BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.030 and 1993 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and
phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other particulate
matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination thereof.

(2)
"Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more
air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such characteristics and
duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to human health, plant or animal
life, or property, or which unreasonably interfere with enjoyment of life and
property. For the purpose of this chapter, air pollution shall not include air
contaminants emitted in compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.

(3)
"Air quality standard" means an established concentration, exposure
time, and frequency of occurrence of an air contaminant or multiple
contaminants in the ambient air which shall not be exceeded.

(4)
"Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.

(5)
"Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or more
counties.

(6)
"Best available control technology" (BACT) means an emission
limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for each air pollutant
subject to regulation under this chapter emitted from or that results from any
new or modified stationary source, that the permitting authority, on a
case-by-case basis, taking into account energy, environmental, and economic
impacts and other costs, determines is achievable for such a source or
modification through application of production processes and available methods,
systems, and techniques, including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or
innovative fuel combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In
no event shall application of "best available control technology"
result in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed by
any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they exist on
July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by reference by the
director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing clean fuels, or any
other means, to comply with this subsection shall not be allowed to increase
above levels that would have been required under the definition of BACT as it
existed prior to enactment of the (([federal])) federal clean air
act amendments of 1990.

(7)
"Best available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission
limitation based on the degree of reduction achievable through the application
of the best system of continuous emission reduction for each pollutant that is
emitted by an existing stationary facility. The emission limitation must be
established, on a case-by-case basis, taking into consideration the technology
available, the costs of compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental
impacts of compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence
at the source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of
improvement in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to result from
the use of the technology.

(8)
"Board" means the board of directors of an authority.

(9)
"Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of any
authority.

(10)
"Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.

(11)
"Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the ambient air.

(12)
"Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter that
limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air contaminants on
a continuous basis, including any requirement relating to the operation or maintenance
of a source to assure continuous emission reduction, and any design, equipment,
work practice, or operational standard adopted under the federal clean air act
or this chapter.

(13)
"Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source that
rate of emissions that reflects:

(a)
The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the implementation
plan of any state for such class or category of source, unless the owner or
operator of the proposed source demonstrates that such limitations are not
achievable; or

(b)
The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in practice by such
class or category of source, whichever is more stringent.

In
no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed new or modified
source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount allowable under applicable
new source performance standards.

(14)
"Modification" means any physical change in, or change in the method
of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount of any air
contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission of any air
contaminant not previously emitted. The term modification shall be construed
consistent with the definition of modification in Section 7411, Title 42,
United States Code, and with rules implementing that section.

(15)
"Multicounty authority" means an authority which consists of two or
more counties.

(16)
"New source" means (a) the construction or modification of a
stationary source that increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted by
such source or that results in the emission of any air contaminant not
previously emitted, and (b) any other project that constitutes a new source
under the federal clean air act.

(17)
"Permit program source" means a source required to apply for or to
maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.

(18)
"Person" means an individual, firm, public or private corporation,
association, partnership, political subdivision of the state, municipality, or
governmental agency.

(19)
"PM-10 emissions" means finely divided solid or liquid material,
including condensible particulate matter, with an aerodynamic diameter less
than or equal to a nominal 10 micrometers emitted to the ambient air as
measured by an applicable reference method, or an equivalent or alternate
method, specified in Appendix M of 40 C.F.R. Part 51 or by a test method
specified in the Washington state implementation plan as the appendix and plan
exist on the effective date of this section.

(20)
"Reasonably available control technology" (RACT) means the lowest
emission limit that a particular source or source category is capable of
meeting by the application of control technology that is reasonably available
considering technological and economic feasibility. RACT is determined on a
case-by-case basis for an individual source or source category taking into
account the impact of the source upon air quality, the availability of
additional controls, the emission reduction to be achieved by additional
controls, the impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a source or
source category shall be adopted only after notice and opportunity for comment
are afforded.

(((20)))
(21) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber on
forest land consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.

(((21)))
(22) "Source" means all of the emissions units including
quantifiable fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more contiguous or
adjacent properties, and are under the control of the same person, or persons
under common control, whose activities are ancillary to the production of a
single product or functionally related group of products.

(((22)))
(23) "Stationary source" means any building, structure,
facility, or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of ecology shall establish a program requiring a reduction in
emissions from burning conducted in association with the production of cereal
grains. The program shall reduce these emissions in the state by fifty percent
over a ten-year period beginning January 1, 1999. The program shall be
established for the reduction of emissions, not for a reduction of the acreage
used in the production of cereal grains or of the acreage burned in association
with that production. The reduction in the emissions shall be measured by the
reduction in PM-10 emissions from such burning. Permits issued by any entity
under this chapter for burning conducted in association with the production of
cereal grains shall be consistent with the department's emission reduction
program established under this section.

(2)
Using the best information available to it, the department of ecology shall
estimate the amount of PM-10 emissions caused by such burning during calendar
year 1998 and use this emission level as the emission base against which
reductions shall be measured during the ten-year period. The emission
reductions necessary to achieve a fifty percent reduction in the base emission
level shall be equally spread over the ten-year period: PM-10 emissions from
such burning in the first year of the period shall be reduced to ninety-five
percent of the PM-10 emissions from such burning in the base year, ninety
percent of the base year in year two of the period, and so forth.

(3) Activities not associated with the routine production of cereal
grains, such as the clearing of land in grassy cover under a federal
conservation reserve program to bring the land into production for cereal
grains, shall not be counted toward the emissions to be reduced under this
section.

---
END ---