BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW to read as follows:

Every
insurer holding a certificate of authority from the commissioner shall file its
financial statements as required by this code and by the commissioner in
accordance with the accounting practices and procedures manuals as adopted by
the national association of insurance commissioners, unless otherwise provided
by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.36A RCW to read as follows:

Every
fraternal benefit society holding a certificate of authority shall file its
financial statements as required by this code and by the commissioner in
accordance with the accounting practices and procedures manuals as adopted by
the national association of insurance commissioners, unless otherwise provided
by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Every health carrier holding a registration from the commissioner
shall file its financial statements as required by this code and by the commissioner
in accordance with the accounting practices and procedures manuals as adopted
by the national association of insurance commissioners, unless otherwise
provided by law.

---
END ---