BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.118.021 and 1998 c 298 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means new motor vehicle arbitration board.

(2)
"Collateral charges" means any sales or lease related charges
including but not limited to sales tax, use tax, arbitration service fees,
unused license fees, unused registration fees, unused title fees, finance
charges, prepayment penalties, credit disability and credit life insurance
costs not otherwise refundable, any other insurance costs prorated for time out
of service, transportation charges, dealer preparation charges, or any other
charges for service contracts, undercoating, rustproofing, or factory or dealer
installed options.

(3)
"Condition" means a general problem that results from a defect or
malfunction of one or more parts, or their improper installation by the
manufacturer, its agents, or the new motor vehicle dealer.

(4)
"Consumer" means any person who has entered into an agreement or
contract for the transfer, lease, or purchase of a new motor vehicle, other
than for purposes of resale or sublease, during the duration of the warranty
period defined under this section.

(5)
"Court" means the superior court in the county where the consumer
resides, except if the consumer does not reside in this state, then the
superior court in the county where an arbitration hearing or determination was
conducted or made pursuant to this chapter.

(6)
"Incidental costs" means any reasonable expenses incurred by the
consumer in connection with the repair of the new motor vehicle, including any
towing charges and the costs of obtaining alternative transportation.

(7)
"Manufacturer" means any person engaged in the business of
constructing or assembling new motor vehicles or engaged in the business of
importing new motor vehicles into the United States for the purpose of selling
or distributing new motor vehicles to new motor vehicle dealers.
"Manufacturer" does not include any person engaged in the business of
set-up of motorcycles as an agent of a new motor vehicle dealer if the person
does not otherwise construct or assemble motorcycles.

(8)
"Motorcycle" means any motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330 which
has an engine displacement of at least seven hundred fifty cubic centimeters.

(9)
"Motor home" means a vehicular unit designed to provide temporary
living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, built on or
permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis or on a chassis
cab or van that is an integral part of the completed vehicle.

(10)
"Motor home manufacturer" means the first stage manufacturer, the
component manufacturer, and the final stage manufacturer.

(a)
"First stage manufacturer" means a person who manufactures incomplete
new motor vehicles such as chassis, chassis cabs, or vans, that are directly
warranted by the first stage manufacturer to the consumer, and are completed by
a final stage manufacturer into a motor home.

(b)
"Component manufacturer" means a person who manufactures components
used in the manufacture or assembly of a chassis, chassis cab, or van that is
completed into a motor home and whose components are directly warranted by the
component manufacturer to the consumer.

(c)
"Final stage manufacturer" means a person who assembles, installs, or
permanently affixes a body, cab, or equipment to an incomplete new motor
vehicle such as a chassis, chassis cab, or van provided by a first stage manufacturer,
to complete the vehicle into a motor home.

(11)
"New motor vehicle" means any new ((self-propelled)) vehicle,
including a new motorcycle, primarily designed for the transportation of
persons or property over the public highways that was originally purchased or
leased at retail from a new motor vehicle dealer or leasing company in this
state, and that was initially registered in this state or for which a temporary
motor vehicle license was issued pursuant to RCW 46.16.460, but does not include
vehicles purchased or leased by a business as part of a fleet of ten or more
vehicles at one time or under a single purchase or lease agreement. If the
motor vehicle is a motor home, this chapter ((shall apply)) applies
to the entire vehicle, including the self-propelled vehicle and chassis,
((but does not include)) and those portions of the vehicle
designated, used, or maintained primarily as a mobile dwelling, office, or
commercial space. The term "new motor vehicle" also includes a
travel trailer as defined by RCW 46.04.623 that was purchased new from a mobile
home and travel trailer dealer, as defined in RCW 46.70.011. The term
"new motor vehicle" does not include trucks with nineteen thousand
pounds or more gross vehicle weight rating. The term "new motor
vehicle" includes a demonstrator or lease-purchase vehicle as long as a
manufacturer's warranty was issued as a condition of sale.

(12)
"New motor vehicle dealer" means a person who holds a dealer
agreement with a manufacturer for the sale of new motor vehicles, who is
engaged in the business of purchasing, selling, servicing, exchanging, or
dealing in new motor vehicles, and who is licensed or required to be licensed
as a vehicle dealer by the state of Washington.

(13)
"Nonconformity" means a defect, serious safety defect, or condition
that substantially impairs the use, value, or safety of a new motor vehicle,
but does not include a defect or condition that is the result of abuse,
neglect, or unauthorized modification or alteration of the new motor vehicle.

(14)
"Purchase price" means the cash price of the new motor vehicle
appearing in the sales agreement or contract.

(a)
"Purchase price" in the instance of a lease means the actual written
capitalized cost disclosed to the consumer contained in the lease agreement.
If there is no disclosed capitalized cost in the lease agreement the
"purchase price" is the manufacturer's suggested retail price
including manufacturer installed accessories or items of optional equipment
displayed on the manufacturer label, required by 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1232.

(b)
"Purchase price" in the instance of both a vehicle purchase or lease
agreement includes any allowance for a trade-in vehicle but does not include
any manufacturer-to-consumer rebate appearing in the agreement or contract that
the consumer received or that was applied to reduce the purchase or lease cost.

Where
the consumer is a subsequent transferee and the consumer selects repurchase of
the motor vehicle, "purchase price" means the consumer's subsequent
purchase price. Where the consumer is a subsequent transferee and the consumer
selects replacement of the motor vehicle, "purchase price" means the
original purchase price.

(15)
"Reasonable offset for use" means the definition provided in RCW
19.118.041(1)(c) for a new motor vehicle other than a new motorcycle. The
reasonable offset for use for a new motorcycle shall be computed by the number
of miles that the vehicle traveled before the manufacturer's acceptance of the
vehicle upon repurchase or replacement multiplied by the purchase price, and
divided by twenty-five thousand.

(16)
"Reasonable number of attempts" means the definition provided in RCW
19.118.041.

(17)
"Replacement motor vehicle" means a new motor vehicle that is
identical or reasonably equivalent to the motor vehicle to be replaced, as the
motor vehicle to be replaced existed at the time of original purchase or lease,
including any service contract, undercoating, rustproofing, and factory or
dealer installed options.

(18)
"Serious safety defect" means a life-threatening malfunction or
nonconformity that impedes the consumer's ability to control or operate the new
motor vehicle for ordinary use or reasonable intended purposes or creates a
risk of fire or explosion.

(19)
"Subsequent transferee" means a consumer who acquires a motor
vehicle, within the warranty period, as defined in this section, with an
applicable manufacturer's written warranty and where the vehicle otherwise met
the definition of a new motor vehicle at the time of original retail sale or
lease.

(20)
"Substantially impair" means to render the new motor vehicle
unreliable, or unsafe for ordinary use, or to diminish the resale value of the
new motor vehicle below the average resale value for comparable motor vehicles.

(21)
"Warranty" means any implied warranty, any written warranty of the
manufacturer, or any affirmation of fact or promise made by the manufacturer in
connection with the sale of a new motor vehicle that becomes part of the basis
of the bargain. The term "warranty" pertains to the obligations of
the manufacturer in relation to materials, workmanship, and fitness of a new
motor vehicle for ordinary use or reasonably intended purposes throughout the
duration of the warranty period as defined under this section.

(22) "Warranty period" means the period ending two years
after the date of the original delivery to the consumer of a new motor vehicle,
or the first twenty-four thousand miles of operation, whichever occurs first.

---
END ---