BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

When
applicable, the certificate of registration must include a statement that the
owner or entity operating a commercial vehicle must be in compliance with the
requirements of the United States department of transportation federal motor
carrier safety regulations contained in Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382, controlled
substances and alcohol use and testing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW to read as follows:

A
person or employer operating as a motor carrier shall comply with the
requirements of the United States department of transportation federal motor
carrier safety regulations as contained in Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382, controlled
substances and alcohol use and testing. A person or employer who begins or
conducts commercial motor vehicle operations without having a controlled
substance and alcohol testing program that is in compliance with the
requirements of Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382 is subject to a penalty, under the
process set forth in RCW 46.32.100, of up to one thousand five hundred dollars
and up to an additional five hundred dollars for each motor vehicle driver
employed by the person or employer who is not in compliance with the motor
vehicle driver testing requirements. A person or employer having actual
knowledge that a driver has tested positive for controlled substances or
alcohol who allows a positively tested person to continue to perform a
safety-sensitive function is subject to a penalty, under the process set forth
in RCW 46.32.100, of one thousand five hundred dollars.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 81.04 RCW to read as follows:

A person or employer operating as a motor carrier shall comply with
the requirements of the United States department of transportation federal
motor carrier safety regulations as contained in Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382,
controlled substances and alcohol use and testing. A person or employer who
begins or conducts commercial motor vehicle operations without having a
controlled substance and alcohol testing program that is in compliance with the
requirements of Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382 is subject to a penalty, under the
process set forth in RCW 81.04.405, of up to one thousand five hundred dollars
and up to an additional five hundred dollars for each motor vehicle driver
employed by the person or employer who is not in compliance with the motor
vehicle driver testing requirements. A person or employer having actual knowledge
that a driver has tested positive for controlled substances or alcohol who
allows a positively tested person to continue to perform a safety-sensitive
function is subject to a penalty, under the process set forth in RCW 81.04.405,
of one thousand five hundred dollars.

---
END ---