BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.80.070 and 1963 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No "motor carrier," "common carrier," "contract
carrier," or "temporary carrier" shall operate for the
transportation of property for compensation in this state without first obtaining
from the commission a permit so to do. Permits heretofore issued or hereafter
issued to any carrier, shall be exercised by said carrier to the fullest extent
so as to render reasonable service to the public. Applications for common or
contract carrier permits or extensions thereof shall be on file for a period of
at least thirty days prior to the granting thereof unless the commission finds
that special conditions require the earlier granting thereof.

(2)
A permit or extension thereof shall be issued to any qualified applicant
therefor, authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by the
application, if it is found that the applicant is fit, willing, and able
properly to perform the services proposed and conform to the provisions of this
chapter and the requirements, rules and regulations of the commission
thereunder, and that such operations will be consistent with the public
interest, and, in the case of common carriers, that the same are or will be
required by the present or future public convenience and necessity, otherwise
such application shall be denied.

(3)
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to confer upon any person
or persons the exclusive right or privilege of transporting property for
compensation over the public highways of the state.

(4)(a)
Failure to obtain the permit required under subsection (1) of this section is
punishable by a civil fine of five thousand dollars.

(b) The commission shall enjoin the carrier from operating
without the proper permit from the commission.

---
END ---