BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is collected
by the use of a motor carrier intelligent transportation system or any
comparable information equipment attached to a truck, tractor, or trailer is
confidential and not subject to public disclosure under this chapter. However,
the information may be given to other governmental agencies or the owners of
the truck, tractor, or trailer from which the information is obtained. As used
in this section, "motor carrier" has the same definition as provided
in RCW 81.80.010.

---
END ---