BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that there is an increasing need and demand for
apprenticeship training resulting from both major construction projects and the
implementation of the Washington state WorkFirst program to reform welfare.
Major public and private construction projects are already planned or
anticipated during the next decade in the areas of transportation, schools,
colleges, universities, stadiums, hotels, and other tourist facilities. The
combined effect of the increasing demand for skilled construction trade workers
and the growing desire on the part of welfare recipients to obtain the necessary
skills to move to good paying jobs is straining the state's current
apprenticeship programs. The legislature therefore finds that a comprehensive
analysis is needed of the projected demand for apprenticeship training and the
most effective ways to meet that demand and that the cost of conducting such an
analysis would be less than fifty thousand dollars.

(2)
The office of program research in the house of representatives shall be
responsible for selecting and monitoring a study contractor. The study shall
be completed by December 1, 1999, and shall report on:

(a)
The number of students currently enrolled in apprenticeship training programs,
by program and institution;

(b)
The institutions or organizations delivering apprenticeship training;

(c)
The facilities used to deliver apprenticeship training;

(d)
How apprenticeship training is coordinated and monitored;

(e)
Current funding levels and allocation procedures;

(f)
Linkages between apprenticeship training programs and other state programs
including the WorkFirst welfare reform program and correctional institutions'
training programs;

(g)
A review and analysis of current literature regarding the delivery and funding
of apprenticeship training;

(h)
An identification of other states that have apprenticeship training needs
similar to those of Washington state and those states identified through the
literature review to be considered leaders in the provision of apprenticeship
training;

(i)
An exploration of public and private capital funding for apprenticeship
training facilities; and

(j)
Recommendations regarding the delivery of apprenticeship training in Washington
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---