BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW to read as follows:

A person who kills a domestic animal belonging to another person
without the owner's permission or other legal justification is liable for
damages in a minimum amount of one thousand five hundred dollars plus
reasonable attorneys' fees as granted by the court.

---
END ---