BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in
this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof
as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the
period ending June 30, 2001, out of the several funds specified in this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Numbers in parentheses refer to project identifier codes established by the
office of financial management. For projects with two identifier codes, the
first identifier code refers to the reappropriation and the second identifier
code refers to the new appropriation. The office of financial management will
separately account for expenditures under each identifier code.

PART
1

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR
THE COURT
OF APPEALS

Division
II Court and Office: Renovation (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR

Salmon
Recovery Program

The
appropriations in this section are for the salmon recovery office within the
office of the governor to provide grants to local governments for salmon and
steelhead projects and activities in accordance with a grant from the department
of interior, United States fish and wildlife service.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,000,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 9,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,750,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

Northwest
Washington Regional Archives: HVAC system upgrade and balancing (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 70,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Tumwater
Records Center: Expansion (00-2-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,550,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Puget
Sound Archives Building (94-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,540,125

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,740,125

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Birch
Bay Records Storage: Asbestos Abatement (94-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 89,355

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 110,645

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Eastern
Branch Archives Building: Design (98-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for completion of the design
phase for the eastern regional archives facility to be sited on the south
campus of the Riverpoint higher education park in Spokane.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 48,645

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 530,972

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,135,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,714,617

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER

Fund
Transfers

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account:

For
transfer to the Salmon Recovery Account..... $ 6,800,000

Water
Quality Account:

For
transfer to the Salmon Recovery Account..... $ 4,500,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account:

For
transfer to the Salmon Recovery Account..... $ 3,700,000

Local
Toxics Control Account:

For
transfer to the Salmon Recovery Account..... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Economic Revitalization (86-1-001) (00-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section from the public facilities construction loan
revolving account is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

The
department shall ensure that all funds transferred from the public works
assistance account into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account during the 1997-99 biennium are used only for loans to local
governments. The department shall also ensure that all principal and interest
payments from these loans are paid into the public works assistance account.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 1,539,515

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 9,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 11,039,515

Appropriation:

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 13,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 559,003

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 36,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 60,598,518

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

County
Public Facility Construction (00-2-010)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for financial assistance to
distressed counties that have experienced extraordinary costs due to the
location of a major new business facility or the substantial expansion of an
existing business facility in the county.

(2)
$3,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to support the
Grays Harbor water system project.

Appropriation:

Distressed
County Facilities Construction

Loan
Account‑-State...................... $ 7,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Interpretive
Centers

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$350,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the Burke museum of
natural history to conduct a predesign study for a new museum.

(2)
$150,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to purchase a
portion of the Mukai farm and garden. Each dollar expended from the amount in
this subsection shall be matched by at least one dollar from nonstate sources
for the same purpose.

(3)
$250,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a grant to the Seattle
Chinese garden. Each dollar expended from the amount in this subsection shall
be matched by at least one dollar from nonstate sources for the same purpose.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public
Works Trust Fund (94-2-001) (00-2-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$10,000,000 of the new appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
preconstruction program as set forth in RCW 43.155.068.

(2)
$2,000,000 of the new appropriation in this section is for the emergency loan
program as set forth in RCW 43.155.065.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 179,446,108

Appropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 213,150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 68,904,717

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 852,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,314,100,825

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing
Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (88-5-015) (00-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$5,000,000 of the new appropriation is provided solely to promote development
of safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social and
health services. If this amount is not expended by June 30, 2001, any
unexpended amount shall be available for reappropriation to projects eligible
for funding under the housing assistance, weatherization, and affordable
housing programs.

(2)
$800,000 of the reappropriation is provided solely to promote development of
safe and affordable housing units for persons eligible for services from the
division of developmental disabilities within the department of social and
health services.

(3)
Any organization receiving a loan or grant from the appropriation in this
section shall agree, as a condition of this loan or grant, to participate in a
local crime prevention program with the local law enforcement agency.

(4)
The reappropriation in this section shall not be included in the annual funds
available for determining the administrative costs authorized under RCW
43.185.050.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 22,000,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 65,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 43,790,503

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 330,790,503

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 114. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Development
Loan Fund (88-2-006) (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 558,716

Washington
State Development Loan

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,439,932

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,998,648

Appropriation:

Washington
State Development Loan

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 805,237

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,303,885

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 115. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Building
for the Arts (92-5-100) (00-2-005)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The following projects are eligible for funding:

Location Recommendation

Projects
Previously Approved

Columbia
Theatre (Phase II), Longview $75,000

Mt.
Baker Theatre (Phase II), Bellingham $137,000

People's
Lodge, Seattle $256,000

Seattle
Symphony, Seattle $1,600,000

New
Projects

Arts
West, Seattle $262,000

Bellevue
Art Museum, Bellevue $1,250,000

Chewelah
Com. Celebrations, Chewelah $6,500

Children's
Museum/Spokane, Spokane $62,000

Columbia
Point (Phase II), Richland $428,000

Everett
Theatre, Everett $91,000

Filipino-American
Community Hall, Bainbridge Island $32,000

Gladish
Center, Pullman $36,000

Harlequin
Productions, Olympia $170,000

Harrington
Opera House, Harrington $35,000

Icicle
Creek Music Center, Leavenworth $54,000

Intiman
Theatre, Seattle $380,000

International
Glass Museum, Tacoma $750,000

Kirkland
Arts Center, Kirkland $9,900

Knutzen
Theatre, Federal Way $413,000

Maple
Hall, La Conner $135,000

Nisqually
Cultural Museum, Olympia $2,400

Pottery
Northwest, Seattle $298,000

Richard
Hugo House, Seattle $50,000

Spokane
Civic Theatre, Spokane $69,000

Tacoma
Art Museum, Tacoma $1,250,000

West
Olympic Council/Arts, Forks $18,000

Total
All Projects $7,869,800

(2)
State grants shall not exceed fifteen percent of either the estimated total
capital cost or actual capital cost of a project, whichever is less. The
remaining portions of the project capital costs shall be a match from nonstate
sources. The nonstate match may include cash, the value of real property when
acquired solely for the purpose of the project, and in-kind contributions. The
department is authorized to set matching requirements for individual projects.

(3)
State grants shall be distributed in the order in which matching requirements
are met. The department may fund projects that demonstrate adequate progress
and have secured the necessary match funding. The department may require that
projects recompete for funding.

(4)
State grants shall be used only for capital costs of a project and shall not be
used for replenishment or deposit into an endowment or other similar fund for
future benefit of the organization.

(5)
By December 15, 1999, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature on the progress of the building for the
arts program, including a list of projects funded under this section.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,099,519

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,444,375

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,143,894

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 116. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Services Facilities Program (98-2-007) (00-2-006)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,416,470

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,022,997

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,439,467

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 117. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (98-2-008) (00-2-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding from the state shall be matched with new federal sources to improve the
quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be provided solely for
projects that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2)
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2000, on the progress of the program, including administrative and
technical assistance procedures, the application process, and funding
priorities.

Reappropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 9,058,862

Appropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 7,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 36,758,862

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 118. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Cedar
River Dredging

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for a grant to the city of
Renton for dredging the Cedar river where it enters Lake Washington.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 119. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Boarding
Home Fire Safety Incentive Program (00-2-008)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for grants for the
installation or retrofit of fire sprinklers in licensed boarding homes.

(2)
The department, in consultation with the state fire marshal, the department of
social and health services, the joint legislative and executive long-term care
task force, and boarding home trade associations, shall develop rules to
implement the grant program.

(3)
To be eligible for a grant under this section, a boarding home must be licensed
by the department of social and health services. At least fifteen percent of
the licensed boarding home's residents must be eligible for services from the
department of social and health services, and the boarding home must maintain
that percentage for a period of no less than three years. If the fifteen
percent resident eligibility for services from the department of social and
health services is not maintained, then the licensed boarding home shall
reimburse the state for the amount of the grant plus appropriate interest.

(4)
Any licensed boarding home receiving a grant shall complete the installation or
retrofit of the fire sprinklers by June 30, 2001.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,400,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 1,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 120. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing
for Homeless Families With Children Program (00-2-009)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the development of
additional emergency shelters and transitional housing opportunities for
homeless families with children. The department shall endeavor to minimize the
amount of these funds that are used for staff and administrative purposes.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 121. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Farm
Worker Housing Assistance (00-2-011)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation is provided solely for low-income farm worker housing and
low-income temporary farm worker facilities.

(2)
$2,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for land acquisition in areas that
would facilitate development of low-income farm worker housing and facilities.

(3)
It is the intent of the legislature that operation of the facilities built
under this section be in compliance with 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1324.

(4)
The department shall endeavor to minimize the amount of these funds that are
utilized for staff and administrative purposes.

(5)
By December 15, 1999, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on the progress of the development of housing for
farm workers, including a list of projects funded under this section.

(6)
The department shall work with the farm worker housing advisory committee to
prioritize funding of projects to the areas of highest need.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 122. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seventh
Street Theatre (90-2-008)

If
the project funded from the reappropriation in this section is not
substantially complete by July 1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 123,984

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 123,984

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 123. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Snohomish
County Drainage (92-2-011)

The
reappropriation in this section shall be matched by at least $585,000 provided
from nonstate sources for capital costs of this project. If the project funded
from the reappropriation in this section is not substantially complete by July
1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 344,829

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 344,829

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 124. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Challenger
Learning Center (93-5-006)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation is provided solely for support of science education at the
Challenger learning center at the museum of flight.

(2)
Each dollar expended from the reappropriation in this section shall be matched
by at least one dollar from nonstate sources for the same purpose.

(3)
If the project funded from the reappropriation in this section is not
substantially complete by July 1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 61,673

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 258,639

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 320,312

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 125. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Washington
Technology Center: Equipment (94-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for equipment installation
on the first floor of Fluke Hall. The reappropriation shall be transferred and
administered by the University of Washington.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,435

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,435

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 126. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Olympic
Peninsula Natural History Museum (94-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each two dollars expended from this reappropriation shall be matched by at
least one dollar from other sources. The match may include cash, land, and
in-kind donations.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that this reappropriation represents a
one-time grant for this project.

(3)
If the project funded from the reappropriation in this section is not
substantially complete by July 1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 164,827

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 164,827

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 127. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Thorp
Grist Mill (94-2-007)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The total state funding in this section shall be matched by at least $47,500
from nonstate and nonfederal sources. The match may include cash or in-kind
contributions. The department shall assist the Thorp Mill town historical
preservation society in soliciting moneys from the intermodal surface
transportation efficiency act to support the project.

(2)
If the project funded from the reappropriation in this section is not
substantially complete by July 1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 23,425

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 39,449

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 62,874

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 128. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Daybreak
Star Center (94-2-100)

If
the project funded from the reappropriation in this section is not
substantially complete by July 1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 155,274

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 514,416

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 669,690

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 129. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Timber
Ports Capital Asset Improvement (94-2-102)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided to continue assisting the ports of
Grays Harbor, Port Angeles, and Longview with infrastructure development and
facilities improvements to increase economic diversity and enhance employment
opportunities. The reappropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each port shall provide, at a minimum, six dollars of nonstate match for every
five dollars received from the reappropriation. The match may include cash and
land value.

(2)
State assistance to each port shall not exceed the following amounts:

Port Amount

Grays
Harbor $ 564,000

Port
Angeles $1,500,000

Longview $1,855,000

(3)
If the projects funded from the reappropriation in this section are not
substantially complete by July 1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 941,479

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)................ ... $ 1,359,689

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,301,168

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 130. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Mirabeau
Point Community Complex (98-2-010)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The amount is provided solely for a grant to Spokane county for design and
development costs for Mirabeau Point community complex.

(2)
The amount represents the entire state contribution to the project and shall be
matched by $8,500,000 in contributions toward the project from nonstate
sources.

(3)
If the project funded from the reappropriation in this section is not
substantially complete by July 1, 2000, the reappropriation shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,206,437

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................. ................. $ 1,206,437

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 131. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Infrastructure
Needs Assessment (99-2-008)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The public works board, in consultation with the department of community,
trade, and economic development, shall contract for a local government
infrastructure needs assessment. The board shall issue a progress report to
the governor, house of representatives capital budget committee, the senate
ways and means committee, the joint legislative transportation committee, the
house of representatives' government administration committee, and the senate
government operations committee by January 31, 1999. The final report shall be
delivered by June 30, 1999.

(2)
The infrastructure needs assessment shall use local capital improvement plans,
to the extent available, to identify local government infrastructure needs for
the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation,
or improvements necessary for the next six years. The definitions and
principles to be used in determining infrastructure needs shall be those set
forth in chapter 36.70A RCW, including economic development. The
infrastructure assessment shall also include a listing, description, and
evaluation of use of all private and public financing options, and policy
alternatives that would assist in meeting local government infrastructure
needs. For the purpose of this infrastructure needs assessment:

(a)
Local government shall include each city, town, and each water, sewer, storm
water, and public utility district providing water or sewer services in the
state of Washington.

(b)
Infrastructure shall be limited to bridges, roadways, domestic water, sanitary
sewer, and storm water systems.

(3)
The board shall contract for the collection and review of local capital
expenditure data, the evaluation of local government infrastructure needs, the
projection of future infrastructure needs, including needs to meet requirements
under chapter 36.70A RCW. The board shall also contract for the development of
criteria for a data base which can be maintained and updated, and such other
matters as the board may deem necessary to provide an adequate representation
of local capital needs and the ability of local governments to finance such
needs.

(4)
The legislative evaluation and accountability program shall cooperate with the
department in the completion of the infrastructure needs assessment and may
enter into interagency agreements. The legislative evaluation and
accountability program shall develop the structure of the local government
infrastructure data base and provide recommendations on the maintenance of the
data base. The data base shall: Use the data compiled by and be compatible
with that developed by the board's contractor; and have a structure to maintain
its future use and update.

The
department shall provide a compilation of all capital improvement plans
prepared by local governments. The department shall identify: Federal, state,
and local infrastructure financing sources currently in use; all revenue
sources available, but fully used by each local government, and obstacles to
full use; and the compilation of local government expenditures for
infrastructure investments by source of funds and by jurisdiction for the
period beginning January 1, 1993, and ending December 31, 1997, for local
governments with a population greater than fifty thousand; and January 1, 1995,
and ending December 31, 1997, for local governments with fewer than fifty
thousand population.

(5)
The board shall convene an advisory committee of stakeholders to include
representatives from the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program, the association of Washington cities, the Washington
association of realtors, the national association of industrial office
properties, the building industry association of Washington, the associated
general contractors, the association of Washington business, Washington state
building and construction trades council, and 1000 friends of Washington. The
board may, as it deems necessary, use technical advisory groups or state
agencies in addition to the advisory committee to assist itself in implementing
this proviso.

The
advisory committee shall assist the board in guiding the infrastructure
assessment and in developing interpretation of this proviso as necessary. The
committee shall establish criteria and categorize infrastructure projects as
necessary to meet the requirements set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW, or as
reflective of other community priorities, and review elements and standards of
infrastructure needs identified in the study.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 132. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Emergency
Flood and Erosion Repairs (99-2-009)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely to continue shoreline
repairs at Ocean Shores to prevent further erosion and for flood control.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 150,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 133. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Budget
System Improvements (00-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)............ ... $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 134. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Colocated
Cascadia Branch Campus (94-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 15,421,888

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,421,888

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 135. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Year
2000 Building, Facility, and Equipment Date Conversion (99-1-001)

The
office of financial management shall allocate reappropriations to be used by
state agencies and universities in performing Year 2000 assessments of facility
management systems, control systems, and other computer systems related to
capital facilities and equipment. Amounts provided in this reappropriation may
also be allocated for corrective measures on a priority basis to address
critical system repairs.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 136. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Emergency
and Small Repairs (00-1-002)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 100,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-State $ 775,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 875,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,076,473

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,151,473

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 137. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol
Campus Facilities: Preservation (00-1-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
$225,000 is provided solely for the capitol campus power house.

(3)
$855,000 is provided solely to replace the main electrical panels with new
transformers and replace elevator controls at the insurance building.

(4)
$400,000 is provided solely for electrical improvements at the temple of justice
building.

(5)
$3,500,000 is provided solely for interior and exterior building repairs and
upgrades to the public and nonpublic areas of the capitol campus mansion.

(6)
$225,000 is provided solely for interior and exterior improvements to the press
houses.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 4,950,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,940,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,240,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,240,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 138. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General
Administration Building: Preservation (00-1-004)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,175,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,175,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 139. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Alaska
Street Building: Renovation (00-1-005)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 140. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Washington
State Training and Conference Center: Preservation (00-1-008)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
The department shall coordinate all work with the tenants of the center.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 125,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,125,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,325,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 141. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Thurston
County Facilities: Preservation (00-1-009)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
The department shall coordinate all work with the tenants in facilities
undergoing preservation work.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 500,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,225,000

-------------

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 10,225,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 142. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

North
Cascades Gateway Center: Preservation (00-1-010)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
The department shall coordinate all work with the tenants of the center.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 607,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,407,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,770,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,177,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 143. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Engineering
and Architectural Services: Project management (00-2-007)

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 200,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 700,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,100,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 200,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 37,550,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 144. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

East
Plaza and Plaza Garage Repairs (96-1-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 1,800,000

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 1,950,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,450,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,395,572

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 30,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 43,595,572

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 145. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative
Buildings: Safety and infrastructure (98-1-005)

The
appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the
office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 179,454

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 475,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 654,454

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 6,250,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 585,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,835,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,415,546

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,905,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 146. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

OB-2
Building: Preservation (98-1-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 1,700,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,900,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 4,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,750,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 40,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 51,650,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 147. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Transportation
Building: Preservation (98-1-008)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 300,000

Appropriation:

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 434,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,234,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 148. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Monumental
Buildings: Cleaning (98-1-011)

Reappropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,300,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 149. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Heritage
Park: Development (98-2-003)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 10,379,774

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,379,774

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 150. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Washington
State Training and Conference Center: Dorm (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:

Public
Safety Reimbursable Bond Account‑-State... $ 1,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 151. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

North
Cascades Gateway Center: Fire Safety Sprinkler Systems (99-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 152. FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Centralia
- Readiness Center: Preservation (00-1-030)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 153. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Energy
Management Systems (00-4-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 278,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 908,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,186,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 154. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp
Murray - Military Support Civilian Activities Center (00-5-002)

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 365,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 385,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 155. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp
Murray Infrastructure: Preservation (96-1-006)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 156. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor
Works: Federal construction projects (98-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,078,400

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,274,100

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,352,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 43,821,100

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,173,600

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 157. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-002)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 158. FOR
THE STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER

Seattle
- Convention Center: Expansion (00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation from the state convention and trade center account is
provided solely for construction of a structure within the convention center to
be occupied by the museum of history and industry.

(2)
The appropriation from the state convention and trade center operations account
is provided solely for additional state mitigation costs, hereby required for
low-income and affordable housing associated with the expansion of the
convention center. The housing division of the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall select the low-income and affordable housing
projects, which shall be distributed throughout King county.

Appropriation:

State
Convention and Trade Center Account‑-

State.................................... $ 5,750,000

State
Convention and Trade Center Operations

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,750,000

(End of part)

PART
2

HUMAN
SERVICES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier
School - Laundry: Equipment (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland
Village: Cottage renovation (00-1-002)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School - Multi-Services Building: Renovation (00-1-003)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Emergency
and Small Repairs (00-1-006)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Mission
Creek Youth Camp - Main Building: Renovation phase II (00-1-010)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child
Study & Treatment Center: Cottage modifications (00-1-015)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 695,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,705,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-018)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 4,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo
Glen - Cottage Renovation (00-1-041)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under section 902 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 75,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 11,100,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,175,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern
State Hospital: Campus renovation phase V (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under section 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 945,250

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 14,014,450

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,959,700

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-019)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School: Wastewater treatment plant (94-1-201)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 419,587

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,852,913

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,272,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Naselle
Youth Camp: Water system improvements (94-1-202)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 148,456

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,017,239

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,165,695

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Ward renovation phase 6 (94-1-316)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 768,458

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,400,765

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,169,223

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Asbestos
Abatement (96-1-002)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 58,680

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,767,319

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,825,999

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Americans
With Disabilities Act Improvements (96-1-003)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 61,899

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 415,953

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 477,852

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Preservation (96-1-004)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 3,562,348

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,245,803

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,808,151

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 11,305,885

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,114,036

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Chlorofluorocarbon
Abatement (96-1-008)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 76,756

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 173,245

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,001

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Juvenile
Facilities Preservation (96-1-020)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 95,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,984,600

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,079,600

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works Projects: Mental health (96-1-030)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 385,105

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,414,287

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,799,392

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works Projects: Division of developmental disabilities (96-1-040)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

(2)
If the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it
shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 113,920

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 957,426

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,071,346

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Underground
Storage Tanks Removal and Replacement (96-1-060)

If
the reappropriations in this section are not expended by June 30, 2000, it
shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 25,651

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 78,872

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 104,523

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 675,268

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 779,791

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maintenance
Management and Planning (96-1-150)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 109,380

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,001

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 309,381

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Medical
Lake Wastewater Treatment Facility (96-1-301)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,158,322

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,356,122

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,014,444

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Replace boiler 1 (96-1-322)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 178,538

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,261,463

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,440,001

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Crisis
Residential Centers (96-1-900)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided to the department of social and
health services for grants to provide secure crisis residential centers
consistent with the plan developed pursuant to the 1995-97 omnibus operating
budget.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 226. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo
Glen: New beds and infrastructure (96-2-229)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,229,358

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,932,411

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,161,769

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 227. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green
Hill School Redevelopment: 416 bed institution (96-2-230)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
Up to $200,000 of the reappropriation may be used to purchase property to
accommodate either off-site parking, or to increase the buffer between Green
Hill School's secure perimeter and adjacent neighborhoods as required by the
city of Chehalis, or both.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 20,563,742

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 25,568,689

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 46,132,431

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 228. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School: Renovation and infrastructure improvements (96-2-231)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 317,342

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,538,159

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,855,501

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 229. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Mission
Creek Preservation Projects (96-2-233)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 160,190

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,029,887

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,190,077

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 230. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Indian
Ridge Youth Camp: Utility Upgrade (96-2-234)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 74,851

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,446,649

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,521,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 231. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Underground
Storage Tank Pool (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 130,495

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 99,505

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 230,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 232. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Asbestos
and Demolition Pool (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 399,113

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 100,887

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 233. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: South hall HVAC retrofit (98-1-041)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 958,128

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 41,872

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 234. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Renovate
Main Building: Mission Creek (98-1-166)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,589,710

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 910,290

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 235. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Emergency
Projects (98-1-428)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 211,449

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 38,551

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 236. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Americans
with Disabilities Act (98-1-993)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 90,567

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 48,533

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 139,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 237. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern
State Hospital: Legal offender unit (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,297,315

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 12,398,685

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,696,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 238. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Legal offender unit (98-2-052)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The department shall provide the necessary equipment to reduce health and
safety risks of employees operating the new facility.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,683,766

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 43,870,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,681,575

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,730,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 58,965,341

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 239. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Naselle
Youth Camp: Academic school and support space (98-2-154)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 43,239

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,494,269

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,537,508

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 240. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo
Glen: Vocational program addition (98-2-211)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,217

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 370,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 74,783

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,725,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,195,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 241. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School: 124 bed housing replacement/support services (98-2-216)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,681,146

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,651,494

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,332,640

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 242. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

North
Cascades Gateway Center: Safe passage program space (98-2-395)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 267,922

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 61,578

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 329,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 243. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-409)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 347,933

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 495,202

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 843,135

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 244. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH

Waste
Water Treatment System: Upgrade (00-1-008)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 208,802

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 208,802

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 245. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Referendum
38: Water bonds (86-2-099)

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State......... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 199,483

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 699,483

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 246. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public
Health Laboratory: Repairs and improvements (96-1-001)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 99,827

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,071,896

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,171,723

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 857,274

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 537,185

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,233,800

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,799,982

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 247. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Emergency
Power System (96-1-009)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 453,468

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 74,553

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 528,021

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 248. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public
Health Laboratory: Consolidation of facilities (96-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 336,307

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 323,993

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 660,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 249. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (97-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement
with the department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal...... $ 16,133,576

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 17,739,874

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 34,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 67,873,450

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 250. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public
Health Laboratory: Building 5 system upgrade (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 282,774

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 28,266

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 311,040

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 251. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

State-wide
- Master Plan (00-2-015)

The
appropriation in this section is provided to conduct a study of an array of
alternative delivery methods for providing needs-based services to veterans.
The study shall include identification of federal veterans affairs funding
options for state operated, independently contracted, and privately owned
long-term care facilities, an examination of community-based programs compared
to programs at state operated veterans facilities, an examination of the cost
implications of using state medicaid and federal medicare long-term care
services as compared to veterans programs, and development of staffing models
at state veterans facilities and contracted community-based facilities. The
department shall develop the study in consultation with the department of
social and health services' aging and adult services administration. The study
shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the
office of financial management by September 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 252. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Minor
Works: Preservation

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for repairs, renovations, and
improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriation
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 3,450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 253. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Orting:
Dining Hall Remodel (97-1-002)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 750,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 254. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil
- Washington Veterans' Home, Building Exteriors: Upgrade (99-1-001)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 255. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Orting
- Washington Soldiers' Home, Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC: Preservation
(99-1-002)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 256. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-020)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 19,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 100,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 119,900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 257. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Emergency
and Small Repairs (00-1-021)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 1,600,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,600,001

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,000,001

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 258. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Penitentiary - Intensive Management Unit: Improvements (00-1-025)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 259. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex - Twin Rivers: 512-bed expansion (00-2-004)

The
appropriation is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 4,213,355

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 487,045

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,700,400

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 60,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 65,100,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 260. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

McNeil
Island Corrections Center - department of social and health services: Special
Commitment Center (00-2-005)

The
appropriation is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 37,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 39,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 261. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex - Reformatory: 100-bed Intensive Management Unit
(00-2-008)

The
amount in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the project
described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by
the office of financial management. Future appropriations for this project are
subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July
1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 190,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 19,876,800

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,066,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 262. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-010)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 263. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex: Kitchen consolidation/modifications (00-2-011)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 264. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Penitentiary Steam System (96-1-016)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 234,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,641,443

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,875,443

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 265. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Corrections Center for Women: Replace "G" Units with 256 Beds
(96-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 483,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,590,272

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,073,272

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 266. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex - Reformatory: 400-bed facility (96-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 153,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,331,969

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,484,969

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 267. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway
Heights Expansion (96-2-003)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,423,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 17,617,752

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,040,752

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 268. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
Corrections Center for Women Mental Health, Special Needs, and Reception Unit
(96-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,273,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 23,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 227,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 269. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Larch
and Cedar Creek Expansions (96-2-010)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 876,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 21,124,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 270. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam
Bay Corrections Center - Juvenile Justice Program: Improvements (97-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,948,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 552,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 271. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Preservation Projects (98-1-001)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 3,150,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,752,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 13,902,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 31,369,536

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,271,536

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 272. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Underground
Storage Tank and Above Ground Storage Tank Program (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,038,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 932,300

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,970,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 273. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Asbestos Removal (98-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 783,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 272,068

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,055,068

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 274. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Americans with Disabilities Act Compliance Projects (98-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 112,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 59,150

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 171,150

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 275. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Emergency
Funds (98-1-005)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 360,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 970,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,330,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,299,100

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,629,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 276. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Stafford
Creek Corrections Center (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 105,000,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,435,107

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,864,893

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 67,490,800

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 15,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 198,290,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 277. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Reformatory: Convert medium to close custody (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,324,588

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,724,588

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 278. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Tacoma:
Design 400-bed prerelease facility (98-2-003)

The
reappropriation is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,129,047

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 496,653

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,625,700

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 279. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide:
Correctional industries expansion (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,918,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 382,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................ ........ $ 19,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 280. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Expand
Special Offenders Center to 400 Beds (98-2-010)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,507,879

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 6,173,300

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,626,700

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 38,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,327,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,635,279

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 281. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

New
1,936-Bed Multicustody Facility: Predesign and site selection (98-2-011)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 958,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 290,453

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 242,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 243,248,453

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 282. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Programmatic Projects (98-2-013)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 15,150,401

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,550,401

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 283. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
Corrections Center: Replace razor ribbon (99-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 485,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 316,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 801,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 284. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

McNeil
Island Corrections Center: Still harbor dock (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 285. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Reformatory Farm: Dairy animal waste lagoon improvement (99-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 182,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,060,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,242,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 286. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Local
Government Criminal Justice Facilities (99-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the purpose of
construction, developing, expanding, modifying, or improving local jails and
other correctional facilities in accordance with the violent offender
incarceration and truth-in-sentencing grant requirements.

(2)
The department of corrections, in consultation with the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop criteria for allocating moneys
appropriated in this section to local governments.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 639,196

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,960,565

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,599,761

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 287. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Grant
Administration and Minor Improvements (99-2-004)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for costs associated with
administration of the violent offender incarceration and truth-in-sentencing
grant program to local governments and other agencies receiving a subaward from
the grant and minor improvements for correctional facilities.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 120,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 392,113

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 60,851

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 452,964

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 35,550

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 608,514

(End of part)

PART
3

NATURAL
RESOURCES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF ECOLOGY

Purchase
Water Rights

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to purchase water rights for
the purpose of improving stream and river flows in basins with current or
proposed listings of salmon or steelhead under the federal endangered species
act and where low flows have been identified as a limiting factor for salmon
recovery. Expenditures for specific projects or activities shall be approved
only after consultation with the interagency review team established in RCW
75.46.080. If chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No. 2187
(instream water use)), Laws of 1999 is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water
Meters and Gages

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$927,000 is provided solely for stream gages to measure instream flows.

(2)
$473,000 is provided solely for water meters to measure water withdraw or
usage.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
26 Waste Disposal Facilities (74-2-004)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under
contract on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999.

(2)
The office of financial management may grant waivers from this lapse
requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances
after notification of the chairs of the house of representatives capital budget
committee and senate ways and means committee.

(3)
The department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities)‑-State................ $ 2,204,376

Appropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities)‑-State................ $ 1,310,467

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,186,488

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,701,331

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
38 Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under
contract on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999.

(2)
The office of financial management may grant waivers from this lapse
requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances
after notification of the chairs of the house of representatives capital budget
committee and senate ways and means committee.

(3)
The department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State......... $ 6,004,436

Appropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State......... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,320,950

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 13,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 33,325,386

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account (76-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 577,833

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 577,833

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
39 Waste Disposal Facilities (82-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contract
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities 1980)‑-State........... $ 6,113,126

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 12,293,785

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,406,911

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial
Clean Water Fund (86-2-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Up to $25,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Metro/King county.

(2)
Up to $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.

(3)
In awarding state-wide water quality implementation and planning grants and
loans, the department shall give priority consideration to:

(a)
Proposals submitted by communities with populations less than 2,500 and that
have demonstrated an economic hardship that will prevent the completion or
implementation of water quality projects;

(b)
Projects located in basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks; and

(c)
The completion of projects for which design work has been completed.

(4)
$1,500,000 of the new appropriation in this section is provided to correct
failing septic systems that pollute shellfish habitat.

(5)
$5,200,000 of the new appropriation in this section is provided for the
construction of a wastewater treatment plant at the city of Connell.

(6)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under
contract on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracts projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this subsection for specific projects upon
findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of the
house of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and the
senate ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects
funded from the reappropriation in this section.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 32,336,890

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 48,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 158,376,857

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 140,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 378,713,747

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local
Toxics Control Account (88-2-008)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contract
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

Reappropriation:

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State............. $ 25,833,809

Appropriation:

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State............. $ 42,479,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 65,202,174

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 180,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 313,514,983

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Fund (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 55,640,931

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 34,914,688

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 90,555,619

Appropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 32,375,833

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 46,830,366

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 79,206,199

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 120,971,790

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)............ ... $ 320,207,299

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 610,940,907

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Methow
Basin Water Conservation (92-2-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 87,689

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 312,311

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level
Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:

Site
Closure Account‑-State..................... $ 5,443,978

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 989,386

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,433,364

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 312. FOR
THE STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Coastal
Facility Relocation (00-1-005)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 313. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Historic
Structure and Land Use Stewardship Program (00-1-007)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 35,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 314. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lewis
and Clark Trail Bicentennial: Preservation (00-1-010)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 315. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Park
Housing (00-1-014)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 316. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Pacific
County: Seashore conservation (00-1-015)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 317. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Park
Land Trust Account (00-3-001)

Appropriation:

Parkland
Trust Revolving Account‑‑State......... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 318. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Spokane
Centennial Trail (89-5-112)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 319. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide
- Boat Pumpouts: Federal Clean Vessel Act (96-2-008)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 300,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)................ ... $ 211,246

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,411,246

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 320. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Americans
with Disabilities Act Improvements (96-5-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 153,855

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 353,855

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 321. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide
- Emergency Projects (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 198,618

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,650,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,998,618

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 322. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Underground
Storage Tank Replacement (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 493,367

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 345,922

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 939,289

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 323. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Facilities
Preservation: State-wide (98-1-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the
office of financial management.

(2)
$1,000,000 of the state building construction account appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation in this
section are provided on the condition that the parks renewal and stewardship
account receive in excess of $26,000,000 in biennial revenue. These amounts
must be expended on a dollar-for-dollar matching basis.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account‑-State.... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 9,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 643,234

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 31,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,643,234

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 324. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Historic
Facilities Renovation (98-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The reappropriation shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,370,628

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,370,628

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 325. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Park
Roadways: Preservation (98-1-006)

Reappropriation:

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 750,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,140,114

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)... ............ $ 21,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 28,390,114

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 326. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Natural
and Historic Stewardship: State-wide (98-1-007)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list resulting from
the 1996 historic structures condition assessment study which is maintained by
the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 850,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 650,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 327. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

State-wide
- Recreation Development Program (98-2-008)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 920,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,920,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 369,953

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 15,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,289,953

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 328. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Storm
Disaster Recovery (99-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 526,647

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,353

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 530,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 329. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cama
Beach Donation (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account‑-State.... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 330. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating
Facilities (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 1,613,672

Recreation
Resources Account‑-State............. $ 12,098,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 13,711,672

Appropriation:

Recreation
Resources Account‑-State............. $ 8,433,414

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,347,788

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 38,855,506

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 68,348,380

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 331. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway
and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

NOVA
Program Account‑-State..................... $ 7,733,899

Appropriation:

NOVA
Program Account‑-State..................... $ 5,434,090

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,691,855

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 23,141,446

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 44,001,290

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 332. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington
Wildlife and Recreation Program (98-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section for the wildlife and recreation program under
chapter 43.98A RCW and RCW 43.98A.040 are subject to the following condition
and limitation: The new appropriations in this section are provided for the
approved list of projects included in LEAP capital document No.
. . ., as developed on . . ., 1999.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,475,416

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 23,733,311

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 25,872,718

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 56,081,445

Appropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 22,500,000

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 22,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 45,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 58,366,817

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 359,448,262

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 333. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms
Range Program (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:

Firearms
Range Account‑-State................... $ 668,101

Appropriation:

Firearms
Range Account‑-State................... $ 354,400

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 758,960

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,581,461

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 334. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land
and Water Conservation Fund (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-Federal............. $ 252,665

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,578,014

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,830,679

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 335. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

National
Recreation Trails Act (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-Federal............. $ 22,815

Recreation
Resources Account‑-Federal........... $ 589,264

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.... ............. $ 612,079

Appropriation:

Recreation
Resources Account‑-Federal........... $ 1,478,350

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 682,304

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,797,251

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,569,984

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 336. FOR
THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation
Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004)

Expenditures
for specific projects or activities shall be approved only after consultation
with the interagency review team established in RCW 75.46.080.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 337. FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation
Reserve Enhancement Plus Program

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the conservation
reserve enhancement plus program to restore and protect environmentally
sensitive land in riparian areas to protect water quality and improve salmon
and steelhead habitat. The conservation commission shall adopt rules for the
implementation of the program consistent with the requirements of the
conservation reserve enhancement program, except the eligibility is not limited
to agricultural lands and contracts may exceed fifteen years in duration. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation will be used primarily
for landowners that do not qualify for the federal conservation reserve
enhancement program. The appropriation in this section shall not be used for
fee simple land acquisition.

(2)
Expenditures for specific projects or activities shall be approved only after
consultation with the interagency review team established in RCW 75.46.080.

(3)(a)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts are equal to or less than
$50,000,000 during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then $6,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section may be expended.

(b)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts exceed $52,000,000, but are less
than $68,000,000 during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then the amount in (a)
of this subsection, plus an additional amount equal to one-fourth of the
federal grants in excess of $52,000,000, may be expended from the appropriation
in this section.

(c)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts exceed $68,000,000 during the
1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then the amount in (a) of this subsection, plus an
additional $4,000,000, plus an additional amount equal to one-half of the
federal grants in excess of $68,000,000, may be expended from the appropriation
in this section.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 22,950,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,950,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 338. FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Water
Quality Grants Program (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$3,840,000 is provided solely for grants to qualifying conservation districts
for nonpoint water quality projects and programs.

(2)
$80,000 is provided solely for audits of districts receiving grants conducted
by the office of the state auditor.

(3)
Remaining amounts shall be distributed by a competitive process that uses state
priorities to rank proposals from districts.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 1,732,102

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 10,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,232,102

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 339. FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy
Waste Management Grants Program (98-2-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a state-wide grant
program to assist dairy operators in implementing dairy waste management
systems; and

(2)
$1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a state-wide grant
program to provide technical assistance to dairy operators for development and
implementation of dairy waste management plans.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 529,132

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 12,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,529,132

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 340. FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Puget
Sound Action Plan (98-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations are provided solely for grants to conservation districts in
the Puget Sound area for water quality projects and programs contained in the
Puget Sound work plan.

(2)
The grants to the Puget Sound area conservation districts are in addition to
other grant dollars that may be available from the water quality account and
the basic funding grant programs administered by the commission.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 137,071

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 830,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 830,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,320,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,117,071

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 341. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Salmon
Recovery Efforts

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,200,000 of the appropriation from the state building construction account
and $14,500,000 from the salmon recovery account is provided solely for fish
passage barrier correction. Expenditures for specific projects or activities
shall be approved only after consultation with the interagency review team
established in RCW 75.46.080.

(2)
$1,000,000 of the appropriation from the state building construction account is
provided solely for fish screens to protect fish. Expenditures for specific
projects or activities shall be approved only after consultation with the
interagency review team established in RCW 75.46.080.

(3)
$1,100,000 of the appropriation from the state building construction account is
provided solely for contracted engineering services for fish habitat
restoration projects.

(4)
$800,000 of the appropriation from the state building construction account is
provided solely for the department to develop stream corridor guidelines for
salmon recovery and habitat restoration projects.

(5)
$2,750,000 of the appropriation from the salmon recovery account is provided
solely for salmon recovery projects contracted by community-based salmon
groups. Expenditures for specific projects or activities shall be approved
only after consultation with the interagency review team established in RCW
75.46.080.

(6)
$2,750,000 of the appropriation from the salmon recovery account is provided
solely for nonprofit entities to purchase easements to protect high quality
salmon habitat in Puget Sound. For each dollar expended from this
appropriation, one dollar must be provided for the same purpose from nonstate
sources. Nonstate sources may include donated land or in-kind contributions.

(7)
$300,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for developing
selective harvesting techniques and equipment.

(8)
$300,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for
developing and implementing methods for reducing the by catch of salmon and
other endangered or threatened species.

(9)
$200,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for
developing and implementing methods to reduce predatory activity on salmon.

(10)
$200,000 of the state building construction account is provided solely for
restoration efforts for sockeye salmon in Lake Washington.

(11)
Amounts provided in this subsection are provided solely for state agencies,
local government, tribes, regional fish enhancement groups, local volunteer
groups, nonprofit organizations, or private landowners for salmon recovery
projects. No more than $5,000,000 of the amount expended under this subsection
may be allocated to state agencies. Amounts in this subsection may not be used
for fee simple land acquisition. Expenditures for specific projects may be
approved only after consultation with the interagency review team established
in RCW 75.46.080.

(a)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts are equal to or less than
$50,000,000 during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then for the purposes of this
subsection the department may expend $20,000,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation and $1,300,000 of the general fund--private appropriation in this
section.

(b)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts exceed $52,000,000 but are less
than $68,000,000 during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then for purposes of
this subsection the department may expend: (i) The amount in (a) of this
subsection; plus (ii) an additional amount equal to one-fourth of the federal
grants in excess of $52,000,000 from the general fund--federal appropriation in
this section.

(c)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts exceed $68,000,000 during the
1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then for purposes of this subsection the department
may expend: (i) The amount in (a) of this subsection; plus (ii) an additional
$4,000,000 from the general fund--federal appropriation in this section; plus
(iii) an additional amount equal to one-half of the federal grants in excess of
$68,000,000 from the general fund--federal appropriation in this section.

(12)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts exceed $52,000,000 during the
1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then one-half of the amount in excess of
$52,000,000, up to a maximum of $8,000,000, of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation in this section may be used for commercial license buy-back. The
amount in this subsection is provided solely to buy-back commercial licenses
for Washington-based commercial salmon fishers who fish in Washington or Alaska
and who directly target or incidentally catch a threatened or endangered salmon
species. Any expenditure from the amount in this subsection used in connection
with a license buy-back program in another state must be matched by an equal
amount of non-Washington state sources. Washington-based Alaska trollers'
licenses may be bought back only if the state or states buying the license
affirms that at least seventy-five percent of the seller's historic catch is
allowed to pass through Alaskan waters. The amount in this subsection may also
be used as grants for programs that combine license buy-back with programs that
facilitate the funding of a conversion to selective fishing methods.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,100,000

General
Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 44,950,000

General
Fund‑‑Private/Local..................... $ 1,300,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑‑State.................. $ 20,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 71,350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 71,350,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 342. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upland
Wildlife Habitat: Replacement (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 343. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Watchable
Wildlife Program (00-2-007)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 344. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Goldsborough
Creek Restoration

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to remove a fish barrier and
restore habitat on Goldsborough creek. Each dollar expended from this
appropriation shall be matched by at least three dollars from other sources for
the same purpose.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 345. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Grandy
Creek Hatchery (92-5-024)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 67,100

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 67,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 346. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Tideland
Acquisition (94-2-003)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,208,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,792,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 347. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Nemah
Hatchery Building and Incubation System Replacement (96-1-006)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 172,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,528,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 348. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Shellfish
Laboratory and Hatchery Upgrades (96-1-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 190,400

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 115,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 305,400

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 804,578

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,159,978

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 349. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter
Creek Hatchery Renovation (96-2-019)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,100,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 350. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-001)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 330,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,705,303

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,635,303

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 351. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Underground
Storage Tank Removal and Replacement (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 65,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,572,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,662,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 352. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Emergency
Repairs (98-1-003)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 135,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,610,923

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,545,926

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 353. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dam
Inspection and Repair (98-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 50,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,850,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 354. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Facilities
Renovation (98-1-005)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 190,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,984,258

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,774,258

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 355. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery
Renovations (98-1-006)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 16,698,022

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,848,022

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 356. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational
Access Redevelopment (98-1-007)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 60,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 550,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 400,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 950,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,427,787

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,437,787

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 357. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast
and Puget Sound Wild Salmonid Habitat Restoration (98-1-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 11,986,386

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,336,386

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 358. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast
and Puget Sound Wildstock Restoration: Hatcheries (98-1-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 580,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,520,626

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,100,626

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 359. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fish
Protection Facilities (98-1-011)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,382,806

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,432,806

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 360. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

State-wide
Fencing Renovation and Construction (98-1-012)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 85,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,543,070

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,550,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,428,070

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 361. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wildlife
Area Renovation (98-1-013)

Reappropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 85,000

Appropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 288,300

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,912,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,585,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 362. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Issaquah
Hatchery Improvements (98-1-015)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 500,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

-------------

SUBTOTAL................................. $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,190,955

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,720,955

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 363. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Crop
and Orchard Protection Fencing (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 290,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 364. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Game
Farm Consolidation (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,094,388

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,174,388

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 365. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Warm
Water Game Fish Access Facilities (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ 210,000

Appropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,080,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,890,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 366. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational
Fish Enhancement (98-2-007)

Reappropriation:

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement‑-State........ $ 515,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 285,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 367. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation
Projects and Dedicated Funds (98-2-008)

Reappropriation:

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State............. $ 50,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local.... $ 1,150,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,200,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 4,000,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 2,000,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State............. $ 60,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,060,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 28,249,081

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 26,270,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 61,779,081

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 368. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory
Waterfowl Habitat Acquisition and Development (98-2-009)

Reappropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 200,000

Appropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,865,044

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,815,044

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 369. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Columbia
River Wildlife Mitigation (98-2-010)

Reappropriation:

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal.......... $ 2,000,000

Appropriation:

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal.......... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,654,773

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 21,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,254,773

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 370. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clam
and Oyster Beach Enhancement (98-2-019)

Reappropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 90,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 130,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,803,803

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,623,803

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 371. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Salmon
Restoration (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 750,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State.................. $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 372. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Agricultural
Asset Preservation and Emergency Repairs (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 125,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 100,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,080,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,305,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 373. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Repairs,
Maintenance and Tenant Improvements (00-1-002)

Appropriation:

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 677,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 893,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,065,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,635,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 374. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Communication
Site Repair Program (00-1-003)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 50,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 40,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 90,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 150,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)..................... $ 964,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,204,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 375. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Underground
Storage Tank Removal and Upgrade (00-1-005)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 10,800

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 30,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 19,200

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 60,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 193,120

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 61,200

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 314,320

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 376. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Small
Timber Landowner Program

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
This appropriation is provided solely to purchase or lease forestry riparian
areas and other sensitive aquatic areas from willing owners of small parcels of
forest land, as defined in chapter . . . (Substitute House Bill No.
2091 (salmon and water/forest practices)), Laws of 1999.

(2)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts are equal to or less than
$50,000,000 during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, then $12,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section may be expended. If federal grants for salmon
recovery efforts during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, exceed $50,000,000, then
the entire appropriation in this section may be expended.

(3)
Expenditures for specific projects or activities shall be approved only after
consultation with the interagency review team established in RCW 75.46.080.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑‑Federal........................... $ 14,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 377. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State-wide
Emergency Repairs (00-1-006)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 18,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 50,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 98,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 598,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 378. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Americans
with Disabilities Act Compliance (00-1-009)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 18,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 50,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 34,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 272,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 406,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 379. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Hazardous
Material and Waste Removal (00-1-010)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 34,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 50,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 160,800

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 336,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 596,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 380. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NAP/NRCA
Management and Emergency Repairs (00-1-011)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 710,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,710,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 381. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NRCA
Management Plan Implementation (00-1-012)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)........... ........ $ 400,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,650,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 382. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Emergency
Repairs: Recreation sites (00-1-015)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 27,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 75,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 48,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)................ ... $ 154,200

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 904,200

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 383. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Recreation
Health and Safety (00-1-016)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 578,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,078,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 384. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Recreation site improvements (00-1-017)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 18,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 50,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 968,100

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,268,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 385. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Administrative
Site Preservation (00-1-018)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 150,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 300,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 938,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,118,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,656,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 386. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust
Land Transfer (00-2-001)

The
state building construction account appropriation in this section is subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from
trust status certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate
for state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2)
The new appropriation in this section is provided solely for transfer of the
following list of trust properties to the identified entities:

(a)
Monte Cristo-Dry Creek, Klickitat county, to the department of natural
resources for natural area preserve purposes;

(b)
Scatter Creek, Thurston county, to the department of fish and wildlife for an
addition to the Scatter Creek game range;

(c)
Upper Trout Lake, Klickitat county, to the department of natural resources for
natural area preserve purposes;

(d)
Cottonwood Island, Skagit county, to the department of fish and wildlife for
wildlife habitat purposes;

(e)
Mount Si, King county, to the department of natural resources for natural
resource conservation area purposes;

(f)
Trout Lake, Klickitat county, to the department of natural resources for
natural area preserve purposes;

(g)
Willapa Divide, Pacific county, to the department of natural resources for
natural area preserve purposes;

(h)
Bite Hill, Clallam county, to the department of natural resources for natural
area preserve purposes;

(i)
South Nemah, Pacific county, to the department of natural resources for natural
resource conservation area purposes;

(j)
Hendrickson Canyon, Wahkiakum county, to the department of natural resources
for natural resource conservation area purposes;

(k)
Mount Peak, King county, to King county for open space and recreation purposes;

(l)
Elk River-Ocosta Parcel C, Grays Harbor county, to the department of natural
resources for natural resource conservation area purposes;

(m)
Ellsworth Creek, Pacific county, to the department of natural resources for
natural resource conservation area purposes;

(n)
Nisqually Interpretive Site, Pierce county, to Pierce county for a regional
environmental education interpretive center.

(3)
Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at
fair market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by
the department in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred shall be
deposited in the natural resources real property replacement account and shall
be expended by the department for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real
property of equal value to be managed as common school trust land.

(4)
All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section,
including all costs of acquiring real property to replace the trust lands
transferred, are authorized to be paid out of this appropriation. Authorized
costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews,
surveys, and other similar costs.

(5)
The department shall attempt to maintain an aggregate ratio of 85:15
timber-to-land value in these transactions.

(6)
Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value
may occur if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by
the board of natural resources.

(7)
Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department,
with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a
real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the
purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of
twenty years. The department of natural resources, in consultation with the
receiving state agencies, shall develop a policy to address requests to replace
transferred properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no
longer deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(8)
The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the
intent of this section. However, the department or receiving agencies may
remove a property from the transfer list in subsection (2) of this section if,
based on new, substantive information, it is determined that transfer of the
property is not in the state-wide interest of either the common school trust or
the receiving agency.

(9)
On June 30, 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted
funds from this appropriation to the common school construction account and the
appropriation in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,000,000

Appropriation:

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement‑-

State.................................... $ 6,200,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 62,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 68,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 34,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 220,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 331,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 387. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement (00-2-002)

Appropriation:

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement‑-

State.................................... $ 8,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 12,400,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 48,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 68,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 388. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land
Bank (00-2-003)

Appropriation:

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,800,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 11,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 389. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Community
and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (00-2-004)

Appropriation:

Community
and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account‑-State........................... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 390. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Right-of-Way
Acquisition (00-2-005)

Reappropriation:

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 500,000

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 387,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 650,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,037,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 892,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,429,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 391. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Jobs
for the Environment (00-2-009)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall be used solely for the jobs for the environment
program to achieve the following goals:

(a)
Restore and protect watersheds to benefit anadromous fish stocks, including
critical or depressed stocks as determined by the department of fish and
wildlife and a priority shall be given to stocks currently listed or proposed
for listing under the federal endangered species act;

(b)
Conduct watershed restoration and protection projects primarily on state lands
in coordination with federal, local, tribal, and private sector efforts; and

(c)
Create market wage jobs with benefits in environmental restoration for
displaced workers in rural natural resource impact areas, as defined under RCW
43.31.601(2).

(2)
The appropriations are solely for projects selected by the department of
natural resources, in consultation with an interagency task force consisting of
the department of fish and wildlife, other appropriate state agencies, tribal
governments, local governments, the federal government, labor, and other
interested stakeholders. In recommending projects for funding the task force
shall use the following criteria:

(a)
The extent to which the project, using best available science, addresses
habitat factors limiting fish and wildlife populations;

(b)
The number, duration, and quality of jobs to be created or retained by the
project for displaced workers in natural resource impact areas;

(c)
The extent to which the project will help avoid the listing of threatened or
endangered species or provides for the recovery of species already listed;

(d)
The extent to which the project will augment existing federal, state, tribal or
local watershed planning efforts or completed watershed restoration and
conservation plans;

(e)
The cost effectiveness of the project;

(f)
The availability of matching funds; and

(g)
The demonstrated ability of the project sponsors to administer the project.

(3)
Prior to making final project decisions, the department of natural resources
shall submit its proposed project list by January 1st or July 1st of each year
for review to the interagency review team established in RCW 75.46.080. The
interagency review team shall coordinate these projects with habitat
restoration project lists prepared by lead entities and provide recommendations
for funding to the department.

(4)
Funds expended shall be used for specific projects and not for ongoing
operational costs. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, closure
or improvement of forest roads, repair of culverts, cleanup of stream beds,
removal of fish barriers, installation of fish screens, fencing of streams, and
construction and planting of fish cover. Funds may also be expended for
planning, design, engineering, and monitoring of eligible projects.

(5)
The department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife, in
consultation with the office of financial management and other appropriate
agencies, shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 1999, and January 1, 2000, on the results of expenditures from the
appropriations.

(6)
All projects funded under this section shall be consistent with any development
regulations or comprehensive plans adopted under the growth management act for
the project areas. No funds may be expended to acquire land through
condemnation.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 2,800,000

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 6,333,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,133,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 25,332,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 43,598,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 392. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-011)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 136,600

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 379,500

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 242,900

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 759,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 609,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,580,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,948,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 393. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Mineral
Resource Testing (00-2-012)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 18,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 28,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 175,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 221,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 394. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Commercial
Development - Local Improvement Districts (00-2-013)

Appropriation:

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 90,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 451,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 741,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 395. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Grants (00-2-014)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The following projects are eligible for grant funding from the new
appropriation in this section:

(a)
$289,371 to the city of Castle Rock for the Castle Rock riverfront trail;

(b)
$576,380 to the department of fish and wildlife for the Eagle Island
acquisition and restoration project;

(c)
$8,280 to Okanogan county for the Methow Valley community trail;

(d)
$349,877 to the Jamestown S'Klallam tribe for rehabilitation of the
Jimmycomelately creek estuary;

(e)
$252,284 to the Port of Bremerton for the Port Orchard waterfront access
project;

(f)
$607,500 to Skagit county for the Skagit river habitat acquisition projects;

(g)
$75,000 to the city of Port Angeles for the Valley creek estuary park and
trail;

(h)
$112,371 to the department of natural resources for the Woodard Bay public
restoration and interpretation project;

(i)
$250,000 to the Odyssey maritime discovery center;

(j)
$300,000 to the Port of Olympia for a waterfront park;

(k)
$750,000 to the city of Seattle for wetlands restoration at Sand Point;

(l)
$30,000 to the department of fish and wildlife to purchase 6 acres from the
department of transportation for a fishing boat launch on the Yakima river near
Thorp.

(2)
The appropriation to the Odyssey maritime discovery center is provided solely
to restore the ferry Kalakala. If the appropriation in this subsection is not
expended by June 30, 2001, the appropriation shall lapse.

(3)
The department shall submit a list of recommended projects to be funded from
the aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2001-03 capital budget. The list
shall result from a competitive grant program developed by the department based
upon, at a minimum: A uniform criteria for the selection of projects and
awarding of grants for up to fifty percent of the total project cost; local
community support for the project; and a state-wide geographic distribution of
projects. The list of projects shall be submitted to the office of financial
management by September 15, 2000.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 2,340,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 3,601,063

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,716,817

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 39,657,880

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 396. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Mobile
Radio System Upgrade (00-2-017)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 106,300

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 177,200

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 283,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,623,500

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,907,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 397. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Compound:
Utilization study (00-2-019)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 27,000

Resource
Management Cost Account‑-State......... $ 75,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 102,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 102,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 398. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest
Legacy and Wetlands Conservation Grants (00-2-020)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 2,366,500

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 6,340,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,756,820

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,463,320

(End of part)

PART
4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE PATROL

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 850,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,870,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,675,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,395,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire
Training Academy: Minor works (00-1-005)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 110,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 320,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,900,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,330,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle
Crime Laboratory (00-2-008)

The
appropriation in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 900,000

Appropriation:

County
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State........................... $ 650,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State........................... $ 250,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire
Training Academy: Water systems upgrades (00-2-009)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,845,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,345,000

(End of part)

PART
5

EDUCATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. FOR
THE HIGHER
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

NSIS
Consortium Development (00-2-001)

For
building and technology improvements at the Everett center.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

Facility
Assessment and Space Utilization: Study (00-2-002)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Common
School Construction (00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state board shall make fiscal year allocations for school district design
and construction projects from the appropriations in this section in such a
manner to provide financial assistance to all eligible projects for fiscal year
2000 and fiscal year 2001.

(2)
The state board shall increase the area cost allowance for fiscal year 2000 and
fiscal year 2001 so long as the requirement in subsection (1) of this section
is met.

(3)
The state board is authorized to release funds for common school construction up
to four times per fiscal year at the discretion of the board.

(4)
The legislature finds that certain lands held by the state as part of the
common school trust should be transferred to local governments or appropriate
state agencies, provided that the trust is fully compensated for the value of
the land and the timber thereon. The state building construction account
appropriation in this section includes amounts sufficient to compensate the
common school construction account and the common school trust for the transfer
out of trust status of the timber on the following lands:

(a)
A portion of Illahee forest in Kitsap county, estimated timber value
$6,500,000; and

(b)
A portion of Banner forest in Kitsap county, estimated timber value $9,000,000.

Prior
to any transfer, the department of natural resources shall appraise the timber
and land on these properties at full market value. From the state building
account appropriation in this section, the trust shall be compensated for the
value of the timber. From nonstate sources provided by a local government, the
trust shall be compensated for value of the land and any timber value not
compensated by this appropriation. Upon payment of the value of the land, the
property shall be transferred to the local government or appropriate state
agency, as determined by the board of natural resources. Such payment may be in
the form of cash or in land of equal value, acceptable to the board of natural
resources, and the cash value shall be deposited into the real property
replacement account. All reasonable costs incurred by the department of
natural resources shall be paid by the local government prior to transfer of
title. The board of natural resources shall approve any transfer associated
with this section. All moneys deposited into the real property replacement
account shall be used to purchase replacement property for the trust.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 40,000,000

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 321,581,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 361,581,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,500,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,861,581,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604. FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
School Building Construction (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,993,556

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 112,424,633

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 114,418,189

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 607,956,559

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 722,374,748

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Program
Management (98-1-001)

The
amount in this section is provided solely for five full-time equivalent
regional coordinators. The coordinators shall have direct construction or
architectural training and experience and be strategically located across the
state. The coordinators shall assist local school districts with: State board
of education rules relating to school construction and modernization projects,
building condition analysis, development of state studies and surveys,
architect/engineer and construction manager selection, value engineering and
constructability reviews during design, building commissioning, construction
administration, maintenance issues, and data verification to allow equitable
administration of the state board priority system.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 1,619,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,644,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,263,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-003)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for repairs, renovations, and
improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriation
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 607. FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Multi-Purpose
Center

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 608. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for repairs, renovations, and
improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriation
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 609. FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Campus
Master Plan - Phase II Tech Ed/Student Commons (00-2-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 540,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,540,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 610. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-001)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for repairs, renovations,
and improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriations
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,800,000

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 8,000,000

Higher
Education Nonproprietary Local

Capital
Account‑-Private/Local........... $ 21,285,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 35,085,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 35,085,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 611. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Life
Sciences I (00-2-014)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 81,356,700

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 86,456,700

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 612. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Bothell Campus and Cascadia Community College: Future Phases (00-2-015)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the appropriation in this section shall be consistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(3)
The appropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 636, 637, 748, 803, and 906(5) of this act and shall be
managed by the department of general administration.

(4)
Phase IIA shall accommodate 1,000 additional FTE students when completed.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 43,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 105,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 148,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 613. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Tacoma - Branch Campus Phase IIA: To construct phase IIA and provide parking
for 600 vehicles (00-2-017)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the appropriation in this section shall be consistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(3)
Phase IIA shall accommodate an additional 600 FTE students upon completion of
new construction and renovated spaces. The appropriation in this section
includes all costs for completion of this phase, including equipment, parking,
and site improvements.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 36,420,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 36,420,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 614. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Tacoma
Branch Campus: Phase III Predesign (00-2-021)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 55,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 615. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

University
of Washington Medical Center: Improvements

Appropriation:

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State.... $ 80,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 80,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 616. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Electrical
Engineering and Computer Science Engineering Building (90-2-013)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 88,491,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 95,791,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 617. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Old
Physics Hall: (Mary Gates hall) design and construction (92-2-008)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 19,407,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 31,407,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 618. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Repairs: Preservation (94-1-003)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,985,199

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,985,199

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 619. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Suzzallo
library renovation‑-Phase I design and construction: To design and
construct the phase I remodeling of the 1925, 1935, and 1963 building and
additions to address structural, mechanical, electrical, and life safety
deficiencies (94-1-015)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 320,000

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 270,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 590,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 29,200,000

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State.... $ 12,034,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 41,234,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 8,863,833

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,687,833

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 620. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Harborview
Research and Training Facility: Construction (94-2-013)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the completion of
construction of this facility. The reappropriations represent the total state
contribution for all costs including design, construction and equipping this
facility.

(3)
The reappropriation from the state building construction account may be
expended before the higher education construction account moneys.

Reappropriation:

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State.... $ 3,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 14,200,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 17,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 61,561,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 78,761,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 621. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

New
Law School Building (94-2-017)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the completion of
construction of this facility.

(3)
It is the intent of the legislature that the principal and interest payments on
the bonds issued to construct the law school will be paid from the revenues of
the metropolitan tract in downtown Seattle and will not be paid from indirect
cost recoveries for federal research grants.

Reappropriation:

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 68,000

Appropriation:

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State.... $ 44,801,500

Higher
Education Nonproprietary Local Capital

Account‑-Private/Local................... $ 24,186,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 68,987,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 69,069,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 622. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Tacoma
Branch Campus: To complete phase IB, conduct predesign of phase II, design of
phase II, to acquire property, and to remediate unknown site conditions
(94-2-500)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the reappropriation in this section must be consistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(3)
The reappropriation for land acquisition was reduced from $5,000,000 to
$2,500,000. This amount shall be applied to the construction of phase IIA in
section 613 of this act.

(4)
The predesign for phase II to serve at least 1,200 additional student full-time
equivalents shall be conducted in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Design of phase IIA to serve
at least 600 student full-time equivalents shall not proceed until the
completed predesign requirements have been reviewed and approved by the office
of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 34,692,087

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,092,087

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 623. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Utility infrastructure (96-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 445,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,455,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 624. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health
Sciences Center BB Tower Elevators (96-1-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The appropriation represents the total state contribution for all costs
including design, construction, and equipping this facility.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 310,000

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 93,100

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 403,100

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,925,800

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 533,348

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,862,248

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 625. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health
Sciences Center D-Wing Dental Student Laboratory: Design and construction
(96-1-016)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 447,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,570,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,017,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 626. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Fisheries
Science - Oceanography Science Buildings (96-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The reappropriations represent the total state contribution for all costs
including design, construction, and equipping this facility.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,507,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 67,787,751

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 80,294,751

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 627. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Social
Work Third Floor Addition (96-2-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,415,600

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,415,600

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 628. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

West
Electrical Power Station (96-2-011)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 550,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,254,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,804,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 629. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Power
Plant Boiler 7 (96-2-020)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,662,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,912,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 630. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Southwest
Campus Utilities Phase I (96-2-027)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 8,809,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,309,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 631. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Safety (98-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 632. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-002)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 3,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,946,075

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,346,075

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 633. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Utility
and Data Communications Projects: Preservation (98-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 900,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 634. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-003)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 100,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 635. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Building
Communication: Upgrade (98-2-009)

Reappropriation:

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 636. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Bothell and Cascadia Community College Phase I (98-2-899)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the reappropriation in this section must be consistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(3)
The reappropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 612, 637, 748, and 803 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration to construct a campus to serve at
least 2,000 student full-time equivalents with approximately 1,200 for the
University of Washington and 800 for Cascadia Community College.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 40,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,970,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 47,970,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 637. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Bothell and Cascadia Community College Future Phases (98-2-999)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the reappropriation in this section must be consistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(3)
The reappropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 612, 636, 748, and 803 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration.

(4)
The predesign for phase II to serve at least 2,000 additional University of
Washington and community college student full-time equivalents included in this
reappropriation shall be conducted in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management.

(5)
Design of phase IIA to serve at least 1,000 total University of Washington and
Cascadia Community College student full-time equivalents shall not proceed
until the completed predesign requirements in subsection (4) of this section
have been reviewed and approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,069,063

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 930,937

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 638. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Nuclear
Reactor: Decommissioning (99-2-009)

The
reappropriation in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 639. FOR WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for repairs, renovations,
and improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriations
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,385,000

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 22,550,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 25,935,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,935,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 640. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Child
Care Facility - Human Development Lab, Infant Care (00-1-039)

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 563,700

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,536,300

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 641. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Scholars
Hall - White Hall: Renovation (00-1-078)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 642. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Animal
Disease Biotechnology Facility: Equipment (00-2-067)

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 643. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Museum
of Art Building (00-2-071)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 125,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 14,100,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,225,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 644. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Shock
Physics Building (00-2-080)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,760,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,160,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 645. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver - Engineering/Life Science Building (00-2-904)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 27,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 646. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver - New Academic Building D (00-2-905)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000. The project shall serve at least 1,200 additional
student full-time equivalents on the Vancouver campus.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 29,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,950,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 647. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Study of Future Campus Development (00-2-906)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a study of future
campus developments, including alternatives regarding the size and timing of
future building construction.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 44,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 44,250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 648. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Plant
Biotechnology Facility - Johnson Hall

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 38,450,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 649. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Hazardous,
Pathological, and Radioactive Waste Handling Facilities (92-1-019)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 632,221

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 710,779

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,343,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 650. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Todd
Hall Renovation (92-1-021)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,918

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 168,909

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 269,827

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 14,343,680

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,613,507

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 651. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Veterinary
Teaching Hospital: Construction (92-2-013)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 300,173

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,310,327

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,610,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 652. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Fulmer
Hall: Fulmer Annex Renovation (92-2-023)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 97,138

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 11,521,329

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,618,467

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 653. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Bohler
Gym Renovation: Construction (94-1-010)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,500,000

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 297,925

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 12,797,925

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,215,375

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,013,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 654. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Thompson
Hall Renovation: Construction (94-1-024)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,500,000

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 101,325

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 6,601,325

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,095,075

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,696,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 655. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (94-1-999)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 916 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 212,474

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 376,662

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 589,136

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 656. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Hazardous
Waste Facilities: Construction (94-2-006)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 822,722

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 888,278

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,711,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 657. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Pathological
and Biomedical Incinerator: Design and construction (94-2-012)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,042,690

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,400,310

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,443,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 658. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Engineering
Teaching and Research Laboratory Building: Construction (94-2-014)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 128,797

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 17,011,503

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,140,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 659. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Chemical
Waste Collection Facilities: Design and construction (94-2-016)

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 112,999

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 887,001

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 660. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Bohler
Gym: Addition (94-2-017)

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 364,708

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 10,319,108

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,683,816

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 661. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Kimbrough
Hall Addition and Remodeling (94-2-019)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,295,806

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 121,875

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,417,681

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,315,319

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,733,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 662. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver: Campus construction (94-2-902)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 37,722,462

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,722,462

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 663. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Plant
Growth: Wheat research center (96-2-047)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act and shall not be expended
until the university has received the federal money or an equivalent amount
from other sources.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 608,518

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,391,482

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 664. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,985,280

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,067,720

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,053,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 665. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Campus
Infrastructure and Road Improvements (98-1-073)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,493,480

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,798,520

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,292,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 666. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Minor Works: Program (98-1-821)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 36,815

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 25,885

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 62,700

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 667. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Americans
with Disabilities Act Pool Account (98-1-993)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 140,159

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 144,059

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 668. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Safety and environmental (98-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 958,129

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,749,586

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,707,715

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 700,075

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,407,790

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 669. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,179,248

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,820,752

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 670. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Major
Equipment: Acquisition (98-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 371,310

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,171,310

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,828,690

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 671. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Murrow
Hall: Renovation and addition (98-2-008)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 23,645

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,650,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 81,355

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,100,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,855,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 672. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Cleveland
Hall: Renovation and addition (98-2-032)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 37,493

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 102,507

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,940,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 673. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

South
Campus Electrical Services: Design and construction (98-2-044)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 313,486

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,586,514

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 674. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Teaching
and Learning Center: Design and construction (98-2-062)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 1,194,073

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 611,094

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,805,167

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 28,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 869,333

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 31,574,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 675. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Apparel,
Merchandise, and Interior Design and Landscape Architecture Building (98-2-072)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 20,527

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,780,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 77,473

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 26,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,278,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 676. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSUnet:
Infrastructure (98-2-074)

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)................ ... $ 3,325,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,075,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 677. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Health Sciences Building (98-2-903)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(2)
Expenditures from the appropriation in this section must be consistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board.

(3)
Design and construction of this building shall accommodate at least 240
additional full-time equivalent students on the Riverpoint campus.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,310,000

Appropriation:

State
Higher Education Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 36,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,610,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 678. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Tri-Cities - Science Education Center (98-2-905)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,954

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 135,046

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 22,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,640,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 679. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver: Phase II (98-2-911)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the reappropriation in this section must be consistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(3)
This reappropriation includes the design phase of the engineering/life science
building and multimedia building and to construct campus infrastructure and
physical plant shops. Section 645 of this act appropriates the funds for
construction phase and equipping the engineering/life science building.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,054,521

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,445,479

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 680. FOR EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Senior
Hall: Renovation (00-1-003)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 11,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 681. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,139,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a childcare center.

(2)
The remaining appropriations are provided solely for repairs, renovations, and
improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure.

(3)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 1,310,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,326,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,288,500

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 6,320,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,608,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,096,505

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,031,005

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 682. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-001)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 381,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 702,502

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,083,502

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,956,138

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,039,640

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 683. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus
Network and Cable: Replacement (90-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,173,800

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,673,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 684. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

JFK
Library Addition and Remodel: Construction (90-5-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 34,662

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 334,662

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 20,381,581

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,716,243

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 685. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Chillers,
Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning (94-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 153,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,444,711

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,597,711

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 686. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Monroe
Hall: Renovation (96-1-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 395,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,750,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 250,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 629,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,024,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 687. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus
Classroom: Renewal (96-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 448,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 457,191

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 905,191

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,244,809

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,150,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 688. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Water
System: Preservation and expansion (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 290,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 210,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 689. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical
Substations: Preservation (98-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,872,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 128,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 690. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Roof
Replacements (98-1-006)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 475,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,230,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,705,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 691. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure:
Preservation (98-1-007)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,662,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 338,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 692. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Heating,
Ventilation, and Air Conditioning Systems: Preservation (98-1-008)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 799,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 201,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 693. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Boiler
Plant Expansion (98-1-011)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 106,415

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 506,415

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,725,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 277,210

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,508,625

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 694. FOR CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-120)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for repairs, renovations, and
improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriation
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 11,169,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,169,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 695. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Music
Facility (00-2-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 116,372

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 24,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,016,372

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 696. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

CWU
- Yakima Valley Higher Education Center (00-2-993)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

(3)
This appropriation shall be combined with the appropriation in section 755 of
this act to develop a multi-institutional higher education center in
cooperation with all participating institutions.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,975,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 697. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Moses
Lake Campus

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
This appropriation is provided solely to construct or acquire a facility for
educational programs to be offered at Big Bend Community College in the city of
Moses Lake.

(2)
The appropriation in this section shall be matched by an equal amount from nonstate
sources for the same purpose.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 698. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science
Facility: Design and construction (94-2-002)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 600,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 56,293,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 58,393,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 699. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Black
Hall: Design and construction (94-2-010)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 26,403,401

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,403,401

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 700. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Infrastructure preservation (96-1-040)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

(2)
No money from this reappropriation may be expended for remodeling or repairing
the president's residence.

(3)
If the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it
shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,300,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (96-1-120)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

(2)
A maximum of $85,000 from this reappropriation may be expended for remodeling
the president's residence.

(3)
If the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it
shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,700,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 702. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (96-2-130)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management. If the reappropriation in
this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall lapse.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 75,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,425,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 703. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Heating
System Improvements (98-1-030)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical
Utility: Upgrade (98-1-110)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 705. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Steamline
Replacement (98-1-120)

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,350,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 706. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-130)

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State....................... ... $ 1,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,463,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,163,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 707. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Building
Indoor Air Quality: Improvements (98-1-170)

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 229,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 429,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 708. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

SeaTac
Center Building: Renovation (98-2-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 162,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 662,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 709. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Lynnwood/Edmonds
Higher Education Center (98-2-080)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

(3)
The design of this facility shall be based on a combination of construction
funding included in this section, section 736 of this act for the state board
for community and technical college, and section 906(6) of this act.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 875,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 125,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 710. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-135)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,782,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,382,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 711. FOR THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-002)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for repairs renovations, and
improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriations
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 4,160,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,276,800

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,436,800

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,436,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 712. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab
II First Floor Remodel - CAL and Adjacent Labs (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 2,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 713. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Library
Building - Technology Center (00-2-008)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,450,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 714. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Safety and code (98-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 166,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,284,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 715. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-002)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,304,319

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 249,389

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,553,708

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,070,631

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,624,339

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 716. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar
Phase II: Design (98-2-004)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 140,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 34,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,740,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 717. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-006)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 1,442,084

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 357,916

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 718. FOR
THE SPOKANE
INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNICAL INSTITUTE

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 320,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 719. FOR WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-068)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for repairs, renovations,
and improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure. The appropriations
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,900,000

Western
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 9,607,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 15,507,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,507,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 720. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Haggard
Hall Renovation and Abatement: Construction (94-2-015)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 20,304,405

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,204,405

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 721. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus
Services Facility: Construction (96-2-025)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The university shall comply with local comprehensive land use laws and
regulations for this project.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 958,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 10,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 333,800

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,391,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 722. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Integrated
Signal Distribution: Construction (96-2-056)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,677,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,477,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 723. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-064)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,100,000

Western
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 1,800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,800,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 724. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Facility
and Property Acquisition (98-2-023)

The
university shall comply with local comprehensive land use laws and regulations
for this project.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,720,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)........... ........ $ 1,280,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 725. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Communications
Facility: Design (98-2-053)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 204,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 36,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,454,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 726. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-063)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Western
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 3,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,328,529

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,628,529

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 727. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Stadium
Way Facility: Seismic and infrastructure repair (96-1-102)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,745,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,422,626

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,167,626

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 728. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

State
Capital Museum: Preservation (98-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,150,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,550,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 729. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor
Works (98-1-003)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 90,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 83,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 390,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 563,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 730. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington
Heritage Projects (98-2-004)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state grant may provide no more than one-third of the actual total capital
cost of the project, or the amount of state assistance listed in this section,
whichever is less. The remaining portions of capital project costs shall be a
match from nonstate sources. The match may include cash, land value, and
documented in-kind gifts and support.

(2)
By December 15, 1999, the society shall submit a report to the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management
on the progress of the heritage program, including a list of projects funded
under this section.

(3)
The appropriation is provided for the following list of projects:

Organization Amount
Recommended Total Project Cost

Port
Townsend Marine

Science
Center 70,000 711,530

Yakima
Valley Museum 400,000 3,266,771

Northwest
Railway Museum 118,000 377,209

Columbia
Breaks Fire

Interpretive
Center 48,298 175,764

Fort
Nisqually Historic Site 121,435 364,303

Kittitas
County 500,000 2,878,285

South
Whidbey Historical

Society 25,000 114,301

Shoreline
Historical Museum 196,073 597,148

Okanogan
County 113,000 459,342

North
Central Washington Museum 500,000 2,572,750

Historic
Seattle Public

Development
Authority 330,000 4,781,600

Pearson
Field 250,000 1,154,711

Touchet
Valley 180,000 632,607

Anacortes
Museum - W.T. Preston 54,004 195,198

Whatcom
Museum 360,000 2,929,050

Oysterville
Community Club 37,799 113,400

Meadowbrook
Farm 94,000 4,208,000

City of
Lynnwood (9971) 50,391 151,175

Grays
Harbor Historical Seaport 220,000 3,865,800

Lewis
County 25,000 80,574

City of
Des Moines 120,000 712,852

Steilacoom
Historical Society 187,000 905,739

Total $4,000,000 31,248,109

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 815,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,285,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 731. FOR
THE EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Cheney
Cowles Museum: Addition and remodel (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,500,000

Washington
State Historical Trust Account‑-

Private/Local............................ $ 7,765,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 23,265,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,425,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,990,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 732. FOR
THE COMMUNITY
AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are provided solely for repairs,
renovations, and improvements to buildings, grounds, and infrastructure.

(2)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(3)
$250,000 is provided solely to Seattle Central Community College for site work
at the Lincoln reservoir.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,840,000

Community
and Technical College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 15,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 47,840,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 47,840,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 733. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

For
Emergency Reserve, Project Management Reserve, and Distribution to College
Districts for Minor Building Repairs and Improvements (00-1-130)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $350,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for an analysis
and plans for converting public broadcasting stations to digital technology.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 18,250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 734. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce
College - Portable Buildings: Replacement (00-1-223)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,640,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,640,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 735. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia
Basin College - N Building: Replacement (00-1-232)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,351,700

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,351,700

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 736. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Edmonds
Community College - Relocatable Buildings: Replacement (00-1-236)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 737. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South
Puget Sound Community College - Portable Building: Replacement (00-1-237)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,612,400

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,612,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 738. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic
College - Plant Operations Building: Replacement (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,029,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,971,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 739. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue
Community College - Robinswood School: Replacement (00-2-005)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 740. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Matching
Funds (00-2-296)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 741. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline
Community College - Library/Technology Center (00-2-319)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 742. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green
River Community College - Drama and Music Class/Labs: Renovation (00-2-322)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,430,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,430,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 743. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark
College - Applied Arts IV Building: Renovation (00-2-326)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,540,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)........... ........ $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,540,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 744. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee
Valley College - Sexton Hall Computer Labs: Renovation (00-2-327)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................ ........ $ 700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 745. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima
Valley Community College - Mechanics Complex: Renovation (00-2-328)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,715,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,715,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 746. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma
Community College - Building 5: Renovation (00-2-335)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 747. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham
Technical College - Building B: Renovation (00-2-338)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,926,800

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).. ................. $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,926,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 748. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia
Community College: Development (00-2-501)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the appropriation in this section must be consistent with the
recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(3)
The appropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 612, 636, 637, 803, and 906(4) of this act and shall be
managed by the department of general administration.

(4)
Phase IIA shall accommodate 1,000 additional full-time equivalent students when
completed.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 43,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 105,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 148,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 749. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Pierce
College - Puyallup Campus Phase 3 Expansion: Predesign (00-2-676)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 217,200

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,747,900

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,965,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 750. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom
Community College - Classroom/Laboratory Building (00-2-677)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,380,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 751. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline
Community College - 21st Century Careers Center (00-2-678)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 117,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)........... ........ $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 17,900,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,017,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 752. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South
Puget Sound Community College - Humanities/General Education Complex (00-2-679)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 124,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 14,900,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,024,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 753. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark
College - Higher Education Center at WSU Vancouver (00-2-680)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to conduct a predesign of the
project described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Future appropriations for
this project are subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements
on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 120,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)........... ........ $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,350,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,470,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 754. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee
Valley Omak - Science Lab (00-2-952)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 755. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima
Valley Higher Education Center: Acquisition (00-2-954)

This
appropriation shall be combined with the appropriation in section 696 of this
act to develop a multi-institutional higher education center in cooperation
with all participating institutions.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 756. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia
Basin College‑-Electrical Substation

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 757. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Repairs
and minor improvements (94-1-001)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 41,080,347

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 41,280,347

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 758. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Construct
Classroom and Laboratory Building: Edmonds Community College (94-2-604)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 318,142

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,840,318

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,158,460

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 759. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Construct
Center for Information Technology: Green River Community College (94-2-606)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,681,551

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,031,551

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 760. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Improvements (94-5-001)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 97,939

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 127,939

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 761. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Small
Repairs, Improvements, and Underground Storage Tank Removal (96-1-001)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,372,038

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,472,038

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 762. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Asbestos
Abatement (96-1-002)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 959,890

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,159,890

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 763. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof
Repairs (96-1-010)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,015,690

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,515,690

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 764. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Heating,
Ventilating, and Air Conditioning Repairs (96-1-030)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 45,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 640,356

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 685,356

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 765. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Mechanical
Repairs (96-1-060)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 441,547

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 541,547

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 766. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Electrical
Repairs (96-1-080)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 351,387

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 801,387

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 767. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Exterior
Repairs (96-1-100)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,501,582

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,531,582

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 768. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Interior
Repairs (96-1-120)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 895,514

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 995,514

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 769. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site
Repairs (96-1-140)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 295,040

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 395,040

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 770. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima
Valley College‑-Replace pedestrian street crossing (96-1-400)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely to use with other nonstate
sources for the construction or installation of a pedestrian street crossing or
other safety improvements in lieu of a street crossing. This appropriation
shall be expended only for the direct cost of the construction or installation
of the street crossing improvements.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 170,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 270,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 771. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Repair
and Minor Improvement Projects (96-2-199)

If
the reappropriation in this section is not expended by June 30, 2000, it shall
lapse.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,176,473

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,176,473

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 772. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Project
Artwork Consolidation Account (96-2-400)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 241,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 219,270

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 460,270

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 773. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North
Seattle Community College - Vocational/Child Care Buildings: Construction
(96-2-651)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,704,161

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,704,161

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 774. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett
Community College - Instructional Technology Center: Construction (96-2-652)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 15,017,483

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,617,483

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 775. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South
Seattle Community College - Integrated Learning Assistance Resource Center:
Construction (96-2-653)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,460,167

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,460,167

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 776. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic
College - Poulsbo Center: Construction (96-2-654)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 147,034

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 627,966

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,675,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 777. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue
Community College - Classrooms and Labs: Construction (96-2-655)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,419,551

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,669,551

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 778. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover
Park Technical College - Transportation Trades: Design (96-2-662)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 25,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 17,500,000

-------------

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 18,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 779. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover
Park Technical College - Aviation Trades Complex: Construction (96-2-998)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community/Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 5,200,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,100,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 780. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Repair
and Minor Improvement (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 781. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Asbestos
Abatement (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 744,097

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 894,097

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 782. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Underground
Storage Tanks (98-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 390,490

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 790,490

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 783. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof
Repairs (98-1-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,080,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,580,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 784. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Heating,
Ventilating, and Air Conditioning Repairs (98-1-040)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,940,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,940,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 785. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Mechanical
Repairs (98-1-070)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,832,300

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,632,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 786. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Electrical
Repairs (98-1-090)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,549,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,049,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 787. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Exterior
Repairs (98-1-110)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 914,200

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,914,200

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 788. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Interior
Repairs (98-1-130)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,361,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,361,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 789. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site
Repairs (98-1-150)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 850,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 325,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,175,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 790. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates
Technical College: Renovation (98-1-190)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 294,716

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,694,716

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 791. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham
Technical College: Renovation (98-1-191)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 992,648

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,392,648

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 792. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover
Park Technical College: Renovation (98-1-192)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,781,518

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,781,518

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 793. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle
Central Community College: Renovation (98-1-193)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 133,605

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,833,605

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 794. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Improvements (98-1-993)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 233,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 389,393

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 622,393

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 795. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor
Improvements (98-2-200)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,900,369

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,900,369

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 796. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic
College - Library: Replacement (98-2-500)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 3,700,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,600,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,300,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 832,051

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 836,448

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,968,499

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 797. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline
Community College - Classroom/Laboratory Building: Construction (98-2-660)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 310,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,550,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 79,717

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,939,717

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 798. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane
Community College - Allied Health Building: Addition (98-2-661)

The
appropriations in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,242,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 91,108

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,933,108

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 799. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham
Technical College - Business and Health Technology Building (98-2-672)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 19,693

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 775,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 55,307

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,450,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 800. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake
Washington Technical College - Phase III: Design (98-2-673)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 26,923

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,050,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 88,077

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 14,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,765,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 801. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton
Technical College - Technology Resource Center: Design (98-2-674)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 67,064

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,010,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 67,936

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,760,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,905,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit
Valley College Higher Education Center (98-2-675)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

(3)
The project shall be coordinated with Western Washington University in order to
incorporate a distance education classroom and additional classroom, lab, and
office space for use by the university.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 17,942

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 660,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 32,058

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,836,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,546,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 803. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia
Community College and UW - Bothell: Construction (98-2-999)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures from the reappropriation in this section must be consistent with
the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the project
design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial management.

(2)
$3,000,000 of this reappropriation is provided solely for design of phase IIA
of this project to accommodate an additional 1,000 University of Washington and
community college student full-time equivalents for the colocated campus.

(3)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(4)
The reappropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 612, 636, 637, and 748 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration to construct a campus to serve at
least 2,000 student full-time equivalents with approximately 1,200 for the
University of Washington and 800 for Cascadia Community College.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 37,320,237

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 8,649,763

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,970,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 804. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia
College - Instructional Building: Replacement (99-2-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 14,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,434,614

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,834,614

(End of part)

PART
6

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 901. The
estimated debt service costs impacting future general fund expenditures related
solely to new capital appropriations within this act are $15,330,000 during the
1999-01 fiscal period; $96,189,000 during the 2001-03 fiscal period;
$136,763,000 during the 2003-05 fiscal period; $137,126,000 during the 2005-07
fiscal period; and $137,126,000 during the 2007-09 fiscal period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 902. To
ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with
legislative and executive intent, appropriations in this act referencing this
section or in excess of $5,000,000 shall not be expended until the office of
financial management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other
documents and approved an allotment for the project. The predesign document
shall include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in
accordance with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial
management. To improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress
reports shall be submitted by the agency administering the project to the
office of financial management and to the fiscal committees of the house of
representatives and senate. Reports will be submitted on July 1st and December
31st each year in a format to be developed by the office of financial
management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 903.
Allotments for appropriations shall be provided in accordance with the capital
project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management. The
office of financial management shall notify the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee of allotment
releases based on review by the office of financial management. No expenditure
may be incurred or obligation entered into for appropriations referring to this
section until the allotment of the funds to be expended has been approved by
the office of financial management. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures, under chapter 39.10 RCW, are
subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.
Contracts shall not be executed that call for expenditures in excess of the
approved allotment, and the total amount shown in such contracts for the cost
of future work that has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount
identified for such work in the level of funding approved by the office of
financial management at the completion of predesign.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 904.
Appropriations for design and construction of facilities on higher education
branch campuses shall be expended only after funds are allotted to institutions
of higher education on the basis of: (1) Comparable unit cost standards, as
determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the
higher education coordinating board; (2) costs consistent with other higher
education teaching facilities in the state; and (3) student full-time
equivalent enrollment levels as established by the office of financial
management in consultation with the higher education coordinating board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 905. It is
the intent of the legislature that the future ongoing operating and maintenance
costs of any child care facility receiving an appropriation from the capital
budget shall be paid from the revenues generated from the programs operating in
the facility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 906.
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The
following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
revenues, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the
most economical financial contract option available, including long-term
leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase
agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. The
director of general administration shall ensure that the clustering of state
facilities and the collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place
where such configurations are economical and consistent with agency space
needs. Agencies shall assist the department of general administration with
facility collocation and consolidation efforts.

State
agencies may enter into agreements with the department of general
administration and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the
legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial
contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(1)
Department of general administration:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $9,435,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Yakima for use by state
agencies.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $4,621,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Kelso for use by the department
of social and health services and the employment security department.

(c)
Enter into an analysis of the feasibility to develop a multi-agency office
building on state owned land in Tumwater. A financial and business plan
identifying all costs related to this project, and the sources and amounts of
all payments to cover these costs shall be submitted for review to both the
office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees.

(2)
Department of corrections:

(a)
Enter into a long-term ground lease or a long-term lease with purchase option
for development of a Tacoma prerelease facility for approximately $360,000 per
annum. Prior to entering into any lease, the department of corrections shall
obtain written confirmation from the city of Tacoma and Pierce county that the
prerelease facility planned for the site meets all land use, environmental
protection, and community notification requirements.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $21,530,500 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire, construct/remodel a 400-bed,
expandable to 600-bed Tacoma prerelease facility. The department of
corrections shall comply with all land use, environmental protection, and
community notification statutes, regulations, and ordinances in the
construction and operation of this facility.

(c)
Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 200
work release beds in facilities throughout the state for $14,000,000.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $2,300,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional industries
transportation services warehouse.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $1,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a lethal fence at the intensive
management unit of the penitentiary in Walla Walla.

(3)
State parks and recreation: It is the intent of the legislature that the
operating revenues of the department provide the primary source of funds
necessary to meet financing contract obligations for the projects financed
under this authority. In addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to
pledge to make payments from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW:

(a)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to construct cabins at Cama beach.

(b)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $250,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to complete improvements at the interpretive center/store at
Deception Pass.

(c)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install additional yurts and cabins
state-wide.

(d)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a day use shelter at Lake Sammamish.

(e)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to improve campsite electrification state-wide.

(f)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop additional campsites state-wide.

(g)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $7,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for improvements to the Fort Worden kitchen and dining hall.

(4)
Community and technical colleges:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $1,526,150 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for remodel of the Lindbloom student center building.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the
amount of $2,070,613 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of the Federal Way Center, currently being
leased by the college.

(c)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase approximately 1.5 acres of land adjacent to
the westside parking lot.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor Community College in
the amount of $600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase and remodeling of the Riverview School
and 2.83 acres of property, currently being leased by the college.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the
amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the remodeling of the fitness center.

(f)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College in the
amount of $1,697,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the existing
student center.

(g)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community College in the
amount of $3,840,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot addition and remodeling to the
existing Lair student service building costing $6,000,000. The balance of
project cost will be cash from student and activity fees and enterprise funds.

(h)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community College in the
amount of $150,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the exchange of 10 acres of land with Grant county.

(i)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for purchase and development of property in the downtown
Kent area.

(j)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College in
the amount of $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot student services
auditorium.

(k)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College in
the amount of $375,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 2,700 gross square foot addition and remodeling to
the existing student union building costing $1,400,000. Prior to commencing,
the college shall prepare and present a business plan describing the financing
of the complete project to the state board for community and technical
colleges, the office of financial management, and the legislative fiscal
committees.

(l)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula Community College in the
amount of $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the student union
building.

(m)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot addition and remodeling to the
existing extended learning/work force facility costing $4,388,000. Prior to
commencing, the college shall prepare and present a business plan describing
the financing of the complete project to the state board for community and
technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the legislative
fiscal committees.

(n)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Lea Hill park from King county.

(o)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Bellevue Community College in the
amount of $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for replacement of the Robinswood school. This authority is
provided in addition to the appropriation in section 739 of this act.

(p)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the
college campus.

(q)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Cascadia Community College in the
amount of $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves for
equipment at the University of Washington Bothell/Cascadia Community College
campus.

(r)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Cascadia Community College in the
amount of $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for parking structures at the University of Washington
Bothell/Cascadia Community College campus.

(s)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $1,918,483 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of 10.71 acres of property for the
completion of the Whatcom Community College campus.

(t)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the
amount of $3,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a music building on the college campus.

(5)
University of Washington:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to finance real property improvements to the Sand Point
building.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to finance Primate Center tenant improvements.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $5,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves for
equipment at the University of Washington Bothell/Cascadia Community College
campus.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $2,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for parking structures at the University of Washington
Bothell/Cascadia Community College campus.

(6)
Central Washington University:

Enter
into a financing contract on behalf of Central Washington University in the
amount of $8,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the Central Washington University/Edmonds Community
College center.

(7)
Washington state convention and trade center:

Enter
into one or more financing contracts not exceeding an aggregate total amount of
$27,500,000 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW,
for funding unanticipated costs in excess of the $111,700,000 principal amount
of the financing contract authorized in section 802 (10) (b), chapter 16, Laws
of 1995 2nd sp. sess., for construction of the expansion of the Washington
state convention and trade center as authorized under chapter 386, Laws of
1995. The balance of the expansion project funds shall be provided from
interest earnings and public or private funds. The financing contract or
contracts representing all or part of the amount authorized by this section
shall not be executed without prior written approval of the office of financial
management based upon its determination that such financing contract or
contracts are reasonably necessary for the expansion project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 907. It is
the intent of the legislature that if appropriations from the state building
construction account, and any other account that receives proceeds of state bonds,
exceed a total of $987,700,000, then any appropriations in excess of this
amount shall be made only for school construction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 908. FOR
THE ARTS COMMISSION‑-ART WORK ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one
percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school
plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The
Washington state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual
projects in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and representatives
of school district boards.

(2)
One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original
construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred
thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided solely for the
purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts commission may combine
the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art or
mobile art displays in consultation with the board of regents or trustees.

(3)
One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original
construction of any public building by a state agency as defined in RCW
43.17.200 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in
order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the state agency.

(4)
At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts
commission during the 1999-01 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210,
28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 shall be spent solely for direct acquisition of works
of art.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 909. The
amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future
Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes
only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 910.
"Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the
context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to
the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 1999, from the 1997-99 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 911. To
carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility
for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any
appropriate agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 912. If
any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not
received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were
appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private
or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the
prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the
senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 913. (1)
Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a
match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement,
consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall
be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the
intended state share of total project costs.

(2)
Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to
permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if
a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each
distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 914.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the 1999-01 biennium,
transfers of reimbursement by the state treasurer to the general fund from the
community college capital projects account for debt service payments made under
Title 28B RCW shall occur only after such debt service payment has been made
and only to the extent that funds are actually available to the account. Any
unpaid reimbursements shall be a continued obligation against the community
college capital projects account until paid. The state board for community and
technical colleges need not accumulate any specific balance in the community
college capital projects account in anticipation of transfers to reimburse the
general fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 915. Any
capital improvements or capital projects involving construction or major
expansion of a state office facility, including, but not limited to, district
headquarters, detachment offices, and off-campus faculty offices, shall be
reviewed by the department of general administration for possible
consolidation, colocation, and compliance with state office standards before
allotment of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this section is
to eliminate duplication and reduce total office space requirements where
feasible, while ensuring proper service to the public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 916. The
governor, through the office of financial management, may authorize a transfer
of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of
the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital
project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be used
to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended by the legislature
in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only between
capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are
funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects
to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a
single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically
authorized by the implementing statutes which govern the grants.

For
purposes of this section, the governor may find that an amount is in excess of
the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (1) The project
as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and
there are funds remaining; or (2) bids have been let on a project and it
appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to
the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the
amount appropriated in this act.

For
the purposes of this section, the legislature intends that each project be
defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document,
unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature
intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

A
report of any transfer effected under this section except emergency projects or
any transfer under $250,000 shall be filed with the legislative fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of
financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is
effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or
smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 917.
Electronic copies of all completed predesigns, BEST studies, value engineering
studies, and constructability reviews performed pursuant to appropriations
contained in this act will be forwarded to the department of general
administration in a format prescribed by the department. These documents will
serve as a means to share information and lessons that may be useful in other
projects. Best practices, changes in technology and materials, new approaches
to resolving facility and construction problems, and any other useful
information will be shared among all agencies and the public through use of the
Internet.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 918. The
legislature finds that opportunities for additional student enrollment capacity
at higher education facilities can be created by increased course scheduling,
more intensive space utilization practices, and the delivery of distance
learning programs. By May 1, 2000, the institutions of higher education and
the state board for community and technical colleges shall review course
scheduling and weekly room use standards and determine if additional student
capacity can be reasonably obtained by changes in practices. Further, this
review shall include an assessment of options to increase distance learning
programs as a means to further increase student full-time equivalent capacity.
The findings of this review and the delineation of the course scheduling and
weekly room use assumptions shall be submitted to the higher education
coordinating board and the office of financial management for review and
approval.

Institutions
of higher education receiving appropriations for predesign, design, or
construction of branch campus facilities in this act shall work with the higher
education coordinating board and the office of financial management to identify
options and prepare plans to increase the full-time equivalent capacity of
these projects and all future construction phases for these campuses. The goal
of these plans is to substantially increase full-time equivalent delivery
capacity above the level identified in the appropriation section. The plans
shall identify alternative program delivery strategies, options to increase use
of distance learning and technology, plans to improve space utilization, and
other recommendations to meet this goal. Branch campuses to be analyzed in
these plans include Vancouver, Tacoma, Bothell, Tri-Cities, and Spokane. The
development of these plans shall include consultation with every institution
that is planned to offer services at each site. Proposals for changes in the
facilities to be constructed in future phases shall clearly identify costs and
schedule alternatives, and currently designed construction projects shall
proceed on schedule.

Sec.
919. RCW
43.98A.040 and 1997 c 235 s 718 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the habitat conservation account shall
be distributed in the following way:

(a)
Not less than thirty-five percent for the acquisition and development of
critical habitat;

(b)
Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition and development of natural
areas;

(c)
Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition and development of urban
wildlife habitat; and

(d)
The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and shall be used by the
committee to fund high priority acquisition and development needs for critical
habitat, natural areas, and urban wildlife habitat. During the fiscal biennium
ending June 30, ((1999)) 2001, the remaining amount reappropriated
from the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1999, may be allocated for
matching grants for riparian zone habitat protection projects that implement
watershed plans under the program established in section 329(6), chapter
235, Laws of 1997.

(2)
In distributing these funds, the committee retains discretion to meet the most
pressing needs for critical habitat, natural areas, and urban wildlife habitat,
and is not required to meet the percentages described in subsection (1) of this
section in any one biennium.

(3)
Only state agencies may apply for acquisition and development funds for
critical habitat and natural areas projects under subsection (1)(a), (b), and
(d) of this section.

(4)
State and local agencies may apply for acquisition and development funds for
urban wildlife habitat projects under subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this
section.

Sec.
920. RCW
43.98A.060 and 1997 c 235 s 719 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and priorities
for distributions from the habitat conservation account.

(2)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
additional staff positions or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional,
or local agency to fund operation and maintenance of areas acquired under this
chapter, except that the committee may use moneys appropriated for this chapter
for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999)) 2001, for the
administrative costs of implementing the pilot watershed plan implementation
program established in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and
developing an inventory of publicly owned lands established in section
329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997.

(3)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used for costs incidental to
acquisition, including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.

(4)
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the committee may not
approve a local project where the local agency share is less than the amount to
be awarded from the habitat conservation account.

(5)
During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999)) 2001, the
committee may approve a riparian zone habitat protection project established
in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, where the local agency share
is less than the amount to be awarded from the habitat conservation account.

(6)
In determining acquisition priorities with respect to the habitat conservation
account, the committee shall consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(a)
For critical habitat and natural areas proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iii)
Uniqueness of the site;

(iv)
Diversity of species using the site;

(v)
Quality of the habitat;

(vi)
Long-term viability of the site;

(vii)
Presence of endangered, threatened, or sensitive species;

(viii)
Enhancement of existing public property;

(ix)
Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or state-wide
recreational or resource plan; and

(x)
Educational and scientific value of the site.

(b)
For urban wildlife habitat proposals, in addition to the criteria of (a) of
this subsection:

(i)
Population of, and distance from, the nearest urban area;

(ii)
Proximity to other wildlife habitat;

(iii)
Potential for public use; and

(iv)
Potential for use by special needs populations.

(7)
Before October 1st of each even-numbered year, the committee shall recommend to
the governor a prioritized list of state agency projects to be funded under RCW
43.98A.040(1) (a), (b), and (c). The governor may remove projects from the
list recommended by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the
capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be
limited to, a description of each project; and shall describe for each project
any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the
project.

(8)
Before October 1st of each year, the committee shall recommend to the governor
a prioritized list of all local projects to be funded under RCW
43.98A.040(1)(c). The governor may remove projects from the list recommended
by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital budget
request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a
description of each project and any particular match requirement, and describe
for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities
allowed prior to the project.

Sec.
921. RCW
43.98A.070 and 1997 c 235 s 720 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In determining which state parks proposals and local parks proposals to fund,
the committee shall use existing policies and priorities.

(2)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
additional staff or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local
agency to fund operation and maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter,
except that the committee may use moneys appropriated for this chapter for the
fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999)) 2001, for the
administrative costs of implementing the pilot watershed plan implementation
program established in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and
developing an inventory of publicly owned lands established in section
329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997.

(3)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used for costs incidental to
acquisition, including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.

(4)
The committee may not approve a project of a local agency where the share
contributed by the local agency is less than the amount to be awarded from the
outdoor recreation account.

(5)
The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and priorities
for the acquisition and development of trails and water access sites to be
financed from moneys in the outdoor recreation account.

(6)
In determining the acquisition and development priorities, the committee shall
consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(a)
For trails proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iii)
Linkage between communities;

(iv)
Linkage between trails;

(v)
Existing or potential usage;

(vi)
Consistency with an existing local land use plan or a regional or state-wide
recreational or resource plan;

(vii)
Availability of water access or views;

(viii)
Enhancement of wildlife habitat; and

(ix)
Scenic values of the site.

(b)
For water access proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Distance from similar water access opportunities;

(iii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iv)
Diversity of possible recreational uses; and

(v)
Public demand in the area.

(7)
Before October 1st of each even-numbered year, the committee shall recommend to
the governor a prioritized list of state agency projects to be funded under RCW
43.98A.050(1) (a), (c), and (d). The governor may remove projects from the
list recommended by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the
capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be
limited to, a description of each project; and shall describe for each project
any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the
project.

(8)
Before October 1st of each year, the committee shall recommend to the governor
a prioritized list of all local projects to be funded under RCW 43.98A.050(1)
(b), (c), and (d) of this act. The governor may remove projects from the list
recommended by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital
budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited
to, a description of each project and any particular match requirement, and
describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational
activities allowed prior to the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 922. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 146

COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM........................ 162

COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT...................... 4

COURT OF APPEALS................................................ 2

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 51

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 63

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE................................ 80

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION........................... 21

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 46

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES................................ 93

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES....................... 32

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS................................. 49

EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 161

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 141

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD........................... 109

INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR
OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 75

MILITARY DEPARTMENT............................................ 28

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT................................. 20

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR.......................................... 2

OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF
STATE................................ 2

SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE
RESEARCH AND TECHNICAL INSTITUTE...... 155

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 109

STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION.................................. 77

STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE
CENTER.............................. 30

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION.......................... 69

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 112

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 112

STATE TREASURER................................................. 4

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION.......................... 111

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 153

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON...................................... 113

WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY........................... 159

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL....................................... 107

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 125

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 156

--- END ---