BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. For
the purpose of providing funds to finance the projects described and authorized
by the legislature in the capital and operating appropriation acts for the
1999-01 fiscal biennium only, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state
of Washington in the sum of one billion two hundred four million two hundred
sixty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance
these projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this
section may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall
determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without
prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall
be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW
43.83.020. The proceeds shall be transferred as follows:

(1)
Nine hundred fifty million dollars to remain in the state building construction
account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(2)
Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the outdoor recreation
account created by RCW 43.99.060;

(3)
Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation
account created by RCW 43.98A.020;

(4)
One hundred thirty-six million eight hundred thirty-six thousand dollars to the
higher education construction account created by RCW 28B.14D.040;

(5)
Thirty-six million three hundred thousand dollars to the state higher education
construction account created by RCW 28B.10.851.

These
proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section
and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds
issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the
office of financial management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2
(1), (2), and (3) of this act.

(2)
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify
to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet
the bond retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in
section 2 (1), (2), and (3) of this act.

(3)
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on
bonds issued for the purposes of section 2 (1), (2), and (3) of this act the
state treasurer shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the
state treasury and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account an amount equal to the amount certified by the state finance committee
to be due on the payment date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account shall be used for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2
(4) and (5) of this act.

(2)
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify
to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet
the bond retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in
section 2 (4) and (5) of this act.

(3)
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on
bonds issued for the purposes of section 2(4) of this act, the board of regents
of the University of Washington shall cause to be paid out of University of
Washington nonappropriated local funds to the state treasurer for deposit into
the nondebt-limit reimbursement bond retirement account the amount computed in
subsection (2) of this section for bonds issued for the purposes of section
2(4) of this act.

(4)
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on
bonds issued for the purposes of section 2(5) of this act, the board of regents
of Washington State University shall cause to be paid out of the Washington
State University nonappropriated funds to the state treasurer for deposit into
the nondebt-limit reimbursement bond retirement account the amount computed in
subsection (2) of this section for bonds issued for the purposes of section
2(5) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Bonds issued under sections 1 through 4 of this act shall state that they are a
general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and
credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest
thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.

(2)
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and
holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
legislature may provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of
the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act,
and sections 2 through 4 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an
exclusive method for the payment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall be a legal investment for all
state funds or funds under state control and for all funds of any other public
body.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement
act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between
accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management
improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior
to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan I account, the public
employees' retirement system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the resource management cost account, the site closure account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense
account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account,
the teachers' retirement system plan II account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash
management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall
occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan I account, the public
employees' retirement system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the resource management cost account, the site closure account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense
account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan II and plan III account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal
account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan II and III account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this subsection
(4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the department
of licensing services account, the economic development account, the essential
rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the highway
safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---