BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1997
c 235 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public
works trust fund (94-2-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

$15,646,000
of the reappropriation in this section is provided solely for the
preconstruction program.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-

State...................... $ ((108,746,982))

106,698,661

Appropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-

State...................... $ ((180,977,328))

207,499,016

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).... $ ((287,953,301))

629,199,299

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs) $ 820,000,000

-------------

TOTAL...................... $ ((1,397,677,611))

1,134,197,677

Sec.
2. 1997
c 235 s 392 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
SPECIAL LAND PURCHASES AND COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION

Special
land purchases and common school construction (98-2-015)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation is provided to the department of natural resources solely for
the purposes of transferring from trust status certain trust lands of
state-wide significance to state park, wildlife habitat, natural area preserve,
natural resources conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes,
acquiring replacement timber trust lands, and providing funding for common
school construction.

(2)
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for the transfer of the
following list of trust properties to the identified agency:

(a)
Iron Horse/Bandera, King county, to the state parks and recreation commission;

(b)
Kitsap Forest, Kitsap county, to the department of natural resources for
natural area preserve purposes;

(c)
Upper Sultan Basin, Snohomish county, to the department of natural resources
for natural resource conservation area purposes;

(d)
West Tiger Mountain, King county, to the department of natural resources for
natural resource conservation area purposes;

(e)
Hendrickson Canyon, Wahkiakum county, to the department of natural resources
for natural area preserve purposes;

(f)
Klickitat Wildlife Area, Klickitat county, to the department of fish and
wildlife;

(g)
Point Lawrence, San Juan county, to the state parks and recreation commission.

The
department shall transfer the ((first)) trust ((property and then
allocate the remaining funds to the remaining)) properties ((in roughly
equal shares)) in the order listed.

(3)
Land and timber transferred under this section shall be appraised and
transferred at full market value. The department of natural resources shall
attempt to maintain a minimum aggregate ratio of 85:15 timber-to-land value in
these transactions. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by
the department of natural resources in the same manner as timber revenues from
other common school trust lands, except that no deduction shall be made for the
resource management cost account. The value of the land transferred, not to
exceed $3,000,000, shall be deposited in the natural resources real property
replacement account to be used for the acquisition of replacement timber lands
solely to benefit the common school trust.

(4)
All reasonable costs incurred by the department of natural resources to
implement this section may be paid out of this appropriation, except that the
costs of acquiring replacement timber lands shall be paid out of appropriations
from the natural resources real property replacement account.

(5)
The department shall use intergrant exchanges between common school and other
trust lands of equal value to effect the purposes of this section if the
exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by the board of
natural resources.

(6)
The department of natural resources and receiving agencies shall work in good
faith to carry out the intent of this section. However, the board of natural
resources or a receiving agency may reject a transfer of property if it is
determined that the transfer is not in the interest of either the common school
trust or the receiving agency.

(7)
((On June 30, 1999)) Upon completion of these transfers, the
state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted funds from this
appropriation to the common school construction fund ((and the appropriation
in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount)).

Appropriation:

St
Bldg Constr Acct............. $ 34,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs) $ 132,000,000

-------------

TOTAL................. $ 166,500,000

Sec.
3. 1997
c 235 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
school building construction (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
From the appropriation in this section the state board shall fund one hundred
percent of the cost for a required standard value engineering study on all
projects exceeding 50,000 gross square feet in size. On an annual basis, the
board shall report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of
financial management the results of these studies including but not limited to
the amounts of each study and the accepted savings achieved due to the studies.

(2)
((No more than $138,000,000 of this appropriation, excluding
reappropriations, may be obligated in fiscal year 1998 for school district
project design and construction.

(3)
Total cash disbursed from the common school construction fund may not exceed
the available cash balance.

(4))) The
reappropriation from the state building construction account shall serve as
full compensation to the common school trust for the transfer of land to the
Washington State University Lind Dryland Research Unit under Substitute House
Bill No. 1016 or Senate Bill No. 5174.

(((5)))
(3) No more than $7,110,000 of this appropriation may be allocated by
the state board to provide up to ninety percent of the total project cost for
the renovation of facilities operating as interdistrict cooperative centers
providing vocational skill programs. The remaining portion of the project cost
shall be a match from local sources. As a condition to receiving an allocation
from this appropriation or any other appropriation for a vocational skill
center provided after calendar year 1996, the recipient facility must maintain
a separate capital account, into which the participating districts make
deposits, to pay for all future minor repair and renovation costs for the
vocational skill center. For purposes of this subsection, a future minor
repair and renovation cost is a capital project costing less than forty percent
of the value of the building.

Reappropriation:

St
Bldg Constr Acct‑-State...... $ 18,329,671

Common
School Constr Fund‑-State $ 109,115,719

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.... $ 127,445,390

Appropriation:

Common
School Constr Fund‑-

State...................... $ ((275,798,712))

289,548,712

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).... $ ((302,821,218))

719,815,320

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs) $ 801,600,000

-------------

TOTAL...................... $ ((1,507,665,320))

1,521,415,320

Sec.
4. 1997
c 235 s 624 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
((THE JOINT CENTER FOR HIGHER EDUCATION)) WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

Health
Sciences Building: To ((design)) construct
the complete (((phase I and II))) health science building. (((98-2-001)))
(98-2-903)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under section 712 of this act.

(2)
No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board.

(3)
Design and construction of this building shall accommodate at least 240
additional student full-time equivalents on the Riverpoint campus.

(((4)
$1,000,000 of the state building construction account appropriation shall be
held in reserve until January 1, 1999.

(5)
Design of this building, when used in conjunction with the building authorized
in section 702(1)(b) of this act, shall accommodate all the academic programs
offered by Eastern Washington University and Washington State University that
are currently in leased space in the city of Spokane.))

Reappropriation:

St
Bldg Constr Acct‑‑State...... $ 1,310,000

Appropriation:

St
Bldg Constr Acct‑-State...... $ 1,375,375

St
H Ed Constr Acct‑-State...... $ 36,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs) $ ((29,219,025))

0

-------------

TOTAL................. $ ((31,904,400))

38,985,375

Sec.
5. 1998
c 347 s 53 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION
OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The
following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
revenues, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the
most economical financial contract option available, including long-term
leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase
agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. The
director of general administration shall ensure that the clustering of state
facilities and the collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place
where such configurations are economical and consistent with agency space
needs. Agencies shall assist the department of general administration with
facility collocation and consolidation efforts.

State
agencies may enter into agreements with the department of general
administration and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the
legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial
contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(1)
Department of general administration:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $8,804,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Yakima for use by the
department of social and health services.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $2,874,100 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase and
renovate the old federal building and associated land in Olympia for use by the
secretary of state.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $6,990,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to buy out the
lease and make improvements to the old Thurston county courthouse for use by
the office of attorney general. The department of general administration shall
advise and assist the office of attorney general on space and functional
planning to improve the efficient use of the facility.

(2)
Liquor control board:

Enter
into a long-term lease for a headquarters office in Thurston County for
approximately 46,000 square feet.

(3)
Department of corrections:

(a)
Enter into a long-term ground lease for ((17 acres in the Tacoma tide flats
property from the Puyallup Nation)) approximately 12 acres with a
purchase option for development of the 400-bed Tacoma prerelease facility
for approximately $360,000 per annum. ((Prior to entering into the lease,
the department shall obtain written confirmation from the city of Tacoma and
Pierce county that the prerelease facility planned for the site meets all land
use, environmental protection, and community notification requirements that
would apply to the facility if the land was not owned by the Puyallup nation.))

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $14,736,900 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a 400-bed Tacoma prerelease
facility. The department of corrections shall comply with all land use, environmental
protection, and community notification statutes, regulations, and ordinances in
the construction and operation of this facility.

(c)
Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 100
work release beds in facilities throughout the state for $5,000,000.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $396,369 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a dairy barn at the Monroe farm.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $2,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional industries
transportation services warehouse.

(4)
Community and technical colleges:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a childcare center costing $2,410,000. The
balance of project cost will be a combination of local capital funds and
nonstate funds provided through private gifts or contributions.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College in the amount of
$750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to develop a new classroom building on the Lakewood campus costing
$1,816,665. The balance of project cost will be provided through a combination
of local capital funds and existing minor works appropriation to replace
relocatable classrooms that are at the end of their useful lives.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract in behalf of Bellingham Technical College in
the amount of $350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for construction of a new classroom addition to the
diesel/heavy equipment instructional shop costing $411,309.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $1,526,150 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for remodel of the Lindbloom student center building.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the
amount of $2,787,950 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 10,000 square foot music building on the college
campus.

(f)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the
amount of $2,070,613 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the purchase of the Federal Way Center, currently being leased by
the college.

(g)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $100,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase approximately 1.5 acres of land adjacent to the westside
parking lot.

(h)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community
College in the amount of $619,210 plus financing and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to expand and redevelop the main campus parking lot A.

(i)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community
College in the amount of $5,500,000 plus financing and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a $6,500,000 student union facility.

(j)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the college
campus.

(5)
State parks and recreation:

Enter
into a financing contract on behalf of state parks and recreation in the amount
of $2,012,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW, to construct cabin and lodge facilities at Cama Beach, develop new
campsite electrical hookups, develop new recreational facilities, and expand
campsites at Ocean Beach/Grayland. It is the intent of the legislature that
debt service on all projects financed under this authority be paid from
operating revenues.

(6)
Washington state patrol:

Enter
into a financing contract for $600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Washington state patrol
Port Angeles detachment office.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---