BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is approximately a fifty-year capacity within
existing municipal solid waste landfills in the state. The legislature also
finds that ground water contamination is the most serious environmental threat
posed by municipal solid waste landfills and that the potential for
contaminated ground water is far less in arid climates. The legislature
further finds that approximately forty percent of garbage is currently being
disposed of within arid areas of the state. The legislature therefore declares
that no new municipal solid waste landfill should be located in a site that
receives an average of twelve or more inches of rain per year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.95 RCW to read as follows:

As
of July 1, 1999, no new municipal solid waste landfill may be sited in an area
of the state that receives twelve or more inches of rain per year, based on the
most recent thirty-year average. This section shall not apply to the expansion
of any landfill that has been legally permitted before July 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---