BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.23 RCW to read as follows:

Elected
municipal officers shall be held to the same ethical standards as provided for
state officers under RCW 42.52.140 and 42.52.150.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.23.020 and 1961 c 268 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of this ((act)) chapter and RCW 28A.58.310, 35.17.150,
35.17.160, 35.23.230, and 42.22.030:

(1)
"Municipality" ((shall)) includes all counties, cities,
towns, districts, and other municipal corporations and quasi municipal
corporations organized under the laws of the state of Washington;

(2)
"Municipal officer" and "officer" ((shall)) each
include all elected and appointed officers of a municipality, together with all
deputies and assistants of such an officer, and all persons exercising or
undertaking to exercise any of the powers or functions of a municipal officer;

(3)
"Elected municipal officer" means a municipal officer who holds an
elective office.

(4)
"Contract" ((shall)) includes any contract, sale, lease,
or purchase;

(((4))) (5) "Contracting party" ((shall))
includes any person, partnership, association, cooperative, corporation,
or other business entity which is a party to a contract with a municipality.

---
END ---