BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
64.12.030 and Code 1881 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any person ((shall)) cuts down, girdles
or otherwise injures, or ((carry)) carries off any tree,
timber, or shrub on the land of another person, or on the street or
highway in front of any person's house, village, town, or city lot, or
cultivated grounds, or on the commons or public grounds of any village, town,
or city, or on the street or highway in front thereof, without lawful
authority, in an action by such person, village, town, or city against
the person committing such trespasses or any of them, if judgment be given for
the plaintiff, it shall be given for the greater of five hundred dollars or
treble the amount of damages claimed or assessed therefor, as the case may be.

---
END ---