BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of:

(1)
Items that become components of a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020; or

(2)
Labor and services rendered for constructing, repairing, decorating, or
improving a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use of items that
become components of a jail as defined in RCW 70.48.020.

---
END ---