BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A municipality may not adopt or implement an ordinance or land use regulation
in a manner that prohibits a person from engaging in the activities of an
automobile collector in an area zoned by the municipality, so long as any
vehicles, including any vehicles that may qualify as "junk vehicles"
as described in RCW 46.55.230, are maintained and stored by the collector and
are located out of ordinary public view by means of inside storage, suitable
fencing, trees, shrubbery, or topography.

(2)
A person engaged in the activities of an automobile collector may conduct
mechanical repairs and modifications to a vehicle located out of ordinary
public view on private real property.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Automobile collector" has the same meaning as "collector"
in RCW 46.04.125; and

(b)
"Ordinary public view" means within normal visual range by a person
on a public street or sidewalk adjacent to real property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 35.22 RCW to read as follows:

Section
1 of this act applies to cities of the first class.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

Section
1 of this act applies to code cities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

Section 1 of this act applies to counties.

---
END ---