BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.04.571 and 1996 c 225 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

"Street
rod vehicle" is a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, that meets the
following conditions:

(1)(a)
The vehicle was manufactured before 1949, ((or)) (b) the vehicle
has been assembled or reconstructed using major component parts of a motor
vehicle manufactured before 1949, or (c) the vehicle was assembled or
manufactured after 1949, to resemble a vehicle manufactured before 1949;
and

(2)(a) The vehicle has been modified in its body style or
design through the use of nonoriginal or reproduction components, such as
frame, engine, drive train, suspension, or brakes in a manner that does not
adversely affect its safe performance as a motor vehicle or render it unlawful
for highway use, or (b) the body has been constructed from nonoriginal
materials or has been altered dimensionally or in shape and appearance from the
original manufactured body.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.37.500 and 1988 c 15 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no person may
operate any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer that is not equipped with
fenders, covers, flaps, or splash aprons adequate for minimizing the spray or
splash of water or mud from the roadway to the rear of the vehicle. All such
devices shall be as wide as the tires behind which they are mounted and extend
downward at least to the center of the axle.

(2) A motor vehicle that is not less than forty years old ((and))
or a street rod vehicle that is owned and operated primarily as a
collector's item need not be equipped with fenders when the vehicle is used and
driven during fair weather on well-maintained, hard-surfaced roads.

---
END ---