BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to encourage each school district to prepare a
district-wide emergency management plan, and to encourage public and private
schools to prepare an emergency management plan, to respond to and recover from
emergencies and disasters. These plans should include provisions for periodic
testing to maintain emergency preparedness. An emergency management plan for a
school district should be consistent and coordinated throughout the entire
school district.

This
act may be known and cited as the school violence reduction and emergency
preparedness act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.330 RCW to read as follows:

School
districts and public schools are encouraged to develop and adopt an emergency
management plan limited in scope to the preparation for, response to, and
recovery from human-caused emergencies stemming from acts or threats of
violence or an all-hazard emergency management plan that details how it will
prepare for, respond to, and recover from natural, technological, and
human-caused emergencies and disasters, including acts of violence. This
emergency management plan should: (1) Identify potential hazards that may pose
a threat to the school or to the staff and students of that school; (2)
describe measures to be taken to protect students, staff, volunteers, and
parents, and to reduce the impacts of each of these potential events, including
plans that describe the protection of people, capital facilities, and
equipment; and (3) describe steps to be taken in the event of an emergency to
ensure all primary emergency functions are fulfilled. Primary emergency functions
may include transportation strategies; methods of communication; and the roles
and responsibilities for staff, students, and volunteers in carrying out
primary emergency functions. Additional elements may be included in an
all-hazard emergency management plan. The emergency management division of the
military department, in cooperation with local emergency management agencies,
shall develop and provide to school districts an "all-hazard planning
guide" for school districts and schools.

These
district and school emergency management plans should encourage each school
within the school district to develop an education program to inform students,
staff, volunteers, and parents about its emergency management plan. An
emergency management plan should be exercised annually during the school year.
These exercises may address different types of potential hazards, such as armed
intruders and earthquakes, in addition to periodic fire drills.

School
districts are encouraged to develop their emergency management plans and
programs in collaboration with the emergency management plan and program
established by the local emergency management agency under chapter 38.52 RCW
and their local law enforcement and fire agencies. School districts are also
encouraged to submit their draft plans to their local emergency management
agency for review before formal adoption by the school board. School districts
are encouraged to develop or update their plans within three years of the
effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.195 RCW to read as follows:

Private
schools are encouraged to develop and adopt an emergency management plan
limited in scope to the preparation for, response to, and recovery from
human-caused emergencies stemming from acts or threats of violence or an
all-hazard emergency management plan that details how it will prepare for,
respond to, and recover from natural, technological, and human-caused
emergencies and disasters, including acts of violence. This emergency
management plan should: (1) Identify potential hazards that may pose a threat
to the school or to the staff and students of that school; (2) describe
measures to be taken to protect students, staff, volunteers, and parents and to
reduce the impacts of each of these potential events, including plans that
describe the protection of people, capital facilities, and equipment; and (3)
describe steps to be taken in the event of an emergency to ensure all primary
emergency functions are fulfilled. Primary emergency functions may include
transportation strategies; methods of communication; and the roles and
responsibilities for staff, students, and volunteers in carrying out primary
emergency functions. Additional elements may be included in an all-hazard
emergency management plan. The emergency management division of the military
department, in cooperation with local emergency management agencies, shall
develop and provide to private schools an "all-hazard planning guide"
for schools.

These
school emergency management plans should encourage each private school to
develop an education program to inform students, staff, volunteers, and parents
about its emergency management plan. An emergency management plan should be exercised
annually during the school year. These exercises may address different types
of potential hazards, such as armed intruders and earthquakes, in addition to
periodic fire drills.

Private
schools are encouraged to develop their emergency management plans and programs
in collaboration with the emergency management plan and program established by
the local emergency management agency under chapter 38.52 RCW and their local
law enforcement and fire agencies. Private schools are encouraged to develop or
update their plans within three years of the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Funding for sections 2 and 3 of this act shall be provided to local emergency
management agencies through the emergency management division of the military
department. Funds shall be distributed on the basis of per capita full-time
equivalent student enrollment in school districts, as follows:

(a)
Emergency management agencies for counties with kindergarten through twelfth
grade public school enrollment of more than one hundred thousand full-time
equivalent students shall receive funding sufficient to employ one full-time
equivalent employee for purposes of implementing sections 2 and 3 of this act;

(b)
Emergency management agencies for counties with kindergarten through twelfth
grade public school enrollment of more than two hundred thousand full-time
equivalent students shall receive funding sufficient to employ two full-time
equivalent employees for purposes of implementing sections 2 and 3 of this act;
and

(c)
The emergency management division of the military department shall be allocated
funding sufficient to employ six full-time equivalent employees for purposes of
implementing sections 2 and 3 of this act in regions not served through funding
made available pursuant to (a) and (b) of this subsection.

(2) School districts that have adopted an emergency management plan
or are in the process of developing an emergency management plan shall report
to the emergency management division of the military department whether the
school district's plan has been adopted or is under development, and shall
further report whether the plan adopted or under development is an emergency
management plan limited in scope to the preparation for, response to, and
recovery from human-caused emergencies stemming from acts or threats of
violence or an all-hazard emergency management plan. They shall submit these
reports to the emergency management division of the military department by
December 31, 2001, and December 31st of every third year thereafter. The
emergency management division of the military department shall report to the
education committees of the house of representatives and senate on school and
school district emergency management planning activities by February 15, 2002,
and by February 15th of every third year thereafter.

---
END ---