BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A fee of ten dollars is created and shall be assessed on each real estate
broker, associate broker, and salesperson originally licensed after October 1,
1999, and upon each renewal of a license with an expiration date after October
1, 1999, including renewals of inactive licenses.

(2)
This section expires September 30, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington real estate research account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from the fee under section 1 of this act shall be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes
of section 3 of this act.

(2)
This section expires September 30, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of a real estate research center in Washington state is to provide
credible research, value-added information, education services, and
project-oriented research to real estate licensees, real estate consumers, real
estate service providers, institutional customers, public agencies, and
communities in Washington state and the Pacific Northwest region. The center
may:

(a)
Conduct studies and research on affordable housing and strategies to meet the
affordable housing needs of the state;

(b)
Conduct studies in all areas directly or indirectly related to real estate and urban
or rural economics and economically isolated communities;

(c)
Disseminate findings and results of real estate research conducted at or by the
center or elsewhere, using a variety of dissemination media;

(d)
Supply research results and educational expertise to the Washington state real
estate commission to support its regulatory functions, as requested;

(e)
Prepare information of interest to real estate consumers and make the
information available to the general public, universities, or colleges, and
appropriate state agencies;

(f)
Encourage economic growth and development within the state of Washington;

(g)
Support the professional development and continuing education of real estate
licensees in Washington; and

(h)
Study and recommend changes in state statutes relating to real estate.

(2)
The director shall establish a memorandum of understanding with an institution
of higher learning that establishes a real estate research center for the
purposes under subsection (1) of this section.

(3) This section expires September 30, 2005.

---
END ---