BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.165 and 1998 c 245 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions as high-occupancy vehicle lanes, including any
designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public
transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a
specified number of passengers when such limitation will increase the efficient
utilization of the highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources.
((There is hereby appropriated from the transportation fund‑-state to
the department of transportation, program C for the period ending June 30,
1993, an additional $15 million for the sole purpose of expediting completion
of the HOV core lane system.)) Regulations authorizing such exclusive or
preferential use of a highway facility ((may be declared to be)) are
effective ((at all times or at specified times of day or on specified days))
only from 6:00 through 9:00 a.m. and 3:30 through 6:00 p.m. Monday through
Friday, excluding state holidays.

---
END ---