BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A
budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the
following sections, the several amounts specified in parts I through VIII of
this act, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes
designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for
other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 1999, and
ending June 30, 2001, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of
the state hereinafter named.

(2)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this act.

(a)
"Fiscal year 2000" or "FY 2000" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000.

(b)
"Fiscal year 2001" or "FY 2001" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2001.

(c)
"FTE" means full time equivalent.

(d)
"Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.

(e)
"Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for
the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act,
any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is
unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART
I

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR
THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 24,828,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 25,667,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 50,520,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR
THE SENATE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 19,674,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 21,131,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 40,830,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR
THE JOINT
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,988,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,050,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,038,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,457,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,585,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 202,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,244,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF THE STATE ACTUARY

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,926,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR
THE JOINT
LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,847,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 5,847,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 11,694,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR
THE STATUTE
LAW COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,785,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 3,947,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,732,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR
THE SUPREME
COURT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 4,847,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 5,061,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 9,908,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR
THE LAW
LIBRARY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,827,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,846,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,673,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110. FOR
THE COURT
OF APPEALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 12,123,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 12,757,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 24,880,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 921,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 832,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,753,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR
THE ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 14,495,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 14,745,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 26,041,000

Judicial
Information Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 17,018,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 72,299,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,594,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 114. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 6,348,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 6,374,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 14,209,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 700,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 27,631,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,612,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,588,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$700,000 of the water quality account appropriation, and $209,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01
through PSAT-05.

(2)
$743,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $822,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the salmon recovery office to meet its
responsibilities for the state-wide salmon recovery strategy. Of this amount:
(a) $1,000,000 is provided for volunteer coordination and training activities;
(b) $100,000 is provided for the operation of the independent science panel;
and (c) $465,000 is provided for staff at the salmon recovery office to support
local salmon recovery planning efforts.

(3)
$14,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for implementation of the forestry components of the state-wide salmon recovery
strategy. These funds shall be provided to the department of natural resources
to implement new forest practice rules adopted by the forest practices board
including the following activities: (a) $5,000,000 is provided to purchase or
lease riparian areas and other habitat from landowners with small parcels; (b)
$1,492,000 is provided for technical assistance to small landowners to develop
forestry plans; (c) $530,000 is provided for the protection of cultural
resources; (d) $5,505,000 is for the development of geographic information
system data layers for forest roads, hydrography, water type, and wetlands; (d)
$1,253,000 is for cooperative, monitoring, evaluation, and research (CMER)
projects related to monitoring the new forest practice rules; and (e) $220,000
is provided for a rate of timber harvest study.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 115. FOR
THE LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 302,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 301,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 160,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 763,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 116. FOR
THE PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,400,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001) ... $ 1,414,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,814,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 117. FOR
THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 13,912,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 8,286,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 120,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,401,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-Private/

Local
Appropriation........................ $ 2,581,000

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 30,981,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,355,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and
general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state
measures.

(2)
$3,780,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of presidential
preference primary election costs.

(3)
$2,231,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,788,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the verification of initiative and referendum
petitions, maintenance of related voter registration records, and the
publication and distribution of the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(4)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW
29.27.072.

(5)(a)
$1,870,350 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,907,757 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for continuing the contract with a nonprofit
organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government
deliberations and other events of state-wide significance during the 1999-2001
biennium.

(b)
The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price deflator
for the previous year. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an
amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the
secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in (a)
and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(c)
The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual
financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure
the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d)
No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used,
directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i)
Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the
legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other
political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency;

(ii)
Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii)
Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or
entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(6)
$867,000 of the archives and records management account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central microfilming
bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8)

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 118. FOR
THE GOVERNOR'S
OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 270,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 269,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 539,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Within the appropriations provided in this section, the
governor's office of Indian affairs may participate in activities to examine
tribal economies, diversification opportunities, and tribal contributions to
local economies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 119. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 215,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 215,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 430,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 120. FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER

State
Treasurer's Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.. ........................... $ 13,184,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 121. FOR
THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 496,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 122. FOR
THE STATE
AUDITOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 917,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 914,000

State
Auditing Services Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,728,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,559,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 123. FOR
THE CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 84,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 122,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 206,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 124. FOR
THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,929,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 3,917,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,291,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,338,000

New
Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,109,000

Legal Services
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 117,364,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 129,948,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services
expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving
legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year.

(2)
The attorney general shall include, at a minimum, the following information
with each bill sent to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The number of
hours and cost of attorney services provided during the billing period; (b)
cost of support staff services provided during the billing period; (c) attorney
general overhead and central support costs charged to the agency for the
billing period; (d) direct legal costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged
to the agency for the billing period; and (e) other costs charged to the agency
for the billing period. The attorney general may, with approval of the office
of financial management change its billing system to meet the needs of its user
agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 125. FOR
THE CASELOAD
FORECAST COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 401,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 399,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 126. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS

Securities Regulation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,002,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 127. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 69,321,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 71,068,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 147,675,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 6,918,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 8,793,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,344,000

Building
Code Council Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,375,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,776,000

Low-Income
Weatherization Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,289,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 6,051,000

Manufactured
Home Installation Training Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 252,000

Washington
Housing Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,485,000

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 522,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 325,869,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,962,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,602,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington technology center.
For work essential to the mission of the Washington technology center and
conducted in partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any
increased indirect rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the
absolute amount paid during the 1995-97 biennium.

(2)
$61,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$62,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item DCTED-01.

(3)
$11,593,320 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2000 as follows:

(a)
$3,603,250 to local units of government to continue multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(b)
$620,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program
in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,552,800 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$240,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$991,000 to drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f)
$302,551 to the department for grants assisting in the development, conduct,
and training on sentencing alternatives;

(g)
$200,000 to the department to continue a substance-abuse treatment in jails
program, to test the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h)
$667,075 to the department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i)
$903,000 to the department to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$91,000 to the department to continue the governor's council on substance
abuse;.

(k)
$99,000 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant
programs;

(l)
$1,519,244 to the office of financial management for criminal history records
improvement;

(m)
$804,400 to the department for required grant administration, monitoring, and
reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne
grant distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may
not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget request for
the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and request authority to
spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this subsection.

(4)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the tourism office to increase rural tourism
development, consumer marketing, and international marketing. Within the funds
provided in this section the tourism office will develop a system that will
provide internet access to photographs and other images. Within the funds
provided in this section, the tourism office and the film office will
administer $60,000 in grants and technical assistance to help communities
attract film and video production to their communities.

(5)
$750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for a grant program to help communities design and
carry out rural economic development projects.

(6)
$1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters for
homeless families with children.

(7)
$2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to operate transitional housing for
homeless families with children. The grants may also be used to make partial
payments for rental assistance.

(8)
$1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for consolidated emergency assistance to homeless
families with children.

(9)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the department to contract with the Washington state
institute for public policy to complete a study on homelessness. The
institute will:

(a)
Review the methods used to collect information on the homeless and services to
the homeless and determine the accuracy of the information that has been
collected;

(b)
Recommend methods that will improve the collection, accuracy, and reliability
of information on homeless persons and the services they receive; and

(c)
Recommend the priority for spending funds on shelters, transitional housing,
affordable housing, and homelessness prevention.

The
institute will provide a final report to the department and the office of
financial management no later than June 30, 2000.

(10)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the department to develop and implement a system to collect
accurate and reliable information on homeless persons.

(11)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided to the department solely for providing technical assistance to
developers of housing for farmworkers.

(12)
$160,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation is solely for
providing technical assistance to local communities that are developing the
infrastructure needed to support the development of housing for farmworkers.

(13)
$205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia river gorge counties
to implement their responsibilities under the national scenic area management
plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is provided for Skamania county, and $20,000 is
provided for Clark county.

(14)
$1,105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the department's responsibilities in the
state-wide salmon recovery strategy. Of this amount: (a) $2,000,000 is
provided for a grant program to counties to update their critical area
ordinances to reflect best available science. Counties with demonstrated
financial need shall receive priority for these grants; and (b) $210,000 is
provided for technical assistance to local watershed planning efforts under the
watershed planning act.

(15)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for a competitive grant program for local governments for
coastal erosion activities. All grant applications will be reviewed and
prioritized by a state and federal agency technical task force consisting of,
but not limited to, the department of community, trade, and economic
development; the department of ecology; the department of fish and wildlife;
the parks and recreation commission; and the United States army corps of
engineers. All local governments receiving a coastal erosion grant must use a
competitive bid process in awarding contracts resulting from these grants. Up
to $120,000 of these funds may be used by the department for the activities of
its coastal task force.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 128. FOR
THE ECONOMIC
AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 457,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 459,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 916,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 129. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 12,396,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 11,986,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,340,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 47,722,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 130. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative
Hearings Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 21,347,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 131. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,947,000

Higher
Education Personnel Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,640,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,587,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall reduce its charge for personnel services to the lowest
rate possible.

(2)
The department of personnel service account appropriation contains sufficient
funds to continue the employee exchange program with the Hyogo prefecture in
Japan.

(3)
$515,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for the development and implementation of a new employment
application processing system to: Provide for electronic applications via the
internet, provide continuous application acceptance, provide increased public
access to job openings, allow for single applications for multiple jobs, and
provide for scanning of larger applicant databases as job openings arise.

(4)
$190,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for the expansion of the executive fellowship program.

(5)
$108,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for increased funding of the administrative expenses of the
combined fund drive.

(6)
The department of personnel has the authority to charge agencies for expenses
associated with converting its payroll/personnel computer system to accommodate
the year 2000 date change. Funding to cover these expenses shall be realized
from the agency FICA savings associated with the pretax benefits contributions
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 132. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE LOTTERY

Lottery
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 21,187,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 133. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 216,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 225,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 441,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 134. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 193,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 191,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 384,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 135. FOR
THE PERSONNEL
APPEALS BOARD

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,624,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 136. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent
Care Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 361,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 40,735,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 41,096,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$212,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the additional resources needed for the teachers'
retirement system plan 3.

(2)
$1,154,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the replacement of the deferred
compensation program record keeping system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 137. FOR
THE STATE
INVESTMENT BOARD

State
Investment Board Expense Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,519,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 138. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 71,007,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 69,419,000

Timber
Tax Distribution Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,899,000

Waste
Education/Recycling/Litter Control‑-State

Appropriation.......................... ... $ 101,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 67,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 145,507,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 139. FOR
THE BOARD
OF TAX APPEALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 920,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 936,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,856,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 140. FOR
THE MUNICIPAL
RESEARCH COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,766,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,822,000

County
Research Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,269,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 141. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

OMWBE
Enterprises Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,546,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 142. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 279,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 279,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,116,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 417,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 395,000

General
Administration Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 44,124,000

Energy
Efficiency Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 199,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 47,809,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The department shall develop an allocation method for tort
defense costs with the office of the attorney general and selected agency
representatives. A report shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by June 30, 2000, on how the agencies will be billed for their tort
defense services from the liability account. If Z-. . . ./99
(consolidates tort activities) is not enacted by June 30, 1999, this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 143. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES

Data
Processing Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,605,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 144. FOR
THE INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 304,000

Insurance
Commissioners Regulatory Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,425,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 24,729,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$500,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely for funding agreements with insurance companies, to counsel
policyholders and administer the liquidation of insurance companies.

(2)
$730,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely for performing market conduct exams on life and annuity
policies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 145. FOR
THE BOARD
OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified
Public Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,180,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 146. FOR
THE FORENSIC
INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 22,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 147. FOR
THE HORSE
RACING COMMISSION

Horse
Racing Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,605,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 148. FOR
THE LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,310,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,302,000

Liquor
Control Board Construction and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 8,120,000

Liquor
Revolving Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 128,389,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 139,121,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $300,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is
provided solely for the board to develop a business plan. The board shall
provide copies of the plan to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the legislature by September 30, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 149. FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Public
Service Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,918,000

Public
Service Revolving Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 652,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 26,570,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 150. FOR
THE BOARD
FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer
Firefighters' Relief and Pension

Administrative
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 573,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 151. FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 26,186,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 8,264,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,148,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 238,000

Enhanced
911 Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 16,491,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State Appropriation. $ 17,792,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-Federal Appropriation $ 88,126,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 179,245,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$17,792,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely for deposit in the disaster response account to cover costs
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
$17,792,000 of the disaster response account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the state share of response and recovery costs associated
with federal emergency management agency (FEMA) disaster 1079 (November/December
1995 storms), FEMA disaster 1100 (February 1996 floods), FEMA disaster 1152
(November 1996 ice storm), FEMA disaster 1159 (December 1996 holiday storm),
FEMA disaster 1172 (March 1997 floods), FEMA disaster 1252 (1998 northeast
counties floods), and FEMA disaster 1255 (Kelso landslide). The military
department is to submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate
detailing disaster costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d)
estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future
payments by biennium. This information is to be displayed by individual disaster,
by fund, and by type of assistance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 152. FOR
THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,034,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,032,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,066,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 153. FOR
THE GROWTH
PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,422,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,383,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,805,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 154. FOR
THE STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER

State
Convention and Trade Center Operating

Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 29,963,000

(End of part)

PART
II

HUMAN
SERVICES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in
this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be
allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and
spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in
this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state
moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys
shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys"
includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be
spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.

(3)(a)
The appropriations to the department of social and health services in chapters
. . . and . . ., Laws of 1999, as amended, shall be
expended for the programs and in the amounts specified therein. However, after
May 1, 2000, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer general fund‑-state appropriations for fiscal year 2000 among
programs and among amounts including amounts provided under conditions and
limitations after approval by the director of the office of financial
management.

(b)
The director of the office of financial management shall notify the appropriate
fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior
to approving any allotment modifications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 209,526,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 224,123,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 336,120,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 4,182,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 774,351,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $376,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000
appropriation, $380,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001
appropriation, and $4,182,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation are provided solely for the operation of the family
policy council and the community public health and safety networks and these
shall be the only funds made available in this section to the family policy
council and the community public health and safety networks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 34,286,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 35,746,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 7,013,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 380,000

Juvenile
Accountability Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,250,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 20,674,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 103,349,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000
appropriation and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001
appropriation are provided to implement community juvenile accountability
grants. Grant moneys awarded by the department under this subsection must be
matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis, in cash and must be used to supplement,
not supplant, other federal, state and local funds.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 48,003,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 49,179,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 740,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 15,282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 113,204,000

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,501,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,500,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 156,000

Juvenile
Accountability Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,678,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 167,619,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 173,229,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 298,576,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 639,424,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Regional support networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for implementation of working agreements with the vocational
rehabilitation program which will maximize the use of federal funding for
vocational programs.

(b)
From the general fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the
secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support
networks reimburse the aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state
cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 72,720,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 72,485,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 139,206,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 28,779,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 313,190,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to
purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations
when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b)
The mental health program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor
provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(3)
CIVIL COMMITMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 9,163,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 9,817,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,980,000

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 494,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 493,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,269,000

(5)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,178,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,766,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,822,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 9,766,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 182,014,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 194,700,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 303,003,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 144,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 679,861,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The health services account appropriation and $155,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
enrollment in the basic health plan of home care workers with family incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are employed through state
contracts. Enrollment in the basic health plan for home care workers with
family incomes at or above 200 percent of poverty shall be covered with general
fund‑-state and matching general fund‑-federal revenues that were
identified by the department to have been previously appropriated for health
benefits coverage, to the extent that these funds had not been contractually
obligated for worker wage increases prior to March 1, 1996.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 67,363,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 66,937,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 147,412,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 9,732,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 291,444,000

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,317,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,316,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,353,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,986,000

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,007,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 438,881,000

General Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 462,869,000

General Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 969,039,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 5,404,000

Health Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 1,720,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,877,913,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The entire health services account appropriation and $1,676,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the enrollment in the
basic health plan of home care workers with family incomes below 200 percent of
the federal poverty level who are employed through state contracts. Enrollment
in the basic health plan for home care workers with family incomes at or above
200 percent of poverty shall be covered with general fund‑-state and
matching general fund‑-federal revenues that were identified by the
department to have been previously appropriated for health benefits coverage,
to the extent that these funds had not been contractually obligated for worker
wage increases prior to March 1, 1996.

(2)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The nursing home
entered into an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1,
1980; (b) the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980;
and (c) the lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home
after January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided
pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or
rate-setting requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(3)
For purposes of implementing chapter 322, Laws of 1998 (nursing home payment
rates), the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal year 2000
shall be no more than $114.62 and no more than $117.39 for fiscal year 2001,
including vendor rate increases, but excluding nurse's aide training. These
maximum allowable yearly rates are based on the following quarterly average
rates: First quarter, fiscal year 2000: $115.46; second quarter, fiscal year
2000: $114.01; third quarter, fiscal year 2000: $114.34; fourth quarter,
fiscal year 2000: $114.67; first quarter, fiscal year 2001: $115.76; second
quarter, fiscal year 2001: $117.59; third quarter, fiscal year 2001: $117.93;
and fourth quarter, fiscal year 2001: $118.28. The department may adjust the
quarterly rates provided that the fiscal year maximum is not exceeded.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 479,328,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 458,137,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,251,198,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 35,412,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,224,075,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 17,599,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 21,970,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 88,580,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 1,204,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,638,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 76,899,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 212,890,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 729,078,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 782,127,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,335,713,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 269,299,000

Emergency
Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 339,284,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,464,701,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall continue to make use of the special eligibility category created
for children through age 18 and in households with incomes below 200 percent of
the federal poverty level made eligible for medicaid as of July 1, 1994.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that Harborview medical center continue to
be an economically viable component of the health care system and that the
state's financial interest in Harborview medical center be recognized.

(3)
Funding is provided in this section for the adult dental program for Title XIX
categorically eligible and medically needy persons and to provide foot care
services by podiatric physicians and surgeons.

(4)
$1,647,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,672,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for treatment of low-income kidney dialysis patients.

(5)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $160,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the prenatal triage clearinghouse to provide access and outreach to
reduce infant mortality.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 10,751,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 10,663,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 81,172,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 102,586,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate the
transfer of funds from state and local entities to improve and expand
employment opportunities for persons with severe disabilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 26,365,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 26,302,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 45,736,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 720,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 99,123,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-PAYMENTS
TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 32,365,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 32,364,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 20,125,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 84,854,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR
THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 6,421,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 6,542,000

State
Health Care Authority Administrative Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 15,598,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 403,997,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 432,558,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for health
care services provided through local community clinics.

(2)
Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of chapter
149, Laws of 1997, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy option for foster parents licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded homecare programs. Under this
enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and homecare workers with family
incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level shall be allowed to
enroll in the basic health plan at a cost of ten dollars per covered worker per
month.

(3)
The health care authority shall require organizations and individuals which are
paid to deliver basic health plan services and which choose to sponsor
enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan to pay the following: (i) A
minimum of fifteen dollars per enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent
of the federal poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee
per month for persons whose family income is 100 percent to 200 percent of the
federal poverty level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR
THE HUMAN
RIGHTS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,536,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,550,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,474,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,660,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR
THE BOARD
OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 11,603,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 11,608,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 23,231,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR
THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 100,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 1,138,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 38,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,271,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 349,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 15,896,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,238,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,225,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,742,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,950,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,178,000

Electrical
License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,055,000

Farm
Labor Revolving Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,211,000

Public
Works Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,996,000

Contractor
Registration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,892,000

Factory
Assembled Structures Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,547,000

Elevator
Inspection Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,164,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 166,184,000

Accident
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 9,112,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 163,543,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 1,592,000

Plumbing
Certificate Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 971,000

Pressure
Systems Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 416,795,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime
victims compensation program within the public safety and education account
funds appropriated in this section. In the event that cost containment
measures are necessary, the department may (a) institute copayments for
services; (b) develop preferred provider and managed care contracts; (c)
coordinate with the department of social and health services to use the public
safety and education account as matching funds for federal Title XIX
reimbursement, to the extent this maximizes total funds available for services
to crime victims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR
THE INDETERMINATE
SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 929,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 925,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,854,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1)
HEADQUARTERS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,432,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,428,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 72,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 78,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 78,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,090,000

(2)
FIELD SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,461,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,490,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 26,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 595,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 5,572,000

(3)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,943,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 5,887,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 19,439,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 15,628,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 46,897,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 69,807,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 70,255,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 267,521,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 69,502,000

Hospital
Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,128,000

Health
Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 36,454,000

Emergency
Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 14,856,000

State
Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,531,000

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,456,000

Waterworks
Operator Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 593,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 3,124,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,904,000

Medical
Test Site Licensure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,651,000

Youth
Tobacco Prevention Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,804,000

Tobacco
Prevention Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 554,586,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,434,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided solely
for the development and implementation of a licensing and disciplinary
management system. Expenditures are conditioned upon compliance with section
902 of this act. These funds shall not be expended without appropriate project
approval by the department of information systems.

(2)
The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees
charged to the nursing assistants, podiatrists, and osteopaths; for certificate
of need; for temporary worker housing; for state institution inspection; for
residential care facilities and for transient accommodations, in excess of the
fiscal growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section.

(3)
$1,324,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,288,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the department to meet its responsibilities in the
state-wide salmon recovery strategy. Of this amount: (a) $866,000 is provided
to develop a water use data management system; (b) $390,000 is provided for
technical assistance to local watershed planning efforts under the watershed
planning act; and (c) $1,356,000 is provided for water conservation and reuse
programs for local governments and special districts.

(4)
$1,685,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$1,686,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and
agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(5)
$4,645,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$4,645,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for distribution to local health departments.

(6)
The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall
lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of
financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used
in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block
grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(7)
$1,047,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,047,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for deposit in the county public health account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

The
appropriations to the department of corrections in this act shall be expended
for the programs and in the amounts specified therein. However, after May 1,
2000, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
general fund‑-state appropriations for fiscal year 2000 between the
correctional operations and community supervision programs after approval by
the director of the office of financial management. The director of the office
of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any
deviations from appropriation levels.

(1)
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 30,212,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 33,908,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,686,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 65,806,000

(2)
CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 366,399,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 372,045,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 32,594,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,059,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 772,097,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Not more than $3,000,000 may be expended to provide financial assistance to
counties for monitoring and treatment services provided to felony offenders who
graduate from drug court programs and who otherwise would have been sentenced
to more than 12 months imprisonment in a department facility. The secretary
may negotiate terms, conditions, and amounts of assistance with counties or
groups of counties operating drug courts, and may review charging and other
documents to verify eligibility for payment. The secretary shall consult with
the division of alcohol and substance abuse, department of social and health
services, in determining appropriate terms, conditions, and amounts of
assistance. For counties receiving assistance under this subsection which
operated drug courts before July 1, 1999, the secretary shall provide
assistance only for the number of offenders graduating from drug court that
exceeds the number graduating in fiscal year 1999 who otherwise would have been
sentenced to more than 12 months imprisonment in a department facility. For
the purposes of this subsection, "drug court" means a department of a
superior court that has special calendars or dockets designed to achieve a
reduction in recidivism and substance abuse among nonviolent, substance abusing
offenders by increasing their likelihood of successful rehabilitation through
early, continuous, and intense judicially supervised treatment; mandatory
periodic drug testing; and the use of appropriate sanctions and other
rehabilitation services, as an alternative to incarceration.

(b)
The department may expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered
into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local jails. If any funds are
generated in excess of actual costs, they shall be deposited in the state
general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed revenue generated by such
agreements and shall be treated as recovery of costs.

(3)
COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 55,430,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 62,059,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 117,489,000

(4)
CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,069,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,869,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,938,000

(5)
INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 13,082,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 12,247,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 25,329,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,481,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,513,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,062,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 80,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,136,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR
THE SENTENCING
GUIDELINES COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 803,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 746,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,549,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR
THE EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,263,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,259,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 209,698,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 29,135,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 174,543,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,443,000

Employment
Service Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 17,078,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 442,419,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of funds appropriated in this section
for the information systems project to improve the agency's labor exchange
system are conditioned upon compliance with section 902 of this act.

(End of part)

PART
III

NATURAL
RESOURCES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR
THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 370,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 327,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 657,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,354,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement the scenic area management plan for Klickitat
county. If Klickitat county adopts an ordinance to implement the scenic area
management plan in accordance with the national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663,
then the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided as a grant to
Klickitat county to implement its responsibilities under the act.

(2)
Within the funding provided, the commission shall make every effort to complete
its review of the national scenic area management plan by the end of the
1999-01 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 39,235,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 32,767,000

General
fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 45,692,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 2,719,000

Special
Grass Seed Burning Research Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 14,000

Reclamation
Revolving Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 1,735,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,989,000

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 317,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 13,192,000

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State Appropriation... $ 557,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 3,760,000

Wood
Stove Education and Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 351,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 1,109,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 51,976,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 377,000

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 4,586,000

Water
Quality Permit Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 21,003,000

Underground
Storage Tank Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 2,475,000

Solid
Waste Management Account‑-State Appropriation. $ 169,000

Environmental
Excellence Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 20,000

Biosolids
Permit Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 572,000

Hazardous
Waste Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 4,242,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 35,882,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 8,632,000

Air
Operating Permit Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 3,548,000

Freshwater
Aquatic Weeds Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 1,430,000

Oil
Spill Response Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 7,078,000

Metals
Mining Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 43,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 503,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 2,136,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 290,109,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$3,432,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$3,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$394,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the
oil spill administration account‑-state appropriation, $819,000 of the
state toxics control account‑-state appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the
water quality permit account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DOE-01,
DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.

(2)
$170,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02
through a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to
develop an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing
vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(3)
$1,749,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation and $370,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation may only be expended upon the
passage of Z-..../99 transferring funding from the oil spill response account
to the oil spill administration account. Of these amounts, $1,111,000 of the
oil spill administration account and the entire general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided to contract for the operation of a rescue tug in
north Puget Sound. The entire amount in this subsection is to implement Puget
Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-09.

(4)
$1,360,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $900,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $800,000 of the water
quality account appropriation are provided solely to implement Z‑0243.3/99
(the Washington conservation corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$1,780,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided for the auto emissions inspection and maintenance program.
Expenditures of the amounts provided in this subsection are contingent upon a
like amount being deposited in the state general fund from auto emission
inspection fees in accordance with RCW 70.120.170(4).

(6)
$19,385,000 of the air pollution control account appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of Z-0204.1/99 (vehicle emission inspection). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(7)
$133,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $134,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for implementation of Z-0102.2/99 (permit assistance
center). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(8)
$438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,025,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $1,870,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the establishment of total maximum daily loads for water bodies
across the state. $433,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation is to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item
DOE-02.

(9)
$4,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is appropriated solely for deposit in the salmon recovery account for clean
water projects as described in section 302 of the omnibus capital budget.

(10)
$1,507,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,060,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for enforcement of laws pertaining to nonpoint pollution and
illegal water withdrawals, and for implementing immediate actions to restore
instream flows and ensuring compliance with water resources laws in basins with
current or proposed federal endangered species act listings and where low
instream flows have been identified as a limiting factor for salmon recovery.
$340,000 of this amount is to implement Puget Sound work plan and agency action
items DOE-03.

(11)
$1,079,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,072,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to assist local governments in revising shoreline master
plans. Of this amount, $2,000,000 is provided for grants to local governments
to revise their shoreline master programs. Counties with demonstrated
financial need shall receive priority for these grants. $667,000 of the amount
in this subsection is to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action
item DOE-08.

(12)
$289,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $265,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the department's responsibilities to conduct water
quality activities related to forest practices.

(13)
$198,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $165,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the department, in cooperation with the department of
fish and wildlife, to establish fish and habitat index monitoring sites to
measure the effectiveness of the state-wide salmon recovery strategy. $121,000
of this amount is to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item
DOE-01.

(14)
$2,515,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,340,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to implement the watershed management act, chapter 90.82
RCW. Of this amount: (a) $898,000 is provided for technical assistance to
local watershed planning efforts; (b) $1,157,000 is provided for the department
to update its water rights tracking system, digitize water rights documents,
and provide access to this information to the public; and (c) $2,800,000 is
provided for grants to local governments to conduct watershed planning.
$800,000 of the amount in (c) of this subsection is to implement the Puget
Sound workplan and agency action item DOE-02.

(15)
$2,310,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,456,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for water quantity activities related to the
state-wide salmon recovery strategy. Of this amount: (a) $1,722,000 is
provided to process water rights documents; and (b) $1,450,000 is provided to
implement metering and increased stream gauging. Expenditure of $521,000 of
the amount in (b) of this subsection is dependent upon passage of Z-..../99
(omnibus water resources); and (c) $1,594,000 is provided for technical
assistance and project review for water conservation and reuse projects.

(16)
$340,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $340,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the department to update its storm water manual and
provide technical assistance to local governments on storm water management. $267,000
of this amount is to implement the Puget Sound workplan and agency action item
DOE-06.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 27,624,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 27,348,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 2,113,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 59,000

Winter
Recreation Program Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 763,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 264,000

Snowmobile
Account‑-State Appropriation............. $ 3,653,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 325,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 48,000

Water
Trail Program Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 14,000

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 29,307,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 91,518,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items
P&RC-01 and P&RC-03.

(2)
$105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $31,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the state parks and recreation commission to meet its
responsibilities under the Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation
Act (P.L. 101-601).

(3)
$4,500,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is
dependent upon the parks and recreation commission generating revenue to the
account in excess of $26,000,000 for the biennium. These funds shall be used
for deferred maintenance and visitor and ranger safety activities.

(4)
$668,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $701,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Z-0243.3/99 (the Washington conservation
corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
The state parks and recreation commission may increase fees by amounts that
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms
Range Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 34,000

Recreation
Resources Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,370,000

Recreation
Resources Account‑-Federal Appropriation. $ 11,000

NOVA
Program Account‑-State Appropriation........... $ 604,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.... ................. $ 3,019,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR
THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 845,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 843,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,688,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR
THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 4,028,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 3,990,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 444,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,462,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$182,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$182,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $130,000 of the water quality account appropriation are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item CC-01.

(2)
$550,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $550,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to conservation districts to reduce nitrate
contamination in the Columbia Basin ground water management area.

(3)
$260,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $260,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for administration of the conservation reserve
enhancement program.

(4)
$984,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $984,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for conducting limiting factors analysis for salmon species.

(5)
$135,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $115,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for development of a state-wide database for
monitoring development and implementation of comprehensive farm plans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 52,331,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 48,480,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 35,880,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 14,416,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 490,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 6,432,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 586,000

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,596,000

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,419,000

Eastern
Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 551,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 40,360,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 40,040,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation........ $........................................... 13,072,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 1,939,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal

Appropriation................................... $ 9,603,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 350,000

Environmental
Excellence Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 15,000

Regional
Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 550,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 272,079,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,064,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,055,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
agency action items DFW-01, DFW-02, DFW-03, DFW-04, and DFW-05.

(2)
$272,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $305,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to develop marine protected areas in Puget Sound. This item
represents Puget Sound work plan agency action item DFW-10.

(3)
$860,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $424,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for business practice and information system improvements
identified in the TKW business practices assessment study of November 1998.
The department shall submit a status report to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by November 1, 1999, on the status of implementing these
improvements and a final report by November 1, 2000.

(4)
$178,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$168,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $346,000 of the wildlife account‑-state appropriation are provided
for the operation of the department's automated license system.

(5)
$256,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $208,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the control of European green crab (Carcinus maenas).
The department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by September 1, 2000, evaluating the effectiveness of
various control strategies and providing recommendations on long-term control
strategies. $248,000 of this amount is for implementation of Puget Sound work
plan and agency action item DFW-23.

(6)
$191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for noxious weed control and survey activities on department
lands. Of this amount, $48,000 is provided for the biological control of
yellowstar thistle.

(7)
$1,890,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,495,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to the department for monitoring the effectiveness of the
state-wide salmon recovery strategy. Of this amount: (a) $2,984,000 is
provided for the department, in cooperation with the department of ecology, to
establish fish and habitat index monitoring sites to measure the effectiveness
of the state-wide salmon recovery strategy; and (b) $401,000 is provided to
update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory.

(8)
$553,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $998,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the department's review of forest practices applications
and related hydraulic permit applications.

(9)
$155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $130,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for additional review of hydro power relicensing applications
before the federal energy regulatory commission (FERC).

(10)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for an interagency agreement with the salmon recovery office in
the office of the governor for operation of the independent science panel
established in RCW 75.46.050.

(11)
$1,643,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $594,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for fish passage technical assistance to local
governments, volunteer groups, and regional fisheries enhancement groups. Of
this amount: (a) $337,000 is provided for technical assistance for correction
of fish screens at irrigation diversions in order to protect salmon; and (b)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is appropriated for deposit in the salmon recovery account for grants to
correct fish screens at irrigation diversions as described in section 357 of
the omnibus capital budget.

(12)
$4,675,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $4,425,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to implement the salmon recovery act under chapter 75.46
RCW. Of this amount: (a) $7,000,000 is provided for salmon restoration
grants. Up to $100,000 of the amount in (a) of this subsection is provided for
the department to contract with the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation to utilize the PRISM data base for tracking salmon restoration projects
including projects funded through the regional fisheries enhancement groups
program and the cooperative fish and wildlife projects funded through the
aquatic lands enhancement account; and (b) $2,100,000 is provided for grants to
lead entities established through RCW 75.46.060.

(13)
All salmon habitat restoration and protection projects proposed for funding by
regional fisheries enhancement groups and all proposed cooperative fish and
wildlife projects funded through the aquatic lands enhancement account shall be
submitted by January 1st or July 1st of each year for review to the interagency
review team established in RCW 75.46.080. The interagency review team shall
coordinate these projects with habitat restoration project lists prepared by
lead entities and provide recommendations for funding to the department.

(14)
$1,170,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement a license buy back program for commercial fishing licenses.

(15)
$2,043,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,444,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for additional fish and wildlife enforcement officers.
Within these funds the department shall provide support to the department of
health to enforce state shellfish harvest laws. Within these funds, the
department shall emphasize enforcement of laws related to protection of fish
habitat and the illegal harvest of salmon and steelhead.

(16)
$460,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $415,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Z-0243.3/99 (the Washington conservation
corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(17)
By July 15, 1999, the department shall establish a hatchery closure
commission. The commission shall consist of representatives from the department,
the northwest Indian fisheries commission, the national marine fisheries
service, and the United States fish and wildlife service. The commission is to
develop a list of hatcheries funded with state general funds to be closed or to
have production reduced for savings totaling a minimum of $1,668,000 for the
1999-01 biennium. In developing this list, the commission shall evaluate each
hatchery based upon the following criteria: (a) Its impact upon wildstocks
including, but not limited to, genetics and smolt interactions; (b) its cost
effectiveness, including both short and long term operating and capital cost;
and (c) its economic impact on the local community. The commission shall
provide its recommended list to the legislature by January 7, 2000. Unless the
legislature enacts legislation rejecting the closure list in whole or in part
and appropriates funding to maintain operation of these hatcheries, these
reductions will be implemented effective April 3, 2000.

(18)
Any indirect cost reimbursement received by the department from federal grants
must be spent on agency administrative activities and cannot be redirected to
direct program activities.

(19)
$251,000 of the wildlife account‑-state appropriation is provided for
additional field surveys of the Olympic Peninsula, North Rainier, and
Packwood/South Rainier elk herds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 29,932,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 27,523,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 1,665,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 420,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 53,250,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation........ $........................................... 3,668,000

Surveys
and Maps Account‑-State Appropriation........ $........................................... 2,221,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 3,131,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State

Appropriation.......................... ........ $ 83,787,000

Surface
Mining Reclamation Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 1,435,000

Aquatic
Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 764,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 900,000

Metals
Mining Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 63,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 208,759,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $1,058,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2)
$7,304,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $7,304,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.

(3)
$2,522,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,523,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for fire protection activities.

(4)
$331,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $339,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for geologic studies to evaluate ground stability in
high growth areas and to provide geologic expertise to small communities.

(5)
$607,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $607,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Z-0243.3/99 (Washington conservation
corps). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and research
projects related to implementation of the timber-fish-wildlife agreement.

(7)
$3,909,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,564,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the department to implement changes in forest practice
rules for the protection of salmon.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 7,476,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 7,316,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 4,440,000

General
fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 410,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 818,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 1,365,000

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 241,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 22,066,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$37,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for technical assistance on pesticide management including the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item DOA-01.

(2)
$241,000 of the local toxics control account appropriation is provided solely
to implement chapter 36, Laws of 1998 (fertilizer regulation). The amount
provided in this subsection shall be used to conduct a comprehensive study of
plant uptake of metals and to implement new fertilizer registration
requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR
THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account‑-

State Appropriation............................. $ 957,000

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,432,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 4,983,000

Architects'
License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 755,000

Cemetery
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 204,000

Profession
Engineers' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,734,000

Real
Estate Commission ‑-State Appropriation... $ 7,130,000

Master
License Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 7,440,000

Uniform
Commercial Code Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,482,000

Real
Estate Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 606,000

Funeral
Directors and Embalmers Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 457,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 33,223,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR
THE STATE
PATROL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 22,650,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 21,677,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,015,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 344,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,114,000

County
Criminal Justice Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,641,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,850,000

Fire
Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 92,000

Fire
Service Training Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,830,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 442,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 260,000

Fingerprint
Identification Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,392,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 69,307,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $255,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $95,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for replacement of fire
training equipment at the fire service training academy.

(End of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STATE
ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 37,540,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 36,340,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 78,121,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 2,602,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,671,000

Education
Savings Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 7,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 165,274,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
AGENCY OPERATIONS

(a)
$404,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $403,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education,
including basic education assistance activities.

(b)
$348,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for administration of the traffic safety education program, including
in-service training related to instruction in the risks of driving while under
the influence of alcohol and other drugs.

(c)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement chapter 165, Laws of 1997 (school audit
resolutions).

(2)
STATE-WIDE PROGRAMS

(a)
$2,174,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science
Center.

(b)
$64,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
operation of the Cispus environmental learning center.

(c)
$2,754,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
educational centers, including state support activities. $100,000 of this
amount is provided to help stabilize funding through distribution among
existing education centers that are currently funded by the state at an amount
less than $100,000 a biennium.

(d)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
organization in southwest Washington that received funding from the Spokane
educational center in the 1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to
students who have dropped out.

(e)
$3,671,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
and $2,250,000 of the public safety education account appropriation are
provided solely for matching grants to enhance security in schools. Not more
than seventy-five percent of a district's total expenditures for school
security in any school year may be paid from a grant under this subsection.
The grants shall be expended solely for the costs of employing or contracting
for building security monitors in schools during school hours and school
events. Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $2,850,000 shall
be spent for grants to districts that, during the 1988-89 school year, employed
or contracted for security monitors in schools during school hours. However,
these grants may be used only for increases in school district expenditures for
school security over expenditure levels for the 1988-89 school year.

(f)
$200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation transferred from the
department of health are provided solely for a program that provides grants to
school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing
the importance of delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until
individuals are ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the
school districts shall be for projects that are substantially designed and
produced by students. The grants shall require a local private sector match
equal to one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind contribution of
technical or other assistance from consultants or firms involved in public
relations, advertising broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.

(g)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for school district petitions to juvenile court for truant
students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed.

(h)
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for alcohol
and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(i)
$7,000,000 of the education savings account appropriation is provided solely
for grants to school districts for programs to prepare high school students to
achieve information technology industry skills certifications. Funding may be
expended to provide or improve internet access; purchase and install networking
or computer equipment; train faculty; or acquire curriculum materials. A match
of cash or in-kind contributions from nonstate sources equal to at least half
of the cash amount of the grant is required. To assure continuity of the
curriculum with higher education institutions, the grant program will be
designed and implemented by an interagency team compromised of representatives
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board
for community and technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board,
and the office of financial management. School districts may apply for grants
in cooperation with other school districts or community or technical colleges
and must demonstrate in the grant application a cooperative relationship with a
community or technical college in information technology programs. Preference
for grants shall be made to districts with sound technology plans, which offer
student access to computers outside of school hours, which demonstrate
involvement of the private sector in information technology programs, and which
serve the needs of low-income communities.

(j)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for competitive grants to school districts to obtain curriculum or programs
that allow high school students to have access to internet-based curriculum
that leads directly to higher education credits or provides preparation for
tests that lead to higher education credit in subjects including but not
limited to mathematics, languages, and science. To assure continuity of the curriculum
with higher education institutions, the grant program will be designed and
implemented by an interagency team comprised of representatives from the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, the state board for community and
technical colleges, the higher education coordinating board, and the office of
financial management.

(k)
$5,702,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for shared infrastructure costs, data equipment maintenance, and depreciation
costs for operation of the K-20 telecommunications network.

(l)
$5,627,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for a K-20 telecommunications network technical support system in the K-12
sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network.
These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support
for the network. No more than $650,000 of this amount may be spent for state-level
administration and staff training on the K-20 network.

(m)
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for allocation to the primary coordinators of the state
geographic alliance to improve the teaching of geography in schools.

(n)
$2,958,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided for state
administrative costs and start-up grants for alternative programs and services
that improve instruction and learning for at-risk and expelled students
consistent with the objectives of chapter 265, Laws of 1997 (disruptive
students/offenders). Each grant application shall contain proposed performance
indicators and an evaluation plan to measure the success of the program and its
impact on improved student learning. Applications shall contain the
applicant's plan for maintaining the program and/or services after the grant
period, shall address the needs of students who cannot be accommodated within
the framework of existing school programs or services and shall address how the
applicant will serve any student within the proposed program's target age range
regardless of the reason for truancy, suspension, expulsion, or other
disciplinary action. Up to $50,000 per year may be used by the superintendent
of public instruction for grant administration. The superintendent shall
submit an evaluation of the alternative program start-up grants provided under
this section, and section 501(2)(q), chapter 283, Laws of 1996, to the fiscal
and education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2000. Grants shall
be awarded to applicants showing the greatest potential for improved student
learning for at-risk students including:

(i)
Students who have been suspended, expelled, or are subject to other
disciplinary actions;

(ii)
Students with unexcused absences who need intervention from community truancy
boards or family support programs;

(iii)
Students who have left school; and

(iv)
Students involved with the court system.

The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report
describing student recruitment, program offerings, staffing practices, and
available indicators of program effectiveness of alternative education programs
funded with state and, to the extent information is available, local funds.
The report shall contain a plan for conducting an evaluation of the educational
effectiveness of alternative education programs.

(o)
$1,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
grants for magnet schools to be distributed as recommended by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to chapter 232, section 516(13),
Laws of 1992.

(p)
$4,300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
complex need grants. Grants shall be provided according to amounts shown in
LEAP Document 30C as developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(q)
$8,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $8,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to continue the Washington reading corps program to
provide intensive reading instruction to students in the elementary grades
(K-6) during the summer months, vacation periods, intercessions, Saturdays, and
before and after and during school. Of these amounts, $15,850,000 is for grants
to be awarded to school districts after an abbreviated application. In making
awards, the superintendent of public instruction shall strive to maximize three
objectives: (i) Provide grants to school districts with existing Washington
reading corps school programs; (ii) give priority to districts with schools
that have high percentages of students not meeting the reading standard of the
Washington assessment of student learning; and (iii) provide grants to as many
school districts as possible. Districts receiving grants shall agree to create
programs that provide a minimum of eighty hours of instructional activity for
each student, supervision by certificated staff, and a ratio of at least one
adult for every four students achieved through a combination of certificated
staff, paid tutors, and volunteer tutors. Recipient districts shall agree to
evaluate, in a manner prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction,
how effectively their program improves academic achievement of students.

Grant
awards, volunteer training, publicity, and assistance with recruitment of
volunteers shall be coordinated by a steering committee led by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction and including school districts,
educational service districts, and the commission for national and community
service in order to maximize collaboration among the various agencies involved
with reading tutors. Up to $150,000 may be expended on program administration.

(r)
$750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
increased costs of providing a norm-referenced test to all third grade students
and retests of certain third grade students and other costs in accordance with
chapter 319, Laws of 1998 (student achievement).

(s)
$2,660,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely to
expand the number of summer accountability institutes offered by the
superintendent of public instruction. The institutes shall provide school and
school district staff with training in the analysis of student assessment data,
information regarding successful district and school teaching models, research
on curriculum and instruction, and planning tools and time for districts to
improve instruction in reading, mathematics, communications, and writing.

(t)
$720,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
state-level content area expertise and support to teachers and school staff in
reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and counseling.

(u)
$2,700,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for a program of teacher assessment in accordance with Z-..../99 (teacher
assessment). Of this amount, $2,520,000 is provided to subsidize the cost of a
teacher skills assessment for teacher certification applicants and $180,000 is
provided for the administration and development of the teacher assessment
program. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT (BASIC EDUCATION)

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,564,459,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 3,576,874,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,141,333,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year that is ending and for prior school year adjustments.

(2)
Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school
years shall be determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated
pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
(d) through (f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
grades K-6 shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection,
or under (d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations
shall be as follows:

(a)
On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments,
excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated
staff unit allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i)
Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-12;

(ii)
49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-3;

(iii)
An additional 5.3 certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3. Any
funds allocated for these additional certificated units shall not be considered
as basic education funding;

(iv)
An additional 2.36 certificated instructional staff units for grades 4 and 5.
These additional certificated instructional staff units are provided in these
grades for allocation purposes only, and districts are authorized to use these
allocations for additional staff in any elementary (K-5) grade or grades. Any
funds allocated for these additional units shall not be considered as basic
education funding;

(A)
Except for opportunity districts authorized in Z-..../99 (opportunity
districts), funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of the
amount required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual
ratio equal to or greater than 54.3 certificated instructional staff per
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3. For any school district
documenting a lower certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation
shall be based on the district's actual grades K-3 certificated instructional
staff ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B)
Except for opportunity districts authorized in Z-..../99 (opportunity
districts), districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3 may dedicate up to 1.3 of
the 54.3 funding ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants
assigned to basic education classrooms in grades K-3. For purposes of
documenting a district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the
district to employ additional classified instructional assistants shall be
converted to a certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional
assistants, for the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the
1989-90 school year as the base year;

(C)
Any district maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 54.3 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3
may use allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 4-6.
Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall only be expended to
reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants; and

(iv)
Forty‑six certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades 4-12;

(b)
For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent
students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month
exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5
percent, an additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such
increased enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time
equivalent students been included in the normal enrollment count for that
particular month;

(c)
On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(i)
Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of public
instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent
vocational students for the 1999-00 school year and the 2000-01 school year.
Except for opportunity districts authorized in Z-..../99 (opportunity
districts), districts documenting staffing ratios of less than 1 certificated
staff per 19.5 students shall be allocated the greater of the total ratio in
subsections (2)(a)(i) and (iv) of this section or the actual documented ratio;

(ii)
Skills center programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction for
skills centers approved prior to September 1, 1997, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students;

(iii)
Except for opportunity districts authorized in Z-..../99 (opportunity
districts), indirect cost charges, as defined by the superintendent of public
instruction, to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 10 percent; and

(iv)
Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same
monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and
payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same
monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for
basic support.

(d)
For districts enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the
state board of education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i)
For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for
enrollment of not more than five students, plus one‑twentieth of a
certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii)
For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of
not more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated
instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e)
For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five
but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which
enroll more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state
board of education:

(i)
For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units; and

(ii)
For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units;

(f)
For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less
than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment
in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i)
For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no
more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-12, four and one‑half certificated instructional staff units and
one‑quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii)
For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated
instructional staff units and one‑half of a certificated administrative
staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time equivalent students,
and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units
per each additional forty‑three and one‑half average annual full
time equivalent students.

Units
calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated
staff units at the rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff
units and four certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational
full-time equivalent students.

(g)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy
annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional
one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional
one‑half of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3)
Allocations for classified salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years
shall be calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units
determined as follows:

(a)
For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection
(2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three
certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b)
For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual
full-time equivalent students; and

(c)
For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, an additional one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4)
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.86 percent in
the 1999‑00 and 2000-01 school years for certificated salary allocations
provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 15.70 percent in
the 1999‑00 and 2000-01 school years for classified salary allocations
provided under subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate
specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the number of benefit units
determined as follows:

(a)
The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this
section; and

(b)
The number of classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so
that, for the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent
classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(6)(a)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $8,214 per certificated staff unit in the
1999‑00 school year and a maximum of $8,436 per certificated staff unit
in the 2000-01 school year.

(b)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $20,171 per certificated staff unit in the 1999‑00
school year and a maximum of $20,716 per certificated staff unit in the 2000-01
school year.

(c)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $15,651 per certificated staff unit in the 1999-00
school year and a maximum of $16,074 per certificated staff unit in the 2000-01
school year.

(7)
Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at
a maintenance rate of $365.28 per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely for the
purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall be equal to the
number of certificated instructional staff units allocated under subsection (2)
of this section, multiplied by the ratio between the number of actual basic
education certificated teachers and the number of actual basic education
certificated instructional staff reported state‑wide for the 1996-97
school year.

(8)
Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of
public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to
reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school
year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or
delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay
shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have
no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort
assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9)
The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $6,267,000 outside the basic
education formula during fiscal years 2000 and 2001 as follows:

(a)
For fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district
as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of
$462,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2000 and a maximum of $474,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001;

(b)
For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,000,000 may
be expended each fiscal year;

(c)
A maximum of $331,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d)
A maximum of $500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing
skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per
full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(10)
For the purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent
student in state basic education appropriations provided under this act,
including appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 1.8 percent from
the 1998‑99 school year to the 1999‑00 school year, and 2.7 percent
from the 1999‑00 school year to the 2000‑01 school year.

(11)
If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving
additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b)
through (h) of this section, the following shall apply:

(a)
For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education
formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education
formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the
consolidation; and

(b)
For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the
difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the
districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education
formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through
(h) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC
EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1)
The following calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units under section 503 of this act:

(a)
Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units shall be
determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated
instructional derived base salary shown on LEAP Document 12D, by the district's
average staff mix factor for basic education and special education certificated
instructional staff in that school year, computed using LEAP Document 1A; and

(b)
Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified
staff units for each district shall be based on the district's certificated
administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document
12D.

(2)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Basic education certificated instructional staff" is defined as
provided in RCW 28A.150.100 and "special education certificated
staff" means staff assigned to the state-supported special education
program pursuant to chapter 28A.155 RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b)
"LEAP Document 1A" means the computerized tabulation establishing
staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education
and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee on April 8, 1991, at 13:35 hours; and

(c)
"LEAP Document 12D" means the computerized tabulation of 1999-00 and
2000-01 school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff
and classified staff and derived base salaries for certificated instructional
staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and accountability program
committee on December 7, 1998 at 11:45 hours.

(3)
Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a
rate of 16.22 percent for certificated staff and 12.20 percent for classified
staff for both years of the biennium.

(4)(a)
Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state‑wide salary allocation
schedules for certificated instructional staff are established for basic
education salary allocations:

STATE-WIDE
SALARY ALLOCATION SCHEDULE

FOR
THE 1999-00 SCHOOL YEAR

Years
of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 23,409 24,041 24,696 25,352 27,459

1 24,176 24,829 25,505 26,204 28,373

2 24,959 25,632 26,328 27,095 29,300

3 25,780 26,474 27,190 27,999 30,243

4 26,617 27,354 28,091 28,943 31,245

5 27,492 28,249 29,006 29,922 32,262

6 28,404 29,158 29,957 30,939 33,314

7 29,331 30,104 30,923 31,968 34,401

8 30,271 31,087 31,925 33,057 35,524

9 32,105 32,984 34,157 36,681

10 34,056 35,313 37,872

11 36,503 39,118

12 37,656 40,397

13 41,708

14 43,026

15 or
more 44,145

Years
of MA+90

Service
BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 28,816 28,066 30,173 31,530

1 29,748 28,918 31,087 32,462

2 30,717 29,809 32,014 33,430

3 31,722 30,713 32,957 34,437

4 32,765 31,657 33,959 35,479

5 33,843 32,636 34,976 36,557

6 34,935 33,653 36,028 37,649

7 36,084 34,682 37,115 38,799

8 37,268 35,771 38,238 39,982

9 38,485 36,870 39,395 41,199

10 39,735 38,027 40,586 42,449

11 41,019 39,218 41,832 43,733

12 42,355 40,456 43,111 45,069

13 43,725 41,735 44,422 46,439

14 45,145 43,054 45,825 47,860

15 or
more 46,319 44,173 47,017 49,104

STATE-WIDE
SALARY ALLOCATION SCHEDULE

FOR
THE 2000-01 SCHOOL YEAR

Years
of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 23,878 24,523 25,191 25,860 28,009

1 24,660 25,326 26,016 26,729 28,941

2 25,459 26,145 26,855 27,637 29,887

3 26,297 27,005 27,735 28,560 30,849

4 27,150 27,902 28,653 29,523 31,871

5 28,043 28,815 29,587 30,522 32,908

6 28,973 29,742 30,558 31,559 33,981

7 29,919 30,707 31,542 32,609 35,091

8 30,878 31,710 32,564 33,719 36,235

9 32,748 33,645 34,841 37,416

10 34,738 36,020 38,630

11 37,235 39,902

12 38,411 41,207

13 42,544

14 43,888

15 or
more 45,029

Years
of MA+90

Service
BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 29,394 28,628 30,777 32,162

1 30,344 29,497 31,710 33,112

2 31,332 30,406 32,655 34,100

3 32,358 31,329 33,617 35,126

4 33,422 32,291 34,639 36,190

5 34,521 33,290 35,677 37,290

6 35,635 34,328 36,750 38,403

7 36,807 35,377 37,859 39,576

8 38,014 36,487 39,004 40,783

9 39,256 37,608 40,185 42,024

10 40,531 38,789 41,399 43,299

11 41,840 40,003 42,670 44,609

12 43,204 41,266 43,975 45,972

13 44,601 42,571 45,312 47,369

14 46,050 43,917 46,744 48,819

15 or
more 47,247 45,058 47,959 50,088

(b)
As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the
number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c)
For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters
degree, any credits in excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after
the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings
"MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i)
Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii)
Any credits in excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the
baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b)
"MA" means a masters degree.

(c)
"PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d)
"Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted
by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e)
"Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and chapter 90,
Laws of 1997.

(6)
No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after
the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations
under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in
this act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a)
The employee has a masters degree; or

(b)
The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1,
1992.

(7)
The salary allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation
purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 103,931,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 213,470,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 317,401,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$173,761,000 is provided for a cost of living adjustment of 2.0 percent effective
September 1, 1999, and another 2.0 percent effective September 1, 2000, for
state formula staff units. The appropriations include associated incremental
fringe benefit allocations at rates of 16.22 percent for certificated staff and
12.20 percent for classified staff.

(a)
The appropriations in this section include the increased portion of salaries
and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs
in part V of this act. Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of
superintendent of public instruction and the education reform program are
provided in part VII of this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic
education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in
section 502 of this act. Increases for special education result from increases
in each district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology
for general apportionment salaries and benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b)
The appropriations in this section provide salary increase and incremental
fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

(i)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.40 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1999‑00 school year and $0.81 per weighted pupil-mile for the
2000-01 school year;

(ii)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $4.54 per formula
student for the 1999‑00 school year and $9.18 per formula student for the
2000-01 school year; and

(iii)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $11.81 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1999‑00 school year and $23.85 per eligible
student for the 2000-01 school year; and

(iv)
For learning assistance, an increase of $5.84 per entitlement unit for the 1999‑00
school year and $11.80 per entitlement unit for the 2000-01 school year.

(c)
The appropriations in this section include $921,000 for salary increase
adjustments for substitute teachers at a rate of $10.64 per unit in the 1999-00
school year and maintained in the 2000-01 school year.

(2)
$19,600,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit allocations. The
maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $314.51 per month for the
1999-00 and 2000-01 school years. The appropriations in this section provide
for a rate increase to $317.34 per month for the 1999-00 school year and
$335.75 per month for the 2000-01 school year at the following rates:

(a)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.03 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1999‑00 school year and $0.19 for the 2000-01 school year;

(b)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $0.20 per formula
student for the 1999‑00 school year and $1.35 for the 2000-01 school
year;

(c)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $.46 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1999‑00 school year and $3.44 for the 2000-01
school year; and

(d)
For learning assistance, an increase of $.36 per funded unit for the 1999‑00
school year and $2.70 for the 2000-01 school year.

(3)
The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the
legislature.

(4)
For the 1999-00 school year, the superintendent shall prepare a report showing
the allowable derived base salary for certificated instructional staff in
accordance with RCW 28A.400.200 and LEAP Document 12D, and the actual derived
base salary paid by each school district as shown on the S-275 report and shall
make the report available to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than February 15, 1998.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 505. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 185,449,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 189,170,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 374,619,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year that is ending and for prior school year adjustments.

(2)
A maximum of $1,499,000 may be expended for regional transportation
coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall
ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding
shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.

(3)
$40,000 of the fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $40,000 of the fiscal year
2001 appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students
enrolled in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to
low-income students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely
for educational reasons.

(4)
Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement
rates of $35.12 per weighted mile in the 1999-00 school year and $35.42 per
weighted mile in the 2000-01 school year exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. Allocations for
transportation of students transported more than one radius mile shall be based
on weighted miles as determined by superintendent of public instruction times
the per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based on the
number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five living within
one radius mile of their assigned school times the per mile reimbursement rate
for the school year times 1.29.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 506. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 3,100,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 3,100,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 194,483,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 200,683,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$6,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriations are provided for
state matching money for federal child nutrition programs.

(2)
$175,000 of the general fund--state appropriations are provided for summer food
programs for children in low-income areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 507. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 389,291,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 389,805,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 147,986,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 927,082,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state appropriations include such funds as are necessary to complete the
school year that is ending and for prior school year adjustments.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school
districts based on two categories, the optional birth through age two program
for special education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers,
and the mandatory special education program for special education eligible
students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible
student" means a student receiving specially designed instruction in
accordance with a properly formulated individualized education program.

(3)
For the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years, the superintendent shall distribute
state funds to each district based on the sum of:

(a)
A district's annual average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed
infants and toddlers ages birth through two, times the district's average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student, times 1.15; and

(b)
A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment
times the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of
this section, times the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student times 0.9309.

(4)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student"
for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios required by RCW 28A.150.260
(i.e., 49/1000 certificated instructional staff in grades K-3, and 46/1000 in
grades 4-12) and shall not include enhancements for K-3, secondary vocational
education, or small schools.

(b)
"Annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment"
means the resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(c)
"Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special education
annual average enrollment including those students counted under the special
education demonstration projects, excluding the birth through age two
enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. For the 1999-00 and the 2000-01 school years, each
district's funded enrollment percent shall be:

(i)
For districts whose enrollment percent for 1994-95 was at or below 12.7
percent, the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent for the school
year for which the allocation is being determined or 12.7 percent.

(ii)
For districts whose enrollment percent for 1994-95 was above 12.7 percent, the
lesser of:

(A)
The district's actual enrollment percent for the school year for which the
special education allocation is being determined; or

(B)
The district's actual enrollment percent for the school year immediately prior
to the school year for which the special education allocation is being
determined if greater than 12.7 percent.

(5)
At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in
which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts
are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7,
and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units. For purposes of this subsection (4) of this section, the average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in
the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(6)
A maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and a maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided as safety net funding for
districts with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond
the amounts provided in subsection (3) of this section. Safety net funding
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee.

(a)
The safety net oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts
adversely affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding
formula. Awards shall be based on the amount required to maintain the 1994-95
state special education excess cost allocation to the school district in
aggregate or on a dollar per funded student basis.

(b)
The committee shall then consider unusual needs of districts due to a special
education population which differs significantly from the assumptions of the
state funding formula. Awards shall be made to districts that convincingly
demonstrate need due to the concentration and/or severity of disabilities in
the district. Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy
or service delivery style are not a basis for safety net awards.

(7)
Prior to June 1st of each year, the superintendent shall make available to each
school district from available data the district's maximum funded enrollment
percent for the coming school year.

(8)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as
are necessary to administer the special education funding and safety net award
process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or rules in place for
the 1996-97 school year, the superintendent shall consult with the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9)
The safety net oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction shall consist of:

(a)
Staff of the office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b)
Staff of the office of the state auditor;

(c)
Staff from the office of the financial management; and

(d)
One or more representatives from school districts or educational service
districts knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(10)
A maximum of $4,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall
be expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or
more individual special education students.

(11)
A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state
appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time
equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This
amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation
and the special education program.

(12)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with appropriate
job and independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(13)
A school district may carry over up to 10 percent of general fund‑-state
funds allocated under this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended
in the special education program.

(14)
The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to
school districts at 84 percent. In addition to other purposes, school
districts may use increased federal funds for high cost students, for
purchasing regional special education services from educational service
districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to
inclusion issues.

(15)
Up to one percent of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be expended
by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion strategies by
school districts for provision of special education services. The
superintendent shall prepare an information database on laws, best practices,
examples of programs, and recommended resources. The information may be
disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 508. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation................................. $ 16,883,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school
year that is ending and for prior school year adjustments.

(2)
A maximum of $507,000 shall be expended for regional traffic safety education
coordinators.

(3)
The maximum basic state allocation per student completing the program shall be
$137.16 in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

(4)
Additional allocations to provide tuition assistance for students from
low-income families who complete the program shall be a maximum of $66.81 per
eligible student in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 509. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR EDUCATIONAL
SERVICE DISTRICTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 4,545,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 4,545,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 9,090,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services
required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3)
and (4).

(2)
$250,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $250,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
student teaching centers as provided in RCW 28A.415.100.

(3)
A maximum of $500,000 is provided for centers for the improvement of teaching
pursuant to RCW 28A.415.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 510. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 92,110,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 99,422,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 191,532,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 511. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE ELEMENTARY
AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 264,388,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 512. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 20,950,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 22,265,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 51,763,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriations include such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year that is ending and for prior school year
adjustments.

(2)
State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other
expenditures for a 220‑day school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional
education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer
program.

(3)
State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the
institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing
ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded
in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4)
The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less
in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in
the 1997-99 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 513. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 6,224,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 6,220,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 12,444,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 2000 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1998‑99 school year.

(2)
Allocations for school district programs for highly capable students shall be
distributed at a maximum rate of $313.07 per funded student for the 1999-00
school year and $313.19 per funded student for the 2000-01 school year,
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this
act. The number of funded students shall be a maximum of two percent of each
district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

(3)
$350,000 of the appropriation is for the centrum program at Fort Worden state
park.

(4)
$186,000 of the appropriation is for the odyssey of the mind and future
problem-solving programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 514. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 27,962,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 28,978,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.................. ... $ 57,340,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$26,039,000 is provided for the operation of the commission on student learning
reauthorized in Z-..../99 (accountability system) and the continued development
and implementation of student assessments. If Z-..../99 is not enacted by June
30, 1999, the appropriation in this section shall be made to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction solely for the continued development and
implementation of student assessments. Of the amount provided in this
subsection, $689,000 is provided for research and data analysis, by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction, associated with using a
standards-based student assessment system to improve student learning.

(2)
$2,190,000 is provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom
assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as
provided in RCW 28A.415.310.

(3)
$6,818,000 is provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260. Funds for the teacher
assistance program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number
of beginning teachers.

(4)
$4,050,000 is provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and
reporting on school district technology development, promoting standards for
school district technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.

(5)
$7,200,000 is provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of
care for children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant
proposals from school districts shall contain local plans designed
collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of care
program exists in the area in which the school district is located, the local
plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the greatest
extent possible. Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(6)
$5,000,000 is provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW
28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.

(7)
$1,260,000 is provided for technical assistance related to education reform
through the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the commission on student learning, as specified in RCW 28A.300.130
(center for the improvement of student learning).

(8)
$1,598,000 of the fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely for the
leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program
administrators. The purpose of the program is to provide funds to school
districts to provide partial release time for district employees in an
internship with an appropriate mentor. The funds shall be distributed by the
superintendent to school districts subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(i)
The superintendent with the assistance of an advisory board that includes
school administrators and higher education representatives shall select
internship participants giving priority to candidates who intend to serve in
school districts where finding qualified applicants has been difficult.

(ii)
Candidates if accepted in the internship program must agree to seek employment
in Washington after receiving certification, participate in education
improvement training activities, and participate in evaluations of the
effectiveness of the internship program.

(iii)
The maximum amount of state funding for each internship shall not exceed the
daily rate of providing a substitute teacher for the equivalent of up to
forty-five days and the funds shall be used to pay for partial release time
while the school district employee is completing the internship.

(iv)
The superintendent may withhold a maximum of seven percent of the funds for
costs of implementing the program.

(9)
$330,000 of the appropriation is provided to create an incentive and reward
system for certification by the national board for professional teaching
standards, and for state professional level certified teachers. Beginning July
1, 1998, teachers certified by the national board may receive a bonus of $3,000
per year as recognition of their outstanding performance. Also beginning July
1, 1998, teachers who are state professional level certified may receive a
bonus of $1,000 in recognition of their performance. The amount of the bonuses
shall be prorated by the number of months in the fiscal year the individual is
actually certified. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
to implement this subsection to ensure appropriate accountability and
documentation of receipt of bonuses. Bonuses provided in this subsection shall
not be considered salary or compensation for purposes of RCW 28A.400.200.

(10)
$2,000,000 is provided solely for staff training in shared decision-making and
effective resource management for principals, teachers, and other school staff
in opportunity school districts authorized in Z-..../99 (opportunity school
districts). This training will be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the office of
financial management, Washington state school directors association, Washington
association of school administrators, association of Washington school
principals, Washington education association, public school employees of
Washington, and the Washington state parent-teacher association. If Z‑..../99
is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(11)
$500,000 is provided solely for operation of the Washington professional
teacher standards board created in Z-..../99 (teacher standards board). If
Z-..../99 is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 515. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 35,373,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 36,843,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 72,216,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 2000 provides such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1998-99 school year.

(2)
The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $647.94 per eligible bilingual
student in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 503 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 516. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 90,613,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 102,537,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 193,150,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 2000 provides such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1998‑99 school year.

(2)
Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at
maximum rates of $360.00 per funded unit for the 1999-00 school year and
$369.72 per funded unit for the 2000-01 school year. School districts may
carryover up to 10 percent of funds allocated under this program; however,
carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program. A
school district's funded units for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years shall
be the district's number of students enrolled in the free and reduced price
lunch program in grades K-9. Districts not participating in the free and
reduced price lunch program will consult with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction to determine their funded units. In determining the
funded units for districts not participating in the free and reduced price
lunch program, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
consider poverty data from the most recent federal decennial census.

(3)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall also calculate the
funding for school district learning assistance programs under the methodology used
for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years. For school years 1999-00 and
2000-01, school districts shall receive the higher of the allocation amounts in
this subsection or in subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
$9,000,000 is provided for targeted assistance grants to low-performing schools
in accordance with Z-..../99 (accountability and assistance). Targeted
assistance grants shall not exceed $50,000 per school building per year.

(5)
$15,800,000 is provided solely for school performance award grants. Annual
grants in the amount of $25 per enrolled student shall be awarded to individual
schools which reduce, by 25 percent over the three preceding years, the
school's total percentage of students who did not meet the Washington
assessment of student learning standard. For fiscal year 2000, for schools
which have only three years of Washington assessment of student learning data,
the two-year improvement required to receive a performance grant shall be
prorated to two-thirds of 25 percent, or 16 2/3 percent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 517. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 55,719,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 55,998,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 111,717,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
A maximum of $56,670,000 is provided for learning improvement allocations to
school districts to enhance the ability of instructional staff to teach and
assess the essential academic learning requirements for reading, writing,
communication, and math in accordance with the timelines and requirements
established under RCW 28A.630.885. However, special emphasis shall be given to
the successful teaching of reading. Allocations under this section shall be
subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a)
The allocations for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years shall be at a maximum
annual rate per full-time equivalent student of $29.66 for students enrolled in
grades K-4, $29.65 for students enrolled in grades 5-7, and $29.65 for students
enrolled in grades 8-12. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment
schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250.

(b)
A district receiving learning improvement allocations shall:

(i)
Develop and keep on file at each building a student learning improvement plan
to achieve the student learning goals and essential academic learning
requirements and to implement the assessment system as it is developed. The
plan shall delineate how the learning improvement allocations will be used to
accomplish the foregoing. The plan shall be made available to the public upon
request;

(ii)
Maintain a policy regarding the involvement of school staff, parents, and
community members in instructional decisions;

(iii)
File a report by October 1, 1999, and October 1, 2000, with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in a format developed by the
superintendent that: Enumerates the activities funded by these allocations;
the amount expended for each activity; describes how the activity improved
understanding, teaching, and assessment of the essential academic learning
requirements by instructional staff; and identifies any amounts expended from
this allocation for supplemental contracts; and

(iv)
Provide parents and the local community with specific information on the use of
this allocation by including in the annual performance report required in RCW
28A.320.205, information on how funds allocated under this subsection were
spent and the results achieved.

(c)
The superintendent of public instruction shall compile and analyze the school
district reports and present the results to the office of financial management
and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 15,
1999, and November 15, 2000.

(2)
$55,046,000 is provided for local education program enhancements to meet
educational needs as identified by the school district, including alternative
education programs. This amount includes such amounts as are necessary for the
remainder of the 1998-99 school year. Allocations for the 1999-00 school year
shall be at a maximum annual rate of $28.816 per full-time equivalent student
and $28.81 per full-time equivalent student for the 2000-01 school year as
determined pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Allocations shall be
made on the monthly apportionment payment schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250.

(3)
Allocations provided under this section shall be based on school district
annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades kindergarten through
twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not more than one
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for small school
plants within any school district designated as remote and necessary schools,
the allocations shall be as follows:

(a)
Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty
full-time equivalent students;

(b)
Enrollment of not more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades seven and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time
equivalent students; and

(c)
Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades nine through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students.

(4)
Funding provided pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition
of basic education for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the
state's funding duty thereunder.

(5)
Receipt by a school district of one-fourth of the district's allocation of
funds under this section, shall be conditioned on a finding by the
superintendent that:

(a)
The district is enrolled as a medicaid service provider and is actively
pursuing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); and

(b)
The district is filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws of
1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 518. K-12
CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. State
general fund appropriations provided to the superintendent of public
instruction for state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V
may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general fund
moneys from school districts and educational service districts for a prior
fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment payments for the current
fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year adjustments on apportionment
reports for the current period. Such recoveries shall not be treated as
revenues to the state, but as a reduction in the amount expended against the
appropriation for the current fiscal period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 519. FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Education
Savings Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 65,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $32,500,000 in fiscal year 2000 and $32,500,000 in
fiscal year 2001 are appropriated to the common school construction account.

(End of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER
EDUCATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a)
Until such time as learning standards and competencies are developed as
specified in section 610(3) of this act, each institution receiving
appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this act shall submit plans
for achieving measurable and specific improvements in academic years 1999-00
and 2000-01 to the higher education coordinating board. The plans, to be prepared
at the direction of the board, shall be submitted by August 15, 1999, (for
academic year 1999-00) and June 30, 2000 (for academic year 2000-01). The
following measures will be used for the 1999-01 biennium:

(i)
Undergraduate graduation efficiency index for students beginning as freshmen
and for transfer students;

(ii)
Undergraduate student retention, defined as the percentage of all undergraduate
students who return for the next year at the same institution, measured from
fall to fall;

(iii)
Graduation rates, defined as the percentage of an entering freshmen class at
each institution that graduates within five years;

(iv)
A measure of faculty productivity to be determined by the higher education
coordinating board in consultation with the institutions receiving
appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this act; and

(v)
An additional measure to be selected by the higher education coordinating board
for each institution, in consultation with each institution.

(b)
Academic year 1998-99 shall be the baseline year against which performance in
academic year 1999-00 shall be measured. Academic year 1999-00 shall be the
baseline year against which performance in academic year 2000-01 shall be
measured. Each institution shall report to the higher education coordinating
board on its actual performance achievement for each measure for academic year
1999-00 by November 1, 2000.

(3)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop an
implementation plan for measurable and specific improvements in academic years
1999-00 and 2000-01 consistent with the performance management system developed
by the work force training and education coordinating board and for the
following performance measures:

(a)
Skilled labor force training gap;

(b)
Share of students served by technology-supported instruction and student
services;

(c)
Percent of basic skills students accomplishing skills gains; and

(d)
Percent of students prepared for transfer to baccalaureate institutions.

(4)
Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of
this act shall participate in the establishment of learning standards for
undergraduates as specified in section 610(3) of this act.

(5)
General fund‑-state appropriations to higher education institutions in
sections 603 through 609 provide an average salary increase of 2.0 percent
effective September 1, 1999, and an average salary increase of 2.0 percent
effective September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act provide state general
fund support or employment and training trust account support for full-time
equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher education. Listed
below are the annual full-time equivalent student enrollments by institutions
assumed in this act.

1999-2000 2000-2001

Annual Annual

Average Average

University
of Washington

Main
campus 31,927 32,266

Bothell
branch 993 1,136

Tacoma
branch 1,143 1,316

Washington
State University

Main
campus 17,272 17,649

Spokane
branch 472 601

Tri-Cities
branch 754 754

Vancouver
branch 1,015 1,090

Central
Washington University 7,670 7,867

Eastern
Washington University 7,739 7,739

The
Evergreen State College 3,638 3,713

Western
Washington University 10,648 10,761

State
Board for Community and

Technical
Colleges 122,141 123,671

Higher
Education Coordinating

Board 50 1,750

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. FOR
THE STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 452,785,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 475,821,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 11,404,000

Employment
and Training Trust Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................... $ 2,497,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 942,507,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for 500 FTE enrollment slots to implement RCW
28B.50.259 (timber-dependent communities).

(2)
$1,862,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,862,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for assessment of student outcomes at community and
technical colleges.

(3)
$706,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $706,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$1,155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,345,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and associated benefits
and may be used in combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty
turnover to provide faculty salary increments and associated benefits.

(5)
$332,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,739,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for Cascadia Community College start-up and enrollment
costs.

(6)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for tuition support for students enrolled in
work-based learning programs.

(7)
$1,650,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,650,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts
through the job skills program.

(8)
$925,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $925,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for investment in new and upgraded high-demand
technical programs. The state board for community and technical colleges
shall provide a report to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by
June 30, 2001, including but not limited to the number of new programs created,
the number of programs redeveloped, and the number of students trained in
programs receiving funds from this section.

(9)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the development of skill standards and the
incorporation of skill standards into existing or new training programs. The
state board for community and technical colleges shall provide a report to the
governor and legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2001, including but not
limited to the number of new programs created, the number of programs
redeveloped, and the number of students trained in programs receiving funds
from this section.

(10)
$570,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,330,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for part-time faculty retirement benefits.

(11)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for part-time faculty salary adjustments to help
reduce the disparity between compensation levels for full-time faculty and
part-time faculty. General fund‑-state expenditures required by this
section must be matched by an equal amount of tuition revenue expenditures.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further close the compensation disparity between part-time and full-time
faculty.

(12)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for grants to expand information technology and computer
science programs. Successful grant applications from a college, partnerships
of colleges, or partnerships of colleges and K-12 school districts must include
a match of cash, in-kind, or donations equivalent to the grant amount. Grant
applications shall receive priority that prepare students to meet industry
standards, achieve industry skill certificates, or continue to upper division
computer science or computer engineering studies. No college may receive more
than $600,000 from appropriations in this section. The state board for
community and technical colleges shall report the implementation of this section
to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by June 30, 2001, including
plans of successful grant recipients for the continuation of programs funded by
this section.

(13)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the Pierce College branch at Puyallup.

(14)
Funding in this section provides support for up to 7,200 full-time equivalent
students in fiscal year 2000 and up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in
fiscal year 2001 in the worker retraining program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604. FOR UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 312,923,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 326,421,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State Appropriation... $............................................... 2,751,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.............. $ 5,654,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation................ $ 5,696,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 653,445,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$9,031,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $10,647,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for upper division and graduate courses and other
educational services offered at the Bothell branch campus.

(2)
$10,542,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $11,566,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for upper division and graduate courses and other
educational services offered at the Tacoma branch campus.

(3)
$186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for assessment of student outcomes.

(4)
$324,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $324,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(5)
$925,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $925,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention
salary adjustments. General fund expenditures required by this section must be
matched by an equal amount of tuition revenue expenditures. Tuition revenues
may be expended in addition to those required by this section to further
provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments. The university shall
provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget request submittal
on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of this section.

(6)
$1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to extend the next-generation internet hub and related
expertise.

(7)
$200,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely
for the forensic pathologist fellowship program.

(8)
$136,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $137,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item UW-01.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605. FOR WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 181,459,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 194,631,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation................................. $ 206,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 376,296,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$6,419,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $9,095,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for upper division and graduate courses and other
educational services offered at the Spokane branch campus.

(2)
$5,083,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $5,217,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for upper division and graduate courses and other
educational services offered at the Tri-Cities branch campus.

(3)
$8,292,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $9,232,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for upper division and graduate courses and other
educational services offered at the Vancouver branch campus.

(4)
$186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for assessment of student outcomes.

(5)
$140,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $140,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(6)
$575,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $575,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. General fund expenditures required by this
section must be matched by an equal amount of tuition revenue expenditures.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments. The
university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this section.

(7)
$2,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
is provided solely for the safe food initiative. Funds provided in this
section can only be expended when matched with $700,000 in other funds
including private donations and other reallocation of $700,000 from the
university's existing budget. The university shall contract for a performance
review of agricultural extension activities and deliver an agricultural
extension strategic plan to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by
September 1, 2000.

(8)
$900,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the Spokane health sciences consortium.

(9)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to Washington State University as fiscal agent and
lead agency among higher education institutions for phase one of the
development of a life-long learning college. The scope of phase one includes
but is not limited to creation of an administrative core; development of a
system-wide on-line catalog and registration form; solicitation of
partnerships, resources, and expertise from private sector industries;
development of best practices for the generation of scalable
technology-mediated curricula; and collaboration with other consortia such as
Spokane health sciences, the western governors' university, Wenatchee, Yakima,
Clark county, the North Snohomish, Island, and Skagit consortium, and the
Washington state community and technical colleges.

(10)
$165,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $166,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item WSU-01.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 41,180,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 42,483,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 83,663,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for assessment of student outcomes.

(2)
$93,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$93,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(3)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. General fund expenditures required by this
section must be matched by an equal amount of tuition revenue expenditures.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments. The
university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 607. FOR CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 41,136,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 43,006,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 84,142,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for assessment of student outcomes.

(2)
$70,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$70,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(3)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. General fund expenditures required by this
section must be matched by an equal amount of tuition revenue expenditures.
Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section
to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments. The
university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 608. FOR THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 21,517,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 23,020,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 44,537,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for assessment of student outcomes.

(2)
$47,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$47,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(3)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention
salary adjustments. General fund expenditures required by this section must be
matched by an equal amount of tuition revenue expenditures. Tuition revenues
may be expended in addition to those required by this section to further
provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments. The university shall
provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget request submittal
on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 609. FOR WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 54,606,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 56,642,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 111,248,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $186,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for assessment of student outcomes.

(2)
$93,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$93,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(3)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. General fund expenditures required by this section
must be matched by an equal amount of tuition revenue expenditures. Tuition
revenues may be expended in addition to those required by this section to
further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments. The university
shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget request
submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of this
section.

(4)
$2,285,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,285,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to the university as the fiscal agent for the
seven-institution higher education consortium to serve the counties of Island
and Skagit and the northern area of Snohomish county. Funds shall support
program administration, student services, academic support, facility leases,
and program marketing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 610. FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 4,468,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 12,584,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 653,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ...................... $ 17,705,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the accountability,
performance measurement, policy coordination, planning, studies and
administrative functions of the board and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1)
The board shall review, recommend changes if necessary, and approve plans
defined in section 601(2)(a) of this act for achieving measurable and specific
improvements in academic years 1999-00 and 2000-01.

(2)
By January, 2000, the board shall recommend to the office of financial
management and appropriate legislative committees any recommended additions,
deletions, or revisions to the performance and accountability measures in
section 601(2)(a) of this act as part of the next master plan for higher
education. The recommendations shall be developed in consultation with the
institutions of higher education and may include additional performance
indicators to measure successful student learning and other student outcomes
for possible inclusion in the 2001-03 operating budget. The recommendations
shall include measures of performance demonstrating specific and measurable
improvements related to distance education and education provided primarily
through technology, to be determined by the board, in consultation with the
institutions of higher education.

(3)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to develop undergraduate learning standards for
experiential learning and new learning in the post-secondary system, and to
develop credentialing standards based on learning competencies.

(4)
$280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for enrollment to implement RCW 28B.80.570 through
28B.80.585 (rural natural resources impact areas). The number of students
served shall be 50 full-time equivalent students per fiscal year. The board
shall ensure that enrollments reported under this subsection meet the criteria
outlined in RCW 28B.80.570 through 28B.80.585.

(5)
$110,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to develop a competency based admissions system for higher
education institutions.

(6)
$8,090,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
is provided solely to contract for 1,700 full-time equivalent students in high
demand fields and programs. The board shall design and implement a bidding
process to solicit proposals from public institutions to deliver these student
enrollments. Successful proposals shall include institutional plans to
reallocate 1 base full-time equivalent student into high demand programs for
every 2 full-time equivalent students funded in and awarded according to this
section.

(7)
$2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitive grants to public baccalaureate
institutions to expand information technology programs. Successful grant applications
to fund faculty, staff, or equipment for computer science, computer
engineering, or related disciplines must include a match of nonstate cash or
donations equivalent to the grant amount. No institution may receive more than
$2,000,000 from appropriations in this section. The board shall report on the
implementation of this section to the governor and legislative fiscal
committees by June 30, 2001, including plans of successful grant recipients for
the continuation of programs funded by this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 611. FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000) ........ $ 103,679,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 117,644,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.. 4........... $ 2,423,000

Advanced
College Tuition Payment Program Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................... $ 3,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 227,154,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $529,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2)
$220,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $225,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the western interstate commission for higher
education.

(3)
$613,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $613,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the future teacher conditional scholarship program
under chapter 28B.102 RCW.

(4)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the health professional conditional scholarship
and loan program under chapter 28B.115 RCW. This amount shall be deposited to
the health professional loan repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out
the purposes of the program.

(5)
$98,111,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $98,131,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for student financial aid, including all
administrative costs. Of these amounts:

(a)
$77,668,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $77,768,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
need grant program may be transferred to the state work study program;

(b)
$15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
work study program may be transferred to the state need grant program;

(c)
$2,420,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,420,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants;

(d)
A maximum of 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 may be expended for financial aid administration,
excluding the 4 percent state work study program administrative allowance
provision;

(e)
$230,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $201,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the educator's excellence awards. Any educator's
excellence moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by
the board to either the Washington scholars program or to the Washington award
for vocational excellence;

(f)
$1,402,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,475,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any
Washington scholars program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be
transferred by the board to either the educator's excellence awards or to the
Washington award for vocational excellence;

(g)
$560,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $588,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Washington award for vocational
excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational program moneys not
awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to either the
educator's excellence awards or the Washington scholars program;

(h)
$51,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$51,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. To
be eligible for the matching grant, a nonprofit community organization
organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate
that it has raised $2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the
effective date of this act. No organization may receive more than one $2,000
matching grant; and

(6)
$3,014,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $16,958,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Z-..../99 (Washington's promise
scholarship program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$187,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for undergraduate fellowships based upon the graduate
fellowship program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 612. FOR
THE WORK
FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 1,045,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 1,043,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 34,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 36,496,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 613. FOR WASHINGTON
STATE LIBRARY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 8,369,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 8,149,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 8,859,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 25,377,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
At least $2,524,000 shall be expended for a contract with the Seattle public
library for library services for the Washington book and braille library.

(2)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the state library to continue the government information
locator service in accordance with chapter 171, Laws of 1996.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 614. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 2,320,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 2,568,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation................ $ 1,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 5,888,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 615. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 2,621,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 2,636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 5,257,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following condition and
limitation: $50,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for activities related to the Lewis and
Clark Bicentennial.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 616. FOR
THE EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 1,228,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 1,397,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 2,625,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$467,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $322,200 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for temporary relocation of the Cheney Cowles museum
operations.

(2)
$311,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the building operation and maintenance of the Cheney Cowles
museum addition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 617. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 3,986,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 4,006,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation.......... $ 644,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,636,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 618. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 6,704,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 6,686,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION...................... $ 13,390,000

(End of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 521,672,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 538,689,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 4,168,000

Debt-Limit
Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account‑-

State
Appropriation...................... $ 2,574,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION......... ........ $ 1,067,103,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the debt-limit
general fund bond retirement account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 702. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State
Convention and Trade Center Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 32,575,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 5,080,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 5,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 42,735,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 703. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 23,806,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 23,445,000

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 118,000

Nondebt-Limit
Reimbursable Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............. $ 106,498,000

Stadium
and Exhibition Center Construction‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 1,250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 155,117,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the
nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Nondebt-Limit
Revenue Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............. $ 1,229,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 705. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 567,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 568,000

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 30,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 1,237,000

Public
Safety Reimbursable Bond Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 3,000

Stadium/Exhibition
Center Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation ............ $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,655,000

Total
Bond Retirement and Interest Appropriations

contained
in sections 701 through 705 of this

act...................................... $ 1,268,839,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 706. FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-TORT
DEFENSE SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 1,632,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 1,633,000

Tort
Defense Services Revolving Account........ $..................................... 3,265,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,530,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: To facilitate payment of tort defense services from special
funds, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each
special fund to the special fund agency tort defense services revolving fund,
in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.
The governor shall distribute the moneys appropriated in this section to
agencies to pay for tort defense services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 707. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EMERGENCY
FUND

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 850,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 850,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,700,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's
emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 708. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE
CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of five million
dollars or so much thereof as may be available on June 30, 1999, from the total
amount of unspent fiscal year 1999 fire contingency funding in the disaster
response account, is appropriated for the purpose of making allocations to the
military department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of
natural resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 709. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-IMPLEMENTATION
OF THE GOVERNOR'S COLLECTIVE BARGAINING BILL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 2,500,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 2,500,000

Special
Payroll System Revolving Account

Appropriation............................ $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 10,000,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's
emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 710. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-IMPLEMENTATION
OF INCREASED MINIMUM WAGE LAW

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 2,500,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 7,500,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........... $ 10,800,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation............................ $ 9,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 29,800,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are for allocation to agencies
that experience increased costs because of the passage of Initiative 688 by the
voters in November, 1998.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 711. FOR
THE VIOLENCE
REDUCTION AND DRUG ENFORCEMENT ACCOUNT. The sum of twenty-two
million, five hundred thousand dollars is appropriated for fiscal year 2000
from the general fund to the violence reduction and drug enforcement account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 712. FOR
THE WILDLIFE
ACCOUNT. The sum of three million, five hundred thousand
dollars is appropriated for fiscal year 2000 from the general fund to the
wildlife account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 713. FOR
THE EDUCATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT. The sum of fourteen
million, eight hundred thousand dollars is appropriated for fiscal year 2000
from the general fund to the education technology revolving account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 714. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 10,000,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........... $ 462,000

Hospital
Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 19,000

Health
Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 182,000

Certified
Public Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 5,000

Safe
Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 96,000

State
Health Care Authority Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 1,456,000

Year
2000 Contingency Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation............................ $ 10,000,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 150,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation.. ... $ 150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 22,520,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management to
agencies to resolve year 2000 issues. Agencies shall submit their estimated
costs to resolve year 2000 issues to the office of financial management.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the year 2000 contingency revolving account, in accordance
with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 715. BELATED
CLAIMS. The agencies and institutions of the state may expend
moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial
management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or
institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 716. FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 20,541,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 32,499,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........... $ 13,927,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation..... $ 1,006,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation............................ $ 35,453,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 103,426,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums shall not
exceed $394.14 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2000, and $430.11 for
fiscal year 2001.

(b)
The monthly employer funding rate for the operating costs of the health care
authority shall not exceed $5.51 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2000,
and $5.02 for fiscal year 2001.

(c)
An additional $5.77 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal years 2000 and 2001 to repay the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account for any claims paid as a result of a court-approved
stipulated settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of
Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1).

(d)
Surplus moneys accruing to the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account due to lower-than-projected insurance costs may not be reallocated by
the health care authority to increase the actuarial value of public employee
insurance plans. Such funds shall be held in reserve in the public employees'
and retirees' insurance account and may not be expended without prior
legislative authorization.

(f)
In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the
public employees' benefits board may require employee premium copayments,
increase point-of-service cost sharing, and/or implement managed competition.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase
revolving fund in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial
management.

(3)
The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees'
benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible
retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From July
1, 1999, through December 31, 1999, the subsidy shall be $56.02 per month.
From January 1, 2000 through December 31, 2000, the subsidy shall be $65.82.
Starting January 1, 2001, the subsidy shall be $74.38 per month.

(4)
Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall
remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a)
For each full-time employee, $21.70 per month beginning September 1, 1999, and
$23.90 beginning September 1, 2000;

(b)
For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in
an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible
for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $21.70 each month
beginning September 1, 1999, and $23.90 beginning September 1, 2000, prorated
by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives.

The
remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to
employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care
authority.

(5)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes
amounts sufficient to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium
levels specified in subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 1999-01
transportation appropriations act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 717. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations shall be made on a monthly basis consistent
with chapter 41.45 RCW.

(1)
There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 27,760,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 16,640,000

(2)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 8,500,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 8,500,000

(3)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 750,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 62,900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 718. SALARY
COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 18,958,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 43,001,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........... $ 16,613,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation..... $ 1,176,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation............................ $ 42,975,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 122,723,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, appropriations in this section are provided solely for a 2.0 percent
salary increase effective September 1, 1999, and a 2.0 percent salary increase
effective September 1, 2000, for all classified employees, including those
employees in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board.

(2)
The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund a 2.0 percent salary
increase effective September 1, 1999, and a 2.0 percent increase effective
September 1, 2000, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees
exempt from merit system rules whose salaries are not set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials.

(3)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this
section includes funds sufficient to fund a 2.0 percent salary increase
effective September 1, 1999, and a 2.0 percent salary increase effective
September 1, 2000, for ferry workers consistent with the 1999-01 transportation
appropriations act.

(4)
No salary increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary
has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 719. FOR
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL‑-SALARY
ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)... $ 1,014,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 2,371,000

Attorney
General Salary Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation............................ $ 3,385,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,770,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations are provided solely for increases in salaries and related
benefits of assistant attorneys general effective September 1, 1999, and
another increase effective September 1, 2000. This funding, in combination
with the provision for salary cost of living adjustments, should be sufficient
to provide an overall average 10.5 percent increase to each assistant attorney
general in an effort to achieve market parity in the year 2003, as determined
by the 1998 compensation study of assistant attorneys general.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, state
agencies are directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated fund or
account to the attorney general salary increase revolving account, hereby
created in the state treasury, in accordance with schedules provided by the
office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 720. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000) ... $ 3,459,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 4,150,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........... $ 2,356,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation..... $ 148,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation............................ $ 9,099,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 19,212,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding is provided to implement the recommendations of the Washington
personnel resources board for the top eight listed priority classes consistent
with the provisions of chapter 319, Laws of 1996.

(2)
Implementation of the salary adjustments for the various occupational and
physical therapy classes, information technology classes, medical
transcriptionists classes, fisheries biometrician class, developmental
disability case resource classes, psychiatric child care counselors,
dieticians, and the physician three modification to include specialty
classifications is effective September 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 721. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-PERSONNEL
RESOURCES BOARD'S SALARY SURVEY FOR STATE AND HIGHER EDUCATION EMPLOYEES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $ 5,208,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........... $ 1,259,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation............................ $ 5,966,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 12,433,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the conditions and limitations in
this section.

(1)
Funding is provided in sufficient amounts to bring the current salary range to
within 12 ranges of their market rate, including any cost-of-living adjustments
and associated benefit costs, those state and higher education classified and
exempt employees whose base salary combined with any special pay provisions,
are greater than 12 ranges from their approved survey applied salary range as
determined under the provisions of RCW 41.06.160.

(2)
Implementation of the salary adjustments for the various classifications is
effective September 1, 2000.

(3)
In allocating these funds, if sufficient funding exists, the office of
financial management may determine to bring to within 11 ranges of market rate,
including any cost-of-living adjustments and associated benefit costs, those
state and higher education classified and exempt employees whose base salary
range combined with any special pay provisions, are greater than 11 ranges from
their approved survey applied salary range as determined under the provisions of
RCW 41.06.160.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 722. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired
Driving Safety Account Appropriation. $ 1,440,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 723. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR THE MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired
Driving Safety Account Appropriation........... $ 960,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed in
accordance with RCW 82.14.330.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 724. INCENTIVE
SAVINGS‑‑FY
2000. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so much
thereof as may be available on June 30, 2000, from the total amount of unspent
fiscal year 2000 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for the
purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1)
Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable
to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the
quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the
agency that generated the savings.

(2)
The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars,
is appropriated to the education savings account.

(3)
For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund
appropriations does not include the appropriations made in this section or any
amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 725. INCENTIVE
SAVINGS‑-FY
2001. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so much
thereof as may be available on June 30, 2001, from the total amount of unspent
fiscal year 2001 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for the
purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1)
Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable
to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the
quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the
agency that generated the savings.

(2)
The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars,
is appropriated to the education savings account.

(3) For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent
state general fund appropriations does not include the appropriations made in
this section or any amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions
under RCW 43.88.110.

(End of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER
TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 801. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General
Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premiums
distribution.................... $ 6,617,250

General
Fund Appropriation for public utility

district
excise tax distribution......... $ 35,876,898

General
Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneys

salaries................................. $ 2,960,000

General
Fund Appropriation for camper and travel

trailer
excise tax distribution.......... $ 4,325,826

General
Fund Appropriation for boating

safety/education
and law enforcement

distribution............................. $ 3,616,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation

for
harbor improvement revenue distribution $ 138,000

Liquor
Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise
tax distribution.................. $ 25,580,000

Liquor
Revolving Fund Appropriation for liquor

profits
distribution..................... $ 52,269,932

Timber
Tax Distribution Account Appropriation

for
distribution to "Timber" counties.... $ 74,025,900

Municipal
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation............................ $ 103,520,000

County
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation............................ $ 13,147,000

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution
to counties for publicly funded

autopsies................................ $ 1,375,332

County
Criminal Justice Account Appropriation. $ 103,105,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Account

Appropriation............................ $ 23,678,000

County
Public Health Account Appropriation.... $ 51,520,250

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 501,755,388

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-FEDERAL
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Forest
Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest

reserve
fund distribution................ $ 56,150,492

General
Fund Appropriation for federal flood control

funds
distribution....................... $ 4,000

General
Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees

distribution............................. $ 52,000

General
Fund Appropriation for distribution of

federal
funds to counties in conformance with

P.L.
97-99 Federal Aid to Counties........ $ 1,281,266

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 57,487,758

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 803. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

General
Fund: For transfer to the Water Quality

Account.................................. $ 30,498,300

General
Fund: For transfer to the Flood Control

Assistance
Account....................... $ 4,000,000

State
Convention and Trade Center Account: For

transfer
to the State Convention and Trade

Center
Operations Account................ $ 3,800,000

Water
Quality Account: For transfer to the Water

Pollution
Control Account. Transfers shall be

made
at intervals coinciding with deposits of

federal
capitalization grant money into the

account.
The amounts transferred shall not

exceed
the match required for each federal

deposit.................................. $ 16,350,000

State
Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the
general fund on or before June 30, 2001, an

amount
up to $13,000,000 in excess of the cash

requirements
of the State Treasurer's Service

Account.................................. $ 13,000,000

Public
Works Assistance Account: For transfer to

the
Drinking Water Assistance Account.... $ 7,700,000

County
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account:

For
transfer to the County Public Health

Account.................................. $ 2,577,664

Public
Health Services Account: For transfer to

the
County Public Health Account......... $ 1,056,000

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account:

For
transfer to the State Drought Preparedness

Account.................................. $ 6,800,000

Tobacco
Settlement Account: For transfer to

the
Health Services Account.............. $ 168,088,595

Tobacco
Settlement Account: For transfer to the

Tobacco
Prevention Trust Account......... $ 155,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 804. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-TRANSFERS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation: For transfer to

the
Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account:
For the administrative expenses

of
the judicial retirement system........ $ 21,550

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 21,550

(End of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 901. EXPENDITURE
AUTHORIZATIONS. The appropriations contained in this act are
maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys
disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be
recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes.
To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the
treasury during the 1999-01 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 902. INFORMATION
SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies shall comply with
the following requirements regarding information systems projects when
specifically directed to do so by this act.

(1)
Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology shall be made
in the context of its information technology portfolio. "Information
technology portfolio" means a strategic management approach in which the
relationships between agency missions and information technology investments
can be seen and understood, such that: Technology efforts are linked to agency
objectives and business plans; the impact of new investments on existing
infrastructure and business functions are assessed and understood before
implementation; and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative state-wide infrastructure.

(2)
Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in making decisions
on matters related to the following:

(a)
System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b)
Setting goals and objectives for using information technology in meeting
legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;

(c)
Assessment of overall information processing performance, resources, and
capabilities;

(d)
Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of
any new systems developed using external resources; and

(e)
Progress toward enabling electronic access to public information.

(3)
The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information technology
projects at the direction of the information services board and in accordance
with published department of information services policies and guidelines. At
a minimum, such studies shall include a statement of: (a) The purpose or
impetus for change; (b) the business value to the agency, including an
examination and evaluation of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a
comprehensive risk assessment based on the proposed project's impact on both
citizens and state operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing
nothing; (d) the impact on agency and state-wide information infrastructure;
and (e) the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.

(4)
The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The
plan or plans shall address all factors critical to successful completion of
each project. The plan(s) shall include, but is not limited to, the following
elements: A description of the problem or opportunity that the information
technology project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives
and assumptions; a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to
be accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the
phased approach shall be such that the business case justification for a
project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable
value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each
development cycle.

(5)
The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for information technology
projects. Consistent with the direction of the information services board and
the published policies and guidelines of the department of information
services, the quality assurance plan shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of the project and successful integration with the agency
and state information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality
assurance plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The quality
assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements for each phase of
a project.

(6)
A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan shall be provided to the department of information services, the
office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees. The plans
and studies shall demonstrate a sound business case that justifies the
investment of taxpayer funds on any new project, an assessment of the impact of
the proposed system on the existing information technology infrastructure, the
disciplined use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging
of private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval of the
relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan
by the department of information services and the office of financial
management.

(7)
Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and legislative
fiscal committees at intervals specified in the project's quality assurance
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 903. VIDEO
TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department of information
services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video telecommunications
services for state agencies. As lead agency, the department shall develop
standards and common specifications for leased and purchased telecommunications
equipment and assist state agencies in developing a video telecommunications
expenditure plan. No agency may spend any portion of any appropriation in this
act for new video telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication
transmission, or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding
current video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and without first
submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan, in accordance with the
policies of the department of information services, for review and assessment
by the department of information services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any
such expenditure by a public school, a video telecommunications expenditure
plan shall be approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the department. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate the use of
video telecommunications in public schools by providing educational information
to local school districts and shall assist local school districts and
educational service districts in telecommunications planning and curriculum
development. Prior to any such expenditure by a public institution of
postsecondary education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be
approved by the higher education coordinating board. The higher education
coordinating board shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications for
instruction and instructional support in postsecondary education, including the
review and approval of instructional telecommunications course offerings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 904. EMERGENCY
FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever allocations are made
from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an agency that is financed
in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys, the director of
financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the
general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency.
No appropriation shall be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 905. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to the amounts appropriated in this
act for revenues for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and interest
including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers, interest
on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is also
appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for these
purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and 39.96 RCW or
any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 906. BOND
EXPENSES. In addition to such other appropriations as are
made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee
from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building
funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred
in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 907. (1)
As a management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources,
while improving employee productivity and morale, agencies shall offer
voluntary separation and/or downshifting incentives and options according to
procedures and guidelines established by the department of personnel and the
department of retirement systems in consultation with the office of financial
management. The options may include, but are not limited to, financial
incentives for: Voluntary resignation and retirement, voluntary
leave-without-pay, voluntary workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary
downward movement, or temporary separation for development purposes.

(2)
Agency plans and offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the
department of personnel, the department of retirement systems, and the office
of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 908. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings
provided that such a program is approved by the director of the office of
financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization are
required to submit a report by June 30, 2001, to the legislature and the office
of financial management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the program
including resulting service delivery changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of
the retirement incentive per participant, the total cost to the state, and the
projected or actual net dollar savings over the 1999-01 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 909. LEGISLATIVE
FACILITIES. Notwithstanding RCW 43.01.090, the house of
representatives, the senate, and the permanent statutory committees shall pay
expenses quarterly to the department of general administration facilities and
services revolving fund for services rendered by the department for operations,
maintenance, and supplies relating to buildings, structures, and facilities
used by the legislature for the biennium beginning July 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 910. AGENCY
RECOVERIES. Except as otherwise provided by law,
recoveries of amounts expended pursuant to an appropriation, including but not
limited to, payments for material supplied or services rendered under chapter
39.34 RCW, may be expended as part of the original appropriation of the fund to
which such recoveries belong, without further or additional appropriation.
Such expenditures shall be subject to conditions and procedures prescribed by
the director of financial management. The director may authorize expenditure
with respect to recoveries accrued but not received, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, except that such recoveries shall not
be included in revenues or expended against an appropriation for a subsequent
fiscal period. This section does not apply to the repayment of loans, except
for loans between state agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 911. GENERALLY
ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES. The appropriations of
moneys and the designation of funds and accounts by this and other acts of the
1999 legislature shall be construed in a manner consistent with legislation
enacted by the 1985, 1987, 1989, 1991, 1993, 1995, and 1997 legislatures to
conform state funds and accounts with generally accepted accounting principles.

Sec.
912. RCW
69.50.520 and 1998 c 346 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

The
violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in the state
treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4),
66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(h)(1), 82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and
section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.,
including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be
appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs associated with
implementing criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the 1997-1999 biennium, funds from the account may also be used for
costs associated with conducting a feasibility study of the department of
corrections' offender-based tracking system, providing grants to local
governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997, and for
multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, ((1999)) 2001,
at least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be
used for providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the
family policy council.

Sec.
913. RCW
72.09.050 and 1995 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall manage the department of corrections and shall be responsible
for the administration of adult correctional programs, including but not
limited to the operation of all state correctional institutions or facilities
used for the confinement of convicted felons. In addition, the secretary shall
have broad powers to enter into agreements with any federal agency, or any
other state, or any Washington state agency or local government providing for
the operation of any correctional facility or program for persons convicted of
felonies or misdemeanors or for juvenile offenders. Such agreements for
counties with local law and justice councils shall be required in the local law
and justice plan pursuant to RCW 72.09.300. The agreements may provide for
joint operation or operation by the department of corrections, alone, or by any
of the other governmental entities, alone. Between July 1, 1999, and June
30, 2001, the secretary may expend funds appropriated for the 1999-01 biennium
to enter into agreements with any local government or private organization in any
other state, providing for the operation of any correctional facility or
program for persons convicted of felonies. The secretary may employ
persons to aid in performing the functions and duties of the department. The
secretary may delegate any of his or her functions or duties to department
employees, including the authority to certify and maintain custody of records
and documents on file with the department. The secretary is authorized to
promulgate standards for the department of corrections within appropriation
levels authorized by the legislature.

Pursuant
to the authority granted in chapter 34.05 RCW, the secretary shall adopt rules
providing for inmate restitution when restitution is determined appropriate as
a result of a disciplinary action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 914. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 915. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

(End of part)

ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS.................................... 4

ATTORNEY GENERAL................................................ 8

SALARY ADJUSTMENTS............................................ 110

BELATED CLAIMS................................................ 107

BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIRE
FIGHTERS.............................. 18

BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY........................................... 17

BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS.......................... 28

BOARD OF TAX APPEALS........................................... 16

BOND EXPENSES................................................. 121

CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL....................................... 8

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY.................................. 94

CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS.......... 8

COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE
COMMISSION................................ 37

COMMISSION ON
AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS......................... 14

COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS............................ 7

COMMISSION ON HISPANIC
AFFAIRS................................. 14

COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT.................................. 3

CONSERVATION COMMISSION........................................ 43

COURT OF APPEALS................................................ 3

CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION........................... 29

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE...................................... 49

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT........ 9

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 33

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 37

DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS............................ 9

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE................................ 43

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION........................... 16

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 31

DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES............................. 17

DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES............................. 29

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING........................................ 51

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES................................ 48

DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL........................................ 13

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS........................... 109

OPERATIONS..................................................... 15

TRANSFERS..................................................... 117

DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.......................................... 15

DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR
THE BLIND........................... 35

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES....................... 20

ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING
SERVICES PROGRAM................. 27

AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM............................... 24

ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE
PROGRAM............................ 26

CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
PROGRAM........................... 21

DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
PROGRAM............................. 23

ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 25

JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM................................ 21

MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 26

MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 22

PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES
PROGRAM............................. 27

VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
PROGRAM.............................. 27

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS................................. 30

EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 102

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY.................................. 94

ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL.......................... 13

EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT........................ 106

EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS.................................... 121

EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT................................. 35

ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE.................................. 43

EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS.................................... 118

FORENSIC INVESTIGATION
COUNCIL................................. 17

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS.............................. 107

TORT DEFENSE SERVICES......................................... 104

GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS............................. 7

GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS
BOARD................................. 19

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD

FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS............................... 98

POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION......................... 97

HORSE RACING COMMISSION........................................ 17

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES........................................ 2

HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION........................................ 28

INCENTIVE SAVINGS

FY 2000....................................................... 113

FY 2001....................................................... 113

INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD............................ 30

INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS.................................. 118

INSURANCE COMMISSIONER......................................... 17

INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR
OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 42

JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND
REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 2

JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE............................. 3

LAW LIBRARY..................................................... 3

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE..... 2

LEGISLATIVE FACILITIES........................................ 122

LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR............................................. 5

LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD........................................... 17

MILITARY DEPARTMENT............................................ 18

MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL..................................... 16

OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS.............................. 13

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT................................. 13

COMPENSATION ACTIONS OF
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD............. 111

EMERGENCY FUND................................................ 105

FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL......................................... 105

IMPLEMENTATION OF INCREASED
MINIMUM WAGE LAW.................. 105

IMPLEMENTATION OF THE
GOVERNOR'S COLLECTIVE BARGAINING BILL... 105

PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD'S
SALARY SURVEY..................... 112

YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS......................................... 106

OFFICE OF MINORITY AND
WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES............ 16

OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE........................................ 4

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR.......................................... 4

OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY..................................... 3

PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD........................................ 15

PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION.................................... 5

PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION......................... 19

REDISTRICTING COMMISSION........................................ 7

SALARY COST OF LIVING
ADJUSTMENT.............................. 109

SECRETARY OF STATE.............................................. 5

SENATE.......................................................... 2

SENTENCING GUIDELINES
COMMISSION............................... 35

STATE AUDITOR................................................... 7

STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES............... 88

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION....................................... 85

STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE
CENTER.............................. 19

STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.................................... 28

STATE INVESTMENT BOARD......................................... 15

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION.......................... 41

STATE PATROL................................................... 51

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 102

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 102

STATE TREASURER................................................. 7

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................. 103,
104

COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT.................... 112

FEDERAL REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION............................. 116

MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT................. 112

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION............................... 115

TRANSFERS..................................................... 116

STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE........................................... 3

STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS...................................... 121

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION.......................... 65

EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS...................................... 78

EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS.................................. 76

ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT................ 77

GENERAL APPORTIONMENT (BASIC
EDUCATION)........................ 59

INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS............................... 77

LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.................................... 81

LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE........................................ 77

LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS........................................ 83

PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE
STUDENTS........................... 78

PUPIL TRANSPORTATION........................................... 71

SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION
ADJUSTMENTS....................... 69

SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS................................... 72

SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS..................................... 72

STATE ADMINISTRATION........................................... 53

TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS.............................. 76

TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS................................ 81

SUPREME COURT................................................... 3

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE.................................... 95

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON....................................... 90

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION........................ 18

VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS...................................... 120

VIOLENCE REDUCTION AND DRUG
ENFORCEMENT ACCOUNT............... 106

WASHINGTON POLLUTION
LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM............. 50

WASHINGTON STATE ARTS
COMMISSION.............................. 101

WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY........................... 101

WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY...................................... 101

WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY....................................... 14

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY.................................... 92

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY.................................. 96

WILDLIFE ACCOUNT.............................................. 106

WORK FORCE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD.......... 101

--- END ---