BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.61.010 and 1994 c 81 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

((Cities
of five thousand or more population and such contiguous property the residents
of which may decide in favor thereof in the manner set forth in this chapter
may create)) A metropolitan park district may be created for
the management, control, improvement, maintenance, and acquisition of parks((,
parkways,)) and ((boulevards)) recreation facilities as defined
in this chapter. A metropolitan park district must include all of the
territory within a city with a population of at least five thousand, and may
include additional contiguous territory, whether unincorporated territory or
all of the territory located in one or more additional cities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"City" means both cities and towns, including code cities.

(2)
"Ex officio board of park commissioners" means the board of park
commissioners of a metropolitan park district, only including a city with a
population of five hundred thousand or more within its boundaries, that is
composed of only the members of a city legislative authority (including the
elected mayor, if any, acting in the mayor's ordinary legislative capacity)
acting ex officio and independently as provided under RCW 35.61.050(3).

(3)
"Separately elected board of park commissioners" means a board of
park commissioners of a metropolitan park district that is composed of five
separately elected commissioners as provided under RCW 35.61.050(1) and
35.61.120(1).

(4)
"Land or lands" refers to land, water, or air, or any of the rights
therein or improvements thereon.

(5)
"Parks and recreation facilities" includes parks, gymnasiums,
playgrounds, swimming pools, field houses, beach houses, stadiums, golf
courses, coliseums, sports facilities, zoos, aquariums, civic facilities,
cultural facilities, theaters, interpretive facilities, museums, public
campgrounds, natural areas, boat ramps, marinas, senior citizen centers,
community centers, arboretums, bicycle and bridle paths, parkways, boulevards,
and other parks and recreation facilities, including related administrative and
support facilities.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.61.020 and 1965 c 7 s 35.61.020 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A ballot proposition authorizing the creation of a metropolitan park district
shall be submitted by ordinance to the voters of the area proposed to be
included in the park district at any general election, or at any special
election which may be called for that purpose((, or at any city election
held in the city in all of the various voting precincts thereof, the city
council or commission may,)).

(a)
The ballot proposition shall be submitted if the legislative authority of the
city enacts such an ordinance after adopting a resolution proposing creation of
a metropolitan park district or ((on)) if a petition ((of))
proposing creation of a metropolitan park district is submitted to the
county auditor that has been signed by at least fifteen percent of the ((qualified
electors of the)) registered voters residing in the city ((based
upon the registration for the last preceding general city election, shall by
ordinance, submit to the voters of the city the proposition of creating a
metropolitan park district, the limits of which shall be coextensive with the limits
of the city as now or hereafter established, inclusive of territory annexed to
and forming a part of the city)).

(b)
For districts proposed to be created after January 1, 1999, other than those to
be governed under RCW 35.61.050(3), the ballot proposition shall be submitted
if either: (i) A resolution proposing the creation of the metropolitan park
district is adopted by the governing body of each city proposed to be included
in the park district and the county legislative authority of the county in
which any unincorporated area proposed to be included in the park district is
located; or (ii) a petition proposing the creation of the metropolitan park
district is submitted to the county auditor that has been signed by at least
fifteen percent of the registered voters residing in the area proposed to be
included in the park district. The petition or resolution shall describe the
boundaries of the proposed metropolitan park district and propose creating the
park district.

(2)
The ballot proposition shall be approved by a majority of the voters residing
in the area in which the metropolitan park district is proposed to be created.

(3)
Once created, any territory ((by virtue of its annexation)) that
is annexed to any city ((having heretofore created a)) included
in a metropolitan park district shall be ((deemed to be within the
limits of)) added automatically to the metropolitan park district upon
the effective date of the annexation by the city and such an extension of a
park district's boundaries shall not be subject to review by a boundary review
board.

((The
city council or commission shall submit the proposition at a special election
to be called therefor when the petition so requests.))

Sec.
4. RCW
35.61.030 and 1985 c 469 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

((In
submitting the question to the voters for their approval or rejection, the city
council or commission shall pass an ordinance declaring its intention to submit
the proposition of creating a metropolitan park district to the qualified
voters of the city. The ordinance shall be published once a week for two
consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the city, and the city council
or commission shall cause to be placed upon the ballot for the election, at the
proper place, the))

(1)
The ballot proposition authorizing creation of a metropolitan park district
that is submitted to voters for their approval or rejection shall appear on the
ballot of the next general election or at the next special election date
specified under RCW 29.13.020 occurring sixty or more days after the last
resolution proposing the creation of the park district is adopted or the date
the county auditor certifies that the petition proposing the creation of the
park district contains sufficient valid signatures, if a boundary review board
does not exist in the county.

(2)
The creation of a metropolitan park district is not subject to review by a
boundary review board if the proposed metropolitan park district only includes
one or more cities and the special election at which a ballot proposition
authorizing creation of the park district shall be held as if a boundary review
board does not exist in the county. In all other instances, notice of the
proposal to create a metropolitan park district shall be filed with the
boundary review board as provided under RCW 36.93.090 and the special election
at which a ballot proposition authorizing creation of the park district shall
be held at the next special election date specified under RCW 29.13.020 sixty
or more days after the date the boundary review board is deemed to have approved
the proposal, approves the proposal, or modifies and approves the proposal.

(3)
The legislative authority of a city placing on the ballot a proposition ((which))
authorizing the creation of a metropolitan park district shall ((be
expressed in)), in the ordinance submitting the question to the voters,
choose and describe the composition of the initial metropolitan park district
commission that is proposed under RCW 35.61.050. The proposition shall include
the following terms:

G "For the formation of a metropolitan park
district."

G "Against the formation of a metropolitan park
district."

Sec.
5. RCW
35.61.040 and 1965 c 7 s 35.61.040 are each amended to read as follows:

If
((at an election)) a majority of the voters voting ((thereon)) on
the ballot proposition authorizing the creation of the metropolitan park
district vote in favor of the formation of a metropolitan park district,
the metropolitan park district shall ((then be and become)) be
created as a municipal corporation effective immediately upon
certification of the election results that voters approved the ballot
proposition and its name shall be "Metropolitan Park District of
. . . . . . (inserting the name of the largest
city included in the park district)."

Sec.
6. RCW
35.61.050 and 1994 c 223 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, five park commissioners
shall be elected at large as the initial members of the board of park
commissioners for the metropolitan park district at the same election at
which the ballot proposition is submitted to the voters as to whether a
metropolitan park district is to be formed((, five park commissioners shall
be elected)). The election of metropolitan park commissioners shall
be null and void if the metropolitan park district is not created. Candidates
shall run for specific commission positions. ((No)) A primary
shall not be held to nominate candidates.

(2)
The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be
elected as a metropolitan park commissioner. The staggering of the
terms of office shall occur as follows: (((1))) (a) The two
persons who are elected receiving the two greatest numbers of votes shall be
elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered
year or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered
year; (((2))) (b) the two persons who are elected receiving the
next two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of
office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of
office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (((3))) (c)
the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office
if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if
the election is held in an even-numbered year.

The
initial metropolitan park commissioners shall take office immediately
when they are elected and qualified, and for purposes of computing their terms
of office the terms shall be assumed to commence on the first day of January in
the year after they are elected. Thereafter, all commissioners shall be
elected to six-year terms of office at general elections held in
odd-numbered years.

All
commissioners shall serve until their respective successors are elected and
qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies shall
occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

(3)
As authorized under RCW 35.61.120, the ballot proposition creating a new
metropolitan park district that only consists of a city with a population of
five hundred thousand or more may provide for the city's legislative authority
(including the elected mayor, if any, acting in the mayor's ordinary
legislative capacity) to act in an ex officio and independent capacity as the
board of commissioners for the metropolitan park district. An election shall
not be held to elect the initial metropolitan park district commissioners if
such an option is taken.

Sec.
7. RCW
35.61.120 and 1965 c 7 s 35.61.120 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The officers of a metropolitan park district shall be a board of park
commissioners consisting of five members unless the board is composed as
permitted under RCW 35.61.050(3). The board shall annually elect one of
their number as president and another of their number as clerk of the board. The
composition of a board under this subsection that was created before January 1,
1999, and that is not governed under RCW 35.61.050(3) may not be altered once
the metropolitan park district has been created.

(2)
The composition of a board of metropolitan park district commissioners
established as permitted under RCW 35.61.050(3) may be altered to a separately
elected board of park commissioners once the metropolitan park district has
been created only by a majority vote of the voters in the district, and then
only if the potential for such an alteration was stated in the resolution or
petition to create the district.

Sec.
8. RCW
35.61.130 and 1969 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A metropolitan park district has the right of eminent domain, and may purchase,
acquire and condemn lands lying within or without the boundaries of ((said))
the park district, for public parks((, parkways, boulevards, aviation
landings and playgrounds,)) and recreation facilities. A metropolitan
park district may condemn such lands for any of the following purposes:
(a) To widen, alter, and extend streets((,)) and
avenues((, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds,));
(b) to alter, enlarge, and extend existing parks((,)) and
recreation facilities; and (c) to acquire lands for the
establishment of new parks((, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and
playgrounds)) and recreation facilities.

(2)
The right of eminent domain shall be exercised and instituted pursuant to
resolution of the board of metropolitan park commissioners and conducted
in the same manner and under the same procedure as is or may be provided by law
for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by ((incorporated))
cities ((and towns)) of the state of Washington in the acquisition of
property rights((: PROVIDED,)). However, funds to
pay for condemnation allowed by this section shall be raised only as specified
in this chapter.

(3)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners ((shall have power to))
may employ counsel((,)) and ((to)) regulate, manage,
and control the parks((, parkways, boulevards, streets, avenues, aviation
landings and playgrounds)) and recreation facilities under its
control((, and to)).

(4)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners may provide ((for park
policemen,)) for a secretary of the board of metropolitan park
commissioners, and for all necessary employees, ((to)) and
fix their salaries and duties. In a metropolitan park district governed
under RCW 35.61.050(3), the city's mayor shall serve ex officio as the chief
executive officer of the metropolitan park district unless otherwise provided
by the board of metropolitan park district commissioners.

(5)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners ((shall have power to))
may improve, acquire, extend and maintain, open, and lay out((,))
parks((, parkways, boulevards,)) and recreation facilities and
avenues, ((aviation landings and playgrounds,)) within or without the metropolitan
park district((, and to)).

(6)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners may authorize, conduct,
and manage the letting of boats, or other amusement apparatus, the operation of
bath houses, the purchase and sale of foodstuffs or other merchandise, the
giving of vocal or instrumental concerts or other entertainments, ((the
establishment and maintenance of aviation landings and playgrounds,)) and the
provision, establishment, operation, maintenance, and improvement of recreational
facilities all on property owned by itself or others.

(7)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners may provide generally for
the management and conduct of such forms of recreation or business as it shall
judge desirable or beneficial for the public, or for the production of revenue
for expenditure for parks and recreation purposes((; and)).

(8)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners may pay out moneys for:
(a) The maintenance and improvement of any such parks((, parkways,
boulevards,)) and recreation facilities and avenues((, aviation
landings and playgrounds)) as now exist, or the right to which may
hereafter be acquired, within or without the limits of ((said city and for))
the metropolitan park district; (b) the purchase of lands within or
without the limits of ((said city)) the metropolitan park district,
whenever it deems the purchase to be for the benefit of the public and for the
interest of the metropolitan park district, and for the maintenance and
improvement thereof; and ((for)) (c) all expenses
incidental to its duties((: PROVIDED, That)). However, all
parks((, boulevards, parkways, aviation landings and playgrounds)) and
recreation facilities shall be subject to the police regulations of the
city or county within whose limits they lie.

(9)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners may, if and to the extent provided
by section 15 of this act, contract with any entity, public or private,
including the city whose voters created the district, for all or any part of
its staffing, operations, and services.

Sec.
9. RCW
35.61.132 and 1989 c 319 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An ex officio board of metropolitan park district commissioners is authorized,
by unanimous board decision and with the approval of the legislative authority
of the city within which it is located, to convey any or all of its real or
personal property to that city.

(2)
Except as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, every metropolitan
park district may, by unanimous decision of its board of park commissioners,
sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property acquired
for park or recreational purposes when such property is declared surplus for
park or other recreational purposes: PROVIDED, That where the property is
acquired by donation or dedication for park or recreational purposes, the
consent of the donor or dedicator, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns is
first obtained if the consent of the donor is required in the instrument
conveying the property to the metropolitan park district. In the event the
donor or dedicator, his or her heirs, successors, or assigns cannot be located
after a reasonable search, the metropolitan park district may petition the
superior court in the county where the property is located for approval of the
sale. If sold, all sales shall be by public bids and sale made only to the
highest and best bidder.

(3)
In addition to the conditions contained in subsection (2) of this section, a
metropolitan park district with an ex officio board of park commissioners shall
not declare surplus its real property acquired for park or recreational purposes
without first having offered to donate that property to the city within which
it is located.

Sec.
10. RCW
35.61.150 and 1998 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, metropolitan park
commissioners shall perform their duties and may provide, by resolution passed
by the commissioners, for the payment of compensation to each of its
commissioners at a rate of up to seventy dollars for each day or portion of a
day devoted to the business of the district. However, the compensation for
each commissioner must not exceed six thousand seven hundred twenty dollars per
year. Any commissioner may waive all or any portion of his or her compensation
payable under this subsection as to any month or months during his or
her term of office, by a written waiver filed with the clerk of the board. The
waiver, to be effective, must be filed any time after the commissioner's
election and prior to the date on which the compensation would otherwise be
paid. The waiver shall specify the month or period of months for which it is
made.

(2)
Metropolitan park commissioners who serve in an ex officio capacity shall
perform their duties as park commissioners without additional compensation.

Sec.
11. RCW
35.61.180 and 1987 c 203 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
county treasurer of the county within which all, or the major portion, of the
district lies shall be the ex officio treasurer of a metropolitan park
district, but shall receive no compensation other than his or her regular
salary for receiving and disbursing the funds of a metropolitan park district.))
The treasurer of a metropolitan park district shall be as follows:

(1)
The treasurer of a metropolitan park district shall be the city treasurer of
the most densely populated city included in the district's boundaries. The
city treasurer, when acting as the treasurer of a metropolitan park district,
shall receive no compensation other than his or her regular salary for acting
as the treasurer of a metropolitan park district.

(2)
The treasurer of a metropolitan park district with an ex officio board of park
commissioners established under RCW 35.61.120(2) shall be the city treasurer.
The city treasurer shall possess and may exercise all powers relating to the
metropolitan park district that are possessed by the county treasurer, other
than the authority to collect property taxes. The city treasurer, when acting
as the treasurer of a metropolitan park district, shall receive no compensation
other than his or her regular salary for acting as the treasurer of the
metropolitan park district.

(3)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a
metropolitan park district may designate someone other than the ((county))
city treasurer who has experience in financial or fiscal affairs to act
as the district treasurer if the board has received the approval of the ((county))
city treasurer to designate this person. If the board of
metropolitan park commissioners designates someone other than the ((county))
city treasurer to act as the district treasurer, the board shall
purchase a bond from a surety company operating in the state that is sufficient
to protect the district from loss. A district treasurer so designated shall
possess all powers relating to the metropolitan park district that are
possessed by the city treasurer, other than the authority to collect property
taxes.

(4)
Notwithstanding RCW 35.61.210, general taxes of the metropolitan park district
shall be distributed to the treasurer of the metropolitan park district by the
county treasurer as is done for cities.

Sec.
12. RCW
35.61.200 and 1983 c 167 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
coupons for the payment of interest on metropolitan park district bonds shall
be considered for all purposes as warrants drawn upon the metropolitan park
district fund against which the bonds were issued, and when presented after
maturity to the treasurer of the ((county having custody of the fund)) metropolitan
park district. If there are no funds in the treasury to pay the coupons,
the ((county)) metropolitan park district treasurer shall endorse
((said)) the coupons as presented for payment, in the same manner
as county warrants are endorsed, and thereafter the coupon shall bear interest
at the same rate as the bond to which it was attached. If there are no funds
in the treasury to make payment on a bond not having coupons, the interest
payment shall continue bearing interest at the bond rate until it is paid,
unless otherwise provided in the proceedings authorizing the sale of the bonds.

Sec.
13. RCW
35.61.250 and 1985 c 416 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The territory adjoining a metropolitan park district with a separately
elected board of park commissioners may be annexed to and become a part ((thereof
upon)) of the metropolitan park district under a petition and ((an))
election ((held pursuant thereto)) method of annexation. The
petition shall define the territory proposed to be annexed and must be signed
by twenty-five registered voters, resident within the territory proposed to be
annexed, unless the territory is within the limits of another city when it must
be signed by twenty percent of the registered voters residing within the
territory proposed to be annexed. The petition must be addressed to the board
of park commissioners requesting that the question be submitted to the legal
voters of the territory proposed to be annexed, whether they will be annexed
and become a part of the metropolitan park district. If the board of
park commissioners accepts the proposed annexation, a ballot proposition
authorizing the annexation shall be submitted to voters residing in the
territory at a special election date specified under RCW 29.13.020.

(2)
A metropolitan park district with an ex officio board of park commissioners as
provided under RCW 35.61.050(3) may not annex territory under the provisions of
RCW 35.61.250 through 35.61.280 and shall maintain boundaries identical with
those of the city in which it is located, including any territory annexed by
the city.

Sec.
14. RCW
35.61.290 and 1985 c 416 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as set forth in (b) of this subsection, any city within or
comprising any metropolitan park district may turn over to the park district
any lands, facilities, equipment, or interests in any lands, facilities, or
equipment which it may own, or any street, avenue, or public place within
the city for ((playground,)) parks ((or parkway)) and
recreation purposes, and thereafter its control and management shall vest
in the board of metropolitan park commissioners((: PROVIDED, That)).
However, the police regulations of ((such)) the city, or
the county should the premises be outside the city limits, shall apply to
all such premises.

(b)
A metropolitan park district created with an ex officio board of park
commissioners shall never become the owner of a park that, at the time of
creation of the district, was owned by the city in which the metropolitan park
district was created. Additionally, the legislative authority of a city in
which a metropolitan park district with an ex officio board of park
commissioners is created may contract with that district for overall management
and operation of any city parks and recreation facilities or lease any city
parks and recreation facilities to that district only after the city
legislative authority holds a public hearing on the proposed lease or proposed
management and operation by the metropolitan park district. At least ten days
prior to the hearing, there shall be published a public notice setting forth
the date, time, and place of the hearing, at least once in a local newspaper of
general circulation. Notice of the hearing shall also be mailed or otherwise
delivered to all who would be entitled to notice of a special meeting of the
city legislative authority under RCW 42.30.080. The notice shall identify the
parks and recreation facilities involved. The terms and conditions under which
the city proposes to lease to the metropolitan park district or contract with
the metropolitan park district for management and operation shall be available
upon request from and after the date of publication of the hearing notice and
at the hearing, but after the public hearing the city legislative authority may
amend the proposed terms and conditions at open public meetings.

(2)
At any time that any such metropolitan park district is unable, through lack of
sufficient funds, to provide for the continuous operation, maintenance,
and improvement of the parks and ((playgrounds)) recreation
facilities and other properties or facilities owned by it or under its
control, and the legislative body of any city within or comprising such
metropolitan park district shall determine that an emergency exists requiring
the financial aid of such city to be extended in order to provide for such
continuous operation, maintenance, and/or improvement of parks((,
playgrounds)) and recreation facilities, other properties, and
programs of such park district within its limits, ((such)) the
city may grant or loan to ((such)) the metropolitan park district
such of its available funds, or such funds which it may lawfully procure and
make available, as it shall find necessary to provide for such continuous
operation and maintenance and, pursuant thereto, any ((such)) city and
the board of park commissioners of ((such)) the metropolitan park
district are authorized and empowered to enter into an agreement embodying such
terms and conditions of any such grant or loan as may be mutually agreed upon.

(3)
The board of metropolitan park commissioners may accept public streets of the
city and grounds for public purposes when donated for parks((,
playground, boulevard)) and recreation purposes and park purposes.

(((2)))
(4) Counties may turn over to ((the)) a metropolitan park
district any park and recreation lands and parks and recreation facilities
and equipment or interests in any lands, facilities, or equipment that
they own, and the board of metropolitan park commissioners may accept such
lands and equipment or interests in any lands, facilities, or equipment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. A
new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A metropolitan park district governed under RCW 35.61.050(3) may contract with
a nonprofit corporation or other public or private organization, including the
city whose voters created the district, to manage or carry out any of its
operations. No such contract for the overall management and operation of any
park and recreation facility shall have an initial term or any renewal term
longer than thirty years but may be renewed by the ex officio board of park
commissioners upon the expiration of an initial or any renewal term. A
metropolitan park district governed under RCW 35.61.050(3) may, however, grant
and may authorize the managing and operating entity to grant to any nonprofit
corporation or other public or private organization franchises or concessions
that further the public use and enjoyment of parks and recreation facilities.

(2)
Before approving each initial and any renewal contract with a nonprofit
corporation for the overall management and operation of any parks and
recreation facilities, the ex officio board of metropolitan park commissioners
shall hold a public hearing on the proposed management and operation by such a
nonprofit corporation. At least ten days prior to the hearing, there shall be
published a public notice setting forth the date, time, and place of the
hearing, at least once in a local newspaper of general circulation. Notice of
the hearing shall also be mailed or otherwise delivered to all who would be
entitled to notice of a special meeting of the board under RCW 42.30.080. The
notice shall identify the parks and recreation facilities involved and the
nonprofit corporation proposed for management and operation under contract with
the metropolitan park district. The terms and conditions under which the
metropolitan park district proposes to contract with the nonprofit corporation
for management and operation shall be available upon request from and after the
date of publication of the hearing notice and at the hearing, but after the
public hearing the board of metropolitan park commissioners may amend the
proposed terms and conditions at open public meetings.

(3)
A metropolitan park district governed under RCW 35.61.050(3) shall contract
with the city whose voters created the district to carry out all of the
metropolitan park district's management and operations except for the
management and operation of parks and recreation facilities for which the
metropolitan park district has a contract with another public agency or a
nonprofit corporation under subsection (1) or (2) of this section. The
contract with the city may provide for its termination if the metropolitan park
district commissioners approve a contract with another entity under subsection
(1) or (2) of this section.

(4)
The nonprofit corporation or other public organization with responsibility for
overall management or operation of any parks and recreation facilities may in
carrying out that responsibility manage and supervise employees of the
metropolitan park district governed under RCW 35.61.050(3) and may hire, fire,
and otherwise discipline those employees. A civil service established under
RCW 35.61.140 may include such management and supervision by persons not
employed by the metropolitan park district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. A
new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in a city charter, and
to the extent provided by the city under an appropriate legislative enactment,
some or all employees of a metropolitan park district with an ex officio board
of park commissioners may be included in the retirement plan of a city that
shares territory with the metropolitan park district if they were previously
employed by the city and were members of its retirement plan. The city and
metropolitan park district are each authorized to pay the parts of the expense
of operating and maintaining the retirement system and to contribute to the
retirement fund on behalf of employees those sums as may be agreed upon between
the legislative authorities of the city and the metropolitan park district, but
a proportionate share of system expenses must be borne by or on behalf of the
metropolitan park district employees.

(2)
In a metropolitan park district with an ex officio board of park commissioners,
neither the chief executive officer nor officers chiefly responsible for
operating a facility or program, as designated by the board of metropolitan
park commissioners, shall be members of the civil service that may be
established under RCW 35.61.140.

Sec.
17. RCW
84.09.030 and 1996 c 230 s 1613 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as follows, the boundaries of counties, cities and all other taxing districts,
for purposes of property taxation and the levy of property taxes, shall be the
established official boundaries of such districts existing on the first day of
March of the year in which the property tax levy is made.

The
official boundaries of a newly incorporated taxing district shall be
established at a different date in the year in which the incorporation occurred
as follows:

(1)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated city shall be established on the last day
of March of the year in which the initial property tax levy is made, and the
boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire protection district or
districts, that include any portion of the area that was incorporated within
its boundaries shall be altered as of this date to exclude this area, if the
budget for the newly incorporated city is filed pursuant to RCW 84.52.020 and
the levy request of the newly incorporated city is made pursuant to RCW
84.52.070. Whenever a proposed city incorporation is on the March special
election ballot, the county auditor shall submit the legal description of the
proposed city to the department of revenue on or before the first day of March;

(2)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated port district shall be established on the
first day of October if the boundaries of the newly incorporated port district
are coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district, as they existed
on the first day of March of that year;

(3)
Boundaries of any other newly incorporated taxing district shall be established
on the first day of June of the year in which the property tax levy is made if
the taxing district has boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of another
taxing district, as they existed on the first day of March of that year;

(4)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated water-sewer district shall be established
on the fifteenth of June of the year in which the proposition under RCW
57.04.050 authorizing a water district excess levy is approved;

(5)
Boundaries of a newly incorporated metropolitan park district, except districts
governed under RCW 35.61.050(3), shall be established on the first day of June
of the year in which the proposition under RCW 35.61.030 authorizing creation
of the park district is approved. The boundaries of a park and recreation
district or park and recreation service area from which territory has been
removed under section 20 of this act, as the result of the creation of a new
metropolitan park district, shall be established on the first day of June of
the year in which the ballot proposition authorizing the metropolitan park
district is approved.

The
boundaries of a taxing district shall be established on the first day of June
if territory has been added to, or removed from, the taxing district after the
first day of March of that year with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries
of another taxing district as they existed on the first day of March of that
year. However, the boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire
protection district or districts, that include any portion of the area that was
annexed to a city or town within its boundaries shall be altered as of this date
to exclude this area. In any case where any instrument setting forth the
official boundaries of any newly established taxing district, or setting forth
any change in such boundaries, is required by law to be filed in the office of
the county auditor or other county official, said instrument shall be filed in
triplicate. The officer with whom such instrument is filed shall transmit two
copies to the county assessor.

No
property tax levy shall be made for any taxing district whose boundaries are
not established as of the dates provided in this section.

Sec.
18. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in specific
amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate
of regular property tax levies subject to the one percent limitation in a
county containing a metropolitan park district governed under RCW 35.61.050(3)
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
remaining levy for that metropolitan park district shall be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent or shall be eliminated; (c) if
the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one
percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any
portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and (((c))) (d)
if the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one
percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax
levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created
before January 1, 1999, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts created
before January 1, 1999, under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars
of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first
fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on
a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, but without eliminating or overriding the
requirements for unanimous board action and consent contained in RCW 35.61.132
for the disposition of property, the voters of a metropolitan park district
governed under RCW 35.61.050(3) shall have the power, within the scope of the
functions of such a metropolitan park district, to initiate and refer to themselves
legislation to the same extent and on the same matters as do the voters of the
city with which the metropolitan park district shares its boundaries. These
powers of initiative and referendum shall be exercised in the same manner and
with the same effect as permitted for the voters of that city.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. A
new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

Except for any metropolitan park district governed under RCW
35.61.050(3), any area included within a park and recreation district or a park
and recreation service area that is also included within a newly created
metropolitan park district or is annexed by a metropolitan park district shall
be removed from the park and recreation district or the park and recreation
service area immediately upon the effective date of the creation of the new
metropolitan park district or the annexation by the metropolitan park district.

---
END ---