BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who uses a shoreline location for the production of a motion picture is
exempt from the substantial development permit requirement of this chapter when
all of the following apply:

(1)
The local government determines the production will be consistent with the
local shoreline master program and all applicable land use plans and
development regulations;

(2)
The person seeking the exemption completes a state environmental policy act
checklist and provides it to the appropriate local government and the
appropriate local government determines the production will have no significant
adverse impact on the environment, including but not limited to:

(a)
Fish or wildlife;

(b)
Fish or wildlife habitat;

(c)
Water quality;

(d)
Aesthetic values;

(3)
The person seeking the exemption notifies all property owners within three hundred
feet of the proposed site of his or her intention to use the site;

(4)
The use of the shoreline location for motion picture production will terminate
within a period of one year or less;

(5)
The production does not interfere with the normal commercial and navigational
use of surface waters of the state although some interference with normal
recreational use of surface waters and shorelines of the state may occur;

(6)
An environmental assessment of the existing conditions of the shorelines of the
state to be used for the motion picture, and a mitigation and restoration plan
for same, are provided to the local government before the start of the motion
picture project. The mitigation and restoration plan must be consistent with
the local shoreline master program and all applicable land use plans and
development regulations. The mitigation and restoration plan must be approved
by the local government before the motion picture project may begin within
shorelines of the state. The mitigation and restoration plan shall be
implemented immediately after the completion of the production as provided
under this section; and

(7) A performance bond is provided to the local government before
the start of a motion picture project to ensure the mitigation and restoration
plan is satisfactorily completed.

---
END ---