BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There is established in the department a grant program to support business
recruitment efforts. The purpose of the program is to assist local associate
development organizations in business recruitment efforts by providing grants
to assist in marketing the area to businesses on a national and international
basis.

(2)
Applications for funding under this section must:

(a)
Be submitted by either a local associate development organization or a
consortium of associate development organizations;

(b)
Contain evidence of active participation in the development of the business
recruitment effort between local governments, the community, and other local
development organizations that serve the region;

(c)
Contain a description of the proposed project and how it will assist the region
in its business recruitment efforts; and

(d)
Contain other information the director deems necessary.

(3)
In making grants under this section, the department shall give preference to
applications based on the following criteria:

(a)
The degree of leverage of other funds, including in-kind match, committed to
the project;

(b)
The degree of community support for the proposed project; and

(c)
The degree the proposed project is coordinated with existing state or local
business recruitment efforts.

(4)
The funding of an activity under this section is not an obligation of the state
of Washington to provide ongoing funding in future years.

(5)
The director may establish, by rule, such other requirements as the director
may reasonably determine necessary and appropriate to assure that the purpose
of this section is satisfied.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund
to the department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---