BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1998
c 92 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes the need to involve the boarding home industry, the
consumers of assisted living and retirement services, the long-term care
ombudsman, and state regulatory agencies in the collaborative process of
developing standards and procedures for accreditation of licensed boarding
homes. As participants, consumers can help develop standards that more closely
address their needs and make the accreditation of boarding home providers more
meaningful to them when choosing among competitors. Providers can maintain
flexibility in the marketplace and more quickly recognize and respond to the
changing needs of its client base. Regulatory agencies can save money and
remain assured that performance standards are high. For these reasons, the
legislature finds that it is in the best interests of the boarding home
industry, boarding home consumers, and state regulatory agencies to support an
industry-funded pilot program prior to changing or developing new standards for
boarding home regulation.

(2) A coalition of assisted living providers represented by
state-wide assisted living professional trade associations, the long-term care
ombudsman, state regulatory agencies, and consumer groups representing, but not
limited to, the assisted living clientele such as the senior lobby, the
American association of retired persons, and the alzheimer's association shall
develop a plan for implementing a pilot program for the third-party
accreditation of boarding homes licensed under RCW 18.20.020. The assisted
living third-party accreditation pilot project coalition shall remain active
until December 12, 2001. The pilot plan must be funded by the northwest
assisted living ((federation of America)) facilities association.
Funds for conducting this plan may also be received from other individuals
and organizations in accordance with state law and upon the approval of the
northwest assisted living facilities association. The plan shall review
the overall feasibility of implementation, cost or savings to the regulating
agency, impact on client health, safety, quality of care, quality of life, and
financial and other impacts to the boarding home industry. ((The)) Pilot
third-party boarding home accreditation ((plan)) progress reports
shall be presented to the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate by January 4, 1999 and by January 4, 2000.
The final pilot third-party boarding home accreditation plan shall be
submitted to the appropriate committees of the house of representatives and the
senate no later than December 12, 2001.

---
END ---