BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of labor and services
rendered in respect to:

(a)
The moving of houses out of any landslide area that has been declared as a
federal disaster area;

(b)
The demolition of houses located in a landslide area that has been declared as
a federal disaster area; or

(c)
The removal of debris from a landslide area that has been declared as a federal
disaster area.

(2)
This section expires July 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies retroactively to March 1, 1998.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---