BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
10.14.150 and 1991 c 33 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The district courts shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of any civil actions
and proceedings brought under this chapter, except the district court shall
transfer such actions and proceedings to the superior court when it is shown
that the respondent to the petition is under eighteen years of age.

(2) Superior courts shall have concurrent jurisdiction to
receive transfer of antiharassment petitions in cases where a district court
judge makes findings of fact and conclusions of law showing that meritorious
reasons ((exit [exist])) exist for the transfer. The municipal
and district courts shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of any criminal
actions brought under RCW 10.14.120 and 10.14.170.

---
END ---