BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.50.330 and 1984 c 258 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

For
a period not to exceed five years after imposition of sentence for a
defendant sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of
sentence for all other offenses, the court shall have continuing
jurisdiction and authority to suspend the execution of all or any part of the
sentence upon stated terms, including installment payment of fines. However,
the jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the enforcement of
orders issued under RCW 46.20.720.

Sec.
2. RCW
3.66.068 and 1983 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For
a period not to exceed five years after imposition of sentence for a
defendant sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years after imposition of
sentence for all other offenses, the court has continuing jurisdiction
and authority to suspend the execution of all or any part of its sentence upon
stated terms, including installment payment of fines. However, the
jurisdiction period in this section does not apply to the enforcement of orders
issued under RCW 46.20.720.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.20.255 and 1983 c 156 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Judges of the municipal court, in their discretion, shall have the
power in all criminal proceedings within their jurisdiction including
violations of city ordinances, to defer imposition of any sentence, suspend all
or part of any sentence, fix the terms of any such deferral or suspension, and
provide for such probation and parole as in their opinion is reasonable and
necessary under the circumstances of the case, but in no case shall it extend
for more than five years from the date of conviction for a defendant to be
sentenced under RCW 46.61.5055 and two years from the date of conviction for
all other offenses. However, the jurisdiction period in this section
does not apply to the enforcement of orders issued under RCW 46.20.720.

---
END ---