BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.10.812 and 1993 c 431 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right
of way, and construction of state highway improvements that are identified as
special category C improvements, there shall be issued and sold upon the
request of the Washington state transportation commission a total of ((two))
three hundred ((forty)) thirty million dollars of general
obligation bonds of the state of Washington.

---
END ---