BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that state agencies that provide environmental
protection, restoration, enhancement, and mitigation by financing, or
undertaking land acquisition, facility construction, or other activities be
better coordinated with each other. Such coordination offers opportunities to
jointly plan, finance, construct, permit, and operate facilities, to better
address the needs of the environment on a local and regional basis, and to
better address state-wide priorities to achieve the most beneficial and
cost-effective results. The intent of the legislature is not to reduce or
eliminate any environmental mitigation obligation of a government agency, but
instead to more effectively meet that obligation through better coordination
and identification of projects with highest environmental benefit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Advisory committee" means a committee advisory to the office
consisting of representatives from the departments of community, trade, and
economic development; ecology; fish and wildlife; natural resources; the parks
and recreation commission; the interagency committee for outdoor recreation;
the conservation commission; and the office of financial management. Other
members may be added by majority vote of the committee. The governor, or the
governor's designee, shall serve as chair of the advisory committee.

(2)
"Environmental project" means land acquisition, facility
construction, or other activity providing environmental protection,
restoration, enhancement, or compensatory mitigation undertaken by state
agencies or funded by state financial assistance programs. It does not mean
the sale, transfer, exchange, or acquisition of trust lands managed by state
agencies or regulatory environmental protection activities.

(3)
"Office" means the environmental affairs office of the department of
transportation.

(4)
"Surplus real property" means any real property that is not needed by
an agency now or in the foreseeable future.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The office shall provide a central depository for information collected under
this chapter. This depository shall collect and disseminate pertinent
information on environmental projects through electronic based systems that may
include geographic information systems and internet functionality.

(2)
By December 31, 1999, the governor's office shall provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on the progress of the coordination
program and the advisory committee.

(3)
By October 31, 2000, the governor's office shall report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature its findings and recommendations on coordination
of environmental projects. The report shall include a description of the
methods used to: Collect information on environmental projects, determine
coordination opportunities, examine programs, and determine benefits and costs
of recommended actions.

(4)
Beginning with fiscal year 2001, and each fiscal year thereafter, state
agencies that receive an appropriation in the capital budget or the
transportation budget for an environmental project shall provide project
information, including geographic location and general descriptive information,
to the office no later than sixty days after the end of the fiscal year.

(5)
Beginning with fiscal year 2003, and each fiscal year thereafter, state
agencies that receive an appropriation in the omnibus appropriations act for an
environmental project shall provide project information, including geographic
location and general descriptive information, to the office no later than sixty
days after the end of the fiscal year.

(6)
Beginning with fiscal year 2005, and each fiscal year thereafter, all state
agencies that have surplus real property available for sale, trade, lease, or
reuse by other government entities shall provide information on those
properties, including geographic location and general descriptive information,
to the office no later than sixty days after the end of the fiscal year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
advisory committee is established to advise and assist the office in:

(1)
Developing methods and data base systems that facilitate the collection and
coordination of environmental project information.

(2)
Examining state financial assistance programs that provide funding for
environmental protection, enhancement, restoration, and mitigation. The
advisory committee shall identify opportunities for improved coordination that
would make it easier and more efficient for agencies and organizations seeking
funding to: Locate the programs, apply for funding, seek and receive technical
assistance, provide required financial reports, provide compliance and
environmental monitoring information, and provide project related information
such as site location.

(3)
Investigating opportunities for improved coordination of financial assistance
programs for environmental projects while complying with the statutory purpose
and policy objective of these programs. Areas for possible improved
coordination may include: Program information dissemination; application
deadlines; state‑wide, regional, and local priorities for environmental
protection, enhancement, restoration, and mitigation; application forms and
required application information; technical assistance; environmental reporting
and monitoring; and project related data.

(4)
Making recommendations on the role that other state agencies, federal, tribal,
and local governments, nongovernmental organizations, and the general public
can play in providing information that would result in increased coordination
of environmental protection, restoration, enhancement, and mitigation
activities. The advisory committee shall solicit comments from agencies and
organizations that are eligible for state financial assistance programs and
solicit comments from federal, tribal, and local organizations that provide
financial assistance for environmental projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted in any manner by a state, federal,
or local governmental agency to require any additional permitting review or
approval process or compliance procedure from any nongovernmental entity or
individual person.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the state transportation
budget or the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---