BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.24.420 and 1987 c 212 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

It is a complete defense to any action for damages for personal
injury or wrongful death that the person injured or killed was engaged in the
commission of a felony, a gross misdemeanor, or a misdemeanor at the
time of the occurrence causing the injury or death and the felony, the gross
misdemeanor, or the misdemeanor was a proximate cause of the injury or
death. However, nothing in this section shall affect a right of action under 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1983, nor shall anything in this section affect a right of
action under the common law doctrine of attractive nuisance when the only
offense committed or intended to be committed is trespass.

---
END ---