BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 10.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, in a criminal
trial in a court of record with a twelve-member jury, the votes of eleven or
more jurors are sufficient to convict or acquit.

(2)
The conviction or acquittal of a defendant charged with aggravated first degree
murder as defined under chapter 10.95 RCW must be by a unanimous vote of the
jury.

(3) The imposition of the death penalty pursuant to a special
sentencing proceeding under chapter 10.95 RCW must be by a unanimous vote of
the jury.

---
END ---