BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is clear the First Amendment protects political speech, giving it greater
protection over other forms of speech. The constitutional protections afforded
political speech apply fully, urgently, and precisely to the conduct of
campaigns for political office and ballot issues.

(2)
Traditional public forums include places that by long tradition or by
government decree, have been devoted to assembly and debate, such as parks, streets,
and sidewalks, including parking strips. Because these places occupy a special
position in terms of First Amendment protection, the government's ability to
restrict expressive activity in them is very limited.

(3)
Restrictions on political signs for any purpose, including time, place, and
manner restrictions, may be imposed only upon a showing by government that the
restriction is necessary and narrowly drawn to accomplish a compelling state
interest.

(4)
Because of the eminent status provided the fundamental right of political
speech in our representative democracy and its essential relation to an
informed and free electorate, the people of this state, and not government,
should properly determine for themselves whether the duration, size, and placement
of political signs offends or attracts voters or fellow citizens as reflected
in their vote or in the social sanctions they may or may not choose to impose
on their neighbors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Neither
the state nor any county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision may impose
durational limitations on the posting of political signs:

(1)
In a public forum other than that allowed under this section;

(2)
In a public forum on behalf of a person from the time the person becomes a
candidate, as defined in RCW 42.17.020(8), and the results of the election are
certified by the appropriate election officer of the constituency voting for or
against the candidate;

(3)
In a public forum on behalf of a ballot issue from the time the issue becomes a
ballot proposition, as defined in RCW 42.17.020(3), and the results of the
election are certified by the appropriate election officer of the constituency
voting for or against the ballot proposition;

(4)
On private property on behalf of a candidate or a ballot issue or any other
lobbying, electoral, or other political or ideological activity, speech, or
advocacy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Neither the state nor any county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision
may impose placement or size limitations on the posting of political signs in a
public forum or on private property other than that allowed under this section.

(2)
The state, any county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision may impose
placement or size limitations on the posting of political signs in a public
forum or on private property only if the limitation is necessary and narrowly
drawn to protect and preserve the public safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Neither
the state nor any county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision may impose
or require a fee, charge, bond, or other monetary liability on or from a person
in order for the person to be able to freely exercise the person's fundamental
right of political speech through the use of political signs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A
wide and diverse range of local and cross-jurisdictional time, place, and
manner restrictions placed on political signs impose unnecessary, unreasonable,
and impermissible burdens on political speech.

The
state hereby preempts the field of regulating the time, place, and manner of
political speech and no county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision may
impose such regulations upon such speech.

The preemption authorized by this act does not impair the ability
of a county, city, town, or other municipal subdivision to impose time, place,
and manner limitations upon political speech otherwise in accordance with this
act.

---
END ---