BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.43.540 and 1998 c 220 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county sheriff shall forward the information, photographs, and fingerprints
obtained pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, including any notice of change of address,
to the Washington state patrol within five working days. The state patrol
shall maintain a central registry of sex offenders and kidnapping offenders
required to register under RCW 9A.44.130 and shall adopt rules consistent with
chapters 10.97, 10.98, and 43.43 RCW as are necessary to carry out the purposes
of RCW 9A.44.130, 9A.44.140, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 46.20.187, 70.48.470, and
72.09.330.

(2)
With regard to sex offenders, the Washington state patrol shall maintain an
internet site containing the following information from the central registry:
Name, current address, crime for which convicted, and date and place of
conviction. The state patrol shall make this information available to the
public in paper form upon request.

(3)
The Washington state patrol shall reimburse the counties for the costs of
processing the offender registration, including taking the fingerprints and the
photographs.

Sec.
2. RCW
10.97.050 and 1990 c 3 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Conviction records may be disseminated without restriction.

(2)
Any criminal history record information which pertains to an incident for which
a person is currently being processed by the criminal justice system, including
the entire period of correctional supervision extending through final discharge
from parole, when applicable, may be disseminated without restriction.

(3)
Criminal history record information which includes nonconviction data may be
disseminated by a criminal justice agency to another criminal justice agency
for any purpose associated with the administration of criminal justice, or in
connection with the employment of the subject of the record by a criminal justice
or juvenile justice agency. A criminal justice agency may respond to any
inquiry from another criminal justice agency without any obligation to
ascertain the purpose for which the information is to be used by the agency
making the inquiry.

(4)
Criminal history record information which includes nonconviction data may be
disseminated by a criminal justice agency to implement a statute, ordinance,
executive order, or a court rule, decision, or order which expressly refers to
records of arrest, charges, or allegations of criminal conduct or other
nonconviction data and authorizes or directs that it be available or accessible
for a specific purpose.

(5)
Criminal history record information which includes nonconviction data may be
disseminated to individuals and agencies pursuant to a contract with a criminal
justice agency to provide services related to the administration of criminal
justice. Such contract must specifically authorize access to criminal history
record information, but need not specifically state that access to
nonconviction data is included. The agreement must limit the use of the
criminal history record information to stated purposes and insure the
confidentiality and security of the information consistent with state law and
any applicable federal statutes and regulations.

(6)
Criminal history record information which includes nonconviction data may be
disseminated to individuals and agencies for the express purpose of research,
evaluative, or statistical activities pursuant to an agreement with a criminal
justice agency. Such agreement must authorize the access to nonconviction
data, limit the use of that information which identifies specific individuals
to research, evaluative, or statistical purposes, and contain provisions giving
notice to the person or organization to which the records are disseminated that
the use of information obtained therefrom and further dissemination of such
information are subject to the provisions of this chapter and applicable
federal statutes and regulations, which shall be cited with express reference
to the penalties provided for a violation thereof.

(7)
Every criminal justice agency that maintains and disseminates criminal history
record information must maintain information pertaining to every dissemination
of criminal history record information except a dissemination to the effect
that the agency has no record concerning an individual. Information pertaining
to disseminations shall include:

(a)
An indication of to whom (agency or person) criminal history record information
was disseminated;

(b)
The date on which the information was disseminated;

(c)
The individual to whom the information relates; and

(d)
A brief description of the information disseminated.

The
information pertaining to dissemination required to be maintained shall be
retained for a period of not less than one year.

(8) In addition to the other provisions in this section allowing
dissemination of criminal history record information, RCW 4.24.550 and
43.43.540 govern((s)) dissemination of information concerning
offenders who commit sex offenses as defined by RCW 9.94A.030. Criminal
justice agencies, their employees, and officials shall be immune from civil
liability for dissemination on criminal history record information concerning
sex offenders as provided in RCW 4.24.550 and 43.43.540.

---
END ---