BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There is established in the department a grant program to support the
development of local international marketing efforts. The program shall assist
businesses located in distressed areas to market their products and services on
an international basis by providing grants to local economic development
councils to assist in developing international marketing efforts.

(2)
Applications for funding under this section must:

(a)
Be submitted by a local economic development council;

(b)
Contain evidence of active participation in the development of the application
between local governments, the business community, and other local economic
development organizations in the area;

(c)
Contain a description of the proposed project and how it will assist the
selected businesses in the distressed area market their products and services
on an international basis; and

(d)
Contain other information the director deems necessary.

(3)
In making awards under this section, the department shall:

(a)
Not provide more than twenty-five percent of the funds appropriated for the
purposes of this section to any one county;

(b)
Consider the degree of other funds, including in-kind match, committed to the
project;

(c)
Consider the degree of community and business support for the proposed project;
and

(d)
Consider the degree the proposed project is coordinated with existing state and
local economic development efforts in the county.

(4)
The department is responsible for determining the scope of services delivered
under these contracts.

(5)
Activities funded under this section may be considered for funding in future
years, but shall be considered under the terms and conditions as new
activities. Funding of an activity under this section shall not constitute an
obligation by the state of Washington to provide ongoing funding.

(6)
The director may establish, by rule, such other requirements as the director
may reasonably determine necessary and appropriate to assure that the purpose
of this section is satisfied.

(7)
As used in this section, "distressed area" has the same meaning as in
RCW 43.165.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund
to the department of community, trade, and economic development for the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---