BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.02.120 and 1991 c 335 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A health care provider who provides health care at a health care facility that
the provider operates and who maintains a record of a patient's health care
information shall create a "notice of information practices" that
contains substantially the following:

NOTICE

"We keep a record of the health care services we
provide you. You may ask us to see and copy that record. You may also ask us
to correct that record. We will not disclose your record to others unless you
direct us to do so or unless the law authorizes or compels us to do so. You
may see your record or get more information about it at
. . . . . ."

(2)
The health care provider shall place a copy of the notice of information
practices in a conspicuous place in the health care facility, on a consent form
or with a billing or other notice provided to the patient.

(3) Upon retirement or relocation of practice at another health
care facility, a health care provider shall notify in writing at the last known
address every patient for whom a personal record of health care information is
maintained by the provider for the purposes of this section.

---
END ---