BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to provide matching funds to the law enforcement
officers' memorial fund for a memorial as part of the heritage park overlook
project. This appropriation is intended for overlook project purposes such as
stabilizing the eroding slope while providing trail access to the park. This
appropriation is not intended for general project costs such as building
retainer walls.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the capitol
building construction account to the department of general administration as
matching funds for the contribution from the Washington state law enforcement
officers' memorial fund.

---
END ---