BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.70.280 and 1998 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary, in consultation with health profession boards and commissions,
shall establish by rule the administrative procedures, administrative requirements,
and fees for initial issue, renewal, and reissue of a credential for
professions under RCW 18.130.040, including procedures and requirements for
late renewals and uniform application of late renewal penalties. Failure to
renew invalidates the credential and all privileges granted by the credential.
Administrative procedures and administrative requirements do not include
establishing, monitoring, and enforcing qualifications for licensure, scope or
standards of practice, continuing competency mechanisms, and discipline when
such authority is authorized in statute to a health profession board or
commission. For the purposes of this section, "in consultation with"
means providing an opportunity for meaningful participation in development of
rules consistent with processes set forth in RCW 34.05.310.

(2)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary which provides for a
licensing period for any type of license subject to this chapter including
those under RCW 18.130.040, the secretary of health may, from time to time,
extend or otherwise modify the duration of any licensing, certification, or
registration period, whether an initial or renewal period, if the secretary
determines that it would result in a more economical or efficient operation of
state government and that the public health, safety, or welfare would not be
substantially adversely affected thereby. However, no license, certification,
or registration may be issued or approved for a period in excess of four years,
without renewal. Such extension, reduction, or other modification of a
licensing, certification, or registration period shall be by rule or regulation
of the department of health adopted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW. Such rules and regulations may provide a method for
imposing and collecting such additional proportional fee as may be required for
the extended or modified period.

(((3) Unless extended by the legislature, effective March 1,
1999, the authority of the secretary to establish administrative procedures and
administrative requirements for initial issue, renewal, and reissue of a
credential, including procedures and requirements for late renewals and uniform
application of late renewal penalties, shall cease to apply to those health professions
otherwise regulated by a board or commission with statutory rule-making
authority. If not extended by the legislature, such authority shall transfer
to the respective board or commission. Rules adopted by the secretary under
this section shall remain in effect after March 1, 1999, until modified or
repealed in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.))

---
END ---