BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.41.150 and 1985 c 213 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Information received by the department through filed reports, inspection, or as
otherwise authorized under this chapter, ((shall not)) may be
disclosed publicly ((in such manner as to identify individuals or hospitals,
except in a proceeding involving the question of licensure. Such records of
the department shall at all times be available to the council and the members
thereof)), as set forth under chapter 42.17 RCW, except:

(a)
Licensing inspections, or complaint investigations, may be disclosed no sooner
than three business days after the hospital has received the resulting
assessment report; and

(b)
Information regarding administrative action against the license may be
disclosed after the hospital has received the documents initiating the
administrative action.

(2)
The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.41.200 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 742 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every hospital shall maintain a coordinated quality improvement program for the
improvement of the quality of health care services rendered to patients and the
identification and prevention of medical malpractice. The program shall
include at least the following:

(a)
The establishment of a quality improvement committee with the responsibility to
review the services rendered in the hospital, both retrospectively and
prospectively, in order to improve the quality of medical care of patients and
to prevent medical malpractice. The committee shall oversee and coordinate the
quality improvement and medical malpractice prevention program and shall ((insure))
ensure that information gathered pursuant to the program is used to
review and to revise hospital policies and procedures;

(b)
A medical staff privileges sanction procedure through which credentials,
physical and mental capacity, and competence in delivering health care services
are periodically reviewed as part of an evaluation of staff privileges;

(c)
The periodic review of the credentials, physical and mental capacity, and
competence in delivering health care services of all persons who are employed
or associated with the hospital;

(d)
A procedure for the prompt resolution of grievances by patients or their
representatives related to accidents, injuries, treatment, and other events
that may result in claims of medical malpractice;

(e)
The maintenance and continuous collection of information concerning the
hospital's experience with negative health care outcomes and incidents
injurious to patients, patient grievances, professional liability premiums,
settlements, awards, costs incurred by the hospital for patient injury
prevention, and safety improvement activities;

(f)
The maintenance of relevant and appropriate information gathered pursuant to
(a) through (e) of this subsection concerning individual physicians within the
physician's personnel or credential file maintained by the hospital;

(g)
Education programs dealing with quality improvement, patient safety, injury
prevention, staff responsibility to report professional misconduct, the legal
aspects of patient care, improved communication with patients, and causes of
malpractice claims for staff personnel engaged in patient care activities; and

(h)
Policies to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements of this section.

(2)
Any person who, in substantial good faith, provides information to further the
purposes of the quality improvement and medical malpractice prevention program
or who, in substantial good faith, participates on the quality improvement
committee shall not be subject to an action for civil damages or other relief
as a result of such activity.

(3)
Information and documents, including complaints and incident reports, created
specifically for, and collected, and maintained by a quality improvement committee
are not subject to discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil action,
and no person who was in attendance at a meeting of such committee or who
participated in the creation, collection, or maintenance of information or
documents specifically for the committee shall be permitted or required to
testify in any civil action as to the content of such proceedings or the
documents and information prepared specifically for the committee. This
subsection does not preclude: (a) In any civil action, the discovery of the
identity of persons involved in the medical care that is the basis of the civil
action whose involvement was independent of any quality improvement activity;
(b) in any civil action, the testimony of any person concerning the facts which
form the basis for the institution of such proceedings of which the person had
personal knowledge acquired independently of such proceedings; (c) in any civil
action by a health care provider regarding the restriction or revocation of
that individual's clinical or staff privileges, introduction into evidence
information collected and maintained by quality improvement committees
regarding such health care provider; (d) in any civil action, disclosure of the
fact that staff privileges were terminated or restricted, including the
specific restrictions imposed, if any and the reasons for the restrictions; or
(e) in any civil action, discovery and introduction into evidence of the
patient's medical records required by regulation of the department of health to
be made regarding the care and treatment received.

(4)
Each quality improvement committee shall, on at least a semiannual basis,
report to the governing board of the hospital in which the committee is
located. The report shall review the quality improvement activities conducted
by the committee, and any actions taken as a result of those activities.

(5)
The department of health shall adopt such rules as are deemed appropriate to
effectuate the purposes of this section.

(6)
The medical quality assurance commission or the board of osteopathic medicine
and surgery, as appropriate, may review and audit the records of committee
decisions in which a physician's privileges are terminated or restricted. Each
hospital shall produce and make accessible to the commission or board the
appropriate records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit. Information
so gained shall not be subject to the discovery process and confidentiality
shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Failure of a
hospital to comply with this subsection is punishable by a civil penalty not to
exceed two hundred fifty dollars.

(7)
The department, the joint commission on accreditation of health care
organizations, and any other accrediting organization may review and audit the
records of a quality improvement committee or peer review committee in
connection with their inspection and review of hospitals. Information so
obtained shall not be subject to the discovery process, and confidentiality
shall be respected as required by subsection (3) of this section. Each
hospital shall produce and make accessible to the department the appropriate
records and otherwise facilitate the review and audit.

(8) Violation of this section shall not be considered
negligence per se.

---
END ---