BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.525 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state board of education may allocate funds appropriated to the state board
for state assistance for school plant facilities to districts that have not
received a voter‑authorized issuance of bonds or the levying of excess
taxes if:

(a)
The school district has declared a school housing emergency;

(b)(i)
The district's enrollments and available educational space are higher than the
space standards, as determined by the state board of education, and the
conditions at the district, based on a projection of available space and
enrollments over the next five years, are expected to become worse without the
state financial assistance; or

(ii)
The district has existing school plant facilities that are deteriorating to
such a degree, as determined by the state board of education, that available
safe educational space is or will be insufficient to handle existing
enrollments or projected enrollments over the next five years without state
financial assistance;

(c)
The district's proposed project is eligible for state assistance under the
priority system in RCW 28A.525.190; and

(d)
The district has matching money from any sources available to the district
equal to or greater than the difference between the total approved project cost
and the amount of state assistance to the district as computed in RCW
28A.525.166. The district may use borrowed money, which may include the
principal amount of any installment purchase agreement or lease purchase
agreement, or any other funds legally available as matching money as long as
any debt incurred is within the indebtedness limit contained in RCW 39.36.020(3).

(2)
The board of directors of any school district may use the state allocation and
other funds, not restricted to capital purposes, for the purposes described in
RCW 28A.530.010, for payment of any installment purchase contract, or for
payments under any financing lease, the term of which is ten years or longer,
that contains an option by the school district to purchase the leased property
for nominal consideration.

(3)
The board of directors of any school district may use the proceeds of voter-approved
bonds or voter-approved levies, used as matching money for state assistance,
for payment of the principal on any installment purchase contract, or for
payment of the principal under any financing lease, the term of which is ten
years or longer, that contains an option by the school district to purchase the
leased property for nominal consideration.

(4)
The time of authorization for purposes of RCW 28A.525.168 shall be the date
that the state funds for assistance in financing a project are allocated by the
state board of education.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.530.080 and 1991 c 114 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the authority granted under RCW 28A.530.010, a
school district may contract indebtedness for any purpose specified in RCW
28A.530.010 or for the purpose of purchasing any real or personal property,
or property rights, in connection with the exercise of any powers or duties
which it is now or hereafter authorized to exercise, and issue bonds, notes, or
other evidences of indebtedness therefor without a vote of the qualified
electors of the district, subject to the limitations on indebtedness set forth
in RCW 39.36.020(3). Such bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness
shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW, and the proceeds
thereof shall be deposited in the capital projects fund, the transportation
vehicle fund, or the general fund, as applicable.

---
END ---