BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Lewis and Clark bicentennial advisory committee is created under the auspices
of the Washington state historical society. The committee shall consist of
fifteen members, as follows:

(1)
Six citizen members, at least three of whom must be enrolled members of a
Washington Indian tribe, who shall be appointed by the governor;

(2)
The president of the Washington state historical society;

(3)
The director of the Washington state parks and recreation commission;

(4)
The secretary of the Washington state department of transportation;

(5)
The director of the Washington state department of community, trade, and
economic development;

(6)
Four members of the Washington state legislature, one from each caucus in the
senate and the house of representatives as designated by each caucus; and

(7)
The chair of the Lewis and Clark trail advisory committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The Lewis and Clark bicentennial committee shall coordinate and provide
guidance to Washington's observance of the bicentennial of the Lewis and Clark
expedition. The committee may:

(a)
Cooperate with national, regional, state-wide, and local events promoting the
bicentennial;

(b)
Assist, plan, or conduct bicentennial events;

(c)
Engage in or encourage fund-raising activities including revenue-generating
enterprises, as well as the solicitation of charitable gifts, grants, or
donations;

(d)
Promote public education concerning the importance of the Lewis and Clark
expedition in American history, including the role of Native people in making
the expedition a success;

(e)
Coordinate interagency participation in the observance; and

(f)
Perform other related duties.

(2)
The committee is attached to the Washington state historical society for
administrative purposes. Accordingly, the society shall:

(a)
Direct and supervise the budgeting, recordkeeping, reporting, and related
administrative and clerical functions of the committee;

(b)
Include the committee's budgetary requests in the society's departmental
budget;

(c)
Collect all nonappropriated revenues for the committee and deposit them in the
proper fund or account;

(d)
Provide staff support for the committee;

(e)
Print and disseminate for the committee any required notices, rules, or orders
adopted by the committee; and

(f)
Allocate or otherwise provide office space to the committee as may be
necessary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Lewis and Clark bicentennial account is created in the state treasury.
Expenditures from the account may only be expended to finance the activities of
the Lewis and Clark bicentennial committee and all expenditures must be
authorized by the director of the Washington state historical society or the
director's designee. Moneys in the account may only be spent after
appropriation. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June 30, 2007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
27.34.340 and 1996 c 65 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---