BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.37.530 and 1997 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
It is unlawful:

(((a)))
(1) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle not
equipped with mirrors on the left and right sides of the motorcycle which shall
be so located as to give the driver a complete view of the highway for a distance
of at least two hundred feet to the rear of the motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle: PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be required on any motorcycle or
motor-driven cycle over twenty-five years old originally manufactured without
mirrors and which has been restored to its original condition ((and which is
being ridden to or from or otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic
motorcycle contest, show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
No mirror is required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1,
1931;

(((b)))
(2) For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle which
does not have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a face shield ((of
a type conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol));

(((c)))
(3) For any person under the age of twenty-one years to operate
or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped on a state highway,
county road, or city street unless wearing upon his or her head a commercially
manufactured protective motorcycle helmet ((of a type conforming
to rules adopted by the state patrol)) except when the vehicle is (a)
an antique motor-driven cycle ((or)) at least twenty-five years old,
(b) an automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle, or ((when the
vehicle is)) (c) equipped with seat belts and roll bars ((approved
by the state patrol)). The motorcycle helmet must be equipped with
either a neck or chin strap which shall be fastened securely while the
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons operating electric-assisted
bicycles shall comply with all laws and regulations related to the use of
bicycle helmets;

(((d)))
(4) For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle((;

(e)
For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet which does not
meet the requirements established by the state patrol.

(2)
The state patrol is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt and amend rules,
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, concerning the standards and
procedures for conformance of rules adopted for glasses, goggles, face shields,
and protective helmets)).

Sec.
2. RCW
46.37.535 and 1990 c 270 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is unlawful for any person to rent out motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, or
mopeds unless the person also has commercially manufactured motorcycle
helmets on hand for rent ((helmets of a type conforming to rules adopted
by the state patrol)).

It shall be unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one
years to rent a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or moped unless the person
has in his or her possession a commercially manufactured motorcycle
helmet ((of a type approved by the state patrol, regardless of from whom the
helmet is obtained)).

---
END ---