BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

By
October 1, 1999, the building code council shall prepare a report to the
legislature documenting the need, including safety benefits, for requiring the
installation of permanent anchors for fall protection on all new commercial and
residential construction and when a roof is replaced on existing commercial and
residential structures. The report shall contain recommendations on the best
design and placement of such anchors.

---
END ---