BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.335.190 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 10 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When, in the opinion of the board of directors of any school district, the cost
of any furniture, supplies, equipment, building, improvements, or repairs, or
other work or purchases, except books, will equal or exceed the sum of fifty
thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work or purchases
shall be prepared and notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of
general circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive
weeks, of the intention to receive bids therefor and that specifications and
other information may be examined at the office of the board or any other
officially designated location: PROVIDED, That the board without giving such
notice may make improvements or repairs to the property of the district through
the shop and repair department of such district when the total of such
improvements or repair does not exceed the sum of (a) fifteen thousand dollars,
for districts with fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time equivalent
students; or (b) for districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred
full-time equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft
or trade is involved with the school district improvement or repair, or ten
thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the school
district improvement or repair. The cost of any public work, improvement or
repair for the purposes of this section shall be the aggregate of all amounts
to be paid for labor, material, and equipment on one continuous or interrelated
project where work is to be performed simultaneously or in close sequence. The
bids shall be in writing and shall be opened and read in public on the date and
in the place named in the notice and after being opened shall be filed for
public inspection.

(2)
Every purchase of furniture, equipment or supplies, except books, the cost of
which is estimated to be in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, shall be on a
competitive basis. The board of directors shall establish a procedure for
securing telephone and/or written quotations for such purchases. Whenever the
estimated cost is from fifteen thousand dollars up to fifty thousand dollars,
the procedure shall require quotations from at least three different sources to
be obtained in writing or by telephone, and recorded for public perusal.
Whenever the estimated cost is in excess of fifty thousand dollars, the public
bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed.

(3)
Every building, improvement, repair or other public works project, the cost of
which is estimated to be in excess of (a) fifteen thousand dollars, for
districts with fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time equivalent
students; or (b) for districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred
full-time equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft
or trade is involved with the school district improvement or repair, or ten
thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the school
district improvement or repair, shall be on a competitive bid process. All
such projects estimated to be less than fifty thousand dollars may be awarded
to a contractor on the small works roster. The small works roster shall be
comprised of all responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list.
The board of directors shall establish a procedure for securing telephone
and/or written quotations from the contractors on the small works roster to
assure establishment of a competitive price and for awarding contracts to the
lowest responsible bidder. Such procedure shall require that a good faith
effort be made to request quotations from all contractors on the small works
roster who have indicated the capability of performing the kind of public works
being contracted. Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations
obtained shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry. The small works roster shall be revised at least once each
year by publishing notice of such opportunity in at least one newspaper of
general circulation in the district. Responsible contractors shall be added to
the list at any time they submit a written request. Whenever the estimated cost
of a public works project is fifty thousand dollars or more, the public bidding
process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed.

(4)(a)
Subject to (b) of this subsection, the contract for the work or purchase
shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder as defined in RCW 43.19.1911
but the board may by resolution reject any and all bids and may make
further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.

(b)
The board may, after review, reject the bid of any bidder, including the lowest
bid, if the board determines that it is in the best interests of the safety and
well-being of the students, the public, and the employees of the school.

(c)
On any work or purchase the board shall provide bidding information to any qualified
bidder or the bidder's agent, requesting it in person.

(5)
In the event of any emergency when the public interest or property of the
district would suffer material injury or damage by delay, upon resolution of
the board declaring the existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts
constituting the same, the board may waive the requirements of this section
with reference to any purchase or contract: PROVIDED, That an
"emergency", for the purposes of this section, means a condition
likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or to property of the
school district in the absence of prompt remedial action.

(6) This section does not apply to the direct purchase of school
buses by school districts and educational services in accordance with RCW
28A.160.195.

---
END ---