BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. (1) The legislature recognizes the existence of
allegations that certain insurers doing business in the state of Washington,
either directly or through related companies and affiliates, have failed to
honor insurance policies issued during the World War II era. Although such
policies were issued outside of the state of Washington, Washington has a clear
obligation under law to secure justice for its citizens and residents.

(2)
The legislature recognizes that allegations regarding a failure to pay legitimate
insurance claims threaten the integrity of the insurance market. The basic
commodity that insurers sell is trust. Policyholders pay substantial sums to
insurers trusting that at a future date, perhaps decades later, the insurer
will protect them and their loved ones. An insurer that violates this trust
should not be authorized to do business in this state or own or control
insurers doing business in this state, least the integrity of this state's
insurance market be compromised.

(3)
The legislature recognizes that hundreds of Holocaust survivors and heirs of
Holocaust victims are citizens or residents of the state of Washington. The
legislature is concerned by allegations that they may have been deprived of
their contractual entitlement to benefits under insurance policies issued by
insurance companies operating in Europe prior to and during World War II. The
state of Washington has a public policy interest in assuring that all of its
residents and citizens, including Holocaust victims and their heirs, who are
entitled to proceeds of insurance policies are treated reasonably and fairly
and that any contractual obligations are honored.

(4)
The legislature recognizes that the business of insurance is one affected by
the public interest, requiring that all persons conducting it be actuated by
good faith, abstain from deception, and practice honesty and equity in all
insurance matters. The insurance commissioner is currently authorized to
refuse, suspend, or revoke the certificate of authority of insurers that are
affiliated directly or indirectly through ownership, control, reinsurance or
other insurance or business relations with any person, persons, or entities
whose business operations are or have been marked, to the detriment of
policyholders or the public, by bad faith or manipulation. The insurance
commissioner is also currently authorized to provide assistance to members of
the public in resolving complaints involving insurers. It is the intent of the
legislature to provide additional resources to the insurance commissioner to
carry out this authority, to authorize the insurance commissioner to cooperate
with other state regulators with regard to such policies, and to authorize the
insurance commissioner to cooperate with and act through the international
commission concerning World War II era policies established under the efforts
of the national association of insurance commissioners.

(5)
In addition to recovering proceeds from unpaid insurance policies, the
legislature recognizes the need to assist Holocaust survivors and their
families, or the heirs of Holocaust victims, to recover other assets illegally
seized from them by the Nazi government and its allies and collaborators in
Germany or Nazi-occupied Europe between 1933 and 1945.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
FINDINGS. The legislature finds the following:

(1)
In addition to the many atrocities that befell the victims of the Nazi regime,
in many cases insurance policy proceeds were not paid to the victims and their
families.

(2)
In many instances, insurance company records are the only proof of insurance
policies held. In some cases, recollection of those policies' very existence
may have perished along with the Holocaust victims.

(3)
Several hundred Holocaust survivors and their families, or the heirs of
Holocaust victims live in Washington today.

(4)
Insurance companies doing business in the state of Washington have a
responsibility to ensure that any involvement they or their related companies
may have had with insurance policies of Holocaust victims are disclosed to the
state to ensure the rapid payment to victims and their survivors of any
proceeds to which they may be entitled.

(5)
As a result of the efforts of the insurance commissioner of the state of
Washington and the national association of insurance commissioners, there has
been established an international commission to investigate and facilitate the
payment of insurance policies to victims of the Holocaust and their survivors.
It is in the best interest of the people of the state of Washington to
authorize the insurance commissioner to cooperate with and coordinate his or
her activities with the international commission.

(6)
Other states are establishing Holocaust survivor assistance offices and
registries of insurance policies and Holocaust victims in order to identify
policyholders and their survivors to whom policy proceeds may be payable. It
is in the best interest of the people of the state of Washington to authorize
the insurance commissioner to cooperate with and coordinate his or her
activities with those other states.

(7)
In addition to unpaid insurance policies, Holocaust victims lost unknown
billions of dollars of assets seized by Nazi Germany and its allies and
collaborators in Germany and Nazi-occupied Europe between 1933 and 1945.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Holocaust survivor" or "Holocaust victim" means any person
who was persecuted, imprisoned or liable to imprisonment, or had property taken
or confiscated during the period of 1933 to 1945, inclusive, by Nazi Germany,
its allies, or sympathizers based on that person's race, religion, ethnicity,
physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, or similar class or
group-based animus.

(2)
"Related company" means any parent, subsidiary, successor in
interest, managing general agent, or other person or company affiliated
directly or indirectly through ownership, control, common ownership or control,
or other business or insurance relationship with another company or insurer.

(3)
"Insurer" means an entity holding a certificate of authority or
license to conduct the business of insurance in this state, or whose contacts
with this state satisfy the constitutional requirements for jurisdiction, that
sold life, property, liability, health, annuities, dowry, educational,
casualty, or any other insurance covering persons or property to persons in
Europe at any time before 1945, whether directly or through or as result of
sales by a related company, or is itself a related company to any person,
entity, or insurance company that sold such policies, whether the sale of the
insurance occurred before or after becoming related.

(4)
"Proceeds" means the amount legally due under any insurance policy
issued by an insurer or any related company as defined in this section.

(5)
"International commission" means the international commission on
Holocaust era insurance claims, referenced in and established under a
memorandum of understanding originally dated April 8, 1998, between and among
the insurance commissioner, various other state insurance regulators, various
alien insurance companies, and world-wide Jewish groups, which commission held
its first meeting in New York on October 21, 1998, and any successor.

(6)
"Other assets" means the proceeds of bank accounts, gold, art,
houses, businesses, other real estate properties or land, or the contents of
homes, businesses, or other real estate properties of Holocaust survivors or
victims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
HOLOCAUST SURVIVOR ASSISTANCE OFFICE. (1) To assist Holocaust victims to
recover proceeds from insurance policies that were improperly denied or
processed, or from other assets, or both, the insurance commissioner may
establish a Holocaust survivor assistance office.

(2)
The insurance commissioner may appoint or deputize personnel to be engaged or
employed by the Holocaust survivor assistance office and utilize insurance
department personnel to resolve or settle claims of Holocaust victims. The
insurance commissioner may also engage outside auditors or other qualified
personnel to assist in the investigation of claims made by Holocaust victims.

(3)
The insurance commissioner may establish a toll-free telephone number, to be
administered by the Holocaust survivor assistance office, and available in
English and such other languages as the commissioner deems appropriate. This
toll-free telephone number may be used to assist any Washington citizen or
resident seeking to recover proceeds from an insurance policy issued to or covering
the life or property of Holocaust victims, as well as other recoverable
assets. The insurance commissioner may also prepare public service
announcements and take other steps deemed appropriate to inform the general
public about the office and other options available to Holocaust victims to
settle insurance claims and claims for other assets.

(4)
The insurance commissioner may cooperate and exchange information with other
states establishing similar Holocaust survivor assistance offices and with the
international commission, and may enter into agreements whereby a single
processing office may be established on behalf of, and to provide services to
the residents of, several states.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
HOLOCAUST INSURANCE COMPANY REGISTRY. (1) To facilitate the work of the
Holocaust survivor assistance office, the insurance commissioner may establish
and maintain a central registry containing records and information relating to
insurance policies, as described in section 6 of this act, of victims, living
and deceased, of the Holocaust. The registry shall be known as the Holocaust
insurance company registry. The insurance commissioner shall establish
standards and procedures to make the information in the registry available to
the public to the extent necessary and appropriate to determine the existence
of insurance polices and to identify beneficiaries, successors in interest, or
other persons entitled to the proceeds of such polices, and to enable such
persons to claim proceeds to which they may be entitled, while protecting the
privacy of policyholders, their survivors, and their family members. All
information received by the claims registry or Holocaust survivor assistance
office from any insurer, related company, or foreign government or regulator
shall be considered and deemed to be matters and information relating to an
examination and part of an examination report that the commissioner may treat
as confidential and withhold from public inspection under RCW 48.03.040(6)(c)
and 48.03.050. To the extent necessary and appropriate to secure access to
documents and information located in or subject to the jurisdiction of other
states and countries, the commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements
or to provide assurances that any or all documents and information received
from an entity regulated by or subject to the laws of such other state or
country, or received from any agency of the government of any such state or
country, will be treated as confidential by the commissioner and will not be
disclosed to any person except with the approval of the appropriate authority
of such state or country or except as permitted or authorized by the laws of
such state or country, and any such agreement shall be binding and enforceable
notwithstanding chapter 42.17 RCW. To the extent necessary and appropriate to
secure access to documents and information from or in the possession of the
international commission as to which the international commission has given
assurances of confidentiality or privacy, the commissioner is authorized to
enter into agreements or to provide assurances that any or all such documents
and information will be treated as confidential by the commissioner and will
not be disclosed to any person except with the approval of the international
commission or as permitted by any agreement or assurances given by the
international commission, and any such agreement shall be binding and
enforceable notwithstanding chapter 42.17 RCW.

(2)
The commissioner may cooperate and exchange information with other states
establishing similar registries and with the international commission, and may
enter into agreements whereby a single registry may be established on behalf
of, and to provide services to the citizens and residents of, several states.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
OPERATIONS OF HOLOCAUST INSURANCE COMPANY REGISTRY. (1) Any insurer that sold
life, property, liability, health, annuities, dowry, educational, or casualty
insurance policies, to persons in Europe, that were in effect between 1920 and
1945, shall within one hundred eighty days following the effective date of this
act, or such later date as the commissioner may establish, file or cause to be
filed the following information with the commissioner to be entered into the
Holocaust insurance company registry:

(a)
A list of such insurance policies;

(b)
The insureds, beneficiaries, and face amounts of such policies;

(c)
A comparison of the names and other available identifying information of
insureds and beneficiaries of such policies and the names and other identifying
information of the victims of the Holocaust. The names and other identifying
information of victims of the Holocaust shall be provided by the office of the
insurance commissioner and may be obtained from the United States Holocaust
museum and the Yad Vashem repository in Israel;

(d)
For each such policy, whichever of the following that may apply:

(i)
That the proceeds of the policy have been paid to the designated beneficiaries
or their heirs where that person or persons, after diligent search, could be
located and identified;

(ii)
That the proceeds of the policies where the beneficiaries or heirs could not,
after diligent search, be located or identified, have been distributed to
Holocaust survivors or to qualified charitable nonprofit organizations for the
purpose of assisting Holocaust survivors;

(iii)
That a court of law has certified in a legal proceeding resolving the rights of
unpaid policyholders, their heirs, and beneficiaries, a plan for the
distribution of the proceeds;

(iv)
That the proceeds have not been distributed and the amount of those proceeds.

(2)
The destruction of any records or other materials pertaining to such policies
shall be a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. Evidence of the
destruction of such material shall be admissible in both administrative and
judicial proceedings as evidence in support of any claim being made against the
insurer involving the destroyed material. It shall be permissible to infer
that the destroyed material was destroyed to prevent discovery of information
supporting a claim.

(3)
An insurer currently doing business in the state that did not sell any
insurance policies in Europe prior to 1945 except through or as a result of
sales by a related company shall not be subject to this section if a related
company, whether or not authorized and currently doing business in the state,
has made a filing with the commissioner under this section.

(4)
The insurance commissioner may fund the costs of operating both the Holocaust
survivor assistance office and the Holocaust claims registry by assessments
upon those insurers providing information to the registry. The commissioner
shall establish standards and procedures to fairly allocate the costs of the
registry and office among such insurers. The commissioner is expressly
authorized to allocate such costs based on the number of policies reported or,
based on the total monetary amount of the policies as determined by their face
amounts without regard to inflation, interest, or depreciation.

(5)
The insurance commissioner is authorized to conduct investigations and
examinations of insurers for the purpose of determining compliance with this
chapter, verifying the accuracy and completeness of any and all information
furnished to the registry and the Holocaust survivor assistance office, and
developing and securing such additional information as may be necessary or
appropriate to determine those entitled to payment under any policy and the
proceeds to which such person may be entitled, if any. Any such investigation
shall be considered to be an examination under chapter 48.03 RCW. The costs of
any such examination will be borne by the insurer investigated, or the insurer
to whom the related company is related, pursuant to RCW 48.03.060(2).
Examinations may be conducted in this state, or in the state or country of
residence of the insurer or related company, or at such other place or country
where the records to be examined may be located.

(6)
In the event the insurance commissioner finds that doing so would not adversely
affect the operations of the registry or Holocaust survivor assistance office
with regard to insurance policies, then the commissioner may permit either or
both of them to accept information and to assist claimants with regard to the
location and recovery of property or assets taken or confiscated from Holocaust
victims other than insurance policies. However, all costs and expenses,
including that of personnel, attributable to such noninsurance assets shall be
separately accounted for and shall not be assessed against insurers under
subsections (4) and (5) of this section and shall not be paid from the general
funds of the office of the insurance commissioner, but shall be paid solely
from contributions or donations received for that purpose.

(a)
The insurance commissioner may accept contributions from any other person
wishing to fund the operations of the Holocaust survivor assistance office or
the registry to facilitate the resolution of claims involving Holocaust
victims.

(b)
The insurance commissioner is authorized to assist in the creation of an entity
to accept tax deductible contributions to support activities conducted by the
Holocaust survivor assistance office and the Holocaust claims registry.

(c)
The insurance commissioner, through the Holocaust survivor assistance office,
is authorized, with the consent of the parties, to act as mediator of any
dispute involving the claim of a Holocaust victim arising from an occurrence
during the period between January 1, 1933, and December 31, 1945.

(7)
The insurance commissioner is authorized to cooperate with and exchange
information with other states with similar registries or Holocaust survivor
assistance offices, with the national association of insurance commissioners,
with foreign countries and with the international commission. The commissioner
is authorized to enter into agreements to handle the processing of claims and
registry functions of other states, and to have other states handle all or part
of the registry and claims processing functions for this state, as the
commissioner may determine to be appropriate. The commissioner is authorized
to enter into agreements with other states and the international commission to
treat and consider information submitted to them as submitted to this state for
purpose of complying with this chapter. As part of any such agreement, the
insurance commissioner may agree to reimburse any other state for expenses or
costs incurred and such reimbursement shall be recovered by the commissioner as
an expense of operating the registry and Holocaust survivor assistance office
under subsections (4) and (5) of this section, and to accept reimbursement from
any other state for services with regard to residents of such other state. The
insurance commissioner is authorized to assist out-of-state claimants with or
otherwise handle on their behalf issues involving the alleged improper
nonpayment of claims to Holocaust survivors or victims and may collect
appropriate fees from such claimants to handle such claims processing.

(8)
A determination by the insurance commissioner that a claim subject to the
provisions of this chapter should be paid shall be regarded by any court in any
private action by a claimant against an insurer as prima facie evidence or
creating presumptive evidence that such claim should be paid.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
PENALTIES. Any insurer that knowingly files information required by this
chapter that is false shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten
thousand dollars for each violation. This penalty is appropriated to the
office of the insurance commissioner to be used by it to aid in the resolution
of Holocaust insurance claims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
SUSPENSION OF CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITY FOR FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH CHAPTER. The
insurance commissioner is authorized to suspend the certificate of authority to
conduct insurance business in the state of Washington of any insurer that fails
to comply with the requirements of this chapter by or after the two hundred
tenth day after the effective date of this act, until the time that the insurer
complies with this chapter. The insurance commissioner is authorized in his or
her discretion to accept fines in lieu of suspension. Such suspension shall
not affect or relieve the insurer from its obligations to service its existing
insureds, and shall not permit the insurer to terminate its existing insureds,
but shall prohibit the insurer from writing new business in this state until
the suspension is lifted by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
COOPERATION WITH INTERNATIONAL COMMISSION. The insurance commissioner may
suspend the application of this chapter to any insurer that is participating in
the international commission process in good faith and is working through the
international commission to resolve all outstanding claims with offers of fair
settlements in a reasonable time frame. If, however, in the judgment of the
insurance commissioner the international commission fails to establish a
mechanism to accomplish identification, adjudication, and payment of insurance
policy claims of Holocaust survivors or victims within a reasonable time, then
all provisions of this chapter shall come into effect as to any such insurer.
For purposes of this section, a reasonable time shall mean by January 1, 2000,
or such later date as the commissioner may establish by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
PRIVATE RIGHTS OF ACTION PRESERVED; VENUE. Any Holocaust survivor, or heir or
beneficiary of a Holocaust survivor or victim, who resides in this state and
has a claim against an insurer arising out of an insurance policy or policies
purchased or in effect in Europe before 1945 from that insurer may bring a
legal action against that insurer to recover on that claim in the superior court
of the county in which any plaintiff resides, which court shall be vested with
jurisdiction over that action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
EXTENSION OF STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS. Any action brought by a Holocaust
survivor or the heir or beneficiary of a Holocaust survivor or victim, seeking
proceeds of the insurance policies issued or in effect before 1945 shall not be
dismissed for failure to comply with the applicable statute of limitations,
provided the action is commenced on or before December 31, 2010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
ADOPTION OF RULES. The insurance commissioner may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
REPORT TO LEGISLATURE. The insurance commissioner shall report to the
legislature one year from the effective date of this act and annually
thereafter on the implementation of this law and resolution of Holocaust
claims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. SHORT
TITLE. This chapter shall be known and cited as the Holocaust victim insurance
relief act of 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 1 through 15 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---