BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The department of fish and wildlife is mandated by RCW 75.08.012 to promote,
enhance, and improve recreational and commercial fishing in this state;

(2)
This mandate applies to all biological aquatic resources whether fish,
shellfish, or other forms of harvestable aquatic life;

(3)
This mandate requires the consideration and representation of all those who
might wish to harvest biological aquatic resources, including nontreaty,
non-Indian fishers and harvesters; and

(4)
The department has failed to adequately represent the interests of nontreaty,
non-Indian fishers and harvesters when the department has dealt with treaty
Indian fishers and harvesters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.08 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever the department of fish and wildlife engages in any sort of
negotiation or agreement with treaty Indian fishers or harvesters, the
department of fish and wildlife shall include, to serve as an observer only, a
representative of nontreaty, non-Indian fishers or harvesters from each user
group potentially affected by the agreement or negotiation, on a case-by-case
basis, for each biological aquatic resource involved with a harvest agreement
or negotiation.

---
END ---