BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 64.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An electric utility is immune from liability under RCW 64.12.030, 64.12.040,
and 4.24.630 and any claims for general or special damages, including claims of
emotional distress, when it cuts or removes vegetation located on or
originating from land or property adjacent to electric facilities and that:

(a)
Has come in contact with or caused damage to electric facilities;

(b)
Poses a hazard to the general public health, safety, or welfare and the
electric utility makes a reasonable effort as soon as practicable to notify and
secure agreement from the affected property owner of record, or the resident of
the affected property, regarding the disposition of the vegetation that has
been cut or removed by the utility; or

(c)
Poses a potential threat to damage electric facilities and the electric utility
notifies and secures agreement from the affected property owner of record for
the cutting, removing, and disposition of the vegetation. If the affected
property owner fails to respond to a notice from the electric utility within
two weeks of the date the electric utility provided notice, the electric
utility may secure agreement from a resident of the affected property for the
cutting, removing, and disposition of vegetation.

(2)
A hazard to the general public health, safety, or welfare is deemed to exist
when:

(a)
Vegetation has encroached upon electric facilities by overhanging, leaning
towards, or growing within ten feet directly beneath electric facilities that
are located above the ground; and

(b)
Vegetation that is visibly diseased, dead, or dying and that has been
determined by a qualified forester or certified arborist employed or retained
by or on behalf of an electric utility to be of such proximity to electric
facilities as to pose an imminent threat to damage those facilities.

(3)
A potential threat to damage electric facilities exists when vegetation is of
such size, condition, and proximity to electric facilities that it can be
reasonably expected to cause damage to electric facilities and, based upon this
standard, the vegetation has been determined to pose a potential threat by a
qualified forester or certified arborist employed or retained by or on behalf
of an electric utility.

(4)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Electric facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts, poles, wires,
pipes, conductors, cables, cross-arms, receivers, transmitters, transformers,
instruments, machines, appliances, instrumentalities, rights of way, and all
devices and apparatus used, operated, owned, or controlled by an electric
utility, for the purposes of manufacturing, transforming, transmitting,
distributing, selling, or furnishing electricity.

(b)
"Electric utility" means an electrical company, as defined under RCW
80.04.010, a municipal electric utility formed under Title 35 RCW, a public
utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under
chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, and a mutual
corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, that is engaged in
the business of distributing electricity in the state.

(c)
"Rights of way" means any real estate, easements, acquired by title
or implied consent, rights of way, franchises, property, and routes used,
operated, owned, maintained, or controlled under agreement, written or implied,
by an electric utility.

(d)
"Vegetation" means trees, timber, or shrubs.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.24.630 and 1994 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every person who goes onto the land of another and who removes timber, crops,
minerals, or other similar valuable property from the land, or wrongfully
causes waste or injury to the land, or wrongfully injures personal property or
improvements to real estate on the land, is liable to the injured party for
treble the amount of the damages caused by the removal, waste, or injury. For
purposes of this section, a person acts "wrongfully" if the person
intentionally and unreasonably commits the act or acts while knowing, or having
reason to know, that he or she lacks authorization to so act. Damages
recoverable under this section include, but are not limited to, damages for the
market value of the property removed or injured, and for injury to the land,
including the costs of restoration. In addition, the person is liable for
reimbursing the injured party for the party's reasonable costs, including but
not limited to investigative costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and other
litigation-related costs.

(2)
This section does not apply in any case where liability for damages is provided
under RCW 64.12.030, 79.01.756, 79.01.760, or 79.40.070.

(3)
This section does not apply to an electric utility under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---