BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.02.010 and 1993 c 448 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or
investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or
affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:

(a)
Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b)
A private or public program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c)
Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(2)
"Directory information" means information disclosing the presence,
and for the purpose of identification, the name, residence, sex, and the
general health condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health
care facility or who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health
care facility.

(3)
"General health condition" means the patient's health status
described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair,"
"good," "excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(4)
"Health care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a
health care provider:

(a)
To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b)
That affects the structure or any function of the human body.

(5)
"Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home,
laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care provider provides
health care to patients.

(6)
"Health care information" means any information, whether oral or
recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated
with the identity of a patient and directly relates to the patient's health
care. The term includes any record of disclosures of health care information.

(7)
"Health care provider" means a person who is licensed, certified,
registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health
care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(8)
"Institutional review board" means any board, committee, or other
group formally designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or
state law, to review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of
research programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human
research subjects.

(9)
"Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold,
possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(10)
"Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health
care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(11)
"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(12)
"Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the
record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page for the first thirty
pages and fifty cents per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical
fee for searching and handling may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars.
These amounts shall be adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the
consumer price index, all consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan
statistical area as determined by the secretary of health. However, where
editing of records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done
by the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge for a
basic office visit. No fee shall be charged for furnishing recorded health
care information to a patient, his or her attorney, or authorized
representative, if the information is requested for the purpose of supporting a
claim or appeal under any provision of the social security act or any federal
or state financial needs-based benefit program, and the request is accompanied
by documentation of the claim or appeal.

(13)
"Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW
authorized to transact business in this state or other jurisdiction, including
a health care service contractor, and health maintenance organization; or an
employee welfare benefit plan; or a state or federal health benefit program.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.02.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 741 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A patient may authorize a health care provider to disclose the patient's health
care information. A health care provider shall honor an authorization and, if
requested, provide a copy of the recorded health care information unless the
health care provider denies the patient access to health care information under
RCW 70.02.090.

(2)
A health care provider may charge a reasonable fee for providing the health
care information and is not required to honor an authorization until the fee is
paid. However, pursuant to RCW 70.02.010(12), no fee shall be charged for
furnishing recorded health care information when the request is for the purpose
of supporting a claim or appeal under any provision of the social security act
or any federal or state financial needs-based benefit program.

(3)
To be valid, a disclosure authorization to a health care provider shall:

(a)
Be in writing, dated, and signed by the patient;

(b)
Identify the nature of the information to be disclosed;

(c)
Identify the name, address, and institutional affiliation of the person to whom
the information is to be disclosed;

(d)
Except for third-party payors, identify the provider who is to make the
disclosure; and

(e)
Identify the patient.

(4)
Except as provided by this chapter, the signing of an authorization by a
patient is not a waiver of any rights a patient has under other statutes, the
rules of evidence, or common law.

(5)
A health care provider shall retain each authorization or revocation in
conjunction with any health care information from which disclosures are made.
This requirement shall not apply to disclosures to third-party payors.

(6)
Except for authorizations given pursuant to an agreement with a treatment or
monitoring program or disciplinary authority under chapter 18.71 or 18.130 RCW
or to provide information to third-party payors, an authorization may not
permit the release of health care information relating to future health care
that the patient receives more than ninety days after the authorization was
signed. Patients shall be advised of the period of validity of their
authorization on the disclosure authorization form. If the authorization does
not contain an expiration date, it expires ninety days after it is signed.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.02.070 and 1995 c 292 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the request of the person requesting the record, the health care provider or
facility shall certify the record furnished and may charge for such certification
in accordance with RCW 36.18.016(5). No record need be certified until the fee
is paid. However, pursuant to RCW 70.02.010(12), no fee shall be charged
for furnishing recorded health care information when the request is for the
purpose of supporting a claim or appeal under any provision of the social
security act or any federal or state financial needs-based benefit program.
The certification shall be affixed to the record and disclose:

(1)
The identity of the patient;

(2)
The kind of health care information involved;

(3)
The identity of the person to whom the information is being furnished;

(4)
The identity of the health care provider or facility furnishing the
information;

(5)
The number of pages of the health care information;

(6)
The date on which the health care information is furnished; and

(7) That the certification is to fulfill and meet the requirements
of this section.

---
END ---