BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the provisions of the charter of a first class city to the contrary, the
following shall apply to a separate board or other body established by a first
class city to manage or operate one or more utilities for the city:

(1)
The board or other body must consist of five members who are elected to
staggered four-year terms of office at municipal general elections, rather than
being appointed.

(2)
Each member of the board or other body must be elected from a separate district
within the greater service area of the city, where each district has
approximately the same population, and the districts are used for the following
purposes: (a) Only a resident of a district may be a candidate or nominee for
the member from that district; (b) only a resident of a district may serve as
the member from that district; (c) only voters residing in a district may vote
at a primary to nominate candidates for the member from that district; and (d)
only voters residing in a district may vote at a general election to elect the
member from that district. The greater service area of the city shall include
the entire city and an area or areas contiguous to the city that includes every
residence outside of the city that is served by any of the utility services
managed or operated by the board or other body.

(3)
The board or other body shall select a director of each utility under its
jurisdiction, or a single director for two or more utilities under its
jurisdiction, and shall set utility rates.

(4)
Each member of the board or other body shall receive the same compensation
provided under RCW 54.12.080 that a public utility district commissioner
receives, with the gross revenues of the utility or utilities managed and
operated by the board or other body being considered the gross revenues of the
district.

(5) Any efforts of the city to provide cable service shall be
managed and operated by the board or other body.

---
END ---