BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.09.5255 and 1994 c 180 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Of
the projected federal medicaid and private insurance revenue collected under
RCW 74.09.5249, twenty percent, after deduction for billing fees, shall be for
incentive payments to first class school districts and fifty percent,
after deduction for billing fees, shall be for incentive payments to second
class school districts. Incentive payments shall only be used by districts
for children with disabilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.09.5256 and 1994 c 180 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Districts shall reassign medicaid payments to be received under RCW 74.09.5249
through 74.09.5253, 74.09.5254 and 74.09.5255, and this section to the
superintendent of public instruction.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall receive medicaid payments from
the department of social and health services for all state and federal moneys
under Title XIX of the federal social security act due to districts for medical
assistance provided in the district's special education program.

(3)
The superintendent shall use reports from the department of social and health
services, the state billing agent, districts acting as their own billing agent,
and firms to calculate the appropriate amounts of incentive payments and state
special education program moneys due each district.

(4)
Moneys received by the superintendent of public instruction shall be disbursed
for the following purposes:

(a)
Reimbursement to the department of social and health services for the
state-funded portion of medicaid payments;

(b)
Reimbursement for billing agent's fees, including those of districts acting as
their own agent and billing fees of firms;

(c)
Incentive payments to first class school districts equal to twenty
percent of the federal portion of medicaid payments after deduction for billing
fees; ((and))

(d)
Incentive payments to second class school districts equal to fifty percent
of the federal portion of medicaid payments after deduction of billing fees; and

(e)
The remainder shall be distributed to districts as part of state allocations
for the special education program provided under RCW 28A.150.390.

(5)
With respect to private insurer funds received by districts, the superintendent
of public instruction shall reduce state special education program allocations
to ((the)) first class districts by eighty percent of the amount
received, after deduction for billing fees and to second class districts by
fifty percent of the amount received, after deduction for billing fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---