BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.09.5255 and 1994 c 180 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Of the projected federal medicaid and private insurance revenue collected under
RCW 74.09.5249((,)):

(a)
Until July 1, 1999, twenty percent, after deduction for billing fees, shall
be for incentive payments to first class school districts;

(b)
Beginning on the effective date of this section until July 1, 1999, fifty
percent, after deduction for billing fees, shall be for incentive payments to
second class school districts; and

(c)
Beginning July 1, 1999, fifty percent, after deduction for billing fees, shall
be for incentive payments to first and second class school districts.

(2)
Incentive payments shall only be used by districts for children with
disabilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.09.5256 and 1994 c 180 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Districts shall reassign medicaid payments to be received under RCW 74.09.5249
through 74.09.5253, 74.09.5254 and 74.09.5255, and this section to the
superintendent of public instruction.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall receive medicaid payments from
the department of social and health services for all state and federal moneys
under Title XIX of the federal social security act due to districts for medical
assistance provided in the district's special education program.

(3)
The superintendent shall use reports from the department of social and health
services, the state billing agent, districts acting as their own billing agent,
and firms to calculate the appropriate amounts of incentive payments and state
special education program moneys due each district.

(4)
Moneys received by the superintendent of public instruction shall be disbursed
for the following purposes:

(a)
Reimbursement to the department of social and health services for the
state-funded portion of medicaid payments;

(b)
Reimbursement for billing agent's fees, including those of districts acting as
their own agent and billing fees of firms;

(c)(i)
Until July 1, 1999, incentive payments to first class school
districts equal to twenty percent of the federal portion of medicaid payments
after deduction for billing fees; ((and))

(ii)
For second class school districts, beginning on the effective date of this
section, and until July 1, 1999, incentive payments to second class school
districts equal to fifty percent of the federal portion of medicaid payments
after deduction for billing fees; and

(iii)
Beginning July 1, 1999, incentive payments to school districts equal to fifty
percent of the federal portion of medicaid payments after deduction for billing
fees; and

(d)
The remainder shall be distributed to districts as part of state allocations
for the special education program provided under RCW 28A.150.390.

(5)
With respect to private insurer funds received by districts, the superintendent
of public instruction shall reduce state special education program allocations
to the districts as provided in this section.

(a)
Until July 1, 1999, for first class districts, by eighty percent of the
amount received, after deduction for billing fees;

(b)
Beginning on the effective date of this section and until July 1, 1999, for
second class districts, by fifty percent of the amount received, after
deduction for billing fees; and

(c)
Beginning July 1, 1999, for first and second class school districts, by fifty
percent of the amount received, after deduction for billing fees.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---