BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

The
state of Washington desires a skilled, dedicated, and well- trained work force
for the community and technical college system. The legislature finds that
community and technical colleges offer quality, cost-effective instructional
programs to the citizens of the state.

The
legislature finds that part-time faculty at the community and technical
colleges have an essential role in providing students with an excellent and
affordable education. Stagnated salaries and lack of career advancement
opportunities within the community college system are hindrances to part-time
faculty. Low salaries also create a perception of a lack of fairness. The legislature
further finds that part-time faculty members make a major contribution to
student learning.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to recognize part-time faculty members for
their contributions to community colleges. Part-time faculty should be
compensated for their contributions to students, contributions to faculty, and
the furtherance of the community and technical college mission.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature that part-time faculty employed in public
community and technical colleges receive fair compensation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to part-time faculty of public community and technical
colleges.

(2)
Part-time faculty under this section shall receive proportional pay.

(3)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Proportional" means part-time faculty will be paid at a rate based
on the teaching portion of a full-time instructor's workload. An instructor's
teaching workload includes classroom instruction, preparation, grading, and
assigned office hours. For the 1999-2001 biennium, the state board for
community and technical colleges shall calculate the teaching portion based on,
"A Study of Part-Time Faculty in Washington Community Colleges," a
December 1984 survey of workload for full and part-time faculty.

(b) "Part-time faculty" means nontenured instructors
employed by public community or technical college districts for any percentage
of a full-time academic workload as defined in RCW 28B.50.489.

---
END ---