BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following sums, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated to the
children and family services division of the department of social and health
services: One million nine hundred sixty-two thousand dollars from the general
fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, and one million nine hundred
sixty-three thousand dollars from the general fund for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2001. The amounts in this section are provided solely for the
operating of the family policy council and the community public health and
safety networks.

---
END ---