BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.319 and 1993 c 280 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 42.17.260 through 42.17.340, ((no
financial or proprietary information supplied by investors or entrepreneurs
under chapter 43.330 RCW shall be made available to the public)) the
following information supplied to the department of community, trade, and
economic development by any person in connection with the siting, recruitment,
expansion, retention, or relocation of that person's business shall not be made
available to the public by the department or the office of the governor:

(a)
Financial or proprietary information; and

(b)
Until a siting decision is made, identifying information of any person
supplying information under this section and the locations being considered for
siting, relocation, or expansion of a business.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "siting decision" means the
decision to acquire or not to acquire a site.

(3)
If there is no written contact for a period of sixty days to the department
from a person connected with siting, recruitment, expansion, retention, or
relocation of that person's business, information described in subsection
(1)(b) of this section will be available to the public under the provisions of
RCW 42.17.250 through 42.17.340.

(4) Nothing in this section shall apply to records of any other
state agency or of a local agency.

---
END ---