BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.56.330 and 1961 c 15 s 84.56.330 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person who has a lien by mortgage or otherwise, upon any real property upon
which any taxes have not been paid, may pay such taxes, and the interest,
penalty and costs thereon; and the receipt of the county treasurer or other
collecting official shall constitute an additional lien upon such land, to the
amount therein stated, and the amount so paid and the interest thereon at the
rate specified in the mortgage or other instrument shall be collectible with,
or as a part of, and in the same manner as the amount secured by the original
lien: PROVIDED, That the person paying such taxes shall pay the same as
mortgagee or other lien holder and shall procure the receipt of the county treasurer
therefor, showing the mortgage or other lien relationship of the person paying
such taxes, and the same shall have been recorded with the county auditor of
the county wherein the said real estate is situated, within ten days after the
payment of such taxes and the issuance of such receipt. It shall be the duty
of any treasurer issuing such receipt to make notation thereon of the lien
relationship claim of the person paying such taxes. It shall be the duty of
the county auditor in such cases to index and record such receipts in the same
manner as provided for the recording of liens on real estate, upon the payment
to the county auditor of the sum of fifty cents by the person presenting the
same for recording: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event the above
provision be not complied with, the lien created by any such payment shall be
subordinate to the liens of all mortgages or encumbrances upon such real
property, which are senior to the mortgage or other lien of the person so
making such payment.

A
mortgagee or other person who by written agreement with the mortgagor is paying
the property taxes for any real property out of an escrow fund or otherwise
must notify the county treasurer of a termination of such agreement within
thirty days after termination. A mortgagee or other person who fails to
provide such notice is liable for any interest and penalties incurred for
delinquent taxes on the subject property during the period between termination
of the agreement and the date the county treasurer receives notice.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.56.050 and 1991 c 245 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

On receiving the tax rolls the treasurer shall post all real and
personal property taxes from the rolls to the treasurer's tax roll, and shall
carry forward to the current tax rolls a memorandum of all delinquent taxes on
each and every description of property, and enter the same on the property upon
which the taxes are delinquent showing the amounts for each year. The
treasurer shall notify each taxpayer in the county, at the expense of the
county, of the amount of the real and personal property, and the current and
delinquent amount of tax due on the same; and the treasurer shall have printed
on the notice the name of each tax and the levy made on the same. Whenever
the treasurer receives notice that a taxpayer's responsibility has been
terminated pursuant to RCW 84.56.330 or otherwise, and if there are any
delinquent or current year taxes due, the treasurer shall send an additional
notice to the new taxpayer within forty-five days. The county treasurer
shall be the sole collector of all delinquent taxes and all other taxes due and
collectible on the tax rolls of the county: PROVIDED, That the term
"taxpayer" as used in this section shall mean any person charged, or
whose property is charged, with property tax; and the person to be notified is
that person whose name appears on the tax roll herein mentioned: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That if no name so appears the person to be notified is that person
shown by the treasurer's tax rolls or duplicate tax receipts of any preceding
year as the payer of the tax last paid on the property in question.

---
END ---