BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

All contracts for public works projects shall require that
apprentices enrolled in state-approved programs constitute not less than ten
percent of the total project work force.

---
END ---