BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A moratorium is established on the imposition of new fees and fee increases by
a railroad company upon a utility for the construction and placement of utility
facilities in a railroad right-of-way, unless otherwise agreed to by the
parties. Renewal of a previously imposed fee at the same rate is not
prohibited by this section. During the period of the moratorium, railroad
companies may not require utilities to remove utility facilities from the
railroad right-of-way solely because of a dispute between the parties
concerning compensation for placement of utility facilities in the railroad
right-of-way. Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, railroad companies
may only require relocation of utility facilities within the railroad
right-of-way when such facilities cause interference with railroad operations
or create a safety hazard.

(2)
For the purposes of this section: (a) "Utility facilities" means
lines, conduits, ducts, poles, wires, pipes, conductors, cables, cross-arms,
receivers, transmitters, transformers, instrumentalities, drains, channels,
aqueducts, collection systems, and all devices, apparatus, and property used,
operated, owned, or controlled by an electric utility, gas company, water utility,
or sewer utility for the purposes of manufacturing, transmitting, transporting,
distributing, selling, furnishing, or disposing of electricity, natural gas,
water, and sewage; and (b) "utility" means an electric utility, gas
company, water utility, natural gas pipeline company, and sewer utility,
including a metropolitan municipal corporation.

(3)
The moratorium created by this section is in effect until December 31, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
task force is created to study and make recommendations on the following issues
related to the siting of utility facilities on, over, under, and along railroad
rights-of-way.

(a)
How a permanent easement can be created for utility facilities when a railroad
abandons a rail right-of-way;

(b)
What costs should a utility pay to a railroad to reimburse the railroad for any
expenses incurred by the railroad as a result of the construction of utility
facilities in the railroad right-of-way;

(c)
How much compensation, if any, should a utility pay for locating utility
facilities in the railroad right-of-way;

(d)
What other costs or expenses, if any, should a utility pay for locating utility
facilities in the railroad right-of-way;

(e)
What amount and scope of insurance should a railroad and a utility have, if
any, to indemnify the other for damages resulting from its own negligence;

(f)
What kind of notification requirements should be required of utilities before
constructing utility facilities in a railroad right-of-way;

(g)
Under what conditions might it be necessary for a utility to relocate utility
facilities that are located in a railroad right-of-way; and

(h)
What, if any mechanism should be created to resolve disputes between utilities
and railroads relative to the issues enumerated in this section.

(2)
The task force shall be composed of eleven members as follows:

(a)
Seven members shall be appointed by the governor as follows: One person
representing an electrical company or natural gas company, as defined under RCW
80.04.010; one person representing a municipal corporation, including public
utility districts, that operates as a water or sewer utility; one person
representing a cooperative association engaged in the business of distributing
electricity within the state; two persons representing railroads that operate
within and without the state; one person representing a railroad that operates
solely in the state; and one person representing the public at large, which
could include a representative from the office of public counsel in the office
of the attorney general. The public representative shall not be, or have ever
been, an employee or agent of, or otherwise have a connection with a utility or
railroad, other than as a consumer. The governor shall select one of these
members to serve as chair of the task force; and

(b)
Two members each from the senate and the house of representatives
transportation committees; one each from the two largest caucuses in each
house. The president of the senate shall appoint the two members from the
senate and the co-speakers of the house of representatives shall appoint the
two members from the house of representatives.

(3)
The Washington utilities and transportation commission shall provide staff
assistance to the task force.

(4)
The task force shall complete its study and submit a report to the governor and
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature by December 1, 1999.

This
section expires June 30, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act does not apply to municipal railroads.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the public service
revolving fund in the general fund to the Washington utilities and
transportation commission for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

---
END ---