BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of health may accept such grants, services, and
property from the federal government, foundations, organizations, medical
schools, and other entities as are available for the purposes of activities and
services to promote women's health.

---
END ---