BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

A
bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization may conduct recreational
gambling events for purposes of raising funds in the form of donations made by
individuals attending the event. The following restrictions apply to
recreational gambling events:

(1)
Only gambling activities authorized by RCW 9.46.0233 may be conducted.

(2)
Equipment used must not include any gambling equipment otherwise prohibited by
this title and must be rented or otherwise obtained from persons licensed by
the commission.

(3)
The sponsoring organization may require a donation of up to five hundred
dollars per person for the opportunity to participate in the event.
Participants may make additional donations of up to two hundred dollars and
obtain additional scrip or chips during the event. If prizes are awarded or if
meals, entertainment, or other items of value are provided in conjunction with
the event, their value must be identified to persons making donations to
participate.

(4)
All wagers must be made with scrip or chips with no value. At the end of the
event, participants may be given the opportunity to purchase or otherwise
redeem their scrip or chips for merchandise prizes. All merchandise prizes
must be donated to or provided by the sponsoring organization. The value of
all purchased prizes must not exceed ten percent of the gross revenue from the
event.

(5)
Only members and guests of the sponsoring organization may participate in the
event.

(6)
Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, no person other than a
member or employee of the sponsoring organization may take any part in the
management or operation of the event.

(7)
A person who has been licensed by the commission may organize and conduct a
recreational gambling event on behalf of the sponsoring organization, but may
not provide the facility for the event. These persons may use paid personnel
and may be compensated by a fixed fee, but shall not share in the proceeds of
the event.

(8)
The gambling activity is limited to eight hours in any twenty-four-hour
period. No sponsoring organization may conduct more than two events under this
section in a twelve-month period.

(9) The commission shall adopt rules governing the operation of
recreational gambling events and the licensing of persons who may organize and
conduct the events on behalf of charitable and nonprofit organizations.

---
END ---