BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that financial institutions play a major role in the
economy of this state and in the financial security and well-being of citizens
of this state. A significant disruption to financial services could adversely
affect the economy and the citizens of this state. The legislature intends to
reduce potential adverse impacts on the public and on financial institutions
regulated by the department from the year 2000 computer problem by providing
technical assistance and increased regulatory oversight regarding this
potential problem.

(2)
To the extent funds are available, the department of financial institutions
shall provide technical assistance to financial institutions under their
jurisdiction in addressing the year 2000 computer problem. Technical
assistance can include, but is not limited to, assistance or models defining
the extent of the problem and managing projects to address the problem, testing
regimes, a list of vendors that other institutions are using, and business
continuity planning. The department shall consult with federal regulators who
are addressing this problem for federal financial institutions.

(3)
In conducting examinations, the department of financial institutions shall
include an examination of whether the institution has a year 2000 computer
problem and the institutions' efforts to address any problems in this area.
The department may advise the institution of technical assistance available
under subsection (1) of this section, and may take other regulatory action the
department deems necessary to preserve the safety and soundness of the
institution or protect the public.

(4)
The director of the department of financial institutions shall report to the
governor and chairs of the legislative committees dealing with financial
institutions' issues by July 1, 1999, and October 1, 1999, regarding the
potential year 2000 computer problem faced by the state's financial
institutions and the implementation of this section.

(5)
This section expires February 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The legislature finds that insurance plays a major role in the economy of this
state and in the financial security and well-being of citizens of this state.
A significant disruption to insurance services could adversely affect the
economy and the citizens of this state. The legislature intends to reduce
potential adverse impacts on insurance companies and policyholders from the
year 2000 computer problem by providing technical assistance and increased
regulatory oversight regarding this potential problem.

(2)
To the extent funds are available, the insurance commissioner shall provide
technical assistance to insurance companies and health carriers in addressing
the year 2000 computer problem. Technical assistance can include, but is not
limited to, assistance or models defining the extent of the problem and
managing projects to address the problem, testing regimes, a list of vendors
that other institutions are using, and business continuity planning. The
commissioner shall consult with other state and federal regulators who also are
addressing this problem.

(3)
In conducting examinations, the commissioner shall include an examination of
whether the insurer or carrier has a year 2000 computer problem and the
insurers' or carriers' efforts to address any problems in this area. The
commissioner may advise the insurer or carrier of technical assistance
available under subsection (1) of this section, and may take other regulatory
action the commissioner deems necessary to preserve the solvency of the insurer
or carrier or to protect the public.

(4)
The commissioner shall report to the governor and chairs of the legislative
committees dealing with insurance issues by July 1, 1999, and October 1, 1999,
regarding the potential year 2000 computer problem faced by the state's
insurers and carriers and the implementation of this section.

(5) This section expires February 1, 2000.

---
END ---