BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.50.115 and 1984 c 258 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

The
municipal court shall have a seal which shall be the vignette of George
Washington, with the words "Seal of The Municipal Court of
. . . . . . (name of city), State of Washington,"
surrounding the vignette. All process from the court runs throughout the
state. The supreme court may determine by rule what process must be issued
under seal.

Sec.
2. RCW
3.54.030 and 1992 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
district court shall have a seal that shall be the vignette of George
Washington, with the words "Seal of the
. . . . . . District Court of
. . . . . . County, State of Washington,"
surrounding the vignette. All process from the court ((must be issued under
its seal and)) runs throughout the state. The supreme court may
determine by rule what process must be issued under seal.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.20.110 and 1965 c 7 s 35.20.110 are each amended to read as follows:

The municipal court shall have a seal which shall be the vignette
of George Washington, with the words "Seal of The Municipal Court of
. . . . . . (name of city), State of Washington,"
surrounding the vignette. All process from such court ((shall issue under
the seal thereof and shall)) runs throughout the state. The
supreme court may determine by rule what process must be issued under seal.

---
END ---