BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I - WATER-SEWER DISTRICT
LAWS

Sec.
1. RCW
57.04.050 and 1996 c 230 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
entry of the findings of the final hearing on the petition if one or more
county legislative authorities find that the proposed district will be
conducive to the public health, welfare, and convenience and will benefit the
land therein, they shall ((call)) present a resolution to the county
auditor calling for a special election ((by presenting a resolution to
the county auditor at least forty‑five days prior to the proposed
election date. A special election shall be held on a date decided by the
commissioners in accordance with RCW 29.13.020)) to be held at a date
specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs forty-five or more days after the
resolution is presented, at which a ballot proposition authorizing the district
to be created shall be submitted to voters for their approval or rejection.
The commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of the election for four
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed
district, which notice shall state the hours during which the polls will be
open, the boundaries of the district as finally adopted and the object of the
election, and the notice shall also be posted ten days in ten public places in
the proposed district. ((In submitting the proposition to the voters, it
shall be expressed on the ballots in the following terms:

. . . . . District.................................... YES
G

. . . . .
District.................................... NO G

giving
the name of the district as provided in the petition. The proposition to be
effective must be)) The district shall be
created if the ballot proposition authorizing the district to be created is
approved by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition.

A
separate ballot proposition authorizing the district, if created, to impose a
single-year excess levy for the preliminary expenses of the district shall be
submitted to voters for their approval or rejection at the same special
election ((a proposition shall be submitted to the voters, for their
approval or rejection, authorizing the district, if formed, to impose on all
property located in the district a general tax for one year, in excess of the
limitations provided by law)), if the petition to create the district
also proposed that a ballot proposition authorizing an excess levy be submitted
to voters for their approval or rejection. The excess levy shall be proposed
in the amount specified in the petition to create the district, not to exceed
one dollar and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, ((for
general preliminary expenses of the district, that proposition to be expressed
on the ballots in the following terms:

One year
. . . . . . dollars and
. . . . . . cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value tax................. YES G

NO
G

Such
a ballot proposition)) and may only be
submitted to voters for their approval or rejection if the special election is
held in February, March, April, or May. The proposition to be effective must
be approved ((by at least three-fifths of the voters voting on the
proposition)) in the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the
state Constitution.

Sec.
2. RCW
57.08.005 and 1997 c 447 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A
district shall have the following powers:

(1)
To acquire by purchase or condemnation, or both, all lands, property and
property rights, and all water and water rights, both within and without the
district, necessary for its purposes. The right of eminent domain shall be
exercised in the same manner and by the same procedure as provided for cities
and towns, insofar as consistent with this title, except that all assessment or
reassessment rolls to be prepared and filed by eminent domain commissioners or
commissioners appointed by the court shall be prepared and filed by the
district, and the duties devolving upon the city treasurer are imposed upon the
county treasurer;

(2)
To lease real or personal property necessary for its purposes for a term of
years for which that leased property may reasonably be needed;

(3)
To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and supply waterworks to
furnish the district and inhabitants thereof and any other persons, both within
and without the district, with an ample supply of water for all uses and
purposes public and private with full authority to regulate and control the
use, content, distribution, and price thereof in such a manner as is not in
conflict with general law and may construct, acquire, or own buildings and
other necessary district facilities. Where a customer connected to the
district's system uses the water on an intermittent or transient basis, a
district may charge for providing water service to such a customer, regardless
of the amount of water, if any, used by the customer. District waterworks may
include facilities which result in combined water supply and electric
generation, if the electricity generated thereby is a byproduct of the water
supply system. That electricity may be used by the district or sold to any
entity authorized by law to use or distribute electricity. Electricity is
deemed a byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the primary
purpose of water supply. For such purposes, a district may take, condemn and
purchase, acquire, and retain water from any public or navigable lake, river or
watercourse, or any underflowing water, and by means of aqueducts or pipeline
conduct the same throughout the district and any city or town therein and carry
it along and upon public highways, roads, and streets, within and without such
district. For the purpose of constructing or laying aqueducts or pipelines,
dams, or waterworks or other necessary structures in storing and retaining
water or for any other lawful purpose such district may occupy the beds and
shores up to the high water mark of any such lake, river, or other watercourse,
and may acquire by purchase or condemnation such property or property rights or
privileges as may be necessary to protect its water supply from pollution. For
the purposes of waterworks which include facilities for the generation of
electricity as a byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to
authorize a district to condemn electric generating, transmission, or
distribution rights or facilities of entities authorized by law to distribute
electricity, or to acquire such rights or facilities without the consent of the
owner;

(4)
To purchase and take water from any municipal corporation, private person, or
entity. A district contiguous to Canada may contract with a Canadian
corporation for the purchase of water and for the construction, purchase,
maintenance, and supply of waterworks to furnish the district and inhabitants
thereof and residents of Canada with an ample supply of water under the terms
approved by the board of commissioners;

(5)
To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and operate systems of
sewers for the purpose of furnishing the district, the inhabitants thereof, and
persons outside the district with an adequate system of sewers for all uses and
purposes, public and private, including but not limited to on-site sewage
disposal facilities, approved septic tanks or approved septic tank systems,
on-site sanitary sewerage systems, inspection services and maintenance services
for private and public on-site systems, point and nonpoint water pollution
monitoring programs that are directly related to the sewerage facilities and
programs operated by a district, other facilities, programs, and systems for
the collection, interception, treatment, and disposal of wastewater, and for
the control of pollution from wastewater ((and for the protection,
preservation, and rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, facilities
for the drainage and treatment of storm or surface waters, public highways,
streets, and roads)) with full authority to regulate the use and operation
thereof and the service rates to be charged. Under this chapter, after July 1,
1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank of an on-site sewage system
should be based, among other things, on actual measurement of accumulation of
sludge and scum by a trained inspector, trained owner's agent, or trained
owner. Training must occur in a program approved by the state board of health
or by a local health officer. Sewage facilities may include facilities which
result in combined sewage disposal((,)) or treatment((, or
drainage)) and electric generation, except that the electricity generated
thereby is a byproduct of the system of sewers. Such electricity may be used
by the district or sold to any entity authorized by law to distribute
electricity. Electricity is deemed a byproduct when the electrical generation
is subordinate to the primary purpose of sewage disposal((,)) or
treatment((, or drainage)). For such purposes a district may conduct
sewage throughout the district and throughout other political subdivisions
within the district, and construct and lay sewer pipe along and upon public
highways, roads, and streets, within and without the district, and condemn and
purchase or acquire land and rights of way necessary for such sewer pipe. A
district may erect sewage treatment plants within or without the district, and
may acquire, by purchase or condemnation, properties or privileges necessary to
be had to protect any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and also other areas of
land from pollution from its sewers or its sewage treatment plant. For the purposes
of sewage facilities which include facilities that result in combined sewage
disposal((,)) or treatment((, or drainage)) and electric
generation where the electric generation is a byproduct, nothing in this
section may be construed to authorize a district to condemn electric
generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities of entities
authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire such rights or
facilities without the consent of the owners;

(6)
To construct, condemn and purchase, add to, maintain, and operate systems of
drainage for the benefit and use of the district, the inhabitants thereof, and
persons outside the district with an adequate system of drainage, including but
not limited to facilities and systems for the collection, interception,
treatment, and disposal of storm or surface waters, and for the protection,
preservation, and rehabilitation of surface and underground waters, and
drainage facilities for public highways, streets, and roads, with full
authority to regulate the use and operation thereof and the service rates to be
charged. Drainage facilities may include natural systems. Drainage facilities
may include facilities which result in combined drainage facilities and
electric generation, except that the electricity generated thereby is a
byproduct of the drainage system. Such electricity may be used by the district
or sold to any entity authorized by law to distribute electricity. Electricity
is deemed a byproduct when the electrical generation is subordinate to the
primary purpose of drainage collection, disposal, and treatment. For such
purposes, a district may conduct storm or surface water throughout the district
and throughout other political subdivisions within the district, construct and
lay drainage pipe and culverts along and upon public highways, roads, and
streets, within and without the district, and condemn and purchase or acquire
land and rights of way necessary for such drainage systems. A district may
provide or erect facilities and improvements for the treatment and disposal of
storm or surface water within or without the district, and may acquire, by
purchase or condemnation, properties or privileges necessary to be had to
protect any lakes, rivers, or watercourses and also other areas of land from
pollution from storm or surface waters. For the purposes of drainage
facilities which include facilities that also generate electricity as a
byproduct, nothing in this section may be construed to authorize a district to
condemn electric generating, transmission, or distribution rights or facilities
of entities authorized by law to distribute electricity, or to acquire such
rights or facilities without the consent of the owners;

(7)
To construct, condemn, acquire, and own buildings and other necessary district
facilities;

(((7)))
(8) To compel all property owners within the district located within an
area served by the district's system of sewers to connect their private drain
and sewer systems with the district's system under such penalty as the
commissioners shall prescribe by resolution. The district may for such purpose
enter upon private property and connect the private drains or sewers with the
district system and the cost thereof shall be charged against the property
owner and shall be a lien upon property served;

(((8)))
(9) Where a district contains within its borders, abuts, or is located
adjacent to any lake, stream, ground water as defined by RCW 90.44.035, or
other waterway within the state of Washington, to provide for the reduction,
minimization, or elimination of pollutants from those waters in accordance with
the district's comprehensive plan, and to issue general obligation bonds,
revenue bonds, local improvement district bonds, or utility local improvement
bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of reducing,
minimizing, or eliminating the pollutants from these waters;

(((9)))
(10) To fix rates and charges for water, sewer, and drain service
supplied and to charge property owners seeking to connect to the district's
systems, as a condition to granting the right to so connect, in addition to the
cost of the connection, such reasonable connection charge as the board of
commissioners shall determine to be proper in order that those property owners
shall bear their equitable share of the cost of the system. For the purposes
of calculating a connection charge, the board of commissioners shall determine
the pro rata share of the cost of existing facilities and facilities planned
for construction within the next ten years and contained in an adopted
comprehensive plan and other costs borne by the district which are directly
attributable to the improvements required by property owners seeking to connect
to the system. The cost of existing facilities shall not include those
portions of the system which have been donated or which have been paid for by
grants. The connection charge may include interest charges applied from the
date of construction of the system until the connection, or for a period not to
exceed ten years, whichever is shorter, at a rate commensurate with the rate of
interest applicable to the district at the time of construction or major
rehabilitation of the system, or at the time of installation of the lines to
which the property owner is seeking to connect. A district may permit payment
of the cost of connection and the reasonable connection charge to be paid with
interest in installments over a period not exceeding fifteen years. The county
treasurer may charge and collect a fee of three dollars for each year for the
treasurer's services. Those fees shall be a charge to be included as part of
each annual installment, and shall be credited to the county current expense
fund by the county treasurer. Revenues from connection charges excluding permit
fees are to be considered payments in aid of construction as defined by
department of revenue rule. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and
maintenance services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.

Before
adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility services, or incorporating
residences into an on-site inspection and maintenance or sewer utility under
this chapter, notification must be provided, prior to the applicable public hearing,
to all residences within the proposed service area that have on-site systems
permitted by the local health officer. The notice must clearly state that the
residence is within the proposed service area and must provide information on
estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the service.

A
water-sewer district shall not provide on-site sewage system inspection,
pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services under this section
using water-sewer district employees unless the on-site system is connected by
a publicly owned collection system to the water-sewer district's sewerage
system, and the on-site system represents the first step in the sewage disposal
process.

Except
as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity and public property,
including the state of Washington and state property, shall be subject to rates
and charges for sewer, water, storm water control, drainage, and street
lighting facilities to the same extent private persons and private property are
subject to those rates and charges that are imposed by districts. In setting
those rates and charges, consideration may be made of in-kind services, such as
stream improvements or donation of property;

(((10)))
(11) To contract with individuals, associations and corporations, the
state of Washington, and the United States;

(((11)))
(12) To employ such persons as are needed to carry out the district's
purposes and fix salaries and any bond requirements for those employees;

(((12)))
(13) To contract for the provision of engineering, legal, and other
professional services as in the board of commissioner's discretion is necessary
in carrying out their duties;

(((13)))
(14) To sue and be sued;

(((14)))
(15) To loan and borrow funds and to issue bonds and instruments
evidencing indebtedness under chapter 57.20 RCW and other applicable laws;

(((15)))
(16) To transfer funds, real or personal property, property interests,
or services subject to RCW 57.08.015;

(((16)))
(17) To levy taxes in accordance with this chapter and chapters 57.04
and 57.20 RCW;

(((17)))
(18) To provide for making local improvements and to levy and collect
special assessments on property benefitted thereby, and for paying for the same
or any portion thereof in accordance with chapter 57.16 RCW;

(((18)))
(19) To establish street lighting systems under RCW 57.08.060;

(((19)))
(20) To exercise such other powers as are granted to water-sewer
districts by this title or other applicable laws; and

(((20)))
(21) To exercise any of the powers granted to cities and counties with
respect to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, operation of, and fixing
rates and charges for waterworks and systems of sewerage and drainage.

Sec.
3. RCW
57.08.014 and 1996 c 230 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the authority of a district to establish classifications for rates
and charges and impose such rates and charges, a district may adjust or delay
those rates and charges for low-income persons or classes of low-income
persons, including but not limited to, ((poor)) low-income
handicapped persons and ((poor)) low-income senior citizens.
Other financial assistance available to low-income persons shall be considered
in determining charges and rates under this section. Notification of special
rates or charges established under this section shall be provided to all
persons served by the district annually and upon initiating service.
Information on cost shifts caused by establishment of the special rates or
charges shall be included in the notification. Any reduction in charges and
rates granted to low-income persons in one part of a service area shall be
uniformly extended to low-income persons in all other parts of the service
area.

Sec.
4. RCW
57.08.015 and 1996 c 230 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of commissioners of a district may sell, at public or private sale,
property belonging to the district if the board determines that the property is
not and will not be needed for district purposes and if the board gives notice
of intention to sell as in this section provided. However, no such notice of
intention shall be required to sell personal property of less than two thousand
five hundred dollars in value.

The
notice of intention to sell shall be published once a week for two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The notice shall
describe the property and state the time and place at which it will be sold or
offered for sale, the terms of sale, whether the property is to be sold at
public or private sale, and if at public sale the notice shall call for bids,
fix the conditions of the bids and reserve the right to reject any and all bids
for good cause.

Sec.
5. RCW
57.08.016 and 1996 c 230 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be no private sale of real property where the appraised value
exceeds the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars. Subject to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section, no real property of the district
shall be sold for less than ninety percent of the value thereof as established
by a written appraisal made not more than six months prior to the date of sale by
three disinterested real estate brokers licensed under the laws of the state or
professionally designated real estate appraisers as defined in RCW 74.46.020.
The appraisal shall be signed by the appraisers and filed with the secretary of
the board of commissioners of the district, who shall keep it at the office of
the district open to public inspection. Any notice of intention to sell real
property of the district shall recite the appraised value thereof.

(2)
If no purchasers can be obtained for the property at ninety percent or more of
its appraised value after one hundred twenty days of offering the property for
sale, the board of commissioners of the district may adopt a resolution stating
that the district has been unable to sell the property at the ninety percent
amount. The district then may sell the property at the highest price it can
obtain at public auction. A notice of intention to sell at public auction
shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district. The notice shall describe the property,
state the time and place at which it will be offered for sale and the terms of
sale, and shall call for bids, fix the conditions thereof, and reserve the
right to reject any and all bids for good cause.

Sec.
6. RCW
57.08.030 and 1996 c 230 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever any district shall have installed a distributing system of water mains
and laterals, and as a source of supply of water shall be purchasing or
intending to purchase water from any city or town, and whenever it appears to
be advantageous to the water consumers in the district that such city or town
shall take over the water system of the district and supply water to those water
users, the commissioners of the district, when authorized as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, shall have the right to convey the distributing
system to that city or town if that city or town is willing to accept,
maintain, and repair the same.

(2)
Should the commissioners of the district decide that it would be to the
advantage of the water consumers of the district to make the conveyance
provided for in subsection (1) of this section, they shall cause the
proposition of making that conveyance to be submitted to the voters of the
district at any general election or at a special election to be called for the
purpose of voting on the same. If at the election a majority of the voters
voting on the proposition shall be in favor of making the conveyance, the
district commissioners shall have the right to convey to the city or town the
mains and laterals belonging to the district upon the city or town entering
into a contract satisfactory to the commissioners to maintain and repair the
same.

(3)
Whenever a city or town located wholly or in part within a district shall enter
into a contract with the commissioners of a district providing that the city or
town shall take over all of the operation of the water supply facilities
of the district located within its boundaries, the area of the district located
within the city or town shall upon the execution of the contract cease to be
served by the district for water service purposes. However, the affected land
within that city or town shall remain liable for the payment of all
assessments, any lien upon the property at the time of the execution of the
agreement, and for any lien of all general obligation bonds due at the date of
the contract, and the city or town shall remain liable for its fair
prorated share of the debt of the area for any revenue bonds, outstanding as of
the date of contract.

Sec.
7. RCW
57.08.044 and 1996 c 230 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:

A
district may enter into contracts with any county, city, town, or any other
municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, or with any private person or
corporation, for the acquisition, ownership, use, and operation of any
property, facilities, or services, within or without the district, and
necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of the district. A district
may provide water, sewer, drainage, or street lighting services to property
owners in areas within or without the limits of the district, except that if
the area to be served is located within another existing district duly
authorized to exercise district powers in that area, then water, sewer,
drainage, or street lighting service may not be so provided by contract or
otherwise without the consent by resolution of the board of commissioners of
that other district.

Sec.
8. RCW
57.08.047 and 1996 c 230 s 310 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provision of water ((or)), sewer, or drainage service
beyond the boundaries of a district may be subject to potential review by a
boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

Sec.
9. RCW
57.08.050 and 1998 c 278 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of five thousand
dollars shall be let by contract. All contract projects, the estimated cost of
which is in excess of five thousand dollars and less than fifty thousand
dollars, may be awarded to a contractor using the small works roster process
provided in RCW 39.04.155. The board of commissioners may set up uniform
procedures to prequalify contractors for inclusion on the small works roster.
All contract projects equal to or in excess of fifty thousand dollars shall be
let by competitive bidding. Before awarding any such contract the board of
commissioners shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation
where the district is located at least once thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for such work,
plans and specifications which must at the time of publication of such notice
be on file in the office of the board of commissioners subject to the public
inspection. The notice shall state generally the work to be done and shall
call for proposals for doing the same to be sealed and filed with the board of
commissioners on or before the day and hour named therein.

Each
bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or postal money
order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a sum not less than five
percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied by a bid bond in an amount not
less than five percent of the bid with a corporate surety licensed to do business
in the state, conditioned that the bidder will pay the district as liquidated
damages the amount specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters into a
contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be considered
unless accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and place
named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of
commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such contract to
the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file or to the
best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and specifications. The board of
commissioners may reject all bids for good cause and readvertise and in such
case all checks, cash or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the
contract is let, then all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the
bidders, except that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a
contract shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners in the
full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the commission in
accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in
accordance with the bid and furnish the bond within ten days from the date at
which the bidder is notified that the bidder is the successful bidder, the
check, cash, or bid bonds and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the
district. If the bidder fails to enter into a contract in accordance with the
bidder's bid, and the board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal
action to collect on any bid bond required by this section, then the district
shall be entitled to collect from the bidder any legal expenses, including
reasonable attorneys' fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder who claims error
and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same
project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2)
Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost in
excess of ten thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Any purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost of less than fifty
thousand dollars shall be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190.
Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of
fifty thousand dollars or more shall be made by competitive bidding following
the procedure for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this
section.

(3)
The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section
pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies
to the purchase or public work.

Sec.
10. RCW
57.08.065 and 1997 c 447 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A district shall have power to establish, maintain, and operate a mutual water,
sewerage, drainage, and street lighting system, a mutual system of any two or
three of the systems, or separate systems.

(2)
Where any two or more districts include the same territory as of July 1, 1997,
none of the overlapping districts may provide any service that was made
available by any of the other districts prior to July 1, 1997, within the
overlapping territory without the consent by resolution of the board of
commissioners of the other district or districts.

(3)
A district that was a water district prior to July 1, 1997, that did not
operate a system of sewerage or drainage prior to July 1, 1997, may not
proceed to exercise the powers to establish, maintain, construct, and operate
any system of sewerage or drainage without first obtaining written
approval and certification of necessity from the department of ecology and
department of health. Any comprehensive plan for a system of sewers or drainages
or addition thereto or betterment thereof, proposed by a district that
was a water district prior to July 1, 1997, shall be approved by the same
county and state officials as were required to approve such plans adopted by a
sewer district immediately prior to July 1, 1997, and as subsequently may be
required.

Sec.
11. RCW
57.08.081 and 1998 c 285 s 2 and 1998 c 106 s 9 are each reenacted to read as
follows:

(1)
The commissioners of any district shall provide for revenues by fixing rates
and charges for furnishing sewer and drainage service and facilities to those
to whom service is available or for providing water, such rates and charges to
be fixed as deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will
be made for the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and
charges may be combined for the furnishing of more than one type of sewer or
drainage service and facilities.

(2)
In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage system, the board of
commissioners may in its discretion consider any or all of the following
factors: The difference in cost to various customers; the location of the
various customers within and without the district; the difference in cost of
maintenance, operation, repair, and replacement of the various parts of the
system; the different character of the service furnished various customers; the
quantity and quality of the service and facility furnished; the time of its
use; the achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including but not
limited to assessments; and any other matters which present a reasonable
difference as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be established as deemed
proper by the commissioners and as fixed by resolution and shall produce
revenues sufficient to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation,
revenue bond and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and
all other charges necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system.
Prior to furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee
payment for services. However, failure to require a deposit does not affect
the validity of any lien authorized by this section.

(3)
The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection charges, and rates and
charges for water supplied against property owners connecting with the system
or receiving such water, and for sewer and drainage services charged against
property to which and its owners to whom the service is available, such charges
being deemed charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of
not more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution that
where either connection charges or rates and charges for services supplied are
delinquent for any specified period of time, the district shall certify the
delinquencies to the auditor of the county in which the real property is
located, and the charges and any penalties added thereto and interest thereon
at the rate of not more than the prime lending rate of the district's bank plus
four percentage points per year shall be a lien against the property upon which
the service was received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.

(4)
The district may, at any time after the connection charges or rates and charges
for services supplied or available and penalties are delinquent for a period of
sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by civil action in the superior court of
the county in which the real property is located. The court may allow, in
addition to the costs and disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees,
title search and report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The
action shall be in rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against
an individual or against all of those who are delinquent in one action. The
laws and rules of the court shall control as in other civil actions.

(5)
In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section, the district
may also cut off all or part of the service after charges for water or sewer
service supplied or available are delinquent for a period of thirty days.

(6)
A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past due accounts.

(7)
A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's designee with
duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an owner or the owner's
designee that a tenant's service account is delinquent. However, if an owner
or the owner's designee notifies the district in writing that a property served
by the district is a rental property, asks to be notified of a tenant's
delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate mailing
address, the district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of a
tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a district
provides a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of
tenant utility service bills or notice that a tenant's utility account is
delinquent, the district shall notify the tenant that it is providing the
duplicate bills or delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's designee.
After January 1, 1999, if a district fails to notify the owner of a tenant's
delinquency after receiving a written request to do so and after receiving the
other information required by this subsection (7), the district shall have no
lien against the premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

Sec.
12. RCW
57.08.085 and 1996 c 230 s 315 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in RCW 90.03.525, any public entity and public property,
including state of Washington property, shall be subject to rates and charges
for ((storm water control)) drainage facilities to the same
extent as private persons and private property are subject to such rates and
charges that are imposed by districts pursuant to RCW 57.08.005 or 57.08.081.
In setting those rates and charges, consideration may be given to in-kind
services, such as stream improvements or donation of property.

Sec.
13. RCW
57.08.110 and 1996 c 230 s 318 are each amended to read as follows:

To
improve the organization and operation of districts, the commissioners of two
or more such districts may form an association thereof, for the purpose of
securing and disseminating information of value to the members of the
association and for the purpose of promoting the more economical and efficient
operation of the comprehensive plans of water supply ((and)),
sewage treatment and disposal, and drainage collection, treatment, and
disposal in their respective districts. The commissioners of districts so
associated shall adopt articles of association, select such officers as they
may determine, and employ and discharge such agents and employees as shall be
deemed convenient to carry out the purposes of the association. District
commissioners and employees are authorized to attend meetings of the
association. The expenses of an association may be paid from the maintenance
or general funds of the associated districts in such manner as shall be
provided in the articles of association. However, the aggregate contributions
made to an association by a district in any calendar year shall not exceed the
amount that would be raised by a levy of two and one-half cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value against the taxable property of the district. ((The
financial records of such an association shall be subject to audit by the state
auditor.))

Sec.
14. RCW
57.08.180 and 1996 c 230 s 322 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is unlawful and a misdemeanor to make, or cause to be made, or to maintain any
connection with any sewer, drainage, or water system of any district, or
with any sewer, drainage, or water system which is connected directly or
indirectly with any sewer, drainage, or water system of any district
without having permission from the district.

Sec.
15. RCW
57.16.060 and 1996 c 230 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
improvement districts or utility local improvement districts to carry out the
whole or any portion of the general comprehensive plan of improvements or plan
providing for additions and betterments to an original general comprehensive
plan previously adopted may be initiated either by resolution of the board of
commissioners or by petition signed by the owners according to the records of
the office of the applicable county auditor of at least fifty-one percent of
the area of the land within the limits of the improvement district to be
created.

In
case the board of commissioners desires to initiate the formation of an
improvement district by resolution, it first shall pass a resolution declaring
its intention to order the improvement, setting forth the nature and territorial
extent of such proposed improvement, designating the number of the proposed
improvement district, and describing the boundaries thereof, stating the
estimated cost and expense of the improvement and the proportionate amount
thereof which will be borne by the property within the proposed improvement
district, and fixing a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the
formation of the proposed improvement district.

In
case any such improvement district is initiated by petition, the petition shall
set forth the nature and territorial extent of the proposed improvement
requested to be ordered and the fact that the signers thereof are the owners
according to the records of the applicable county auditor of at least fifty-one
percent of the area of land within the limits of the improvement district to be
created. Upon the filing of such petition the board shall determine whether
the petition is sufficient, and the board's determination thereof shall be
conclusive upon all persons. No person may withdraw his or her name from the
petition after it has been filed with the board of commissioners. If the board
finds the petition to be sufficient, it shall proceed to adopt a resolution
declaring its intention to order the improvement petitioned for, setting forth
the nature and territorial extent of the improvement, designating the number of
the proposed improvement district and describing the boundaries thereof,
stating the estimated cost and expense of the improvement and the proportionate
amount thereof which will be borne by the property within the proposed
improvement district, and fixing a date, time, and place for a public hearing
on the formation of the proposed improvement district.

Notice
of the adoption of the resolution of intention, whether the resolution was
adopted on the initiative of the board or pursuant to a petition of the
property owners, shall be published in at least two consecutive issues of a
newspaper of general circulation in the proposed improvement district, the date
of the first publication to be at least fifteen days prior to the date fixed by
such resolution for hearing before the board of commissioners. Notice of the
adoption of the resolution of intention shall also be given each owner or
reputed owner of any lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property within the
proposed improvement district by mailing the notice at least fifteen days
before the date fixed for the public hearing to the owner or reputed owner of
the property as shown on the tax rolls of the county ((auditor)) treasurer
of the county in which the real property is located at the address shown
thereon. Whenever such notices are mailed, the commissioners shall maintain a
list of the reputed property owners, which list shall be kept on file at a
location within the district and shall be made available for public perusal.
The notices shall refer to the resolution of intention and designate the
proposed improvement district by number. The notices also shall set forth the
nature of the proposed improvement, the total estimated cost, the proportion of
total cost to be borne by assessments, and the date, time, and place of the
hearing before the board of commissioners. In the case of improvements
initiated by resolution, the notice also shall: (1) State that all persons
desiring to object to the formation of the proposed district must file their
written protests with the secretary of the board of commissioners no later than
ten days after the public hearing; (2) state that if owners of at least forty
percent of the area of land within the proposed improvement district file
written protests with the secretary of the board, the power of the
commissioners to proceed with the creation of the proposed improvement district
shall be divested; (3) provide the name and address of the secretary of the
board; and (4) state the hours and location within the district where the names
of the property owners within the proposed improvement district are kept
available for public perusal. In the case of the notice given each owner or
reputed owner by mail, the notice shall set forth the estimated amount of the
cost and expense of such improvement to be borne by the particular lot, tract,
parcel of land, or other property.

Sec.
16. RCW
57.16.110 and 1998 c 106 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
any land against which there has been levied any special assessment by any
district shall have been sold in part or ((subdivided)) divided,
the board of commissioners of the district shall have the power to order a
segregation of the assessment.

Any
person desiring to have a special assessment against a tract of land segregated
to apply to smaller parts thereof shall apply to the board of commissioners of
the district that levied the assessment. If the commissioners determine that a
segregation should be made, they shall by resolution order the treasurer of the
county in which the real property is located to make segregation on the
original assessment roll as directed in the resolution. The segregation shall
be made as nearly as possible on the same basis as the original assessment was
levied, and the total of the segregated parts of the assessment shall equal the
assessment before segregation. The resolution shall describe the original
tract and the amount and date of the original assessment, and shall define the
boundaries of the divided parts and the amount of the assessment chargeable to
each part. A certified copy of the resolution shall be delivered to the
treasurer of the county in which the real property is located who shall proceed
to make the segregation. The board of commissioners may require as a condition
to the order of segregation that the person seeking it pay the district the
reasonable engineering and clerical costs incident to making the segregation.

Sec.
17. RCW
57.20.120 and 1996 c 230 s 714 are each amended to read as follows:

A
district may contract indebtedness in excess of the amount named in RCW
57.20.110, but not exceeding in amount, together with existing indebtedness,
two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property in that district,
as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW
39.36.015, and impose excess property tax levies to retire the indebtedness
whenever ((three‑fifths of the voters voting at the election in such
district assent thereto, at which election the total number of persons voting
on the proposition shall constitute not less than forty percent of the total
number of votes cast in the district at the last preceding general election))
a ballot proposition authorizing the indebtedness and excess levies is
approved as provided under Article VII, section 2, and Article VIII, section 6,
of the state Constitution, at an election to be held in the district in the
manner provided by this title and RCW 39.36.050.

Sec.
18. RCW
57.20.140 and 1996 c 230 s 717 are each amended to read as follows:

The
treasurer ((designated under RCW 57.20.135)) shall create and maintain a
separate fund designated as the maintenance fund or general fund of the
district into which shall be paid all money received by the treasurer from the
collection of taxes other than taxes levied for the payment of general
obligation bonds of the district and all revenues of the district other than
assessments levied in local improvement districts or utility local improvement
districts, and no money shall be disbursed therefrom except upon warrants of
the county auditor issued by authority of the commissioners or upon a
resolution of the commissioners ordering a transfer to any other fund of the
district. The treasurer also shall maintain such other special funds as may be
prescribed by the district, into which shall be placed such money as the board
of commissioners may by its resolution direct, and from which disbursements
shall be made upon proper warrants of the county auditor issued against the
same by authority of the board of commissioners.

Sec.
19. RCW
57.24.040 and 1996 c 230 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The annexation election shall be held on the date designated in the notice and
shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of the state.
If the original petition for annexation is signed by qualified voters, then
only qualified voters at the date of election residing in the territory
proposed to be annexed, shall be permitted to vote at the election.

(2)
If the original petition for annexation is signed by property owners as
provided for in this chapter, then no person shall be entitled to vote at that
election unless at the time of the filing of the original petition he or she
owned land in the district of record and in addition thereto at the date of
election shall be a qualified voter of the county in which such district is
located. It shall be the duty of the county auditor, upon request of the
county legislative authority, to certify the names of all persons owning land
in the district at the date of the filing of the original petition as shown by
the records of the auditor's office; and at any such election the county
auditor may require any such property owner offering to vote to take an oath
that the property owner is a qualified voter of the county before the property
owner shall be allowed to vote. However, at any election held under the
provisions of this chapter an officer or agent of any corporation having its
principal place of business in the county and owning land at the date of filing
the original petition in the district duly authorized in writing may cast a
vote on behalf of such corporation. When so voting the person shall file with
the county auditor such a written instrument of that person's authority.

(3)
If the majority of the votes cast upon the question of such election shall be
for annexation, then the territory concerned shall immediately be and become
annexed to such district and the same shall then forthwith be a part of the
district, the same as though originally included in that district.

Sec.
20. RCW
57.24.050 and 1996 c 230 s 905 are each amended to read as follows:

All
elections held pursuant to this chapter, whether general or special, shall be
conducted by the county ((election board)) auditor of the county
in which the district is located. The expense of all such elections shall be
paid for out of the funds of such district.

Sec.
21. RCW
57.28.050 and 1996 c 230 s 1007 are each amended to read as follows:

The
petition for withdrawal shall be heard at the time and place specified in such
notice or the hearing may be adjourned from time to time, not exceeding one
month in all, and any person may appear at such hearing and make objections to
the withdrawal of such territory or to the proposed boundary lines thereof.
Upon final hearing on the petition for withdrawal, the board of commissioners
of the district shall make such changes in the proposed boundary lines as it
deems to be proper, except that no changes in the boundary lines shall be made
by the board of commissioners to include lands not within the boundaries of the
territory as described in such petition. In establishing and defining such
boundaries the board of commissioners shall exclude any property which is then
being furnished with water ((or)), sewer, or drainage
service by the district or which is included in any distribution or collection
system the construction of which is included within any duly established local
improvement district or utility local improvement district, and the territory
as finally established and defined must be substantial in area and consist of
adjoining or contiguous properties. The board of commissioners shall thereupon
make and by resolution adopt findings of fact as to the following questions:

(1)
Would the withdrawal of such territory be of benefit to such territory?

(2)
Would such withdrawal be conducive to the general welfare of the balance of the
district?

Such
findings shall be entered in the records of the district, together with any
recommendations the board of commissioners may by resolution adopt.

Sec.
22. RCW
57.32.023 and 1996 c 230 s 1106 are each amended to read as follows:

If
at the election a majority of the voters in each of the consolidating districts
vote in favor of the consolidation, the ((county canvassing board shall so
declare in its canvass and the return of such election shall be made within ten
days after the date thereof. Upon the return)) consolidation shall be authorized.
The consolidation shall be effective and the consolidating districts shall
cease to exist and shall then be and become a new district and municipal
corporation of the state of Washington, upon the certification of the
election results. The name of the new district shall be
". . . . . Water-Sewer District,"
". . . . . Water District,"
". . . . . Sewer District," or
". . . . . District No.
. . . . .," which shall be the name appearing on the
ballot. The district shall have all and every power, right, and privilege
possessed by other water-sewer, sewer, or water districts of the state of
Washington. The district may issue revenue bonds to pay for the construction
of any additions and betterments set forth in the comprehensive plan of water
supply, sewer, and drainage services contained in the agreement for
consolidation and any future additions and betterments to the comprehensive
plan of water supply, sewer, and drainage services, as its board of district
commissioners shall by resolution adopt, without submitting a proposition
therefor to the voters of the district.

Sec.
23. RCW
57.36.040 and 1996 c 230 s 1205 are each amended to read as follows:

If
at such election a majority of the voters of the merging district or districts
shall vote in favor of the merger, the ((county canvassing board shall so
declare in its canvass and the return of such election shall be made within ten
days after the date thereof, and upon such return)) merger shall be
authorized. The merger shall be effective and the merging district or
districts shall cease to exist and shall become a part of the merger district,
upon the certification of the election results. The commissioners of the
merging district or districts shall hold office as commissioners of the new
merged district until their respective terms of office expire or until they
resign from office if the resignation is before the expiration of their terms
of office. The election of commissioners in the merger district after the
merger shall occur as provided in RCW 57.32.130 in a consolidated district
after the consolidation.

Sec.
24. RCW
57.90.010 and 1996 c 230 s 1502 are each amended to read as follows:

Water-sewer,
((sewer, water,)) park and recreation, metropolitan park, county rural
library, cemetery, flood control, mosquito control, diking and drainage,
irrigation or reclamation, weed, health, or fire protection districts, and any
air pollution control authority, hereinafter referred to as "special
districts," which are located wholly or in part within a county with a
population of two hundred ten thousand or more may be disincorporated when the
district has not actively carried out any of the special purposes or functions
for which it was formed within the preceding consecutive five-year period.

PART II -
MISCELLANEOUS CORRECTIONS

Sec.
25. RCW
27.12.470 and 1994 c 198 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A
rural partial-county library district may be created in a portion of the
unincorporated area of a county as provided in this section if a rural county
library district, intercounty rural library district, or island library
district has not been created in the county.

The
procedure to create a rural partial-county library district is initiated by the
filing of petitions with the county auditor proposing the creation of the
district that have been signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters
residing in the area proposed to be included in the rural partial-county
library district. The county auditor shall review the petitions and certify
the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures to the county legislative
authority.

If
the petitions are certified as having sufficient valid signatures, the county
legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rural
partial-county library district, may adjust the boundaries of the proposed
district, and may cause a ballot proposition to be submitted to the voters of
the proposed rural partial-county library district authorizing its creation if
the county legislative authority finds that the creation of the rural
partial-county library district is in the public interest. A subsequent public
hearing shall be held if additional territory is added to the proposed rural
partial-county library district by action of the county legislative authority.

The
rural partial-county library district shall be created if the ballot
proposition authorizing the creation of the district is approved by a simple
majority vote of the voters voting on the proposition. Immediately after
creation of the rural partial-county library district the county legislative
authority shall appoint a board of library trustees for the district as
provided under RCW 27.12.190.

Except
as provided in this section, a rural partial-county library district is subject
to all the provisions of law applicable to a rural county library district and
shall have all the powers, duties, and authorities of a rural county library
district, including, but not limited to, the authority to impose property
taxes, incur debt, and annex a city or town with a population of less than one
hundred thousand at the time of the annexation that is located in the same
county as the rural partial-county library district.

Adjacent
unincorporated territory in the county may be annexed to a rural partial-county
library district in the same manner as territory is annexed to a water-sewer
district, except that an annexation is not subject to potential review by a
boundary review board.

If,
at the time of creation, a rural partial-county library district has an
assessed valuation of less than fifty million dollars, it may provide library
services only by contracting for the services through an interlocal agreement
with an adjacent library district, or an adjacent city or town that maintains
its own library. If the assessed valuation of the rural partial-county library
district subsequently reaches fifty million dollars as a result of annexation
or appreciation, the fifty million dollar limitation shall not apply.

If
a ballot proposition is approved creating a rural county library district in
the county, every rural partial-county library district in that county shall be
dissolved and its assets and liabilities transferred to the rural county
library district. Where a rural partial-county library district has annexed a
city or town, the voters of the city or town shall be allowed to vote on the
proposed creation of a rural county library district and, if created, the rural
county library district shall include each city and town that was annexed to
the rural partial-county library district.

Nothing
in this section authorizes the consolidation of a rural partial-county library
district with any rural county library district; island library district; city,
county, or regional library; intercounty library district; or other rural
partial-county library district, unless, in addition to any other requirements
imposed by statute, the boards of all library districts involved approve the
consolidation.

Sec.
26. RCW
32.20.070 and 1955 c 13 s 32.20.070 are each amended to read as follows:

A
mutual savings bank may invest its funds in the valid warrants or bonds of any
county, city, town, school district, port district, water-sewer
district, or other municipal corporation in the state of Washington issued
pursuant to law and for the payment of which the faith and credit of such
county, municipality, or district is pledged and taxes are leviable upon all
taxable property within its limits.

A
mutual savings bank may invest its funds in the water revenue, sewer revenue,
or electric revenue bonds of any city or public utility district of this state
for the payment of which the entire revenue of the city's or district's water
system, sewer system, or electric system, less maintenance and operating costs,
is irrevocably pledged.

Sec.
27. RCW
32.20.110 and 1955 c 13 s 32.20.110 are each amended to read as follows:

A
mutual savings bank may invest its funds in the bonds of any port district, ((water
district,)) sanitary district, water-sewer district, tunnel
district, bridge district, flood control district, park district, or highway
district in the United States which has a population as shown by the last
decennial federal census of not less than one hundred fifty thousand
inhabitants, and has taxable real property with an assessed valuation in excess
of two hundred million dollars and has power to levy taxes on the taxable real
property therein for the payment of the bonds without limitation of rate or
amount.

Sec.
28. RCW
35.13A.020 and 1998 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever all of the territory of a ((water‑sewer)) district is
included within the corporate boundaries of a city, the city legislative body
may adopt a resolution or ordinance to assume jurisdiction over all of the
district.

(2)
Upon the assumption, all real and personal property, franchises, rights,
assets, taxes levied but not collected for the district for other than
indebtedness, water, sewer, and drainage facilities, and all other facilities
and equipment of the district shall become the property of the city subject to
all financial, statutory, or contractual obligations of the district for the
security or performance of which the property may have been pledged. The city,
in addition to its other powers, shall have the power to manage, control,
maintain, and operate the property, facilities and equipment and to fix and
collect service and other charges from owners and occupants of properties so
served by the city, subject, however, to any outstanding indebtedness, bonded
or otherwise, of the district payable from taxes, assessments, or revenues of
any kind or nature and to any other contractual obligations of the district.

(3)
The city may by resolution or ordinance of its legislative body, assume the
obligation of paying such district indebtedness and of levying and of
collecting or causing to be collected the district taxes, assessments, and
utility rates and charges of any kind or nature to pay and secure the payment
of the indebtedness, according to all of the terms, conditions and covenants
incident to the indebtedness, and shall assume and perform all other
outstanding contractual obligation of the district in accordance with all of
their terms, conditions, and covenants. An assumption shall not be deemed to
impair the obligation of any indebtedness or other contractual obligation.
During the period until the outstanding indebtedness of the district has been
discharged, the territory of the district and the owners and occupants of
property therein, shall continue to be liable for its and their proportionate
share of the indebtedness, including any outstanding assessments levied within
any local improvement district or utility local improvement district thereof.
The city shall assume the obligation of causing the payment of the district's
indebtedness, collecting the district's taxes, assessments, and charges, and
observing and performing the other district contractual obligations. The
legislative body of the city shall act as the officers of the district for the
purpose of certifying the amount of any property tax to be levied and collected
therein, and causing service and other charges and assessments to be collected
from the property or owners or occupants thereof, enforcing the collection and
performing all other acts necessary to ensure performance of the district's
contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same means as if the
territory of the district had not been included within the boundaries of a
city.

When
a city assumes the obligation of paying the outstanding indebtedness, and if
property taxes or assessments have been levied and service and other charges
have accrued for this purpose but have not been collected by the district prior
to the assumption, the same when collected shall belong and be paid to the city
and be used by the city so far as necessary for payment of the indebtedness of
the district existing and unpaid on the date the city assumes the
indebtedness. Any funds received by the city which have been collected for the
purpose of paying any bonded or other indebtedness of the district, shall be
used for the purpose for which they were collected and for no other purpose.
Any outstanding indebtedness shall be paid as provided in the terms,
conditions, and covenants of the indebtedness. All funds of the district on deposit
with the county treasurer at the time of title transfer shall be used by the
city solely for the benefit of the assumed utility and shall not be transferred
to or used for the benefit of the city's general fund.

Sec.
29. RCW
35.13A.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a portion of a ((water district or sewer)) district equal to at least
sixty percent of the area or sixty percent of the assessed valuation of the
real property lying within such district, is included within the corporate
boundaries of a city, the city may assume by ordinance the full and complete
management and control of that portion of the entire district not included
within another city, whereupon the provisions of RCW 35.13A.020 shall be
operative; or the city may proceed directly under the provisions of RCW
35.13A.050.

Sec.
30. RCW
35.13A.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the portion of a ((water or sewer)) district included within the
corporate boundaries of a city is less than sixty percent of the area of the
district and less than sixty percent of the assessed valuation of the real
property within the district, the city may elect to proceed under the
provisions of RCW 35.13A.050.

Sec.
31. RCW
35.13A.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
more than one city, in whole or in part, is included within a ((water
district or sewer)) district, the city which has within its boundaries
sixty percent or more of the area of the assessed valuation of the district (in
this section referred to as the "principal city") may, with the
approval of any other city containing part of such district, assume
responsibility for operation and maintenance of the district's property,
facilities and equipment within such other city and make and enforce such
charges for operation, maintenance and retirement of indebtedness as may be
reasonable under all the circumstances.

Any
other city having less than sixty percent in area or assessed valuation of such
district, within its boundaries may install facilities and create local
improvement districts or otherwise finance the cost of installation of such
facilities and if such facilities have been installed in accordance with
reasonable standards fixed by the principal city, such other city may connect
such facilities to the utility system of such district operated by the
principal city upon providing for payment by the owners or occupants of
properties served thereby, of such charges established by the principal city as
may be reasonable under the circumstances.

Sec.
32. RCW
35.13A.090 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a city acquires all of the facilities of a ((water district or sewer))
district, pursuant to this chapter, such a city shall offer to employ every
full time employee of the district who is engaged in the operation of such a
district's facilities on the date on which such city acquires the district
facilities. When a city acquires any portion of the facilities of such a
district, such a city shall offer to employ full time employees of the district
as of the date of the acquisition of the facilities of the district who are not
longer needed by the district.

Whenever
a city employs a person who was employed immediately prior thereto by the
district, arrangements shall be made:

(1)
((For the retention of service credits under the pension plan of the
district pursuant to RCW 41.04.070 through 41.04.110.

(2))) For
the retention of all sick leave standing to the employee's credit in the plan
of such district.

(((3)))
(2) For a vacation with pay during the first year of employment
equivalent to that to which he would have been entitled if he had remained in
the employment of the district.

Sec.
33. RCW
35.58.210 and 1974 ex.s. c 70 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

If
a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the
function of metropolitan water pollution abatement, the metropolitan council
shall, prior to the effective date of the assumption of such function, cause a
metropolitan water pollution abatement advisory committee to be formed by
notifying the legislative body of each component city and county which operates
a sewer system to appoint one person to serve on such advisory committee and
the board of commissioners of each water-sewer district ((and water
district)) which operates a sewer system, any portion of which lies within
the metropolitan area, to appoint one person to serve on such committee who
shall be a commissioner of such a water-sewer ((or water))
district. The metropolitan water pollution abatement advisory committee shall
meet at the time and place provided in the notice and elect a chairman. The
members of such committee shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing bodies
and shall receive no compensation other than reimbursement for expenses
actually incurred in the performance of their duties. The function of such
advisory committee shall be to advise the metropolitan council in matters
relating to the performance of the water pollution (([abatement])) abatement
function.

Sec.
34. RCW
35.58.220 and 1965 c 7 s 35.58.220 are each amended to read as follows:

If
a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the
function of metropolitan water supply, it shall have the following powers in
addition to the general powers granted by this chapter:

(1)
To prepare a comprehensive plan for the development of sources of water supply,
trunk supply mains and water treatment and storage facilities for the
metropolitan area.

(2)
To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant and to lease, construct,
add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of
metropolitan facilities for water supply within or without the metropolitan area,
including buildings, structures, water sheds, wells, springs, dams, settling
basins, intakes, treatment plants, trunk supply mains and pumping stations,
together with all lands, property, equipment and accessories necessary to
enable the metropolitan municipal corporation to obtain and develop sources of
water supply, treat and store water and deliver water through trunk supply
mains. Water supply facilities which are owned by a city or special district
may be acquired or used by the metropolitan municipal corporation only with the
consent of the legislative body of the city or special district owning such
facilities. Cities and special districts are hereby authorized to convey or
lease such facilities to metropolitan municipal corporations or to contract for
their joint use on such terms as may be fixed by agreement between the
legislative body of such city or special district and the metropolitan council,
without submitting the matter to the voters of such city or special
district.

(3)
To fix rates and charges for water supplied by the metropolitan municipal
corporation.

(4)
To acquire by purchase, condemnation, gift or grant and to lease, construct,
add to, improve, replace, repair, maintain, operate and regulate the use of
facilities for the local distribution of water in portions of the metropolitan
area not contained within any city, or water-sewer district that
operates a water system, and, with the consent of the legislative body of
any city or the water-sewer district, to exercise such powers within
such city or water-sewer district and for such purpose to have all the
powers conferred by law upon such city or water-sewer district with
respect to such local distribution facilities. All costs of such local
distribution facilities shall be paid for by the area served thereby.

Sec.
35. RCW
35.58.230 and 1993 c 240 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If
a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the
function of metropolitan water supply, the metropolitan council shall, prior to
the effective date of the assumption of such function, cause a metropolitan
water advisory committee to be formed by notifying the legislative body of each
component city which operates a water system to appoint one person to serve on
such advisory committee and the board of commissioners of each water-sewer
district that operates a water system, any portion of which lies within
the metropolitan area, to appoint one person to serve on such committee who
shall be a water-sewer district commissioner. The metropolitan water
advisory committee shall meet at the time and place provided in the notice and
elect a chairman. The members of such committee shall serve at the pleasure of
the appointing bodies and shall receive no compensation other than
reimbursement for expenses actually incurred in the performance of their
duties. The function of such advisory committee shall be to advise the
metropolitan council with respect to matters relating to the performance of the
water supply function.

The
requirement to create a metropolitan water advisory committee shall not apply
to a county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of
the metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW.

Sec.
36. RCW
35.58.410 and 1998 c 321 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
On or before the third Monday in June of each year, each metropolitan municipal
corporation shall adopt a budget for the following calendar year. Such budget
shall include a separate section for each authorized metropolitan function.
Expenditures shall be segregated as to operation and maintenance expenses and
capital and betterment outlays. Administrative and other expense general to
the corporation shall be allocated between the authorized metropolitan
functions. The budget shall contain an estimate of all revenues to be
collected during the following budget year, including any surplus funds
remaining unexpended from the preceding year. The metropolitan council shall
not be required to confine capital or betterment expenditures made from bond
proceeds or emergency expenditures to items provided in the budget. The
affirmative vote of three-fourths of all members of the metropolitan council
shall be required to authorize emergency expenditures.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a county that has assumed the
rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal
corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW. This subsection (2) shall apply only to
each county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of
a metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW.

Each
county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a
metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW shall, on or before
the third Monday in June of each year, prepare an estimate of all revenues to
be collected during the following calendar year, including any surplus funds
remaining unexpended from the preceding year for each authorized metropolitan
function.

By
June 30 of each year, the county shall adopt the rate for sewage disposal that
will be charged to component cities and water-sewer districts during the
following budget year.

As
long as any general obligation indebtedness remains outstanding that was issued
by the metropolitan municipal corporation prior to the assumption by the
county, the county shall continue to impose the taxes authorized by RCW
82.14.045 and 35.58.273(4) at the maximum rates and on all of the taxable
events authorized by law. If, despite the continued imposition of those taxes,
the estimate of revenues made on or before the third Monday in June shows that
estimated revenues will be insufficient to make all debt service payments
falling due in the following calendar year on all general obligation
indebtedness issued by the metropolitan municipal corporation prior to the
assumption by the county of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of
the metropolitan municipal corporation, the remaining amount required to make
the debt service payments shall be designated as "supplemental
income" and shall be obtained from component cities and component counties
as provided under RCW 35.58.420.

The
county shall prepare and adopt a budget each year in accordance with applicable
general law or county charter. If supplemental income has been designated
under this subsection, the supplemental income shall be reflected in the budget
that is adopted. If during the budget year the actual tax revenues from the
taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.045 and 35.58.273(4) exceed the
estimates upon which the supplemental income was based, the difference shall be
refunded to the component cities and component counties in proportion to their
payments promptly after the end of the budget year. A county that has assumed
the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal
corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW shall not be required to confine capital or
betterment expenditures for authorized metropolitan functions from bond
proceeds or emergency expenditures to items provided in the budget.

Sec.
37. RCW
35.67.300 and 1965 c 7 s 35.67.300 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
city, town, or organized and established water-sewer district owning or
operating its own sewer system, whenever topographic conditions shall make it
feasible and whenever such existing sewer system shall be adequate therefor in
view of the sewerage and drainage requirements of the property in such city,
town, or water-sewer district, served or to be served by such system,
may contract with any other city, town, or organized and established water-sewer
district for the discharge into its sewer system of sewage from all or any part
or parts of such other city, town, or water-sewer district upon such
terms and conditions and for such periods of time as may be deemed reasonable.

Any
city, town, or organized and established water-sewer district may
contract with any other city, town, or organized and established water-sewer
district for the construction and/or operation of any sewer or sewage disposal
facilities for the joint use and benefit of the contracting parties upon such
terms and conditions and for such period of time as the governing bodies of the
contracting parties may determine. Any such contract may provide that the
responsibility for the management of the construction and/or maintenance and
operation of any sewer disposal facilities or part thereof covered by such
contract shall be vested solely in one of the contracting parties, with the
other party or parties thereto paying to the managing party such portion of the
expenses thereof as shall be agreed upon.

Sec.
38. RCW
35.91.020 and 1981 c 313 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of any city, town, county, water-sewer
district, ((water district,)) or drainage district, hereinafter referred
to as a "municipality" may contract with owners of real estate for
the construction of storm, sanitary, or combination sewers, pumping stations,
and disposal plants, water mains, hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances,
hereinafter called "water or sewer facilities," within their
boundaries or (except for counties) within ten miles from their corporate limits
connecting with the public water or sewerage system to serve the area in which
the real estate of such owners is located, and to provide for a period of not
to exceed fifteen years for the reimbursement of such owners and their assigns
by any owner of real estate who did not contribute to the original cost of such
water or sewer facilities and who subsequently tap onto or use the same of a
fair pro rata share of the cost of the construction of said water or sewer
facilities, including not only those directly connected thereto, but also users
connected to laterals or branches connecting thereto, subject to such
reasonable rules and regulations as the governing body of such municipality may
provide or contract, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law. To the
extent it may require in the performance of such contract, such municipality
may install said water or sewer facilities in and along the county streets in
the area to be served as hereinabove provided, subject to such reasonable
requirements as to the manner of occupancy of such streets as the county may by
resolution provide. The provisions of such contract shall not be effective as
to any owner of real estate not a party thereto unless such contract has been
recorded in the office of the county auditor of the county in which the real
estate of such owner is located prior to the time such owner taps into or
connects to said water or sewer facilities. ((The power of the governing
body of such municipality to so contract also applies to water or sewer facilities
in process of construction on June 10, 1959, or which have not been finally
approved or accepted for full maintenance and operation by such municipality
upon June 10, 1959.))

Sec.
39. RCW
35.92.012 and 1965 c 7 s 35.92.012 are each amended to read as follows:

A city
or town, whose boundaries are identical with those of a water-sewer
district, or within which a water-sewer district is entirely located,
which is free from all debts and liabilities except contractual obligations
between the district and the town, may accept the property and assets of the ((water))
district and operate such property and assets as a municipal waterworks, if the
district and the city or town each participate in a summary dissolution
proceedings for the district as provided in RCW 57.04.110.

Sec.
40. RCW
35.92.170 and 1965 c 7 s 35.92.170 are each amended to read as follows:

When a city or town owns or operates a municipal waterworks system
and desires to extend such utility beyond its corporate limits it may acquire,
construct and maintain any addition to or extension of the system, and dispose
of and distribute water to any other municipality, water-sewer district,
community, or person desiring to purchase it.

Sec.
41. RCW
35.97.010 and 1987 c 522 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Biomass energy system" means a system that provides for the
production or collection of organic materials such as wood and agricultural
residues and municipal solid waste that are primarily organic materials and the
conversion or use of that material for the production of heat or substitute
fuels through several processes including, but not limited to, burning,
pyrolysis, or anaerobic digestion.

(2)
"Cogeneration" means the sequential generation of two or more forms
of energy from a common fuel or energy source.

(3)
"Cogeneration facility" means any machinery, equipment, structure,
process, or property or any part thereof, installed or acquired for the primary
purpose of cogeneration by a person or corporation.

(4)
"Geothermal heat" means the natural thermal energy of the earth.

(5)
"Waste heat" means the thermal energy which otherwise would be
released to the environment from an industrial process, electric generation, or
other process.

(6)
"Heat" means thermal energy.

(7)
"Heat source" includes but is not limited to (a) any integral part of
a heat production or heat rejection system of an industrial facility,
cogeneration facility, or electric power generation facility, (b) geothermal
well or spring, (c) biomass energy system, (d) solar collection facility, and
(e) hydrothermal resource or heat extraction process.

(8)
"Municipality" means a county, city, town, irrigation district which
distributes electricity, water-sewer district, ((water district,))
port district, or metropolitan municipal corporation.

(9)
"Heating facilities or heating systems" means all real and personal
property, or interests therein, necessary or useful for: (a) The acquisition,
production, or extraction of heat; (b) the storage of heat; (c) the
distribution of heat from its source to the place of utilization; (d) the
extraction of heat at the place of utilization from the medium by which the
heat is distributed; (e) the distribution of heat at the place of utilization;
and (f) the conservation of heat.

(10)
"Hydrothermal resource" means the thermal energy available in
wastewater, sewage effluent, wells, or other water sources, natural or manmade.

Sec.
42. RCW
35.97.050 and 1996 c 230 s 1603 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the legislative authority of a municipality deems it advisable that the
municipality purchase, acquire, or construct a heating system, or make any
additions or extensions to a heating system, the legislative authority shall so
provide by an ordinance or a resolution specifying and adopting the system or
plan proposed, declaring the estimated cost thereof, as near as may be, and
specifying the method of financing and source of funds. Any construction,
alteration, or improvement of a heating system by any ((county, city, town,
irrigation district, water-sewer district, or port district)) municipality
shall be in compliance with the appropriate competitive bidding requirements in
Titles 35, 36, 53, 57, or 87 RCW.

Sec.
43. RCW
36.16.138 and 1975 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
board of commissioners, council, or board of directors or other governing board
of any county, city, town, school district, port district, public utility
district, water-sewer district, ((water district,)) irrigation
district, or other municipal corporation or political subdivision is authorized
to purchase insurance to protect and hold personally harmless any of its
commissioners, council members, directors, or other governing board members,
and any of its other officers, employees, and agents from any action, claim, or
proceeding instituted against the foregoing individuals arising out of the
performance, purported performance, or failure of performance, in good faith of
duties for, or employment with, such institutions and to hold these individuals
harmless from any expenses connected with the defense, settlement, or monetary
judgments from such actions, claims, or proceedings. The purchase of such
insurance for any of the foregoing individuals and the policy limits shall be
discretionary with the municipal corporation or political subdivision, and such
insurance shall not be considered to be compensation for these individuals.

The
provisions of this section are cumulative and in addition to any other
provision of law authorizing any municipal corporation or political subdivision
to purchase liability insurance.

Sec.
44. RCW
36.93.020 and 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used herein:

(1)
"Governmental unit" means any incorporated city or town, metropolitan
municipal corporation, or any special purpose district as defined in this
section.

(2)
"Special purpose district" means any water-sewer district, ((water
district,)) fire protection district, drainage improvement district,
drainage and diking improvement district, flood control zone district,
irrigation district, metropolitan park district, drainage district, or public
utility district engaged in water distribution.

(3)
"Board" means a boundary review board created by or pursuant to this
chapter.

Sec.
45. RCW
36.93.093 and 1971 ex.s. c 127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a ((sewer or)) water-sewer district files with the board a notice
of intention as required by RCW 36.93.090, the board shall send a copy of such
notice of intention to the legislative authority of the county wherein such
action is proposed to be taken and one copy to the state department of ecology.

Sec.
46. RCW
36.93.105 and 1989 c 84 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following actions shall not be subject to potential review by a boundary review
board:

(1)
Annexations of territory to a water ((or))- sewer district
pursuant to RCW 36.94.410 through 36.94.440;

(2)
Revisions of city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.21.790 or 35A.21.210;

(3)
Adjustments to city or town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.13.340; and

(4)
Adjustments to city and town boundaries pursuant to RCW 35.13.300 through
35.13.330.

Sec.
47. RCW
36.93.185 and 1989 c 308 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
proposal by a ((water district or)) water-sewer district to annex
territory that is not adjacent to the district shall not be deemed to be
violative of the objectives of a boundary review board solely due to the fact
that the territory is not adjacent to the ((water district or)) water-sewer
district. The proposed consolidation or merger of two or more ((water
districts or two or more)) water-sewer districts that are not
adjacent to each other shall not be deemed to be violative of the objectives of
a boundary review board solely due to the fact that the districts are not
adjacent.

Sec.
48. RCW
36.94.220 and 1981 c 313 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A county shall have the power to establish utility local improvement districts
and local improvement districts within the area of a sewerage and/or water
general plan and to levy special assessments under a mode of annual
installments extending over a period not exceeding twenty years on all property
specially benefited by any local improvement on the basis of the special
benefits to pay in whole or in part the damages or costs of any improvements
ordered in such county.

(2)
Utility local improvement districts and local improvement districts may include
territory within a city or town only with the written consent of the city or
town, but if the local district is formed before such area is included within
the city or town, no such consent shall be necessary. Utility local
improvement districts and local improvement districts used to provide sewerage
disposal systems may include territory within a ((sewer district or within a))
water-sewer district providing sewerage disposal systems only with the
written consent of ((the sewer district or)) such a water-sewer
district, but if the local district is formed before such area is included
within ((the sewer district or)) such a water-sewer district, no
consent is necessary. Utility local improvement districts and local
improvement districts used to provide water systems may include territory
within ((a water district or within)) a water-sewer district
providing water systems only with the written consent of ((the water
district or)) such a water-sewer district, but if the local district
is formed before such area is included within ((the water district or))
such a water-sewer district, no consent is necessary.

(3)
The levying, collection, and enforcement of all public assessments hereby
authorized shall be in the manner now and hereafter provided by law for the
levying, collection, and enforcement of local improvement assessments by cities
and towns, insofar as the same shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter. In addition, the county shall file the preliminary assessment
roll at the time and in the manner prescribed in RCW 35.50.005. The duties
devolving upon the city or town treasurer under such laws are imposed
upon the county treasurer for the purposes of this chapter. The mode of
assessment shall be in the manner to be determined by the county legislative
authority by ordinance or resolution. As an alternative to equal annual
assessment installments of principal provided for cities and towns, a county
legislative authority may provide for the payment of such assessments in equal
annual installments of principal and interest. Assessments in any local
district may be made on the basis of special benefits up to but not in excess
of the total cost of any sewerage and/or water improvement made with respect to
that local district and the share of any general sewerage and/or water
facilities allocable to that district. In utility local improvement districts,
assessments shall be deposited into the revenue bond fund or general obligation
bond fund established for the payment of bonds issued to pay such costs which
bond payments are secured in part by the pledge of assessments, except pending
the issuance and sale of such bonds, assessments may be deposited in a fund for
the payment of such costs. In local improvement districts, assessments shall
be deposited into a fund for the payment of such costs and local improvement
bonds issued to finance the same or into the local improvement guaranty fund as
provided by applicable statute.

Sec.
49. RCW
36.94.430 and 1984 c 147 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of RCW 36.94.410 and 36.94.420 provide an alternative method of
accomplishing the transfer permitted by those sections and do not impose
additional conditions upon the exercise of powers vested in water ((and))-
sewer districts and counties.

Sec.
50. RCW
36.96.010 and 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1)
"Special purpose district" means every municipal and quasi-municipal
corporation other than counties, cities, and towns. Such special purpose
districts shall include, but are not limited to, water-sewer districts,
fire protection districts, port districts, public utility districts, county park
and recreation service areas, flood control zone districts, diking districts,
drainage improvement districts, and solid waste collection districts, but shall
not include industrial development districts created by port districts, and
shall not include local improvement districts, utility local improvement
districts, and road improvement districts;

(2)
"Governing authority" means the commission, council, or other body
which directs the affairs of a special purpose district;

(3)
"Inactive" means that a special purpose district, other than a public
utility district, is characterized by either of the following criteria:

(a)
Has not carried out any of the special purposes or functions for which it was
formed within the preceding consecutive five-year period; or

(b)
No election has been held for the purpose of electing a member of the governing
body within the preceding consecutive seven-year period or, in those instances
where members of the governing body are appointed and not elected, where no
member of the governing body has been appointed within the preceding seven-year
period.

A
public utility district is inactive when it is characterized by both criteria
(a) and (b) of this subsection.

Sec.
51. RCW
36.94.410 and 1984 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
system of sewerage, system of water or combined water and sewerage systems
operated by a county under the authority of this chapter may be transferred
from that county to a water ((or))- sewer district in the same
manner as is provided for the transfer of those functions from a water ((or))-
sewer district to a county in RCW 36.94.310 through 36.94.340.

Sec.
52. RCW
36.94.420 and 1996 c 230 s 1609 are each amended to read as follows:

If
so provided in the transfer agreement, the area served by the system shall,
upon completion of the transfer, be deemed annexed to and become a part of the
water-sewer district acquiring the system. The county shall provide notice of
the hearing by the county legislative authority on the ordinance executing the
transfer agreement under RCW 36.94.330 as follows: (1) By mailed notice to all
ratepayers served by the system at least fifteen days prior to the hearing; and
(2) by notice in a newspaper of general circulation once at least fifteen days
prior to the hearing.

In
the event of an annexation under this section resulting from the transfer of a
system of sewerage, a system of water, or combined water and sewer
systems from a county to a water-sewer district ((governed by Title 57 RCW)),
the water-sewer district shall ((have all the powers of a water-sewer
district provided by chapter 57.36 RCW, as if a water-sewer district had been merged
into a water-sewer district)) operate the system or systems under the
provisions of Title 57 RCW.

Sec.
53. RCW
39.69.010 and 1987 c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, "municipal corporation" includes counties,
cities, towns, port districts, ((sewer districts,)) water-sewer
districts, school districts, metropolitan park districts, or such other units
of local government which are authorized to issue obligations.

Sec.
54. RCW
39.50.010 and 1998 c 106 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Governing body" means the legislative authority of a municipal
corporation by whatever name designated;

(2)
"Local improvement district" includes local improvement districts,
utility local improvement districts, road improvement districts, and other
improvement districts that a municipal corporation is authorized by law to
establish;

(3)
"Municipal corporation" means any city, town, county, ((water
district,)) water-sewer district, school district, port district,
public utility district, metropolitan municipal corporation, public
transportation benefit area, park and recreation district, irrigation district,
fire protection district or any other municipal or quasi municipal corporation
described as such by statute, or regional transit authority, except joint
operating agencies under chapter 43.52 RCW;

(4)
"Ordinance" means an ordinance of a city or town or resolution or
other instrument by which the governing body of the municipal corporation
exercising any power under this chapter takes formal action and adopts
legislative provisions and matters of some permanency; and

(5)
"Short-term obligations" are warrants, notes, or other evidences of
indebtedness, except bonds.

Sec.
55. RCW
39.80.020 and 1981 c 61 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"State agency" means any department, agency, commission, bureau,
office, or any other entity or authority of the state government.

(2)
"Local agency" means any city and any town, county, special district,
municipal corporation, agency, port district or authority, or political
subdivision of any type, or any other entity or authority of local government
in corporate form or otherwise.

(3)
"Special district" means a local unit of government, other than a
city, town, or county, authorized by law to perform a single function or a
limited number of functions, and including but not limited to, water-sewer
districts, irrigation districts, fire districts, school districts, community
college districts, hospital districts, ((sewer districts,))
transportation districts, and metropolitan municipal corporations organized
under chapter 35.58 RCW.

(4)
"Agency" means both state and local agencies and special districts as
defined in subsection(([s]))s (1), (2), and (3) of this section.

(5)
"Architectural and engineering services" or "professional
services" means professional services rendered by any person, other than
as an employee of the agency, contracting to perform activities within the
scope of the general definition of professional practice in chapters 18.08,
18.43, or 18.96 RCW.

(6)
"Person" means any individual, organization, group, association,
partnership, firm, joint venture, corporation, or any combination thereof.

(7)
"Consultant" means any person providing professional services who is
not an employee of the agency for which the services are provided.

(8)
"Application" means a completed statement of qualifications together
with a request to be considered for the award of one or more contracts for
professional services.

Sec.
56. RCW
43.20.240 and 1990 c 132 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall have primary responsibility among state agencies to
receive complaints from persons aggrieved by the failure of a public water
system. If the remedy to the complaint is not within the jurisdiction of the
department, the department shall refer the complaint to the state or local
agency that has the appropriate jurisdiction. The department shall take such
steps as are necessary to inform other state agencies of their primary
responsibility for such complaints and the implementing procedures.

(2)
Each county shall designate a contact person to the department for the purpose
of receiving and following up on complaint referrals that are within county
jurisdiction. In the absence of any such designation, the county health
officer shall be responsible for performing this function.

(3)
The department and each county shall establish procedures for providing a
reasonable response to complaints received from persons aggrieved by the
failure of a public water system.

(4)
The department and each county shall use all reasonable efforts to assist
customers of public water systems in obtaining a dependable supply of water at
all times. The availability of resources and the public health significance of
the complaint shall be considered when determining what constitutes a
reasonable effort.

(5)
The department shall, in consultation with local governments, water utilities,
water-sewer districts, public utility districts, and other interested
parties, develop a booklet or other single document that will provide to
members of the public the following information:

(a)
A summary of state law regarding the obligations of public water systems in
providing drinking water supplies to their customers;

(b)
A summary of the activities, including planning, rate setting, and compliance,
that are to be performed by both local and state agencies;

(c)
The rights of customers of public water systems, including identification of
agencies or offices to which they may address the most common complaints
regarding the failures or inadequacies of public water systems.

This
booklet or document shall be available to members of the public no later than
January 1, 1991.

Sec.
57. RCW
43.70.195 and 1994 c 292 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In any action brought by the secretary of health or by a local health officer
pursuant to chapter 7.60 RCW to place a public water system in receivership,
the petition shall include the names of one or more suitable candidates for
receiver who have consented to assume operation of the water system. The
department shall maintain a list of interested and qualified individuals,
municipal entities, special purpose districts, and investor-owned water
companies with experience in the provision of water service and a history of
satisfactory operation of a water system. If there is no other person willing
and able to be named as receiver, the court shall appoint the county in which
the water system is located as receiver. The county may designate a county
agency to operate the system, or it may contract with another individual or
public water system to provide management for the system. If the county is
appointed as receiver, the secretary of health and the county health officer
shall provide regulatory oversight for the agency or other person responsible
for managing the water system.

(2)
In any petition for receivership under subsection (1) of this section, the
department shall recommend that the court grant to the receiver full authority
to act in the best interests of the customers served by the public water
system. The receiver shall assess the capability, in conjunction with the
department and local government, for the system to operate in compliance with
health and safety standards, and shall report to the court and the petitioning
agency its recommendations for the system's future operation, including the
formation of a water-sewer district or other public entity, or ownership
by another existing water system capable of providing service.

(3)
If a petition for receivership and verifying affidavit executed by an
appropriate departmental official allege an immediate and serious danger to
residents constituting an emergency, the court shall set the matter for hearing
within three days and may appoint a temporary receiver ex parte upon the
strength of such petition and affidavit pending a full evidentiary hearing,
which shall be held within fourteen days after receipt of the petition.

(4)
A bond, if any is imposed upon a receiver, shall be minimal and shall
reasonably relate to the level of operating revenue generated by the system.
Any receiver appointed pursuant to this section shall not be held personally
liable for any good faith, reasonable effort to assume possession of, and to
operate, the system in compliance with the court's orders.

(5)
The court shall authorize the receiver to impose reasonable assessments on a
water system's customers to recover expenditures for improvements necessary for
the public health and safety.

(6)
No later than twelve months after appointment of a receiver, the petitioning
agency, in conjunction with the county in which the system is located, and the
appropriate state and local health agencies, shall develop and present to the
court a plan for the disposition of the system. The report shall include the
recommendations of the receiver made pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. The report shall include all reasonable and feasible alternatives.
After receiving the report, the court shall provide notice to interested
parties and conduct such hearings as are necessary. The court shall then order
the parties to implement one of the alternatives, or any combination thereof,
for the disposition of the system. Such order shall include a date, or
proposed date, for the termination of the receivership. Nothing in this
section authorizes a court to require a city, town, public utility district,
water-sewer district, or irrigation district to accept a system that has
been in receivership unless the city, town, public utility district, water-sewer
district, or irrigation district agrees to the terms and conditions outlined in
the plan adopted by the court.

(7)
The court shall not terminate the receivership, and order the return of the
system to the owners, unless the department of health approves of such an
action. The court may impose reasonable conditions upon the return of the
system to the owner, including the posting of a bond or other security, routine
performance and financial audits, employment of qualified operators and other
staff or contracted services, compliance with financial viability requirements,
or other measures sufficient to ensure the ongoing proper operation of the
system.

(8)
If, as part of the ultimate disposition of the system, an eminent domain action
is commenced by a public entity to acquire the system, the court shall oversee
any appraisal of the system conducted under Title 7 RCW to assure that the
appraised value properly reflects any reduced value because of the necessity to
make improvements to the system. The court shall have the authority to approve
the appraisal, and to modify it based on any information provided at an
evidentiary hearing. The court's determination of the proper value of the
system, based on the appraisal, shall be final, and only appealable if not
supported by substantial evidence. If the appraised value is appealed, the
court may order that the system's ownership be transferred upon payment of the
approved appraised value.

Sec.
58. RCW
43.155.030 and 1985 c 446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The public works board is hereby created.

(2)
The board shall be composed of thirteen members appointed by the governor for
terms of four years, except that five members initially shall be appointed for
terms of two years. The board shall include: (a) Three members, two of whom
shall be elected officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed
from a list of at least six persons nominated by the association of Washington
cities or its successor; (b) three members, two of whom shall be elected
officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed from a list of at
least six persons nominated by the Washington state association of counties or
its successor; (c) three members appointed from a list of at least six persons
nominated jointly by the ((Washington state association of water districts,
the)) Washington public utility districts association((,)) and ((the
Washington)) a state association of water-sewer districts,
or their successors; and (d) four members appointed from the general public.
In appointing the four general public members, the governor shall endeavor to
balance the geographical composition of the board and to include members with
special expertise in relevant fields such as public finance, architecture and
civil engineering, and public works construction. The governor shall appoint
one of the general public members of the board as chair. The term of the chair
shall coincide with the term of the governor.

(3)
Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.

(4)
Members of the board shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
If a vacancy on the board occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise, the
governor shall fill the vacant position for the unexpired term. Each vacancy
in a position appointed from lists provided by the associations under
subsection (2) of this section shall be filled from a list of at least three
persons nominated by the relevant association or associations. Any members of
the board, appointive or otherwise, may be removed by the governor for cause in
accordance with RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.

Sec.
59. RCW
44.04.170 and 1970 ex.s. c 69 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of each association of municipal corporations or municipal
officers, which is recognized by law and utilized as an official agency for the
coordination of the policies and/or administrative programs of municipal
corporations, to submit biennially, or oftener as necessary, to the governor
and to the legislature the joint recommendations of such participating
municipalities regarding changes which would affect the efficiency of such
municipal corporations. Such associations shall include but shall not be
limited to the Washington state association of fire commissioners, ((the
Washington)) a state association of water/wastewater districts,
((the Washington state association of sewer districts,)) and the
Washington state school directors' association.

Sec.
60. RCW
48.62.021 and 1991 sp.s. c 30 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Local government entity" or "entity" means every unit of
local government, both general purpose and special purpose, and includes, but
is not limited to, counties, cities, towns, port districts, public utility
districts, ((water districts,)) water-sewer districts, school
districts, fire protection districts, irrigation districts, metropolitan
municipal corporations, conservation districts, and other political subdivisions,
governmental subdivisions, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal
corporations.

(2)
"Risk assumption" means a decision to absorb the entity's financial
exposure to a risk of loss without the creation of a formal program of advance
funding of anticipated losses.

(3)
"Self-insurance" means a formal program of advance funding and
management of entity financial exposure to a risk of loss that is not
transferred through the purchase of an insurance policy or contract.

(4)
"Health and welfare benefits" means a plan or program established by
a local government entity or entities for the purpose of providing its
employees and their dependents, and in the case of school districts, its
district employees, students, directors, or any of their dependents, with
health care, accident, disability, death, and salary protection benefits.

(5)
"Property and liability risks" includes the risk of property damage
or loss sustained by a local government entity and the risk of claims arising
from the tortious or negligent conduct or any error or omission of the local
government entity, its officers, employees, agents, or volunteers as a result
of which a claim may be made against the local government entity.

(6)
"State risk manager" means the state risk manager of the division of
risk management within the department of general administration.

Sec.
61. RCW
52.08.011 and 1984 c 230 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

Territory within a fire protection district may be withdrawn from
the district in the same manner provided by law for withdrawal of territory
from water-sewer districts, as provided by chapter 57.28 RCW.

Sec.
62. RCW
53.48.001 and 1989 c 84 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

The
dissolution of a metropolitan park district, fire protection district, ((sewer
district,)) water-sewer district, or flood control zone district
under chapter 53.48 RCW may be subject to potential review by a boundary review
board under chapter 36.93 RCW.

Sec.
63. RCW
53.48.010 and 1986 c 278 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following words and terms shall, whenever used in this chapter, have the
meaning set forth in this section:

(1)
The term "district" as used herein, shall include all municipal and
quasi-municipal corporations having a governing body, other than cities,
towns, counties, and townships, such as port districts, school districts,
water-sewer districts, fire protection districts, and all other special
districts of similar organization, but shall not include local improvement
districts, diking, drainage and irrigation districts, special districts as
defined in RCW 85.38.010, nor public utility districts.

(2)
The words "board of commissioners," as used herein, shall mean the
governing authority of any district as defined in subdivision (1) of this
section.

Sec.
64. RCW
54.04.030 and 1931 c 1 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

((This act)) Chapter 1, Laws of 1931, shall not be
deemed or construed to repeal or affect any existing act, or any part thereof,
relating to the construction, operation and maintenance of public utilities by
irrigation or water-sewer districts or other municipal corporations, but
shall be supplemental thereto and concurrent therewith. No public utility
district created hereunder shall include therein any municipal corporation, or
any part thereof, where such municipal corporation already owns or operates all
the utilities herein authorized: PROVIDED, that in case it does not own or
operate all such utilities it may be included within such public utility
district for the purpose of establishing or operating therein such utilities as
it does not own or operate: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That no property situated
within any irrigation or water-sewer districts or other municipal
corporations shall ever be taxed or assessed to pay for any utility, or part
thereof, of like character to any utility, owned or operated by such irrigation
or water districts or other municipal corporations.

Sec.
65. RCW
70.44.400 and 1984 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Territory
within a public hospital district may be withdrawn therefrom in the same manner
provided by law for withdrawal of territory from water-sewer districts,
as provided by chapter 57.28 RCW. For purposes of conforming with such
procedure, the public hospital district shall be deemed to be the water-sewer
district and the public hospital board of commissioners shall be deemed to be
the water-sewer district board of commissioners.

Sec.
66. RCW
70.95B.020 and 1995 c 269 s 2901 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter unless context requires another meaning:

(1)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3)
"Certificate" means a certificate of competency issued by the
director stating that the operator has met the requirements for the specified
operator classification of the certification program.

(4)
"Wastewater treatment plant" means a facility used to treat any
liquid or waterborne waste of domestic origin or a combination of domestic,
commercial or industrial origin, and which by its design requires the presence
of an operator for its operation. It shall not include any facility used
exclusively by a single family residence, septic tanks with subsoil absorption,
industrial wastewater treatment plants, or wastewater collection systems.

(5)
"Operator in responsible charge" means an individual who is
designated by the owner as the person on-site in responsible charge of the
routine operation of a wastewater treatment plant.

(6)
"Nationally recognized association of certification authorities"
shall mean that organization which serves as an information center for
certification activities, recommends minimum standards and guidelines for
classification of potable water treatment plants, water distribution systems
and wastewater facilities and certification of operators, facilitates
reciprocity between state programs and assists authorities in establishing new
certification programs and updating existing ones.

(7)
"Wastewater collection system" means any system of lines, pipes,
manholes, pumps, liftstations, or other facilities used for the purpose of
collecting and transporting wastewater.

(8)
"Operating experience" means routine performance of duties, on-site
in a wastewater treatment plant, that affects plant performance or effluent
quality.

(9)
"Owner" means in the case of a town or city, the city or town acting
through its chief executive officer or the lessee if operated pursuant to a
lease or contract; in the case of a county, the chairman of the county
legislative authority or the chairman's designee; in the case of a water-sewer
district, board of public utilities, association, municipality or other public
body, the president or chairman of the body or the president's or chairman's
designee; in the case of a privately owned wastewater treatment plant, the
legal owner.

(10)
"Wastewater certification program coordinator" means an employee of
the department who administers the wastewater treatment plant operators'
certification program.

Sec.
67. RCW
70.119.020 and 1995 c 269 s 2904 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter unless context requires another meaning:

(1)
"Certificate" means a certificate of competency issued by the
secretary stating that the operator has met the requirements for the specified
operator classification of the certification program.

(2)
"Certified operator" means an individual holding a valid certificate
and employed or appointed by any county, water-sewer district,
municipality, public or private corporation, company, institution, person, or
the state of Washington and who is designated by the employing or appointing
officials as the person responsible for active daily technical operation.

(3)
"Department" means the department of health.

(4)
"Distribution system" means that portion of a public water system
which stores, transmits, pumps and distributes water to consumers.

(5)
"Ground water under the direct influence of surface water" means any
water beneath the surface of the ground with:

(a)
Significant occurrence of insects or other macroorganisms, algae, or large
diameter pathogens such as giardia lamblia; or

(b)
Significant and relatively rapid shifts in water characteristics such as
turbidity, temperature, conductivity, or pH which closely correlate to
climatological or surface water conditions.

(6)
"Group A water system" means a system with fifteen or more service
connections, regardless of the number of people; or a system serving an average
of twenty-five or more people per day for sixty or more days within a calendar
year, regardless of the number of service connections. Group A water system
does not include a system serving fewer than fifteen single-family residences,
regardless of the number of people.

(7)
"Nationally recognized association of certification authorities"
shall mean an organization which serves as an information center for
certification activities, recommends minimum standards and guidelines for
classification of potable water treatment plants, water distribution systems
and waste water facilities and certification of operators, facilitates
reciprocity between state programs and assists authorities in establishing new
certification programs and updating existing ones.

(8)
"Public water system" means any system, excluding a system serving
only one single-family residence and a system with four or fewer connections
all of which serve residences on the same farm, providing piped water for human
consumption, including any collection, treatment, storage, or distribution
facilities under control of the purveyor and used primarily in connection with
the system; and collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under control
of the purveyor but primarily used in connection with the system.

(9)
"Purification plant" means that portion of a public water system
which treats or improves the physical, chemical or bacteriological quality of
the system's water to bring the water into compliance with state board of
health standards.

(10)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(11)
"Service" means a connection to a public water system designed to
serve a single-family residence, dwelling unit, or equivalent use. If the
facility has group home or barracks-type accommodations, three persons will be
considered equivalent to one service.

(12)
"Surface water" means all water open to the atmosphere and subject to
surface runoff.

Sec.
68. RCW
79.44.003 and 1989 c 243 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter "assessing district" means:

(1)
Incorporated cities and towns;

(2)
Diking districts;

(3)
Drainage districts;

(4)
Port districts;

(5)
Irrigation districts;

(6)
Water-sewer districts;

(7)
((Sewer districts;

(8)))
Counties; and

(((9)))
(8) Any municipal corporation or public agency having power to levy
local improvement or other assessments, rates, or charges which by statute are
expressly made applicable to lands of the state.

Sec.
69. RCW
84.04.120 and 1961 c 15 s 84.04.120 are each amended to read as follows:

"Taxing
district" shall be held and construed to mean and include the state and
any county, city, town, ((township,)) port district, school district,
road district, metropolitan park district, water-sewer district or other
municipal corporation, now or hereafter existing, having the power or
authorized by law to impose burdens upon property within the district in
proportion to the value thereof, for the purpose of obtaining revenue for
public purposes, as distinguished from municipal corporations authorized to
impose burdens, or for which burdens may be imposed, for such purposes, upon property
in proportion to the benefits accruing thereto.

Sec.
70. RCW
84.33.100 and 1992 c 52 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 84.33.110 through 84.33.140 and 84.33.210 through 84.33.270:

(1)
"Forest land" is synonymous with timberland and means all land in any
contiguous ownership of twenty or more acres which is primarily devoted to and
used for growing and harvesting timber and means the land only.

(2)
"Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in land,
except where land is subject to a real estate contract "owner" means
the contract vendee.

(3)
"Local government" shall mean any city, town, county, ((sewer
district,)) water-sewer district, public utility district, port
district, irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision
authorized to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary or storm sewerage
systems, domestic water supply or distribution systems, or road construction or
improvement purposes.

(4)
"Local improvement district" shall mean any local improvement
district, utility local improvement district, local utility district, road
improvement district, or any similar unit created by a local government for the
purpose of levying special benefit assessments against property specially
benefited by improvements relating to such districts.

(5)
The term "average rate of inflation" shall mean the annual rate of
inflation as determined by the department of revenue averaged over the period
of time as provided in RCW 84.33.220 (1) and (2). Such determination shall be
published not later than January 1 of each year for use in that assessment
year.

(6)
"Special benefit assessments" shall mean special assessments levied
or capable of being levied in any local improvement district or otherwise
levied or capable of being levied by a local government to pay for all or part
of the costs of a local improvement and which may be levied only for the special
benefits to be realized by property by reason of that local improvement.

Sec.
71. RCW
84.34.310 and 1992 c 52 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 84.34.300 through 84.34.380, unless a different meaning is
required, the words defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated.

(1)
"Farm and agricultural land" shall mean the same as defined in RCW
84.34.020(2).

(2)
"Timber land" shall mean the same as defined in RCW 84.34.020(3).

(3)
"Local government" shall mean any city, town, county, ((sewer
district,)) water-sewer district, public utility district, port
district, irrigation district, flood control district, or any other municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or other political subdivision
authorized to levy special benefit assessments for sanitary and/or storm
sewerage systems, domestic water supply and/or distribution systems, or road
construction or improvement purposes.

(4)
"Local improvement district" shall mean any local improvement
district, utility local improvement district, local utility district, road
improvement district, or any similar unit created by a local government for the
purpose of levying special benefit assessments against property specially
benefited by improvements relating to such districts.

(5)
"Owner" shall mean the same as defined in RCW 84.34.020(5) or the
applicable statutes relating to special benefit assessments.

(6)
The term "average rate of inflation" shall mean the annual rate of
inflation as determined by the department of revenue averaged over the period
of time as provided in RCW 84.34.330 (1) and (2). Such determination shall be
published not later than January 1 of each year for use in that assessment
year.

(7)
"Special benefit assessments" shall mean special assessments levied
or capable of being levied in any local improvement district or otherwise
levied or capable of being levied by a local government to pay for all or part
of the costs of a local improvement and which may be levied only for the
special benefits to be realized by property by reason of that local
improvement.

Sec.
72. RCW
84.64.080 and 1991 c 245 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The
court shall examine each application for judgment foreclosing tax lien, and if
defense (specifying in writing the particular cause of objection) be offered by
any person interested in any of the lands or lots to the entry of judgment against
the same, the court shall hear and determine the matter in a summary manner,
without other pleadings, and shall pronounce judgment as the right of the case
may be; or the court may, in its discretion, continue such individual cases,
wherein defense is offered, to such time as may be necessary, in order to
secure substantial justice to the contestants therein; but in all other cases
the court shall proceed to determine the matter in a summary manner as above
specified. In all judicial proceedings of any kind for the collection of
taxes, and interest and costs thereon, all amendments which by law can be made
in any personal action pending in such court shall be allowed, and no
assessments of property or charge for any of the taxes shall be considered illegal
on account of any irregularity in the tax list or assessment rolls or on
account of the assessment rolls or tax list not having been made, completed or
returned within the time required by law, or on account of the property having
been charged or listed in the assessment or tax lists without name, or in any
other name than that of the owner, and no error or informality in the
proceedings of any of the officers connected with the assessment, levying or
collection of the taxes, shall vitiate or in any manner affect the tax or the
assessment thereof, and any irregularities or informality in the assessment
rolls or tax lists or in any of the proceedings connected with the assessment
or levy of such taxes or any omission or defective act of any officer or officers
connected with the assessment or levying of such taxes, may be, in the
discretion of the court, corrected, supplied and made to conform to the law by
the court. The court shall give judgment for such taxes, interest and costs as
shall appear to be due upon the several lots or tracts described in the notice
of application for judgment or complaint, and such judgment shall be a several
judgment against each tract or lot or part of a tract or lot for each kind of
tax included therein, including all interest and costs, and the court shall
order and direct the clerk to make and enter an order for the sale of such real
property against which judgment is made, or vacate and set aside the
certificate of delinquency or make such other order or judgment as in the law
or equity may be just. The order shall be signed by the judge of the superior
court, shall be delivered to the county treasurer, and shall be full and
sufficient authority for him or her to proceed to sell the property for the sum
as set forth in the order and to take such further steps in the matter as are
provided by law. The county treasurer shall immediately after receiving the
order and judgment of the court proceed to sell the property as provided in
this chapter to the highest and best bidder for cash. The acceptable minimum
bid shall be the total amount of taxes, interest, penalties, and costs. All
sales shall be made at a location in the county on a date and time (except
Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays) as the county treasurer may direct, and
shall continue from day to day (Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays
excepted) during the same hours until all lots or tracts are sold, after first
giving notice of the time, and place where such sale is to take place for ten
days successively by posting notice thereof in three public places in the
county, one of which shall be in the office of the treasurer. The notice shall
be substantially in the following form:

TAX JUDGMENT SALE

Public
notice is hereby given that pursuant to real property tax judgment of the
superior court of the county of . . . . . . in the
state of Washington, and an order of sale duly issued by the court, entered the
. . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . ., in proceedings for foreclosure of tax liens upon real
property, as per provisions of law, I shall on the . . . . day
of . . . . . ., . . . ., at
. . . . o'clock a.m., at . . . . . . in
the city of . . . . . ., and county of
. . . . . ., state of Washington, sell the real
property to the highest and best bidder for cash, to satisfy the full amount of
taxes, interest and costs adjudged to be due.

In
witness whereof, I have hereunto affixed my hand and seal this
. . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . . .

...................................

Treasurer of ......................

county.

No
county officer or employee shall directly or indirectly be a purchaser of such
property at such sale.

If
any buildings or improvements are upon an area encompassing more than one tract
or lot, the same must be advertised and sold as a single unit.

If
the highest amount bid for any such separate unit tract or lot is in excess of
the minimum bid due upon the whole property included in the certificate of
delinquency, the excess shall be refunded following payment of all water ((and))-
sewer district liens, on application therefor, to the record owner of the
property. The record owner of the property is the person who held title on the
date of issuance of the certificate of delinquency. In the event no claim for
the excess is received by the county treasurer within three years after the
date of the sale he or she shall at expiration of the three year period deposit
such excess in the current expense fund of the county. The county treasurer
shall execute to the purchaser of any piece or parcel of land a tax deed. The
deed so made by the county treasurer, under the official seal of his or her
office, shall be recorded in the same manner as other conveyances of real
property, and shall vest in the grantee, his or her heirs and assigns the title
to the property therein described, without further acknowledgment or evidence
of such conveyance, and shall be substantially in the following form:

State of Washington B

C ss.

County
of ......... D

This
indenture, made this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., . . . . . .,
between . . . . . ., as treasurer of
. . . . . . county, state of Washington, party of the
first part, and . . . . . ., party of the second part:

Witnesseth,
that, whereas, at a public sale of real property held on the
. . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . ., pursuant to a real property tax judgment entered in the
superior court in the county of . . . . . . on the
. . . . day of . . . . . .,
. . . ., in proceedings to foreclose tax liens upon real
property and an order of sale duly issued by the court,
. . . . . . duly purchased in compliance with the laws
of the state of Washington, the following described real property, to wit:
(Here place description of real property conveyed) and that the
. . . . . . has complied with the laws of the state of
Washington necessary to entitle (him, or her or them) to a deed for the real
property.

Now,
therefore, know ye, that, I . . . . . ., county treasurer
of the county of . . . . . ., state of Washington, in
consideration of the premises and by virtue of the statutes of the state of
Washington, in such cases provided, do hereby grant and convey unto
. . . . . ., his or her heirs and assigns, forever,
the real property hereinbefore described.

Given
under my hand and seal of office this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., A.D. . . . .

...............................

County
Treasurer.

Sec.
73. RCW
84.69.010 and 1961 c 15 s 84.69.010 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Taxing district" means any county, city, town, ((township,))
port district, school district, road district, metropolitan park district,
water-sewer district, or other municipal corporation now or hereafter
authorized by law to impose burdens upon property within the district in
proportion to the value thereof, for the purpose of obtaining revenue for
public purposes, as distinguished from municipal corporations authorized to
impose burdens, or for which burdens may be imposed, for such purposes, upon
property in proportion to the benefits accruing thereto.

(2)
"Tax" includes penalties and interest.

Sec.
74. RCW
87.03.015 and 1979 ex.s. c 185 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
irrigation district, operating and maintaining an irrigation system, in
addition to other powers conferred by law, shall have authority:

(1)
To purchase and sell electric power to the inhabitants of the irrigation
district for the purposes of irrigation and domestic use, to acquire,
construct, and lease dams, canals, plants, transmission lines, and other power
equipment and the necessary property and rights therefor and to operate,
improve, repair, and maintain the same, for the generation and transmission of
electrical energy for use in the operation of pumping plants and irrigation
systems of the district and for sale to the inhabitants of the irrigation
district for the purposes of irrigation and domestic use; and, as a further and
separate grant of authority and in furtherance of a state purpose and policy of
developing hydroelectric capability in connection with irrigation facilities,
to construct, finance, acquire, own, operate, and maintain, alone or jointly
with other irrigation districts, boards of control, other municipal or quasi-municipal
corporations or cooperatives authorized to engage in the business of
distributing electricity, or electrical companies subject to the jurisdiction
of the utilities and transportation commission, hydroelectric facilities
including but not limited to dams, canals, plants, transmission lines, other
power equipment, and the necessary property and rights therefor, located within
or outside the district, for the purpose of utilizing for the generation of
electricity, water power made available by and as a part of the irrigation
water storage, conveyance, and distribution facilities, waste ways, and
drainage water facilities which serve irrigation districts, and to sell any and
all the electric energy generated at any such hydroelectric facilities or the
irrigation district's share of such energy, to municipal or quasi-municipal
corporations and cooperatives authorized to engage in the business of
distributing electricity, and electrical companies subject to the jurisdiction
of the utilities and transportation commission, or to other irrigation
districts, and on such terms and conditions as the board of directors shall
determine, and to enter into contracts with other irrigation districts, boards
of control, other municipal or quasi-municipal corporations and
cooperatives authorized to engage in the business of distributing electricity,
and electrical companies subject to the jurisdiction of the utilities and
transportation commission: PROVIDED, That no contract entered into by the
board of directors of any irrigation district for the sale of electrical energy
from such hydroelectric facility for a period longer than forty years from the
date of commercial operation of such hydroelectric facility shall be binding on
the district until ratified by a majority vote of the electors of the district
at an election therein, called, held and canvassed for that purpose in the same
manner as that provided by law for district bond elections.

(2)
To construct, repair, purchase, maintain or lease a system for the sale or
lease of water to the owners of irrigated lands within the district for
domestic purposes.

(3)
To construct, repair, purchase, lease, acquire, operate and maintain a system
of drains, sanitary sewers, and sewage disposal or treatment plants as herein
provided.

(4)
To assume, as principal or guarantor, any indebtedness to the United States
under the federal reclamation laws, on account of district lands.

(5)
To maintain, repair, construct and reconstruct ditches, laterals, pipe lines
and other water conduits used or to be used in carrying water for irrigation of
lands located within the boundaries of a city or town or for the domestic use
of the residents of a city or town where the owners of land within such city or
town shall use such works to carry water to the boundaries of such city or town
for irrigation, domestic or other purposes within such city or town, and to
charge to such city or town the pro rata proportion of the cost of such
maintenance, repair, construction and reconstruction work in proportion to the
benefits received by the lands served and located within the boundaries of such
city or town, and if such cost is not paid, then and in that event said
irrigation district shall have the right to prevent further water deliveries
through such works to the lands located within the boundaries of such city or
town until such charges have been paid.

(6)
To acquire, install and maintain as a part of the irrigation district's water
system the necessary water mains and fire hydrants to make water available for
fire fighting purposes; and in addition any such irrigation district shall have
the authority to repair, operate and maintain such hydrants and mains.

(7)
To enter into contracts with other irrigation districts, boards of control,
municipal or quasi-municipal corporations and cooperatives authorized to
engage in the business of distributing electricity, and electrical companies
subject to the jurisdiction of the utilities and transportation commission to
jointly acquire, construct, own, operate, and maintain irrigation water,
domestic water, drainage and sewerage works, and electrical power works to the
same extent as authorized by subsection (1) of this section, or portions of
such works.

(8)
To acquire from a water-sewer district wholly within the irrigation
district's boundaries, by a conveyance without cost, the water-sewer
district's water system and to operate the same to provide water for the
domestic use of the irrigation district residents. As a part of its acceptance
of the conveyance the irrigation district must agree to relieve the water-sewer
district of responsibility for maintenance and repair of the system. Any such
water-sewer district is authorized to make such a conveyance if all
indebtedness of the water-sewer district, except local improvement
district bonds, has been paid and the conveyance has been approved by a
majority of the water-sewer district's ((electors)) voters
voting at a general or special election.

This
section shall not be construed as in any manner abridging any other powers of
an irrigation district conferred by law.

Sec.
75. RCW
87.03.720 and 1977 ex.s. c 208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of directors of an irrigation district shall, after being notified by the
legislative authority of the county or counties within which the irrigation
district lies of the filing of the petition therefor, have the power to assent
to the proposed merger with the irrigation district of that portion of a
drainage improvement district, joint drainage improvement district,
consolidated drainage improvement district, or water-sewer district
within its boundaries at a hearing duly called by the board to consider the
proposed merger if sufficient objections thereto have not been presented, as
hereinafter provided.

Sec.
76. RCW
87.03.725 and 1977 ex.s. c 208 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of the board of directors shall cause a notice of the proposed merger
to be posted and published in the same manner and for the same time as notice
of a special election for the issue of bonds. The notice shall state that a
petition has been filed with the legislative authority of the county or
counties within which the irrigation districts lies by the board of supervisors
of the drainage improvement district, joint drainage improvement district, or
consolidated drainage improvement district or by the board of commissioners of
a water-sewer district requesting that the drainage improvement
district, joint drainage improvement district, consolidated drainage
improvement district, or water-sewer district be merged with the
irrigation district or irrigation districts, the names of the petitioners and
the prayer thereof, and it shall notify all persons interested in the
irrigation district to appear at the office of the board at the time named in the
notice, and show cause in writing why the proposed merger should not take
place. The time to show cause shall be the regular meeting of the board of
directors of the irrigation district next after the expiration of the time for
the publication of the notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 77. Part
headings as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law.

---
END ---