BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.80.040 and 1993 c 121 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter, except where specifically otherwise provided, and
except the provisions providing for licenses, shall not apply to:

(1)
((Motor vehicles when operated in transportation exclusively within the
corporate limits of any city or town of less than ten thousand population
unless contiguous to a city or town of ten thousand population or over, nor
between contiguous cities or towns both or all of which are less than ten
thousand population;

(2)
Motor vehicles when operated in transportation wholly within the corporate
limits of cities or towns of ten thousand or more but less than thirty thousand
population, or between such cities or towns when contiguous, as to which the
commission, after investigation and the issuance of an order thereon, has
determined that no substantial public interest exists which requires that such
transportation be subject to regulation under this chapter;

(3)))
Motor vehicles when transporting exclusively the United States mail or in the
transportation of newspapers or periodicals;

(((4)))
(2) Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States, the state of
Washington, or any county, city, town, or municipality therein, or by any
department of them, or either of them;

(((5)))
(3) Motor vehicles specially constructed for towing not more than two
disabled, unauthorized, or repossessed motor vehicles, wrecking, or exchanging
an operable vehicle for a disabled vehicle and not otherwise used in
transporting goods for compensation. For the purposes of this subsection, a
vehicle is considered to be repossessed only from the time of its actual repossession
through the end of its initial tow;

(((6)))
(4) Motor vehicles normally owned and operated by farmers in the
transportation of their own farm, orchard, or dairy products, including
livestock and plant or animal wastes, from point of production to market, or in
the infrequent or seasonal transportation by one farmer for another farmer, if
their farms are located within twenty miles of each other, of products of the
farm, orchard, or dairy, including livestock and plant or animal wastes, or of
supplies or commodities to be used on the farm, orchard, or dairy;

(((7)))
(5) Motor vehicles when transporting exclusively water in connection
with construction projects only;

(((8))) (6) Motor vehicles of less than 8,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight when transporting exclusively legal documents, pleadings,
process, correspondence, depositions, briefs, medical records, photographs,
books or papers, cash or checks, when moving shipments of the documents
described at the direction of an attorney as part of providing legal services.

---
END ---