BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.44.065 and 1961 c 14 s 81.44.065 are each amended to read as follows:

The
utilities and transportation commission shall exercise all powers and duties in
relation to the inspection of tracks, bridges, structures, equipment,
apparatus, and appliances of railroads with respect to the safety of employees
and the public and the administration and enforcement of all laws providing for
the protection of the public and employees of railroads ((which)) that
prior to April 1, 1955, were vested in and required to be performed by
the director of labor and industries.

The commission may enter the property of any business that
receives, ships, or offers for shipment hazardous materials by rail, or that
manufactures, marks, maintains, reconditions, repairs, or tests containers that
are represented, marked, certified, or sold for use in the transportation of
hazardous materials by rail. Entry shall be at a reasonable time and in a
reasonable manner. The purpose of such entry shall be to perform inspections,
investigations, or surveillance of facilities, equipment, records, and
operations relating to the packaging, loading, or transportation of hazardous
materials by rail. The term "business" is all inclusive and is not
limited to common carriers or public service companies.

---
END ---