BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.28.1817 and 1998 c 35 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Before proposing imposition of a new tax under this chapter, an increase in the
rate of a tax imposed under this chapter, repeal of an exemption from a tax
imposed under this chapter, or a change in the use of revenue received under
this chapter, a municipality with a population of five thousand or more shall
establish a lodging tax advisory committee under this section. A lodging tax
advisory committee shall consist of at least five members, appointed by the
legislative body of the municipality, unless the municipality has a charter
providing for a different appointment authority. The committee membership
shall ((include)) consist of the following: (a) At least two
members who are representatives of businesses required to collect tax under
this chapter; ((and)) (b) at least two members who are persons involved
in activities authorized to be funded by revenue received under this chapter;
and (c) one member who is an elected official of the municipality who shall
serve as chair. Persons who are eligible for appointment under (a) of this
subsection are not eligible for appointment under (b) of this subsection. ((Persons
who are eligible for appointment under (b) of this subsection are not eligible
for appointment under (a) of this subsection.)) Organizations representing
businesses required to collect tax under this chapter, organizations involved
in activities authorized to be funded by revenue received under this chapter,
and local agencies involved in tourism promotion may submit recommendations for
membership on the committee. The number of members who are representatives of
businesses required to collect tax under this chapter shall equal the number of
members who are involved in activities authorized to be funded by revenue
received under this chapter. ((One member shall be an elected official of
the municipality who shall serve as chair of the committee.)) An advisory
committee for a county may include one nonvoting member who is an elected
official of a city or town in the county. An advisory committee for a city or
town may include one nonvoting member who is an elected official of the county
in which the city or town is located. The appointing authority shall review
the membership of the advisory committee annually and make changes as appropriate.

(2)
Any municipality that proposes imposition of a tax under this chapter, an
increase in the rate of a tax imposed under this chapter, repeal of an
exemption from a tax imposed under this chapter, or a change in the use of
revenue received under this chapter shall submit the proposal to the lodging
tax advisory committee for review and comment. The submission shall occur at
least forty-five days before final action on or passage of the proposal by the
municipality. The advisory committee shall submit comments on the proposal in
a timely manner through generally applicable public comment procedures. The
comments shall include an analysis of the extent to which the proposal will
accommodate activities for tourists or increase tourism, and the extent to
which the proposal will affect the long-term stability of the fund created
under RCW 67.28.1815. Failure of the advisory committee to submit comments
before final action on or passage of the proposal shall not prevent the
municipality from acting on the proposal. A municipality is not required to
submit an amended proposal to an advisory committee under this section.

(3) If a municipality with a population of less than five
thousand establishes a lodging tax advisory committee, then the committee shall
be composed according to subsection (1) of this section and shall follow the
procedures according to subsection (2) of this section.

---
END ---