BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the practice of conducting random inspections of
commercial motor vehicles by law enforcement officers without establishment of
probable cause is both inefficient and costly to law enforcement agencies and
to business and industry. The legislature further finds that in protecting
public safety on the roads of this state, the enforcement of safety laws and
regulations must be done within the parameter of both the state and federal
Constitutions. It is the intent of this act to require that a commercial motor
vehicle operating upon the public highways of this state must not be subjected
to a random inspection without the establishment of probable cause.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.32.010 and 1993 c 403 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The chief of the Washington state patrol may operate, maintain, or designate,
throughout the state of Washington, stations for the inspection of school buses
and private carrier buses, with respect to vehicle equipment, drivers'
qualifications, and hours of service and to set reasonable times when
inspection of vehicles shall be performed.

(2)
The state patrol may inspect a commercial motor vehicle upon the
establishment of probable cause while the vehicle is operating on the
public highways of this state with respect to vehicle equipment, hours of
service, and driver qualifications. The state patrol shall, whenever possible,
conduct these inspections at commercial vehicle terminals instead of along the
highway.

(3)
It is unlawful for any vehicle required to be inspected to be operated over the
public highways of this state unless and until it has been approved periodically
as to equipment.

(4)
Inspections shall be performed by a responsible employee of the chief of the
Washington state patrol, who shall be duly authorized and who shall have
authority to secure and withhold, with written notice to the director of
licensing, the certificate of license registration and license plates of any
vehicle found to be defective in equipment so as to be unsafe or unfit to be
operated upon the highways of this state, and it shall be unlawful for any
person to operate such vehicle unless and until it has been placed in a
condition satisfactory to pass a subsequent equipment inspection. The police
officer in charge of such vehicle equipment inspection shall grant to the
operator of such defective vehicle the privilege to move such vehicle to a
place for repair under such restrictions as may be reasonably necessary.

(5)
In the event any insignia, sticker, or other marker is adopted to be displayed
upon vehicles in connection with the inspection of vehicle equipment, it shall
be displayed as required by the rules of the chief of the Washington state
patrol, and it is a traffic infraction for any person to mutilate, destroy,
remove, or otherwise interfere with the display thereof.

(6)
It is a traffic infraction for any person to refuse to have his motor vehicle
examined as required by the chief of the Washington state patrol, or, after
having had it examined, to refuse to place an insignia, sticker, or other
marker, if issued, upon the vehicle, or fraudulently to obtain any such
insignia, sticker, or other marker, or to refuse to place his motor vehicle in
proper condition after having had it examined, or in any manner, to fail to
conform to the provisions of this chapter.

(7)
It is a traffic infraction for any person to perform false or improvised
repairs, or repairs in any manner not in accordance with acceptable and
customary repair practices, upon a motor vehicle.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.32.040 and 1986 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Vehicle
equipment inspection shall be at such intervals as required by the chief of the
Washington state patrol and shall be made without charge. A commercial
motor vehicle while operating upon the public highways of this state must not
be stopped for a safety inspection without probable cause.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

A
commercial motor vehicle as defined in chapter 46.32 RCW while operating upon
the public highways of this state must not be stopped by a law enforcement
officer for a safety inspection without probable cause.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
46.64.060 and 1967 c 144 s 1; and

(2) RCW
46.64.070 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 22 s 1 & 1967 c 144 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---