BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
governing unit may require that each person who is booked at a city, county, or
regional jail pay a fee of ten dollars to the sheriff's department of the
county or police chief of the city in which the jail is located. The fee is
payable immediately from any money then possessed by the person being booked,
or any money deposited with the sheriff's department or city jail
administration on the person's behalf. If the person has no funds at the time
of booking or during the period of incarceration, the sheriff or police chief
may notify the court in the county or city where the charges related to the
booking are pending, and may request the assessment of the fee. Unless the
person is held on other criminal matters, if the person is not charged, is acquitted,
or if all charges are dismissed, the sheriff or police chief shall return the
fee to the person at the last known address listed in the booking records.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.48.020 and 1987 c 462 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter the words and phrases in this section shall have the
meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Holding facility" means a facility operated by a governing unit
primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of adult
persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or sentencing and for
the temporary housing of such persons during or after trial and/or sentencing,
but in no instance shall the housing exceed thirty days.

(2)
"Detention facility" means a facility operated by a governing unit
primarily designed, staffed, and used for the temporary housing of adult
persons charged with a criminal offense prior to trial or sentencing and for
the housing of adult persons for purposes of punishment and correction after
sentencing or persons serving terms not to exceed ninety days.

(3)
"Special detention facility" means a minimum security facility
operated by a governing unit primarily designed, staffed, and used for the
housing of special populations of sentenced persons who do not require the
level of security normally provided in detention and correctional facilities
including, but not necessarily limited to, persons convicted of offenses under
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504.

(4)
"Correctional facility" means a facility operated by a governing unit
primarily designed, staffed, and used for the housing of adult persons serving
terms not exceeding one year for the purposes of punishment, correction, and
rehabilitation following conviction of a criminal offense.

(5)
"Cost of incarceration" means the cost of providing a prisoner
with shelter, food, clothing, transportation, supervision, health care, and
other services and supplies as may be necessary for the maintenance and support
of the prisoner while in custody, based on the actual cost per day per prisoner
established by the governing unit.

(6)
"Jail" means any holding, detention, special detention, or
correctional facility as defined in this section.

(((6)))
(7) "Health care" means preventive, diagnostic, and
rehabilitative services provided by licensed health care professionals and/or
facilities; such care to include providing prescription drugs where indicated.

(((7)))
(8) "Governing unit" means the city and/or county or any combinations
of cities and/or counties responsible for the operation, supervision, and
maintenance of a jail.

(((8)))
(9) "Major urban" means a county or combination of counties
which has a city having a population greater than twenty-six thousand based on the
1978 projections of the office of financial management.

(((9)))
(10) "Medium urban" means a county or combination of counties
which has a city having a population equal to or greater than ten thousand but
less than twenty-six thousand based on the 1978 projections of the office of
financial management.

(((10)))
(11) "Prisoner" means a person who has been convicted and
sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a county or city jail or detention
facility for a crime punishable under the laws of this state, including a
person sentenced as a condition of probation, but does not include a person who
is committed to a county jail under RCW 70.48.140.

(12)
"Rural" means a county or combination of counties which has a city
having a population less than ten thousand based on the 1978 projections of the
office of financial management.

(((11)))
(13) "Office" means the office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
governing unit may seek reimbursement from a nonindigent prisoner for cost of
incarceration incurred by the county or city for the maintenance and support of
the prisoner in a county or city jail or detention facility, including expenses
incurred during a period of pretrial detention if time served during the
pretrial detention is credited by the court against any sentence imposed. The
reimbursement may be payable from any money then possessed by the prisoner or
any money deposited with the jail on the prisoner's behalf.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Before a governing unit may request reimbursement from a prisoner, the
governing unit must conduct an investigation of the financial status of the
prisoner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
At any time after the conviction of a prisoner, and after the financial status
of the prisoner has been determined or the prisoner has refused to cooperate
with the financial status investigation set forth in section 4 of this act, the
sheriff of the county, or the administrator of the department of detention or
the person appointed to administer a city jail, may issue a written demand to
the prisoner for reimbursement of the expenses incurred by the county or city
for the prisoner's maintenance and support during his period of imprisonment.

(2)
The prisoner shall pay the total amount due when the written demand is issued.
The prisoner may arrange to make payments on a monthly basis. If such
arrangements are made, the prisoner must be provided with a monthly billing
statement that specifies the date on which the next payment is due.

(3)
If the prisoner does not satisfy the written demand for reimbursement within
the time set, the prosecuting attorney for a county or the city attorney for an
incorporated city may file a civil action under section 6 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
If a prisoner fails to make a payment within ten days after it is due, the county
prosecutor or the city attorney for an incorporated city may file a civil
action in a court of competent jurisdiction within this state seeking recovery
of:

(a)
The amount of reimbursement due;

(b)
Costs incurred in conducting an investigation of the financial status of the
prisoner; and

(c)
Attorneys' fees and costs.

(2)
A civil action brought under this section must:

(a)
Be instituted in the name of the county or city in which the jail or detention
facility is located;

(b)
Indicate the date and place of sentencing, including the name of the court that
imposed the sentence;

(c)
Include the record of judgment of conviction, if available;

(d)
Indicate the length of time served by the prisoner and, if the prisoner has
been released, the date of release; and

(e)
Indicate the amount of reimbursement that the prisoner owes to the county or
city.

(3)
The treasurer of the governing unit in which a prisoner is or was confined
shall determine the amount of reimbursement that the prisoner owes to the governing
unit. The treasurer may render a sworn statement indicating the amount of
reimbursement that the prisoner owes and submit the statement in support of a
civil action brought under this section. The statement is prima facie evidence
of the amount due.

(4)
A court in a civil action brought under this section may award a money judgment
in favor of the governing unit in whose name the action was brought.

(5)
If necessary to prevent the disposition of the prisoner's property by the
prisoner, or the prisoner's spouse or agent, a governing unit may file a motion
for a temporary restraining order. The court may, without a hearing, issue ex
parte orders restraining any person from transferring, encumbering,
hypothecating, concealing, or in any way disposing of any property of the
prisoner, real or personal, whether community or separate, except for necessary
living expenses.

(6)
The payment, under a judicial order, of existing obligations for:

(a)
Child support or alimony;

(b)
Restitution to victims of crimes; and

(c)
Court-ordered legal financial obligations pursuant to RCW 9.94A.145;

has
priority over the payment of a judgment entered under this section.

(7)
The governing unit may seek a mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of
obtaining satisfaction for the legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) A
prisoner who is or was sentenced to a term of imprisonment in a county or city
jail or detention facility shall cooperate with the governing unit in
satisfying the reimbursement sought by the governing unit under sections 3
through 9 of this act.

(2)
The governing unit may reduce or deny a credit on the prisoner's term of
imprisonment for any prisoner who willfully refuses to cooperate under
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
sheriff of the county or the administrator of the department of detention or a
person chosen to administer a city jail shall provide the prosecuting attorney
of the county or the city attorney of the incorporated city all information and
assistance possible to enable the prosecutor or city attorney to secure
reimbursement for the county or city under sections 3 through 9 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Reimbursements secured or otherwise obtained by a local legislative authority
under sections 3 through 9 of this act must be credited to the jail operating
budget of the county or city, provided that the offender's earnings from jail
industries shall be deposited as specified in RCW 36.110.110. The county or
city shall reimburse the governmental entity for its payment to the extent of
the amount received from the prisoner if:

(1)
In accordance with a contractual agreement, the county or city was paid by
another governmental entity for expenses related to maintaining and supporting
a prisoner; and

(2)
The prisoner reimburses the county or city for those expenses under sections 3
through 9 of this act except for those moneys deposited pursuant to RCW
36.110.110.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The administrator of the county jail or authorized staff may consent as
provided in this section to the provision of health and dental examinations and
care, and necessary treatment for medical and dental conditions requiring
prompt attention, for juveniles lawfully detained at or sentenced to a county
jail. The treatment may include treatment provided at medical or dental
facilities outside the county jail and treatment provided within the county
jail for the period of time the youth is in the custody of the county jail.
Juveniles shall not be transported for treatment outside the county jail if
treatment services are available within the county jail.

(2)
The examination, care, and treatment may be provided without parental consent
when prompt attention is required if the administrator of the county jail or
authorized staff have been unable to secure permission for treatment from the
parent or parents, guardian, or other person having custody of the child after
reasonable attempts to do so before the provision of the medical and dental
services.

(3)
Treatment shall not be authorized for juveniles whose parent or parents,
guardian, or other person having custody of the child informs the administrator
of the county jail of objections to the treatment before the treatment is
provided except where RCW 70.96A.095 applies.

Sec.
11. RCW
10.01.160 and 1995 c 221 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court may require a defendant to pay costs. Costs may be imposed only upon
a convicted defendant, except for costs imposed upon a defendant's entry into a
deferred prosecution program or costs imposed upon a defendant for preparing
and serving a warrant for failure to appear.

(2)
Costs shall be limited to expenses specially incurred by the state in
prosecuting the defendant or in administering the deferred prosecution program
under chapter 10.05 RCW. They cannot include expenses inherent in providing a
constitutionally guaranteed jury trial or expenditures in connection with the
maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by the
public irrespective of specific violations of law. Expenses incurred for
serving of warrants for failure to appear and jury fees under RCW 10.46.190 may
be included in costs the court may require a defendant to pay. Costs for
administering a deferred prosecution may not exceed one hundred fifty dollars.
Costs for preparing and serving a warrant for failure to appear may not exceed
one hundred dollars. ((Costs of incarceration imposed on a defendant
convicted of a misdemeanor or a gross misdemeanor may not exceed fifty dollars
per day of incarceration.)) Payment of other court-ordered financial
obligations, including all legal financial obligations and costs of supervision
take precedence over the payment of the cost of incarceration ((ordered by
the court)) pursuant to sections 3 and 6 of this act. Except for
funds deposited pursuant to RCW 36.110.110, all funds received from
defendants for the cost of incarceration in the county or city jail must be
remitted for ((criminal justice)) jail operation purposes to the
county or city that is responsible for the defendant's jail costs. Costs
imposed constitute a judgment against a defendant and survive a dismissal of
the underlying action against the defendant. However, if the defendant is
acquitted on the underlying action, the costs for preparing and serving a
warrant for failure to appear do not survive the acquittal, and the judgment
that such costs would otherwise constitute shall be vacated.

(3)
The court shall not sentence a defendant to pay costs unless the defendant is
or will be able to pay them. In determining the amount and method of payment
of costs, the court shall take account of the financial resources of the
defendant and the nature of the burden that payment of costs will impose.

(4)
A defendant who has been sentenced to pay costs and who is not in contumacious
default in the payment thereof may at any time petition the sentencing court
for remission of the payment of costs or of any unpaid portion thereof. If it
appears to the satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will
impose manifest hardship on the defendant or the defendant's immediate family,
the court may remit all or part of the amount due in costs, or modify the
method of payment under RCW 10.01.170.

Sec.
12. RCW
9.94A.145 and 1997 c 121 s 5 and 1997 c 52 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a person is convicted of a felony, the court may order the payment of
a legal financial obligation as part of the sentence. The court must on either
the judgment and sentence or on a subsequent order to pay, designate the total
amount of a legal financial obligation and segregate this amount among the
separate assessments made for restitution, costs, fines, and other assessments
required by law. On the same order, the court is also to set a sum that the
offender is required to pay on a monthly basis towards satisfying the legal
financial obligation. If the court fails to set the offender monthly payment
amount, the department shall set the amount. Upon receipt of an offender's
monthly payment, after restitution is satisfied, the county clerk shall
distribute the payment proportionally among all other fines, costs, and
assessments imposed, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

(2)
((If the court determines that the offender, at the time of sentencing, has
the means to pay for the cost of incarceration, the court may require the
offender to pay for the cost of incarceration at a rate of fifty dollars per
day of incarceration.)) Payment of other court-ordered financial
obligations, including all legal financial obligations and costs of supervision
shall take precedence over the payment of the cost of incarceration ((ordered
by the court)) pursuant to sections 3 and 6 of this act. All funds
recovered from offenders for the cost of incarceration in the county jail shall
be remitted to the county and the costs of incarceration in a prison shall be
remitted to the department of corrections.

(3)
The court may add to the judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay a
statement that a notice of payroll deduction is to be immediately issued. If
the court chooses not to order the immediate issuance of a notice of payroll
deduction at sentencing, the court shall add to the judgment and sentence or
subsequent order to pay a statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be
issued or other income-withholding action may be taken, without further notice
to the offender if a monthly court-ordered legal financial obligation payment
is not paid when due, and an amount equal to or greater than the amount payable
for one month is owed.

If
a judgment and sentence or subsequent order to pay does not include the
statement that a notice of payroll deduction may be issued or other
income-withholding action may be taken if a monthly legal financial obligation
payment is past due, the department may serve a notice on the offender stating
such requirements and authorizations. Service shall be by personal service or
any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(4)
All legal financial obligations that are ordered as a result of a conviction
for a felony, may also be enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil
action by the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed.
Restitution collected through civil enforcement must be paid through the
registry of the court and must be distributed proportionately according to each
victim's loss when there is more than one victim. The judgment and sentence
shall identify the party or entity to whom restitution is owed so that the
state, party, or entity may enforce the judgment. If restitution is ordered
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.140(3) or 9.94A.142(3) to a victim of rape of a child and
the victim's child born from the rape, the Washington state child support
registry shall be identified as the party to whom payments must be made.
Restitution obligations arising from the rape of a child in the first, second,
or third degree that result in the pregnancy of the victim may be enforced for
the time periods provided under RCW 9.94A.140(3) and 9.94A.142(3). All other
legal financial obligations may be enforced at any time during the ten-year
period following the offender's release from total confinement or within ten
years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. Prior
to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior court may extend
the criminal judgment an additional ten years for payment of legal financial
obligations including crime victims' assessments. If jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during the subsequent period. Independent of the
department, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed
shall have the authority to utilize any other remedies available to the party
or entity to collect the legal financial obligation.

(5)
In order to assist the court in setting a monthly sum that the offender must
pay during the period of supervision, the offender is required to report to the
department for purposes of preparing a recommendation to the court. When
reporting, the offender is required, under oath, to truthfully and honestly
respond to all questions concerning present, past, and future earning
capabilities and the location and nature of all property or financial assets.
The offender is further required to bring any and all documents as requested by
the department.

(6)
After completing the investigation, the department shall make a report to the
court on the amount of the monthly payment that the offender should be required
to make towards a satisfied legal financial obligation.

(7)
During the period of supervision, the department may make a recommendation to
the court that the offender's monthly payment schedule be modified so as to
reflect a change in financial circumstances. If the department sets the
monthly payment amount, the department may modify the monthly payment amount
without the matter being returned to the court. Also, during the period of
supervision, the offender may be required at the request of the department to
report to the department for the purposes of reviewing the appropriateness of
the collection schedule for the legal financial obligation. During this
reporting, the offender is required under oath to truthfully and honestly
respond to all questions concerning earning capabilities and the location and
nature of all property or financial assets. Also, the offender is required to
bring any and all documents as requested by the department in order to prepare the
collection schedule.

(8)
After the judgment and sentence or payment order is entered, the department
shall for any period of supervision be authorized to collect the legal
financial obligation from the offender. Any amount collected by the department
shall be remitted daily to the county clerk for the purposes of disbursements.
The department is authorized to accept credit cards as payment for a legal
financial obligation, and any costs incurred related to accepting credit card
payments shall be the responsibility of the offender.

(9)
The department or any obligee of the legal financial obligation may seek a
mandatory wage assignment for the purposes of obtaining satisfaction for the
legal financial obligation pursuant to RCW 9.94A.2001.

(10)
The requirement that the offender pay a monthly sum towards a legal financial
obligation constitutes a condition or requirement of a sentence and the
offender is subject to the penalties as provided in RCW 9.94A.200 for
noncompliance.

(11)
The county clerk shall provide the department with individualized monthly
billings for each offender with an unsatisfied legal financial obligation and
shall provide the department with notice of payments by such offenders no less
frequently than weekly.

Sec.
13. RCW
9.94A.380 and 1988 c 157 s 4 and 1988 c 155 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Alternatives
to total confinement are available for offenders with sentences of one year or
less. These alternatives include the following sentence conditions that the
court may order as substitutes for total confinement:

(1)
One day of partial confinement may be substituted for one day of total
confinement;

(2)
In addition, for offenders convicted of nonviolent offenses only, eight
hours of community service may be substituted for one day of total confinement,
with a maximum conversion limit of two hundred forty hours or thirty days.
Community service hours must be completed within the period of community
supervision or a time period specified by the court, which shall not exceed
twenty-four months, pursuant to a schedule determined by the department; and

(3)
For offenders convicted of nonviolent and nonsex offenses, unless the court
prohibits use of jail confinement options, the county jails are authorized to
convert jail confinement to an available county supervised community option.

For
sentences of nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the court shall
consider and give priority to available alternatives to total confinement and
shall state its reasons in writing on the judgment and sentence form if the
alternatives are not used.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14.
Sections 1 and 3 through 10 of this act are each added to chapter 70.48 RCW.

---
END ---