BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.270 and 1997 c 58 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

Good cause reasons for failure to participate in WorkFirst program
components include: (1) Situations where the recipient is a parent or other
relative personally providing care for a child under the age of six years, and
formal or informal child care, or day care for an incapacitated individual
living in the same home as a dependent child, is necessary for an individual to
participate or continue participation in the program or accept employment, and
such care is not available, and the department fails to provide such care; or
(2) ((until June 30, 1999,)) if the recipient is a parent with a child
under the age of one year. A parent may only receive this exemption for a
total of twelve months, which may be consecutive or nonconsecutive((; or (3)
after June 30, 1999, if the recipient is a parent with a child under three
months of age)).

---
END ---