BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.13.280 and 1997 c 272 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 70.24.105, whenever a child is placed in out-of-home
care by the department or a child-placing agency, the department or agency
shall, within available resources, share information about the child and the
child's family with the care provider and shall, within available resources,
consult with the care provider regarding the child's case plan. ((If the
child is dependent pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, the
department or agency shall keep the care provider informed regarding the dates
and location of dependency review and permanency planning hearings pertaining
to the child.)) The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and their right to an
opportunity to be heard in, any hearing pertaining to the child, but only if
the child is residing with the foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative
at the time of the hearing. This provision shall not be construed to grant
party status to any person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.

(2)
Any person who receives information about a child or a child's family pursuant
to this section shall keep the information confidential and shall not further
disclose or disseminate the information except as authorized by law.

(3)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the
department or child-placing agencies to disclose client information or to
maintain client confidentiality as provided by law.

(4)
The department is authorized to adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.34.130 and 1998 c 314 s 2 and 1998 c 130 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

If,
after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has been proven by a
preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of
RCW 13.34.030; after consideration of the predisposition report prepared
pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a disposition hearing has been held
pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court shall enter an order of disposition
pursuant to this section.

(1)
The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the case:

(a)
Order a disposition other than removal of the child from his or her home, which
shall provide a program designed to alleviate the immediate danger to the
child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child has already suffered, and to
aid the parents so that the child will not be endangered in the future. In
selecting a program, the court should choose those services that least
interfere with family autonomy, provided that the services are adequate to
protect the child.

(b)
Order that the child be removed from his or her home and ordered into the
custody, control, and care of a relative or the department of social and health
services or a licensed child placing agency for placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or in a home
not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW. Unless there is
reasonable cause to believe that the safety or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered,
such child shall be placed with a person who is related to the child as defined
in RCW 74.15.020(((4)(a))) (2)(a) and with whom the child has a
relationship and is comfortable, and who is willing and available to care for
the child. Placement of the child with a relative under this subsection shall
be given preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be
made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent
or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home and to
make it possible for the child to return home, specifying the services that
have been provided to the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, and that preventive services have been offered or provided and have
failed to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health,
safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home,
and that:

(i)
There is no parent or guardian available to care for such child;

(ii)
The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take custody of the
child;

(iii)
The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a manifest danger
exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or neglect if the child is not
removed from the home and an order under RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the
child from danger; or

(iv)
The extent of the child's disability is such that the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian is unable to provide the necessary care for the child and the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian has determined that the child would benefit from
placement outside of the home.

(2)
If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that a petition seeking
termination of the parent and child relationship be filed if the court finds:
(a) Termination is recommended by the supervising agency; (b) termination is in
the best interests of the child; and (c) that because of the existence of
aggravated circumstances, reasonable efforts to unify the family are not
required. Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated circumstances,
reasonable efforts may be required if the court or department determines it is
in the best interest of the child. In determining whether aggravated
circumstances exist, the court shall consider one or more of the following:

(i)
Conviction of the parent of rape of the child in the first, second, or third
degree as defined in RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079;

(ii)
Conviction of the parent of criminal mistreatment of the child in the first or
second degree as defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and 9A.42.030;

(iii)
Conviction of the parent of one of the following assault crimes, when the child
is the victim: Assault in the first or second degree as defined in RCW
9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021 or assault of a child in the first or second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.36.120 or 9A.36.130;

(iv)
Conviction of the parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide by abuse of the
child's other parent, sibling, or another child;

(v)
Conviction of the parent of attempting, soliciting, or conspiracy to commit a
crime listed in (c)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection;

(vi)
A finding by a court that a parent is a sexually violent predator as defined in
RCW 71.09.020;

(vii)
Failure of the parent to complete available treatment ordered under this
chapter or the equivalent laws of another state, where such failure has
resulted in a prior termination of parental rights to another child and the
parent has failed to effect significant change in the interim. In the case of
a parent of an Indian child, as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, P.L.
95-608 (25 U.S.C. (([Sec.])) Sec. 1903), the court shall also
consider tribal efforts to assist the parent in completing treatment and make
it possible for the child to return home;

(viii)
An infant under three years of age has been abandoned as defined in RCW
13.34.030(4)(a);

(ix)
The mother has given birth to three or more drug-affected infants, resulting in
the department filing a petition under section 23 of this act.

(3)
If reasonable efforts are not ordered under subsection (2) of this section a
permanency ((plan [planning])) planning hearing shall be held
within thirty days. Reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a
timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

(4)
Whenever a child is ordered removed from the child's home, the agency charged
with his or her care shall provide the court with:

(a)
A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the following outcomes as
a primary goal and may identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; or long-term
relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written
agreement between the parties and the care provider; and independent living, if
appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older. Whenever a permanency
plan identifies independent living as a goal, the plan shall also specifically
identify the services that will be provided to assist the child to make a
successful transition from foster care to independent living. Before the court
approves independent living as a permanency plan of care, the court shall make
a finding that the provision of services to assist the child in making a
transition from foster care to independent living will allow the child to
manage his or her financial affairs and to manage his or her personal, social,
educational, and nonfinancial affairs. The department shall not discharge a
child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of
age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.

(b)
Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that
a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to return the child home, and what actions the
agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.

(i)
The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be offered in
order to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents must meet
in order to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and parental
requirement.

(ii)
The agency shall be required to encourage the maximum parent-child contact
possible, including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the
care of the child while the child is in placement. Visitation may be limited
or denied only if the court determines that such limitation or denial is
necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare.

(iii)
A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as possible, preferably in
the child's own neighborhood, unless the court finds that placement at a
greater distance is necessary to promote the child's or parents' well-being.

(iv)
The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the agency, or within the
community, or those services which the department of social and health services
has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services.

(c)
If the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the child, services
to be offered or provided to the child, and, if visitation would be in the best
interests of the child, a recommendation to the court regarding visitation
between parent and child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination
petition. The agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for
the parents or provide services to the parents.

(5)
If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable efforts to prevent
or eliminate the need to remove the child from his or her home or to safely
return the child home should not be part of the permanency plan of care for the
child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner
and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent
placement of the child.

(6)
If there is insufficient information at the time of the disposition hearing
upon which to base a determination regarding the suitability of a proposed
placement with a relative, the child shall remain in foster care and the court
shall direct the supervising agency to conduct necessary background
investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report the results of such
investigation to the court within thirty days. However, if such relative
appears otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment, the
criminal history background check need not be completed before placement, but
as soon as possible after placement. Any placements with relatives, pursuant
to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation by the relative with the
agency case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders regarding
parent-child contacts and any other conditions imposed by the court.
Noncompliance with the case plan or court order shall be grounds for removal of
the child from the relative's home, subject to review by the court.

(7)
Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen review board under
chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found to be dependent shall be
reviewed by the court at least every six months from the beginning date of the
placement episode or the date dependency is established, whichever is first, at
a hearing in which it shall be determined whether court supervision should
continue. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and parental
completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary, revised
permanency time limits. The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and their right to an
opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only
if the child is residing with that person ((is currently providing
care to that child)) at the time of the hearing. This section shall not be
construed to grant party status to any person who has been provided an
opportunity to be heard.

(a)
A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless the court finds
that a reason for removal as set forth in this section no longer exists. The
parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall report to the court the efforts
they have made to correct the conditions which led to removal. If a child is
returned, casework supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at
which time there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.

(b)
If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in writing:

(i)
Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to the parties to
facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or offered;

(ii)
Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate
to the child's needs, including whether consideration and preference has been
given to placement with the child's relatives;

(iii)
Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether the placement is
appropriate;

(iv)
Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the child, the child's
parents, and the agency supervising the placement;

(v)
Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems that necessitated
the child's placement in out-of-home care;

(vi)
Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why visitation has
not occurred or has been infrequent;

(vii)
Whether additional services are needed to facilitate the return of the child to
the child's parents; if so, the court shall order that reasonable services be
offered specifying such services; and

(viii)
The projected date by which the child will be returned home or other permanent
plan of care will be implemented.

(c)
The court at the review hearing may order that a petition seeking termination
of the parent and child relationship be filed.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.34.145 and 1998 c 314 s 3 and 1998 c 130 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
A permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services, including
placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever
occurs first. The permanency planning process continues until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or dependency is dismissed. The planning process
shall include reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.

(a)
Whenever a child is placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130, the
agency that has custody of the child shall provide the court with a written
permanency plan of care directed towards securing a safe, stable, and permanent
home for the child as soon as possible. The plan shall identify one of the
following outcomes as the primary goal and may also identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the child's
parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal
custody; or long-term relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen,
with a written agreement between the parties and the care provider; and
independent living, if appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older and
the provisions of subsection (2) of this section are met.

(b)
The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may change over time
based upon the circumstances of the particular case.

(c)
Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest possible date,
preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen months.
In cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally free
for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency
planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months
following entry of the termination order.

(d)
For purposes related to permanency planning:

(i)
"Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship pursuant to this
chapter, a legal guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW, or equivalent laws
of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(ii)
"Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW.

(iii)
"Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to chapter
26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or of a federally recognized
Indian tribe.

(2)
Whenever a permanency plan identifies independent living as a goal, the plan
shall also specifically identify the services that will be provided to assist
the child to make a successful transition from foster care to independent
living. Before the court approves independent living as a permanency plan of
care, the court shall make a finding that the provision of services to assist
the child in making a transition from foster care to independent living will
allow the child to manage his or her financial affairs and to manage his or her
personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs. The department shall
not discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child is
eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter
13.64 RCW.

(3)
A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where the child has
remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and an adoption decree,
guardianship order, or permanent custody order has not previously been
entered. The hearing shall take place no later than twelve months following
commencement of the current placement episode.

(4)
Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency guardian or long-term
relative or foster care provider, and the child is not returned to the home of
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian but is placed in out-of-home care, a
permanency planning hearing shall take place no later than twelve months, as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, following the date of removal
unless, prior to the hearing, the child returns to the home of the dependency
guardian or long-term care provider, the child is placed in the home of the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order,
or permanent custody order is entered, or the dependency is dismissed.

(5)
No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning hearing, the
agency having custody of the child shall submit a written permanency plan to
the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all parties and their legal
counsel, if any.

(6)
At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall enter findings as required
by RCW 13.34.130(7) and shall review the permanency plan prepared by the
agency. ((If the child has resided in the home of a foster parent or
relative for more than six months prior to the permanency planning hearing,))
The court shall also enter a finding regarding whether the foster parent
or relative was informed of the hearing as required in RCW 74.13.280 and
13.34.130(7). If a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been achieved
prior to the permanency planning hearing, the court shall review the child's
status to determine whether the placement and the plan for the child's care
remain appropriate. In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has
not yet been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the
primary goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done to make
it possible to achieve the primary goal. In all cases, the court shall:

(a)(i)
Order the permanency plan prepared by the agency to be implemented; or

(ii)
Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the modified plan; and

(b)(i)
Order the child returned home only if the court finds that a reason for removal
as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or

(ii)
Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited specified time
period while efforts are made to implement the permanency plan.

(7)
If the court orders the child returned home, casework supervision shall
continue for at least six months, at which time a review hearing shall be held
pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(7), and the court shall determine the need for
continued intervention.

(8)
Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this chapter shall not be a barrier
to the entry of an order establishing a legal guardianship or permanent legal
custody when, (a) the court has ordered implementation of a permanency plan
that includes legal guardianship or permanent legal custody, and (b) the party
pursuing the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody is the party
identified in the permanency plan as the prospective legal guardian or
custodian. During the pendency of such proceeding, juvenile court shall
conduct review hearings and further permanency planning hearings as provided in
this chapter. At the conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal
custody proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship or
permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be dismissed.

(9)
Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold a further
permanency planning hearing in accordance with this section at least once every
twelve months until a permanency planning goal is achieved or the dependency is
dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(10)
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 13.34.235, the status of all dependent
children shall continue to be reviewed by the court at least once every six
months, in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(7), until the dependency is
dismissed. Prior to the second permanency planning hearing, the agency that
has custody of the child shall consider whether to file a petition for
termination of parental rights.

(11)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability of the agency
that has custody of the child to file a petition for termination of parental
rights or a guardianship petition at any time following the establishment of
dependency. Upon the filing of such a petition, a fact-finding hearing shall
be scheduled and held in accordance with this chapter unless the agency
requests dismissal of the petition prior to the hearing or unless the parties
enter an agreed order terminating parental rights, establishing guardianship,
or otherwise resolving the matter.

(12)
The approval of a permanency plan that does not contemplate return of the child
to the parent does not relieve the supervising agency of its obligation to
provide reasonable services, under this chapter, intended to effectuate the
return of the child to the parent, including but not limited to, visitation
rights.

(13) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the
procedural due process rights of any party in a termination or guardianship
proceeding filed under this chapter.

---
END ---