BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislative authority of any town or city located in a county with a
population of less than one million may create a public facilities district.
The legislative authorities of any contiguous group of towns or cities located
in a county with a population of less than one million may enter an agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a public
facilities district.

(2)
A public facilities district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the
city or town or contiguous group of cities or towns that created the district,
except that the district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county
or counties in which the district is located if a majority of the voters of the
county or counties approve the creation of the district in a general election
or a special election that may be called for that purpose.

(3)
A public facilities district created by a single city or town shall be governed
by a board of directors consisting of the members of the legislative body of
the city that created the district. A district created by a contiguous group
of cities or towns shall be governed by a board of directors appointed in
accordance with the terms of the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the
joint operation of the district.

(4)
A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(5)
A public facilities district shall constitute a body corporate and shall
possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as
all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by
statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff,
and services, to enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(6)
A public facilities district may acquire and transfer real and personal
property by lease, sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or collateral attack
on any metropolitan facilities district purported to be authorized or created
in conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after
creation by the city legislative authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
public facilities district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate one or more regional centers.
For purposes of this act, "regional center" means a convention,
conference, or special events center, or any combination of facilities, and
related parking facilities, serving a regional population constructed,
improved, or rehabilitated after the effective date of this act at a cost of at
least ten million dollars, including debt service. "Regional center"
also includes an existing convention, conference, or special events center, and
related parking facilities, serving a regional population, that is improved or
rehabilitated after the effective date of this act where the costs of improvement
or rehabilitation are at least ten million dollars, including debt service. A
regional center is conclusively presumed to serve a regional population if
state and local government investment in the construction, improvement, or
rehabilitation of the regional center is equal to or greater than ten million
dollars.

(2)
A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for the use of its
facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for
the purpose of a regional center.

(3)
Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system,
a public facilities district may contract with a public or private entity for
the operation or management of its public facilities.

(4)
A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any regional center.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
board of directors of the public facilities district shall adopt a resolution
that may be amended from time to time that shall establish the basic
requirements governing methods and amounts of reimbursement payable to such
district officials and employees for travel and other business expenses
incurred on behalf of the district. The resolution shall, among other things,
establish procedures for approving such expenses; the form of the travel and
expense voucher; and requirements governing the use of credit cards issued in
the name of the district. The resolution may also establish procedures for
payment of per diem to board members. The state auditor shall, as provided by
general law, cooperate with the public facilities district in establishing
adequate procedures for regulating and auditing the reimbursement of all such
expenses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
board of directors of the public facilities district shall have authority to
authorize the expenditure of funds for the public purposes of preparing and
distributing information to the general public and promoting, advertising,
improving, developing, operating, and maintaining a regional center. Nothing
contained in this section may be construed to authorize preparation and
distribution of information to the general public for the purpose of
influencing the outcome of a district election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
public facilities district may secure services by means of an agreement with a
service provider. The public facilities district shall publish notice,
establish criteria, receive and evaluate proposals, and negotiate with
respondents under requirements set forth by district resolution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
addition to provisions contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, the public facilities
district is authorized to follow procedures contained in RCW 43.19.1906 and
43.19.1911 for all purchases, contracts for purchase, and sales.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---