BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
chapter may be known and cited as the state sovereignty act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Person" means natural persons, corporations, partnerships, limited
liability companies, associations, and other legal entities.

(2)
"Excise tax" means any tax that forms a component of the highway
users tax fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The tenth amendment of the United States Constitution defines the total scope
of federal power as being that specifically granted by the federal Constitution
and no more. The legislature recognizes that the United States congress has
the right to lay and collect taxes under the federal Constitution. The
legislature finds, however, that the congress does not have the right under the
federal Constitution to withhold from the states the benefits of those taxes
through unconstitutional mandates.

(2)
The legislature further finds that most unconstitutional mandates prohibit
Washington from implementing programs of excellence that would exceed federal
expectations. Washington has significant technical expertise in resource
management in the areas of air, earth, and water, but the persistent threat of
sanctions renders that expertise ineffective.

(3)
In light of the continuing unconstitutional withholding of the benefits of the
taxes, the state of Washington hereby asserts its claim of sovereignty.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
There is created in the Washington state treasury the federal tax fund, which
shall be an escrow account. Any interest earned on the deposit of moneys in
the fund along with any civil penalties assessed under section 5 of this act
shall remain in the fund and shall not revert to the general fund of the state
at the end of any fiscal year. The interest earned on the deposit of moneys
and any civil penalties shall be used to pay any necessary administrative costs
incurred under this chapter and any excess interest and penalties shall be
transferred to the highway users tax fund.

(2)
Any person liable for any excise tax shall remit the tax when due along with
the person's federal taxpayer number to the department of revenue for deposit
into the fund.

(3)
All moneys collected under subsection (2) of this section shall be transmitted
to the state treasurer who, as a fiduciary agent, shall credit the same to the
federal tax fund on behalf of the person that remitted the tax.

(4)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the state treasurer shall
transfer at the end of each month the moneys held in the federal tax fund less
any interest earned on the deposit to the internal revenue service in payment
of the tax obligation of those persons who remitted the tax to the department
of revenue. As a part of the transfer, the state treasurer shall identify the
federal taxpayer number and amount received from each person who remitted any
tax to the department of revenue.

(b)
If the federal government imposes any sanctions on the state of Washington for
failing to enact legislation required by federal law, which the legislature
deems to be unconstitutional, by withholding or reprogramming any federal aid
moneys from, among other things, highway construction to highway safety or
other programs, the state treasurer shall not transfer any taxes held in the
federal tax fund but shall retain the moneys in the fund until such time as the
sanctions are lifted. If the lifting of the sanctions occurs within ninety
days, the state treasurer shall transfer the amounts held in the fund to the
internal revenue service within ten days of the lifting of the sanctions. If
the sanctions are not lifted within ninety days, the state shall impose a surcharge
on the moneys in the fund to be used for payment to continue highway project
funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Any
person who fails to comply with section 4 of this act is subject to a civil
penalty in an amount equal to one hundred fifty percent of the tax owed for
each day the person fails to comply with section 4 of this act. Any civil
penalties assessed under this section shall be deposited into the federal tax
fund established in section 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
chapter applies to federal taxes to be collected on or after the effective date
of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---