BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.27.015 and 1996 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"City" means a city or town;

(2)
"Multifamily residential building" means common wall residential
buildings that consist of ((four)) fifteen or fewer units, that
do not exceed ((two)) three stories in height, that are less than
((five)) twelve thousand square feet in area, and that have a
one-hour fire-resistive occupancy separation between units; and

(3)
"Temporary growing structure" means a structure that has the sides
and roof covered with polyethylene, polyvinyl, or similar flexible synthetic
material and is used to provide plants with either frost protection or
increased heat retention.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.27.020 and 1985 c 360 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of this chapter is to promote the health, safety, and welfare of
the occupants or users of buildings and structures and the general public by
the provision of building codes throughout the state. Accordingly, this
chapter is designed to effectuate the following purposes, objectives, and
standards:

(1)
To require ((minimum)) performance standards and requirements for
construction and construction materials, consistent with accepted standards of
engineering, fire, and life safety.

(2)
To require standards and requirements in terms of performance and nationally
accepted standards.

(3)
To permit the use of modern technical methods, devices, and improvements.

(4)
To eliminate restrictive, obsolete, conflicting, duplicating, and
unnecessary regulations and requirements which could unnecessarily increase
construction costs or retard the use of new materials and methods of
installation or provide unwarranted preferential treatment to types or classes
of materials or products or methods of construction.

(5)
To provide for standards and specifications for making buildings and facilities
accessible to and usable by physically disabled persons.

(6)
To consolidate within each authorized enforcement jurisdiction, the
administration and enforcement of building codes.

Sec.
3. RCW
19.27.035 and 1989 c 266 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
building code council shall, within one year of July 23, 1989, adopt a process
for the review of proposed state-wide amendments to the codes enumerated in RCW
19.27.031, and proposed or enacted less restrictive local amendments to
the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state
building code council.

Sec.
4. RCW
19.27.040 and 1990 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governing body of each county or city is authorized to amend the state building
code as it applies within the jurisdiction of the county or city. The ((minimum))
performance standards of the codes and the objectives enumerated in RCW
19.27.020 and 19.27.031 shall not be ((diminished)) increased
by any county or city amendments.

Nothing
in this chapter shall authorize any modifications of the requirements of
chapter 70.92 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
19.27.060 and 1989 c 266 s 2 and 1989 c 246 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The governing bodies of counties and cities may amend the codes enumerated in
RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by the state building code council as they
apply within their respective jurisdictions, but the amendments shall not
result in a code that is ((less)) more restrictive than the ((minimum))
performance standards and objectives contained in the state building code.

(a)
No amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 as amended and adopted by
the state building code council that affects single family or multifamily
residential buildings shall be effective unless the amendment is approved by
the building code council under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b).

(b)
Any county or city amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 ((which
is approved under RCW 19.27.074(1)(b) shall continue to be effective after any
action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) without necessity of reapproval under
RCW 19.27.074(1)(b) unless the amendment)) is declared null and void ((by
the council at the time any action is taken under RCW 19.27.074(1)(a) because
such action in any way altered the impact of the amendment)). A county
or city amendment to a code enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 may be approved by the
council if it is less restrictive than the code in RCW 19.27.031, and takes
effect after the effective date of this act.

(2)
Except as permitted or provided otherwise under this section, the state
building code shall be applicable to all buildings and structures including
those owned by the state or by any governmental subdivision or unit of local
government.

(3)
The governing body of each county or city may limit the application of any
portion of the state building code to exclude specified classes or types of
buildings or structures according to use other than single family or
multifamily residential buildings: PROVIDED, That in no event shall fruits or
vegetables of the tree or vine stored in buildings or warehouses constitute
combustible stock for the purposes of application of the uniform fire code.

(4)
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any building four or more
stories high with a B occupancy as defined by the uniform building code, 1982
edition, and with a city fire insurance rating of 1, 2, or 3 as defined by a
recognized fire rating bureau or organization.

(5)
No provision of the uniform fire code concerning roadways shall be part of the
state building code: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not limit the
authority of a county or city to adopt street, road, or access standards.

(6)
The provisions of the state building code may be preempted by any city or
county to the extent that the code provisions relating to the installation or
use of sprinklers in jail cells conflict with the secure and humane operation
of jails.

(7)(a)
Effective one year after July 23, 1989, the governing bodies of counties and
cities may adopt an ordinance or resolution to exempt from permit requirements
certain construction or alteration of either group R, division 3, or group M,
division 1 occupancies, or both, as defined in the uniform building code, 1988
edition, for which the total cost of fair market value of the construction or
alteration does not exceed fifteen hundred dollars. The permit exemption shall
not otherwise exempt the construction or alteration from the substantive
standards of the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031, as amended and maintained
by the state building code council under RCW 19.27.070.

(b)
Prior to July 23, 1989, the state building code council shall adopt by rule,
guidelines exempting from permit requirements certain construction and
alteration activities under (a) of this subsection.

Sec.
6. RCW
19.27.074 and 1989 c 266 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state building code council shall:

(a)
Adopt and maintain the codes to which reference is made in RCW 19.27.031 in a
status which is consistent with the state's interest as set forth in RCW
19.27.020. In maintaining these codes, the council shall regularly review
updated versions of the codes referred to in RCW 19.27.031 and other pertinent
information and shall amend the codes as deemed appropriate but not more
restrictive by the council;

(b)
Approve or deny all county or city amendments to any code referred to in RCW
19.27.031 to the degree the amendments apply to single family or multifamily
residential buildings;

(c)
As required by the legislature, develop and adopt any codes relating to
buildings; and

(d)
Propose a budget for the operation of the state building code council to be
submitted to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.090.

(2)
The state building code council may:

(a)
Appoint technical advisory committees which may include members of the council;

(b)
Employ permanent and temporary staff and contract for services; and

(c)
Conduct research into matters relating to any code or codes referred to in RCW
19.27.031 or any related matter.

All
meetings of the state building code council shall be open to the public under
the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. All actions of the state
building code council which adopt or amend any code of state-wide applicability
shall be pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

All
council decisions relating to the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 shall require
approval by at least a majority of the members of the council.

All decisions to adopt or amend codes of state-wide application
shall be made prior to December 1 of any year and shall not take effect before
the end of the regular legislative session in the next year.

---
END ---