BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act may be known and cited as the family forestry support act.

PART
1

NONINDUSTRIAL
LANDOWNER LANDSCAPE MANAGEMENT PLANS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. The
legislature finds that approximately one-third of Washington's forested land base
is managed by individuals who own less than five thousand acres of forest
land. These forest lands often are located on the edges of urban areas.
Current economic factors are encouraging the conversion of these timber lands
to uses such as roads, residential areas, shopping malls, and other uses
incompatible with providing timber and other natural resources. Once these
lands have been converted, the land base available for growing timber is
permanently reduced. The loss of productive forest land reduces the supply of
commodities and the associated jobs in timber production. It also causes the
loss of habitat, wetlands, and open space, all of which are essential to our
quality of life in this state.

The
legislature recognizes the importance of these nonindustrial forest lands for
providing the land base for timber production and habitat, particularly
riparian, wetland, and other habitat for assuring the long-term sustainability
of fish and wildlife. The legislature recognizes that nonindustrial private
forest landowners play a critical role in managing and conserving forest land.

The
legislature recognizes that with current economic factors many nonindustrial
private forest landowners will need incentives to help them remain in forestry
for the long term. These incentives and assistance programs include: Enhanced
forest stewardship programs; long-term landscape planning and associated
permits; purchase of conservation easements and development rights; marketing
credits for using forests for carbon storage; and demonstrating different ways
of keeping lands in production while allowing low-impact development.

Sec.
102. RCW
76.09.020 and 1974 ex.s. c 137 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Appeals board" shall mean the forest practices appeals board created
by RCW 76.09.210.

(2)
"Commissioner" shall mean the commissioner of public lands.

(3)
"Contiguous" shall mean land adjoining or touching by common corner
or otherwise. Land having common ownership divided by a road or other right of
way shall be considered contiguous.

(4)
"Conversion to a use other than commercial timber operation" shall
mean a bona fide conversion to an active use which is incompatible with timber
growing and as may be defined by forest practices regulations.

(5)
"Department" shall mean the department of natural resources.

(6)
"Forest land" shall mean all land which is capable of supporting a
merchantable stand of timber and is not being actively used for a use which is
incompatible with timber growing.

(7)
"Forest land owner" shall mean any person in actual control of forest
land, whether such control is based either on legal or equitable title, or on
any other interest entitling the holder to sell or otherwise dispose of any or
all of the timber on such land in any manner: PROVIDED, That any lessee or
other person in possession of forest land without legal or equitable title to
such land shall be excluded from the definition of "forest land
owner" unless such lessee or other person has the right to sell or
otherwise dispose of any or all of the timber located on such forest land.

(8)
"Forest practice" shall mean any activity conducted on or directly
pertaining to forest land and relating to growing, harvesting, or processing
timber, including but not limited to:

(a)
Road and trail construction;

(b)
Harvesting, final and intermediate;

(c)
Precommercial thinning;

(d)
Reforestation;

(e)
Fertilization;

(f)
Prevention and suppression of diseases and insects;

(g)
Salvage of trees; and

(h)
Brush control.

"Forest
practice" shall not include preparatory work such as tree marking,
surveying and road flagging, and removal or harvesting of incidental vegetation
from forest lands such as berries, ferns, greenery, mistletoe, herbs,
mushrooms, and other products which cannot normally be expected to result in
damage to forest soils, timber, or public resources.

(9)
"Forest practices regulations" shall mean any rules promulgated
pursuant to RCW 76.09.040.

(10)
"Application" shall mean the application required pursuant to RCW
76.09.050.

(11)
"Operator" shall mean any person engaging in forest practices except
an employee with wages as his sole compensation.

(12)
"Person" shall mean any individual, partnership, private, public, or
municipal corporation, county, the department or other state or local
governmental entity, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

(13)
"Public resources" shall mean water, fish and wildlife, and in
addition shall mean capital improvements of the state or its political
subdivisions.

(14)
"Timber" shall mean forest trees, standing or down, of a commercial
species, including Christmas trees.

(15)
"Timber owner" shall mean any person having all or any part of the legal
interest in timber. Where such timber is subject to a contract of sale,
"timber owner" shall mean the contract purchaser.

(16)
"Board" shall mean the forest practices board created in RCW
76.09.030.

(17)
"Landowner landscape plan" means an individual landowner plan
prepared under section 103 of this act and approved by the department.

(18)
"Landscape level permit" means a single forest practices permit
issued upon approval of a landowner landscape plan for a term not to exceed
twenty-five years.

(19)
"Nonindustrial private forest landowner" means a nonindustrial
private forest landowner owning fifteen thousand acres or less of forest land
in Washington state and does not own or operate a forest products manufacturing
facility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. A
new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A landowner landscape plan will help each nonindustrial private forest
landowner incorporate best available science into his or her long-term forest
management objectives. This planning system is intended to be a voluntary
approach to providing protection for public resources and capital improvements
of the state, while providing landowners longer term certainty for timber
harvest.

(2)
Sections 103, 104, and 108 of this act and RCW 76.09.060, 76.09.220, and
75.20.100 establish a pilot project to evaluate using landscape plans and
long-term permits as an incentive to keep nonindustrial private forest
landowners from converting their forest lands to other incompatible uses.

(3)
The department is granted authority to select up to twenty nonindustrial
landowners for the purpose of a pilot project to develop individual landscape
management plans.

(a)
Pilot project participants must be selected by the department in consultation
with the departments of fish and wildlife and ecology by December 31, 1999.

(b)
Pilot project participants shall be selected on the basis of size (less than
fifteen thousand acres total ownership), risk to the habitat and species,
variety and importance of species and habitats in the planning area, geographic
distribution, surrounding ownership, other ongoing landscape and watershed
planning activities in the area, potential benefits to water quantity and
quality, financial and staffing capabilities of participants, and other factors
that will contribute to the creation of a nonindustrial forest landowner
multispecies landscape planning system.

(c)
The department shall, subject to available funding, assist landowners in the
development of the pilot landscape management plans.

(d)
Each pilot landscape management plan shall contain the following:

(i)
A termination date not to exceed twenty-five years;

(ii)
Short and long-term management objectives for the property;

(iii)
Assessment of the current habitat conditions;

(iv)
Management strategies in the following areas:

(A)
Forest health;

(B)
Timber and wood production;

(C)
Soils;

(D)
Water quality, riparian, and wetland areas;

(E)
Fish and wildlife habitat;

(F)
Threatened and endangered species;

(G)
Aesthetics and recreation; and

(H)
Road maintenance and abandonment;

(v)
Maps delineating:

(A)
Ownership, including the specific location covered by the landowner landscape
plan;

(B)
Vegetative types including forest stands;

(C)
Streams, ponds, wetlands, roads, structures;

(D)
Soil types; and

(E)
Other significant elements of the environment in need of protection;

(vi)
Reporting requirements and a schedule for review of the landowner's performance
under the plan;

(vii)
Conditions under which the plan may be terminated. No plan shall permit forest
land covered by its terms to be withdrawn from coverage, whether by sale,
exchange, or other means, nor to be converted to nonforestry uses except to the
extent that such withdrawal or conversion would not measurably impair the
achievement of the plan's stated public resource objectives;

(viii)
Conditions under which the plan may be modified, such as sale or transfer of
land, exchanges, or catastrophic events; and

(ix)
Conditions for modifying the plan in response to changes in best available
science and adaptive management.

(4)
Until December 31, 2002, the department, in agreement with the department of
fish and wildlife and in consultation with the department of ecology, shall
approve a landscape management plan when in the view of the department, the
plan:

(a)
Contains all the provisions required under chapter . . ., Laws
of 1999 (this act), and in the view of the department, meets the standards and
objectives of these provisions;

(b)
Provides better protection than current state law for the ecological functions
expected to be provided by the landscape, including but not limited to upland
wildlife habitat, riparian habitat, and water quality;

(c)
Does not result in poorer habitat conditions over the life of the plan for any
species listed as threatened or endangered under federal law;

(d)
Measurably improves habitat conditions for the majority of species that would
be expected to be found within the planning area;

(e)
Provides an opportunity for affected Indian tribes and interested parties to
review and comment on the plan prior to approval; and

(f)
Has undergone the environmental review process of chapter 43.21C RCW.

(5)
If the department receives from the department of ecology a recommendation that
is not adopted, the department shall provide a written explanation of the
reasons for not adopting the recommendation.

(6)
After a nonindustrial forest landowner landscape plan is adopted:

(a)
The department shall issue a single forest practices permit valid for the term
of the plan and the landowner landscape plan shall supersede any current or
future rule that specifically covers the specific elements of the environment
being protected under the plan. This permit shall not impose additional
conditions beyond those agreed to in the plan;

(b)
The plan shall serve as the hydraulic project approval for the life of the
plan, in compliance with RCW 75.20.100; and

(c)
Nothing in this section impairs the department's conditioning and enforcement
authority.

(7)
Landowners receiving a landscape level permit shall meet annually with the
department and the departments of fish and wildlife and ecology to review the
specific forest practices activities planned for the next twelve months and to
determine whether these activities are in compliance with the plan. The
departments will consult with the affected Indian tribes and other interested
parties who have expressed an interest in a particular landscape plan.

(8)
The landowner shall provide ten calendar days' written notice to the department
prior to the commencement of any forest practices authorized under the
landscape level permit. The department shall forward the landowner's notice to
the department of revenue.

(9)
Except as otherwise provided in a plan, the agreement implementing the
landscape management plan is an agreement that runs with the property covered
by the approved landscape management plan. The department shall record notice
of the plan in the real property records of the counties in which the affected
properties are located. If a participant transfers all or part of its interest
in the property, the terms of the plan still apply to the new landowner for the
plan's stated duration unless the plan is terminated under its terms or unless
the plan specifies the conditions under which the terms of the plan do not apply
to the new landowner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. A
new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is directed to provide to the forest practices board, no later than
December 31, 2002, and every two years thereafter, an evaluation of the pilot
projects created in chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act). The
department shall recommend to the forest practices board whether a permanent
landscape planning process should be established along with a discussion of
what legislative and rule modifications are necessary.

Sec.
105. RCW
76.09.060 and 1997 c 290 s 3 and 1997 c 173 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
following shall apply to those forest practices administered and enforced by
the department and for which the board shall promulgate regulations as provided
in this chapter:

(1)
The department shall prescribe the form and contents of the notification and
application. The forest practices rules shall specify by whom and under what
conditions the notification and application shall be signed or otherwise
certified as acceptable. The application or notification shall be delivered in
person to the department, sent by first class mail to the department or
electronically filed in a form defined by the department. The form for
electronic filing shall be readily convertible to a paper copy, which shall be
available to the public pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW. The information
required may include, but is not limited to:

(a)
Name and address of the forest landowner, timber owner, and operator;

(b)
Description of the proposed forest practice or practices to be conducted;

(c)
Legal description and tax parcel identification numbers of the land on which
the forest practices are to be conducted;

(d)
Planimetric and topographic maps showing location and size of all lakes and
streams and other public waters in and immediately adjacent to the operating
area and showing all existing and proposed roads and major tractor roads;

(e)
Description of the silvicultural, harvesting, or other forest practice methods
to be used, including the type of equipment to be used and materials to be
applied;

(f)
Proposed plan for reforestation and for any revegetation necessary to reduce
erosion potential from roadsides and yarding roads, as required by the forest
practices rules;

(g)
Soil, geological, and hydrological data with respect to forest practices;

(h)
The expected dates of commencement and completion of all forest practices
specified in the application;

(i)
Provisions for continuing maintenance of roads and other construction or other
measures necessary to afford protection to public resources;

(j)
An affirmation that the statements contained in the notification or application
are true; and

(k)
All necessary application or notification fees.

(2)
Long range plans may be submitted to the department for review and
consultation.

(3)
The application for a forest practice or the notification of a Class II forest
practice is subject to the three-year reforestation requirement.

(a)
If the application states that any such land will be or is intended to be so
converted:

(i)
The reforestation requirements of this chapter and of the forest practices
rules shall not apply if the land is in fact so converted unless applicable
alternatives or limitations are provided in forest practices rules issued under
RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended;

(ii)
Completion of such forest practice operations shall be deemed conversion of the
lands to another use for purposes of chapters 84.33 and 84.34 RCW unless the
conversion is to a use permitted under a current use tax agreement permitted
under chapter 84.34 RCW;

(iii)
The forest practices described in the application are subject to applicable
county, city, town, and regional governmental authority permitted under RCW
76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended as well as the forest practices rules.

(b)
Except as provided elsewhere in this section, if the application or
notification does not state that any land covered by the application or
notification will be or is intended to be so converted:

(i)
For six years after the date of the application the county, city, town, and
regional governmental entities shall deny any or all applications for permits
or approvals, including building permits and subdivision approvals, relating to
nonforestry uses of land subject to the application;

(A)
The department shall submit to the local governmental entity a copy of the
statement of a forest landowner's intention not to convert which shall
represent a recognition by the landowner that the six-year moratorium shall be
imposed and shall preclude the landowner's ability to obtain development
permits while the moratorium is in place. This statement shall be filed by the
local governmental entity with the county recording officer, who shall record
the documents as provided in chapter 65.04 RCW, except that lands designated as
forest lands of long-term commercial significance under chapter 36.70A RCW
shall not be recorded due to the low likelihood of conversion. Not recording
the statement of a forest landowner's conversion intention shall not be
construed to mean the moratorium is not in effect.

(B)
The department shall collect the recording fee and reimburse the local
governmental entity for the cost of recording the application.

(C)
When harvesting takes place without an application, the local governmental
entity shall impose the six-year moratorium provided in (b)(i) of this
subsection from the date the unpermitted harvesting was discovered by the
department or the local governmental entity.

(D)
The local governmental entity shall develop a process for lifting the six-year
moratorium, which shall include public notification, and procedures for appeals
and public hearings.

(E)
The local governmental entity may develop an administrative process for lifting
or waiving the six-year moratorium for the purposes of constructing a
single-family residence or outbuildings, or both, on a legal lot and building
site. Lifting or waiving of the six-year moratorium is subject to compliance
with all local ordinances.

(F)
The six-year moratorium shall not be imposed on a forest practices application
that contains a conversion option harvest plan approved by the local
governmental entity unless the forest practice was not in compliance with the
approved forest practice permit. Where not in compliance with the conversion
option harvest plan, the six-year moratorium shall be imposed from the date the
application was approved by the department or the local governmental entity;

(ii)
Failure to comply with the reforestation requirements contained in any final
order or decision shall constitute a removal of designation under the
provisions of RCW 84.33.140, and a change of use under the provisions of RCW
84.34.080, and, if applicable, shall subject such lands to the payments and/or
penalties resulting from such removals or changes; and

(iii)
Conversion to a use other than commercial forest product operations within six
years after approval of the forest practices without the consent of the county,
city, or town shall constitute a violation of each of the county, municipal
city, town, and regional authorities to which the forest practice operations
would have been subject if the application had so stated.

(c)
The application or notification shall be signed by the forest landowner and accompanied
by a statement signed by the forest landowner indicating his or her intent with
respect to conversion and acknowledging that he or she is familiar with the
effects of this subsection.

(4)
Whenever an approved application authorizes a forest practice which, because of
soil condition, proximity to a water course or other unusual factor, has a
potential for causing material damage to a public resource, as determined by
the department, the applicant shall, when requested on the approved application,
notify the department two days before the commencement of actual operations.

(5)
Before the operator commences any forest practice in a manner or to an extent
significantly different from that described in a previously approved
application or notification, there shall be submitted to the department a new
application or notification form in the manner set forth in this section.

(6)
Except as provided in RCW 76.09.350(4) or section 103(6)(a) of this act,
the notification to or the approval given by the department to an application
to conduct a forest practice shall be effective for a term of two years from
the date of approval or notification and shall not be renewed unless a new
application is filed and approved or a new notification has been filed. At the
option of the applicant, an application or notification may be submitted to
cover a single forest practice or a number of forest practices within
reasonable geographic or political boundaries as specified by the department.
An application or notification that covers more than one forest practice may
have an effective term of more than two years. The board shall adopt rules
that establish standards and procedures for approving an application or
notification that has an effective term of more than two years. Such rules
shall include extended time periods for application or notification approval or
disapproval. On an approved application with a term of more than two years,
the applicant shall inform the department before commencing operations.

(7)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no prior application or
notification shall be required for any emergency forest practice necessitated
by fire, flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other emergency as defined by the
board, but the operator shall submit an application or notification, whichever
is applicable, to the department within forty-eight hours after commencement of
such practice or as required by local regulations.

Sec.
106. RCW
76.09.220 and 1997 c 290 s 5 and 1997 c 423 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The appeals board shall operate on either a part-time or a full-time basis, as
determined by the governor. If it is determined that the appeals board shall
operate on a full-time basis, each member shall receive an annual salary to be
determined by the governor. If it is determined that the appeals board shall
operate on a part-time basis, each member shall be compensated in accordance
with RCW((. However, such)) 43.03.250. The director of the
environmental hearings office shall make the determination, required under RCW
43.03.250, as to what statutorily prescribed duties, in addition to attendance
at a hearing or meeting of the board, shall merit compensation. This
compensation shall not exceed ten thousand dollars in a fiscal year. Each
member shall receive reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the
discharge of his duties in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(2)
The appeals board shall as soon as practicable after the initial appointment of
the members thereof, meet and elect from among its members a chair, and shall
at least biennially thereafter meet and elect or reelect a chair.

(3)
The principal office of the appeals board shall be at the state capital, but it
may sit or hold hearings at any other place in the state. A majority of the
appeals board shall constitute a quorum for making orders or decisions,
promulgating rules and regulations necessary for the conduct of its powers and
duties, or transacting other official business, and may act though one position
on the board be vacant. One or more members may hold hearings and take
testimony to be reported for action by the board when authorized by rule or
order of the board. The appeals board shall perform all the powers and duties
granted to it in this chapter or as otherwise provided by law.

(4)
The appeals board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written decision in
each case decided by it, and such findings and decision shall be effective upon
being signed by two or more members and upon being filed at the appeals board's
principal office, and shall be open to public inspection at all reasonable
times.

(5)
The appeals board shall either publish at its expense or make arrangements with
a publishing firm for the publication of those of its findings and decisions
which are of general public interest, in such form as to assure reasonable
distribution thereof.

(6)
The appeals board shall maintain at its principal office a journal which shall
contain all official actions of the appeals board, with the exception of
findings and decisions, together with the vote of each member on such actions.
The journal shall be available for public inspection at the principal office of
the appeals board at all reasonable times.

(7)
The forest practices appeals board shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear
appeals arising from an action or determination by the department, and the
department of fish and wildlife, and the department of ecology with respect to
management plans provided for under RCW 76.09.350 and provisions of section
103 (4) and (6)(a) of this act.

(8)(a)
Any person aggrieved by the approval or disapproval of an application to
conduct a forest practice or the approval or disapproval of any landscape plan
or permit may seek review from the appeals board by filing a request for the
same within thirty days of the approval or disapproval. Concurrently with the
filing of any request for review with the board as provided in this section, the
requestor shall file a copy of his or her request with the department and the
attorney general. The attorney general may intervene to protect the public
interest and ensure that the provisions of this chapter are complied with.

(b)
The review proceedings authorized in (a) of this subsection are subject to the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures in adjudicative
proceedings.

Sec.
107. RCW
75.20.100 and 1998 c 190 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the event that any person or government agency desires to construct any form
of hydraulic project or perform other work that will use, divert, obstruct, or
change the natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh waters of the state,
such person or government agency shall, before commencing construction or work
thereon and to ensure the proper protection of fish life, secure the approval
of the department as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the protection
of fish life. This approval shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in RCW 75.20.1001, the department shall grant or deny
approval of a standard permit within forty-five calendar days of the receipt of
a complete application and notice of compliance with any applicable
requirements of the state environmental policy act, made in the manner
prescribed in this section.

(b)
The applicant may document receipt of application by filing in person or by
registered mail. A complete application for approval shall contain general
plans for the overall project, complete plans and specifications of the
proposed construction or work within the mean higher high water line in salt
water or within the ordinary high water line in fresh water, and complete plans
and specifications for the proper protection of fish life.

(c)
The forty-five day requirement shall be suspended if:

(i)
After ten working days of receipt of the application, the applicant remains
unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field evaluation of the proposed
project;

(ii)
The site is physically inaccessible for inspection; or

(iii)
The applicant requests delay. Immediately upon determination that the
forty-five day period is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant
in writing of the reasons for the delay.

(d)
For purposes of this section, "standard permit" means a written
permit issued by the department when the conditions under subsections (3) and
(5)(b) of this section are not met.

(3)(a)
The department may issue an expedited written permit in those instances where
normal permit processing would result in significant hardship for the applicant
or unacceptable damage to the environment. In cases of imminent danger, the
department shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
repair existing structures, move obstructions, restore banks, protect property,
or protect fish resources. Expedited permit requests require a complete
written application as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section and shall
be issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written
application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days
from the date of issuance.

(b)
For the purposes of this subsection, "imminent danger" means a threat
by weather, water flow, or other natural conditions that is likely to occur
within sixty days of a request for a permit application.

(c)
The department may not require the provisions of the state environmental policy
act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a permit under
this subsection.

(d)
The department or the county legislative authority may determine if an imminent
danger exists. The county legislative authority shall notify the department,
in writing, if it determines that an imminent danger exists.

(4)
Approval of a standard permit is valid for a period of up to five years from
date of issuance. The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the approval within two
years of the date of issuance. If the department denies approval, the
department shall provide the applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific
reasons why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
Protection of fish life shall be the only ground upon which approval may be
denied or conditioned. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to any denial of project
approval, conditional approval, or requirements for project modification upon
which approval may be contingent.

(5)(a)
In case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow conditions or other
natural conditions, the department, through its authorized representatives,
shall issue immediately, upon request, oral approval for removing any
obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring stream banks, or to
protect property threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow
without the necessity of obtaining a written approval prior to commencing
work. Conditions of an oral approval to protect fish life shall be established
by the department and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied with
as provided for in this section. Oral approval shall be granted immediately,
upon request, for a stream crossing during an emergency situation.

(b)
For purposes of this section and RCW 75.20.103, "emergency" means an
immediate threat to life, the public, property, or of environmental
degradation.

(c)
The department or the county legislative authority may declare and continue an
emergency when one or more of the criteria under (b) of this subsection are
met. The county legislative authority shall immediately notify the department
if it declares an emergency under this subsection.

(6)
The department shall, at the request of a county, develop five-year maintenance
approval agreements, consistent with comprehensive flood control management
plans adopted under the authority of RCW 86.12.200, or other watershed plan
approved by a county legislative authority, to allow for work on public and
private property for bank stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sand bars
and debris, channel maintenance, and other flood damage repair and reduction
activity under agreed-upon conditions and times without obtaining permits for
specific projects.

(7)
This section shall not apply to the construction of any form of hydraulic
project or other work which diverts water for agricultural irrigation or stock
watering purposes authorized under or recognized as being valid by the state's
water codes, or when such hydraulic project or other work is associated with
streambank stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in
RCW 84.34.020. These irrigation or stock watering diversion and streambank
stabilization projects shall be governed by RCW 75.20.103.

A
landscape management plan approved by the department and the department of
natural resources under RCW 76.09.350(2), shall serve as a hydraulic project
approval for the life of the plan if fish are selected as one of the public
resources for coverage under such a plan.

A
landscape management plan approved by the department and the department of
natural resources under section 103(4) of this act shall serve as a hydraulic
project approval for the life of the plan.

(8)
For the purposes of this section and RCW 75.20.103, "bed" means the
land below the ordinary high water lines of state waters. This definition does
not include irrigation ditches, canals, storm water run-off devices, or other
artificial watercourses except where they exist in a natural watercourse that
has been altered by man.

(9)
The phrase "to construct any form of hydraulic project or perform other
work" does not include the act of driving across an established ford.
Driving across streams or on wetted stream beds at areas other than established
fords requires approval. Work within the ordinary high water line of state
waters to construct or repair a ford or crossing requires approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. (1)
The implementation of sections 103 through 107 of this act, and providing
assistance to nonindustrial private forest landowners in the development of
landscape plans, will require wildlife biologists, foresters, and cartographers
to develop and review the plans and will require funding to implement tracking
and recording systems.

(2)
The sum of three hundred thirty thousand five hundred dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2000, from the general fund to the department of natural resources for the
purposes of this section and sections 103 through 107 of this act.

(3)
The sum of three hundred thirty thousand five hundred dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2001, from the general fund to the department of natural resources for the
purposes of this section and sections 103 through 107 of this act.

PART
2

STEWARDSHIP
ASSISTANCE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. (1)
The legislature finds that providing for long-term stewardship of private
nonindustrial forest lands in rural areas is an important factor in maintaining
Washington's rural character and quality of life. The department of natural
resources currently provides stewardship assistance to nonindustrial forest
landowners. Funding for this program currently comes primarily from federal
sources. Those funds have been dwindling over the past several biennia. The
legislature finds that additional resources are needed by the department of
natural resources to provide an enhanced level of stewardship assistance to
nonindustrial forest landowners. The enhanced stewardship program will allow
the department to expand the current program to cover more nonindustrial forest
lands and in additional counties. Funding will be used for technical
assistance, landowner education, and implementation of forest stewardship
activities including the development of stewardship plans, planting of trees
and shrubs, forest stand improvement, riparian and wetland establishment or
enhancement, prevention and control of sedimentation, and fish and wildlife
enhancement.

(2)
The sum of nine hundred forty-three thousand five hundred dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2000, from the general fund to the department of natural resources for the
purposes of enhanced forest land stewardship programs.

(3)
The sum of nine hundred forty-three thousand five hundred dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2001, from the general fund to the department of natural resources for the
purposes of enhanced forest land stewardship programs.

PART
3

RURAL
DESIGN DEMONSTRATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301.
Between 1970 and 1997, two million three hundred thousand acres of forest land
were converted to other uses. Economics provide the main driver for the
conversion of forest lands in the state of Washington. Development often
presents higher and more immediate value to the landowner. Most of the acres
converted have been owned by nonindustrial forest landowners. Most of those
acres were converted for urban expansion. The loss of these productive forest lands
reduces the jobs and products they could produce as well as reducing important
habitat for fish and wildlife.

Despite
local governments' efforts to maintain rural areas, conserve natural resource
lands, and preserve fish and wildlife habitat, development of Washington's
rural landscape is still causing the loss of these resources. Several
strategies have been and continue to be used to control the conversion of
forest land. These strategies include density controls, critical area
protections, development regulations, and development clustering. Each of
these strategies is, however, carried out independently, which makes it
difficult to integrate resource and habitat protection with a rural human
settlement strategy.

A
program is needed that encourages each of these independent strategies to be
used together. That program should encourage landowners and developers to
design for rural development, including assuring that rural settlement patterns
are structured in a way to assure the conservation of natural resources.

The
program should encourage the integration of land use planning with conservation
principles, including landscape architecture, to produce a more balanced
pattern of development and conservation. This should occur in a way that respects
the rights of landowners who would continue to realize densities allowed under
the applicable zoning code while designing their development around an open
space framework that includes meadows, fields, woodlots, riparian corridors,
and other features of the natural environment.

This
program is intended to demonstrate a means to achieve a better balance between
development and the conservation of the natural environment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. (1)
The department of natural resources, in coordination with the department of
community, trade, and economic development, shall develop and implement a rural
design demonstration. The rural design demonstration will include defining
design principles, assessing compatibility with existing county plans, and
developing rural design standards for rural land. It shall be developed in
such a way that it can be used as a model for conserving natural resources and
preserving rural landscapes while maintaining existing development densities.
The rural design demonstration must involve nonindustrial private forests that
are zoned residential. The rural design demonstration would be a design for a
proposed development that would ensure that the development proceed on no more
than forty percent of the site, be designed for maximum salmonid habitat
protection, and protect in perpetuity, such as through an easement or covenant
on the land, the practice of forestry on a majority of the site. The rural
design demonstration must specify when the development project will begin and
end.

(2)
The sum of three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of natural resources for the purpose of a rural
design pilot grant program.

(3)
The sum of three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the department of natural resources for the purpose of a rural
design pilot grant program.

PART
4

CONSERVATION
EASEMENTS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. (1)
The goal of restoring salmon to our watersheds requires a commitment to
protecting existing habitat that is in good condition. In western Washington,
three hundred twenty-two thousand acres of forest land were converted during
the 1980's from forest to another use, predominantly urban development. The
challenge to reverse or slow this trend of habitat loss, given the population
projections, is to provide incentives to landowners to keep their land in a
forested condition.

(2)
Maintaining the land in a forested condition along riparian areas provides
shade, cool temperatures, large woody debris, and sediment filtration, which in
turn provides key habitat functions for fish and other wildlife.

(3)
The purchase of conservation easements, also known as "conservation
futures," provides the strongest possible incentive to nonindustrial, private
forest landowners to prevent the conversion of their forest land to a use
incompatible with forestry.

(4)
The sum of three million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the state building
construction account to the department of natural resources to acquire less
than fee simple conservation easements in riparian areas from nonindustrial
private forest landowners.

Sec.
402. RCW
84.34.210 and 1993 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
state agency, county, city, town, metropolitan park district,
metropolitan municipal corporation, nonprofit historic preservation corporation
as defined in RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or
association, as such are defined in RCW 84.34.250, may acquire by purchase,
gift, grant, bequest, devise, lease, or otherwise, except by eminent domain,
the fee simple or any lesser interest, development right, easement, covenant,
or other contractual right necessary to protect, preserve, maintain, improve,
restore, limit the future use of, or otherwise conserve, selected open space
land, farm and agricultural land, and timber land as such are defined in
chapter 84.34 RCW for public use or enjoyment. Among interests that may be so
acquired are mineral rights. Any state agency, county, city, town,
metropolitan park district, metropolitan municipal corporation, nonprofit
historic preservation corporation as defined in RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation or association, as such are defined in RCW 84.34.250,
may acquire such property for the purpose of conveying or leasing the property
back to its original owner or other person under such covenants or other
contractual arrangements as will limit the future use of the property in
accordance with the purposes of chapter 243, Laws of 1971 ex. sess.

Sec.
403. RCW
84.34.220 and 1993 c 248 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
accordance with the authority granted in RCW 84.34.210, a state agency,
county, city, town, metropolitan park district, metropolitan municipal
corporation, nonprofit historic preservation corporation as defined in RCW
64.04.130, or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association, as such
are defined in RCW 84.34.250, may specifically purchase or otherwise acquire,
except by eminent domain, rights in perpetuity to future development of any
open space land, farm and agricultural land, and timber land which are so designated
under the provisions of chapter 84.34 RCW and taxed at current use assessment
as provided by that chapter. For the purposes of chapter 243, Laws of 1971 ex.
sess., such developmental rights shall be termed "conservation
futures". The private owner may retain the right to continue any existing
open space use of the land, and to develop any other open space use, but, under
the terms of purchase of conservation futures, the state agency, county,
city, town, metropolitan park district, metropolitan municipal corporation,
nonprofit historic preservation corporation as defined in RCW 64.04.130, or
nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association, as such are defined in
RCW 84.34.250, may forbid or restrict building thereon, or may require that improvements
cannot be made without state agency, county, city, town, metropolitan
park district, metropolitan municipal corporation, nonprofit historic
preservation corporation as defined in RCW 64.04.130, or nonprofit nature
conservancy corporation or association, as such are defined in RCW 84.34.250,
permission. The land may be alienated or sold and used as formerly by the new
owner, subject to the terms of the agreement made by the state agency,
county, city, town, metropolitan park district, metropolitan municipal
corporation, nonprofit historic preservation corporation as defined in RCW
64.04.130, or nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association, as such
are defined in RCW 84.34.250, with the original owner.

PART
5

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2001, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 503. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---