BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Over
the next twenty years the state's population is expected to increase by two
million people. As the urban and suburban development related to this growth
spreads into the rural and resource lands, more mineral resources such as sand,
gravel, and rock will be needed for the construction of homes, shopping
centers, commercial and industrial facilities, and roads. At the same time,
this growth will utilize the land base that may contain these deposits.
Current evaluations indicate that existing mines will not be able to meet the
future demand for sand, gravel, or rock. Current development patterns and land
use regulations limit the opportunity to open new mines or to expand existing
mines. Therefore, the legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the
citizens of the state to identify known sand, gravel, and rock deposits that
are environmentally acceptable for resource production and assure that efforts
are undertaken to protect these resources from uses incompatible with mineral
extraction so there will be a future supply of these resources.

In
recent years, there have been increasing efforts to mine sand and gravel
resources from rivers and their floodplains. Current and past practices of
mining from rivers and their floodplains may impact the state's effort to
recover threatened and endangered anadromous and freshwater fish. Therefore,
the legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the citizens of the
state to study the impacts of sand, gravel, and rock resource extraction methods
on the habitat needs of anadromous and freshwater fish.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department of natural resources is directed to prepare a report to the
legislature identifying the status of sand, gravel, and rock deposits, and
recommending zoning and extraction practices. In preparing the report, the
department shall evaluate existing information.

The
report shall include the following:

(1)
An evaluation of the impacts of sand and gravel excavation in floodplains on the
spawning and rearing habitat of salmonid and freshwater species;

(2)
A recommendation on whether additional controls are needed for sand and gravel
extraction in floodplains to protect fish resources;

(3)
An evaluation of the expected life of known and designated sand and gravel
deposits within an economically viable transport distance from major urban
areas;

(4)
An evaluation of current sand, gravel, and rock consumption and projected sand,
gravel, and rock consumption trends for the next fifty years;

(5)
An evaluation of alternative sources of aggregate supply including recycling,
reuse, conservation opportunities, and quarried rock; and

(6)
A recommendation to local governments on mineral resource designation standards
to protect known deposits of sand, rock, and gravel to meet projected supply
needs.

This
section expires June 30, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of natural resources for the purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the department of natural resources for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---