BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.15.030 and 1998 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Declarations
of candidacy shall be filed ((with the following filing officers)) as
follows:

(1)
((The secretary of state for)) Declarations of candidacy for
state-wide offices, the United States senate, ((and)) the
United States house of representatives((;

(2)
The secretary of state for declarations of candidacy for the state legislature)), the
court of appeals, and the superior court when voters from a district comprising
more than one county vote upon the candidates((;

(3)
The county auditor for all other offices. For any nonpartisan office, other
than judicial offices and school director in joint districts, where voters from
a district comprising more than one county vote upon the candidates, a
declaration of candidacy shall)) must be filed with the
secretary of state.

(2)
Declarations of candidacy for the state legislature must be filed with either
the secretary of state or the county auditor of the county in which the
candidate is registered to vote. Each county auditor with whom a declaration
of candidacy is filed for the state legislature shall notify the secretary of
state about this filing, using one of the methods of communication designated
by the secretary of state, within one hour of the close of business on the day
the declaration was filed. The filing fee accompanying a declaration of
candidacy for the legislature that is filed with a county auditor will be
retained by the county if the legislative district is located entirely within
that county, or the county shall transfer a portion of the filing fee to each
other county in which the legislative district is located in the same manner as
the secretary of state distributes the filing fee under RCW 29.15.050.

(3)
Declarations of candidacy for all county offices and for all other offices of a
local government that is either coextensive with a county or located completely
within a county must be filed with the county auditor of that county.

(4)
Declarations of candidacy for any other office of a local government that is
located in more than one county, other than a school director of a joint school
district, must be filed with the county auditor of the county in which a
majority of the registered voters of the district reside. ((For school
directors in joint school districts, the declaration of candidacy shall))

(5)
Declarations of candidacy for school director of a joint school district must
be filed with the county auditor of the county designated by the state board of
education as the county to which the joint school district is considered as
belonging under RCW 28A.315.380.

Each official with whom declarations of candidacy are filed under
this section, within one business day following the closing of the applicable
filing period, shall forward to the public disclosure commission a copy of each
declaration of candidacy filed in his office during such filing period or a
list containing the name of each candidate who files such a declaration in his
office during such filing period together with a precise identification of the
position sought by each such candidate and the date on which each such
declaration was filed. Such official, within three days following his receipt
of any letter withdrawing a person's name as a candidate, shall also forward a
copy of such withdrawal letter to the public disclosure commission.

---
END ---