BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

An
absentee ballot may be tabulated only if the absentee ballot was:

(1)
Both mailed to the county auditor from anywhere in the United States with a
date of mailing on or before the Saturday immediately before the day of the
primary or election for which it was issued and received by the county auditor
by noon of the day the election results are certified; or

(2)
Both mailed to the county auditor by an overseas voter or service voter with a
date of mailing on or before the day of the primary or election for which it
was issued and received by the county auditor by noon of the day the election
results are certified; or

(3)
Deposited at a polling site in the county of the auditor who issued the ballot,
during normal voting hours of the primary or election for which it was issued;
or

(4)
Deposited with the county auditor who issued the ballot on or before the close
of the polling places on the date of the primary or election for which it was
issued.

The
date of mailing is the date of the postmark. However, if the postmark is
missing or illegible or if the voter is an overseas voter or a service voter,
the date of mailing is the date a voter attests to voting, as shown on the
return envelope.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.36.045 and 1987 c 346 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a security envelope in
which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope in which to return the
security envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how to return
it to the county auditor. The larger return envelope shall contain a
declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications and
stating that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at this
election, together with a summary of the penalties for any violation of any of the
provisions of this chapter. The return envelope shall provide space for the
voter to indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to
sign the oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter
shall be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space for
the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope shall
affirm and attest to the statements regarding the qualifications of that voter
and to the validity of the ballot. For out-of-state voters, overseas voters,
and service voters, the signed declaration on the return envelope constitutes
the equivalent of a voter registration for the election or primary for which
the ballot has been issued. The ((voter shall be instructed to either
return the ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach
sufficient first class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the
appropriate county auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for
which the ballot was issued)) instructions must include a description of
the circumstances when an absentee ballot will be tabulated, as provided under
section 1 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
29.62.020 and 1995 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No later than the tenth day after a special election or primary and no later
than the fifteenth day after a general election, the county auditor shall
convene the county canvassing board to process the absentee ballots and canvass
the votes cast at that primary or election. On the tenth day after a special
election or a primary and on the fifteenth day after a general election, the
canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the results. The
canvass report must include each absentee ballot that ((was returned
before the closing of the polls on the date of the primary or election for
which it was issued, and each absentee ballot with a date of mailing on or
before the date of the primary or election for which it was issued and received
on or before the date on which the primary or election is certified, shall be
included in the canvass report)) may be tabulated under section 1 of
this act.

(2) At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the
county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and
legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county canvassing
board to ((either)) the secretary of the senate ((or)) and
the chief clerk of the house.

---
END ---