BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.42.050 and 1991 c 363 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

((The))
Precinct committee officers of major political parties will be elected at
general elections held in even-numbered years or appointed as provided in this
section. General statutory requirements for filing ((as a candidate at
the primaries shall)) declarations of candidacy apply to ((candidates))
filing declarations of candidacy for a precinct committee officer
of a major political party, except that the filing period for this office
alone shall be extended to and include the Friday immediately following the
last day for political parties to fill vacancies in the ticket as provided by
RCW 29.18.150((, and)). A primary may not be held for the office
((shall not be voted upon at the primaries, but the names of all candidates
must appear under the proper party and office designations on the ballot for
the general November election for each even-numbered year and the one)),
no matter how many persons file for the same office. The position of precinct
committee officer of a major political party for a precinct may be placed on
the ballot at the general election only if two or more persons file
declarations of candidacy for that position. The candidate receiving the
highest number of votes ((shall)) will be declared elected((:
PROVIDED, That to be declared elected, a candidate must receive at least ten
percent of the number of votes cast for the candidate of the candidate's party
receiving the greatest number of votes in the precinct. Any person elected to
the office of precinct committee officer who has not filed a declaration of
candidacy shall pay the fee of one dollar to the county auditor for a
certificate of election)). Even though the position of a precinct
committee officer of each major political party for the same precinct are
separate offices, voters in the precinct may vote for only one candidate for
all of these positions. If only one person has filed a declaration of
candidacy for the same office of precinct committee officer, the office may not
be placed on the general election ballot, and the sole candidate will be
declared to have been elected to that position.

The
term of office of precinct committee officer shall be for two years, commencing
upon completion of the official canvass of votes by the county canvassing board
of election returns.

((Should
any)) If a vacancy occurs in this office by reason of death,
resignation, or disqualification of the incumbent, or because of failure to
elect, the respective county chair of the county central committee ((shall
be empowered to)) may fill ((such)) the vacancy by
appointment((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, in a
legislative district((s)) having a majority of its precincts in a county
with a population of one million or more, ((such)) the
appointment ((shall)) may be made only upon the recommendation of
the legislative district chair((: PROVIDED, That the)). A
person ((so)) who is appointed ((shall)) as a precinct
committee officer must have the same qualifications as ((candidates))
a candidate for that position must have when filing for ((election to
such)) that office ((for such precinct: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
When a vacancy in the office of precinct committee officer exists because
of failure to elect at a state general election held in an even-numbered
year, ((such)) the vacancy ((shall)) may not be
filled until after the organization meeting of the county central committee and
the new county chair selected as provided by RCW 29.42.030.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.36.030 and 1991 c 81 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the information contained in a request for an absentee ballot received by the
county auditor is complete and correct and the applicant is qualified to vote
under federal or state law, the county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot
for the primary or election for which the absentee ballot was requested.
Otherwise, the county auditor shall notify the applicant of the reason or
reasons why the request cannot be accepted.

((At
each general election in an even-numbered year, each)) Absentee
voters ((shall)) of a precinct where an election is held for
precinct committee officer must also be given a separate ballot containing
the names of the candidates ((that have filed for the office of)) for
precinct committee officer ((unless fewer than two candidates have filed for
the same political party in the absentee voter's precinct)) from that
precinct who are included on the ballot, as provided under RCW 29.42.050.
The separate ballot ((shall)) must provide space for ((writing
in the name of additional)) write-in candidates.

When mailing an absentee ballot to a registered voter temporarily
outside the state or to an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service
voter, the county auditor shall send a copy of the state voters' and
candidates' pamphlet with the absentee ballot. The county auditor shall mail
all absentee ballots and related material to voters outside the territorial
limits of the United States and the District of Columbia under 39 U.S.C. 3406.

---
END ---