BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.611 and 1967 c 232 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

No person shall operate on a public highway a motorcycle in which
the handlebars or grips are more than ((fifteen)) thirty inches
higher than the seat or saddle for the operator.

---
END ---