BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.30.020 and 1985 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Public agency" means:

(a)
Any state board, commission, committee, department, educational institution, or
other state agency which is created by or pursuant to statute, other than courts
and the legislature;

(b)
Any county, city, school district, special purpose district, or other municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state of Washington;

(c)
Any subagency of a public agency which is created by or pursuant to statute,
ordinance, or other legislative act, including but not limited to planning
commissions, library or park boards, commissions, and agencies;

(d)
Any policy group whose membership includes representatives of publicly owned
utilities formed by or pursuant to the laws of this state when meeting together
as or on behalf of participants who have contracted for the output of
generating plants being planned or built by an operating agency;

(e)
Any school site-council that is authorized or permitted to exist including by
silent acquiescence by a school district board of directors. As used in this
subsection, "school site-council" means the multimember board that
acts as the representative body of persons connected to a school including
teachers and parents if any of its actions are on behalf of the school or
school district board including the approval of grant applications.

(2)
"Governing body" means the multimember board, commission, committee,
council, or other policy or rule-making body of a public agency, or any
committee thereof when the committee acts on behalf of the governing body,
conducts hearings, or takes testimony or public comment.

(3)
"Action" means the transaction of the official business of a public
agency by a governing body including but not limited to receipt of public
testimony, deliberations, discussions, considerations, reviews, evaluations,
and final actions. "Final action" means a collective positive or
negative decision, or an actual vote by a majority of the members of a governing
body when sitting as a body or entity, upon a motion, proposal, resolution,
order, or ordinance.

(4) "Meeting" means meetings at which action is taken.

---
END ---