BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.150 and 1996 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the
custody of the department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility
or be released prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the term of
the sentence of an offender committed to a correctional facility operated by
the department, may be reduced by earned early release time in accordance with
procedures that shall be developed and promulgated by the correctional agency
having jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned early
release time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not
credit the offender with earned early release credits in advance of the
offender actually earning the credits. Any program established pursuant to
this section shall allow an offender to earn early release credits for
presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred from a county jail to
the department of corrections, the county jail facility shall certify to the
department the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the amount
of earned early release time. In the case of an offender who has been
convicted of a felony committed after July 23, 1995, that involves any
applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4), or both, shall
not receive any good time credits or earned early release time for that portion
of his or her sentence that results from any deadly weapon enhancements. In
the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense, or a sex
offense that is a class A felony, committed on or after July 1, 1990,
the aggregate earned early release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the
sentence. In no other case shall the aggregate earned early release time
exceed one-third of the total sentence;

(2)
A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense categorized as a serious
violent offense, assault in the second degree, vehicular homicide, vehicular
assault, assault of a child in the second degree, any crime against a person
where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.125 that the defendant or
an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any
felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW may become eligible, in
accordance with a program developed by the department, for transfer to
community custody status in lieu of earned early release time pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section;

(3)
An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized
furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may leave a correctional
facility when in the custody of a corrections officer or officers;

(4)
The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may
grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health problems,
senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary
circumstances;

(5)
No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served in partial
confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and reestablishing
himself or herself in the community;

(6)
The governor may pardon any offender;

(7)
The department of corrections may release an offender from confinement any time
within ten days before a release date calculated under this section; and

(8)
An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his
sentence if the sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.160.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, an offender
sentenced for a felony crime listed in RCW 9.94A.120(4) as subject to a
mandatory minimum sentence of total confinement shall not be released from
total confinement before the completion of the listed mandatory minimum
sentence for that felony crime of conviction unless allowed under RCW
9.94A.120(4).

---
END ---