BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.150 and 1996 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the
custody of the department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility
or be released prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the term of
the sentence of an offender committed to a correctional facility operated by
the department, may be reduced by earned early release time in accordance with
procedures that shall be developed and promulgated by the correctional agency
having jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned early
release time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not
credit the offender with earned early release credits in advance of the
offender actually earning the credits. Any program established pursuant to
this section shall allow an offender to earn early release credits for
presentence incarceration. If an offender is transferred from a county jail to
the department of corrections, the county jail facility shall certify to the
department the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the amount
of earned early release time. In the case of an offender who has been
convicted of a felony committed after July 23, 1995, that involves any
applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4), or both,
shall not receive any good time credits or earned early release time for that
portion of his or her sentence that results from any deadly weapon
enhancements. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on or after July 1,
1990, the aggregate earned early release time may not exceed fifteen percent of
the sentence. In no other case shall the aggregate earned early release time
exceed one-third of the total sentence;

(2)
A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense categorized as a serious
violent offense, assault in the second degree, vehicular homicide, vehicular
assault, assault of a child in the second degree, any crime against a person
where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.125 that the defendant or an
accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any
felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW may become eligible, in
accordance with a program developed by the department, for transfer to
community custody status in lieu of earned early release time pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section;

(3)
An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized
furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may leave a correctional
facility when in the custody of a corrections officer or officers;

(4)(a)
The secretary of corrections may authorize an extraordinary medical release for
an offender when all of the following conditions exist:

(i)
The offender has a medical condition that is serious enough to require costly
care or treatment;

(ii)
The offender poses a low risk to the community because he or she is physically
incapacitated due to age or the medical condition; and

(iii)
Granting the extraordinary medical release will result in a cost savings to the
state.

(b)
An offender sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without the possibility
of release or parole is not eligible for an extraordinary medical release under
this subsection.

(c)
The secretary may revoke an extraordinary medical release under this subsection
at any time.

(5)
The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may
grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health problems,
senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary
circumstances;

(((5)))
(6) No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served in
partial confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and
reestablishing himself or herself in the community;

(((6)))
(7) The governor may pardon any offender;

(((7)))
(8) The department of corrections may release an offender from
confinement any time within ten days before a release date calculated under
this section; and

(((8)))
(9) An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to completion of
his or her sentence if the sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW
9.94A.160.

Notwithstanding
any other provisions of this section, an offender sentenced for a felony crime
listed in RCW 9.94A.120(4) as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total
confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion
of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction
unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.120(4).

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.120 and 1998 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as
provided in this section.

(1)
Except as authorized in subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), and (8) of this
section, the court shall impose a sentence within the sentence range for the
offense.

(2)
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that
offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(3)
Whenever a sentence outside the standard range is imposed, the court shall set
forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions
of law. A sentence outside the standard range shall be a determinate sentence.

(4)
A persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for
life without the possibility of parole or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death,
notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law. An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years. An offender convicted of
the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first
degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or
intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
not less than five years. An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the
first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years. The foregoing minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and
shall not be varied or modified as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
In addition, all offenders subject to the provisions of this subsection shall
not be eligible for community custody, earned early release time, furlough,
home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form
of early release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), or
(8), or any other form of authorized leave of absence from the correctional
facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer or officers
during such minimum terms of total confinement except: (a) In the case
of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment ((or)); (b)
for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of
an offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree; or (c) for
an extraordinary medical release when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(5)
In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a
sentence within the sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up
to ninety days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract
by the county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include up to two years of community
supervision, which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(b)
Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to two years, or inpatient
treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;

(c)
Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(e)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer; or

(f)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030
and/or perform community service work.

(6)(a)
An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative
if:

(i)
The offender is convicted of the manufacture, delivery, or possession with
intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule
I or II that is a narcotic drug or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW or
RCW 69.50.407, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes, and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(ii)
The offender has no prior convictions for a felony in this state, another
state, or the United States; and

(iii)
The offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled
substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the
weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled
substance.

(b)
If the midpoint of the standard range is greater than one year and the
sentencing judge determines that the offender is eligible for this option and
that the offender and the community will benefit from the use of the special
drug offender sentencing alternative, the judge may waive imposition of a
sentence within the standard range and impose a sentence that must include a
period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half of the midpoint of
the standard range. During incarceration in the state facility, offenders
sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse
assessment and receive, within available resources, treatment services
appropriate for the offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services, in cooperation with the department of corrections. If the midpoint
of the standard range is twenty-four months or less, no more than three months
of the sentence may be served in a work release status. The court shall also
impose one year of concurrent community custody and community supervision that
must include appropriate outpatient substance abuse treatment, crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances,
and a requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that
status. The court may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street crime
program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be
required to pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset
the cost of monitoring. In addition, the court shall impose three or more of
the following conditions:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or training;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v)
Perform community service work;

(vi)
Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing judge.

(c)
If the offender violates any of the sentence conditions in (b) of this
subsection, the department shall impose sanctions administratively, with notice
to the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing court. Upon motion of the court
or the prosecuting attorney, a violation hearing shall be held by the court.
If the court finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the court may
impose confinement consisting of up to the remaining one-half of the midpoint
of the standard range. All total confinement served during the period of
community custody shall be credited to the offender, regardless of whether the
total confinement is served as a result of the original sentence, as a result
of a sanction imposed by the department, or as a result of a violation found by
the court. The term of community supervision shall be tolled by any period of
time served in total confinement as a result of a violation found by the court.

(d)
The department shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day
fine based on the offender's income and reasonable obligations which the
offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents. These rules
shall be developed in consultation with the administrator for the courts, the
office of financial management, and the commission.

(7)
If a sentence range has not been established for the defendant's crime, the
court shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one
year of confinement, community service work, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year, and/or other legal financial obligations. The court
may impose a sentence which provides more than one year of confinement if the court
finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(8)(a)(i)
When an offender is convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW
9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense and has no
prior convictions for a sex offense or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state, the sentencing court, on its own motion or the motion of the
state or the defendant, may order an examination to determine whether the
defendant is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
defendant's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
defendant's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the offender's social and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the defendant's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(A)
Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;

(B)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(C)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others;

(D)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(E)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(ii)
After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and
the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender sentencing
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this subsection. If the court determines
that this special sex offender sentencing alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence within the sentence range. If this sentence is
less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of
the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(A)
The court shall place the defendant on community custody for the length of the
suspended sentence or three years, whichever is greater, and require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (14) of this section;

(B)
The court shall order treatment for any period up to three years in duration.
The court in its discretion shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or
inpatient sex offender treatment, if available. A community mental health
center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program
designed for sex offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex
offender treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the
prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court, and shall not
change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or
community corrections officer object to the change. In addition, as conditions
of the suspended sentence, the court may impose other sentence conditions
including up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of
confinement for that offense, crime-related prohibitions, and requirements that
the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(I)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(II)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(III)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(IV)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030,
perform community service work, or any combination thereof; or

(V)
Make recoupment to the victim for the cost of any counseling required as a
result of the offender's crime; and

(C)
Sex offenders sentenced under this special sex offender sentencing alternative
are not eligible to accrue any earned early release time while serving a
suspended sentence.

(iii)
The sex offender therapist shall submit quarterly reports on the defendant's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference
the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, defendant's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
defendant's relative progress in treatment, and any other material as specified
by the court at sentencing.

(iv)
At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing
for three months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.
Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment professional and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the defendant's compliance with treatment and monitoring
requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment,
including proposed community supervision conditions. Either party may request
and the court may order another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The defendant shall pay the cost of any additional
evaluation ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (A) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (B)
terminate treatment, or (C) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of
community custody.

(v)
If a violation of conditions occurs during community custody, the department
shall either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence
as provided for in (a)(vi) of this subsection.

(vi)
The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of
community custody and order execution of the sentence if: (A) The defendant
violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or (B) the court finds that
the defendant is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All
confinement time served during the period of community custody shall be
credited to the offender if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(vii)
Except as provided in (a)(viii) of this subsection, after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW.

(viii)
A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection (8) does not have to be certified by the department of health
pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with
this subsection (8) and the rules adopted by the department of health.

(ix)
For purposes of this subsection (8), "victim" means any person who
has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person
or property as a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(x)
If the defendant was less than eighteen years of age when the charge was filed,
the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

(b)
When an offender commits any felony sex offense on or after July 1, 1987, and
is sentenced to a term of confinement of more than one year but less than six
years, the sentencing court may, on its own motion or on the motion of the
offender or the state, request the department of corrections to evaluate
whether the offender is amenable to treatment and the department may place the
offender in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department.

Except
for an offender who has been convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050, if the offender completes the treatment program before the
expiration of his or her term of confinement, the department of corrections may
request the court to convert the balance of confinement to community
supervision and to place conditions on the offender including crime-related
prohibitions and requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the
following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Undergo available outpatient treatment.

If
the offender violates any of the terms of his or her community supervision, the
court may order the offender to serve out the balance of his or her community
supervision term in confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections.

Nothing
in this subsection (8)(b) shall confer eligibility for such programs for
offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987. This subsection (8)(b) does not apply to any crime committed after July
1, 1990.

(c)
Offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987, may, subject to available funds, request an evaluation by the department
of corrections to determine whether they are amenable to treatment. If the
offender is determined to be amenable to treatment, the offender may request
placement in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department. Placement in such treatment program is subject to available funds.

(9)(a)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense or
a serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1,
1990, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree,
any crime against a person where it is determined in accordance with RCW
9.94A.125 that the defendant or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at
the time of commission, or any felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW
not sentenced under subsection (6) of this section, committed on or after July
1, 1988, the court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence,
sentence the offender to a one-year term of community placement beginning
either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned early release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences an
offender under this subsection to the statutory maximum period of confinement
then the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of
such community custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually
served shall be credited against the community placement portion of the
sentence.

(b)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense
committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, a serious violent
offense, vehicular homicide, or vehicular assault, committed on or after July
1, 1990, the court shall in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence
the offender to community placement for two years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community placement shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1)
and (2). When the court sentences an offender under this subsection to the
statutory maximum period of confinement then the community placement portion of
the sentence shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the
offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).
Any period of community custody actually served shall be credited against the
community placement portion of the sentence. Unless a condition is waived by
the court, the terms of community placement for offenders sentenced pursuant to
this section shall include the following conditions:

(i)
The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;

(ii)
The offender shall work at department of corrections-approved education,
employment, and/or community service;

(iii)
The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant
to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(iv)
The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department of
corrections;

(v)
The residence location and living arrangements are subject to the prior
approval of the department of corrections during the period of community
placement; and

(vi)
The offender shall submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the orders of the court as required by the department.

(c)
As a part of any sentence imposed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(i)
The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;

(ii)
The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;

(iii)
The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling
services;

(iv)
The offender shall not consume alcohol;

(v)
The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions; or

(vi)
For an offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the offender shall comply with any terms and conditions of
community placement imposed by the department of corrections relating to
contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.

(d)
Prior to transfer to, or during, community placement, any conditions of
community placement may be removed or modified so as not to be more restrictive
by the sentencing court, upon recommendation of the department of corrections.

(10)(a)
When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department of corrections
for an offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after June 6, 1996,
the court shall, in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to community custody for three years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community custody shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1)
and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community custody shall
be the same as those provided for in subsection (9)(b) of this section and may
include those provided for in subsection (9)(c) of this section. As part of
any sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this
subsection, the court shall also require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department of corrections under subsection (14) of
this section.

(c)
At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of community
custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may
impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed
pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for
the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a
condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

(11)
If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less,
the court may, in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on
consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days
of confinement shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators
may schedule court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(12)
If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, the
sentence shall specify the total amount of the legal financial obligation owed,
and shall require the offender to pay a specified monthly sum toward that legal
financial obligation. Restitution to victims shall be paid prior to any other
payments of monetary obligations. Any legal financial obligation that is
imposed by the court may be collected by the department, which shall deliver
the amount paid to the county clerk for credit. The offender's compliance with
payment of legal financial obligations shall be supervised by the department
for ten years following the entry of the judgment and sentence or ten years
following the offender's release from total confinement. All monetary payments
ordered shall be paid no later than ten years after the last date of release
from confinement pursuant to a felony conviction or the date the sentence was
entered unless the superior court extends the criminal judgment an additional
ten years. If the legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments are not paid during the initial ten-year period, the superior court
may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years as
provided in RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145. If jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during the subsequent period. Independent of the
department, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed
shall have the authority to utilize any other remedies available to the party
or entity to collect the legal financial obligation. Nothing in this section
makes the department, the state, or any of its employees, agents, or other
persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations. If an order includes restitution as one
of the monetary assessments, the county clerk shall make disbursements to
victims named in the order.

(13)
Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.140(1) and 9.94A.142(1), a court may not
impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or community supervision
or community placement which exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(14)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, community placement, or legal financial obligation shall be under the
supervision of the department of corrections and shall follow explicitly the
instructions and conditions of the department of corrections. The department
may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to
monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed.

(a)
The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a
community corrections officer, remaining within prescribed geographical
boundaries, notifying the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(b)
For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes
committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to
the instructions in (a) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of
supervision, including but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having
contact with any other specified individuals or specific class of individuals.
The conditions authorized under this subsection (14)(b) may be imposed by the
department prior to or during an offender's community custody term. If a
violation of conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section occurs during community custody, it shall be
deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.207 and
shall authorize the department to transfer an offender to a more restrictive
confinement status as provided in RCW 9.94A.205. At any time prior to the
completion of a sex offender's term of community custody, the department may
recommend to the court that any or all of the conditions imposed by the court
or the department pursuant to subsection (10) of this section be continued
beyond the expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized
in subsection (10)(c) of this section.

The
department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or
after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(15)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, or community placement under the supervision of the department of
corrections shall not own, use, or possess firearms or ammunition. Offenders
who own, use, or are found to be in actual or constructive possession of
firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the appropriate violation process
and sanctions. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection
means the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition.
"Firearm" as used in this subsection means a weapon or device from
which a projectile may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder.

(16)
The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time
served before the sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the
offense for which the offender is being sentenced.

(17)
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2) governing whether
sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional
sentence subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
and may be appealed by the defendant or the state as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210
(2) through (6).

(18)
The court shall order restitution whenever the offender is convicted of a
felony that results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property,
whether the offender is sentenced to confinement or placed under community
supervision, unless extraordinary circumstances exist that make restitution
inappropriate in the court's judgment. The court shall set forth the
extraordinary circumstances in the record if it does not order restitution.

(19)
As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce an order that
relates directly to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has
been convicted, prohibiting the offender from having any contact with other
specified individuals or a specific class of individuals for a period not to
exceed the maximum allowable sentence for the crime, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community supervision or community
placement.

(20)
The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community placement or
community supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate
in available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(21)
In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require the defendant to
serve the partial confinement in work release, in a program of home detention,
on work crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(22)
All court-ordered legal financial obligations collected by the department and
remitted to the county clerk shall be credited and paid where restitution is
ordered. Restitution shall be paid prior to any other payments of monetary
obligations.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.310 and 1998 c 235 s 1 and 1998 c 211 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1) TABLE 1

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

SCORE OFFENDER SCORE

9 or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

XV Life
Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XIV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320
333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIII 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m
29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136
147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102
114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14
20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3
8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6
9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

NOTE:
Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category represent
sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and
third rows represent presumptive sentencing ranges in months, or in days if so
designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.

(2)
For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the presumptive sentence
is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the
appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime,
and multiplying the range by 75 percent.

(3)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony
crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the
firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject
to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following
additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence determined under
subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as
classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or
with a maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of
this subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b),
and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced
for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or
(c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section,
or both, any and all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice
the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all firearm enhancements
under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and
shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other
firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this
chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an
offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an
extraordinary medical release when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(f)
The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so
that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the
sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a deadly weapon as defined in this chapter other than a firearm
as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the
crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is
being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or
enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses,
regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon
enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon
other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements,
the following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence
determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of
conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously
been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under
(a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c)
of this section, or both, any and all deadly weapon enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions,
including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum
term has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be
granted an extraordinary medical release when authorized under RCW
9.94A.150(4).

(f)
The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the
sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the
portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence if
the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or
state correctional facility as that term is defined in this chapter and the
offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection.
If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this
subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility as that term
is defined in this chapter, and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
presumptive sentence determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a)
Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or
69.50.410;

(b)
Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv),
and (v);

(c)
Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For
the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state
correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that
facility or county jail.

(6)
An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense
was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435.

(7)
An additional two years shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in
RCW 46.61.5055.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.95.040 and 1993 c 144 s 4 and 1993 c 140 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
board shall fix the duration of confinement for persons committed by the court
before July 1, 1986, for crimes committed before July 1, 1984. Within six
months after the admission of the convicted person to a state correctional
facility, the board shall fix the duration of confinement. The term of
imprisonment so fixed shall not exceed the maximum provided by law for the
offense of which the person was convicted or the maximum fixed by the court
where the law does not provide for a maximum term.

Subject
to RCW 9.95.047, the following limitations are placed on the board or the court
for persons committed to a state correctional facility on or after July 1,
1986, for crimes committed before July 1, 1984, with regard to fixing the
duration of confinement in certain cases, notwithstanding any provisions of law
specifying a lesser sentence:

(1)
For a person not previously convicted of a felony but armed with a deadly
weapon at the time of the commission of the offense, the duration of
confinement shall not be fixed at less than five years.

(2)
For a person previously convicted of a felony either in this state or elsewhere
and who was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of the commission of the
offense, the duration of confinement shall not be fixed at less than seven and
one-half years.

The
words "deadly weapon," as used in this section include, but are not
limited to, any instrument known as a blackjack, sling shot, billy, sand club,
sandbag, metal knuckles, any dirk, dagger, pistol, revolver, or any other
firearm, any knife having a blade longer than three inches, any razor with an
unguarded blade, any metal pipe or bar used or intended to be used as a club,
any explosive, and any weapon containing poisonous or injurious gas.

(3)
For a person convicted of being an habitual criminal within the meaning of the
statute which provides for mandatory life imprisonment for such habitual
criminals, the duration of confinement shall not be fixed at less than fifteen
years.

(4)
Any person convicted of embezzling funds from any institution of public deposit
of which the person was an officer or stockholder, the duration of confinement
shall be fixed at not less than five years.

Except
when an inmate of a state correctional facility has been convicted of murder in
the first or second degree, the board may parole an inmate prior to the
expiration of a mandatory minimum term, provided such inmate has demonstrated a
meritorious effort in rehabilitation and at least two-thirds of the board
members concur in such action: PROVIDED, That any inmate who has a mandatory
minimum term and is paroled prior to the expiration of such term according to
the provisions of this chapter shall not receive a conditional release from
supervision while on parole until after the mandatory minimum term has expired.

An
inmate serving a sentence fixed under this chapter, whether or not a mandatory
minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical release by
the secretary of corrections when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

Sec.
5. RCW
46.61.5055 and 1998 c 215 s 1, 1998 c 214 s 1, 1998 c 211 s 1, 1998 c 210 s 4,
1998 c 207 s 1 and 1998 c 206 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four
consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring.
The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court
may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By suspension of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of ninety days. The period of
license, permit, or privilege suspension may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall suspend the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one year. Two
consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever
the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state
in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts
upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory
minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the
court may order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or
municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.
The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the
amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of one year. The period of
license, permit, or privilege suspension may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall suspend the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of two years. The period of
license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and ninety
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days of imprisonment
and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of nine hundred days. The
period of license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The
court shall notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon
receiving notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the
offender's license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has two or more prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one
hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require
the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of
imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not
be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting
the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral
is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of three years. The period of
license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one
year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The
court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include
an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days
of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the
mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon
which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of four years. The period of
license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(4)
In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by
this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a)
Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for
injury or damage to another or another's property; and

(b)
Whether the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or
more passengers at the time of the offense.

(5)
An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment
and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6)
After expiration of any period of suspension or revocation of the offender's
license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department
shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to
RCW 46.20.355.

(7)(a)
In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by
this section, whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court
shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not
exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that
include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid
license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not
driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii) not refusing to
submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine alcohol
concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has reasonable
grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical control of
a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor. The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment,
supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The
sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.

(b)
For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii)
or (a)(i) and (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted
person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or
deferred.

(c)
For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation
imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of
the person shall be suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license,
permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the
time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or
denial then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify
the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(8)
An offender serving a sentence under this section, whether or not a
mandatory minimum term has expired, may be granted an extraordinary medical
release by the jail administrator subject to the standards and limitations set
forth in RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(9)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Electronic home monitoring" shall not be considered confinement as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(v)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an
equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that
was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi)
An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of
(b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this
state;

(vii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge
under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or
of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522; and

(c)
"Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec.
6. RCW
69.50.410 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized by this chapter it shall be unlawful for any person to
sell for profit any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana.

For
the purposes of this section only, the following words and phrases shall have
the following meanings:

(a)
"To sell" means the passing of title and possession of a controlled
substance from the seller to the buyer for a price whether or not the price is
paid immediately or at a future date.

(b)
"For profit" means the obtaining of anything of value in exchange for
a controlled substance.

(c)
"Price" means anything of value.

(2)
Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall
receive a sentence of not more than five years in a correctional facility of
the department of social and health services for the first offense. Any person
convicted on a second or subsequent cause, the sale having transpired after
prosecution and conviction on the first cause, of subsection (1) of this
section shall receive a mandatory sentence of five years in a correctional
facility of the department of social and health services and no judge of any
court shall suspend or defer the sentence imposed for the second or subsequent
violation of subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Any person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section by
selling heroin shall receive a mandatory sentence of two years in a
correctional facility of the department of social and health services and no judge
of any court shall suspend or defer the sentence imposed for such violation.
Any person convicted on a second or subsequent sale of heroin, the sale having
transpired after prosecution and conviction on the first cause of the sale of
heroin shall receive a mandatory sentence of ten years in a correctional
facility of the department of social and health services and no judge of any
court shall suspend or defer the sentence imposed for this second or subsequent
violation: PROVIDED, That the indeterminate sentence review board ((of
prison terms and paroles)) under RCW 9.95.040 shall not reduce the minimum
term imposed for a violation under this subsection.

(4)
Whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an offender serving a
sentence under this section may be granted an extraordinary medical release
when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(5)
In addition to the sentences provided in subsection (2) of this section, any
person convicted of a violation of subsection (1) of this section shall be
fined in an amount calculated to at least eliminate any and all proceeds or
profits directly or indirectly gained by such person as a result of sales of
controlled substances in violation of the laws of this or other states, or the
United States, up to the amount of five hundred thousand dollars on each count.

(((5)))
(6) Any person, addicted to the use of controlled substances, who
voluntarily applies to the department of social and health services for the
purpose of participating in a rehabilitation program approved by the department
for addicts of controlled substances shall be immune from prosecution for
subsection (1) offenses unless a filing of an information or indictment against
such person for a violation of subsection (1) of this section is made prior to
his or her voluntary participation in the program of the department of
social and health services. All applications for immunity under this section
shall be sent to the department of social and health services in Olympia. It
shall be the duty of the department to stamp each application received pursuant
to this section with the date and time of receipt.

This
section shall not apply to offenses defined and punishable under the provisions
of RCW 69.50.401 ((as now or hereafter amended)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary shall report annually to the legislature on the
number of offenders considered for an extraordinary medical release, the number
of offenders who were granted such a release, the number of offenders who were
denied such a release, the length of time between initial consideration and the
decision to release for each offender who was released, the number of offenders
granted an extraordinary medical release who were later returned to total
confinement, and the cost savings realized by the state.

---
END ---