BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.67 RCW to read as follows:

Any
mobile home park landlord may request any public or private entity to provide
utilities to tenants in a mobile home park in the name of the tenant, if the
tenant's utility can be reasonably identified separately in the name of the
tenant. Any costs for the utilities are the exclusive responsibility of the
tenant. The landlord is not liable for a tenant's utility costs when the
utility is provided in the name of the tenant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

Any
mobile home park landlord may request any public or private entity to provide
utilities to tenants in a mobile home park in the name of the tenant, if the
tenant's utility can be reasonably identified separately in the name of the
tenant. Any costs for the utilities are the exclusive responsibility of the
tenant. The landlord is not liable for a tenant's utility costs when the
utility is provided in the name of the tenant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

Any
mobile home park landlord may request any public or private entity to provide
utilities to tenants in a mobile home park in the name of the tenant, if the
tenant's utility can be reasonably identified separately in the name of the
tenant. Any costs for the utilities are the exclusive responsibility of the
tenant. The landlord is not liable for a tenant's utility costs when the
utility is provided in the name of the tenant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 57.08 RCW to read as follows:

Any
mobile home park landlord may request any public or private entity to provide
utilities to tenants in a mobile home park in the name of the tenant, if the
tenant's utility can be reasonably identified separately in the name of the
tenant. Any costs for the utilities are the exclusive responsibility of the
tenant. The landlord is not liable for a tenant's utility costs when the
utility is provided in the name of the tenant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

Any mobile home park landlord may request any public or private
entity to provide utilities to tenants in a mobile home park in the name of the
tenant, if the tenant's utility can be reasonably identified separately in the
name of the tenant. Any costs for the utilities are the exclusive
responsibility of the tenant. The landlord is not liable for a tenant's
utility costs when the utility is provided in the name of the tenant.

---
END ---