BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.24.410 and 1983 c 3 s 164 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Spirituous liquor," as used in RCW 66.24.400 to 66.24.450,
inclusive, means "liquor" as defined in RCW 66.04.010, except
"wine" and "beer" sold as such.

(2)
"Restaurant" as used in RCW 66.24.400 to 66.24.450, inclusive, means
an establishment provided with special space and accommodations where, in
consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is habitually furnished to
the public, not including drug stores and soda fountains: PROVIDED, That such
establishments shall be approved by the board and that the board shall be
satisfied that such establishment is maintained in a substantial manner as a
place for ((preparing, cooking and)) serving ((of)) complete
meals((. The service of only)) or fry orders ((or)) and
such food ((and victuals)) as sandwiches, hamburgers, or salads ((shall
not be deemed in compliance with this definition)).

(3)
"Hotel," "clubs," "wine" and "beer" are
used in RCW 66.24.400 to 66.24.450, inclusive, with the meaning given in
chapter 66.04 RCW: PROVIDED, That any such hotel shall be provided with
special space and accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food is
habitually furnished to the public: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the board shall be
satisfied that such hotel is maintained in a substantial manner as a place for
((preparing, cooking and)) serving ((of)) complete meals((.
The service of only)) or fry orders((,)) and food such as
sandwiches, hamburgers, or salads shall not be deemed in compliance with this
definition.

Sec.
2. RCW
66.24.420 and 1998 c 126 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be issued in accordance
with the following schedule of annual fees:

(a)
The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license shall be
graduated according to the dedicated dining area and type of service provided
as follows:

With
no dedicated dining required

and
persons under 21 years of age

prohibited $2,500

Less
than 50% dedicated dining area $2,000

50%
or more dedicated dining area $1,600

Service
bar only $1,000

(b)
The annual fee for the license when issued to any other spirits, beer, and wine
restaurant licensee outside of incorporated cities and towns shall be prorated
according to the calendar quarters, or portion thereof, during which the
licensee is open for business, except in case of suspension or revocation of
the license.

(c)
Where the license shall be issued to any corporation, association or person
operating a bona fide restaurant in an airport terminal facility providing
service to transient passengers with more than one place where liquor is to be
dispensed and sold, such license shall be issued upon the payment of the annual
fee, which shall be a master license and shall permit such sale within and from
one such place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the
premises at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued
for each such additional place: PROVIDED, That the holder of a master license
for a restaurant in an airport terminal facility shall be required to maintain
in a substantial manner at least one place on the premises for preparing,
cooking, and serving of complete meals, and such food service shall be
available on request in other licensed places on the premises: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That an additional license fee of twenty-five percent of the annual
master license fee shall be required for such duplicate licenses.

(d)
Where the license shall be issued to any corporation, association, or person
operating dining places at a publicly or privately owned civic or convention
center with facilities for sports, entertainment, or conventions, or a
combination thereof, with more than one place where liquor is to be dispensed
and sold, such license shall be issued upon the payment of the annual fee,
which shall be a master license and shall permit such sale within and from one
such place. Such license may be extended to additional places on the premises
at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for each
such additional place: PROVIDED, That the holder of a master license for a
dining place at such a publicly or privately owned civic or convention center
shall be required to maintain in a substantial manner at least one place on the
premises for preparing, cooking, and serving of complete meals, and food
service shall be available on request in other licensed places on the
premises: PROVIDED FURTHER, That an additional license fee of ten dollars
shall be required for such duplicate licenses.

(e)
Where the license shall be issued to any corporation, association or person
operating more than one building containing dining places at privately owned
facilities which are open to the public and where there is a continuity of
ownership of all adjacent property, such license shall be issued upon the
payment of an annual fee which shall be a master license and shall permit such
sale within and from one such place. Such license may be extended to the
additional dining places on the property or, in the case of a spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensed hotel, property owned or controlled by leasehold
interest by that hotel for use as a conference or convention center or banquet
facility open to the general public for special events in the same metropolitan
area, at the discretion of the board and a duplicate license may be issued for
each additional place: PROVIDED, That the holder of the master license for the
dining place shall not offer alcoholic beverages for sale, service, and
consumption at the additional place unless food service is available at both
the location of the master license and the duplicate license: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That an additional license fee of twenty dollars shall be required for
such duplicate licenses.

(2)
The board, so far as in its judgment is reasonably possible, shall confine
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses to the business districts of cities
and towns and other communities, and not grant such licenses in residential
districts, nor within the immediate vicinity of schools, without being limited
in the administration of this subsection to any specific distance requirements.

(3)
The board shall have discretion to issue spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licenses outside of cities and towns in the state of Washington. The purpose
of this subsection is to enable the board, in its discretion, to license in
areas outside of cities and towns and other communities, establishments which
are operated and maintained primarily for the benefit of tourists, vacationers
and travelers, and also golf and country clubs, and common carriers operating
dining, club and buffet cars, or boats.

(4)
The total number of spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses issued in the
state of Washington by the board, not including spirits, beer, and wine private
club licenses, shall not in the aggregate at any time exceed one license for
each fifteen hundred of population in the state, determined according to the
yearly population determination developed by the office of financial management
pursuant to RCW 43.62.030.

(5)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, the board
shall refuse a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to any applicant if
in the opinion of the board the spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses
already granted for the particular locality are adequate for the reasonable
needs of the community.

(6)
The board may issue a caterer's endorsement to this license to allow the
licensee to remove the liquor stocks at the licensed premises, for use as
liquor for sale and service at special occasion locations at a specified date
and place not currently licensed by the board. The privilege of selling and
serving liquor under such endorsement is limited to members and guests of a
society or organization as defined in RCW 66.24.375. Cost of the endorsement
is three hundred fifty dollars.

(a)
The holder of this license with catering endorsement shall, if requested by the
board, notify the board or its designee of the date, time, place, and location
of any catered event. Upon request, the licensee shall provide to the board
all necessary or requested information concerning the society or organization
that will be holding the function at which the endorsed license will be
utilized.

(b) If attendance at the function will be limited to members and
invited guests of the sponsoring society or organization, the requirement that
the society or organization be within the definition of RCW 66.24.375 is
waived.

---
END ---