BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.44.150 and 1998 c 321 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of licensing shall, on the twenty-fifth day of February, May,
August, and November of each year, advise the state treasurer of the total amount
of motor vehicle excise taxes imposed by RCW 82.44.020(1) remitted to the
department during the preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of
March, June, September, and December, respectively, except for those payable
under RCW 82.44.030, from motor vehicle owners residing within each
municipality which has levied a tax under RCW 35.58.273, which amount of excise
taxes shall be determined by the director as follows:

The
total amount of motor vehicle excise taxes remitted to the department, except
those payable under RCW 82.44.020(2) and 82.44.030, from each county shall be
multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the population of the
municipality residing in such county, and the denominator of which is the total
population of the county in which such municipality or portion thereof is
located. The product of this computation shall be the amount of excise taxes
from motor vehicle owners residing within such municipality or portion
thereof. Where the municipality levying a tax under RCW 35.58.273 is located
in more than one county, the above computation shall be made by county, and the
combined products shall provide the total amount of motor vehicle excise taxes
from motor vehicle owners residing in the municipality as a whole. Population
figures required for these computations shall be supplied to the director by
the office of financial management, who shall adjust the fraction annually.

(2)
On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each
year, the state treasurer based upon information provided by the department
shall, from motor vehicle excise taxes deposited in the transportation fund
under RCW 82.44.110, make the following deposits:

(a)
To the high capacity transportation account created in RCW 47.78.010, a sum
equal to four and five-tenths percent of the special excise tax levied under
RCW 35.58.273 by those municipalities authorized to levy a special excise tax
within each county that has a population of one hundred seventy-five thousand
or more and has an interstate highway within its borders; except that in a case
of a municipality located in a county that has a population of one hundred
seventy-five thousand or more that does not have an interstate highway located
within its borders, that sum shall be deposited in the passenger ferry account;

(b)
To the central Puget Sound public transportation account created in RCW
82.44.180, for revenues distributed after June 30, 1999, within a county
with a population of one million or more and a county with a population of from
two hundred thousand to less than one million bordering a county with a
population of one million or more with which it shares a border of more than
five miles, a sum equal to ((the difference between (i) the special
excise tax levied and collected under RCW 35.58.273 by those municipalities
authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax subject to the requirements
of subsections (3) and (4) of this section and (ii) the special excise tax that
the municipality would otherwise have been eligible to levy and collect at a
tax rate of .815 percent and been able to match with locally generated tax
revenues, other than the excise tax imposed under RCW 35.58.273, budgeted for
any public transportation purpose. Before this deposit, the sum shall be
reduced by an amount equal to the amount distributed under (a) of this
subsection for each of the municipalities within the counties to which this
subsection (2)(b) applies; however, any transfer under this subsection (2)(b)
must be greater than zero)) 6.732 percent of the special excise tax
distributed under RCW 35.58.273; and

(c)
To the public transportation systems account created in RCW 82.44.180, for
revenues distributed after June 30, 1999, within counties not described in
(b) of this subsection, a sum equal to ((the difference between (i) the
special excise tax levied and collected under RCW 35.58.273 by those
municipalities authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax subject to
the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section and (ii) the
special excise tax that the municipality would otherwise have been eligible to
levy and collect at a tax rate of .815 percent and been able to match with
locally generated tax revenues, other than the excise tax imposed under RCW 35.58.273,
budgeted for any public transportation purpose. Before this deposit, the sum
shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount distributed under (a) of this
subsection for each of the municipalities within the counties to which this
subsection (2)(c) applies; however, any transfer under this subsection (2)(c)
must be greater than zero)) 1.158 percent of the special excise tax
levied and collected under RCW 35.58.273.

(3)
On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each year,
the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department, shall
remit motor vehicle excise tax revenues imposed and collected under RCW
35.58.273 as follows:

(a)
The amount required to be remitted by the state treasurer to the treasurer of
any municipality levying the tax shall not exceed in any calendar year the
amount of locally-generated tax revenues, excluding (i) the excise tax imposed
under RCW 35.58.273 for the purposes of this section, which shall have been
budgeted by the municipality to be collected in such calendar year for any
public transportation purposes including but not limited to operating costs,
capital costs, and debt service on general obligation or revenue bonds issued
for these purposes; and (ii) the sales and use tax equalization distributions
provided under RCW 82.14.046; and

(b)
In no event may the amount remitted in a single calendar quarter exceed the
amount collected on behalf of the municipality under RCW 35.58.273 during the
calendar quarter next preceding the immediately preceding quarter, excluding
the sales and use tax equalization distributions provided under RCW 82.14.046.

(4)
At the close of each calendar year accounting period, but not later than April
1, each municipality that has received motor vehicle excise taxes under
subsection (3) of this section shall transmit to the director of licensing and
the state auditor a written report showing by source the previous year's
budgeted tax revenues for public transportation purposes as compared to actual
collections. Any municipality that has not submitted the report by April 1
shall cease to be eligible to receive motor vehicle excise taxes under
subsection (3) of this section until the report is received by the director of
licensing. If a municipality has received more or less money under subsection
(3) of this section for the period covered by the report than it is entitled to
receive by reason of its locally-generated collected tax revenues, the director
of licensing shall, during the next ensuing quarter that the municipality is
eligible to receive motor vehicle excise tax funds, increase or decrease the
amount to be remitted in an amount equal to the difference between the
locally-generated budgeted tax revenues and the locally-generated collected tax
revenues. In no event may the amount remitted for a calendar year exceed the
amount collected on behalf of the municipality under RCW 35.58.273 during that
same calendar year excluding the sales and use tax equalization distributions
provided under RCW 82.14.046. At the time of the next fiscal audit of each
municipality, the state auditor shall verify the accuracy of the report
submitted and notify the director of licensing of any discrepancies.

(5)
The motor vehicle excise taxes imposed under RCW 35.58.273 and required to be
remitted under this section and RCW 82.14.046 shall be remitted without
legislative appropriation.

(6)
Any municipality levying and collecting a tax under RCW 35.58.273 which does
not have an operating, public transit system or a contract for public
transportation services in effect within one year from the initial effective
date of the tax shall return to the state treasurer all motor vehicle excise
taxes received under subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect June 30, 1999.

---
END ---