BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1998
c 346 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR THE MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired
Driving Safety Account Appropriation ...... $ 480,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed ((in accordance
with RCW 82.14.320)) to all cities ratably based on population as last
determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any
city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July
1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with
criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county
in which the city is located. $240,000 of the appropriation shall be
distributed in January 1999 and the remaining $240,000 of the appropriation
shall be distributed in April 1999. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited
to, Substitute House Bill No. 2885 (drunk driving penalties), Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3070 (DUI penalties), Second Substitute House Bill No. 3089
(deferred prosecution), Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6142 (DUI/license
suspension), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6165 (ignition interlock
violations), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6166 (DUI penalties),
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DUI penalties), Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 6257 (intoxication levels lowered), and Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6293 (DUI penalties).

(2)
To implement the 1999 amendments to this section, the state treasurer shall
determine the amount of the April 1999 distribution to each city in the
following manner:

(a)
The state treasurer shall determine the amount of the total appropriation that
would have been distributed to each city if both the January 1999 and April
1999 distributions were made ratably based on population;

(b)
The state treasurer shall deduct from the amounts calculated under (a) of this
subsection the amount received by each city in the January 1999 distribution;

(c)
The amount to be distributed to each city shall be the amount calculated under
(b) of this subsection if that amount is greater than zero; and

(d)
If the appropriation in this section is inadequate to distribute the amounts
calculated under (c) of this subsection, the amounts distributed to each city
shall be ratably reduced.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---