BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.04.010 and 1974 ex.s. c 170 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all competitive examinations, unless otherwise provided ((herein)) in
this section, to determine the qualifications of applicants for public
offices, positions or employment, the state, and all of its political
subdivisions and all municipal corporations, shall give a ((preference))
scoring criteria status to all veterans as defined in RCW 41.04.005, by
adding to the passing mark, grade or rating only, based upon a possible rating
of one hundred points as perfect a percentage in accordance with the following:

(1)
Ten percent to a veteran who ((is not receiving any veterans retirement
payments and said)) served during a period of war or in a hostile
environment as defined in RCW 41.04.005 and does not receive military
retirement. The percentage shall be ((utilized in said veteran's)) added
to the passing mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations ((and
not in any promotional examination)) until ((one of such examinations
results in said)) the veteran's first appointment((: PROVIDED,
That said)). The percentage shall not be utilized in ((any))
promotional examinations;

(2)
Five percent to a veteran who did not serve during a period of war or in a
hostile environment as defined in RCW 41.04.005 or is receiving ((any
veterans retirement payments and said)) military retirement. The
percentage shall be ((utilized in said veteran's)) added to the passing
mark, grade, or rating of competitive examinations ((only and not
in any promotional examination)) until ((one of such examinations
results in said)) the veteran's first appointment((: PROVIDED,
That said)). The percentage shall not be utilized in ((any))
promotional examinations;

(3)
Five percent to a veteran who((, after having previously received)) was
called to active military service for one or more years from employment
with the state or any of its political subdivisions or municipal corporations((,
shall be called, or recalled, to active military service for a period of one
year, or more, during any period of war, for his)). The percentage
shall be added to the first promotional examination only((, upon
compliance with RCW 73.16.035 as it now exists or may hereafter be amended));

(4)
((There shall be no examination preferences other than those which have been
specifically provided for above and all preferences above)) All
veterans' scoring criteria specified in subsections (1), (2),
and (3) of this section must be claimed ((by a veteran)) within
((eight)) fifteen years of the date of ((his)) release
from active military service. This period may be extended for valid
and extenuating reasons to include but not be limited to:

(a)
Documented medical reasons beyond control of the veteran;

(b)
Any veterans' administration documented disabled veteran; or

(c) Any veteran who has his or her employment terminated through
no fault or action of his or her own and whose livelihood is adversely affected
may seek preference employment consideration under this section.

---
END ---