BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
54.16.030 and 1998 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
district may construct, purchase, condemn and purchase, acquire, add to,
maintain, conduct, and operate water works and irrigation plants and systems,
within or without its limits, for the purpose of furnishing the district, and
the inhabitants thereof, and of the county in which the district is
located, and any other persons including public and private corporations within
or without ((its limits)) the limits of the district or the county,
with an ample supply of water for all purposes, public and private, including
water power, domestic use, and irrigation, with full and exclusive authority to
sell and regulate and control the use, distribution, and price thereof.

Sec.
2. RCW
54.16.120 and 1975 c 46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A district may, by resolution, establish and define the boundaries
of local assessment districts to be known as local utility district No.
. . . ., for distribution, under the general supervision and
control of the commission, of water for all purposes, public and private,
including domestic use, irrigation, and electric energy, and for providing
street lighting, or any of them, and in like manner provide for the purchasing,
or otherwise acquiring, or constructing and equipping and maintaining and
operating distribution systems for such purposes, and for extensions and
betterments thereof, and may levy and collect in accordance with the special benefits
conferred thereon, special assessments and reassessments on property specially
benefited thereby, for paying the cost and expense thereof, or any portions
thereof, as herein provided, and issue local improvement bonds or warrants or
both to be repaid wholly or in part by collection of local improvement
assessments. A district also may form local utility districts located
entirely or in part outside its limits or the limits of the county in which the
district is located to provide water, or sewer facilities if otherwise
authorized under this title.

---
END ---