BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.168.020 and 1996 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Committee" means the Washington state development loan fund
committee.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Distressed area" means: (a) A county which has an unemployment rate
which is twenty percent above the state average for the immediately previous
three years; (b) a county that has a median household income that is less than
seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the previous
three years; (c) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the office of
federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of commerce,
in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which an application is filed under this chapter exceeds
the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty percent; (d) an
area within a county, which area: (i) Is composed of contiguous census tracts;
(ii) has a minimum population of five thousand persons; (iii) has at least
seventy percent of its families and unrelated individuals with incomes below
eighty percent of the county's median income for families and unrelated
individuals; and (iv) has an unemployment rate which is at least forty percent
higher than the county's unemployment rate; ((or)) (e) a county
designated by the governor as a distressed area or an eligible area under RCW
82.60.047; or (f) a county designated as a rural natural resources impact
area under RCW 43.31.601 if an application is filed by July 1, 1997. For
purposes of this definition, "families and unrelated individuals" has
the same meaning that is ascribed to that term by the federal department of
housing and urban development in its regulations authorizing action grants for economic
development and neighborhood revitalization projects.

(5)
"Fund" means the Washington state development loan fund.

(6)
"Local development organization" means a nonprofit organization which
is organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a commitment to a
long-standing effort for an economic development program, and makes a
demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed or underemployed
residents in an area.

(7)
"Project" means the establishment of a new or expanded business in an
area which when completed will provide employment opportunities.
"Project" also means the retention of an existing business in an area
which when completed will provide employment opportunities.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.62.010 and 1996 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3)
"Eligible area" means: (a) A county in which the average level of
unemployment for the three years before the year in which an application is
filed under this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for those years
by twenty percent; (b) a county that has a median household income that is less
than seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the previous
three years; (c) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the office of
federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of commerce,
in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which an application is filed under this chapter exceeds
the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty percent; (d) a
designated community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.63A.700; ((or))
(e) a county designated by the governor as a distressed area or an eligible
area under RCW 82.60.047; or (f) subcounty areas in those counties that are
not covered under (a) of this subsection that are timber impact areas as
defined in RCW 43.31.601.

(4)(a)
"Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research and
development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an eligible area
at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average full-time qualified
employment positions at the specific facility will be at least fifteen percent
greater in the year for which the credit is being sought than the applicant's
average full-time qualified employment positions at the same facility in the
immediately preceding year.

(b)
"Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW
82.16.010(5) or that portion of a business project creating qualified full-time
employment positions outside an eligible area or those recipients of a sales
tax deferral under chapter 82.61 RCW.

(5)
"Manufacturing" means all activities of a commercial or industrial
nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to materials so
that as a result thereof a new, different, or useful substance or article of
tangible personal property is produced for sale or commercial or industrial use
and shall include the production or fabrication of specially made or custom
made articles. "Manufacturing" also includes computer programming,
the production of computer software, and other computer-related services, and
the activities performed by research and development laboratories and
commercial testing laboratories.

(6)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(7)
"Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee
employed in the eligible business project during the entire tax year.

(8)
"Tax year" means the calendar year in which taxes are due.

(9)
"Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this chapter.

(10)
"Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or process
before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection,
"commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market
testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or
process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.60.047 and 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The governor is authorized to designate a county as an eligible
area for purposes of chapter 43.168 RCW, chapter 82.62 RCW, and this
chapter if, as a result of: (1) A natural disaster or business or
military base closure or mass layoff, the twelve-month average unemployment
rate using the projected level of new unemployment in the county over the
ensuing twelve months added to the base unemployment level in the county for
the preceding twelve months will exceed the previous twelve-month average state
unemployment rate by forty percent, or (2) a military base restructuring,
the county has a loss of more than five thousand jobs over the previous
seven-year period. The designation shall be effective for a period of ((twelve))
twenty-four months.

---
END ---