BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
34.05.610 and 1998 c 280 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((There is hereby created a)) The joint administrative rules
review committee is created, which shall be a bipartisan committee
consisting of four senators ((and)), four representatives from
the state legislature, and the lieutenant governor. The lieutenant governor
may participate in the deliberations and work of the committee but may only vote
to break a tie vote. The senate members of the committee shall be
appointed by the president of the senate, and the house members of the
committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than two
members from each house may be from the same political party. The appointing
authorities shall also appoint one alternate member from each caucus of each
house. All appointments to the committee are subject to approval by the
caucuses to which the appointed members belong.

(2)
Legislative members and alternates shall be appointed as soon as
possible after the legislature convenes in regular session in an odd-numbered
year, and their terms shall extend until their successors are appointed and
qualified at the next regular session of the legislature in an odd-numbered
year or until such persons no longer serve in the legislature, whichever occurs
first. Legislative members and alternates may be reappointed to the
committee.

(3)
On or about January 1, 1999, the president of the senate shall appoint the
chairperson and the vice chairperson from among the committee membership. The
speaker of the house shall appoint the chairperson and the vice chairperson in
alternating even-numbered years beginning in the year 2000 from among the
committee membership. The secretary of the senate shall appoint the
chairperson and the vice chairperson in the alternating even-numbered years
beginning in the year 2002 from among the committee membership. Such
appointments shall be made in January of each even-numbered year as soon as
possible after a legislative session convenes.

(4) The chairperson of the committee shall cause all meeting
notices and committee documents to be sent to the members and alternates. A legislative
vacancy shall be filled by appointment of a legislator from the same political
party as the original appointment. The appropriate appointing authority shall
make the appointment within thirty days of the vacancy occurring.

---
END ---