BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that numerous fish stocks of the state are being listed or
are proposed to be listed as threatened or endangered under the federal
endangered species act. The legislature further finds that existing state laws
form a good foundation for the state to respond to the listings and proposed
listings, but that various laws relating to water resources, land use, and fish
protection and restoration must be strengthened to minimize the potential for
federal preemption of state authority and autonomy regarding the management of
the state's fisheries and water resources.

PART
I

WATER
CONSERVATION

Sec.
101. RCW
90.54.020 and 1997 c 442 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

Utilization
and management of the waters of the state shall be guided by the following
general declaration of fundamentals:

(1)
Uses of water for domestic, stock watering, industrial, commercial,
agricultural, irrigation, hydroelectric power production, mining, fish and
wildlife maintenance and enhancement, recreational, and thermal power
production purposes, and preservation of environmental and aesthetic values,
and all other uses compatible with the enjoyment of the public waters of the
state, are declared to be beneficial.

(2)
Allocation of waters among potential uses and users shall be based generally on
the securing of the maximum net benefits for the people of the state. Maximum
net benefits shall constitute total benefits less costs including opportunities
lost.

(3)
The quality of the natural environment shall be protected and, where possible,
enhanced as follows:

(a)
Perennial rivers and streams of the state shall be retained with base flows
necessary to provide for preservation of wildlife, fish, scenic, aesthetic and
other environmental values, and navigational values. Lakes and ponds shall be
retained substantially in their natural condition. Withdrawals of water which
would conflict therewith shall be authorized only in those situations where it
is clear that overriding considerations of the public interest will be served.

(b)
Waters of the state shall be of high quality. Regardless of the quality of the
waters of the state, all wastes and other materials and substances proposed for
entry into said waters shall be provided with all known, available, and
reasonable methods of treatment prior to entry. Notwithstanding that standards
of quality established for the waters of the state would not be violated,
wastes and other materials and substances shall not be allowed to enter such
waters which will reduce the existing quality thereof, except in those
situations where it is clear that overriding considerations of the public
interest will be served. Technology-based effluent limitations or standards
for discharges for municipal water treatment plants located on the Chehalis,
Columbia, Cowlitz, Lewis, or Skagit river shall be adjusted to reflect credit
for substances removed from the plant intake water if:

(i)
The municipality demonstrates that the intake water is drawn from the same body
of water into which the discharge is made; and

(ii)
The municipality demonstrates that no violation of receiving water quality
standards or appreciable environmental degradation will result.

(4)
The development of multipurpose water storage facilities shall be a high
priority for programs of water allocation, planning, management, and
efficiency. The department, other state agencies, and local
governments, and planning units formed under ((section 107 or 108 of this
act)) chapter 90.82 RCW shall evaluate the potential for the
development of new storage projects and the benefits and effects of storage in
reducing damage to stream banks and property, increasing the use of land,
providing water for municipal, industrial, agricultural, power generation, and
other beneficial uses, and improving stream flow regimes for fisheries and
other instream uses.

(5)
Adequate and safe supplies of water shall be preserved and protected in potable
condition to satisfy human domestic needs.

(6)
Multiple-purpose impoundment structures are to be preferred over single-purpose
structures. Due regard shall be given to means and methods for protection of
fishery resources in the planning for and construction of water impoundment
structures and other artificial obstructions.

(7)
Federal, state, and local governments, individuals, corporations, groups,
and other entities shall ((be encouraged to)) carry out practices of
conservation as they relate to the use of the waters of the state. In addition
to traditional development approaches, improved water use efficiency and
conservation, including reclaiming municipal and industrial effluent,
shall be emphasized in the management of the state's water resources and ((in
some cases)) will be a potential new source of water with which to meet
future needs throughout the state. Where reclaimed water is a feasible
replacement source of water in accordance with criteria adopted under section
206 of this act, it shall be used for nonpotable water uses in lieu of using
potable water for those uses.

(8)
Development of water supply systems, whether publicly or privately owned, which
provide water to the public generally in regional areas within the state shall
be encouraged. Development of water supply systems for multiple domestic use
which will not serve the public generally shall be discouraged where water
supplies are available from water systems serving the public.

(9)
Full recognition shall be given in the administration of water allocation and
use programs to the natural interrelationships of surface and ground waters.

(10)
Expressions of the public interest will be sought at all stages of water
planning and allocation discussions.

(11)
Water management programs, including but not limited to, water quality, flood
control, drainage, erosion control, and storm runoff are deemed to be in
the public interest.

Sec.
102. RCW
90.54.180 and 1989 c 348 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Consistent
with the fundamentals of water resource policy set forth in this chapter, state
and local governments, individuals, corporations, groups, and other
entities shall ((be encouraged to)) carry out water use efficiency and
conservation programs and practices consistent with the following:

(1)
Water efficiency and conservation programs ((should)) shall
utilize an appropriate mix of economic incentives, cost share programs,
regulatory programs, and technical and public information efforts. Programs
which encourage voluntary participation are preferred.

(2)
Increased water use efficiency ((should receive consideration as)) and
conservation, including reclaiming municipal and industrial effluent shall be
considered a potential source of water in state and local water resource
planning processes. In determining the cost-effectiveness of alternative water
sources, consideration should be given to the benefits of conservation, waste
water recycling, and impoundment of waters.

(3)
In determining the cost-effectiveness of alternative water sources, full
consideration should be given to the benefits of storage which can reduce the
damage to stream banks and property, increase the utilization of land, provide
water for municipal, industrial, agricultural, and other beneficial uses,
provide for the generation of electric power from renewable resources, and
improve stream flow regimes for fishery and other instream uses.

(4)
Entities receiving state financial assistance for construction of water source
expansion or acquisition of new sources shall develop, and implement if
cost-effective, a water use efficiency and conservation element of a water
supply plan pursuant to RCW 43.20.230(1).

(5)
State programs to improve water use efficiency ((should)) shall
focus on those areas of the state in which water is overappropriated; areas
that experience diminished stream flows or aquifer levels, including areas
with declining fish stocks due to lack of stream flow; and areas where
projected water needs, including those for instream flows, exceed available
supplies.

(6) Existing and future generations of citizens of the state of
Washington ((should)) must be made aware of the importance of the
state's water resources and the need for wise and efficient use and development
of this vital resource. In order to increase this awareness, state agencies ((should))
shall integrate public education on increasing water use efficiency into
existing public information efforts. This effort shall be coordinated with
other levels of government, including local governments and Indian tribes.

Sec.
103. RCW
90.03.290 and 1994 c 264 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an application complying with the provisions of this chapter and with the
rules ((and regulations)) of the department has been filed, ((the
same)) it shall be placed on record with the department((, and it
shall be its duty to)). The department shall investigate the
application, and determine what water, if any, is available for appropriation,
and find and determine to what beneficial use or uses it can be applied.

(2)
If it is proposed to appropriate water for irrigation purposes, the department
shall investigate, determine, and find what lands are capable of
irrigation by means of water found available for appropriation. If it is
proposed to appropriate water for the purpose of power development, the
department shall investigate, determine, and find whether the proposed
development is likely to prove detrimental to the public interest, having in
mind the highest feasible use of the waters belonging to the public.

(3)
If the application does not contain, and the applicant does not promptly
furnish sufficient information on which to base such findings, the department
may issue a preliminary permit, for a period of not to exceed three years,
requiring the applicant to make such surveys, investigations, studies, and
progress reports, as in the opinion of the department may be necessary. If the
applicant fails to comply with the conditions of the preliminary permit, it and
the application or applications on which it is based shall be automatically
canceled and the applicant so notified. If the holder of a preliminary permit
shall, before its expiration, file with the department a verified report of
expenditures made and work done under the preliminary permit, which, in the
opinion of the department, establishes the good faith, intent and ability of
the applicant to carry on the proposed development, the preliminary permit may,
with the approval of the ((governor)) director, be extended, but
not to exceed a maximum period of five years from the date of the issuance of
the preliminary permit.

(4)
The department shall make and file as part of the record in the matter, written
findings of fact concerning all things investigated, and if it shall find that
there is water available for appropriation for a beneficial use, and the
appropriation thereof as proposed in the application will not impair existing
rights or be detrimental to the public welfare, it shall issue a permit stating
the amount of water to which the applicant shall be entitled and the beneficial
use or uses to which it may be applied((: PROVIDED, That where)).
If the water applied for is to be used for irrigation purposes, it shall
become appurtenant only to such land as may be reclaimed thereby to the full
extent of the soil for agricultural purposes. But where there is no
unappropriated water in the proposed source of supply, or where the proposed
use conflicts with existing rights, or threatens to prove detrimental to the
public interest, having due regard to the highest feasible development of the
use of the waters belonging to the public, it shall be the duty of the
department to reject such application and to refuse to issue the permit asked
for. The department may also reject the application and refuse to issue the
permit if reliance on an alternative source of water, including, but not
limited to, water that could be acquired through a change or transfer of an
existing water right or use of a feasible source of reclaimed water, would
better serve the public interest. If the permit is refused because of
conflict with existing rights and such applicant shall acquire the same
by purchase or condemnation under RCW 90.03.040, the department may thereupon
grant such permit.

(5)
Any application may be approved for a less amount of water than that applied
for, if there exists substantial reason therefor, and in any event shall not be
approved for more water than can be applied to beneficial use for the purposes
named in the application. In determining whether or not a permit shall issue
upon any application, it shall be the duty of the department to investigate all
facts relevant and material to the application. After the department approves
said application in whole or in part and before any permit shall be issued
thereon to the applicant, such applicant shall pay the fee provided in RCW
90.03.470((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event)). If a permit
is issued by the department upon any application, it shall be its duty to
notify the director of fish and wildlife of such issuance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. A
new section is added to chapter 43.83B RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature to provide moneys to the department of
ecology for grants and loans to public bodies engaged in irrigation water
supply for the purpose of improved drought preparedness. As used in this
chapter, "drought preparedness" means the implementation of
agricultural water supply conservation projects that:

(a)
Are identified in approved water conservation plans;

(b)
Mitigate the effects of future droughts on existing water uses in drought-prone
areas;

(c)
Result in conveying trust water rights to the state for instream flows;

(d)
Produce increases in instream flows; and

(e)
Are located in predominantly agricultural areas that have threatened or
endangered species listed or proposed for listing under the federal endangered
species act or that have salmonid stocks listed as critical or depressed under
the state salmon and steelhead stock inventory.

(2)
The department of ecology is authorized to make loans or grants, or
combinations of loans and grants from drought preparedness funds when needed to
implement agricultural water supply conservation or efficiency projects. For
the purposes of this section, "drought preparedness funds" means
funds appropriated from the state drought preparedness account created under
section 1004 of this act. The department of ecology may make the loans or
grants, or combinations of loans and grants as matching funds in any case where
federal, local, or other funds have been made available on a matching basis.
The department may make a loan of up to ninety percent of the total eligible
project cost or combination loan and grant up to one hundred percent of the
total single project cost. The grant portion of any single project shall not
exceed twenty percent of the total project cost. No single entity shall
receive more than ten percent of the total drought preparedness funds
available.

(3)
The following eligibility criteria must be met in order for an entity to apply
for drought preparedness funds:

(a)
The entity must be organized as a public body, capable of accepting and
administering loans and grants;

(b)
The entity must have a completed, approved water conservation plan that
recommends the project or projects proposed for funding; and

(c)
The proposed project must be sited in an area that:

(i)
Has threatened or endangered fish species listed or proposed for listing under
the federal endangered species act or depressed or critical stocks under the
state salmon and steelhead stock assessment;

(ii)
Has agriculture as its economic base; and

(iii)
Is prone to drought conditions.

(4)
The proposed project must result in at least a ten percent decrease in
diversion from the applicable surface water source, and must increase the
stream flow in the same surface water source. If the entity is served mainly
by ground water, there must be at least a ten percent decrease in the
instantaneous and annual amount withdrawn. There must be an increase in
surface water sources in hydraulic continuity with the ground water source.

(5)
Recipients of loans and grants under this section may retain and use conserved
water under the following conditions:

(a)
The person proposing the change or transfer must agree in writing to convey to
the state of Washington at least one-half of the transferable net water savings
for the purpose of establishing a trust water right under chapter 90.38 or
90.42 RCW as applicable. The proportion of water that must be conveyed to the
state of Washington shall be equivalent to the ratio of the state or federal
funding to the overall project cost, but in no case less than one-half of the
net water savings. The person proposing to change or transfer and use the
remaining water on additional or different lands may do so only under an
approved change to the water right issued by the department of ecology under
RCW 90.03.380. Reallocation and use of conserved water under this section
shall not impair any existing water rights.

(b)
The department of ecology may waive the requirement to convey a trust water
right to the state only where there is no discernable public purpose to be
benefited by establishment of a trust water right for those waters. In such
case, in lieu of conveying a trust water right, the person proposing the
conservation project must remit to the state treasurer a payment equal to the
value of the proportion of the water right not conveyed to the state. The
amount of this payment shall be determined by a licensed independent real
estate appraiser selected by agreement of the department of ecology and the
applicant. The basis of the appraisal shall be the value of the proportion of
the conserved water not conveyed to the state in consideration of the economic
value of water in the immediate area where the water right is used. The cost
of the appraisal shall be shared equally by the department of ecology and the
applicant. Any funds conveyed to the state under this section shall be
deposited in the state stream flow restoration account established in section
1005 of this act for use in purchasing or leasing trust water rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. A
new section is added to chapter 70.119A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each public water system with fifteen or more service connections shall:

(a)
Implement a water conservation program promotion targeted at system customers;
and

(b)
Implement other cost-effective water conservation measures identified in
approved water conservation plans required under RCW 43.20.230.

(2)
Public water systems with one thousand or more service connections shall:

(a)
Implement a leak detection and repair program, and shall repair leaks if the
system's unaccounted for water is ten percent or more of total system water
usage;

(b)
Conduct water audits to identify internal water distribution and associated
opportunities for improved water use efficiency; and

(c)
Utilize commodity-based water rates and not declining block rate structures.
Commodity-based rate structures are based, at least in part, upon the volume of
water used. Declining block rate structures separate consumption levels into
two or more blocks, with rates per unit of water decreasing as the total volume
of consumption by a customer increases.

(3)
Public water systems that have completed a conservation plan within six years
prior to the effective date of this section in accordance with the requirements
of the department need not create a new plan, but shall address any of the
above elements that have not been previously addressed in the next scheduled
update of the water system plan and conservation plan.

Sec.
106. RCW
43.20.230 and 1993 sp.s. c 4 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Consistent
with the water resource planning process of the department of ecology, the
department of health shall:

(1)
Develop ((procedures and guidelines relating to water use efficiency, as
defined in section 4(3), chapter 348, Laws of 1989, to be included in the
development and approval of cost-efficient water system plans required under
RCW 43.20.050)) comprehensive water conservation planning requirements
for public water systems based upon system size, to be included in water system
plans and small water system management programs required under RCW 43.20.050.
Conservation plans approved under this section shall meet the water
conservation planning requirements of the department of ecology for the
purposes of water right permit processing. As part of these comprehensive
planning requirements water systems shall:

(a)
Demonstrate compliance with the conservation requirements contained in section
113 of this act;

(b)
Evaluate service meter installation;

(c)
Evaluate conservation measures and implement those that are cost-effective;

(d)
Evaluate development and implementation of a leak detection and repair program;
and

(e)
Utilize water use efficiency performance standards developed under section 113
of this act for conservation planning, water demand forecasting, and other
water system planning purposes;

(2)
Review and approve water conservation plans, and monitor plan implementation
to ensure compliance with comprehensive conservation planning requirements
under subsection (1) of this section;

(3)
Develop criteria, with input from technical experts, with the objective of
encouraging the cost-effective reuse of greywater and other water recycling
practices, consistent with protection of public health and water quality;

(((3)))
(4) Provide advice and technical assistance upon request in the
development of water use efficiency plans. This includes development of
model landscape ordinances, assistance to public water systems and local
governments regarding water conservation, and general public education on water
conservation and efficiency; ((and

(4))) (5)
Provide advice and technical assistance on request for development of model
conservation rate structures for public water systems((. Subsections (1),
(2), and (3) of this section are subject to the availability of funding));
and

(6)
Adopt rules as necessary through the state board of health to implement any
provisions of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. A
new section is added to chapter 70.119A RCW to read as follows:

Public
water systems with fifteen or more service connections shall collect monthly
water use data from all water sources used to serve the system. Water use data
collected under this section shall be submitted annually to the department in a
form and manner prescribed by the department. Data collected under this
section shall be coordinated with water use data collection requirements of the
department of ecology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. A
new section is added to chapter 58.17 RCW to read as follows:

In
determining whether a proposed short plat, short subdivision, or subdivision
meets the requirements for potable water supplies as required under RCW
58.17.060 or 58.17.110, and otherwise serves the public use and interest, the
city, town, or county shall require:

(1)
Conformance to any water conservation ordinances or plans adopted by the city,
town, or county;

(2)
Utilization of water conservation measures consistent with any regional
watershed plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW; and

(3)
Utilization of reclaimed water where potable water is not required consistent
with any local ordinance adopted on water reuse requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any city or town may adopt a water conservation program by ordinance or other
legal authority. This includes ordinances to implement the provisions of any
regional watershed plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW. Such a program may
include the following requirements:

(a)
Utilization of water conservation measures consistent with specific provisions
of regional watershed plans adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW;

(b)
Utilization of water conservation measures that may be in addition to those
required by either the department of health or the department of ecology,
including landscape irrigation requirements, public fixture retrofit and rebate
programs, and commercial and industrial conservation programs; and

(c)
Utilization of any opportunities for using reclaimed water where potable water
is not required.

(2)
The provisions of any water conservation program shall be implemented by the
city or town through development of any comprehensive plan, development
regulations, issuance of permits and other approvals, development of any
sewerage and/or water general plan under RCW 36.94.030, operation of any
sewerage or water systems under chapter 36.94 RCW, or as otherwise allowed by
law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110. A new
section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any city or town may adopt a water conservation program by ordinance or other
legal authority. This includes ordinances to implement the provisions of any
regional watershed plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW. Such a program may
include the following requirements:

(a)
Utilization of water conservation measures consistent with specific provisions
of regional watershed plans adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW;

(b)
Utilization of water conservation measures that may be in addition to those
required by either the department of health or the department of ecology,
including landscape irrigation requirements, public fixture retrofit and rebate
programs, and commercial and industrial conservation programs; and

(c)
Utilization of any opportunities for using reclaimed water where potable water
is not required.

(2)
The provisions of any water conservation program shall be implemented by the
city or town through development of any comprehensive plan, development
regulations, issuance of permits and other approvals, development of any
sewerage and/or water general plan under RCW 36.94.030, operation of any
sewerage or water systems under chapter 36.94 RCW, or as otherwise allowed by
law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111. A
new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any county may adopt a water conservation program by ordinance or other legal
authority. This includes ordinances to implement the provisions of any
regional watershed plan adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW. Such a program may
include the following requirements:

(a)
Utilization of water conservation measures consistent with specific provisions
of regional watershed plans adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW;

(b)
Utilization of water conservation measures that may be in addition to those
required by either the department of health or the department of ecology,
including landscape irrigation requirements, public fixture retrofit and rebate
programs, and commercial and industrial conservation programs; and

(c)
Utilization of any opportunities for using reclaimed water where potable water
is not required.

(2) The provisions of any water conservation program shall be
implemented by the county through development of any comprehensive plan,
development regulations, issuance of permits and other approvals, development
of any sewerage and/or water general plan under RCW 36.94.030, operation of any
sewerage or water systems under chapter 36.94 RCW, or as otherwise allowed by
law.

Sec.
112. RCW
90.48.495 and 1989 c 348 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ecology shall require sewer plans that propose an expansion of
treatment capacity to include a discussion of water conservation measures
considered or underway and their anticipated impact on public sewer service. The
plans shall evaluate the cost-effectiveness of funding water conservation
programs as an alternative to expanding sewage treatment capacity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 113. A
new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Reasonable and beneficial use" means the minimum amount of water
necessary to carry out the intended purpose of water use without waste. It may
include a reasonable amount of water lost due to normal conveyance and
application losses.

(b)
"Water duty" means that measure of water, which by careful management
and use, without waste, is reasonably required for the use or proposed use.

(2)
The department in consultation with the department of health shall adopt rules
establishing water use efficiency performance standards for various water uses
by December 31, 2000. The department shall engage in a negotiated rule-making
process involving representatives of interested parties. However, if the
participants do not reach consensus by July 1, 2000, the department shall
proceed with the adoption of rules using the advice and guidance of the
participants to the extent possible. The standards shall be based on the
quantity of water required for reasonable and beneficial use of water without
waste. The rules shall also address standards for reasonable conveyance loss
of water for various means of water conveyance. Basin management plans adopted
under this chapter or watershed plans adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW may
specify water use efficiency performance standards for the basin or watershed
that vary from and supersede those adopted by the department under this section
if Washington state government is a participant in the planning process and
agrees with the locally based standards. The department shall adopt rules
implementing locally determined standards.

(3)
The state-wide or local standards adopted under this section shall be used for
water demand forecasting, public water system planning, and assessing whether
new water rights are needed. In addition, the standards shall be used to guide
the development and evaluation of water conservation plans developed under
chapter 43.99E RCW and RCW 43.20.230.

(4)
Any person claiming a right or a need to the use of water in excess of the
standards adopted under this section carries the burden of showing that special
circumstances require a variance from the standards.

(5)
The department shall consult with the Washington State University cooperative
extension service and the United States natural resource conservation service
regarding normal water duties for irrigation water uses.

PART
II

RECLAIMED
WATER

Sec.
201. RCW
90.46.005 and 1997 c 355 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that by encouraging the use of reclaimed water while assuring
the health and safety of all Washington citizens and the protection of its
environment, the state of Washington will continue to use water in the best
interests of present and future generations.

To
facilitate the use of reclaimed water as soon as is practicable, the
legislature encourages the cooperative efforts of the public and private
sectors and the use of pilot projects to effectuate the goals of this chapter.
The legislature further directs the department of health and the department of
ecology to coordinate efforts towards developing an efficient and streamlined
process for creating and implementing processes for the use of reclaimed
water. The department of ecology is the lead agency for reclaimed water
permitting and design approval, and the department of health is to provide
public health input and assessment on all department of ecology reclaimed water
permit decisions.

It
is hereby declared that the people of the state of Washington have a primary
interest in the development of facilities to provide reclaimed water to replace
potable water in nonpotable applications, to supplement existing surface and
ground water supplies, and to assist in meeting the future water requirements
of the state. The use of reclaimed water will contribute to the restoration
and protection of instream flows, which are crucial to preservation of the
state's salmonid fishery resources.

The
legislature further finds and declares that the utilization of reclaimed water
by local communities for domestic, agricultural, industrial, recreational, and
fish and wildlife habitat creation and enhancement purposes, including wetland
enhancement, will contribute to the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the
people of the state of Washington. To the extent reclaimed water is
appropriate for beneficial uses, it should be so used to preserve potable water
for drinking purposes. Use of reclaimed water constitutes the development of
new basic water supplies needed for future generations.

The
legislature further finds and declares that the use of reclaimed water is not
inconsistent with the policy of antidegradation of state waters announced in
other state statutes, including the water pollution control act, chapter 90.48
RCW and the water resources act, chapter 90.54 RCW.

The
legislature finds that other states, including California, Florida, and
Arizona, have successfully used reclaimed water to supplement existing water
supplies without threatening existing resources or public health.

It
is the intent of the legislature that the department of ecology and the
department of health undertake the necessary steps to encourage the development
of water reclamation facilities so that reclaimed water may be made available
to help meet the growing water requirements of the state.

The
legislature further finds and declares that reclaimed water facilities are
water pollution control facilities as defined in chapter 70.146 RCW and are
eligible for financial assistance as provided in chapter 70.146 RCW. The
legislature finds that funding demonstration projects will ensure the future
use of reclaimed water. The demonstration projects in RCW 90.46.110 are varied
in nature and will provide the experience necessary to test different facets of
the standards and refine a variety of technologies so that water purveyors can
begin to use reclaimed water technology in a more cost-effective manner. This
is especially critical in smaller cities and communities where the feasibility
for such projects is great, but there are scarce resources to develop the
necessary facilities.

Sec.
202. RCW
90.46.030 and 1992 c 204 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of ((health)) ecology shall, in coordination with
the department of ((ecology)) health, adopt ((a single set of
standards, procedures, and guidelines on or before August 1, 1993)) rules
by December 31, 2000, for the industrial and commercial use of reclaimed
water.

(2)
The department of ((health)) ecology may issue a reclaimed water
permit for industrial and commercial uses of reclaimed water to the generator
of reclaimed water who may then distribute the water, subject to provisions in
the permit governing the location, rate, water quality, and purposes of use.

(3)
The department of ((health)) ecology in consultation with the
advisory committee established in RCW 90.46.050, shall develop recommendations
for a fee structure for permits issued under subsection (2) of this section.
Fees shall be established in amounts to fully recover, and not exceed, expenses
incurred by the department of health and the department of ecology in
processing permit applications and modifications, monitoring and evaluating
compliance with permits, and conducting inspections and supporting the
reasonable overhead expenses that are directly related to these activities. ((Permit
fees may not be used for research or enforcement activities. The department of
health shall not issue permits under this section until a fee structure has
been established.))

(4)
A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be issued only to a
municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity or to the holder of a
waste discharge permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW.

(5)
The authority and duties created in this section are in addition to any
authority and duties already provided in law with regard to sewage and
wastewater collection, treatment, and disposal for the protection of health and
safety of the state's waters. Nothing in this section limits the powers of the
state or any political subdivision to exercise such authority.

Sec.
203. RCW
90.46.040 and 1992 c 204 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of ecology shall, in coordination with the department of health,
adopt ((a single set of standards, procedures, and guidelines, on or before
August 1, 1993)) rules by December 31, 2000, for land applications
of reclaimed water.

(2)
A permit is required for any land application of reclaimed water. The
department of ecology may issue a reclaimed water permit under chapter 90.48
RCW to the generator of reclaimed water who may then distribute the water,
subject to provisions in the permit governing the location, rate, water
quality, and purpose of use. The department of ecology shall not issue more
than one permit for any individual land application of reclaimed water to a
single generator.

(3)
In cases where the department of ecology determines, in land applications of
reclaimed water, that a ((significant)) risk to the public health
exists, the department shall refer the application to the department of health
for review and consultation and the department of health may require fees
appropriate for review and consultation from the applicant pursuant to RCW
43.70.250.

(4)
A permit under this section for use of reclaimed water may be issued only to a
municipal, quasi-municipal, or other governmental entity or to the holder of a
waste discharge permit issued under chapter 90.48 RCW.

(5)
The authority and duties created in this section are in addition to any authority
and duties already provided in law. Nothing in this section limits the powers
of the state or any political subdivision to exercise such authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. A
new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
departments of ecology and health may adopt rules as necessary to carry out the
intent of this chapter. If rules are adopted, the rules shall identify permit
and design approval requirements under chapters 43.20, 70.116, 70.119A, 70.142,
90.03, 90.44, and 90.48 RCW applicable to the generation and distribution of
reclaimed water, and identify criteria to determine when the use of reclaimed
water is feasible to replace nonpotable water uses.

Sec.
205. RCW
90.46.120 and 1997 c 444 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
owner of a wastewater treatment facility that is reclaiming water with a permit
issued under this chapter has the exclusive right to any reclaimed water
generated by the wastewater treatment facility. Use and distribution of the
reclaimed water by the owner of the wastewater treatment facility is exempt
from the permit requirements of RCW 90.03.250 and 90.44.060.)) Revenues
derived from the reclaimed water facility shall be used only to offset the cost
of operation of the wastewater utility fund or other applicable source of
system-wide funding.

If
the proposed use or uses of reclaimed water are intended to augment or replace
potable water supplies or will create the potential for the development
of additional potable water supplies, such use or uses shall be considered in
the development of the regional water supply plan or plans addressing potable
water supply service by multiple water purveyors. This may include water
system plans and coordinated water system plans adopted under chapters 43.20
and 70.116 RCW. The owner of a wastewater treatment facility that proposes
to reclaim water shall be included as a participant in the development of such
regional water supply ((plan or)) plans and water system plans. The
water supply planning activities shall be developed and coordinated to ensure
that opportunities for reclaimed water are evaluated and that proposals for
construction in public rights of way delineated within the plan consider
infrastructure needed to distribute reclaimed water. Wastewater plans adopted
under chapter 90.48 RCW shall include a statement of certification that
reclamation and reuse elements in applicable regional water supply plans and
water system plans have been fully considered and accounted for with regard to
the need for future distribution of reclaimed water.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. A
new section is added to chapter 90.46 RCW to read as follows:

The department of ecology, in consultation with the department of
health and water purveyors, shall adopt rules by December 31, 2000,
establishing criteria to determine when the use of reclaimed water is feasible
to replace potable water supplied for nonpotable water use. Local governments
may adopt ordinances requiring the use of reclaimed water for nonpotable uses
when determined feasible.

Sec.
207. RCW
90.46.130 and 1997 c 444 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the owner of a wastewater
treatment facility that is reclaiming water with a permit issued under this
chapter has the exclusive right, subject to the terms of the permit and as
otherwise provided in this chapter, to any reclaimed water generated by the
wastewater treatment facility. Upon securing a permit under this chapter, the
use and distribution of the reclaimed water by the owner of the wastewater
treatment facility is exempt from the requirements to obtain a permit under RCW
90.03.250 and 90.44.060 and the requirements to obtain approval of a change or
amendment of a water right under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.383, 90.03.390,
90.44.100, or 90.44.105.

(2)
If the state of Washington or the United States provides funding for the
construction of reclaimed water facilities, the state shall establish a trust
water right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW for the fraction of the reclaimed
water attributable to such funding. The priority of use for the state's share
of reclaimed water is instream flow restoration and enhancement. The
department may accept an alternate water right from the reclaimed water project
owner in lieu of reclaimed project water if the alternate water right is more
advantageous for instream flow restoration.

(3)
Facilities that reclaim water under this chapter shall not impair any existing
water right ((downstream from any freshwater discharge points of such
facilities unless compensation or mitigation for such impairment is agreed to
by the holder of the affected water right)) unless the holder of the
water right is equitably compensated.

PART
III

WATER
RIGHT CHANGES AND TRANSFERS

Sec.
301. RCW
90.03.380 and 1997 c 442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The right to the use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the
state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the ((same))
water is used((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, the
right may be transferred to another or to others and become appurtenant to any
other land or place of use without loss of priority of right theretofore
established if ((such)) the change can be made without detriment
or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for beneficial
use or the purpose of use may be changed, if ((such)) the change
can be made without detriment or injury to existing rights. ((A change in
the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to
enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be
permitted if such change results in no increase in the annual consumptive
quantity of water used under the water right. For purposes of this section,
"annual consumptive quantity" means the estimated or actual annual
amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated
annual amount of return flows, averaged over the most recent five-year period
of continuous beneficial use of the water right.))

(2)
Before any transfer of ((such)) a right to use water or change of
the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be made, any
person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a written
application therefor with the department((, and the)) on a form
prescribed by the department. The application must be accompanied with the
applicable fee as provided by RCW 90.03.470. The application shall not be
granted until notice of the application is published as provided in RCW
90.03.280. ((If it shall appear that such))

(3)
The department shall make a tentative determination as to the validity and
extent of the water right proposed to be transferred or changed, including the
reasonable and beneficial use of water actually used. In its determination,
the department shall consider whether all or any portion of the asserted water
right has been lost by nonuse under common law abandonment or forfeiture under
chapter 90.14 RCW, and whether any portion of the water diverted or withdrawn
constitutes the waste of water. If the department determines that any portion
of the current or former use of water under the asserted water right proposed
for change or transfer is not a water right, or constitutes waste of water,
that portion of the right shall not be approved for change or transfer. If the
department determines that (a) the asserted water right is valid, (b) the water
right as proposed to be changed will be for beneficial use, (c) the public
interest will not be detrimentally affected by the change, and (d) the
transfer or ((such)) change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant an authorization
to make the change. Upon determining that the change has been completed and
water has been put to beneficial use in accordance with the authorization, the
department shall issue a certificate in duplicate granting the right for
such transfer or for such change of point of diversion or of use. The
certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a record with the department
and the duplicate certificate issued to the applicant ((may)) must
be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as
provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(((2)))
(4) If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights from
one irrigation district to another, the department shall, before publication of
notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such
transfer or change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to
other landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(((3)))
(5) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users of
water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval for the
change from the board of directors of the district if the use of water
continues within the irrigation district, and when water is provided by an
irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint control created under
chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received from the board of joint
control if the use of water continues within the area of jurisdiction of the
joint board and the change can be made without detriment or injury to existing
rights. The acreage irrigated within an irrigation district may not be
expanded through use of conserved water unless approval has been received from
the department in accordance with section 302 of this act.

(((4)))
(6) The department may approve an application for change that proposes to
transfer or change an inchoate water right permit or certificate held by a
public water system in accordance with section 408 of this act.

(7)
This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state
through the funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or
RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
After the effective date of this section, if a person holding a water right
established under the laws of the state of Washington conserves water or
proposes to conserve water, the person may, in accordance with RCW 90.03.380,
apply to the department for a change in purpose or place of use or point of
diversion or any combination thereof for the purpose of using conserved water
for a new purpose or in a place not originally authorized for beneficial use.
The maximum acreage allowed to be irrigated may be expanded and the place of
use and the population served by the water right may be increased beyond the
original intended place of use and purpose of use of the water right only as
provided by this section.

(2)
If the proposed change results in no increase in the annual consumptive
quantity of water used under the water right, the person proposing to make the
change may retain for new use all of the transferable conserved water. For
conservation projects in which the annual consumptive quantity of water will be
increased, the person proposing the change or transfer must agree in writing to
convey to the state of Washington the water right for at least one-half of the
transferable net water savings for the purpose of establishing a trust water
right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW as applicable. If state or federal funds
will be employed in the conservation project, the proportion of the water
savings that must be conveyed to the state of Washington shall be equivalent to
the ratio of the state or federal funding to the overall project cost, but in
no case less than one-half of the net water savings. The person proposing to
change or transfer and use the remaining water on additional or different lands
may do so only under an approved change to the water right issued by the
department under RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100.
Reallocation and use of conserved water under this section shall not impair any
existing water right.

(3)
The department may waive the requirement to convey a trust water right to the
state only where there is no discernible public purpose to be benefited by
establishment of a trust water right for those waters. In such case, in lieu
of conveying a trust water right, the person proposing the conservation project
must remit to the state treasurer a payment equal to the value of the
proportion of the water right not conveyed to the state. The amount of this
payment shall be determined by a licensed independent real estate appraiser
selected by agreement of the department and the applicant. The basis of the
appraisal shall be the value of the proportion of the conserved water not
conveyed to the state in consideration of the economic value of water in the
immediate area where the water right is used. The cost of the appraisal shall
be shared equally by the department and the applicant. Any funds conveyed to
the state under this section shall be deposited in the state stream flow
restoration account established in section 1005 of this act for use in
purchasing or leasing trust water rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to process and render decisions on applications for
change or transfer under this chapter and amendments of ground water rights
under chapter 90.44 RCW as a matter of higher priority than processing and
rendering decisions on applications for new water rights. Any application for
a new water right for which a permit decision has not been made by the
department at the time a transfer, change, or amendment is approved shall not
be considered an existing water right subject to analysis as to whether the
application may be injured, impaired, or detrimentally affected by the transfer
or change.

Sec.
304. RCW
90.42.080 and 1993 c 98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state may acquire all or portions of existing water rights, for the
purposes of this chapter, by purchase, lease, gift, financing
water conservation, reclaiming water, or as a consequence of the artificial
storage and discharge of ground water, or by other appropriate means
other than by condemnation, from any person or entity or combination of persons
or entities. Once acquired, such rights are trust water rights.

(2)
The department may enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements
with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water
rights acquired in accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest
possible extent.

(3)
Trust water rights may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent
basis.

(4)
The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 apply to transfers of water
rights under this section.

(((5)
No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by the state pursuant
to this section unless specifically appropriated for this purpose by the
legislature.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

A
person may acquire and hold a water right for a beneficial instream purpose or
purposes if the department approves a transfer or change of the water right
under RCW 90.03.380 or 90.03.390. An application for change must be filed on a
form prescribed by the department. Notice of the application shall be provided
in the same manner as any other application filed under this chapter. An
instream flow right established in this manner need not involve any diversion
of water or other physical works. An instream flow right is appurtenant to a
stream or reach of stream specified in the department's change approval. When
changed or transferred in this manner, the water right shall retain its
original priority date.

PART
IV

PUBLIC
WATER SUPPLY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

It
is in the public interest for public water systems' certificated water rights
that document a combination of water that has been put to beneficial use and
water that has not been put to beneficial use to be managed and regulated in a
manner that:

(1)
Provides for concurrent development and use of an inchoate water right permit
and the restoration of instream flows in geographic areas with salmonid stocks
listed or proposed for listing as threatened or endangered under the federal
endangered species act, or with stocks listed as critical or depressed under
the state salmon and steelhead stock inventory;

(2)
Provides for the concurrent use of an inchoate water right permit and the
retention of instream flows to provide for the preservation of wildlife, fish,
scenic, aesthetic, and navigational values and other environmental values in
geographic areas without salmonid stocks listed or proposed for listing as
threatened or endangered under the endangered species act or with stocks listed
as critical or depressed under the state salmon and steelhead stock inventory;

(3)
Provides clarity and certainty regarding the legal status of those rights for
purposes of planning for water supply, land use, watershed management, and
growth management;

(4)
Allows public water systems, through existing planning and regulatory
processes, the certainty required for public water systems to operate in a
safe, reliable, and effective manner consistent with their duties to:

(a)
Implement programs that promote the efficient management and use of water
resources;

(b)
Provide water service in a timely and reasonable manner; and

(c)
Respect and protect the ecological system affected by their water withdrawals;

(5)
Ensures the effective use of existing water supplies through water
conservation; and

(6)
Promotes the formation of satellite management agencies to facilitate regional
management of public water supplies.

Sec.
402. RCW
90.03.330 and 1987 c 109 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon a showing satisfactory to the department that any appropriation has been
perfected in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the
duty of the department to issue to the applicant a certificate stating such
facts in a form ((to be)) prescribed by ((him)) the department,
and such certificate shall ((thereupon)) be recorded with the
department. Upon the request of a public water system, the department shall
issue incremental certificates of water right, not more than once every six
years, that reflect either instantaneous or annual quantities of water, or
both, perfected by actual beneficial use. Pumping or diversion records, meter
data, or other reasonable information showing the extent of actual beneficial
use of water shall accompany the request. Any original water right
certificate issued, as provided by this chapter, shall be recorded with the
department and thereafter, at the expense of the party receiving the ((same))
certificate, be transmitted by the department ((transmitted))
to the county auditor of the county or counties where the distributing system
or any part thereof is located((, and)). The certificate shall
be recorded in the office of such county auditor, and thereafter be transmitted
to the ((owner thereof)) certificate holder.

(2)
Public water system certificates of water right that document a combination of
water that has been put to beneficial use and water that has never been put to
use, that have department of health approval for the source for which the right
is associated, and for which the entity holding the certificate has constructed
facilities in place to use the water authorized by the water right, shall be
administered in the following manner:

(a)
Any instantaneous or annual quantity of water that has been perfected by
application of water to actual beneficial use prior to the effective date of
this section shall remain a certificated right in good standing under this
section subject to issuance of a superseding certificate under section 405 of
this act. The application of water to beneficial use must be shown by pumping
or diversion records, meter data, or other reasonable information showing the
extent of actual beneficial use.

(b)
Any instantaneous or annual quantity of water not perfected by actual
beneficial use prior to the effective date of this section is reinstated as a
water right permit within the meaning of this chapter and the holder of the permit
is authorized to continue development and use of the inchoate water right. The
reinstated permit shall be administered by the department as an inchoate right
in permit status in good standing, with a priority date as of the original
application, subject to the requirements of section 407 of this act.

(3)(a)
For a public water system holding a permit reinstated by this section and
having a department of health approved number of connections, and for which the
original water right application filing was for a discrete number of
connections, water use by up to the department of health approved number of
connections as of the effective date of this section is allowed within the
existing water service area of the public water system. If the public water system
does not have an existing service area established under chapter 43.20 or
70.116 RCW, the place of use as authorized under the original certificate shall
be the place of use for water that is reinstated to permit status under this
section.

(b)
For any public water system holding permits reinstated by this section and
having a department of health approved number of equivalent residential units,
and for which the original water right application filing was made for a
discrete number of connections or a then current population and future
requirements of the municipality or community, water services shall be allowed
up to the number of equivalent residential units approved by the department of
health as of the effective date of this section for the existing service area
of the public water system as established under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW.
However, any water supply interties must also comply with RCW 90.03.383.

(c)
For any public water system holding permits reinstated by this section with an
unspecified number of connections in its department of health approved water
system plan, and the original application filing was made for then current
population and future requirements of the municipality or community, water
services shall be allowed to satisfy the existing retail service area as
established under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW, retail service area in-filling,
and existing wholesale water delivery as of the effective date of this
section. However, any interties must also comply with RCW 90.03.383.

Sec.
403. RCW
90.03.015 and 1987 c 109 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

((As
used in this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology((;)).

(2)
"Director" means the director of ecology((; and)).

(3)
"Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as an individual.

(4)
"Inchoate water right" means an incomplete appropriative right in
good standing so long as the requirements of law are being fulfilled.

(5)
"Public water system" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.119A.020.

Sec.
404. RCW
39.34.020 and 1985 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, the term "public agency" shall mean any
agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this state
including, but not limited to, municipal corporations, quasi municipal
corporations, special purpose districts, ((and)) local service districts,
and public water systems as defined in RCW 70.119A.020; any agency of the
state government; any agency of the United States; any Indian tribe recognized
as such by the federal government; and any political subdivision of another
state.

The
term "state" shall mean a state of the United States.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any public water system asserting that it holds a certificate that documents a
combination of water put to beneficial use and water not yet put to beneficial
use shall provide evidence to the department demonstrating that the criteria in
subsection (2) of this section are met such that a superseding certificate and
water rights permit should be issued. If the department, upon reviewing a
public water system plan or other applicable information, determines that the
system has an inchoate water right as provided in RCW 90.03.330, the department
shall issue a superseding certificate for the portion of the right that has
been put to beneficial use and shall issue a permit for the inchoate portion of
the water right that is reinstated to permit status. The department shall
condition permits reinstated by RCW 90.03.330 with the performance standards
created by section 407 of this act and a development schedule. The development
schedule shall be twenty years from the effective date of this section with the
option to extend the schedule if good cause is shown under RCW 90.03.320,
except that the department may:

(a)
Authorize a development schedule longer than twenty years, but not more than
fifty years, if a planned need is demonstrated, and (i) a withdrawal facility
with a hydraulic capacity beyond that needed for twenty years was constructed,
or (ii) debt service requirements extend for such a period;

(b)
Authorize a development schedule of less than twenty years if the permittee,
pursuant to reasonable diligence, can perfect inchoate water right quantities
by actual beneficial use in a shorter period of time; or

(c)
Deny any time for further development if there is no demonstrated need for the
water based on the water system plan or other applicable information.

(2)
Upon any determination of noncompliance with the performance standards created
by section 407 of this act, the permittee shall be granted, by written notice,
a reasonable period of time to effect compliance. If a public water system
receiving such a notification disagrees with the department's determination of
a reasonable time for compliance, it may, at its election, initiate nonbinding
mediation with the department to resolve the dispute. After mediation, if the
dispute is not resolved, the state shall issue the permit to effect the
performance standards. The permit is appealable to the pollution control
hearings board.

(3)
At the end of the construction schedule authorized in the permit, the permit
holder may request an extension of time only as provided in RCW 90.03.320.

Sec.
406. RCW
90.03.386 and 1991 c 350 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within service areas established pursuant to chapters 43.20 and 70.116 RCW, the
department of ecology and the department of health shall coordinate approval
procedures to ensure compliance and consistency with the approved water system
plan.

(2)
An application for change of water right may be approved to establish a common
service area for the use of existing water rights across multiple service areas
that have been established under chapters 43.20 and 70.116 RCW. The department
of ecology and the department of health shall coordinate review and approval
procedures to ensure compliance and consistency with an approved coordinated
water system plan or regional water plan for any common place of use proposal.
All water rights for public water supply within the proposed common service
area shall be evaluated as part of the proposal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 407. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any permittee with a water right permit reinstated under section 405 of this
act must meet the performance standards of this subsection. Demonstration of
compliance with performance standards shall be through existing planning
programs and processes of the department of health or ecology to the extent
practicable. All permittees shall initially document compliance with the
performance standards not less than two years and not more than eight years
from the effective date of this section to the department of ecology and then
in its water system plan update, provided a water system plan is required. Any
permittee not required to complete a water system plan shall demonstrate
compliance in a reasonable, written format. If the permittee complies with the
performance standards, it will be considered in compliance with RCW 90.03.320.
The performance standards are:

(a)
Evidence demonstrating a need for the water within the development schedule
specified by the permit consistent with demand forecasts prepared in accordance
with the demand forecasting methods specified by the departments of ecology and
health;

(b)
Evidence that the water system's use of water is fully consistent with approved
local land use planning within the constraints of water availability and cost;

(c)
Evidence that the water use meets state conservation and water use efficiency
requirements existing at the time the documentation is submitted;

(d)
Current information on how the utility's recent and proposed beneficial use of
water under such permits is consistent with state and federal laws legally
applicable to water use under the permit; and

(e)
Evidence of participation by the permittee, to the extent practicable, in
watershed planning under chapter 90.82 RCW, coordinated water system planning
under chapter 70.119 RCW, or other collaborative watershed planning efforts, if
initiated.

(2)
For the performance measures in subsection (1) of this section, the department
of health is responsible for ensuring compliance with subsection (1)(a) through
(c) of this section and the department of ecology is responsible for ensuring
compliance with subsection (1)(d) and (e) of this section when the performance
measures are identified in a water system plan. If no water system plan is
required, the department of ecology is responsible for ensuring compliance with
all performance measures.

(3)
For public water systems with a source of water that is either a surface water
source or a ground water source that is interconnected with a surface water body
that provides habitat for one or more salmonid stocks that are listed or
proposed for listing as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered
species act or with stocks listed as critical or depressed under the state
salmon and steelhead stock inventory, the public water system shall enter into
and implement an interlocal agreement with the departments of ecology and fish
and wildlife as provided by chapter 39.34 RCW.

(a)
The purpose of the interlocal agreement is to identify and make mutual commitments
to:

(i)
Take immediate actions to arrest the further decline in fish stock health and
abundance;

(ii)
Establish, protect, and restore an instream flow that is sufficient to ensure
that the instream flow contributes to the recovery and maintenance of salmonid
stocks. Any instream flows that are established in connection with an
interlocal agreement for a water resource inventory area, as defined by chapter
173-500 WAC, overlaying the same geographic areas that received a grant from
the department under chapter 90.82 RCW shall be interim until such planning for
instream flow, if applicable, is complete under chapter 90.82 RCW. Interim
instream flows established shall be conservative with regard to preserving
instream values;

(iii)
Define a strategy to restore stream flows to the established instream flow;

(iv)
Establish benchmarks or milestones that can be used to objectively measure the
success in the recovery and maintenance of the listed salmonid stocks; and

(v)
Establish provisions for an adaptive management approach to modify the
interlocal agreement to effect its goal.

(b)
If an interlocal agreement is not developed and signed by the departments of
ecology and fish and wildlife and the permittee within two years of the
effective date of this section, the permittee's use of water from the effective
date of this section under the permit shall be subject to applicable source
instream flows existing as of the effective date of this section created by
rule. If instream flows have not been established or are insufficient, an
instream flow shall be specified by the department in consultation with the
department of fish and wildlife under RCW 75.20.050 by permit proviso, and any
future instream flows adopted or amended by the department.

(c)
Within four years of the effective date of this section, and every three years
thereafter, the department in consultation with the department of fish and
wildlife, shall review the interlocal agreement and its implementation to
determine its effectiveness in contributing to the recovery and maintenance of
the listed salmonid stocks and review the actions of all parties to implement
the agreement. If the department of ecology determines by written findings
that a permittee who is party to the interlocal agreement has failed to abide
by the agreement, it shall condition the use of water under the permit, from
the effective date of this section, to applicable instream flows existing as of
the effective date of this section created by rule. If instream flows have not
been established or are insufficient, an instream flow shall be specified by
the department in consultation with the department of fish and wildlife under
RCW 75.20.050 by permit proviso, and any future instream flows adopted or
amended by the department.

(d)
If any permittee who is party to the interlocal agreement disagrees with any
determinations made by the department under this section, the permittee may, at
its election, initiate nonbinding mediation with the department to resolve a
dispute. After mediation, if the dispute is not resolved, the permittee may
appeal any findings made by the department to the pollution control hearings
board.

(4)
For any public water system permittee in an area without stocks listed as
threatened or endangered under the endangered species act and without stocks
listed as critical or depressed in the state salmon and steelhead stock
inventory, the use of inchoate permits shall be conditioned with instream flows
established under chapter 90.22 or 90.54 RCW existing as of the effective date
of this section, for the applicable source.

(5)
Nothing in this section waives any other requirement of the law related to the
use of water.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall approve an application for change that proposes to change or
transfer an inchoate water right from one public water system to another or to
expand the place of use of an existing public water system if in addition to
the requirements of RCW 90.03.380:

(1)
The proposed change will authorize the use of water consistent with a
state-approved water system plan under chapter 43.20 RCW, and any approved
comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A or 36.70 RCW, or in the absence of such
a plan, an approved plan under chapter 35.63 RCW. The department shall review
water right issues concurrently with department of health review of the
associated water system plan describing any proposed transfer of water. Any
transfer of more than two million gallons of water per day across a water
resource inventory area boundary must be consistent with an approved watershed
plan under chapter 90.82 RCW, coordinated water system plan under chapter
70.116 RCW, or a similar plan. In the absence of such a plan, the department
shall secure the approval of the counties affected by the transfer prior to
approval of the change;

(2)
The public water system has implemented water conservation measures so that its
water use meets or exceeds state performance standards. For transfers of water
by intertie, the receiving public water system's conservation performance must
be equivalent to or exceed the sending system's performance; and

(3)(a)
The use of water is subject to instream flows to protect the quality of the
natural environment as provided in RCW 90.54.020(3)(a) or 75.20.050 and a
contribution to flow restoration is made as provided under (b) of this
subsection. The department shall condition the use of water with any instream
flow proviso on the water right proposed for change or any applicable instream
flows contained in an adopted rule, unless the department, in consultation with
the department of fish and wildlife, determines that the applicable instream
flow is not sufficient. Interim instream flows shall be established that are
conservative with regard to preserving instream values. Any interim instream
flow placed as a proviso on an approved change under this section is effective
until permanent instream flows are developed under a watershed planning program
under chapter 90.82 RCW, or in the absence of such a program, by the department
of ecology under chapters 90.22 and 90.54 RCW.

(b)
In addition to the provisions of (a) of this subsection, in areas where adopted
minimum instream flows have not been met in eight of the most recent ten years,
the department shall require the applicant to provide a contribution to assist
in the restoration of aquatic ecosystems in the affected watershed or watersheds
equal to ten percent of the volume or value of the unused water to be
transferred. The contribution can be a transfer of water to the state trust
water rights program, or at the applicant's discretion a one-time monetary
contribution. For a monetary contribution, the applicant proposing the
transfer shall remit to the state treasurer a payment based on the value of the
water as determined by a licensed independent real estate appraiser selected by
agreement of the department and the applicant. The cost of the appraisal shall
be borne by the applicant. Any funds conveyed to the state under this section
shall be deposited in the state stream flow restoration account established in
section 1005 of this act for use in purchasing or leasing trust water rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 409. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to enter into agreements with satellite management
agencies to effect sound water management and public health objectives
consistent with this chapter and chapters 43.20 and 70.116 RCW. The department
shall seek expressions of the public interest in developing the agreements and
any such agreement shall not authorize any impairment of existing rights. Implementation
of the agreement must result in a net benefit to the public when public health
and environmental values are evaluated together. In developing the agreements,
the department shall consider, but is not limited to considering:

(1)
Benefits to regional water supplies;

(2)
The effect of existing and future withdrawals of ground water under RCW
90.44.050;

(3)
Appropriate mitigation or contingency plans for water use during low flow
periods;

(4)
Appropriate conservation and metering practices;

(5)
Water management responsibilities proportional to the volume of water being
moved, if any; and

(6)
Water management activities targeted at establishment, protection, and
restoration of instream flows.

Sec.
410. RCW
90.03.383 and 1991 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability
of public water systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently
utilizing the increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the
most populous areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water
supply management, and the trend toward regional planning and regional
solutions to resource issues, interconnections of public water systems through
interties provide a valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for
the citizens of the state. Public water systems have been encouraged in the
past to utilize interties to achieve public health and resource management
objectives. The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to
recognize interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, and to have
associated water rights modified by the department of ecology to reflect
current use of water through those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section. The legislature further finds it in the public interest to
develop a coordinated process to review proposals for interties commencing use
after January 1, 1991.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water between those
systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or
delivery is within established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates
specified in the systems' existing water right permits or certificates, or
contained in claims filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better management of public water supply consistent with existing rights and
obligations. Interties include interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water to serve as
primary or secondary sources of supply((, but do not include development of
new sources of supply to meet future demand)).

(b)
"Service area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a
coordinated water system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW
respectively. When a public water system does not have a designated service
area subject to the approval process of those chapters, the service area shall
be the designated place of use contained in the water right permit or
certificate, or contained in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3)
Public water systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991,
or that have received written approval from the department of health prior to
that date, shall file written notice of those interties with the department of
health and the department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated into the
public water system's five-year update of its water system plan, but shall be
filed no later than June 30, 1996. The notice shall identify the location of
the intertie; the dates of its first use; the purpose, capacity, and current
use; the intertie agreement of the parties and the service areas assigned; and
other information reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, the
department of ecology, upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this
subsection, shall, as soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions
in the water right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use
through such interties, provided that the place of use is within service area
designations established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW, or a coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
70.116 RCW, and further provided that the water used is within the
instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit
and that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing water rights have
been filed with the department of ecology prior to September 1, 1991. Where
such complaints of impairment have been received, the department of ecology
shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through
agreement of the parties or through available administrative remedies.

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or
delivery of water through interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall
be permitted when the intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances
the manageability of the systems, provides opportunities for conjunctive use,
or delays or avoids the need to develop new water sources, and otherwise meets
the requirements of this section, provided that each public water system's
water use shall not exceed the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate
specified in its water right authorization, shall not adversely affect existing
water rights, and shall not be inconsistent with state-approved plans such as
water system plans or other plans which include specific proposals for
construction of interties. Interties commencing use after January 1, 1991,
shall not be inconsistent with regional water resource plans developed pursuant
to chapter 90.54 RCW.

(5)
For public water systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW
or chapter 70.116 RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1,
1991, shall be incorporated into water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20
RCW or coordinated water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and
submitted to the department of health and the department of ecology for review
and approval as provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section.
The plan shall state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system
reliability, enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities
for conjunctive use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

(6)
The department of health shall be responsible for review and approval of
proposals for new interties. In its review the department of health shall
determine whether the intertie satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this
section, with the exception of water rights considerations, which are the
responsibility of the department of ecology, and shall determine whether the
intertie is necessary to address emergent public health or safety concerns
associated with public water supply.

(7)
If the intertie is determined by the department of health to be necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the public water system shall amend its water system plan as required
and shall file an application with the department of ecology to change its
existing water right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described in
the approved water system plan. The department of ecology shall process the
application for change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate,
except that, notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding
notice and protest periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one
time, and the comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication
of the notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department
of ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely
affected by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of health and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which its
determination will be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and in
no event shall the total review period for the department of ecology exceed one
hundred eighty days.

(8)
If the department of health determines the proposed intertie appears to meet
the requirements of subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the department of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the
department of ecology an application for change to the underlying water right
or claim as necessary to reflect the new place of use. The department of
ecology shall consider the applications pursuant to the provisions of RCW
90.03.380 and 90.44.100 as appropriate. If in its review of proposed interties
and associated water rights the department of ecology determines that
additional information is required to act on the application, the department
may request applicants to provide information necessary for its decision,
consistent with agency rules and written guidelines. Parties disagreeing with
the decision of the department of ecology on the application for change in
place of use may appeal the decision to the pollution control hearings board.

(9)
The department of health may approve plans containing intertie proposals prior
to the department of ecology's decision on the water right application for
change in place of use. However, notwithstanding such approval, construction
work on the intertie shall not begin until the department of ecology issues the
appropriate water right document to the applicant consistent with the approved
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 411. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing
in section 401, 405, or 407 through 409 of this act or RCW 90.03.330,
90.03.015, 39.34.020, 90.03.386, or 90.03.383 shall impair any existing water
right.

PART
V

GROUND
WATER EXEMPTION

Sec.
501. RCW
90.44.050 and 1987 c 109 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

((After
June 6, 1945,)) No withdrawal of public ground waters of the state
shall be begun, nor shall any well or other works for such withdrawal be
constructed, unless an application to appropriate such waters has been made to
the department and a permit has been granted ((by it as herein provided:
EXCEPT, HOWEVER, That any withdrawal of public ground waters for stock-watering
purposes, or for the watering of a lawn or of a noncommercial garden not
exceeding one-half acre in area, or for single or group domestic uses in an
amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, or for an industrial purpose
in an amount not exceeding five thousand gallons a day, is and shall be exempt
from the provisions of this section, but, to the extent that it is regularly
used beneficially, shall be entitled to a right equal to that established by a
permit issued under the provisions of this chapter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That
the department from time to time may require the person or agency making any
such small withdrawal to furnish information as to the means for and the
quantity of that withdrawal: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That at the option of the
party making withdrawals of ground waters of the state not exceeding five
thousand gallons per day, applications under this section or declarations under
RCW 90.44.090 may be filed and permits and certificates obtained in the same
manner and under the same requirements as is in this chapter provided in the
case of withdrawals in excess of five thousand gallons a day)) except as
provided in sections 502 and 503 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

Within
two years of the effective date of this section, and afterward whenever
changing water supply and water use conditions dictate, the department shall
enter into agreements with each county of the state to establish the conditions
under which various new withdrawals of ground water would be exempt from the
permit requirement of RCW 90.44.050 for those watersheds or portions of
watersheds that lie within that county's boundaries. In developing such
agreements, the department shall consult with the departments of health, fish
and wildlife, and community, trade, and economic development, and the
department shall, as quickly as is practicable, adopt the conditions
established in such agreements as rules. The agreements shall be designed to
meet both state and local objectives with respect to land and water resource
management, including, but not limited to:

(1)
Protecting and restoring salmonid stocks that are listed or proposed for
listing as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act or
listed as critical or depressed under the state salmon and steelhead stock
inventory;

(2)
Complying with, and effectively implementing, the provisions of chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(3)
Providing for public health and safety and promoting the use of satellite
management agencies to manage new public water systems;

(4)
Promoting meaningful and effective watershed planning and management;

(5)
Providing certainty about types of water uses that would be exempt from the
permit requirements of RCW 90.44.050;

(6)
Promoting cluster development to help preserve open space; and

(7)
Providing the means to address and mitigate for any environmental and natural
resources effects caused by either single or multiple withdrawals exempted from
the permit requirements of RCW 90.44.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and until that
time as an agreement or agreements under section 502 of this act have been
concluded with a particular county, but not after two years from the effective
date of this section, a withdrawal of public ground waters in a total amount
not exceeding five thousand gallons per day is allowed for one or more of the
following purposes:

(a)
Stock watering up to the carrying capacity of the land;

(b)
Irrigation of a lawn or noncommercial garden, the total area irrigated not to
exceed one-half acre;

(c)
Single or group domestic use; or

(d)
Industrial purposes.

The
purposes listed in (a) through (d) of this subsection are exempt from the
permit requirements of RCW 90.44.050, and, to the extent water is beneficially
used and in conformance with all other applicable laws, are entitled to a right
equal to that established under the provisions of this chapter. The priority
date for a right established under this section shall be the date that
continuous usage of water for one or more of the exempted purposes set forth in
this subsection is commenced. The department may require persons or entities
making withdrawals under this section to furnish information as to the means
for and the quantity of their withdrawals.

(2)
Until an agreement or agreements have been concluded under section 502 of this
act, but not after two years from the effective date of this section, for those
watersheds or portions of watersheds that lie within a county's boundaries but
outside of the areas identified in subsection (3) of this section, the county
may adopt criteria by local ordinance further restricting the use of the
exemption specified in subsection (1) of this section. Types of restrictions
that may be placed upon use of the exemption include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Limiting use to certain purposes;

(b)
Limiting the amount of water that can be used for one or more purposes and the
acreage that can be irrigated;

(c)
Limiting the total number of exempt uses or the total quantities of water that
may be withdrawn from the source, regardless of purpose; and

(d)
Limiting the term of use of the exemption to the period until water can be
provided by a public water system.

(3)
Until an agreement or agreements have been concluded under section 502 of this
act, but not after two years from the effective date of this section, for any
areas of the state containing waters in which one or more salmonid stocks are
listed or proposed for listing as threatened or endangered under the federal
endangered species act, or are listed as critical or depressed under the state
salmon and steelhead stock inventory, the use of the permit exemption specified
in RCW 90.44.050 is either prohibited, or the conditions under which the
exemption can be used modified, if, within that area, depleted stream flows
have been identified as a contributing factor in the decline of the fishery
resource by a limiting factor analysis undertaken in conjunction with the
listing, and the aquifer or aquifers that would serve as the source for new
water supplies would capture water from one or more of the surface water bodies
that is experiencing depleted stream flows. In those areas where water service
from an existing public water system or approved satellite management agency is
reasonably available, use of the exemption is prohibited. In those areas where
water service from an existing public water system or approved satellite
management agency is not reasonably available, the exemption shall be used
solely for reasonable single-family domestic purposes in an amount not to
exceed four hundred gallons per day and only until water can be provided by a
public water system.

(4)
This section expires two years from the effective date of this section.

Sec.
504. RCW
58.17.110 and 1995 c 32 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The city, town, or county legislative body shall inquire into the public use
and interest proposed to be served by the establishment of the subdivision and
dedication. ((It shall determine: (a) If appropriate provisions are made
for, but not limited to, the public health, safety, and general welfare, for
open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads, alleys, other public ways,
transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary wastes, parks and recreation,
playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds, and shall consider all other relevant
facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that assure safe walking
conditions for students who only walk to and from school; and (b) whether the
public interest will be served by the subdivision and dedication.

(2))) A
proposed subdivision and dedication shall not be approved unless the city,
town, or county legislative body determines and makes written findings
that: (a) Appropriate provisions are made for the public health, safety, and
general welfare and for such open spaces, drainage ways, streets or roads,
alleys, other public ways, transit stops, potable water supplies, sanitary
wastes, parks and recreation, playgrounds, schools and schoolgrounds and all
other relevant facts, including sidewalks and other planning features that
assure safe walking conditions for students who only walk to and from school;
and (b) the public use and interest will be served by the platting of such
subdivision and dedication.

(2)
In making its determination and written findings that appropriate provisions
have been made for potable water supplies, the city, town, or county
legislative body shall promote the reliable and efficient delivery of safe and
adequate water supply by ensuring that:

(a)
The number of new public water supply systems established is minimized;

(b)
The use of new wells for potable water supply shall, until such time as an
agreement or agreements have been concluded under section 502 of this act, be
in conformance with the provisions of section 503 of this act; and

(c)
If a proposed subdivision is within the future service area of an existing
public water system, as identified in an approved coordinated water system plan
under chapter 70.116 RCW or an approved water system plan under chapter 43.20
RCW, and the system can provide safe and reliable potable water to an applicant
in a timely and reasonable manner, under guidelines developed by the department
of health, the city, town, or county shall require connection to that system.
If no existing public water system can provide service, the city, town, or
county shall only approve new public water systems in conformance with RCW
70.119A.060(2).

(3)
If ((it)) the city, town, or county legislative body finds that
the proposed subdivision and dedication make ((such)) appropriate
provisions as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section and
that the public use and interest will be served, then the legislative body
shall approve the proposed subdivision and dedication. Dedication of land to
any public body, provision of public improvements to serve the subdivision,
and/or impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 may be
required as a condition of subdivision approval. Dedications shall be clearly
shown on the final plat. No dedication, provision of public improvements, or
impact fees imposed under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 shall be allowed that
constitutes an unconstitutional taking of private property. The legislative
body shall not as a condition to the approval of any subdivision require a
release from damages to be procured from other property owners.

(((3)))
(4) If the preliminary plat includes a dedication of a public park with
an area of less than two acres and the donor has designated that the park be
named in honor of a deceased individual of good character, the city, town, or
county legislative body must adopt the designated name.

Sec.
505. RCW
19.27.097 and 1995 c 399 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each applicant for a building permit of a building necessitating potable water
shall provide evidence of an adequate water supply for the intended use of the
building. Evidence may be in the form of a water right permit from the
department of ecology, a letter from an approved public water ((purveyor))
system stating the ability to provide water, or another form sufficient
to verify the existence of an adequate water supply. ((In addition to other
authorities, the county or city may impose conditions on building permits
requiring connection to an existing public water system where the existing
system is willing and able to provide safe and reliable potable water to the
applicant with reasonable economy and efficiency.)) When an existing
public water system can provide safe and reliable water to an applicant, the
county or city shall require connection to that system. An application for
a water right shall not be sufficient proof of an adequate water supply.

(2)
Within counties not required or not choosing to plan pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040, the county and the state may mutually determine those areas in the
county in which the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not
apply. The departments of health and ecology shall coordinate on the
implementation of this section. Should the county and the state fail to mutually
determine those areas to be designated pursuant to this subsection, the county
may petition the department of community, trade, and economic development to
mediate or, if necessary, make the determination.

(3)
A county, city, or town shall require an applicant for a building permit to
utilize water conservation measures consistent with local ordinances, including
ordinances established in accordance with regional watershed plans adopted
under chapter 90.82 RCW. The conservation measures may be in addition to those
required by either the department of health or the department of ecology.

(4)
Buildings that do not need potable water facilities are exempt from the
provisions of this section. The department of ecology, after consultation with
local governments, may adopt rules to implement this section, which may
recognize differences between high-growth and low-growth counties.

PART
VI

CAPTURE OF
SURFACE WATER BY WELLS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. The
legislature finds that Washington's watersheds are unique and vary considerably
in structure and complexity. Watershed-specific information is required to
address water use, planning, and management in each watershed. In many basins
the connection between ground water and surface water makes further development
of the ground water resource problematic because of the risk of impairment to
existing water rights, including established instream flows. A technical
advisory committee convened by the department of ecology determined that, in
most watersheds in the state, withdrawals of ground water will, to some extent,
capture stream flow, meaning that the withdrawal or withdrawals will draw water
directly from the stream or will intercept and reduce the amount of ground
water discharge to the stream, or both. The committee also developed a
framework for using the best available science and information to select a
technical method appropriate to assess the relationship between surface and
ground water for a given area. These methods can then be used to determine the
effects proposed ground water withdrawals could have on existing rights,
including established instream flows.

The
legislature also finds that significant opportunities exist to further develop
the ground water resources of the state provided that appropriate actions are
taken to mitigate for any possible impairment caused by new ground water
withdrawals on those existing water rights. Because most new applications for
ground water rights involve withdrawals that could capture surface water, the
issuance of new ground water permits is often dependent upon an applicant
offsetting or mitigating the effects of those proposed withdrawals on surface
water sources. Thus there is a strong need to understand the types of
mitigation measures that would effectively offset the effects caused by
proposed withdrawals if new ground water permits are to be issued.

The
legislature further finds that the mitigation efforts should be undertaken in a
manner consistent with a set of principles that promote general watershed
health and the preservation and enhancement of the fishery resource,
particularly in those parts of the state that contain waters in which one or
more salmonid stocks are listed or proposed for listing as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act or listed as critical or
depressed under the state salmon and steelhead stock inventory. The purpose of
chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act) is, in part, to establish that
set of principles under which proposals to mitigate for the effects of new
ground water withdrawals can be evaluated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. The
department of ecology shall convene a group consisting of representatives from
major stakeholder groups concerned with water resources management as well as
scientists recognized for their expertise in the fields of hydrology,
hydrogeology, fish biology, stream ecology, and stream restoration to review,
assess, and recommend methods for mitigating the effects caused by proposed
ground water withdrawals. The group shall consider all types of mitigation measures.
The department of ecology shall adopt rules to implement the findings of the
group and shall report on the group's progress, findings, and any
recommendations for possible legislative action to the legislature by December
31, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the department determines that an application for a water right, transfer,
or change filed under RCW 90.03.260 or 90.03.380 could impair existing rights,
including instream flows, the department shall apply the following principles
to evaluate any mitigation proposal included as part of the application:

(a)
Preference shall be given to proposals that would replace the impaired quantity
with a like amount of water, both in quantity and quality;

(b)
Preference shall be given to proposals that would require a minimum of ongoing
maintenance in order to be effective;

(c)
Preference shall be given to proposals that would provide benefits for the
entire watershed;

(d)
Preference shall be given to coordinated mitigation proposals submitted in
conjunction with a group of applications when those proposals would result in
more effective mitigation, provide greater benefits to the water resource, and
promote better overall watershed health. Submission of joint mitigation
proposals shall not alter the priority dates of the respective applications.

(2)
All proposals to mitigate potential impairments that would be created by a
proposed diversion or withdrawal of water shall include a program to monitor
the effectiveness of the mitigation measure.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall, when evaluating an application for a water right or an
amendment filed under RCW 90.44.050 or 90.44.100 that it determines could
impair existing rights, including instream flows, apply the principles outlined
in section 603 of this act.

The
department shall condition the use of water with any instream flow proviso on
the water right proposed for change or any applicable instream flows contained
in an adopted rule, unless the department, in consultation with the department
of fish and wildlife, determines that the applicable instream flow is not
sufficient using the best information available at the time the decision is
made. In the absence of established instream flows, or if existing instream
flows are determined by the department to be insufficient, the department
shall, in consultation with the department of fish and wildlife, determine
interim instream flows for conditioning the unused water to be transferred or
changed. Interim instream flows shall be established that are conservative
with regard to preserving instream values. Any interim instream flow placed as
a proviso on an approved change under this section shall be effective until
permanent instream flows are developed pursuant to a watershed planning program
under chapter 90.82 RCW, or in the absence of such program, by the department
of ecology under chapters 90.22 and 90.54 RCW.

Sec.
605. RCW
90.03.255 and 1997 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall, when evaluating an application for a water right, transfer, or
change filed pursuant to RCW ((90.03.250)) 90.03.260 or 90.03.380
that includes provision for any water impoundment or other resource management
technique, take into consideration the benefits and costs, including
environmental effects, of any water impoundment or other resource management
technique that is included as a component of the application. The department's
consideration shall extend to any increased water supply, or mitigation for
any impairment to existing rights, that results from the impoundment or
other resource management technique, including but not limited to any recharge
of ground water that may occur, as a means of making water available or
otherwise offsetting the impact of the diversion of surface water proposed in
the application for the water right, transfer, or change. Provision for an
impoundment or other resource management technique in an application shall be
made solely at the discretion of the applicant and shall not otherwise be made
by the department as a condition for approving an application that does not
include such provision.

This
section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of any riparian owner,
or any existing water right acquired by appropriation or otherwise.

Sec.
606. RCW 90.44.055
and 1997 c 360 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall, when evaluating an application for a water right or an
amendment filed pursuant to RCW 90.44.050 or 90.44.100 that includes provision
for any water impoundment or other resource management technique, take into
consideration the benefits and costs, including environmental effects, of any
water impoundment or other resource management technique that is included as a
component of the application. The department's consideration shall extend to
any increased water supply, or mitigation for any impairment to existing
rights, that results from the impoundment or other resource management
technique, including but not limited to any recharge of ground water that may
occur, as a means of making water available or otherwise offsetting the impact
of the withdrawal of ground water proposed in the application for the water
right or amendment in the same water resource inventory area. Provision for an
impoundment or other resource management technique in an application shall be
made solely at the discretion of the applicant and shall not be made by the
department as a condition for approving an application that does not include
such provision.

This
section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of any riparian owner,
or any existing water right acquired by appropriation or otherwise.

PART
VII

ENFORCEMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701. A
new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW to read as follows:

By
agreement under this chapter, the director of the department of ecology and the
director of the department of fish and wildlife are each authorized to delegate
and accept law enforcement powers or functions to or from the other department.

Sec.
702. RCW
75.20.106 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
department may levy civil penalties of up to one hundred dollars per day for
violation of any provisions of RCW 75.20.100 or 75.20.103. The penalty
provided shall be imposed by notice in writing, either by certified mail or
personal service to the person incurring the penalty, from the director or the
director's designee describing the violation. Any person incurring any penalty
under this chapter may appeal the same under chapter 34.05 RCW to the
director. Appeals shall be filed within thirty days of receipt of notice
imposing any penalty. The penalty imposed shall become due and payable thirty
days after receipt of a notice imposing the penalty unless an appeal is filed.
Whenever an appeal of any penalty incurred under this chapter is filed, the
penalty shall become due and payable only upon completion of all review
proceedings and the issuance of a final order confirming the penalty in whole
or in part.

If
the amount of any penalty is not paid within thirty days after it becomes due
and payable the attorney general, upon the request of the director shall bring
an action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston
county or of any county in which such violator may do business, to recover such
penalty. In all such actions the procedure and rules of evidence shall be the
same as an ordinary civil action. All penalties recovered under this section
shall be paid into the state's general fund.))

(1)
If any person or government agency fails to follow the requirements of
obtaining hydraulic project approval under this chapter or fails to carry out
any of the requirements or conditions of a hydraulic project approval issued
under this chapter, the department may issue an order to that person or
government agency. The order may require the person or government agency to
stop work on any or all of the activities subject to the hydraulic project
approval, to correct or to restore the nonconforming site, or to both stop work
and to correct or to restore the nonconforming site. Within twenty days of
service of such an order or as provided by rule of the department extending
such time, the person may file a written petition with the department appealing
the order, and this petition shall be treated as an application for an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW. In the event of an appeal, a
person or government agency may seek interim relief from an order under this
section as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2)
The department may adopt rules to designate that certain violations of the
terms or conditions of hydraulic project approval are an infraction to be
punished as provided by RCW 77.15.160. Any punishment under chapter 77.15 RCW
shall be supplemental to the remedy provided by subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
703. RCW
77.15.300 and 1998 c 190 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities if
the person:

(a)
Constructs any form of hydraulic project or performs other work on a
hydraulic project and((:

(a))) fails
to have a hydraulic project approval required under chapter 75.20 RCW for such
construction or work; ((or))

(b)
Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic project approval for
such construction or work;

(c)
Violates any stop work or other order issued pursuant to RCW 75.20.106 when
that order has been either served on the person or posted at the site of the
violation, except when the person acts in accordance with any relief under
chapter 34.05 RCW pursuant to a timely appeal or timely relief from the
department order; or

(d)
Violates any rule governing small scale mining adopted under RCW 75.20.330,
except when such a rule violation has been designated as an infraction by rule
of the department.

(2)
Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever
there are terms or conditions of the permit that are required to be completed
after occupancy or use commences, or carried out as an ongoing part of
occupancy or use, the local government may require the posting of a bond or
other demonstration of financial responsibility as a condition of approval with
regard to compliance with any one or all terms and conditions of approval. A local
government may include compliance reporting requirements in any permit
authorizing development under this chapter. Submittal of a report that makes
false claims regarding the compliance of the project with permit requirements
may be considered grounds for revocation of the permit and may be considered a
separate violation of chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec.
705. RCW
90.03.600 and 1995 c 403 s 635 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of this section, the "unauthorized use of water"
means the use, storage, diversion, or withdrawal of any water prior to the
issuance of a permit when one is required; the use of water in a manner beyond
the legal entitlement of the water right claimant or holder of a water appropriation
permit or certificate; or the willful waste of water.

(2)
Except as provided in RCW 43.05.060 through 43.05.080 and 43.05.150, the power
is granted to the department ((of ecology)) to levy civil penalties ((of
up to one hundred dollars per day)) for violation of any of the provisions
of this chapter and chapters 43.83B, 90.22, ((and)) 90.44, 90.54, and
90.66 RCW, and rules, permits, and similar documents and regulatory orders
of the department of ecology adopted or issued pursuant to such chapters. Each
and every violation is a separate and distinct offense, and in case of a
continuing violation, every day's continuance shall be deemed to be a separate
and distinct violation. Every act of commission or omission that results in,
aids, or abets in the violation shall be considered a violation under the
provisions of this section and subject to the penalty as provided for in this
section.

(3)
There are three categories of violations:

(a)
A minor violation is a violation that does not seriously threaten public
health, safety, and the environment. Minor violations include, but are not
limited to, paperwork violations such as failure to provide metering records or
other required water use records upon request.

(b)
A serious violation is a violation that poses a critical or serious threat to
public health, safety, and the environment. Serious violations include, but
are not limited to, unauthorized use of water, construction of any controlling
works, ditch, canal, or well prior to obtaining a required water right permit,
failure to comply with the instream flow or other provision of a permit or
certificate, waste of water, failure to install a metering or measuring device
as required, failure to comply with a previously issued order, or repeated
minor violations.

(c)
A major violation is the continued unauthorized use of water after prior
written notice from the department to cease.

(4)
The penalty for a minor violation is not less than one hundred dollars and not more
than one thousand dollars per day. The penalty for a serious violation is not
less than one thousand dollars and not more than ten thousand dollars per day.
The penalty for a major violation is not less than ten thousand dollars and not
more than twenty-five thousand dollars per day.

(5)
In determining the appropriate penalty under subsection (3) of this section,
the department shall consider whether the person:

(a)
Has demonstrated a general disregard for public health and safety through the
number and magnitude of the violations;

(b)
Has demonstrated a disregard for the water resource laws, rules, or permits in
repeated or continuous violations; or

(c)
Knew or reasonably should have known of circumstances that resulted in the
violation.

(6)
Penalties provided for in this section shall be imposed under RCW 43.21B.300.
The procedures of RCW 90.48.144 shall be applicable to all phases of the
levying of a penalty as well as review and appeal of the same.

(7)
Moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in the stream flow
restoration account created in section 1005 of this act.

Sec.
706. RCW
43.21B.300 and 1993 c 387 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431, 70.105.080,
70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330 shall be
imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt
requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the penalty from the
department, the administrator of the ((office of marine safety)) integrated
oil spill prevention and response program, or the local air authority,
describing the violation with reasonable particularity. Within fifteen days
after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in
writing to the department, the administrator, or the authority for the
remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the
department, the administrator, or authority may remit or mitigate the penalty
upon whatever terms the department, the administrator, or the authority in its
discretion deems proper. The department or the authority may ascertain the
facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and under such
rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a
demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of
information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.

(2)
Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the pollution control
hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the appeal is filed with the
hearings board and served on the department, the administrator, or authority
thirty days after receipt by the person penalized of the notice imposing the
penalty or thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition of the
application for relief from penalty.

(3)
A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:

(a)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;

(b)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on application for
relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or

(c)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the hearings board if
the penalty is appealed.

(4)
If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department or the administrator
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon
request of the department or the administrator, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county, or of
any county in which the violator does business, to recover the penalty. If the
amount of the penalty is not paid to the authority within thirty days after it
becomes due and payable, the authority may bring an action to recover the
penalty in the superior court of the county of the authority's main office or
of any county in which the violator does business. In these actions, the
procedures and rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil
action.

(5)
All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to
the general fund except those penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155,
which shall be credited to the reclamation account as provided in RCW
18.104.155(7), RCW 70.94.431, the disposition of which shall be governed by
that provision, RCW 70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste
control and elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, ((and)) RCW
90.56.330, which shall be credited to the coastal protection fund created by
RCW 90.48.390, and RCW 90.03.600, which shall be credited to the stream flow
restoration account, created by section 1005 of this act.

Sec.
707. RCW
90.08.040 and 1977 c 22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
water rights of a stream or ground water source have been adjudicated a
stream patrolman shall be appointed by the director of the department of
ecology (1) upon application of water users having adjudicated water
rights in each particular water resource making a reasonable showing of the
necessity therefor((, which application shall have been approved by the
district water master if one has been appointed,)); or (2) upon
determination by the department at such time, for such ((stream)) water
source, and for such periods of service as local conditions may indicate to
be necessary to provide the most practical supervision and to secure to water
users and owners the best protection in their rights. Subject to the
approval of the legislative body of the affected county or counties, the
department may appoint a stream patrolman for any area, regardless of whether
it has been adjudicated, if required to assure proper supervision and
protection of water rights, enforcement of minimum or base flows or other rules
or regulations, or in response to a general decline in ground water levels.

The
stream patrolman shall have the same powers as a water master appointed under
RCW 90.03.060, but ((his)) the patrolman's district shall be
confined to the regulation of waters of a designated ((stream or streams))
source or sources. ((Such)) The patrolman shall be under
the supervision of the director or ((his)) the director's
designated representative((. He)) and shall also enforce such
special rules and regulations as the director may prescribe from time to time.

Sec.
708. RCW
90.08.060 and 1977 c 22 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
salary of the stream patrolman shall be borne by the water users receiving the
benefits and shall be paid to the county or counties in the following manner:

The county or counties ((may)) shall assess each
water user for ((his)) the users' proportionate share of the
total stream patrolman expense in the same ratio that the amount of water
diverted or withdrawn by ((him)) the user bears to the
total amount diverted or withdrawn from the ((stream)) water
source during each season, on an annual basis, to recover all such county
expenses. The stream patrolman shall keep an accurate record of the amount of
water diverted by each water user coming under ((his)) the
patrolman's supervision. On the first of each month the stream patrolman
shall present ((his)) the record of water diversion and
withdrawal to the county or counties for the preceding month. Where the
water users are organized into an irrigation district or water users'
association, such organization may enter into an agreement with the county or
counties for direct payment to the stream patrolman in order to minimize
administrative costs.

Sec.
709. RCW
90.03.070 and 1987 c 109 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of the water master, acting under the direction of the
department, to divide in whole or in part, the water supply of ((his)) the
water master's designated district among the several water conduits and
reservoirs using ((said)) the supply, according to the right and
priority of each, respectively. ((He)) The water master shall
divide, regulate, and control the use of water within ((his)) the
district by such regulation of headgates, conduits, and reservoirs as
shall be necessary to prevent the use of water in excess of the amount to which
the owner of the right is lawfully entitled. The regulation shall be
carried out in accordance with section 710 of this act. The water master shall
also enforce instream flow levels established by rule and instream flow
conditions imposed on water right permits and certificates. Whenever, in
the pursuance of his or her duties, the water master regulates a
headgate of a water conduit or the controlling works of a reservoir, he or
she shall attach to such headgate or controlling works a written notice,
properly dated and signed, stating that such headgate or controlling works has
been properly regulated and is wholly under his or her control and such
notice shall be a legal notice to all parties. In addition to dividing the
available waters and supervising the stream patrolmen in ((his)) the
district, ((he)) the water master shall enforce such rules and
regulations as the department shall from time to time prescribe.

The
county or counties in which water master districts are created shall deputize
the water masters appointed hereunder, and may without charge provide to each
water master suitable office space, supplies, equipment and clerical assistance
as are necessary to the water master in the performance of his or her
duties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 710. A
new section is added to chapter 43.27A RCW to read as follows:

The
purpose of this section is to set forth the powers of the department to
regulate the withdrawal or diversion of public waters and water or water rights
related thereto, including regulation based on dates of priority or other
pertinent factors. Regulatory actions taken under this section shall be based
on examination and determination by the department or the court, as applicable,
of the various water rights involved according to the department's records and
other records and pertinent facts. The powers set forth in this section may be
exercised whether or not a general adjudication relating to the water rights
involved has been conducted.

(1)
In a regulatory situation (a) where a water right or all water rights proposed
for regulation by the department, as well as any right or rights of a senior
priority that the proposed regulation is designed to protect, is or are
embodied in a certificate or certificates issued under RCW 90.03.240,
90.03.330, 90.38.040, 90.42.040, or 90.44.060 or a permit or permits issued
under RCW 90.03.290 or 90.44.060; (b) where a flow or level has been
established by rule under chapter 90.22 or 90.54 RCW; or (c) where it appears
to the department that public waters are being withdrawn without any right or
other appropriate authority whatsoever, the department in its discretion is
authorized to regulate the right or rights under either RCW 43.27A.190 or
subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
In a regulatory situation where one or more of the water rights proposed for
regulation by the department, as well as any right or rights of a senior
priority that the proposed regulation is designed to protect, is not or are not
embodied in a permit or certificate as described in subsection (1) of this
section, the department, in its sole and exclusive power to regulate, is
authorized to bring an appropriate action at law or in equity, including
seeking injunctive relief, as it may deem necessary. Where actions are brought
in a state court, the actions shall be initiated in the superior court of the
county where the point or points of diversion of the water right or rights
proposed for regulation are located. If the points of diversion are located in
more than one county, the department may bring the action in a county where a
point of diversion is located. Notwithstanding the general adjudication
procedures in RCW 90.03.110 through 90.03.245 and 90.44.220, the superior court
shall make findings and a determination of the validity and priority of the
water rights held by the parties to resolve the regulatory situation. The
superior court shall issue any necessary orders to implement its findings and
determination, including injunctive relief, that it determines is necessary to
regulate among the water rights.

(3)
Nothing in this section authorizes the department or the superior court to
accomplish a general adjudication of water rights proceeding or the substantial
equivalent of a general adjudication of water rights. The exclusive procedure
for accomplishing a general adjudication of water rights is under RCW 90.03.110
through 90.03.245 or 90.44.220.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall amend, revise, or repeal RCW 90.14.130 or
90.14.200.

(5)
This section does not in any way modify regulatory powers previously placed
with the department except as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.

PART
VIII

LAND
USE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 801. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the elements required by RCW 36.70A.070, a county or city may
include in its comprehensive plan an economic development element that:

(1)
Promotes economic opportunity for all citizens of the county or city,
especially for unemployed and disadvantaged persons and, within the capacities
of the natural resources and consistent with other requirements of this
chapter, encourages appropriate types of growth in areas of the city or county
experiencing insufficient economic growth;

(2)
Is within the capacities of the county's or city's natural resources, as
determined in the land use element, including recognition of the special
treatment of shorelines of the state and water-dependent uses, and its public
facilities and public services, as determined in its capital facilities and
utilities elements;

(3)
Promotes the processing of permits in a timely and fair manner;

(4)
To the extent possible, is coordinated with economic development plans and
strategies of economic development councils, economic development districts,
port districts, and other public and private organizations engaged in economic
development planning;

(5)
Encourages the reuse of underutilized or abandoned property; and

(6)
Provides for monitoring and adaptation of the economic development element
based on successes and failures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the elements required by RCW 36.70A.070, a county or city may
include in its comprehensive plan an environmental element that identifies and
evaluates the environmental impacts and tradeoffs that can reasonably be
foreseen by adoption and implementation of the plan.

(2)
The environmental element shall address system and area-wide improvements and
environmental elements and cumulative impacts, including critical areas and
shorelines of the state, endangered or threatened species habitats, watersheds,
water quality, ground water movement, air quality, historic and cultural
resources, utilities, transportation, and public services.

(3)
Environmental analysis of plan alternatives shall be conducted in the draft
plan. The draft plan should present reasonable alternatives to allow
comparison of the outcomes and tradeoffs in terms of impacts on the
environment, levels of service, costs of implementation, and rates of growth.
The final plan should summarize the outcomes and tradeoffs that were made and
found acceptable in selecting the final plan.

(4)
The environmental element, at a minimum, shall address the following issues for
each other element of the plan:

(a)
Land use element. The analysis of the land use element should clearly analyze
the designations of urban growth areas and boundaries, both as to location and
size, and the tradeoffs inherent in each alternative and the impacts of the
preferred designation of urban growth areas and boundaries, as compared to
alternates considered and the impacts of the planned growth with respect to
infrastructure and capital facilities, public services, critical areas,
shorelines of the state, air quality, water quality, and monitoring of
development and density (land supply/use) to track the remaining land supply
and capacity in urban growth areas.

(b)
Housing. The analysis of this element should provide a description of the
expected impacts of projected growth on the residential densities that may be
required in existing residential areas, an analysis of the community's ability
to provide for affordable housing needs, a program of ongoing review to monitor
performance of plan implementation, and disclosure of the impacts on affordable
housing that can reasonably be expected to result from the implementation of
the other elements of the plan.

(c)
Capital facilities. The analysis of this element should address the
environmental costs of providing the established levels of services to serve
projected development and growth, the consequences of projected growth and
development on the established levels of service, capital facilities and
improvements to existing capital facilities necessary to provide adequate
public services to serve existing and projected growth and development,
coordination and relationship of the capital facilities element with functional
plans, such as storm water, flood plain management, service plans,
comprehensive water plans, shoreline master programs, watershed management
plans, options for conservation, reuse, recycling to reduce environmental and
capital costs, and methods for ongoing monitoring of allocated and available
capacity of capital facilities.

(d)
Transportation. The analysis of this element should determine whether the plan
encourages efficient multimodal transportation systems that are based on
regional priorities, coordinated with county and city plans, and whether the
jurisdiction can accommodate projected growth and development at established
levels of service. The analysis should provide: (i) An analysis of the
impacts of land use designations, population densities, and development of
existing and projected growth and development on the existing transportation
system; (ii) ten-year traffic forecasts based on land use decisions and
projected rates of growth and development; (iii) an analysis of existing
intergovernmental coordination and methods to maintain or enhance regionally
coordinated levels of service; (iv) transportation demand management strategies
and alternative transportation modes; and (v) a program to monitor actual use
against projected use and capacity.

(e)
Utilities. The analysis of this element should address the availability of
service to existing and projected growth and development at established levels
of service, the economic and environmental costs of providing services to
existing and projected growth and development at established levels of service,
conservation and other measures to reduce demand, and monitoring allocated and
available capacity of utility systems.

(f)
Shorelines of the state. The analysis of this element should determine whether
the comprehensive plan recognizes and protects the state-wide long-term
interest in shoreline management consistent with the policy and procedures of
chapter 90.58 RCW.

(g)
Rural. The analysis of the rural element should address land use designations,
including population densities and intensity of development in the rural area
and the tradeoffs made in terms of consequences to the size, location, and
density of development in urban growth areas, impacts on affordable housing,
impacts on local government's ability to provide services, including
transportation and utilities, impacts of development on viability of long-term
agricultural and forest resource lands, impacts of development on air quality,
water quality, and critical areas, and impacts of residential development on
ability to fight forest fires on lands adjacent to residences.

(5)
The environmental element may be prepared as a separate document, as a separate
element in the plan, or integrated and presented as a part of each other
element of the plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 803. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

A
county or city that prepares an environmental element as provided by section
802 of this act shall not be required to prepare the detailed statement
required by RCW 43.21C.031 on the comprehensive plan.

PART
IX

SHORELINE
MANAGEMENT

Sec.
901. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after
the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program
for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department. For
jurisdictions that are required to or choose to plan pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040, the master program shall be reviewed for compliance with the
guidelines and adopted or amended as necessary by September 1, 2002, and at
least once every five years thereafter. For all other jurisdictions, except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, the master program shall be adopted
or amended within twenty-four months after the adoption of guidelines as
provided in RCW 90.58.060.

(2)
The department may adopt a schedule for development or amending of master
programs by jurisdictions not planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 that allows
for a development or amendment period of more than twenty-four months, but not
more than sixty months. The schedule shall be adopted as a part of the
guidelines. The schedule may identify groups or classes of local government
and establish different schedules for such groups or classes. Prior to
adoption of a schedule, each local government shall be notified in writing of
the time requirements applicable to it. The department shall give full
consideration to comments made by local government on the proposed schedule
based on the criteria.

PART
X

FUNDING

Sec.
1001. RCW
43.99E.015 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 15 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of providing funds for the planning, acquisition, construction, and
improvement of water supply facilities within the state and water
conservation within those facilities, the state finance committee is
authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the
sum of sixty-five million dollars, or so much thereof as may be required, to
finance the improvements defined in this chapter and all costs incidental
thereto. These bonds shall be paid and discharged within thirty years of the
date of issuance in accordance with Article VIII, section 1 of the state
Constitution. No bonds authorized by this chapter may be offered for sale
without prior legislative appropriation of the proceeds of the bonds to be
sold.

Sec.
1002. RCW
43.99E.030 and 1996 c 320 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the term "water supply facilities" means
domestic, municipal, industrial, and agricultural (and any associated fishery,
recreational, or other beneficial use) water supply or distribution systems
including but not limited to all equipment, utilities, structures, real
property, and interests in and improvements on real property necessary for or
incidental to the acquisition, construction, installation, or use of any such
water supply or distribution system.

As
used in this chapter, the term "public body" means the state of
Washington or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, local
improvement district, or municipal or public corporation thereof; a board
of joint control; an agency of the federal government; and those Indian tribes
which may constitutionally receive grants or loans from the state of
Washington.

Sec.
1003. RCW
43.83B.300 and 1988 c 47 s 1, 1988 c 46 s 2, and 1988 c 45 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the fundamentals of water resource policy in this state
must be reviewed by the legislature to ensure that the water resources of the
state are protected and fully utilized for the greatest benefit to the people
of the state of Washington. The legislature further finds that it is necessary
to provide the department of ecology with emergency powers to authorize
withdrawals of public surface and ground waters, including dead storage within
reservoirs, on a temporary basis, and construction of facilities in relation
thereto, in order to alleviate emergency water supply conditions arising from
the drought forecast for the state of Washington during 1977 and during 1987
through 1989.

The
legislature further finds that there is a continuing water supply shortage in
many areas of the state and that there is an urgent need to assure the survival
of irrigated crops and of the state's fisheries.

The
legislature further finds that in addition to water storage facilities or other
augmentation programs, improved efficiency of water use could provide an
important new supply of water in many parts of the state with which to meet
future water needs and that improved efficiency of water use should receive
greater emphasis in the management of the state's water resources.

The
legislature further finds that it is in the interest of Washington state
citizens to be better prepared for future droughts. Investments in water
conservation and efficiency projects can result in conserved water that can be used
to alleviate drought conditions and to conserve instream flows to benefit
threatened and endangered fish species. Other benefits include improvements in
water quality, public health, recreation, and habitat.

In
order to study the fundamentals of water resource policy of the state and to
provide needed moneys for the planning, acquisition, construction, and
improvement of water supply facilities, drought preparedness, and for
other appropriate measures to assure the survival of irrigated crops and/or the
state's fisheries to alleviate emergency water supply conditions arising from
droughts occurring from time to time in the state of Washington, and to carry
out a comprehensive water use efficiency study for the state of Washington, the
state finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the
state of Washington in the sum of eighteen million dollars, or so much thereof
as may be required to finance such projects, and all costs incidental thereto.
No bonds authorized by this section and RCW 43.83B.360 through 43.83B.375 shall
be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation, and these bonds
shall be paid and discharged within thirty years of the date of issuance in
accordance with Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1004. A
new section is added to chapter 43.83B RCW to read as follows:

The
state drought preparedness account is created in the state treasury. Six
million eight hundred thousand dollars is transferred from the state emergency
water projects revolving account to establish the drought preparedness
account. Five hundred thousand dollars will remain in the state emergency
water projects revolving account for its original purpose or purposes. Moneys
in the state drought preparedness account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the state drought preparedness account may be
used only for the purposes specified in section 104 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1005. A
new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW to read as follows:

The
state stream flow restoration account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from payments made under sections 104, 302, and 408 of this act, and
penalties under RCW 43.21B.300 and 90.03.600 must be deposited into the
account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the department of
ecology to purchase or lease water rights for placement in the trust water
rights program created in this chapter and chapter 90.38 RCW. Moneys in the
stream flow restoration account may be spent only after appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1006. There
is hereby appropriated to the state and local improvements revolving account‑-water
supply facilities, established in RCW 43.99E.020, for the biennium ending June
30, 2001, the sum of forty-three million dollars from funds appropriated by the
United States to the state of Washington to be divided into two shares as
follows:

(1)
Twenty-one million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, shall be expended by the department of ecology for agricultural
water supply conservation and efficiency improvement projects. These funds
shall be provided to qualifying public bodies as grants and loans.

(2)
Twenty-one million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, shall be expended by the department of health for domestic and
municipal water supply conservation and efficiency improvement projects. These
funds shall be provided to qualifying public bodies as grants and loans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1007. A
new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW to read as follows:

Conserved
water resulting from projects funded under section 1006 of this act shall be
allocated in accordance with section 302 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1008. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---