BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The department of health shall prepare and submit a report to the legislature,
not later than December 31, 1999, on the most effective ways for parents to
control juvenile access to violent video games.

(2)
The department shall ensure that the report includes, at a minimum:

(a)
A study of the types of violence existing in video games available on the
retail and rental market or over the internet.

(b)
Recommendations for educating parents about the level of violence existing in
video games available to juveniles, including identification of types of
violent video games that may be harmful to specific age groups of juveniles;

(c)
A list of nonviolent video game alternatives for juveniles;

(d)
Recommendations on the most effective techniques for parents to allow juveniles
access to only age-appropriate video games.

(3)
In preparing the report, the department shall also include any current research
that links violent television shows, movies, and video games to acts of
aggression and violence by juveniles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department of revenue shall conduct a study of methods for collecting a user
fee on the rental and sales of unrated video games, video games rated NC-17 and
M, and video games that are even more restrictively rated. All user fees
collected shall be divided evenly, with fifty percent of the user fee being
distributed to the crime victims' compensation program and the remaining fifty
percent being distributed to the department of health for parent education
programming. The department shall investigate alternative methods of
collecting the user fee. The department shall identify and estimate the costs
of collecting the user fee by small, medium, and large retailers for each
alternative. The department shall identify and estimate the department's costs
of collecting the tax for each alternative. The department shall report its
findings to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate by
December 31, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of health shall implement and obtain, through a request for proposal
process, a definitive scientific study, in addition to and exceeding the report
mandated in section 1 of this act. The department shall ensure that the study
addresses: (1) Whether, and to what extent, violent video games encourage or
increase aggressive acts by juveniles exposed to those games, with specificity
regarding specific games and types of games, and with specificity regarding juvenile
age groups; and (2) effective methods for parental control of juvenile access
to violent video games and for abatement of aggressive juvenile behaviors
related to violent video games.

---
END ---