BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.80.023 and 1998 c 171 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
regional transportation planning organization shall have the following duties:

(1)
Prepare and periodically update a transportation strategy for the region. The
strategy shall address alternative transportation modes and transportation
demand management measures in regional corridors and shall recommend preferred
transportation policies to implement adopted growth strategies. The strategy
shall serve as a guide in preparation of the regional transportation plan.

(2)
Prepare a regional transportation plan as set forth in RCW 47.80.030 that is
consistent with county-wide planning policies if such have been adopted
pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, with county, city, and town comprehensive
plans, and state transportation plans.

(3)
Certify by December 31, 1996, that the transportation elements of comprehensive
plans adopted by counties, cities, and towns within the region reflect the
guidelines and principles developed pursuant to RCW 47.80.026, are consistent
with the adopted regional transportation plan, and, where appropriate, conform
with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.070.

(4)
Where appropriate, certify that county-wide planning policies adopted under RCW
36.70A.210 and the adopted regional transportation plan are consistent.

(5)
Develop, in cooperation with the department of transportation, operators of
public transportation services and local governments within the region, a
six-year regional transportation improvement program which proposes regionally
significant transportation projects and programs and transportation demand
management measures. The regional transportation improvement program shall be
based on the programs, projects, and transportation demand management measures
of regional significance as identified by transit agencies, cities, and
counties pursuant to RCW 35.58.2795, 35.77.010, and 36.81.121, respectively.
The program shall include a priority list of projects and programs, project
segments and programs, transportation demand management measures, and a
specific financial plan that demonstrates how the transportation improvement
program can be funded. The program shall be updated at least every two years
for the ensuing six-year period. Regional transportation planning
organizations shall provide to the legislators whose districts are within the
boundaries of the organization a schedule of six-year transportation
improvement program decision process points, updates, and amendments to the
six-year transportation improvement program.

(6)
Designate a lead planning agency to coordinate preparation of the regional
transportation plan and carry out the other responsibilities of the
organization. The lead planning agency may be a regional organization, a
component county, city, or town agency, or the appropriate Washington state
department of transportation district office.

(7)
Review level of service methodologies used by cities and counties planning
under chapter 36.70A RCW to promote a consistent regional evaluation of
transportation facilities and corridors.

(8)
Work with cities, counties, transit agencies, the department of transportation,
and others to develop level of service standards or alternative transportation
performance measures.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.80.040 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
regional transportation planning organization shall create a transportation
policy board. Transportation policy boards shall provide policy advice to the
regional transportation planning organization and shall allow representatives
of major employers within the region, the department of transportation, transit
districts, port districts, and member cities, towns, and counties within the
region to participate in policy making. Board membership must include at
least one member from each caucus of the state senate and the house of
representatives, to be appointed by the speaker of the house and president of
the senate. Additional members of the house of representatives or the state
senate whose districts are within the boundaries of the regional transportation
planning organization are considered ex officio, nonvoting policy board members
of the regional transportation planning organization.

Sec.
3. RCW
47.80.070 and 1994 c 158 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to ensure state-wide consistency in the regional transportation planning
process, the state department of transportation, in conformance with chapter
34.05 RCW, shall:

(1)
In cooperation with regional transportation planning organizations, establish
minimum standards for development of a regional transportation plan;

(2)
Facilitate coordination between regional transportation planning organizations;
and

(3) Through the regional transportation planning process, and
through state planning efforts as required by RCW 47.01.071, identify and
jointly plan ((improvements and strategies)) the most efficient
strategy to address identified deficiencies, including investments in modal
integration within those corridors important to moving people and goods on
a regional ((or)) and state-wide basis.

---
END ---