BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.79 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to appropriation, the department is authorized to acquire by purchase, lease,
condemnation, gift, devise, bequest, grant, or exchange, title to or any
interests or rights in real property adjacent to or used in association with
state intercity passenger rail service which may include, but are not limited
to, depots, platforms, parking areas, and maintenance facilities. The
department is authorized to contract with a public or private entity for the
operation, maintenance, and/or management of these facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.79 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to appropriation, the department is authorized to accept and expend or use
gifts, grants, and donations for the benefit of any depot, platform, parking
area, maintenance facility, or other associated rail facility. However, such
an expenditure shall be for the public benefit of the state's intercity
passenger rail service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 47.79 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to appropriation, the department is authorized to exercise all the powers and
perform all the duties necessary, convenient, or incidental to the planning,
designing, constructing, improving, repairing, operating, and maintaining real
property adjacent to or used in association with the state intercity passenger
rail service which may include, but are not limited to, depots, platforms,
parking areas, and maintenance facilities, even if such real property is owned
or controlled by another entity. However, any expenditure of public funds for
these purposes shall be directly related to public benefit of the state's
intercity passenger rail service. The department shall enter into a written
contract with the affected real property owners to secure the public's
investment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---