BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

Except
when directed to proceed by a flagger, police officer, or fire fighter, the
driver of a vehicle approaching an intersection controlled by a traffic control
signal that is temporarily without power on all approaches or is not displaying
any green, red, or yellow indication to the approach the vehicle is on, shall
consider the intersection to be an all-way stop. After stopping, the driver
shall yield the right of way in accordance with RCW 46.61.180(1) and 46.61.185.

---
END ---