BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.42.080 and 1985 c 376 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any sign erected or maintained contrary to the provisions of this chapter or
rules adopted ((hereunder)) under it that is designed to be
viewed from the interstate system, the primary system, or the scenic system is
a public nuisance and is in violation of the Scenic Vistas Act, and the
department((, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the county sheriff,
or the chief of police of any city or town)) shall notify the ((permittee
or, if there is no permittee,)) sign owner or the owner of the
property on which the sign is located, or both, by certified mail at his
or her last known address, that it constitutes a public nuisance by
violating the Scenic Vistas Act and must comply with ((the)) this
chapter or be removed, or the person notified is subject to a civil penalty
under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
If the ((permittee or owner, as the case may be,)) sign owner or the
owner of the property on which the sign is located fails to either
comply with ((the)) this chapter or remove any such sign within
fifteen days after being notified ((to remove the sign he is guilty of a
misdemeanor. In addition to the penalties imposed by law upon conviction, an
order may be entered compelling removal of the sign.)) in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section, the sign owner or the property owner has
maintained a public nuisance and committed a violation of the Scenic Vistas
Act. Beginning the sixteenth day after being notified to either comply with
this chapter or remove the sign, the sign owner or the property owner is
subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars for that day and for each
day thereafter, up to a maximum of thirty days, that the sign is
maintained ((constitutes a separate offense)). The department shall
impose the civil penalty by a written notice, either by certified mail with
return receipt requested or by personal service, to the sign owner or the
property owner. The notice must describe the violation, the dates of
violation, the dollar amount of penalty due, the date due, and shall order that
the sign either be made to comply with this chapter or be immediately removed.

(3)
Penalties imposed under this section become due and payable thirty days
after receipt of the notice imposing them unless an appeal is filed. Whenever
an appeal of a penalty is filed, as provided for in section 3 of this act, the
penalty becomes due and payable upon completion of all review proceedings and
upon issuance of a final decision confirming the penalty in whole or in part.
If the amount of penalty owed the department is not paid within thirty days
after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon request of the
department, shall bring an action in Thurston county in the name of the state
to recover the penalty. Civil penalties collected under this section must be
deposited into the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
If the ((permittee)) sign owner or the owner of the property upon
which ((it)) the sign is located((, as the case may be,))
is not found or refuses receipt of the notice, the department((, the chief
of the Washington state patrol, the county sheriff, or the chief of police of
any city or town)) shall post the sign and property upon which it is
located with a notice that the sign constitutes a public nuisance and must either
be made to comply with this chapter or be removed. If the sign is not brought
into compliance or removed within fifteen days after such posting, the
department((, the chief of the Washington state patrol, the county sheriff,
or the chief of police of any city or town)) shall abate the nuisance and
destroy the sign, and for that purpose may enter upon private property without
incurring liability for doing so.

(((4)))
(5) Nothing in this section may be construed to affect the provisions
contained in RCW 47.42.102 requiring the payment of compensation upon the
removal of any signs compensable under state law.

(((5)
Any sign erected or maintained on state highway right of way contrary to this
chapter or rules adopted under it is a public nuisance, and the department is
authorized to remove any such sign without notice.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A sign, except an official traffic control sign installed by a public agency,
erected or maintained on a public right of way adjacent to a state highway, a
county road, or a city or town street, and funded wholly or in part with state
funds, is considered to be litter and a public nuisance.

(2)
The department, for highways under its jurisdiction, a county, for roads under
its jurisdiction, and a city or town, for streets under its jurisdiction, may
remove any such sign without notice.

(3)
A monetary penalty may be assessed in lieu of sign removal by public agencies.
A person who installs a sign on a public right of way, as specified in
subsection (1) of this section, has committed a violation of the Scenic Vistas
Act and is subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars per day, up to a
maximum of thirty days, for each day that the sign is maintained. The agency
having jurisdiction over the public right of way where the sign is installed
may impose a civil penalty by written notice, either by certified mail with
return receipt requested, or by personal service. The notice must describe the
violation, the dollar amount of the penalty due, the date due, and order that
the sign be immediately removed.

(4)
Penalties imposed under subsection (3) of this section are due and payable
thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing them. Funds collected by a
public agency from these civil penalties must be spent in the agency's
maintenance or landscaping budget for roadway beautification purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 47.42 RCW to read as follows:

Persons
incurring a civil penalty imposed by the department may appeal the penalty to
the secretary of transportation or a designee within thirty days of receipt of
the notice of penalty. Appeals to decisions by the secretary of transportation
or a designee are contested cases under chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
47.42.090 and 1984 c 7 s 228 are each amended to read as follows:

((If
any person is convicted of a violation of this chapter, or any rule adopted
hereunder,)) The department may revoke ((any)), without
further process or liability, a permit issued ((to that person))
under this chapter to a person who has incurred a civil penalty for a
violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under it, and who fails to comply
with this chapter or remove a sign in accordance with RCW 47.42.080(2).

Sec.
5. RCW
47.42.120 and 1984 c 7 s 232 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no sign
except a sign of type 1 or 2 or those type 3 signs that advertise activities
conducted upon the properties where the signs are located, may be erected or
maintained without a permit issued by the department. Application for a permit
shall be made to the department on forms furnished by it. The forms shall
contain a statement that the owner or lessee of the land in question has
consented thereto. The application shall be accompanied by a fee ((of ten
dollars)) established by department rule to be deposited with the
state treasurer to the credit of the motor vehicle fund. Permits shall be for
the remainder of the calendar year in which they are issued, and
((shall be renewed annually upon payment of this fee for the new year
without the filing of a new application.)) accompanying fees shall
not be prorated for fractions of the year. Permits must be renewed annually
through a certification process established by department rule.
Advertising copy may be changed at any time without the payment of an
additional fee. Assignment of permits in good standing is effective only upon
receipt of written notice of assignment by the department. A permit may be
revoked after hearing if the department finds that any statement made in the
application or annual certification process was false or misleading, or
that the sign covered is not in good general condition and in a reasonable
state of repair, or is otherwise in violation of this chapter, if the false or
misleading information has not been corrected and the sign has not been brought
into compliance with this chapter or rules adopted under it within
thirty days after written notification.

Sec.
6. RCW
47.42.130 and 1984 c 7 s 233 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
permit issued by the department shall be assigned a separate identification
number, and each permittee shall fasten to each sign a weatherproof label, not
larger than ((six)) sixteen square inches, that shall be
furnished by the department and on which shall be plainly visible the permit
number. The permittee shall also place his or her name in a conspicuous
position on the front or back of each sign. The failure of a sign to have such
a label affixed to it is prima facie evidence that it is not in compliance with
the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
7. RCW
47.42.911 and 1971 ex.s. c 62 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

This ((act)) chapter may be cited as the "Scenic
Vistas Act ((of 1971))."

---
END ---