BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Lightweight
stud" means a stud intended for installation and use in a vehicle tire.
As used in this title, this means a stud that is recommended by the
manufacturer of the tire for the type and size of the tire and that:

(1)
Weighs no more than 1.5 grams if the stud conforms to Tire Stud Manufacturing
Institute (TSMI) stud size 14 or less;

(2)
Weighs no more than 2.3 grams if the stud conforms to TSMI stud size 15 or 16;
or

(3)
Weighs no more than 3.0 grams if the stud conforms to TSMI stud size 17 or
larger.

A
lightweight stud may contain any materials necessary to achieve the lighter
weight.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
January 1, 2000, a person offering to sell to a tire dealer conducting business
in the state of Washington, a metal flange or cleat intended for installation
as a stud in a vehicle tire shall certify that the studs are lightweight studs
as defined in section 1 of this act. Certification must be accomplished by
clearly marking the boxes or containers used to ship and store studs with the
designation "lightweight." This section does not apply to tires or
studs in a wholesaler's existing inventory as of January 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning July 1, 2001, a person may not sell a studded tire or
sell a stud for installation in a tire unless the stud qualifies as a
lightweight stud under section 1 of this act.

---
END ---