BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that activity by students in schools which threatens the
safety and welfare of other students and school employees is a serious problem
in our schools. School officials report that they lack the training,
expertise, and preparedness to handle situations which pose potential threats
to safety, such as violent behavior, gang-related activity, possession of
weapons, and other disruptions caused by students. They fear that their own
safety may be threatened and that they lack adequate training or authority to
handle such potentially volatile situations.

The
legislature further finds that situations which pose potential threats to the
safety of students or school employees create a special need, beyond the normal
need for law enforcement, for the involvement of law enforcement officers in
investigating and assuring against such threats to safety. Such situations
also make it impracticable for the officer to obtain a warrant before acting to
preserve school safety, due to the safety risk and the real possibility that
evidence may be destroyed or hidden. In particular, the legislature finds that
gang activity and the possession of firearms in schools create a special need
for the protection of school safety.

The
legislature declares that school officials should be free to focus on the
education of students and not on policing the student body. At the request of
school officials, it may sometimes be necessary for the criminal justice
resource officer, who has received adequate training in safety and law
enforcement, to take on the tasks of questioning or searching students,
students' lockers, or students' possessions upon reasonable, individualized
suspicion.

The
legislature notes that searches of students based on less than probable cause
in the school context have been approved of by state and federal courts. The
legislature does not here authorize random, suspicionless searches but only
those searches based upon reasonable, individualized suspicion. The
legislature recognizes that although students are not stripped of their rights
at the schoolhouse door, they do have a reduced expectation of privacy while in
attendance at school. In contrast, the state has a compelling interest in
protecting the safety of students and school employees, and in creating a
positive learning environment for all school children. In balancing the
interests, conducting a search for the purpose of ensuring school safety is not
unreasonable.

The
legislature intends to give criminal justice resource officers the authority to
intervene in potentially threatening situations where school officials already
have authority to intervene. The students in question may already be searched
by the school officials. The legislature intends to give school officials the
option to remove themselves from such potentially dangerous situations, and to
grant authority to competent, trained law enforcement officers whose primary
goal is to ensure the safety of students and employees of the school.

Nothing
in this act narrows the scope of permissible searches under state or federal
law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, a criminal justice resource officer is a general
authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020(3) who routinely
works with schools and students, and whose job objectives include improving
safety and reducing crime in schools.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.600.230 and 1989 c 271 s 246 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A school principal, vice principal, or principal's designee may search a
student, the student's possessions, and the student's locker, if the principal,
vice principal, or principal's designee has reasonable grounds to suspect that
the search will yield evidence of the student's violation of the law or school
rules.

(2)
A criminal justice resource officer may, at the request of the principal or
vice principal, search a student, the student's possessions, and the student's
locker, if the principal or vice principal has reasonable grounds to suspect
that the search will yield evidence of the student's violation of the law,
including but not limited to possession of a firearm on school grounds in
violation of RCW 9.41.280 or 28A.600.420, and involvement in gang activity on
school grounds in violation of RCW 28A.600.455.

(3)
A criminal justice resource officer may make an investigative stop of a student
if the officer has reasonable, articulable facts suggesting the student is
armed and dangerous, possesses a firearm on school grounds in violation of RCW
9.41.280 or 28A.600.420, is involved in gang activity on school grounds in
violation of RCW 28A.600.455, or otherwise poses an immediate threat to the
officer or others in the school.

(4)
Except as provided in subsection (((3))) (5) of this section, the
scope of the search is proper if the search is conducted as follows:

(a)
The methods used are reasonably related to the objectives of the search; and

(b)
Is not excessively intrusive in light of the age and sex of the student and the
nature of the suspected infraction.

(((3))) (5) A principal or vice principal or anyone
acting under their direction may not subject a student to a strip search or
body cavity search as those terms are defined in RCW 10.79.070.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.600.240 and 1990 c 33 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the provisions in RCW 28A.600.230, the school principal, vice
principal, or principal's designee may search all student lockers at any time
without prior notice and without a reasonable suspicion that the search will
yield evidence of any particular student's violation of the law or school rule.

(2)
If the school principal, vice principal, or principal's designee, as a result
of the search, develops a reasonable suspicion that a certain container or
containers in any student locker contain evidence of a student's violation of
the law or school rule, the principal, vice principal, ((or))
principal's designee, or a criminal justice resource officer may search
the container or containers according to the provisions of RCW 28A.600.230(((2)))
(4).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---