BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of any county or any city is authorized to levy and
collect a special excise tax not to exceed six and one-half percent on the sale
of materials used in the construction of new commercial or industrial
structures, or to sales or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to installing such materials in new commercial or industrial
structures.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection
of the taxes on behalf of the county or city at no cost to the county or city.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing public facilities in the county or city where it was collected.

(4)
Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section shall contain a
provision allowing a credit against the county tax for the full amount of any
city tax imposed under this section upon the same taxable event.

(5)
As used in this section, "public facilities" has the same meaning as
in RCW 36.70A.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---