BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.180.010 and 1990 c 33 s 163 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 shall be known and cited as "the ((Transitional
Bilingual Instruction)) English language proficiency act." The
legislature finds that there are large numbers of children ((who come from
homes where the primary language is other than English. The legislature finds
that a transitional bilingual education program can meet the needs of these
children)) whose primary language is other than English and whose
English language skills are such that the child will have significant
difficulties meeting the state learning goals established in RCW 28A.150.210.
Pursuant to the policy of this state to ((insure)) ensure equal
educational opportunity to every child in this state, it is the purpose of RCW
28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 to provide for the implementation of ((transitional
bilingual education)) English language proficiency programs in the
public schools, and to provide supplemental financial assistance to school
districts to meet the extra costs of these programs. It is also the intent
of the legislature to encourage the full participation and integration of these
children into the public schools as quickly as possible and to provide school
districts maximum flexibility in the selection of instructional programs to
meet individual district needs.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.180.020 and 1984 c 124 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction shall review annually the ((transitional
bilingual instruction)) English language proficiency program and
shall submit a report of such review to the legislature on or before January 1
of each year.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.180.030 and 1990 c 33 s 164 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080, unless the context thereof
indicates to the contrary:

(1)
(("Transitional bilingual instruction" means:

(a)
A system of instruction which uses two languages, one of which is English, as a
means of instruction to build upon and expand language skills to enable the
pupil to achieve competency in English. Concepts and information are
introduced in the primary language and reinforced in the second language:
PROVIDED, That the program shall include testing in the subject matter in
English; or

(b)
In those cases in which the use of two languages is not practicable as
established by the superintendent of public instruction and unless otherwise
prohibited by law, an alternative system of instruction which may include
English as a second language and is designed to enable the pupil to achieve
competency in English.

(2)))
"Primary language" means the language most often used by the student
for communication in his/her home.

(((3)))
(2) "Eligible pupil" means any enrollee of the school district
whose primary language is other than English and whose English language skills
are sufficiently deficient or absent to impair learning.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.180.040 and 1984 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
school district board of directors shall:

(1)
Make available to each eligible pupil ((transitional bilingual)) English
language proficiency instruction to achieve competency in English, in
accord with rules of the superintendent of public instruction. English
language proficiency instructional programs may include, but are not limited
to, English as a second language, bilingual instruction, accelerated learning,
and inclusion models.

(2)
Wherever feasible, ensure that communications to parents emanating from the
schools shall be appropriately bilingual for those parents of pupils in the ((bilingual))
English language proficiency instruction program.

(3)
Determine, by administration of an English test approved by the superintendent
of public instruction the number of eligible pupils enrolled in the school
district at the beginning of a school year and thereafter during the year as
necessary in individual cases. If, however, a preliminary interview indicates
little or no English speaking ability, eligibility testing shall not be
necessary.

(4)
Before the conclusion of each school year, measure each eligible pupil's
improvement in learning the English language by means of a test approved by the
superintendent of public instruction.

(5)
Provide in-service training for teachers, counselors, and other staff, who are
involved in the district's ((transitional bilingual)) English
language proficiency program. Such training shall include appropriate
instructional strategies for children of culturally different backgrounds, use
of curriculum materials, and program models.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.180.060 and 1990 c 33 s 165 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1)
Promulgate and issue program development guidelines to assist school districts
in preparing their programs;

(2)
Promulgate rules for implementation of RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The rules shall be designed to maximize the
role of school districts in selecting programs appropriate to meet the needs of
eligible students. The rules shall identify the process and criteria to be
used to determine when a student is no longer eligible for ((transitional
bilingual)) English language proficiency instruction pursuant to RCW
28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.180.080 and 1995 c 335 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction shall prepare and submit biennially to the
governor and the legislature a budget request for ((bilingual)) English
language proficiency instruction programs. Moneys appropriated by the
legislature for the purposes of RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080 shall be
allocated by the superintendent of public instruction to school districts for
the sole purpose of operating an approved ((bilingual)) English
language proficiency instruction program; priorities for funding shall
exist for the early elementary grades. No moneys shall be allocated pursuant
to this section to fund more than three school years of ((bilingual)) English
language proficiency instruction for each eligible pupil within a
district: PROVIDED, That such moneys may be allocated to fund more than three
school years of ((bilingual)) English language proficiency
instruction for any pupil who fails to demonstrate improvement in English
language skills adequate to remove impairment of learning when taught only in
English. The superintendent of public instruction shall set standards and
approve a test for the measurement of such English language skills.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.150.370 and 1995 c 335 s 102 and 1995 c 77 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

In
addition to those state funds provided to school districts for basic education,
the legislature shall appropriate funds for pupil transportation, in accordance
with this chapter, RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.210, 28A.300.035, 28A.300.170,
and 28A.500.010, and for special education programs for students with
disabilities, in accordance with RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100. The
legislature may appropriate funds to be distributed to school districts for
population factors such as urban costs, enrollment fluctuations and for special
programs, including but not limited to, vocational-technical institutes,
compensatory programs, ((bilingual education)) English language
proficiency programs, urban, rural, racial and disadvantaged programs,
programs for gifted students, and other special programs.

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.630.830 and 1996 c 288 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The selection advisory committee is created. The committee shall be composed
of up to three members from the house of representatives, up to three members
from the senate, up to two members from the office of the superintendent of
public instruction, and one member from each of the following: The office of
financial management, Washington state special education coalition, ((transitional
bilingual)) English language proficiency instruction educators, and
Washington education association.

(2)
The joint legislative audit and review committee and the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide staff for the selection advisory committee.

(3)
The selection advisory committee shall:

(a)
Develop appropriate criteria for selecting demonstration projects;

(b)
Issue requests for proposals in accordance with RCW 28A.630.820 through
28A.630.845 for demonstration projects;

(c)
Review proposals and recommend demonstration projects for approval by the
superintendent of public instruction; and

(d)
Advise the superintendent of public instruction on the evaluation design.

Sec.
9. RCW
28A.630.840 and 1995 c 77 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Funding used in demonstration projects may include state, federal, and local
funds, as determined by the district.

(2)
State special education allocations shall be calculated for districts with
demonstration projects according to the special education funding formula in
use for other districts, except for the provisions of RCW 28A.630.845 and with
the following changes:

(a)
Funding for school districts that had pilot projects approved under section 13,
chapter 233, Laws of 1989, and that were participating in projects under this
section on January 31, 1992, shall be based for the duration of a project on
four percent of the kindergarten through twelfth grade enrollment considered as
specific learning disabled, without regard to the actual number of students so
identified. The legislature recognizes the importance of continuing and
developing the pilot projects.

(b)
The funding percentages for districts with demonstration projects specified in
(a) of this subsection and in RCW 28A.630.845 shall be used to adjust basic
education allocations under RCW 28A.150.260 and learning assistance program
allocations under RCW 28A.165.070.

(c)
State special education allocations up to the level required by federal
maintenance of effort rules shall be expended for special education services to
students with disabilities. Allocations greater than the amount needed to
comply with federal maintenance of effort rules may at the option of the
district be designated as noncategorical project funds and may be expended on
services to any student served in the project.

(3)
Learning assistance program allocations shall be calculated for districts with
demonstration projects according to the funding formula in use for other
districts, except that any increases in the district allocation above the
fiscal year 1991 amount shall be designated as noncategorical project funds and
may be expended on services to any student served in the project.

(4)
((Transitional bilingual)) English language proficiency program
allocations shall be calculated for districts with demonstration projects
according to the funding formula in use for other districts, except that any
increases in the district allocation above the fiscal year 1991 amount shall be
designated as noncategorical project funds and may be expended on services to
any student served in the project.

(5)
Expenditures of noncategorical project funds under subsections (2)(c), (3), and
(4) of this section shall be accounted for in new and discrete program or
subprogram codes designated by the superintendent of public instruction. The
codes shall take effect by September 1, 1991.

Sec.
10. RCW
84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any school district for
maintenance and operation support under the provisions of RCW 84.52.053 shall
be determined as follows:

(1)
For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the maximum dollar
amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and rules in effect in November
1996.

(2)
For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, the
maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or minus (b) and (c) of this
subsection minus (d) of this subsection:

(a)
The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this section multiplied
by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined in subsection (4) of this
section;

(b)
For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school district's
maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school district's maximum
levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the estimated amount of
the nonhigh payment due to the high school district under RCW 28A.545.030(3)
and 28A.545.050 for the school year commencing the year of the levy;

(c)
For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the per
pupil basic education allocation included in the nonresident district's levy
base under subsection (3) of this section multiplied by:

(i)
The number of full-time equivalent students served from the resident district
in the prior school year; multiplied by:

(ii)
The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined under subsection (4)
of this section; increased by:

(iii)
The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as stated in the state
basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior
school year and the current school year divided by fifty-five percent;

(d)
The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the maximum amount of
state matching funds for which the district is eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.

(3)
For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, a
district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in (a) through (c) of this
subsection received by the district for the prior school year, including
allocations for compensation increases, plus the sum of such allocations multiplied
by the percent increase per full time equivalent student as stated in the state
basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior
school year and the current school year and divided by fifty-five percent. A
district's levy base shall not include local school district property tax
levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations not identified
in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(a)
The district's basic education allocation as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250,
28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;

(b)
State and federal categorical allocations for the following programs:

(i)
Pupil transportation;

(ii)
Special education;

(iii)
Education of highly capable students;

(iv)
Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning assistance,
migrant education, Indian education, refugee programs, and ((bilingual
education)) English language proficiency programs;

(v)
Food services; and

(vi)
State-wide block grant programs; and

(c)
Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary school programs,
including direct grants, other than federal impact aid funds and allocations in
lieu of taxes.

(4)
A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two percent in 1998 and
twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying
districts, the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:

(a)
For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum levy percentage
and twenty percent; and

(b)
For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:

(i)
Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times the district's
levy base determined under subsection (3) of this section;

(ii)
Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy reduction funds as
defined in subsection (5) of this section that are to be allocated to the
district for the current school year;

(iii)
Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the district's levy base;
and

(iv)
Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in (b)(iii) of this
subsection.

(5)
"Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from the
prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or
inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as
levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are
dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after the start
of the current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school year
data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not include
moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.

(6)
For the purposes of this section, "prior school year" means the most
recent school year completed prior to the year in which the levies are to be
collected.

(7)
For the purposes of this section, "current school year" means the
year immediately following the prior school year.

(8)
Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies shall not be
subject to the levy limitations in this section.

(9)
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop rules and regulations
and inform school districts of the pertinent data necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 8 and 9 of this act expire September 1, 2001.

---
END ---