BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.180.040 and 1984 c 124 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
school district board of directors shall:

(1)
Make available to each eligible pupil transitional bilingual instruction to
achieve competency in English, in accord with rules of the superintendent of
public instruction.

(2)
Wherever feasible, ensure that communications to parents emanating from the
schools shall be appropriately bilingual for those parents of pupils in the
bilingual instruction program. Before providing eligible students with
transitional bilingual education instruction, the district shall consult with
the pupil's parent or legal guardian regarding instruction services provided to
the student while in the program. The parent may decline participation by his
or her child and may remove his or her child from the program at any time if he
or she feels the program is no longer meeting the child's needs.

(3)
Determine, by administration of an English test approved by the superintendent
of public instruction the number of eligible pupils enrolled in the school
district at the beginning of a school year and thereafter during the year as
necessary in individual cases. If, however, a preliminary interview indicates
little or no English speaking ability, eligibility testing shall not be
necessary.

(4)
Before the conclusion of each school year, measure each eligible pupil's
improvement in learning the English language by means of a test approved by the
superintendent of public instruction. Results of the test shall be provided
to each eligible pupil's parent or legal guardian.

(5) Provide in-service training for teachers, counselors, and other
staff, who are involved in the district's transitional bilingual program. Such
training shall include appropriate instructional strategies for children of
culturally different backgrounds, use of curriculum materials, and program
models.

---
END ---