BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the citizens of this state are usually unaware of the
presence of criminals, and criminal activity, within their communities and
neighborhoods. As a consequence, law-abiding citizens are frequently unable to
take effective measures to protect themselves. Criminals have no right to keep
their identities hidden from the public, making law-abiding citizens
uninformed, unaware, unprotected, and vulnerable to further harm. Far too often,
criminals engage in repeat offenses within the very community where they
committed previous offenses and within the very community where they currently
reside. Because of the lack of accessibility to information regarding
criminals, and criminal activity, citizens of the state needlessly suffer the
many harmful effects of crime, including injury to their person and property,
loss of life, financial loss, increased anxiety, and loss of a sense of
well-being.

Simple
protective measures by responsible individuals will frequently thwart criminal
activity. However, a lack of pertinent knowledge effectively hinders citizens
from taking lawful, wise, crime-preventative actions. The law-abiding public
must have the basic information necessary to protect their lives, their
property, and the ability to engage in the pursuit of happiness.

The
internet is one of the most rapid and effective means of communicating
information available today. A large percentage of the population is now
online, and it appears likely that the internet will be increasingly utilized
as a means of receiving important information. The legislature therefore
concludes that it is in the best interest of the public health, safety, and
welfare that information regarding criminals and criminal activity be posted on
the internet and thereby made available to the public at large.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of corrections shall post information regarding an offender on
the internet within thirty days following his or her conviction and subsequent
custody to the department.

(2)
The posting of information on the internet applies to information regarding:
(a) Any person convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (b) any
person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board as the
result of a sex offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually violent
predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06
RCW; (d) any person adjudicated or convicted of a felony classified as a
violent offense under chapter 9.94A RCW; and (e) any person convicted of an
offense involving the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
deliver, a controlled substance under chapter 69.50 RCW.

(3)
Within the limits of subsection (2) of this section, the department shall post
the following information:

(a)
The name of the person and any aliases used by the person;

(b)
The address of the person at the time the person was arrested and the current
address of the person;

(c)
The court before which the person was tried and the name of the presiding
judge;

(d)
The offense for which the person was convicted and the sentence imposed on the
person by the trial court;

(e)
The person's age, height, weight, and other descriptive data, such as a tattoo
or other distinguishing marks;

(f)
A copy of the person's mug shots and a photograph of the person taken at the
time of sentencing or upon release;

(g)
The dates and duration that the person was or will be incarcerated, the
anticipated release date, the actual release date, indication of whether the
person served the complete sentence or was released early for any reason, and
indication of that reason; and

(h)
A list of all previous felonies for which the person has been convicted and the
disposition of each conviction.

(4)
The department shall ensure that the information required by subsections (2)
and (3) of this section is posted on the internet regardless of whether the
person to whom the information pertains has filed an appeal of the underlying
conviction or adjudication.

(5) The department shall ensure that the information required by
subsections (2) and (3) of this section remains on the internet during the
offender's incarceration within the department and for a total of thirty days
following the offender's release date from the department's supervision.

---
END ---