BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.710 and 1993 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a
regular legislative session convenes and continuing thirty days past the date
of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date a special
legislative session convenes and continuing through the date that session
adjourns, no state official or a person employed by or acting on behalf of a
state official or state legislator may solicit or accept contributions to a
public office fund, to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a
campaign debt, unless the contribution was solicited by the state official
more than thirty days before the regular legislative session.

---
END ---