BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.010 and 1997 c 328 s 2 and 1997 c 241 s 13 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for a person to operate any vehicle over and along a public
highway of this state without first having obtained and having in full force
and effect a current and proper vehicle license and display vehicle license
number plates therefor as by this chapter provided. Failure to make initial
registration before operation on the highways of this state is a misdemeanor,
and any person convicted thereof shall be punished by a fine of no less than
three hundred thirty dollars, no part of which may be suspended or deferred.
Failure to renew an expired registration before operation on the highways of
this state is a traffic infraction.

(2)
The licensing of a vehicle in another state by a resident of this state, as
defined in RCW 46.16.028, evading the payment of any tax or license fee imposed
in connection with registration, is a ((gross misdemeanor)) class C
felony punishable as follows:

(a)
For a first offense, up to ((one year in the county jail)) five years
in a state correctional institution and a fine equal to ((twice)) four
times the amount of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of which may be
suspended or deferred;

(b)
For a second or subsequent offense, up to ((one year in the county jail))
five years in a state correctional institution and a fine equal to four
times the amount of delinquent taxes and fees, no part of which may be
suspended or deferred, and the offender's driver's license will be suspended
for ninety days;

(c)
For fines levied under (a) or (b) of this subsection, an amount equal to
the avoided taxes and fees owed shall be deposited in the vehicle licensing
fraud account created in the state treasury;

(d)
((The)) For fines levied under (a) or (b) of this subsection, an
amount equal to the avoided taxes and fees owed shall be deposited
and distributed in the same manner as if the taxes and fees were properly paid
in a timely fashion;

(e)
For fines levied under (a) or (b) of this subsection, an amount equal to the
avoided taxes and fees owed will be distributed to the Washington state patrol
or the agency issuing the citation for the violation;

(f)
For fines levied under (a) or (b) of this subsection, an amount equal to the
avoided taxes and fees owed will be distributed to the court system that holds
the original trial for the offense.

(3)
These provisions shall not apply to the following vehicles:

(a)
Electric-assisted bicycles;

(b)
Farm vehicles if operated within a radius of fifteen miles of the farm where
principally used or garaged, farm tractors and farm implements including
trailers designed as cook or bunk houses used exclusively for animal herding
temporarily operating or drawn upon the public highways, and trailers used
exclusively to transport farm implements from one farm to another during the
daylight hours or at night when such equipment has lights that comply with the
law;

(c)
Spray or fertilizer applicator rigs designed and used exclusively for spraying
or fertilization in the conduct of agricultural operations and not primarily
for the purpose of transportation, and nurse rigs or equipment auxiliary to the
use of and designed or modified for the fueling, repairing, or loading of spray
and fertilizer applicator rigs and not used, designed, or modified primarily
for the purpose of transportation;

(d)
Fork lifts operated during daylight hours on public highways adjacent to and
within five hundred feet of the warehouses which they serve: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That these provisions shall not apply to vehicles used by the state parks and
recreation commission exclusively for park maintenance and operations upon
public highways within state parks;

(e)
"Special highway construction equipment" defined as follows: Any
vehicle which is designed and used primarily for grading of highways, paving of
highways, earth moving, and other construction work on highways and which is
not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property on
a public highway and which is only incidentally operated or moved over the
highway. It includes, but is not limited to, road construction and maintenance
machinery so designed and used such as portable air compressors, air drills,
asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, track laying tractors,
ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, paving mixers,
road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving scrapers and carryalls, lighting plants,
welders, pumps, power shovels and draglines, self-propelled and tractor-drawn
earth moving equipment and machinery, including dump trucks and tractor-dump
trailer combinations which either (i) are in excess of the legal width, or (ii)
which, because of their length, height, or unladen weight, may not be moved on
a public highway without the permit specified in RCW 46.44.090 and which are
not operated laden except within the boundaries of the project limits as
defined by the contract, and other similar types of construction equipment, or
(iii) which are driven or moved upon a public highway only for the purpose of
crossing such highway from one property to another, provided such movement does
not exceed five hundred feet and the vehicle is equipped with wheels or pads
which will not damage the roadway surface.

Exclusions:

"Special
highway construction equipment" does not include any of the following:

Dump
trucks originally designed to comply with the legal size and weight provisions
of this code notwithstanding any subsequent modification which would require a
permit, as specified in RCW 46.44.090, to operate such vehicles on a public
highway, including trailers, truck-mounted transit mixers, cranes and shovels,
or other vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to
which machinery has been attached.

(4)
The following vehicles, whether operated solo or in combination, are exempt
from license registration and displaying license plates as required by this
chapter:

(a)
A converter gear used to convert a semitrailer into a trailer or a two-axle truck
or tractor into a three or more axle truck or tractor or used in any other
manner to increase the number of axles of a vehicle. Converter gear includes
an auxiliary axle, booster axle, dolly, and jeep axle.

(b)
A tow dolly that is used for towing a motor vehicle behind another motor
vehicle. The front or rear wheels of the towed vehicle are secured to and rest
on the tow dolly that is attached to the towing vehicle by a tow bar.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.63.020 and 1998 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure
to perform any act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this
title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing,
stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and
may not be classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in
the following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1)
RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(2)
RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(3)
RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit‑forming drugs or
in a manner endangering the person of another;

(4)
RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(5)
Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and registration and
markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss;

(6)
RCW 46.16.010 relating to ((initial)) registration of motor vehicles;

(7)
RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(8)
RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;

(9)
RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false information in
conjunction with an application for a special placard or license plate for
disabled persons' parking;

(10)
RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(11)
RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or
instruction permit;

(12)
RCW 46.20.336 relating to the unlawful possession and use of a driver's
license;

(13)
RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or
status;

(14)
RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational
driver's license;

(15)
RCW 46.20.420 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or
revoked license;

(16)
RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition
interlock device in violation of a license notation that the device is
required;

(17)
RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device;

(18)
RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(19)
Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;

(20)
RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(21)
RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(22)
RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(23)
RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(24)
RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(25)
RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(26)
RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen, and appraisers;

(27)
((RCW 46.52.100 relating to driving under the influence of liquor or drugs;

(28))) RCW
46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished to
an insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or treatment
agency;

(((29)))
(28) RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a
registered tow truck operator without a registration certificate;

(((30)))
(29) RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck
operators;

(((31)))
(30) RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers, flagmen, or
fire fighters;

(((32)))
(31) RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or
cooperate with an officer;

(((33)))
(32) RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give identification
to an officer;

(((34)))
(33) RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;

(((35)))
(34) RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

(((36)))
(35) RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(((37)))
(36) RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a
motor vehicle after consuming alcohol;

(((38)))
(37) RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(((39)))
(38) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

(((40)))
(39) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;

(((41)))
(40) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;

(((42)))
(41) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(((43)))
(42) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle
with the motor running;

(((44)))
(43) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to
cancel a traffic citation;

(((45)))
(44) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing,
and committing crimes;

(((46)))
(45) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(((47)))
(46) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(((48)))
(47) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business practices,
except where that chapter provides for the assessment of monetary penalties of
a civil nature;

(((49)))
(48) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers in
for hire vehicles;

(((50)))
(49) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;

(((51)))
(50) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a
vehicle certificate;

(((52)))
(51) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine
carrier;

(((53)))
(52) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(((54)))
(53) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;

(((55)))
(54) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card,
letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87
RCW;

(((56))) (55) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of
an unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

---
END ---