BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.28.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever any accident occurs to any worker it ((shall be)) is the
duty of ((such)) the worker or someone in his or her behalf to ((forthwith))
report ((such)) the accident to his or her employer,
superintendent, or foreman or forewoman in charge of the work((, and))
within ninety days of the date of the accident.

(2)
When an employer receives notice of an accident as required under subsection
(1) of this section, it is the duty of the employer to at once report such
accident and the injury resulting therefrom to the department pursuant to RCW
51.28.025, ((as now or hereafter amended,)) where the worker has
received treatment from a physician, has been hospitalized, disabled from work,
or has died as the apparent result of such accident and injury.

(3)
Upon receipt of ((such)) the notice of accident required under
RCW 51.28.025, the department shall immediately forward to the worker or
his or her beneficiaries or dependents notification, in nontechnical language,
of their rights under this title.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.28.050 and 1984 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and in RCW 51.28.055, no
application shall be valid or claim thereunder enforceable unless filed within
one year after the day upon which the injury occurred or the rights of
dependents or beneficiaries accrued((, except as provided in RCW 51.28.055)).

(2) Except as provided in RCW 51.28.055, beginning with claims
for injuries occurring on or after the effective date of this section, an
application for a claim is not valid nor the claim thereunder enforceable
unless the accident from which the claim arose has been reported as required
under RCW 51.28.010(1) and the application is filed within one year after the
day upon which the injury occurred or the rights of dependents or beneficiaries
accrued.

---
END ---