BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 88.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft unless each person aboard the
personal watercraft or being towed behind the personal watercraft is wearing a
United States coast guard approved type I, II, III, or V personal flotation
device. An inflatable personal flotation device does not satisfy the
requirements of this section. Except as provided for in RCW 88.12.015, a
violation of this subsection is a civil infraction punishable under RCW
7.84.100.

(2)
A person operating a personal watercraft equipped by the manufacturer with a
lanyard-type engine cutoff switch shall attach the lanyard to his or her
person, clothing, or personal flotation device, as appropriate for the specific
personal watercraft. It is unlawful for any person to remove or disable a
cutoff switch or spring loaded throttle mechanism that was installed by the
manufacturer.

(3)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft between sunset and 8:00 a.m.

A
person at least fourteen years of age may operate a personal watercraft if that
person has successfully completed a boating education course approved by the
commission under this section.

(4)
Beginning April 1, 2000:

(a)
No person under the age of fourteen may operate a personal watercraft.

(b)
Subject to the minimum age requirement contained in (a) of this subsection, no
person born after January 1, 1984, may operate a personal watercraft powered by
a motor of ten horsepower or greater unless such a person has successfully
completed a boating education course approved by the commission. The
commission shall cooperate with the United States coast guard auxiliary, the
United States power squadron, and other organizations in approving boating
education courses. In lieu of completing a boating course, an individual may
demonstrate, in a manner approved by the commission, sufficient knowledge of
the information from the boating education course. The commission shall issue
written confirmation of the successful demonstration of equivalent knowledge.

(c)
If a nonresident of the state is operating a personal watercraft on the waters
of the state, the person is subject to the requirements of this section. The
person is in compliance with the requirements of this subsection if the person
possesses written confirmation of successful completion of a safe boating
course approved by the national association of state boating law administrators
and issued by the person's home state, or any other state or country.

(d)
Any operator of a personal watercraft required by this subsection to possess
proof of completion of a boating course or equivalency demonstration must have
the documentation in his or her possession at all times while operating a personal
watercraft.

(5)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft in a negligent manner.
Maneuvers that constitute negligent operation of a vessel include, but are not
limited to:

(a)
Weaving through congested vessel traffic;

(b)
Jumping the wake of another vessel unreasonably close to another vessel or when
visibility around the vessel is obstructed or restricted;

(c)
Becoming airborne or completely leaving the water while crossing the wake of
another vessel within one hundred feet of the vessel creating the wake;

(d)
Operating at greater than a slow/no-wake speed within one hundred feet of the
shoreline, a dock, pier, marked launch area, marked swim area, swim float,
swimmers, surfers, persons engaged in angling, any manually powered vessel, or any
anchored, moored, or drifting vessel;

(e)
Operating contrary to navigation rules including following too closely to
another vessel, including another personal watercraft. For the purposes of
this subsection, "following too closely" means proceeding in the same
direction and operating at a speed in excess of ten miles per hour within one
hundred feet to the rear or fifty feet to the side of another vessel which is
underway, unless the vessels are operating in a narrow channel, in which case
personal watercraft may operate at the speed and flow of the other traffic in
the channel;

(f)
A violation of this subsection (5) is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.

(6)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft:

(a)
While towing a person on water skis, a kneeboard, an inflatable craft or any
other device unless the personal watercraft is rated by the manufacturer to
carry at least three persons, and an operator and observer are aboard the
personal watercraft, except for a personal watercraft that is actually operated
by the person or persons being towed and no person is on the personal
watercraft;

(b)
To chase or harass wildlife;

(c)
Through emergent vegetation at other than a slow/no-wake speed;

(d)
In any other manner that is not reasonable and prudent.

(7)
Except for the minimum age requirement established in subsection (4)(a) of this
section, subsections (1) through (6) of this section do not apply to a
performer engaged in a professional exhibition or a person participating in a
regatta, race, marine parade, or exhibition authorized or otherwise permitted
by the appropriate agency having jurisdiction and authority to authorize such
events.

(8)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft in a reckless manner. For the
purposes of this section, "reckless operation of a personal
watercraft" means the willful and wanton performance of any of the actions
described in subsection (5) of this section.

(9)
A person shall not lease, hire, or rent a personal watercraft to a person under
the age of sixteen.

(10)
A violation of subsection (2), (3), (4), (6), (8), or (9) of this section is a
misdemeanor under RCW 9.92.030. This subsection does not limit the application
of any other section that makes the unauthorized use or operation of a personal
watercraft a misdemeanor.

(11)
The commission shall adopt rules implementing subsection (4) of this section.
The commission shall establish a fee for a boating education course and for an
equivalency demonstration not to exceed the commission's costs associated with
the boating education course and equivalency demonstration. All such fees
collected by the commission shall be deposited into the state parks renewal and
stewardship account created under RCW 43.51.275, and appropriated only to the
commission solely for use in the commission's boating safety program.

(12)
Nothing in this section limits the authority of local governments to regulate
the operation of personal watercraft.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
88.12.145 (Operation of personal watercraft‑-Prohibited
activities‑-Penalties) and 1993 c 244 s 17 are each repealed.

---
END ---