BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.38.160 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 22 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A cultural arts, stadium and convention district established in accordance with
this chapter shall be dissolved and its affairs liquidated when so directed by
a majority of persons in the district voting on such question. An election
placing such question before the voters may be called in the following manner:

(((1)))
(a) By resolution of the cultural arts, stadium and convention district
governing authority;

(((2)))
(b) By resolution of the county legislative body or bodies with the
concurrence therein by resolution of the city council of a component city; or

(((3)))
(c) By petition calling for such election signed by at least ten percent
of the qualified voters residing within the district filed with the auditor of
the county wherein the largest portion of the district is located. The auditor
shall examine the same and certify to the sufficiency of the signatures
thereon: PROVIDED, That to be validated, signatures must have been collected
within a ninety-day period as designated by the petition sponsors.

With
dissolution of the district, any outstanding obligations and bonded
indebtedness of the district shall be satisfied or allocated by mutual
agreement to the county or counties and component cities of the cultural arts,
stadium and convention district.

(2) A cultural arts, stadium and convention district established
in accordance with this chapter shall be dissolved and its affairs liquidated
when directed by a majority vote of the governing body if a ballot proposition
under RCW 67.38.110 or 67.38.130, submitted to voters, is not approved.

---
END ---