BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the unique challenges schools must face when students
with a history of violent behavior enroll in their schools or return to their
schools after having been in a detention or other correctional facility. In
order to improve student safety and increase school options in providing an
education to repeatedly violent students, the legislature encourages schools to
develop programs that not only preserve student safety but also provide unique
educational opportunities for repeatedly violent students.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.40.215 and 1997 c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest possible
date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any
other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community
residential facility, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge,
parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of a juvenile found to have
committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, to the following:

(i)
The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the juvenile will reside;

(ii)
The sheriff of the county in which the juvenile will reside; and

(iii)
The approved private schools and the common school district board of directors
of the district in which the juvenile intends to reside or the approved private
school or public school district in which the juvenile last attended school,
whichever is appropriate, except when it has been determined by the department
that the juvenile is twenty-one years old((; is not required to return to
school under chapter 28A.225 RCW;)) or will be in the community for less
than seven consecutive days on approved leave and will not be attending school
during that time.

(b)
After July 27, 1997, the department shall send a written notice to approved
private and public schools under the same conditions identified in subsection
(1)(a)(iii) of this section when a juvenile adjudicated of any offense is
transferred to a community residential facility. The community residential
facility shall provide written notice of the offender's criminal history to any
school that the offender attends while residing at the community residential
facility and to any employer that employs the offender while residing at the
community residential facility.

(c)
The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the
following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific
juvenile:

(i)
The victim of the offense for which the juvenile was found to have committed or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;

(ii)
Any witnesses who testified against the juvenile in any court proceedings
involving the offense; and

(iii)
Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.

Information
regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information
regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to
receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available
to the juvenile. The notice to the chief of police or the sheriff shall
include the identity of the juvenile, the residence where the juvenile will
reside, the identity of the person, if any, responsible for supervising the
juvenile, and the time period of any authorized leave.

(d)
The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply
to emergency medical furloughs.

(e)
The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require
any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after
notification.

(2)(a)
If a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or
stalking escapes from a facility of the department, the secretary shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the
chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the juvenile
resided immediately before the juvenile's arrest. If previously requested, the
secretary shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the offense which
the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the
crime was a homicide. If the juvenile is recaptured, the secretary shall send
notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in
no event later than two working days after the department learns of such
recapture.

(b)
The secretary may authorize a leave, for a juvenile found to have committed a
violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, which shall not exceed forty-eight
hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or
critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may
authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the time medically necessary, to
obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the
department. Prior to the commencement of an emergency or medical leave, the
secretary shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement
agency in the jurisdiction in which the juvenile will be during the leave
period. The notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period
of the leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity
of the person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave. If
previously requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and victim
of the offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's
next of kin if the offense was a homicide.

In
case of an emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any
portion of the requirements for leaves pursuant to RCW 13.40.205 (2)(a), (3),
(4), and (5).

(3)
If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of
sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or
legal guardian of the child.

(4)
The secretary shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last
address provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting
party shall furnish the department with a current address.

(5)
Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or
other authorized leave or release, a convicted juvenile sex offender shall not
attend a public or approved private elementary, middle, or high school that is
attended by a victim or a sibling of a victim of the sex offender. The parents
or legal guardians of the convicted juvenile sex offender shall be responsible
for transportation or other costs associated with or required by the sex
offender's change in school that otherwise would be paid by a school district.
Upon discharge, parole, transfer to a community residential facility, or
other authorized leave or release of a convicted juvenile sex offender, the
secretary shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, transfer,
or other authorized leave or release and the requirements of this subsection to
the common school district board of directors of the district in which the sex
offender intends to reside or the district in which the sex offender last
attended school, whichever is appropriate. The secretary shall send a similar
notice to any approved private school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if
unknown, to the approved private schools within the district the juvenile
resides or intends to reside.

(6)
For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(a)
"Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
"Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(c)
"Stalking" means the crime of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;

(d)
"Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and
children.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.225.225 and 1997 c 265 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All districts accepting applications from nonresident students or from students
receiving home-based instruction for admission to the district's schools shall
consider equally all applications received. Each school district shall adopt a
policy establishing rational, fair, and equitable standards for acceptance and
rejection of applications by June 30, 1990. The policy may include rejection
of a nonresident student if:

(a)
Acceptance of a nonresident student would result in the district experiencing a
financial hardship;

(b)
The student's disciplinary records indicate a history of convictions for
offenses or crimes, violent or disruptive behavior, or gang
membership; or

(c)
The student has been expelled or suspended from a public school for more than
ten consecutive days. Any policy allowing for readmission of expelled or
suspended students under this subsection (1)(c) must apply uniformly to both
resident and nonresident applicants.

For
purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this section, "gang" means a group
which: (i) Consists of three or more persons; (ii) has identifiable
leadership; and (iii) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in
concert mainly for criminal purposes.

(2)
The district shall provide to applicants written notification of the approval
or denial of the application in a timely manner. If the application is
rejected, the notification shall include the reason or reasons for denial and
the right to appeal under RCW 28A.225.230(3).

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.225.330 and 1997 c 266 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When enrolling a student who has attended school in another school district,
the school enrolling the student ((may)) shall request the parent
and the student to briefly indicate in writing whether or not the student has:

(a)
Any history of placement in special educational programs;

(b)
Any past, current, or pending disciplinary action;

(c)
Any history of violent behavior, or behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155;

(d)
Any unpaid fines or fees imposed by other schools; and

(e)
Any health conditions affecting the student's educational needs.

(2)
The school enrolling the student shall request the school the student
previously attended to send the student's permanent record including records of
disciplinary action and behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155, attendance,
immunization records, and academic performance. If the student has not paid a
fine or fee under RCW 28A.635.060, or tuition, fees, or fines at approved
private schools the school may withhold the student's official transcript, but
shall transmit information about the student's academic performance, special
placement, immunization records, and records of disciplinary action and
behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155. If the official transcript is not sent
due to unpaid tuition, fees, or fines, the enrolling school shall notify both
the student and parent or guardian that the official transcript will not be
sent until the obligation is met, and failure to have an official transcript
may result in exclusion from extracurricular activities or failure to graduate.

(3)
If information is requested under subsection (2) of this section, the
information shall be transmitted within two school days after receiving the
request and the records shall be sent as soon as possible. Any school district
or district employee who releases the information in compliance with this section
is immune from civil liability for damages unless it is shown that the school
district employee acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The state board
of education shall provide by rule for the discipline under chapter 28A.410 RCW
of a school principal or other chief administrator of a public school building
who fails to make a good faith effort to assure compliance with this
subsection.

(4)
Any school district or district employee who releases the information in
compliance with federal and state law is immune from civil liability for
damages unless it is shown that the school district or district employee acted
with gross negligence or in bad faith.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any school district, educational service district, or consortium of school
districts may create specialized schools for students who have been adjudicated
or convicted of offenses and who pose a danger to themselves, other students,
and staff. The schools may be designed to address the special educational
needs of those students and the security needs of the students and staff. The
schools may give priority in placement to adjudicated or convicted youth who
are violent or chronically disruptive of the educational process and who would
otherwise be subject to suspension or expulsion.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction is directed to assist school
districts, educational service districts, and consortiums that intend to create
specialized schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

The
secretary shall require any agency that receives juveniles who have been
adjudicated or convicted to provide written notice of the offender's criminal
history to any school that the offender attends while the offender resides at
the agency's facility, home, or center, and to any employer who employs the offender
while the offender resides at the facility, home, or center. The secretary
shall, at a minimum, suspend the license of an agency for one year if the
agency violates this section two or more times within one year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements, the
conflicting part of this act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the
extent of the conflict, and such finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet
federal requirements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---