BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I - CRISIS RESIDENTIAL CENTERS AND
TREATMENT SERVICES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

Any
county or group of counties may make application to the department of social
and health services in the manner and form prescribed by the department to administer
and provide the services established under RCW 13.32A.197. Any such
application must include a plan or plans for providing such services to at-risk
youth.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

No
county may receive any state funds provided by this chapter until its
application and plan are received by the department.

(1)
The distribution of funds to a county or a group of counties shall be based on
criteria including but not limited to the county's per capita income, regional
or county at-risk populations, rates of poverty, and the presence of existing
programs serving at-risk children.

(2)
The secretary of social and health services shall reimburse a county upon
presentation and approval of a valid claim pursuant to this chapter based on
actual performance in meeting the terms and conditions of the approved plan and
contract. Funds received by participating counties under this chapter shall
not be used to replace local funds for existing programs.

(3)
Funds available for county-operated treatment facilities and services under RCW
13.32A.197 shall not exceed the appropriation for these services specified in
the biennial operating budget.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.13.031 and 1998 c 314 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall have the duty to provide child welfare services and shall:

(1)
Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and comprehensive
plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for the protection and
care of homeless, runaway, dependent, or neglected children.

(2)
Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of prospective adoptive
and foster homes, both regular and specialized, i.e. homes for children of
ethnic minority, including Indian homes for Indian children, sibling groups,
handicapped and emotionally disturbed, teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and
annually report to the governor and the legislature concerning the department's
success in: (a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies for
legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the passport program
required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include a section entitled
"Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."

(3)
Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on the part of a
parent or caretaker that results in death, serious physical or emotional harm,
or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that presents an imminent risk of serious
harm, and on the basis of the findings of such investigation, offer child
welfare services in relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians,
or persons serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the
attention of an appropriate court, or another community agency: PROVIDED, That
an investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly
not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation reveals
that a crime against a child may have been committed, the department shall
notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(4)
Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to families who are
in conflict.

(5)
Monitor out-of-home placements, on a timely and routine basis, to assure the
safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is within the scope of
the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and
annually submit a report measuring the extent to which the department achieved
the specified goals to the governor and the legislature.

(6)
Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and to accept custody
of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to do so under law, to
provide child welfare services including placement for adoption, and to provide
for the physical care of such children and make payment of maintenance costs if
needed. Except where required by Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no
private adoption agency which receives children for adoption from the
department shall discriminate on the basis of race, creed, or color when
considering applications in their placement for adoption.

(7)
Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who have run away from
home and who are admitted to crisis residential centers.

(8)
Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow in general the
policy of using properly approved private agency services for the actual care
and supervision of such children insofar as they are available, paying for care
of such children as are accepted by the department as eligible for support at
reasonable rates established by the department.

(9)
Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall assist the
secretary in the development of a partnership plan for utilizing resources of
the public and private sectors, and advise on all matters pertaining to child
welfare, licensing of child care agencies, adoption, and services related
thereto. At least one member shall represent the adoption community.

(10)
Have authority to provide continued foster care or group care for individuals
from eighteen through twenty years of age to enable them to complete their high
school or vocational school program.

(11)
Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase
care for Indian children who are in the custody of a federally recognized
Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing agency pursuant to parental
consent, tribal court order, or state juvenile court order; and the purchase of
such care shall be subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of
support applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.

(12)
Provide funding for counties to operate treatment facilities and provide
treatment services to children who have been ordered placed in a staff secure
facility under RCW 13.32A.197.

Notwithstanding
any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through 13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through
74.13.036, or of this section all services to be provided by the department of
social and health services under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section,
or counties under subsection (12) of this section, subject to the
limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program offering such
services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the federal juvenile justice
and delinquency prevention act of 1974.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A county or group of counties operating a treatment facility under sections 1
and 2 of this act shall establish, by contracts with private or public vendors,
treatment centers with staff secure facilities. These facilities shall be
structured group care facilities licensed under rules adopted by the
department.

(2)
The staff at the facilities established under RCW 13.32A.197 shall be trained
so that they may effectively counsel, supervise, provide treatment for
behavioral difficulties or needs, and provide structure to the juveniles
admitted to treatment facilities. The treatment, supervision, and counseling must
recognize the need for support and the varying circumstances that cause
children to leave their families.

(3)
Juveniles shall be admitted to the facilities based on a court order for
placement at a staff secure facility to receive treatment under RCW
13.32A.197. Juveniles shall not be denied admission based on their county of
residence.

(4) The state shall indemnify and hold harmless facilities
providing services to children under this section, from actions arising from
placement in their facilities.

---
END ---