BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.92.151 and 1990 c 3 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

The
sentence of a prisoner confined in a county jail facility for a felony, gross
misdemeanor, or misdemeanor conviction may be reduced by earned release credits
in accordance with procedures that shall be developed and promulgated by the
correctional agency having jurisdiction. The earned early release time shall
be for good behavior and good performance as determined by the correctional
agency having jurisdiction. Any program established pursuant to this section
shall allow an offender to earn early release credits for presentence
incarceration. The correctional agency shall not credit the offender with
earned early release credits in advance of the offender actually earning the
credits. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent offense or
a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on or after July 1, 1990, robbery
in the first or second degree, manslaughter in the first or second degree,
assault in the second degree, or any attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to
commit these crimes, the aggregate earned early release time may not exceed
fifteen percent of the sentence. In no other case may the aggregate earned
early release time exceed one-third of the total sentence.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.150 and 1996 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person serving a sentence imposed pursuant to this chapter and committed to the
custody of the department shall leave the confines of the correctional facility
or be released prior to the expiration of the sentence except as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the term of
the sentence of an offender committed to a correctional facility operated by
the department, may be reduced by earned early release time in accordance with
procedures that shall be developed and promulgated by the correctional agency
having jurisdiction in which the offender is confined. The earned early
release time shall be for good behavior and good performance, as determined by
the correctional agency having jurisdiction. The correctional agency shall not
credit the offender with earned early release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits. Any program established pursuant to this section
shall allow an offender to earn early release credits for presentence
incarceration. If an offender is transferred from a county jail to the
department of corrections, the county jail facility shall certify to the
department the amount of time spent in custody at the facility and the amount
of earned early release time. In the case of an offender who has been
convicted of a felony committed after July 23, 1995, that involves any
applicable deadly weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4), or both,
shall not receive any good time credits or earned early release time for that
portion of his or her sentence that results from any deadly weapon
enhancements. In the case of an offender convicted of a serious violent
offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on or after July 1,
1990, robbery in the first or second degree, manslaughter in the first or
second degree, assault in the second degree, or any attempt, conspiracy, or
solicitation to commit these crimes, the aggregate earned early release
time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In no other case shall
the aggregate earned early release time exceed one-third of the total sentence;

(2)
A person convicted of a sex offense or an offense categorized as a serious
violent offense, assault in the second degree, vehicular homicide, vehicular
assault, assault of a child in the second degree, any crime against a person
where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.125 that the defendant or
an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any
felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW may become eligible, in
accordance with a program developed by the department, for transfer to
community custody status in lieu of earned early release time pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section;

(3)
An offender may leave a correctional facility pursuant to an authorized
furlough or leave of absence. In addition, offenders may leave a correctional
facility when in the custody of a corrections officer or officers;

(4)
The governor, upon recommendation from the clemency and pardons board, may
grant an extraordinary release for reasons of serious health problems,
senility, advanced age, extraordinary meritorious acts, or other extraordinary
circumstances;

(5)
No more than the final six months of the sentence may be served in partial
confinement designed to aid the offender in finding work and reestablishing
himself or herself in the community;

(6)
The governor may pardon any offender;

(7)
The department of corrections may release an offender from confinement any time
within ten days before a release date calculated under this section; and

(8)
An offender may leave a correctional facility prior to completion of his
sentence if the sentence has been reduced as provided in RCW 9.94A.160.

Notwithstanding
any other provisions of this section, an offender sentenced for a felony crime
listed in RCW 9.94A.120(4) as subject to a mandatory minimum sentence of total
confinement shall not be released from total confinement before the completion
of the listed mandatory minimum sentence for that felony crime of conviction
unless allowed under RCW 9.94A.120(4).

Sec.
3. RCW
70.48.210 and 1990 c 3 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All cities and counties are authorized to establish and maintain farms, camps,
and work release programs and facilities, as well as special detention
facilities. The facilities shall meet the requirements of chapter 70.48 RCW
and any rules adopted thereunder.

(2)
Farms and camps may be established either inside or outside the territorial
limits of a city or county. A sentence of confinement in a city or county jail
may include placement in a farm or camp. Unless directed otherwise by court
order, the chief law enforcement officer or department of corrections, may
transfer the prisoner to a farm or camp. The sentencing court, chief law
enforcement officer, or department of corrections may not transfer to a farm or
camp a greater number of prisoners than can be furnished with constructive
employment and can be reasonably accommodated.

(3)
The city or county may establish a city or county work release program and
housing facilities for the prisoners in the program. In such regard, factors
such as employment conditions and the condition of jail facilities should be
considered. When a work release program is established the following
provisions apply:

(a)
A person convicted of a felony and placed in a city or county jail is eligible
for the work release program. A person sentenced to a city or county jail is
eligible for the work release program. The program may be used as a condition
of probation for a criminal offense. Good conduct is a condition of
participation in the program.

(b)
The court may permit a person who is currently, regularly employed to continue
his or her employment. The chief law enforcement officer or department of
corrections shall make all necessary arrangements if possible. The court may
authorize the person to seek suitable employment and may authorize the chief
law enforcement officer or department of corrections to make reasonable efforts
to find suitable employment for the person. A person participating in the work
release program may not work in an establishment where there is a labor
dispute.

(c)
The work release prisoner shall be confined in a work release facility or jail
unless authorized to be absent from the facility for program-related purposes,
unless the court directs otherwise.

(d)
Each work release prisoner's earnings may be collected by the chief law
enforcement officer or a designee. The chief law enforcement officer or a
designee may deduct from the earnings moneys for the payments for the
prisoner's board, personal expenses inside and outside the jail, a share of the
administrative expenses of this section, court-ordered victim compensation, and
court-ordered restitution. Support payments for the prisoner's dependents, if
any, shall be made as directed by the court. With the prisoner's consent, the
remaining funds may be used to pay the prisoner's preexisting debts. Any
remaining balance shall be returned to the prisoner.

(e)
The prisoner's sentence may be reduced by earned early release time in
accordance with procedures that shall be developed and promulgated by the work
release facility. The earned early release time shall be for good behavior and
good performance as determined by the facility. The facility shall not credit
the offender with earned early release credits in advance of the offender
actually earning the credits. In the case of an offender convicted of a
serious violent offense or a sex offense that is a class A felony committed on
or after July 1, 1990, robbery in the first or second degree, manslaughter
in the first or second degree, assault in the second degree, or any attempt,
conspiracy, or solicitation to commit these crimes, the aggregate earned
early release time may not exceed fifteen percent of the sentence. In no other
case may the aggregate earned early release time exceed one-third of the total
sentence.

(f)
If the work release prisoner violates the conditions of custody or employment,
the prisoner shall be returned to the sentencing court. The sentencing court
may require the prisoner to spend the remainder of the sentence in actual
confinement and may cancel any earned reduction of the sentence.

(4)
A special detention facility may be operated by a noncorrectional agency or by
noncorrectional personnel by contract with the governing unit. The employees
shall meet the standards of training and education established by the criminal
justice training commission as authorized by RCW 43.101.080. The special
detention facility may use combinations of features including, but not limited
to, low-security or honor prisoner status, work farm, work release, community
review, prisoner facility maintenance and food preparation, training programs,
or alcohol or drug rehabilitation programs. Special detention facilities may
establish a reasonable fee schedule to cover the cost of facility housing and
programs. The schedule shall be on a sliding basis that reflects the person's
ability to pay.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act applies to crimes committed on or after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---