BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

Instructors of firearms safety, education, and familiarization
classes authorized by and conducted at a sport shooting range are not subject
to civil liability relating to or arising from accidents occurring during such
a class, except for accidents arising from the instructor's gross negligence or
willful misconduct.

---
END ---