BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 21.20 RCW to read as follows:

It is unlawful for a broker-dealer or its associated salesperson to
charge a customer a periodic fee if the broker-dealer or its associated
salesperson has not effected transactions in securities for the customer during
the period for which the broker-dealer or its associated salesperson is
charging the fee.

---
END ---