BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature shall establish in the omnibus appropriations act a state-wide
salary allocation schedule for each community college district, for allocation
purposes only, to be used to distribute funds for adjunct faculty salaries
under section 2 of this act.

(2)
The college board shall calculate salary allocations for state-funded adjunct
faculty by determining the community college district average salary for basic
education adjunct faculty using the salary allocation schedule established
under this section.

(3)
Beginning January 1, 2000, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits
received by adjunct faculty after the baccalaureate degree may be used to
determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule
and LEAP documents referenced in the omnibus appropriations act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a)
The employee has a master's degree; or

(b)
The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1,
2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every community college district shall fix, alter, allow, and order paid
salaries and compensation for all community college adjunct faculty in
conformance with this section.

(2)(a)
Salaries for adjunct faculty shall not be less than the salary provided in the
omnibus appropriations act in the state-wide salary allocation schedule for an
employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b)
Salaries for adjunct faculty with a master's degree shall not be less than the
salary provided in the omnibus appropriations act in the state-wide salary
allocation schedule for an employee with a master's degree and zero years of
service.

(3)(a)
The actual average salary paid to adjunct faculty shall not exceed the community
college district's average adjunct faculty salary used for the college board
allocations for that school year as determined under section 1 of this act.

(b)
Salary and benefits for adjunct faculty in programs other than academic courses
and occupational and adult education shall be consistent with the salary and
benefits paid to adjunct faculty in the academic courses and occupational and
adult education programs.

(4)
Salaries and benefits for adjunct faculty may exceed the limitations in
subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for additional time,
additional responsibilities, or incentives. Supplemental contracts shall not
cause the state to incur any present or future funding obligation.
Supplemental contracts are subject to the collective bargaining provisions of
chapter 28B.52 RCW, shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed do not
constitute adverse change.

(5) Employee benefit plans offered by any community college
district must comply with chapter 28B.10 RCW.

---
END ---