BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the dissemination of meaningful and accurate data on
serious crimes to the appropriate law enforcement agencies is beneficial to
public safety in the state. The homicide information tracking system program
within the criminal litigation division of the office of the attorney general
has provided useful and timely information on murder and rape cases to law
enforcement officials in the state, especially regarding multiple offenders.
Because robbery is often a crime that accompanies murders and rapes,
investigation of violent crime would be facilitated by the monitoring of
robberies. Integrating the collection, compilation, and analysis of robbery
data into the homicide information tracking system would eliminate the need to
develop a parallel process. The combination of major criminal data into one
data base and analysis tool will result in greater interagency information
sharing and ultimately in more efficient criminal investigations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of two hundred sixty-one thousand dollars for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2000, and the sum of one hundred ninety-three thousand dollars for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are
appropriated from the general fund to the office of the attorney general. The
amounts in this section are provided solely to expand the homicide information
tracking system to include collection, compilation, and analysis of robberies.

---
END ---