BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that increased communication between local law enforcement
officers and the state department of corrections' community corrections
officers improves public safety. Improved public safety is accomplished
through shared monitoring and supervision of offenders who live in the
community under the jurisdiction of the state department of corrections.
Participating local law enforcement agencies and local offices of the state
department of corrections have implemented in some areas of the state the
supervision management and recidivist tracking program, whereby the entities
provide mutual assistance with supervising offenders living within the
boundaries of local law enforcement agencies. Through shared information and
coordinated supervision, the supervision management and recidivist tracking program
has helped local law enforcement solve crimes faster, or has prevented future
criminal activity, by reporting offenders' sentence violations to state
community corrections officers in a more timely manner. Information collected
in the field by local law enforcement related to serious offenders under the
jurisdiction of the state department of corrections is electronically
transferred to the office of the attorney general's homicide investigative
tracking system. Field information entered into the system is electronically
transferred to the department of corrections' community corrections officer
responsible for the offender and remains in the homicide investigative tracking
system, where it is accessible to the department of corrections and law enforcement
throughout the state. Expansion of the supervision management and recidivist
tracking program state-wide is needed to improve public safety for all
law-abiding citizens in the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of four hundred thousand dollars for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
and the sum of four hundred thousand dollars for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2001, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated from the
general fund to the office of the attorney general. The amounts in this
section are provided solely for completing the state-wide implementation of the
supervision management and recidivist tracking program.

---
END ---