BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.06.050 and 1993 c 446 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state-owned facilities component of the state-wide transportation plan shall identify
the most cost-effective combination of highway, ferry, passenger rail, and
high-capacity transportation improvements that maximizes the efficient movement
of people, freight, and goods within state transportation corridors and will
consist of:

(1)
The state highway system plan, which identifies program and financing needs and
recommends specific and financially realistic improvements to preserve the
structural integrity of the state highway system, ensure acceptable operating
conditions, and provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and
cultural resources. The state highway system plan shall contain the following
elements:

(a)
A system preservation element, which shall establish structural preservation
objectives for the state highway system including bridges, identify current and
future structural deficiencies based upon analysis of current conditions and
projected future deterioration, and recommend program funding levels and
specific actions necessary to preserve the structural integrity of the state
highway system consistent with adopted objectives. This element shall serve as
the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway program and
the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(b)
A capacity and operational improvement element, which shall establish
operational objectives, including safety considerations, for moving people and
goods on the state highway system, identify current and future capacity,
operational, and safety deficiencies, and recommend program funding levels and
specific improvements and strategies necessary to achieve the operational
objectives. In developing capacity and operational improvement plans the
department shall first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency
of the existing system before recommending system expansion. Congestion relief
must be a primary emphasis of the capacity and operational improvement element.
Strategies to enhance the operational efficiencies include but are not limited
to access management, transportation system management, demand management, and
high-occupancy vehicle facilities. The capacity and operational improvement
element must conform to the state implementation plan for air quality and be
consistent with regional transportation plans adopted under chapter 47.80 RCW,
and shall serve as the basis for the capacity and operational improvement
portions of the six-year highway program and the two-year biennial budget
request to the legislature;

(c)
A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall identify and recommend
designation of scenic and recreational highways, provide for enhanced access to
scenic, recreational, and cultural resources associated with designated routes,
and recommend a variety of management strategies to protect, preserve, and
enhance these resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or federal
agencies shall jointly develop this element;

(d)
A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of nonmotorized
transportation modes on the state transportation systems and provide the basis
for the investment of state transportation funds in paths and trails, including
funding provided under chapter 47.30 RCW.

(2)
The state ferry system plan, which shall guide capital and operating investments
in the state ferry system. The plan shall establish service objectives for
state ferry routes, forecast travel demand for the various markets served in
the system, and develop strategies for ferry system investment that consider
regional and state-wide vehicle and passenger needs, support local land use
plans, and assure that ferry services are fully integrated with other
transportation services. The plan shall assess the role of private ferries
operating under the authority of the utilities and transportation commission
and shall coordinate ferry system capital and operational plans with these
private operations. The ferry system plan must be consistent with the regional
transportation plans for areas served by the state ferry system, and shall be
developed in conjunction with the ferry advisory committees.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.06.090 and 1993 c 446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state-interest component of the state-wide multimodal transportation plan shall
include an intercity passenger rail plan, which shall analyze existing
intercity passenger rail service and recommend improvements to that service
under the state passenger rail service program including depot improvements,
potential service extensions, and ways to achieve higher train speeds. The
plan must include:

(1)
A service preservation element that outlines the trackage, depots, and train
investments needed to maintain established service levels; and

(2) A service improvement element that establishes service
improvement objectives and outlines the trackage, depot, and train investments
needed to meet improvement service objectives.

---
END ---