BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.100 and 1991 c 199 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of each authority shall be known as the board of directors.

(2)
In the case of an authority comprised of one county the board shall be
comprised of two appointees of the city selection committee, at least one of
whom shall represent the city having the most population in the county, and two
representatives to be designated by the ((board of)) county ((commissioners))
legislative authority of that county. However, in the case of an authority
located in a single eastern Washington county with a population of four hundred
thousand or more, the authority shall be comprised of two representatives to be
designated by the county legislative authority, one member representing the
most populous city who is nominated by the mayor and approved by the council of
that city, and one appointee of the city selection committee. In the case
of an authority comprised of two, three, four, or five counties, the board
shall be comprised of one appointee from each county, who shall represent the
city having the most population in such county, to be designated by the mayor
and city council of such city, and one representative from each county to be
designated by the ((board of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative
authority of each county making up the authority. In the case of an
authority comprised of six or more counties, the board shall be comprised of
one representative from each county to be designated by the ((board of))
county ((commissioners)) legislative authority of each county
making up the authority, and three appointees, one each from the three largest
cities within the local authority's jurisdiction to be appointed by the mayor
and city council of such city.

(3)
If the board of an authority otherwise would consist of an even number, the
members selected as above provided shall agree upon and elect an additional
member who shall be either a member of the governing body of one of the towns,
cities or counties comprising the authority, or a private citizen residing in
the authority.

(4)
The terms of office of board members shall be four years.

(5) Wherever a member of a board has a potential conflict of
interest in an action before the board, the member shall declare to the board
the nature of the potential conflict prior to participating in the action
review. The board shall, if the potential conflict of interest, in the
judgment of a majority of the board, may prevent the member from a fair and
objective review of the case, remove the member from participation in the
action.

---
END ---