BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW to read as follows:

When the spouse of an insured who is fifty-five years of age or
older dies, insurance companies writing automobile liability and physical
damage insurance in this state shall continue to apply to the premium paid by
the surviving insured all discounts associated with marital status and the
driving record of the deceased spouse for a period of two years after the death
of the spouse or until the insured remarries.

---
END ---