BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.17.180 and 1995 c 403 s 629 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 43.05.090, any employer who willfully or repeatedly
violates the requirements of RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health standard
promulgated under the authority of this chapter, of any existing rule or
regulation governing the conditions of employment promulgated by the
department, or of any order issued granting a variance under RCW 49.17.080 or
49.17.090 may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed seventy thousand
dollars for each violation. A minimum penalty of five thousand dollars shall
be assessed for a willful violation.

(2)
Any employer who has received a citation for a serious violation of the
requirements of RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health standard promulgated
under the authority of this chapter, of any existing rule or regulation
governing the conditions of employment promulgated by the department, or of any
order issued granting a variance under RCW 49.17.080 or 49.17.090 as determined
in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, shall be assessed a civil penalty
not to exceed seven thousand dollars for each such violation.

(3)
Any employer who has received a citation for a violation of the requirements of
RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health standard promulgated under this chapter,
of any existing rule or regulation governing the conditions of employment
promulgated by the department, or of any order issued granting a variance under
RCW 49.17.080 or 49.17.090, where such violation is specifically determined not
to be of a serious nature as provided in subsection (6) of this section, may be
assessed a civil penalty not to exceed seven thousand dollars for each such
violation, unless such violation is determined to be de minimis.

(4)
Any employer who fails to correct a violation for which a citation has been
issued under RCW 49.17.120 or 49.17.130 within the period permitted for its
correction, which period shall not begin to run until the date of the final
order of the board of industrial insurance appeals in the case of any review
proceedings under this chapter initiated by the employer in good faith and not
solely for delay or avoidance of penalties, may be assessed a civil penalty of
not more than seven thousand dollars for each day during which such failure or
violation continues.

(5)
Any employer who violates any of the posting requirements of this chapter, or
any of the posting requirements of rules promulgated by the department pursuant
to this chapter related to employee or employee representative's rights to
notice, including but not limited to those employee rights to notice set forth
in RCW 49.17.080, 49.17.090, 49.17.120, 49.17.130, 49.17.220(1) and
49.17.240(2), shall be assessed a penalty not to exceed seven thousand dollars
for each such violation. Any employer who violates any of the posting
requirements for the posting of informational, educational, or training
materials under the authority of RCW 49.17.050(7), may be assessed a penalty
not to exceed seven thousand dollars for each such violation.

(6)
For the purposes of this section, a serious violation shall be deemed to exist
in a work place if there is a substantial probability that death or serious
physical harm could result from a condition which exists, or from one or more
practices, means, methods, operations, or processes which have been adopted or
are in use in such work place, unless the employer did not, and could not with
the exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.

(7)
The director, or his authorized representatives, shall have authority to assess
all civil penalties provided in this section, giving due consideration to the
appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the number of affected employees
of the employer being charged, the gravity of the violation, the size of the
employer's business, the good faith of the employer, and the history of
previous violations.

(8)
Civil penalties imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the director for
deposit in the supplemental pension fund established by RCW 51.44.033. Civil
penalties may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the department
brought in the superior court of the county where the violation is alleged to
have occurred, or the department may utilize the procedures for collection of
civil penalties as set forth in RCW 51.48.120 through 51.48.150.

(9) A civil penalty may not be assessed against an employer for
failure to address a hazard within an accident prevention program unless: (a)
There is a separate specific standard in rule or variance addressing the
subject matter of the hazard; or (b) as a result of the separate recognized
hazard, the employer has been found to be in violation of RCW 49.17.060.

---
END ---