BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Every
health carrier that provides coverage for any outpatient mental health service
shall comply with the following requirements:

(1)
In performing a utilization review of mental health services for a specific
enrollee, the person performing the utilization review is limited to accessing
only the specific health care information for the particular enrollee in
question that is necessary to complete the review.

(2) In performing an audit of mental health services, the person
performing the audit is limited to accessing only the records of persons
covered by the specific health carrier for which the audit is being performed,
except as otherwise permitted by RCW 70.02.050 and 71.05.630.

---
END ---