BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.30 RCW to read as follows:

Every invitation to bid on a contract that is expected to cost in
excess of fifty thousand dollars for the construction, alteration, or repair of
any public building or public work of the state or a state agency or
municipality as defined under RCW 39.04.010, an institution of higher education
as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, or a school district shall require the
electrical, mechanical, or heating, venting, and air conditioning work to be bid
separately from the general contractor's bid.

---
END ---