BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.34.230 and 1995 c 318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of acquiring conservation futures ((as well as)) and
other rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and
84.34.220, and for the purposes of development, maintenance, and operation
of real property acquired according to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, a
county may levy an amount not to exceed six and one-quarter cents per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation against the assessed valuation of all taxable property
within the county. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax
levy authorized in this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.34.240 and 1971 ex.s. c 243 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any board of county commissioners may establish by resolution a
special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to which it may
credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts placed in this fund
may be used ((solely)) for the purpose of acquiring rights and interests
in real property pursuant to the terms of RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220 and
for the purposes of development, maintenance, and operation of real property
acquired according to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220. Nothing in this section
shall be construed as limiting in any manner methods and funds otherwise
available to a county for financing the acquisition of such rights and
interests in real property.

---
END ---