BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
15.17.243 and 1997 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((inspector-at-large)) district manager for district two as
defined in WAC 16‑458‑075 is authorized to transfer two hundred
thousand dollars from the ((horticultural)) fruit and vegetable
district fund to the plant pest account within the agricultural local fund.
The amount transferred is to be derived from fees collected for state
inspections of tree fruits and is to be used solely for activities related to
the control of Rhagoletis pomonella in district two. The transfer of funds
shall occur by June 1, 1997. On June 30, ((1999)) 2001, any
unexpended portion of the two hundred thousand dollars shall be returned to the
((horticultural)) fruit and vegetable district fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect June 30, 1999.

---
END ---