BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Existing statutes related to the birth defects surveillance are redundant to
other reportable conditions rules. Repeal of these sections will allow for
consolidation of birth defects surveillance with other notifiable conditions.
This is expected to improve the quality and efficiency of reporting for
practitioners as well as health systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
70.58.300 and 1959 c 177 s 1;

(2) RCW
70.58.310 and 1991 c 3 s 344, 1979 c 141 s 110, & 1959 c 177
s 2;

(3) RCW
70.58.320 and 1991 c 3 s 345, 1984 c 156 s 1, 1979 c 141 s 111,
& 1959 c 177 s 3;

(4) RCW
70.58.322 and 1984 c 156 s 2;

(5) RCW
70.58.324 and 1984 c 156 s 3;

(6) RCW
70.58.330 and 1984 c 156 s 4 & 1959 c 177 s 4;

(7) RCW
70.58.332 and 1984 c 156 s 5;

(8) RCW
70.58.334 and 1984 c 156 s 6;

(9) RCW
70.58.338 and 1984 c 156 s 7;

(10) RCW
70.58.340 and 1991 c 3 s 346, 1979 c 141 s 112, & 1959 c 177
s 5; and

(11) RCW
70.58.350 and 1959 c 177 s 6.

---
END ---