BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.260 and 1979 ex.s. c 193 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All
real property interests, including fee simple or any lesser interest,
development rights, easements, covenants and conservation futures, as that
latter term is defined in RCW 84.34.220 as now or hereafter amended, used
exclusively for the conservation of ecological systems, natural resources, or
open space, including park lands, held by any nonprofit corporation or
association the primary purpose of which is the conducting or facilitating of
scientific research or the conserving of natural resources or open space for
the general public, or real property used exclusively as a roadside park,
held by any nonprofit organization, association, or corporation shall be
exempt from ad valorem taxation if either of the following conditions are met:

(1)
To the extent feasible considering the nature of the property interest
involved, such property interests shall be used and effectively dedicated
primarily for the purpose of providing scientific research or educational
opportunities for the general public or the preservation of native plants or
animals, or biotic communities, or works of ancient man or geological or
geographical formations, of distinct scientific and educational interest, and
for roadside parks, for the purpose of public use and enjoyment of travelers or
the community in which the roadside park may be located, and not for the
pecuniary benefit of any person or company, as defined in RCW 82.04.030, and
shall be open to the general public for educational and scientific research
purposes, and for roadside parks, for the public use and enjoyment of
travelers or the community in which the roadside park may be located,
subject to reasonable restrictions designed for its protection; or

(2)
Such property interests shall be subject to an option, accepted in writing by
the state, a city or a county, or department of the United States government,
for the purchase thereof by the state, a city or a county, or the United
States, at a price not exceeding the lesser of the following amounts: (a) The
sum of the original purchase cost to such nonprofit corporation or association
plus interest from the date of acquisition by such corporation or association
at the rate of six percent per annum compounded annually to the date of the
exercise of the option; or (b) the appraised value of the property at the time
of the granting of the option, as determined by the department of revenue or
when the option is held by the United States, or by an appropriate agency
thereof.

(3) For the purpose of this section, a "roadside park"
is real property essentially unimproved except for restroom facilities and open
structures, does not exceed one acre in size, and located adjacent to a state
maintained highway.

---
END ---