BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.20.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Manufactured/Mobile
Home Landlord-Tenant Act".

Sec.
2. RCW
59.20.030 and 1998 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Abandoned" as it relates to a mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model owned by a tenant in a mobile home park, mobile home park
cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision or tenancy in a mobile home lot
means the tenant has defaulted in rent and by absence and by words or actions
reasonably indicates the intention not to continue tenancy;

(2)
"Landlord" means the owner of a mobile home park and includes the
agents of a landlord;

(3)
"Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built according
to the United States department of housing and urban development manufactured
home construction and safety standards act, which is a national preemptive
building code. A manufactured home also: (a) Includes plumbing, heating, air
conditioning, and electrical systems; (b) is built on a permanent chassis; and
(c) can be transported in one or more sections with each section at least eight
feet wide and forty feet long when transported, or when installed on the site
is three hundred twenty square feet or greater;

(4)
"Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to June 15,
1976, to standards other than the United States department of housing and urban
development code, and acceptable under applicable state codes in effect at the
time of construction or introduction of the home into the state. Mobile homes
have not been built since the introduction of the United States department of
housing and urban development manufactured home construction and safety act;

(5)
"Mobile home lot" means a portion of a mobile home park or
manufactured housing community designated as the location of one mobile
home, manufactured home, or park model and its accessory buildings, and
intended for the exclusive use as a primary residence by the occupants of that
mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;

(((4)))
(6) "Mobile home park" or "manufactured housing
community" means any real property which is rented or held out for
rent to others for the placement of two or more mobile homes manufactured
homes, or park models for the primary purpose of production of income,
except where such real property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal
recreational purpose only and is not intended for year-round occupancy;

(((5)))
(7) "Mobile home park cooperative" or "manufactured
housing cooperative" means real property consisting of common areas
and two or more lots held out for placement of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, or park models in which both the individual lots and the common
areas are owned by an association of shareholders which leases or otherwise
extends the right to occupy individual lots to its own members;

(((6)))
(8) "Mobile home park subdivision" or "manufactured
housing subdivision" means real property, whether it is called a
subdivision, condominium, or planned unit development, consisting of common
areas and two or more lots held for placement of mobile homes, manufactured
homes, or park models in which there is private ownership of the individual
lots and common, undivided ownership of the common areas by owners of the
individual lots;

(((7)))
(9) "Park model" means a recreational vehicle intended for
permanent or semi-permanent installation and habitation;

(10)
"Recreational vehicle" means a travel trailer, motor home, truck
camper, or camping trailer that is primarily designed and used as temporary
living quarters, is either self-propelled or mounted on or drawn by another
vehicle, is transient, is not occupied as a primary residence, and is not
immobilized or permanently affixed to a mobile home lot;

(((8)))
(11) "Tenant" means any person, except a transient, who rents
a mobile home lot;

(((9)))
(12) "Transient" means a person who rents a mobile home lot
for a period of less than one month for purposes other than as a primary
residence;

(((10)))
(13) "Occupant" means any person, including a live-in care
provider, other than a tenant, who occupies a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model and mobile home lot.

Sec.
3. RCW
59.20.040 and 1997 c 86 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall regulate and determine legal rights, remedies, and obligations
arising from any rental agreement between a landlord and a tenant regarding a
mobile home lot and including specified amenities within the mobile home park,
mobile home park cooperative, or mobile home park subdivision, where the tenant
has no ownership interest in the property or in the association which owns the property,
whose uses are referred to as a part of the rent structure paid by the tenant.
All such rental agreements shall be unenforceable to the extent of any conflict
with any provision of this chapter. Chapter 59.12 RCW shall be applicable only
in implementation of the provisions of this chapter and not as an alternative
remedy to this chapter which shall be exclusive where applicable: PROVIDED,
That the provision of RCW 59.12.090, 59.12.100, and 59.12.170 shall not apply
to any rental agreement included under the provisions of this chapter. RCW
59.18.055 and 59.18.370 through 59.18.410 shall be applicable to any action of
forcible entry or detainer or unlawful detainer arising from a tenancy under
the provisions of this chapter, except when a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model or a tenancy in a mobile home lot is abandoned.
Rentals of mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models themselves
are governed by the Residential Landlord-Tenant Act, chapter 59.18 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
59.20.050 and 1981 c 304 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No landlord may offer a mobile home lot for rent to anyone without offering a
written rental agreement for a term of one year or more. No landlord may offer
to anyone any rental agreement for a term of one year or more for which the
monthly rental is greater, or the terms of payment or other material conditions
more burdensome to the tenant, than any month-to-month rental agreement also
offered to such tenant or prospective tenant. Anyone who desires to occupy a
mobile home lot for other than a term of one year or more may have the option
to be on a month-to-month basis but must waive, in writing, the right to such
one year or more term: PROVIDED, That annually, at any anniversary date of the
tenancy the tenant may require that the landlord provide a written rental
agreement for a term of one year. No landlord shall allow a mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model to be moved into a mobile home park in
this state until a written rental agreement has been signed by and is in the
possession of the parties: PROVIDED, That if the landlord allows the tenant to
move a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model into a mobile home
park without obtaining a written rental agreement for a term of one year or
more, or a written waiver of the right to a one-year term or more, the term of
the tenancy shall be deemed to be for one year from the date of occupancy of
the mobile home lot;

(2)
The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if:

(a)
The mobile home park or part thereof has been acquired or is under imminent
threat of condemnation for a public works project, or

(b)
An employer-employee relationship exists between a landlord and tenant;

(3)
The provisions of this section shall apply to any tenancy upon expiration of
the term of any oral or written rental agreement governing such tenancy.

Sec.
5. RCW
59.20.060 and 1990 c 174 s 1 and 1990 c 169 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any mobile home space tenancy regardless of the term, shall be based upon a
written rental agreement, signed by the parties, which shall contain:

(a)
The terms for the payment of rent, including time and place, and any additional
charges to be paid by the tenant. Additional charges that occur less frequently
than monthly shall be itemized in a billing to the tenant;

(b)
Reasonable rules for guest parking which shall be clearly stated;

(c)
The rules and regulations of the park;

(d)
The name and address of the person who is the landlord, and if such person does
not reside in the state there shall also be designated by name and address a
person who resides in the county where the mobile home park is located who is
authorized to act as agent for the purposes of service of notices and process.
If no designation is made of a person to act as agent, then the person to whom
rental payments are to be made shall be considered the agent;

(e)
The name and address of any party who has a secured interest in the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model;

(f)
A forwarding address of the tenant or the name and address of a person who
would likely know the whereabouts of the tenant in the event of an emergency or
an abandonment of the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model;

(g)(i)
A covenant by the landlord that, except for acts or events beyond the control
of the landlord, the mobile home park will not be converted to a land use that
will prevent the space that is the subject of the lease from continuing to be
used for its intended use for a period of three years after the beginning of
the term of the rental agreement;

(ii)
A rental agreement may, in the alternative, contain a statement that the park
may be sold or otherwise transferred at any time with the result that
subsequent owners may close the mobile home park, or that the landlord may
close the park at any time after the required notice. The covenant or
statement required by this subsection must appear in print that is larger than
the other text of the lease and must be set off by means of a box, blank space,
or comparable visual device;

The
requirements of this subsection shall apply to tenancies initiated after April
28, 1989.

(h)
The terms and conditions under which any deposit or portion thereof may be
withheld by the landlord upon termination of the rental agreement if any moneys
are paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit or as security for
performance of the tenant's obligations in a rental agreement;

(i)
A listing of the utilities, services, and facilities which will be available to
the tenant during the tenancy and the nature of the fees, if any, to be
charged;

(j)
A description of the boundaries of a mobile home space sufficient to inform the
tenant of the exact location of the tenant's space in relation to other
tenants' spaces;

(k)
A statement of the current zoning of the land on which the mobile home park is
located; and

(l)
A statement of the expiration date of any conditional use, temporary use, or
other land use permit subject to a fixed expiration date that is necessary for
the continued use of the land as a mobile home park.

(2)
Any rental agreement executed between the landlord and tenant shall not contain
any provision:

(a)
Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guest parking unless a violation
of the rules for guest parking occurs: PROVIDED, That a fee may be charged for
guest parking which covers an extended period of time as defined in the rental
agreement;

(b)
Which authorizes the towing or impounding of a vehicle except upon notice to
the owner thereof or the tenant whose guest is the owner of the vehicle;

(c)
Which allows the landlord to alter the due date for rent payment or increase
the rent: (i) During the term of the rental agreement if the term is less than
one year, or (ii) more frequently than annually if the term is for one year or
more: PROVIDED, That a rental agreement may include an escalation clause for a
pro rata share of any increase in the mobile home park's real property taxes or
utility assessments or charges, over the base taxes or utility assessments or
charges of the year in which the rental agreement took effect, if the clause
also provides for a pro rata reduction in rent or other charges in the event of
a reduction in real property taxes or utility assessments or charges, below the
base year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a rental agreement for a term exceeding one
year may provide for annual increases in rent in specified amounts or by a
formula specified in such agreement;

(d)
By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego rights or remedies under this
chapter;

(e)
Allowing the landlord to charge an "entrance fee" or an "exit
fee";

(f)
Which allows the landlord to charge a fee for guests: PROVIDED, That a
landlord may establish rules charging for guests who remain on the premises for
more than fifteen days in any sixty-day period;

(g)
By which the tenant agrees to waive or forego homestead rights provided by
chapter 6.13 RCW. This subsection shall not prohibit such waiver after a
default in rent so long as such waiver is in writing signed by the husband and
wife or by an unmarried claimant and in consideration of the landlord's
agreement not to terminate the tenancy for a period of time specified in the
waiver if the landlord would be otherwise entitled to terminate the tenancy
under this chapter; or

(h)
By which, at the time the rental agreement is entered into, the landlord and
tenant agree to the selection of a particular arbitrator.

Sec.
6. RCW
59.20.070 and 1993 c 66 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A
landlord shall not:

(1)
Deny any tenant the right to sell such tenant's mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model within a park or require the removal of the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model from the park because of the sale
thereof. Requirements for the transfer of the rental agreement are in RCW
59.20.073;

(2)
Restrict the tenant's freedom of choice in purchasing goods or services but may
reserve the right to approve or disapprove any exterior structural improvements
on a mobile home space: PROVIDED, That door-to-door solicitation in the mobile
home park may be restricted in the rental agreement. Door-to-door solicitation
does not include public officials or candidates for public office meeting or
distributing information to tenants in accordance with subsection (4) of this
section;

(3)
Prohibit meetings by tenants of the mobile home park to discuss mobile home
living and affairs, including political caucuses or forums for or speeches of
public officials or candidates for public office, or meetings of organizations
that represent the interest of tenants in the park, held in any of the park
community or recreation halls if these halls are open for the use of the
tenants, conducted at reasonable times and in an orderly manner on the
premises, nor penalize any tenant for participation in such activities;

(4)
Prohibit a public official or candidate for public office from meeting with or
distributing information to tenants in their individual mobile homes,
manufactured homes, or park models, nor penalize any tenant for
participating in these meetings or receiving this information;

(5)
Evict a tenant, terminate a rental agreement, decline to renew a rental
agreement, increase rental or other tenant obligations, decrease services, or
modify park rules in retaliation for any of the following actions on the part
of a tenant taken in good faith:

(a)
Filing a complaint with any state, county, or municipal governmental authority
relating to any alleged violation by the landlord of an applicable statute,
regulation, or ordinance;

(b)
Requesting the landlord to comply with the provision of this chapter or other
applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance of the state, county, or
municipality;

(c)
Filing suit against the landlord for any reason;

(d)
Participation or membership in any homeowners association or group;

(6)
Charge to any tenant a utility fee in excess of actual utility costs or
intentionally cause termination or interruption of any tenant's utility
services, including water, heat, electricity, or gas, except when an
interruption of a reasonable duration is required to make necessary repairs;

(7)
Remove or exclude a tenant from the premises unless this chapter is complied
with or the exclusion or removal is under an appropriate court order; or

(8)
Prevent the entry or require the removal of a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model for the sole reason that the mobile home has reached a
certain age. Nothing in this subsection shall limit a landlords' right to
exclude or expel a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model for any
other reason, including but not limited to, fire and safety concerns
provided such action conforms to chapter 59.20 RCW or any other statutory provision.

Sec.
7. RCW
59.20.073 and 1993 c 66 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any rental agreement shall be assignable by the tenant to any person to whom he
or she sells or transfers title to the mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model.

(2)
A tenant who sells a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
within a park shall notify the landlord in writing of the date of the intended
sale and transfer of the rental agreement at least fifteen days in advance of
such intended transfer and shall notify the buyer in writing of the provisions
of this section. The tenant shall verify in writing to the landlord payment of
all taxes, rent, and reasonable expenses due on the mobile home,
manufactured home, or park model and mobile home lot.

(3)
The landlord shall notify the selling tenant, in writing, of a refusal
to permit transfer of the rental agreement at least seven days in advance of
such intended transfer.

(4)
The landlord may require the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
to meet applicable fire and safety standards.

(5)
The landlord shall approve or disapprove of the assignment of a rental
agreement on the same basis that the landlord approves or disapproves of any
new tenant, and any disapproval shall be in writing. Consent to an assignment
shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(((5)))
(6) Failure to notify the landlord in writing, as required under
subsection (2) of this section; or failure of the new tenant to make a good
faith attempt to arrange an interview with the landlord to discuss assignment
of the rental agreement; or failure of the current or new tenant to obtain
written approval of the landlord for assignment of the rental agreement, shall
be grounds for disapproval of such transfer.

Sec.
8. RCW
59.20.074 and 1990 c 169 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A secured party who has a security interest in a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model that is located within a mobile home park and who has a
right to possession of the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
under RCW 62A.9-503, shall be liable to the landlord from the date the secured
party receives written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, for
rent for occupancy of the mobile home space under the same terms the tenant was
paying prior to repossession, and any other reasonable expenses incurred after
the receipt of the notice, until disposition of the mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model under RCW 62A.9-504. The notice of default by a tenant
must state the amount of rent and the amount and nature of any reasonable
expenses that the secured party is liable for payment to the landlord. The
notice must also state that the secured party will be provided a copy of the
rental agreement previously signed by the tenant and the landlord upon request.

(2)
This section shall not affect the availability of a landlord's lien as provided
in chapter 60.72 RCW.

(3)
As used in this section, "security interest" shall have the same
meaning as this term is defined in RCW 62A.1-201, and "secured party"
shall have the same meaning as this term is defined in RCW 62A.9-105.

(4)
For purposes of this section, "reasonable expenses" means any routine
maintenance and utility charges for which the tenant is liable under the rental
agreement.

(5)
Any rent or other reasonable expenses owed by the secured party to the landlord
pursuant to this section shall be paid to the landlord prior to the removal of
the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model from the mobile home
park.

(6)
If a secured party who has a secured interest in a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model that is located in a mobile home park becomes liable to
the landlord pursuant to this section, then the relationship between the
secured party and the landlord shall be governed by the rental agreement
previously signed by the tenant and the landlord unless otherwise agreed,
except that the term of the rental agreement shall convert to a month-to-month
tenancy. No waiver is required to convert the rental agreement to a
month-to-month tenancy. Either the landlord or the secured party may terminate
the month-to-month tenancy upon giving written notice of thirty days or more.
The secured party and the landlord are not required to execute a new rental
agreement. Nothing in this section shall be construed to be a waiver of any
rights by the tenant.

Sec.
9. RCW
59.20.075 and 1984 c 58 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Initiation
by the landlord of any action listed in RCW 59.20.070(((4))) (5)
within one hundred twenty days after a good faith and lawful act by the tenant
or within one hundred twenty days after any inspection or proceeding of a
governmental agency resulting from such act, shall create a rebuttable
presumption affecting the burden of proof, that the action is a reprisal or
retaliatory action against the tenant: PROVIDED, That if the court finds that
the tenant made a complaint or report to a governmental authority within one
hundred twenty days after notice of a proposed increase in rent or other action
in good faith by the landlord, there is a rebuttable presumption that the
complaint or report was not made in good faith: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no
presumption against the landlord shall arise under this section, with respect
to an increase in rent, if the landlord, in a notice to the tenant of increase
in rent, specifies reasonable grounds for said increase, which grounds may
include a substantial increase in market value due to remedial action under
this chapter.

Sec.
10. RCW
59.20.080 and 1998 c 118 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A landlord shall not terminate or fail to renew a tenancy of a tenant or the
occupancy of an occupant, of whatever duration except for one or more of the
following reasons:

(a)
Substantial violation, or repeated or periodic violations of the rules of the
mobile home park as established by the landlord at the inception of the tenancy
or as assumed subsequently with the consent of the tenant or for violation of
the tenant's duties as provided in RCW 59.20.140. The tenant shall be given
written notice to cease the rule violation immediately. The notice shall state
that failure to cease the violation of the rule or any subsequent violation of
that or any other rule shall result in termination of the tenancy, and that the
tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen days: PROVIDED, That for a
periodic violation the notice shall also specify that repetition of the same
violation shall result in termination: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the case of a
violation of a "material change" in park rules with respect to pets,
tenants with minor children living with them, or recreational facilities, the
tenant shall be given written notice under this chapter of a six month period
in which to comply or vacate;

(b)
Nonpayment of rent or other charges specified in the rental agreement, upon
five days written notice to pay rent and/or other charges or to vacate;

(c)
Conviction of the tenant of a crime, commission of which threatens the health,
safety, or welfare of the other mobile home park tenants. The tenant shall be
given written notice of a fifteen day period in which to vacate;

(d)
Failure of the tenant to comply with local ordinances and state laws and
regulations relating to mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park models
or mobile home, manufactured homes, or park model living within a
reasonable time after the tenant's receipt of notice of such noncompliance from
the appropriate governmental agency;

(e)
Change of land use of the mobile home park including, but not limited to,
conversion to a use other than for mobile homes, manufactured homes, or park
models or conversion of the mobile home park to a mobile home park
cooperative or mobile home park subdivision: PROVIDED, That the landlord shall
give the tenants twelve months' notice in advance of the effective date of such
change, except that for the period of six months following April 28, 1989, the
landlord shall give the tenants eighteen months' notice in advance of the
proposed effective date of such change;

(f)
Engaging in "criminal activity." "Criminal activity" means
a criminal act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health,
safety, or welfare of the tenants. A park owner seeking to evict a tenant or
occupant under this subsection need not produce evidence of a criminal
conviction, even if the alleged misconduct constitutes a criminal offense.
Notice from a law enforcement agency of criminal activity constitutes
sufficient grounds, but not the only grounds, for an eviction under this
subsection. Notification of the seizure of illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155
is evidence of criminal activity and is grounds for an eviction under this
subsection. The requirement that any tenant or occupant register as a sex
offender under RCW 9A.44.130 is grounds for eviction under this subsection. If
criminal activity is alleged to be a basis of termination, the park owner may
proceed directly to an unlawful detainer action;

(g)
The tenant's application for tenancy contained a material misstatement that
induced the park owner to approve the tenant as a resident of the park, and the
park owner discovers and acts upon the misstatement within one year of the time
the resident began paying rent;

(h)
If the landlord serves a tenant three fifteen-day notices within a twelve-month
period to comply or vacate for failure to comply with the material terms of the
rental agreement or park rules. The applicable twelve-month period shall
commence on the date of the first violation;

(i)
Failure of the tenant to comply with obligations imposed upon tenants by
applicable provisions of municipal, county, and state codes, statutes,
ordinances, and regulations, including chapter 59.20 RCW. The landlord shall
give the tenant written notice to comply immediately. The notice must state
that failure to comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the
tenant shall vacate the premises within fifteen days;

(j)
The tenant engages in disorderly or substantially annoying conduct upon the
park premises that results in the destruction of the rights of others to the
peaceful enjoyment and use of the premises. The landlord shall give the tenant
written notice to comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to
comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall
vacate the premises within fifteen days;

(k)
The tenant creates a nuisance that materially affects the health, safety, and
welfare of other park residents. The landlord shall give the tenant written
notice to cease the conduct that constitutes a nuisance immediately. The
notice must state that failure to cease the conduct will result in termination
of the tenancy and that the tenant shall vacate the premises in five days;

(l)
Any other substantial just cause that materially affects the health, safety,
and welfare of other park residents. The landlord shall give the tenant
written notice to comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to
comply will result in termination of the tenancy and that the tenant shall
vacate the premises within fifteen days; or

(m)
Failure to pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental agreement three
or more times in a twelve-month period, commencing with the date of the first
violation, after service of a five-day notice to comply or vacate.

(2)
Within five days of a notice of eviction as required by subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the landlord and tenant shall submit any dispute to mediation.
The parties may agree in writing to mediation by an independent third party or
through industry mediation procedures. If the parties cannot agree, then
mediation shall be through industry mediation procedures. A duty is imposed
upon both parties to participate in the mediation process in good faith for a
period of ten days for an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this section. It
is a defense to an eviction under subsection (1)(a) of this section that a
landlord did not participate in the mediation process in good faith.

(3)
Chapters 59.12 and 59.18 RCW govern the eviction of recreational vehicles from
mobile home parks.

Sec.
11. RCW
59.20.130 and 1993 c 66 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of the landlord to:

(1)
Comply with codes, statutes, ordinances, and administrative rules applicable to
the mobile home park;

(2)
Maintain the common premises and prevent the accumulation of stagnant water and
to prevent the detrimental effects of moving water when such condition is not
the fault of the tenant;

(3)
Keep any shared or common premises reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from
defects to reduce the hazards of fire or accident;

(4)
Keep all common premises of the mobile home park, and vacant mobile home
lots, not in the possession of tenants, free of weeds or plant growth
noxious and detrimental to the health of the tenants and free from potentially
injurious or unsightly objects and condition;

(5)
Exterminate or make a reasonable effort to exterminate rodents, vermin, or
other pests dangerous to the health and safety of the tenant whenever
infestation exists on the common premises or whenever infestation occurs in the
interior of a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model as a result
of infestation existing on the common premises;

(6)
Maintain and protect all utilities provided to the mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model in good working condition. Maintenance responsibility
shall be determined at that point where the normal mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model utilities "hook-ups" connect to those
provided by the landlord or utility company;

(7)
Respect the privacy of the tenants and shall have no right of entry to a mobile
home, manufactured home, or park model without the prior written consent
of the occupant, except in case of emergency or when the occupant has abandoned
the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model. Such consent may be
revoked in writing by the occupant at any time. The ownership or management
shall have a right of entry upon the land upon which a mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model is situated for maintenance of utilities, to insure
compliance with applicable codes, statutes, ordinances, administrative rules,
and the rental agreement and the rules of the park, and protection of the
mobile home park at any reasonable time or in an emergency, but not in a manner
or at a time which would interfere with the occupant's quiet enjoyment. The
ownership or management shall make a reasonable effort to notify the tenant of
their intention of entry upon the land which a mobile home, manufactured home,
or park model is located prior to entry;

(8)
Allow tenants freedom of choice in the purchase of goods and services, and not
unreasonably restrict access to the mobile home park for such purposes;

(9)
Maintain roads within the mobile home park in good condition; and

(10)
Notify each tenant within five days after a petition has been filed by the
landlord for a change in the zoning of the land where the mobile home park is
located and make a description of the change available to the tenant.

A
landlord shall not have a duty to repair a defective condition under this
section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to the tenant under this
chapter, if the defective condition complained of was caused by the conduct of
the tenant, the tenant's family, invitee, or other person acting under the
tenant's control, or if a tenant unreasonably fails to allow the landlord
access to the property for purposes of repair.

Sec.
12. RCW
59.20.135 and 1994 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that some mobile home park owners transfer the
responsibility for the upkeep of permanent structures within the mobile home
park to the park tenants. This transfer sometimes occurs after the permanent
structures have been allowed to deteriorate. Many mobile home parks consist
entirely of senior citizens who do not have the financial resources or physical
capability to make the necessary repairs to these structures once they have
fallen into disrepair. The inability of the tenants to maintain permanent
structures can lead to significant safety hazards to the tenants as well as to
visitors to the mobile home park. The legislature therefore finds and declares
that it is in the public interest and necessary for the public health and
safety to prohibit mobile home park owners from transferring the duty to
maintain permanent structures in mobile home parks to the tenants.

(2)
A mobile home park owner is prohibited from transferring responsibility for the
maintenance or care of permanent structures within the mobile home park to the
tenants of the park. A provision within a rental agreement or other document
transferring responsibility for the maintenance or care of permanent structures
within the mobile home park to the park tenants is void.

(3)
A "permanent structure" for purposes of this section includes the
clubhouse, carports, storage sheds, or other permanent structure. A permanent
structure does not include structures built or affixed by a tenant. A
permanent structure includes only those structures that were provided as
amenities to the park tenants.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a park owner from
requiring a tenant to maintain his or her mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model or yard. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit
a park owner from transferring responsibility for the maintenance or care of
permanent structures within the mobile home park to an organization of park
tenants or to an individual park tenant when requested by the tenant
organization or individual tenant.

Sec.
13. RCW
59.20.145 and 1993 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
tenant in a mobile home park may share his or her mobile home, manufactured
home, or park model with any person over eighteen years of age, if that
person is providing live-in home health care or live-in hospice care to the
tenant under an approved plan of treatment ordered by the tenant's physician.
The live-in care provider is not considered a tenant of the park and shall have
no rights of tenancy in the park. Any agreement between the tenant and the
live-in care provider does not change the terms and conditions of the rental
agreement between the landlord and the tenant. The live-in care provider shall
comply with the rules of the mobile home park, the rental agreement, and this
chapter. The landlord may not charge a guest fee for the live-in care
provider.

Sec.
14. RCW
59.20.150 and 1979 ex.s. c 186 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any notice required by this chapter to be given to a tenant shall be served on
behalf of the landlord: (a) By delivering a copy personally to the tenant; or
(b) ((if the tenant is absent from the mobile home, by leaving a copy at the
mobile home with some person of suitable age and discretion and by sending a
copy through the mail addressed to the tenant's place of residence; or (c)))
if the tenant is absent from the mobile home ((and a person of suitable age
and discretion cannot be found to leave a copy with, then)),
manufactured home, or park model by affixing a copy of the notice in a
conspicuous place on the mobile home, manufactured home, or park model
and also sending a copy through the mail addressed to the tenant at the
tenant's last known address.

(2)
Any notice required by this chapter to be given to the landlord shall be served
by the tenant in the same manner as provided for in subsection (1) of this
section, or by mail to the landlord at such place as shall be expressly
provided in the rental agreement.

(3)
The landlord shall state in any notice of eviction required by RCW 59.20.080(1)
as now or hereafter amended the specific reason for eviction in a clear and
concise manner.

Sec.
15. RCW
59.20.170 and 1979 ex.s. c 186 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All moneys paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as security for
performance of the tenant's obligations in a rental agreement shall promptly be
deposited by the landlord in a trust account, maintained by the landlord for
the purpose of holding such security deposits for tenants of the landlord, in a
bank, savings and loan association, mutual savings bank, or licensed escrow
agent located in Washington. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, unless otherwise agreed in writing, the landlord shall be entitled
to receipt of interest paid on such trust account deposits. The landlord shall
provide the tenant with a written receipt for the deposit and shall provide
written notice of the name and address and location of the depository and any
subsequent change thereof. If during a tenancy the status of landlord is
transferred to another, any sums in the deposit trust account affected by such
transfer shall simultaneously be transferred to an equivalent trust account of
the successor landlord, and the successor landlord shall promptly notify the
tenant of the transfer and of the name, address and location of the new
depository. The tenant's claim to any moneys paid under this section shall be
prior to that of any creditor of the landlord, including a trustee in
bankruptcy or receiver, even if such moneys are commingled.

(2)
All moneys paid, in excess of two months' rent on the mobile home lot, to the
landlord by the tenant as a deposit as security for performance of the tenant's
obligations in a rental agreement shall be deposited into an interest-bearing
trust account for the particular tenant. The interest accruing on the deposit
in the account, minus fees charged to administer the account, shall be paid to
the tenant on an annual basis. All other provisions of subsection (1) of this
section shall apply to deposits under this subsection.

Sec.
16. RCW
59.20.210 and 1984 c 58 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If at any time during the tenancy, the landlord fails to carry out any of the
duties imposed by RCW 59.20.130, and notice of the defect is given to the
landlord pursuant to RCW 59.20.200, the tenant may submit to the landlord or
the landlord's designated agent by certified mail or in person at least two
bids to perform the repairs necessary to correct the defective condition from
licensed or registered persons, or if no licensing or registration requirement
applies to the type of work to be performed, from responsible persons capable
of performing such repairs. Such bids may be submitted to the landlord at the
same time as notice is given pursuant to RCW 59.20.200.

(2)
If the landlord fails to commence repair of the defective condition within a
reasonable time after receipt of notice from the tenant, the tenant may
contract with the person submitting the lowest bid to make the repair, and upon
the completion of the repair and an opportunity for inspection by the landlord
or the landlord's designated agent, the tenant may deduct the cost of repair
from the rent in an amount not to exceed the sum expressed in dollars
representing one month's rental of the tenant's mobile home space in any
calendar year. When, however, the landlord is required to begin remedying the
defective condition within thirty days under RCW 59.20.200, the tenant cannot
contract for repairs for at least fifteen days following receipt of bids by the
landlord. The total costs of repairs deducted by the tenant in any calendar
year under this subsection shall not exceed the sum expressed in dollars
representing one month's rental of the tenant's mobile home space.

(3)
Two or more tenants shall not collectively initiate remedies under this section.
Remedial action under this section shall not be initiated for conditions in the
design or construction existing in a mobile home park before June 7, 1984.

(4)
The provisions of this section shall not:

(a)
Create a relationship of employer and employee between landlord and tenant; or

(b)
Create liability under the worker's compensation act; or

(c)
Constitute the tenant as an agent of the landlord for the purposes of ((RCW
60.04.010 and 60.04.040)) mechanics' and materialmen's liens under
chapter 60.04 RCW.

(5)
Any repair work performed under this section shall comply with the requirements
imposed by any applicable code, statute, ordinance, or rule. A landlord whose
property is damaged because of repairs performed in a negligent manner may
recover the actual damages in an action against the tenant.

(6)
Nothing in this section shall prevent the tenant from agreeing with the
landlord to undertake the repairs in return for cash payment or a reasonable
reduction in rent, the agreement to be between the parties, and this agreement
does not alter the landlord's obligations under this chapter.

Sec.
17. RCW
59.20.220 and 1984 c 58 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a court or an arbitrator determines that:

(a)
A landlord has failed to carry out a duty or duties imposed by RCW 59.20.130;
and

(b)
A reasonable time has passed for the landlord to remedy the defective condition
following notice to the landlord under RCW 59.20.200 or such other time as may
be allotted by the court or arbitrator; the court or arbitrator may determine
the diminution in rental value of the property due to the defective condition
and shall render judgment against the landlord for the rent paid in excess of
such diminished rental value from the time of notice of such defect to the time
of decision and any costs of repair done pursuant to ((section 4 of this act))
RCW 59.20.210 for which no deduction has been previously made. Such
decisions may be enforced as other judgments at law and shall be available to
the tenant as a set-off against any existing or subsequent claims of the
landlord.

The
court or arbitrator may also authorize the tenant to contract to make further
corrective repairs. The court or arbitrator shall specify a time period in
which the landlord may make such repairs before the tenant may contract for
such repairs. Such repairs shall not exceed the sum expressed in dollars
representing one month's rental of the tenant's mobile home space in any one
calendar year.

(2)
The tenant shall not be obligated to pay rent in excess of the diminished
rental value of the mobile home space until such defect or defects are corrected
by the landlord or until the court or arbitrator determines otherwise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A city or town shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a tenant or the
tenant's agent for a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model installation
in a mobile home park to the landlord.

(2)
A city or town shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a person engaged
in the business of moving or installing a mobile home, manufactured home, or
park model in a mobile home park to the tenant and the landlord.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Landlord" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(b)
"Mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(c)
"Mobile or manufactured home installation" has the same meaning as in
RCW 43.63B.010; and

(d)
"Tenant" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A code city shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a tenant or the
tenant's agent for a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model installation
in a mobile home park to the landlord.

(2)
A code city shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a person engaged in
the business of moving or installing a mobile home, manufactured home, or park
model in a mobile home park to the tenant and the landlord.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Landlord" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(b)
"Mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(c)
"Mobile or manufactured home installation" has the same meaning as in
RCW 43.63B.010; and

(d)
"Tenant" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. A
new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A county shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a tenant or the tenant's
agent for a mobile home, manufactured home, or park model installation in a
mobile home park to the landlord.

(2)
A county shall transmit a copy of any permit issued to a person engaged in the
business of moving or installing a mobile home, manufactured home, or park
model in a mobile home park to the tenant and the landlord.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Landlord" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(b)
"Mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(c)
"Mobile or manufactured home installation" has the same meaning as in
RCW 43.63B.010; and

(d)
"Tenant" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---