BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.285 and 1998 c 207 s 4 and 1998 c 41 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
department shall forthwith revoke the license of any driver for the period of
one calendar year unless otherwise provided in this section, upon receiving a
record of the driver's conviction of any of the following offenses, when the
conviction has become final:

(1)
For vehicular homicide the period of revocation shall be two years. The
revocation period shall be tolled during any period of total confinement for
the offense;

(2)
Vehicular assault. The revocation period shall be tolled during any period of
total confinement for the offense;

(3)
Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
narcotic drug, or under the influence of any other drug to a degree which
renders the driver incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle, for the period
prescribed in RCW 46.61.5055;

(4)
For attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle the period of revocation
shall be two years;

(5)
Any other felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

(((5)))
(6) Failure to stop and give information or render aid as required under
the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in
the death or personal injury of another or resulting in damage to a vehicle
that is driven or attended by another;

(((6)))
(7) Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under oath
to the department under Title 46 RCW or under any other law relating to the
ownership or operation of motor vehicles;

(((7)))
(8) Reckless driving upon a showing by the department's records that the
conviction is the third such conviction for the driver within a period of two
years.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.311 and 1998 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a
motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year,
except as specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.342 or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), or 74.20A.320,
whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended by reason
of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has been committed,
pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or
probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. Whenever the license
or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect until the
person provides a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i)
The department shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee
shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(2)(a)
Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public
highways has been revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been
removed, is not entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored
until: (i) After the expiration of one year from the date the license or
privilege to drive was revoked; or (ii) after the expiration of the
applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265, 46.20.285,
46.20.3101, or 46.61.5055((; (iii) after the expiration of two years
for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of
the applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265)).

(b)(i)
After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application
for a new license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount
of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or
46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon
the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit,
or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified.

(c)
Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving
ability of the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a
motor vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall
not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a)
Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV
of the nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or
46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other
state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical control
of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical test
of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one hundred
fifty dollars.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.61.024 and 1983 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
driver of a motor vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to immediately
bring his vehicle to a stop and who drives his vehicle in a manner indicating a
wanton or willful disregard for the lives or property of others while
attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle, after being given a visual or
audible signal to bring the vehicle to a stop, shall be guilty of a class ((C))
(B) felony. The signal given by the police officer may be by hand,
voice, emergency light, or siren. The officer giving such a signal shall be in
uniform and ((his vehicle)) shall be ((appropriately marked showing
it to be)) driving an official police vehicle. An official
police vehicle means any municipal, county, or state police vehicle
appropriately equipped with emergency lights and siren.

The
license or permit to drive or any nonresident driving privilege of a person
convicted of a violation of this section shall be revoked for two years
by the department of licensing.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1998 c 290 s 4, 1998 c 219 s 4, 1998 c 82 s 1, and 1998 c 78 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XIVMurder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

XIIIMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

XIRape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

XKidnapping 1 (RCW
9A.40.020)

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, a narcotic from Schedule
I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam, from Schedule I-V to someone under
18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 88.12.029)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Promoting Prostitution 1
(RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 88.12.029)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Vehicular Homicide, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 88.12.029)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

VIBribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VPersistent prison
misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Abandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

IVResidential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW
9A.56.080)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
88.12.155(3))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 88.12.032)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Use of Proceeds of
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

IIICriminal Gang
Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2
(RCW 9A.42.030)

Abandonment of dependent
person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Extortion 2 (RCW
9A.56.130)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Theft of livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

IIUnlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Class B Felony Theft of Rental, Leased, or
Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle
(RCW 46.61.024)

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

ITheft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Class C Felony Theft of
Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Possession of Stolen
Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

((Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle
(RCW 46.61.024)))

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Possess Controlled
Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from
Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

---
END ---