BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.035 and 1969 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, when responding to an emergency
call or when in the pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law or
when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm, may exercise the
privileges set forth in this section, but subject to the conditions ((herein))
stated in this section.

(2)
The driver of an authorized emergency vehicle may:

(a)
Park or stand, irrespective of the provisions of this chapter;

(b)
Proceed past a red or stop signal or stop sign, but only after slowing down as
may be necessary for safe operation;

(c)
Exceed the maximum speed limits so long as he does not endanger life or
property;

(d)
Disregard regulations governing direction of movement or turning in specified
directions.

(3)
The exemptions ((herein)) granted in this section to an
authorized emergency vehicle shall apply only when such vehicle is making use
of visual signals meeting the requirements of RCW 46.37.190, except that: (a)
An authorized emergency vehicle operated as a police vehicle need not be
equipped with or display a red light visible from in front of the vehicle; (b)
authorized emergency vehicles shall use audible signals when necessary to warn
others of the emergency nature of the situation but in no case shall they be
required to use audible signals while parked or standing.

(4)
The ((foregoing)) provisions of this section shall not relieve
the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due
regard for the safety of all persons, nor shall such provisions protect the
driver from the consequences of his or her reckless disregard for the
safety of others.

(5) If a police officer decides not to pursue or terminates
pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, the officer and his or
her employing agency are not liable for any subsequent damages or injuries proximately
caused by the flight of the suspect.

---
END ---