BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.16.138 and 1975 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
board of commissioners, council, or board of directors or other governing board
of any county, city, town, school district, port district, public utility
district, sewer district, water district, irrigation district, or other
municipal corporation or political subdivision is authorized to purchase
insurance to protect and hold personally harmless any of its commissioners,
council members, directors, or other governing board members, and any of its
other officers, employees, and agents, including but not limited to law
enforcement personnel, from any action, claim, or proceeding instituted
against the foregoing individuals arising out of the performance, purported
performance, or failure of performance, in good faith of duties for, or
employment with, such institutions and to hold these individuals harmless from
any expenses connected with the defense, settlement, or monetary judgments from
such actions, claims, or proceedings. The purchase of such insurance for any
of the foregoing individuals and the policy limits shall be discretionary with
the municipal corporation or political subdivision, and such insurance shall
not be considered to be compensation for these individuals.

The provisions of this section are cumulative and in addition to
any other provision of law authorizing any municipal corporation or political
subdivision to purchase liability insurance.

---
END ---