BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.43.300 and 1965 c 8 s 43.43.300 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
on ((July 1, 1963)) the effective date of this act, every
Washington state patrol employee who is a member of the retirement fund shall
contribute ((seven percent)) a percentage of his or her
monthly salary that is the same percentage contributed by the employer as
determined under chapter 41.45 RCW, with a maximum of seven percent, which
shall be deducted from the compensation of each member on each and every
payroll.

In event a member severs his or her connection with the
Washington state patrol or is dismissed, the amount paid by the state of
Washington shall remain in the retirement fund.

---
END ---