BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 26.23 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington state child support lien registry is created within the division
of child support of the department of social and health services. The state
child support lien registry shall:

(a)
File and maintain a record of child support liens against personal and real
property located anywhere in the state of Washington based on child support
arrears in cases receiving full collection services from the division of child
support or another state's child support enforcement agency. The record shall
include the amount of the lien and date it was filed; and

(b)
Be of public record and accessed, using the debtor's name and identifying
number, by computer through the internet or by an automated telephone system.
Inquiries made to the state child support lien registry are not of public
record.

(2)
The secretary of social and health services may adopt rules for filing liens in
and administering the state child support lien registry created in this
section.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.18.055 and 1997 c 58 s 942 are each amended to read as follows:

Child
support debts, not paid when due, become liens by operation of law against all
property of the debtor with priority of a secured creditor. This lien shall be
separate and apart from, and in addition to, any other lien created by, or
provided for, in this title. ((The lien attaches)) Liens filed with:

(1)
A county auditor attach on the date of filing to all real and personal
property of the debtor ((on the date of filing with the county auditor of))
in the county in which the ((property is located)) lien is
filed; and

(2)
The Washington state child support lien registry created in section 1 of this
act attach on the date of filing to all real and personal property of the
debtor within the state of Washington.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.20A.060 and 1997 c 58 s 906 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary may assert a lien upon the real or personal property of a
responsible parent:

(a)
When a support payment is past due, if the parent's support order contains
notice that liens may be enforced against real and personal property, or notice
that action may be taken under this chapter;

(b)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support debt under RCW 74.20A.040;

(c)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of financial responsibility
under RCW 74.20A.055;

(d)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of parental
responsibility;

(e)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support owed under RCW 26.23.110;
or

(f)
When appropriate under RCW 74.20A.270.

(2)
The division of child support may use uniform interstate lien forms adopted by
the United States department of health and human services to assert liens on a
responsible parent's real and personal property located in Washington or
another state.

(3)
The claim of the department for a support debt, not paid when due, shall be a
lien against all property of the debtor with priority of a secured creditor.
This lien shall be separate and apart from, and in addition to, any other lien
created by, or provided for, in this title. ((The lien shall attach)) Liens
filed with:

(a)
A county auditor attach on the date of filing to all real and personal
property of the debtor ((on the date of filing of such statement with the
county auditor of)) in the county in which ((such property is
located)) the lien is filed; and

(b)
The Washington state child support lien registry created in section 1 of this
act attach on the date of filing to all real and personal property of the
debtor within the state of Washington.

(4)
Whenever a support lien has been filed and there is in the possession of any
person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of
the state having notice of said lien any property which may be subject to the
support lien, such property shall not be paid over, released, sold,
transferred, encumbered or conveyed, except as provided for by the exemptions
contained in RCW 74.20A.090 and 74.20A.130, unless:

(a)
A written release or waiver signed by the secretary has been delivered to said
person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision or department of
the state; or

(b)
A determination has been made in an adjudicative proceeding pursuant to RCW
74.20A.055 or by a superior court ordering release of said support lien on the
basis that no debt exists or that the debt has been satisfied.

Sec.
4. RCW
65.08.070 and 1927 c 278 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A conveyance of real property, when acknowledged by the person
executing the same (the acknowledgment being certified as required by law), may
be recorded in the office of the recording officer of the county where the
property is situated. A child support lien may be recorded in the
Washington state child support lien registry created in section 1 of this act.
Every such conveyance not so recorded is void as against any subsequent
purchaser or mortgagee in good faith and for a valuable consideration from the
same vendor, his heirs or devisees, of the same real property or any portion
thereof whose conveyance is first duly recorded. An instrument is deemed recorded
the minute it is filed for record.

---
END ---