BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.04.030 and 1981 c 187 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following persons are liable to punishment:

(1)
A person who commits in the state any crime, in whole or in part.

(2)
A person who commits out of the state any act which, if committed within it,
would be theft and is afterward found in the state with any of the stolen
property.

(3)
A person who being out of the state, counsels, causes, procures, aids, or abets
another to commit a crime in this state.

(4)
A person who, being out of the state, abducts or kidnaps by force or fraud, any
person, contrary to the laws of the place where the act is committed, and
brings, sends, or conveys such person into this state.

(5)
A person who commits an act without the state which affects persons or property
within the state, which, if committed within the state, would be a crime.

(6)
A person who, being out of the state, makes a statement, declaration,
verification, or certificate under RCW 9A.72.085 which, if made within the
state, would be perjury.

(7) A person who commits an act onboard a conveyance within the
state of Washington, including the airspace over the state of Washington, that
subsequently lands, docks, or stops within the state which, if committed within
the state, would be a crime.

---
END ---