BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
7.68.015 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((labor and industries)) community, trade, and economic
development shall, through the office of crime victims' advocacy
established by RCW 43.280.080, operate the crime victims' compensation
program within the appropriations and the conditions and limitations on the
appropriations provided for this program.

Sec.
2. RCW
7.68.020 and 1997 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following words and phrases as used in this chapter have the meanings set forth
in this section unless the context otherwise requires.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ((labor and industries)) community,
trade, and economic development. For the purposes of applying Title 51 RCW as
provided in this chapter, the term "department" as used in that title
means the department of community, trade, and economic development.

(2)
"Criminal act" means an act committed or attempted in this state
which is punishable as a felony or gross misdemeanor under the laws of this
state, or an act committed outside the state of Washington against a resident
of the state of Washington which would be compensable had it occurred inside
this state; and the crime occurred in a state which does not have a crime
victims compensation program, for which the victim is eligible as set forth in
the Washington compensation law, or an act of terrorism as defined in 18 U.S.C.
Sec. 2331, as it exists on May 2, 1997, committed outside of the United States
against a resident of the state of Washington, except as follows:

(a)
The operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, train, boat, or aircraft in
violation of law does not constitute a "criminal act" unless:

(i)
The injury or death was intentionally inflicted;

(ii)
The operation thereof was part of the commission of another non-vehicular
criminal act as defined in this section;

(iii)
The death or injury was the result of the operation of a motor vehicle after
July 24, 1983, and a preponderance of the evidence establishes that the death
was the result of vehicular homicide under RCW 46.61.520, or a conviction of
vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522, has been obtained: PROVIDED, That in
cases where a probable criminal defendant has died in perpetration of vehicular
assault or, because of physical or mental infirmity or disability the
perpetrator is incapable of standing trial for vehicular assault, the
department may, by a preponderance of the evidence, establish that a vehicular
assault had been committed and authorize benefits; or

(iv)
Injury or death caused by a driver in violation of RCW 46.61.502;

(b)
Neither an acquittal in a criminal prosecution nor the absence of any such
prosecution is admissible in any claim or proceeding under this chapter as
evidence of the noncriminal character of the acts giving rise to such claim or
proceeding, except as provided for in subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section;

(c)
Evidence of a criminal conviction arising from acts which are the basis for a
claim or proceeding under this chapter is admissible in such claim or
proceeding for the limited purpose of proving the criminal character of the
acts; and

(d)
Acts which, but for the insanity or mental irresponsibility of the perpetrator,
would constitute criminal conduct are deemed to be criminal conduct within the
meaning of this chapter.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development. For the purposes of applying Title 51 RCW as
provided in this chapter, the term "director" as used in that title
means the director of the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Office" means the office of crime victims' advocacy of the
department of community, trade, and economic development. For the purposes of
applying Title 51 RCW as provided in this chapter, the term "supervisor of
industrial insurance" as used in that title means the head of the office
of crime victims' advocacy.

(5)
"Victim" means a person who suffers bodily injury or death as a
proximate result of a criminal act of another person, the victim's own good
faith and reasonable effort to prevent a criminal act, or his good faith effort
to apprehend a person reasonably suspected of engaging in a criminal act. For
the purposes of receiving benefits pursuant to this chapter, "victim"
is interchangeable with "employee" or (("workman")) "worker"
as defined in chapter 51.08 RCW ((as now or hereafter amended)).

(((4)))
(6) "Child," "accredited school,"
"dependent," "beneficiary," "average monthly
wage," (("director,")) "injury,"
"invalid," "permanent partial disability," and
"permanent total disability" have the meanings assigned to them in
chapter 51.08 RCW ((as now or hereafter amended)).

(((5)))
(7) "Gainfully employed" means engaging on a regular and
continuous basis in a lawful activity from which a person derives a livelihood.

(((6)))
(8) "Private insurance" means any source of recompense
provided by contract available as a result of the claimed injury or death at
the time of such injury or death, or which becomes available any time
thereafter.

(((7)))
(9) "Public insurance" means any source of recompense provided
by statute, state or federal, available as a result of the claimed injury or
death at the time of such injury or death, or which becomes available any time
thereafter.

Sec.
3. RCW
7.68.035 and 1997 c 66 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Whenever any person is found guilty in any superior court of having committed a
crime, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, there shall be
imposed by the court upon such convicted person a penalty assessment. The
assessment shall be in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law and
shall be five hundred dollars for each case or cause of action that includes
one or more convictions of a felony or gross misdemeanor and two hundred fifty
dollars for any case or cause of action that includes convictions of only one
or more misdemeanors.

(b)
Whenever any juvenile is adjudicated of any offense in any juvenile offense
disposition under Title 13 RCW, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, there shall be imposed upon the juvenile offender a penalty
assessment. The assessment shall be in addition to any other penalty or fine
imposed by law and shall be one hundred dollars for each case or cause of
action that includes one or more adjudications for a felony or gross
misdemeanor and seventy-five dollars for each case or cause of action that
includes adjudications of only one or more misdemeanors.

(2)
The assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to
motor vehicle crimes defined in Title 46 RCW except those defined in the
following sections: RCW 46.61.520, 46.61.522, 46.61.024, 46.52.090, 46.70.140,
46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.52.100, 46.20.410, 46.52.020, 46.10.130, 46.09.130,
46.61.5249, 46.61.525, 46.61.685, 46.61.530, 46.61.500, 46.61.015, 46.52.010,
46.44.180, 46.10.090(2), and 46.09.120(2).

(3)
Whenever any person accused of having committed a crime posts bail in superior
court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10.19 RCW and such bail is
forfeited, there shall be deducted from the proceeds of such forfeited bail a
penalty assessment, in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed by law,
equal to the assessment which would be applicable under subsection (1) of this
section if the person had been convicted of the crime.

(4)
Such penalty assessments shall be paid by the clerk of the superior court to
the county treasurer who shall monthly transmit the money as provided in RCW
10.82.070. Each county shall deposit fifty percent of the money it receives
per case or cause of action under subsection (1) of this section and retains
under RCW 10.82.070, not less than one and seventy-five one-hundredths percent
of the remaining money it retains under RCW 10.82.070 and the money it retains
under chapter 3.62 RCW, and all money it receives under subsection (7) of this
section into a fund maintained exclusively for the support of comprehensive
programs to encourage and facilitate testimony by the victims of crimes and
witnesses to crimes. A program shall be considered "comprehensive"
only after approval of the department upon application by the county
prosecuting attorney. The department shall approve as comprehensive only programs
which:

(a)
Provide comprehensive services to victims and witnesses of all types of crime
with particular emphasis on serious crimes against persons and property. It is
the intent of the legislature to make funds available only to programs which do
not restrict services to victims or witnesses of a particular type or types of
crime and that such funds supplement, not supplant, existing local funding
levels;

(b)
Are administered by the county prosecuting attorney either directly through the
prosecuting attorney's office or by contract between the county and agencies
providing services to victims of crime;

(c)
Make a reasonable effort to inform the known victim or his surviving dependents
of the existence of this chapter and the procedure for making application for
benefits;

(d)
Assist victims in the restitution and adjudication process; and

(e)
Assist victims of violent crimes in the preparation and presentation of their
claims to the department ((of labor and industries)) under this chapter.

Before
a program in any county west of the Cascade mountains is submitted to the
department for approval, it shall be submitted for review and comment to each
city within the county with a population of more than one hundred fifty
thousand. The department will consider if the county's proposed comprehensive
plan meets the needs of crime victims in cases adjudicated in municipal,
district or superior courts and of crime victims located within the city and
county.

(5)
Upon submission to the department of a letter of intent to adopt a
comprehensive program, the prosecuting attorney shall retain the money
deposited by the county under subsection (4) of this section until such time as
the county prosecuting attorney has obtained approval of a program from the
department. Approval of the comprehensive plan by the department must be
obtained within one year of the date of the letter of intent to adopt a
comprehensive program. The county prosecuting attorney shall not make any
expenditures from the money deposited under subsection (4) of this section
until approval of a comprehensive plan by the department. If a county
prosecuting attorney has failed to obtain approval of a program from the
department under subsection (4) of this section or failed to obtain approval of
a comprehensive program within one year after submission of a letter of intent
under this section, the county treasurer shall monthly transmit one hundred
percent of the money deposited by the county under subsection (4) of this
section to the state treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education
account established under RCW 43.08.250.

(6)
County prosecuting attorneys are responsible to make every reasonable effort to
insure that the penalty assessments of this chapter are imposed and collected.

(7)
Every city and town shall transmit monthly one and seventy-five one-hundredths
percent of all money, other than money received for parking infractions,
retained under RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, and 35.20.220 to the county treasurer
for deposit as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
7.68.085 and 1990 c 3 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director ((of labor and industries)) shall institute a cap on medical
benefits of one hundred fifty thousand dollars per injury or death. Payment
for medical services in excess of the cap shall be made available to any
innocent victim under the same conditions as other medical services and if the
medical services are:

(1)
Necessary for a previously accepted condition;

(2)
Necessary to protect the victim's life or prevent deterioration of the victim's
previously accepted condition; and

(3)
Not available from an alternative source.

The
director of financial management and the director of ((labor and industries))
community, trade, and economic development shall monitor expenditures
from the public safety and education account. Once each fiscal quarter, the
director of financial management shall determine if expenditures from the
public safety and education account during the prior fiscal quarter exceeded
allotments by more than ten percent. Within thirty days of a determination
that expenditures exceeded allotments by more than ten percent, the director of
financial management shall develop and implement a plan to reduce expenditures
from the account to a level that does not exceed the allotments. Such a plan
may include across-the-board reductions in allotments from the account to all nonjudicial
agencies except for the crime victims' compensation program. In
implementing the plan, the director of financial management shall seek the
cooperation of judicial agencies in reducing their expenditures from the
account. The director of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees prior to implementation of the plan.

Development
and implementation of the plan is not required if the director of financial
management notifies the legislative fiscal committees that increases in the
official revenue forecast for the public safety and education account for that
fiscal quarter will eliminate the need to reduce expenditures from the
account. The official revenue forecast for the public safety and education
account shall be prepared by the economic and revenue forecast council pursuant
to RCW 82.33.020 and 82.33.010.

For
the purposes of this section, an individual will not be required to use his or
her assets other than funds recovered as a result of a civil action or criminal
restitution, for medical expenses or pain and suffering, in order to qualify
for an alternative source of payment.

The
director shall, in cooperation with the department of social and health
services, establish by October 1, 1989, a process to aid crime victims in
identifying and applying for appropriate alternative benefit programs, if any,
administered by the department of social and health services.

Sec.
5. RCW
7.68.145 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 176 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, all law enforcement, criminal justice, or other
governmental agencies, or hospital; any physician or other practitioner of the
healing arts; or any other organization or person having possession or control
of any investigative or other information pertaining to any alleged criminal
act or victim concerning which a claim for benefits has been filed under this
chapter, shall, upon request, make available to and allow the reproduction of
any such information by the ((section of the)) department, the office
of crime victims' advocacy administering this chapter, or other
public employees in their performance of their official duties under this
chapter.

No
person or organization, public or private, shall incur any legal liability by
reason of releasing any such information to the director ((of labor and
industries or the section of the department)), the office of crime
victims' advocacy which administers this chapter, or other public
employees in the performance of their official duties under this chapter.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.280.080 and 1995 c 241 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of crime victims' advocacy is established in the department of
community, trade, and economic development. The office shall assist
communities in planning and implementing services for crime victims, advocate
on behalf of crime victims in obtaining needed services and resources, and
advise local and state governments on practices, policies, and priorities that
impact crime victims. In addition, the office shall administer grant programs
for sexual assault treatment and prevention services, as authorized in this
chapter, and administer the crime victims' compensation program established
under chapter 7.68 RCW.

Sec.
7. RCW
51.52.200 and 1997 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter ((shall)) applies to orders, decisions, and awards made by
the department of community, trade, and economic development under chapter 7.68
RCW. References in this chapter to the "director" in context of
orders, decisions, and awards made under chapter 7.68 RCW mean the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development. References in
this chapter to the "department of labor and industries" in context
of orders, decisions, and awards made under chapter 7.68 RCW mean the
department of community, trade, and economic development. However, this
chapter does not apply to matters concerning employers as parties to any
settlement, appeal, or other action in accordance with chapter 7.68 RCW.

Sec.
8. RCW
9.94A.142 and 1997 c 121 s 4 and 1997 c 52 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
When restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the amount of
restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within one hundred eighty days
except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The court may continue
the hearing beyond the one hundred eighty days for good cause. The court shall
then set a minimum monthly payment that the offender is required to make
towards the restitution that is ordered. The court should take into
consideration the total amount of the restitution owed, the offender's present,
past, and future ability to pay, as well as any assets that the offender may
have. During the period of supervision, the community corrections officer may
examine the offender to determine if there has been a change in circumstances
that warrants an amendment of the monthly payment schedule. The community
corrections officer may recommend a change to the schedule of payment and shall
inform the court of the recommended change and the reasons for the change. The
sentencing court may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the
report from the community corrections officer of the change in circumstances.
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, restitution ordered by a
court pursuant to a criminal conviction shall be based on easily ascertainable
damages for injury to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for
treatment for injury to persons, and lost wages resulting from injury.
Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental anguish,
pain and suffering, or other intangible losses, but may include the costs of
counseling reasonably related to the offense. The amount of restitution shall
not exceed double the amount of the offender's gain or the victim's loss from
the commission of the crime. For the purposes of this section, the offender
shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for a term of ten years following
the offender's release from total confinement or ten years subsequent to the
entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. Prior to the
expiration of the initial ten-year period, the superior court may extend
jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years for payment of
restitution. The portion of the sentence concerning restitution may be modified
as to amount, terms and conditions during either the initial ten-year period or
subsequent ten-year period if the criminal judgment is extended, regardless of
the expiration of the offender's term of community supervision and regardless
of the statutory maximum for the crime. The court may not reduce the total
amount of restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay
the total amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be
supervised by the department of corrections for ten years following the entry
of the judgment and sentence or ten years following the offender's release from
total confinement. If jurisdiction under the criminal judgment is extended,
the department is not responsible for supervision of the offender during the
subsequent period.

(2)
Restitution shall be ordered whenever the offender is convicted of an offense
which results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property or as
provided in subsection (3) of this section unless extraordinary circumstances
exist which make restitution inappropriate in the court's judgment and the
court sets forth such circumstances in the record. In addition, restitution
shall be ordered to pay for an injury, loss, or damage if the offender pleads
guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's
recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of
an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.

(3)
Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first, second, or third
degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall include: (a) All of the
victim's medical expenses that are associated with the rape and resulting
pregnancy; and (b) child support for any child born as a result of the rape if
child support is ordered pursuant to a civil superior court or administrative
order for support for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution
payments made on behalf of the victim's child to the Washington state child support
registry under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the victim and
child shall not be included in the order. The defendant shall receive a credit
against any obligation owing under the administrative or superior court order
for support of the victim's child. For the purposes of this subsection, the
offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until the defendant has
satisfied support obligations under the superior court or administrative order
but not longer than a maximum term of twenty-five years following the
offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five years subsequent to
the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is longer. The court
may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered because the offender may
lack the ability to pay the total amount. The department shall supervise the
offender's compliance with the restitution ordered under this subsection.

(4)
Regardless of the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section,
the court shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to
benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the
court does not order restitution and the victim of the crime has been
determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation
act, the ((department of labor and industries)) office of crime
victims' advocacy of the department of community, trade, and economic
development, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation program,
may petition the court within one year of entry of the judgment and sentence
for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the ((department
of labor and industries)) office of crime victims' advocacy, the
court shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.

(5)
In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, a defendant who has been found
guilty of an offense involving fraud or other deceptive practice or an
organization which has been found guilty of any such offense may be ordered by
the sentencing court to give notice of the conviction to the class of persons
or to the sector of the public affected by the conviction or financially
interested in the subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in
designated areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.

(6)
This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses available to the victim,
survivors of the victim, or defendant including support enforcement remedies
for support ordered under subsection (3) of this section for a child born as a
result of a rape of a child victim. The court shall identify in the judgment
and sentence the victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is
due each victim. The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution
in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution collected
through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and
must be distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there
is more than one victim.

(7)
This section shall apply to offenses committed after July 1, 1985.

Sec.
9. RCW
9.95.210 and 1996 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In granting probation, the superior court may suspend the imposition or the
execution of the sentence and may direct that the suspension may continue upon
such conditions and for such time as it shall designate, not exceeding the
maximum term of sentence or two years, whichever is longer.

(2)
In the order granting probation and as a condition thereof, the superior court
may in its discretion imprison the defendant in the county jail for a period
not exceeding one year and may fine the defendant any sum not exceeding the
statutory limit for the offense committed, and court costs. As a condition of
probation, the superior court shall require the payment of the penalty
assessment required by RCW 7.68.035. The superior court may also require the
defendant to make such monetary payments, on such terms as it deems appropriate
under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the
court for the payment of family support; (b) to make restitution to any person
or persons who may have suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of
the crime in question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or
fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the
offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses
which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay such fine as
may be imposed and court costs, including reimbursement of the state for costs
of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; (d)
following consideration of the financial condition of the person subject to
possible electronic monitoring, to pay for the costs of electronic monitoring
if that monitoring was required by the court as a condition of release from
custody or as a condition of probation; (e) to contribute to a county or
interlocal drug fund; and (f) to make restitution to a public agency for the
costs of an emergency response under RCW 38.52.430, and may require bonds for
the faithful observance of any and all conditions imposed in the probation.

(3)
The superior court shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is
entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68
RCW. If the superior court does not order restitution and the victim of the
crime has been determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime victims'
compensation act, the ((department of labor and industries)) office
of crime victims' advocacy of the department of community, trade, and economic
development, as administrator of the crime victims' compensation program,
may petition the superior court within one year of imposition of the sentence
for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of a petition from the ((department
of labor and industries)) office of crime victims' advocacy, the
superior court shall hold a restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution
order.

(4)
In granting probation, the superior court may order the probationer to report
to the secretary of corrections or such officer as the secretary may designate
and as a condition of the probation to follow the instructions of the
secretary. If the county legislative authority has elected to assume
responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers
within its jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall
report to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In
cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one
county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions for the
probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility for the
probationer's county of residence.

(5)
If the probationer has been ordered to make restitution and the superior court
has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the probationer shall make a
reasonable effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made. If the
superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has not been made as
ordered, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms
of probation not less than three months prior to the termination of the
probation period. The secretary of corrections will promulgate rules and
regulations for the conduct of the person during the term of probation. For
defendants found guilty in district court, like functions as the secretary
performs in regard to probation may be performed by probation officers employed
for that purpose by the county legislative authority of the county wherein the
court is located.

Sec.
10. RCW
13.40.190 and 1997 c 338 s 29 and 1997 c 121 s 9 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
In its dispositional order, the court shall require the respondent to make
restitution to any persons who have suffered loss or damage as a result of the
offense committed by the respondent. In addition, restitution may be ordered
for loss or damage if the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer
offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be
required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which,
pursuant to a plea agreement, are not prosecuted. The payment of restitution
shall be in addition to any punishment which is imposed pursuant to the other
provisions of this chapter. The court may determine the amount, terms, and
conditions of the restitution including a payment plan extending up to ten
years if the court determines that the respondent does not have the means to
make full restitution over a shorter period. Restitution may include the costs
of counseling reasonably related to the offense. If the respondent
participated in the crime with another person or other persons, all such
participants shall be jointly and severally responsible for the payment of
restitution. For the purposes of this section, the respondent shall remain
under the court's jurisdiction for a maximum term of ten years after the
respondent's eighteenth birthday. Prior to the expiration of the ten-year
period, the juvenile court may extend the judgment for the payment of
restitution for an additional ten years.

(2)
Regardless of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the court shall
order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to benefits under
the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the court does not
order restitution and the victim of the crime has been determined to be entitled
to benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, the ((department of
labor and industries)) office of crime victims' advocacy of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, as administrator
of the crime victims' compensation program, may petition the court within one
year of entry of the disposition order for entry of a restitution order. Upon
receipt of a petition from the ((department of labor and industries)) office
of crime victims' advocacy, the court shall hold a restitution hearing and
shall enter a restitution order.

(3)
If an order includes restitution as one of the monetary assessments, the county
clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the order. The restitution
to victims named in the order shall be paid prior to any payment for other
penalties or monetary assessments.

(4)
A respondent under obligation to pay restitution may petition the court for
modification of the restitution order.

Sec.
11. RCW
72.09.095 and 1995 c 234 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
year the department shall transfer twenty-five percent of the total annual
revenues and receipts received in each institutional betterment fund subaccount
to the department of ((labor and industries)) community, trade, and
economic development for the purpose of providing direct benefits to crime
victims through the crime victims' compensation program as outlined in chapter
7.68 RCW. This transfer takes priority over any expenditure of betterment
funds and shall be reflected on the monthly financial statements of each
institution's betterment fund subaccount.

Any
funds so transferred to the department of ((labor and industries)) community,
trade, and economic development shall be in addition to the crime victims'
compensation amount provided in an omnibus appropriation bill. It is the
intent of the legislature that the funds forecasted or transferred pursuant to
this section shall not reduce the funding levels provided by appropriation.

Sec.
12. RCW
74.08A.010 and 1997 c 58 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A family that includes an adult who has received temporary assistance for needy
families for sixty months after July 27, 1997, shall be ineligible for further
temporary assistance for needy families assistance.

(2)
For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the department shall
count any month in which an adult family member received a temporary assistance
for needy families cash assistance grant unless the assistance was provided
when the family member was a minor child and not the head of the household or
married to the head of the household.

(3)
The department shall refer recipients who require specialized assistance to
appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs through the department
of community, trade, and economic development, or the crime victims'
compensation program of ((the)) that department ((of labor and
industries)).

(4)
The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section by reason of hardship or if the
recipient meets the family violence options of section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA
of the federal social security act as amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of
recipients and their families exempted from subsection (1) of this section for
a fiscal year shall not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of
recipients and their families to which assistance is provided under the
temporary assistance for needy families program.

(5)
The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section until after the recipient has
received fifty-two months of assistance under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of labor and industries
pertaining to the crime victims' compensation program are transferred to the
department of community, trade, and economic development. All references to
the director or the department of labor and industries in the Revised Code of
Washington in context of the functions transferred in this section mean the
director or the department of community, trade, and economic development. All
references to the supervisor of industrial insurance in the Revised Code of
Washington in context of the functions transferred in this section mean the
head of the office of crime victims' advocacy of the department of community,
trade, and economic development.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of labor and industries pertaining
to the powers, functions, and duties transferred in subsection (1) of this
section shall be delivered to the custody of the department of community,
trade, and economic development. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of labor
and industries in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be made available to the department of community, trade, and economic
development. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department
of community, trade, and economic development.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of labor and industries for carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date
of this section, be transferred and credited to the department of community,
trade, and economic development to carry out the responsibilities of the crime
victims' compensation program.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and shall certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3)
All rules and all pending business before the department of labor and
industries pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred in
subsection (1) of this section shall be continued and acted upon by the
department of community, trade, and economic development. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the department of community, trade, and economic development.

(4)
The transfer by this section of the powers, duties, and functions of the
department of labor and industries shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(5)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---