BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to offenders convicted of crimes in a superior court or a
court of limited jurisdiction and who are not subject to the provisions of RCW
9.95.240 or 9.94A.230. An offender who has completed his or her sentence,
including fulfilling the conditions of any probation for the entire period
thereof, or who has been discharged from probation prior to the termination of
the period thereof, may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the
offender's record of conviction. If the court finds the offender meets the
tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the court may clear the
record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the
offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty; (b) if the offender
has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court setting aside the
verdict of guilty; or (c) the court dismissing the information or indictment
against the offender.

(2)
An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if:

(a)
There are any criminal charges against the offender pending in any court of
this state or another state, or in any federal court;

(b)
The offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(c)
The offense was a felony crime against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830;

(d)
The offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another state, or
federal court since the date the offender successfully completed his or her
sentence, including any probation;

(e)
The offense is a class B felony and less than ten years have passed since the
date the offender successfully completed his or her sentence, including any
probation;

(f)
The offense was a class C felony and less than five years have passed since the
date the offender successfully completed his or her sentence, including any
probation;

(g)
The offense was a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and operated to interrupt
the washout of a class B felony under RCW 9.94A.360 and less than ten years
have passed since the date of the conviction for the misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor;

(h)
The offense was a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor for which a statute provides
a specific period for counting prior offenses, including but not limited to the
period applicable to a "prior offense" under RCW 46.61.5055, and less
than the applicable period has passed; or

(i)
The offense was a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor not otherwise covered by
this subsection (2) and less than five years have passed since the date the
offender successfully completed his or her sentence, including any probation.

(3)
Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this
section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not
be included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a
sentence in any subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from
all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal case.

(4)
No person may seek or be granted a vacation of record of conviction for an
offense committed after the date upon which the person received a vacation of
record of conviction for any other offense.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.95.240 and 1957 c 227 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every defendant who has fulfilled the conditions of his of her probation
for the entire period thereof, or who ((shall have)) has been
discharged from probation prior to the termination of the period thereof, may
((at any time prior to the expiration of the maximum period of punishment
for the offense for which he has been convicted be permitted in the discretion
of the court to withdraw his plea of guilty and enter a plea of not guilty, or
if he has been convicted after a plea of not guilty, the court may in its
discretion set aside the verdict of guilty; and in either case, the court may
thereupon dismiss the information or indictment against such defendant, who
shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from
the offense or crime of which he has been convicted. The probationer shall be
informed of this right in his probation papers: PROVIDED, That in any
subsequent prosecution, for any other offense, such prior conviction may be
pleaded and proved, and shall have the same effect as if probation had not been
granted, or the information or indictment dismissed)) apply to the
sentencing court for a vacation of the defendant's record of conviction. If
the court finds the defendant meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of
this section, the court may clear the record of conviction by: (a) Permitting
the defendant to withdraw the defendant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of
not guilty; (b) if the defendant has been convicted after a plea of not guilty,
the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; or (c) the court dismissing the
information or indictment against the defendant.

(2)
An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if: (a) There are
any criminal charges against the defendant pending in any court of this state
or another state, or in any federal court; (b) the offense was a violent
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the offense was a felony crime against
persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830; (d) the defendant has been convicted of a
new crime in this state, another state, or federal court since the date the
defendant successfully completed probation; (e) the offense is a class B felony
and less than ten years have passed since the date the defendant successfully
completed probation; (f) the offense was a class C felony and less than five
years have passed since the date the defendant successfully completed
probation; (g) the offense was a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and less than
five years have passed since the date the defendant successfully completed
probation; or (h) the offense was a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and
operated to interrupt the washout of a class B felony under RCW 9.94A.360 and
less than ten years have passed since the date of the conviction for the
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor.

(3)
Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this
section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not
be included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a
sentence in any subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from
all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal case.

(4)
No person may seek or be granted a vacation of record of conviction for an
offense committed after the date upon which the person received a vacation of
record of conviction for any other offense.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.230 and 1987 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.220 may apply to the
sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the
court finds the offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section, the court may clear the record of conviction by: (a) Permitting the
offender to withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not
guilty; or (b) if the offender has been convicted after a plea of not guilty,
by the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) by the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the offender.

(2)
An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if: (a) There are
any criminal charges against the offender pending in any court of this state or
another state, or in any federal court; (b) the offense was a violent offense
as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the offense was a crime against persons as
defined in RCW 43.43.830; (d) the offender has been convicted of a new crime in
this state, another state, or federal court since the date of the offender's
discharge under RCW 9.94A.220; (e) the offense is a class B felony and less
than ten years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under
RCW 9.94A.220; and (f) the offense was a class C felony and less than five
years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged under RCW
9.94A.220.

(3)
Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this
section, the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not
be included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a
sentence in any subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from
all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

(4) No person may seek or be granted a vacation of record of
conviction for an offense committed after the date upon which the person
received a vacation of record of conviction for any other offense.

---
END ---