BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.56.200 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.200 are each amended to read as
follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of robbery in the first degree if:

(a)
In the commission of a robbery or of immediate flight therefrom, he or
she:

(((a)))
(i) Is armed with a deadly weapon; or

(((b)))
(ii) Displays what appears to be a firearm or other deadly weapon; or

(((c)))
(iii) Inflicts bodily injury; or

(b)
He or she commits a robbery within and against a financial institution as
defined in RCW 7.88.010 which is located in this state and lawfully engaged in
business.

(2) Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

---
END ---