BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.16.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.16.060 are each amended to read as
follows:

(1)
In any prosecution for a crime, it is a defense that:

(a)
The actor participated in the crime under compulsion by another who by threat
or use of force created an apprehension in the mind of the actor that in case
of refusal he or she or another would be liable to immediate death or
immediate grievous bodily injury; and

(b)
That such apprehension was reasonable upon the part of the actor; and

(c)
That the actor would not have participated in the crime except for the duress
involved.

(2)
The defense of duress is not available if the crime charged is murder ((or)),
manslaughter, or homicide by abuse.

(3)
The defense of duress is not available if the actor intentionally or recklessly
places himself or herself in a situation in which it is probable that he
or she will be subject to duress.

(4) The defense of duress is not established solely by a showing
that a married person acted on the command of his or her spouse.

---
END ---