BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.04.030 and 1998 c 230 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall supervise the providing of prompt and efficient care and
treatment, including care provided by physician assistants governed by the
provisions of chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW, acting under a supervising
physician, and including chiropractic care, to workers injured during the
course of their employment at the least cost consistent with promptness and
efficiency, without discrimination or favoritism, and with as great uniformity
as the various and diverse surrounding circumstances and locations of
industries will permit and to that end shall, from time to time, establish and
adopt and supervise the administration of printed forms, rules, regulations,
and practices for the furnishing of such care and treatment((: PROVIDED,
That)). This subsection is subject to the following:

(a)
The medical coverage decisions of the department do not constitute a
"rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16), nor are such decisions subject
to the rule-making provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW except that criteria for
establishing medical coverage decisions shall be adopted by rule after
consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee established in RCW
51.04.110((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(b)
The department may recommend to an injured worker particular health care
services and providers where specialized treatment is indicated or where cost
effective payment levels or rates are obtained by the department((: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(c)
The department may enter into contracts for goods and services including,
but not limited to, durable medical equipment so long as state-wide access to
quality service is maintained for injured workers; and

(d)
A department employee is not authorized to practice in any field or specialty
in the course of or incident to his or her official duties unless the employee
is currently licensed, certified, or registered as a provider in that field or
specialty. The department shall adopt rules implementing this subsection
(1)(d).

(2)
The director shall, in consultation with interested persons, establish and, in
his or her discretion, periodically change as may be necessary, and make
available a fee schedule of the maximum charges to be made by any physician,
surgeon, chiropractor, hospital, druggist, physicians' assistants as defined in
chapters 18.57A and 18.71A RCW, acting under a supervising physician or other
agency or person rendering services to injured workers. The department shall
coordinate with other state purchasers of health care services to establish as
much consistency and uniformity in billing and coding practices as possible,
taking into account the unique requirements and differences between programs.
No service covered under this title, including services provided to injured
workers, whether aliens or other injured workers, who are not residing in the
United States at the time of receiving the services, shall be charged or paid
at a rate or rates exceeding those specified in such fee schedule, and no
contract providing for greater fees shall be valid as to the excess. The
establishment of such a schedule, exclusive of conversion factors, does not
constitute "agency action" as used in RCW 34.05.010(3), nor does such
a fee schedule constitute a "rule" as used in RCW 34.05.010(16).

(3)
The director or self-insurer, as the case may be, shall make a record of the
commencement of every disability and the termination thereof and, when bills
are rendered for the care and treatment of injured workers, shall approve and
pay those which conform to the adopted rules, regulations, established fee
schedules, and practices of the director and may reject any bill or item
thereof incurred in violation of the principles laid down in this section or
the rules, regulations, or the established fee schedules and rules and
regulations adopted under it.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.32.110 and 1997 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any worker entitled to receive any benefits or claiming such under this title
shall, if requested by the department or self-insurer as authorized under
this title, submit himself or herself for medical examination, at a time
and from time to time, at a place reasonably convenient for the worker and as
may be provided by the rules of the department. An injured worker, whether an
alien or other injured worker, who is not residing in the United States at the
time that a medical examination is requested may be required to submit to an
examination at any location in the United States determined by the department
or self-insurer.

(2)
If the worker refuses to submit to medical examination, or obstructs the same,
or, if any injured worker shall persist in unsanitary or injurious practices
which tend to imperil or retard his or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit
to such medical or surgical treatment as is reasonably essential to his or her
recovery or refuse or obstruct evaluation or examination for the purpose of
vocational rehabilitation or does not cooperate in reasonable efforts at such
rehabilitation, the department or the self-insurer upon approval by the
department, with notice to the worker may suspend any further action on any
claim of such worker so long as such refusal, obstruction, noncooperation, or
practice continues and reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation for such
period: PROVIDED, That the department or the self-insurer shall not suspend
any further action on any claim of a worker or reduce, suspend, or deny any
compensation if a worker has good cause for refusing to submit to or to
obstruct any examination, evaluation, treatment or practice requested by the
department or required under this section.

(3)
If the worker necessarily incurs traveling expenses in attending the
examination pursuant to the request of the department, such traveling expenses
shall be repaid to him or her out of the accident fund upon proper voucher and
audit or shall be repaid by the self-insurer, as the case may be.

(4)(a)
If the medical examination required by this section causes the worker to be
absent from his or her work without pay:

(i)
In the case of a worker insured by the department, the worker shall be paid
compensation out of the accident fund in an amount equal to his or her usual
wages for the time lost from work while attending the medical examination; or

(ii)
In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, the self-insurer shall pay the
worker an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work
while attending the medical examination.

(b)
This subsection (4) shall apply prospectively to all claims regardless of the
date of injury.

Sec.
3. RCW
51.36.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the requirements of this title, whenever the director or the
self-insurer deems it necessary ((in order to resolve any medical issue, a))
to order a medical examination of a worker, the worker shall submit to
examination by a ((physician or physicians)) provider or providers
selected by the director, with the rendition of a report to the person ordering
the examination. The director, in his or her discretion, may charge the cost
of such examination or examinations to the self-insurer or to the medical aid
fund as the case may be. The cost of said examination shall include payment to
the worker of reasonable expenses connected therewith.

(2)
Examinations by the worker's treating provider or providers may be ordered
whenever necessary to resolve a medical issue. Examinations by independent
examiners may be ordered only in the following circumstances:

(a)
To resolve a disagreement among the treating providers concerning the best
course of treatment or the need for continuing treatment;

(b)
To determine whether the worker's condition is fixed and stable after
completion of a course of treatment, if the treating provider agrees that the
course of treatment is complete. If the treating provider does not agree that
the course of treatment is complete, an examination by an independent examiner
may be ordered under this subsection only if the examiner is chosen by
agreement between the worker and the department or self-insurer;

(c)
To provide consultation to the worker's treating provider when the care of the
worker has exceeded practice parameters established by the department. The
consultation is limited to reviewing diagnoses, determining the reason that
care has exceeded practice parameters, and/or providing suggestions for
alternate diagnoses and treatment procedures.

(3)
The course of treatment or care, including emergency services, for an accepted
condition may not be interrupted or delayed pending the examination report of
an independent examiner unless the director or designee finds that the
treatment or care is not medically necessary. This subsection does not apply
to procedures, determined by department rule, that can be delayed without harm
to the injured worker until a consultation opinion is obtained.

(4)
If the department or self-insurer relies on the report of an independent
examiner to deny, limit, or terminate benefits to a worker, the examiner must
be currently licensed, certified, or registered to practice in the same field
or specialty as the claimant's treating provider or providers.

(5)
Any provider licensed to practice in medicine and surgery under chapter 18.71
RCW, osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW, podiatric
medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW, dentistry under chapter 18.30
RCW, chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW, and psychology under chapter 18.83
RCW may be an independent examiner, within the appropriate scope of practice
for the examination to be performed and subject to department rules regarding
approval as an independent examiner.

(6)
For purposes of this section, "independent examiner" means a provider
or panel of providers, none of whom are a treating provider for the worker
being examined.

(7)
This section does not apply to special examinations for determining permanent
disabilities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act applies to all medical examinations, other than special examinations for
determining permanent disabilities, ordered by the department of labor and
industries or a self-insured employer under Title 51 RCW on or after the
effective date of this act.

---
END ---