BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.24.035 and 1987 c 212 s 1801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding RCW 51.24.030(1), the injured worker or beneficiary may not seek
damages ((against a design professional who is a third person and who has
been retained to perform professional services on a construction project, or
any employee of a design professional who is assisting or representing the
design professional in the performance of professional services on the site of
the construction project, unless responsibility for safety practices is
specifically assumed by contract, the provisions of which were mutually
negotiated, or the design professional actually exercised control over the
portion of the premises where the worker was injured)) for an injury or
occupational disease occurring in the course of employment at the site of a
construction project, whether accomplished by a single contract or by multiple
contracts, against the owner or developer of the project or against any person
or entity performing work, furnishing materials, or providing services to or
for the construction project including, but not limited to, design
professionals, construction managers, general or prime contractors, suppliers,
subcontractors of any tier, and any employee of a design professional,
construction manager, general or prime contractor, supplier, or subcontractor
of any tier.

(2)
The immunity provided by this section does not extend to any person or
entity who injures a worker by deliberate intention as defined in RCW
51.24.020, and it is against public policy to seek indemnification in
construction contracts against such liability. Such contractual clauses are
void and unenforceable.

(3)
The immunity provided by this section does not extend to manufacturers and
product sellers for product liability actions as defined in chapter 7.72 RCW.

(4)
The immunity provided by this section does not apply to the negligent
preparation of design plans and specifications by a design professional.

(((3)))
(5) For the purposes of this section, "design professional"
means an architect, professional engineer, land surveyor, or landscape
architect, who is licensed or authorized by law to practice such profession, or
any corporation organized under chapter 18.100 RCW or authorized under RCW
18.08.420 or 18.43.130 to render design services through the practice of one or
more of such professions.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.16.140 and 1989 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every employer who is not a self-insurer shall deduct from the pay of each of
his or her workers one-half of the amount he or she is required to pay((,))
for medical benefits within each risk classification, except that for
workers in the construction industry, the amount deducted shall not be more
than one-half of the basic manual premium rate established by the department
for the applicable risk classification. Such amount shall be periodically
determined by the director and reported by him or her to all employers under
this title: PROVIDED, That the state governmental unit shall pay the entire
amount into the medical aid fund for volunteers, as defined in RCW 51.12.035,
and the state apprenticeship council shall pay the entire amount into the
medical aid fund for registered apprentices or trainees, for the purposes of
RCW 51.12.130. The deduction under this section is not authorized for premiums
assessed under RCW 51.16.210.

(2)
It shall be unlawful for the employer, unless specifically authorized by this
title, to deduct or obtain any part of the premium or other costs required to
be by him or her paid from the wages or earnings of any of his or her workers,
and the making of or attempt to make any such deduction shall be a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All construction employers have a duty to provide a safe place to work for
their own employees and for the employees of their subcontractors of any tier
working at the site of a construction project. This duty shall be considered
within the context of standard construction industry practices; and this duty
includes implementation of a safety program that is effective in practice.

(2)
All construction employers shall take reasonable steps to ensure that their
safety programs are designed to comply with Title 51 RCW and this chapter,
including the development, implementation, and periodic evaluation of a written
accident prevention plan specific to the site of each construction project.
All construction employers shall designate an individual with responsibility
for construction jobsite safety. All construction employers shall inform their
own employees of the name and telephone number of that designated individual.
The prime contractor or general contractor shall post the name and telephone
number of its designated individual responsible for jobsite safety at the site
of a construction project. All subcontractors shall inform the prime
contractor or general contractor of the name and telephone number of the
subcontractor's designated individual responsible for construction jobsite
safety.

(3)
Suggestions for safety improvements and identification of potential hazards at
the site of a construction project are to be encouraged. Permissible
disciplinary actions for violation of these or other appropriately communicated
requirements include, but are not limited to: Verbal or written reprimand,
suspension from work, and termination for cause. These disciplinary actions
for violations are subject to the disciplinary provisions set forth in an
employer's written policy statement or in a written agreement between an
employer and employees, if such a written agreement exists.

(4)
Neither violation of the provisions of this section nor the issuance of a
citation under this chapter eliminates or effects any change to the immunity
conferred in RCW 51.24.035.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

The
prime contractor or general contractor has the primary responsibility for
compliance with safety regulations at each construction jobsite. If a
construction employer's safety program is effective in practice, no citation
may be issued to the construction employer for violations of this chapter by
any of the construction employer's subcontractors of any tier. A safety
program shall be considered effective in practice if it complies with the
following:

(1)
A prime contractor or general contractor's subcontractors are required, by
contract, to comply with the provisions of this chapter;

(2)
The prime contractor or general contractor develops, implements, and enforces a
written accident prevention program for each construction project;

(3)
The prime contractor or general contractor requires each subcontractor at the
site of a construction project to provide an accident prevention plan for that
construction project, which shall be available at the construction jobsite or
at the prime contractor's or general contractor's main business office located
within the state of Washington;

(4)
The prime contractor or general contractor posts at that construction project
the name and telephone number of its designated individual with responsibility
for construction jobsite safety at that construction jobsite;

(5)
The prime contractor or general contractor provides to its employees all safety
equipment necessary for that construction jobsite; and

(6)
The prime contractor or general contractor provides, or requires by contract
its subcontractors to provide to the subcontractor's employees, all safety
equipment necessary for that construction jobsite.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of labor and industries shall adopt, in consultation with the
affected parties, rules that are consistent with the legislative intent of this
act and shall implement this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Sections 1, 3, 4, and 5 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---