BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.240 and 1963 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All real and personal property belonging solely to soil and
water conservation districts shall be exempt from taxation((: PROVIDED,
That the)). This exemption ((contained herein)) shall not
apply to property of any ((such)) conservation district which
engages in contract work for persons or firms not landowners or cooperators of
a district.

---
END ---