BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCING

Sec.
1. RCW
43.160.020 and 1997 c 367 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other
evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant to this
chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Distressed county" means any county in which the average level of
unemployment, for the three years before the year in which an application for
financial assistance is filed, exceeds the average state unemployment for those
years by twenty percent.

(5)
"Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan association,
credit union, development credit corporation, insurance company, investment
company, trust company, savings institution, or other financial institution
approved by the board and maintaining an office in the state.

(((5)))
(6) "Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(((6)))
(7) "Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt
revenue bonds used to fund industrial development facilities.

(((7)))
(8) "Local government" or "political subdivision"
means any port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any
other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.

(((8)))
(9) "Sponsor" means any of the following entities which
customarily provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing
and are approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings
bank, investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan
association, building and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or
any other financial institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any
entity specified in this subsection.

(((9)))
(10) "Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue
bonds from which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made
available to two or more users under this chapter.

(((10)))
(11) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee,
purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.

(((11)))
(12) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, buildings or structures, and port facilities.

(((12)))
(13) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (((13))) (14)
of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section.

(((13)))
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip
code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services
under this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion,
or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes designated
in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not
reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political subdivision
and the finding by the board that unique circumstances exist. The board shall
not obligate more than twenty percent of its biennial appropriation as grants.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would directly result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable
materials or for facilities that support recycling, including processes not
currently provided in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking
facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste
processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on
recyclable materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste
paper; (iv) which support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban
areas to distressed rural areas; or (v) which substantially support the trading
of goods or services outside of the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic opportunities.

(c)(i)
Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, when the application
includes convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion
is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement is
made.

(ii)
Applications for projects located in distressed counties or rural natural
resources impact areas need not demonstrate evidence that specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur if funds are provided.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:

(a)
The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project
would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create after the
project is completed and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which
the jobs would be located((. As long as there is more demand for financial
assistance than there are funds available, the board is instructed to fund
projects in order of their priority)); and

(b)
The rate of return on the state's investment, that includes the expected
increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the project.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

Before
any financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision
seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it
at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic
revitalization board.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.160.070 and 1998 c 321 s 27 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to
read as follows:

Public
facilities financial assistance, when authorized by the board, is subject to
the following conditions:

(1)
The moneys in the public facilities construction loan revolving account and the
distressed county public facilities construction loan account shall be used
solely to fulfill commitments arising from financial assistance authorized in
this chapter or, during the 1989-91 fiscal biennium, for economic development
purposes as appropriated by the legislature. The total outstanding amount
which the board shall dispense at any time pursuant to this section shall not
exceed the moneys available from the accounts. The total amount of outstanding
financial assistance in Pierce, King, and Snohomish counties shall never exceed
sixty percent of the total amount of outstanding financial assistance disbursed
by the board under this chapter without reference to financial assistance
provided under RCW 43.160.220.

(2)
On contracts made for public facilities loans the board shall determine the
interest rate which loans shall bear. The interest rate shall not exceed ten
percent per annum. The board may provide reasonable terms and conditions for
repayment for loans, including partial forgiveness of loan principal and
interest payments on projects located in distressed counties or rural natural
resources impact areas, as the board determines. The loans shall not
exceed twenty years in duration.

(3)
Repayments of loans made from the public facilities construction loan revolving
account under the contracts for public facilities construction loans shall be
paid into the public facilities construction loan revolving account.
Repayments of loans made from the distressed county public facilities
construction loan account under the contracts for public facilities
construction loans shall be paid into the distressed county public facilities
construction loan account. Repayments of loans from moneys from the new
appropriation from the public works assistance account for the fiscal biennium
ending June 30, 1999, shall be paid into the public works assistance account.

(4)
When every feasible effort has been made to provide loans and if loans
are not possible, the board may provide grants upon finding that unique
circumstances exist.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.160.080 and 1998 c 321 s 30 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to
read as follows:

There
shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public facilities
construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of all moneys
collected under this chapter or deposited by the state treasurer pursuant to
any other legislative act, except moneys of the board collected in
connection with the issuance of industrial development revenue bonds and moneys
deposited in the distressed county public facilities construction loan account
under RCW 43.160.220, and any moneys appropriated to it by law((: PROVIDED,
That seventy-five percent of all principal and interest payments on loans made
with the proceeds deposited in the account under section 901, chapter 57, Laws
of 1983 1st ex. sess. shall be deposited in the general fund as reimbursement
for debt service payments on the bonds authorized in RCW 43.83.184)).
Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on authorization of the
board. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the
public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.160.900 and 1993 c 320 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The community economic revitalization board shall report to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature biennially on the implementation of this
chapter. The report shall include information on the number of applications
for community economic revitalization board assistance, the number and types of
projects approved, the grant or loan amount awarded each project, the projected
number of jobs created or retained by each project, the actual number of jobs
created or retained by each project, the amount of state and local tax
revenue generated by projects funded under this chapter, the number of
delinquent loans, and the number of project terminations. The report may also
include additional performance measures and recommendations for programmatic
changes. The first report shall be submitted by December 1, 1994.

(2)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall contract for services to
conduct a performance review on the effectiveness of the program administered
by the board under this chapter. The costs for the performance reviews shall
be paid from repayments of principal and interest on loans made under this
chapter. The performance reviews shall be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000, December 1, 2004, and December
1, 2008.

Sec.
6. RCW
82.14.370 and 1998 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The legislative authority of a distressed county may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.04
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(b)
The legislative authority of a distressed county may impose an additional sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and may be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax may not
exceed 0.04 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of
the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)(a)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing qualifying public facilities all for the purpose of job
creation, job retention, or job expansion in ((rural)) distressed
counties. The public facility must be listed as an item in the officially
adopted county overall economic development plan or the economic development
section of the county's comprehensive plan or the comprehensive plan of a city
located within the county for those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040, or,
for those counties who do not plan under the growth management act and do not
have an adopted overall economic development plan, the public facility must be
listed in the county's capital facilities plan or the capital facilities plan
of a city located within the county.

(b)
The county must set aside an appropriate amount of money collected under
subsection (1)(b) of this section to be used for the purpose of financing
qualifying public facilities in cities and towns, located within the county,
that qualify for municipal sales and use tax equalization under RCW
82.14.210(3).

(4)
No tax may be collected under subsection (1)(b) of this section before
((July 1, 1998)) October 1, 1999. No tax may be collected under this
section by a county more than twenty-five years after the date that a tax is
first imposed under this section.

(5)(a)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall develop performance
standards for judging the effectiveness of the use of the sales and use tax for
public facilities in distressed counties. Those standards must include, to the
extent possible, an examination of the effectiveness of the money to: (i)
Create new job opportunities for area residents; (ii) retain existing employment
opportunities; (iii) diversify the economic base of the county; and (iv)
determine the return on the investment in the form of either increased or
retained tax revenues at the local government.

(b)
By February 1, 2000, and every February 1st thereafter, all distressed counties
that impose the tax authorized under this section shall report to the joint
legislative audit and review committee on the use and effectiveness of the
sales and use tax money to meet the objectives of (a) of this subsection. The
joint legislative audit and review committee shall report the results to the
appropriate legislative committees by March 1, 2000, and every March 1st
thereafter.

(6)
For purposes of this section((,)):

(a)
"Distressed county" means a county in which the average level
of unemployment for the three years before the year in which a tax is first
imposed under this section exceeds the average state unemployment for those
years by twenty percent.

(b)
"Public facility" means a bridge, road, domestic and industrial
water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural gas,
building or structure, flood control facility, earth stabilization facility,
and port facility in the state of Washington.

PART
II

TASK FORCE ON
DISTRESSED AREA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
There is created the task force on distressed area economic development
incentives to consist of seventeen members. The task force consists of the
following members:

(a)
The director of the department of community, trade, and economic development or
the director's designee, who shall serve as chair;

(b)
Two members of the house of representatives, one each from two of the largest
caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house;

(c)
Two members of the senate, one each from two of the largest caucuses, appointed
by the president of the senate;

(d)
The director of the department of revenue or the director's designee;

(e)
The director of the office of financial management or the director's designee;

(f)
Four representatives of the business community appointed by the director of
community, trade, and economic development, those four representatives
consisting of one representative from a business with less than fifty employees
that is located in a distressed area, one representative from a business with
more than fifty employees that is located in a distressed area, one
representative from a business with less than fifty employees that is located
outside a distressed area, and one representative from a business with more
than fifty employees that is located outside a distressed area;

(g)
Two representatives of state-wide labor organizations, appointed by the
director of community, trade, and economic development;

(h)
Two representatives of local economic development organizations, appointed by
the director of community, trade, and economic development; and

(i)
Two representatives at large, appointed by the director of community, trade,
and economic development.

(2)
The vice-chair of the task force is selected by majority vote of the task force
members. The members of the task force serve without compensation, but shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)
The department of community, trade, and economic development and the department
of revenue shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the task
force.

(4)
As used in this section and section 8 of this act, "distressed area"
means a rural natural resources impact area as defined in RCW 43.31.601 and an
eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
task force on distressed area economic development incentives shall:

(1)
Review existing federal and state programs and incentives designed to assist
economic development efforts in distressed areas;

(2)
Review programs, incentives, and techniques designed to assist economic
development efforts in rural and distressed areas in other states;

(3)
Make recommendations regarding a common definition of distress and options to
consolidate, streamline, or strengthen existing programs or incentives designed
to assist economic development efforts in distressed areas;

(4)
Make recommendations regarding the establishment of performance measures and
standards, and program evaluation standards for the various state incentive
programs designed to encourage economic development;

(5)
By November 30, 1999, prepare and submit to the governor and legislature, a
report detailing its findings and recommendations regarding economic
development efforts in distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 7 and 8 of this act expire February 1, 2000.

PART
III

RURAL
WASHINGTON LOAN FUND

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The economic health and well-being of the state is of substantial public
concern, particularly in geographic areas of high unemployment, economic
stagnation, and poverty.

(2)
The consequences of minimal economic activity and persistent unemployment and
underemployment are serious threats to the safety, health, and welfare of
residents of these geographic areas, decreasing the value of private
investments and jeopardizing the sources of public revenue.

(3)
The economic and social interdependence of communities and the vitality of
industrial and economic activity necessitates and partially depends upon
preventing substantial dislocation of residents and rebuilding the diversification
of the areas' economy.

(4)
The ability to remedy problems in stagnant areas of the state is beyond the
power and control of the regulatory process and influence of the state; and the
ordinary operations of private enterprise, without additional governmental
assistance, are insufficient to adequately remedy the problems of poverty and
unemployment.

(5)
Revitalization of depressed communities requires stimulation of private
investment, development of new business ventures, provision of capital to ventures
sponsored by local organizations and capable of growth in the business markets,
and assistance to viable, but underfinanced, small businesses in order to
create and preserve jobs that are sustainable in the local economy.

Therefore,
the legislature declares there to be a substantial public purpose in providing
capital to promote economic development and job creation in areas of economic
stagnation, unemployment, and poverty. To accomplish this purpose, the
legislature hereby creates the rural Washington loan fund and vests in the
department of community, trade, and economic development the authority to spend
federal funds to stimulate the economy of distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Distressed area" means: (a) A county which has an unemployment rate
which is twenty percent above the state average for the immediately previous
three years; (b) a county that has a median household income that is less than
seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the previous
three years; (c) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the office of
federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of commerce,
in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which an application is filed under this chapter exceeds
the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty percent; (d) an
area within a county, which area: (i) Is composed of contiguous census tracts;
(ii) has a minimum population of five thousand persons; (iii) has at least
seventy percent of its families and unrelated individuals with incomes below
eighty percent of the county's median income for families and unrelated
individuals; and (iv) has an unemployment rate which is at least forty percent
higher than the county's unemployment rate; or (e) a county designated as a
rural natural resources impact area under RCW 43.31.601. For purposes of this
subsection, "families and unrelated individuals" has the same meaning
that is ascribed to that term by the federal department of housing and urban
development in its regulations authorizing action grants for economic
development and neighborhood revitalization projects.

(4)
"Fund" means the rural Washington loan fund.

(5)
"Local development organization" means a nonprofit organization which
is organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a commitment to a
long-standing effort for an economic development program, and makes a
demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed or underemployed
residents in an area.

(6)
"Project" means the establishment of a new or expanded business in an
area, which business, when completed, will provide employment opportunities.
"Project" also means the retention of an existing business in an
area, which business, when completed, will provide employment opportunities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the department is
authorized to approve applications of local governments for federal community
development block grant funds or other federal funds which the local
governments would use to make loans to finance business projects within their
jurisdictions. Applications approved by the department under this chapter must
conform to applicable federal requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. (1)
The department may approve an application providing a loan for a project only
if the department finds that the project:

(a)
Will result in creation of employment opportunities, maintenance of threatened
employment, or development or expansion of business ownership by minorities and
women;

(b)
Has been approved by the director as conforming to federal rules and
regulations governing the spending of federal community development block grant
funds or other applicable federal funds;

(c)
Will be of public benefit and for a public purpose, and that the benefits,
including increased or maintained employment, improved standard of living,
employment of disadvantaged workers, and development or expansion of business
ownership by minorities and women, will primarily accrue to residents of the area;

(d)
Will probably be successful;

(e)
Would probably not be completed without the loan because other capital or
financing at feasible terms is unavailable, or because the return on investment
is inadequate.

(2)(a)
The department shall, subject to applicable federal funding criteria, give
priority to applications that capitalize or recapitalize an existing or new
local revolving loan fund.

(b)
The department shall, subject to applicable federal funding criteria, give
higher priority to economic development projects that contain provisions for
child care.

(3)
The department may not approve an application that fails to provide for
adequate reporting or disclosure of financial data to the department. The
department may require an annual or other periodic audit of the project books.

(4)
The department may require that the project be managed in whole or in part by a
local development organization and may prescribe a management fee to be paid to
that organization by the recipient of the loan or grant.

(5)
The department shall fix the terms and rates pertaining to its loans.

(6)
If there is more demand for loans than funds available for lending, the
department shall provide loans for those projects which will lead to the
greatest amount of employment or benefit to a community. In determining the
"greatest amount of employment or benefit," the department shall also
consider the employment which would be saved by its loan and the benefit
relative to the community, not just the total number of new jobs or jobs saved.

(7)
To the extent permitted under federal law, the department shall require
applicants to provide for the transfer of all payments of principal and
interest on loans to the rural Washington loan fund created under this
chapter. Under circumstances where federal law does not permit the department
to require the transfer, the department shall give priority to applicants who
on their own volition make commitments to provide for the transfer.

(8)
The department shall not approve any application to finance or help finance a
shopping mall.

(9)
For loans not made to minority and women-owned businesses, the department shall
make at least eighty percent of the appropriated funds available to projects
located in distressed areas, and may make up to twenty percent available to
projects located in areas not designated as distressed.

(10)
If an objection is raised to a project on the basis of unfair business
competition, the department shall evaluate the potential impact of a project on
similar businesses located in the local market area. The department may deny a
grant if the department determines the proposed project is not likely to result
in a net increase in employment within a local market area.

(11)
For loans to minority and women-owned businesses who do not meet the credit
criteria, the department may consider nontraditional credit standards to offset
past discrimination that has precluded full participation of minority or
women-owned businesses in the economy. For applicants with high potential who
do not meet the credit criteria, the department shall consider developing
alternative borrowing methods. For applicants denied loans due to credit
problems, the department shall provide financial counseling within available
resources and provide referrals to credit rehabilitation services. In
circumstances of competing applications, the department shall give priority to
members of eligible groups which previously have been least served by this
fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. The
department is encouraged to work with local development organizations to
promote applications for loans by the fund. The department shall also provide
assistance to local development organizations and local governments to identify
viable projects for consideration by the department. The department shall
provide technical assistance to organizations that administer local revolving
loan funds regarding practices to establish sustainable operations. The
department shall adopt such rules and regulations as are appropriate to carry
out its authority under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. The
department may receive and approve applications on a monthly basis but shall
receive and approve applications on at least a quarterly basis for each fiscal
year. The department shall make every effort to simplify the loan process for
applicants. Department staff shall process and assist in the preparation of
applications. Each application shall show in detail the nature of the project,
the types and numbers of jobs to be created, wages to be paid to new employees,
and methods of hiring unemployed persons from the local market area. Each
application must contain a credit analysis of the business to receive the loan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. The
department shall make available an amount of federal community development
block grant funds equal to the amount of state funds transferred or
appropriated to the department for purposes of supplementing the department's
block grant funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. The
department may make grants of state funds to local governments that qualify as
"entitlement communities" under the federal law authorizing community
development block grants. These grants may be made only on condition that the
entitlement community provide the department with assurances that the
entitlement community will: (1) Spend the grant moneys for purposes and in a
manner satisfying state constitutional requirements; (2) spend the grant moneys
for purposes and in a manner satisfying federal requirements; and (3) spend at
least the same amount of the grant for loans to businesses from the federal
funds received by the entitlement community.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. There
is established the rural Washington loan fund, which shall be an account in the
state treasury. The rural Washington loan fund shall include revenue from the
sources established by this chapter, appropriations by the legislature, federal
funds, private contributions, all loan payments of principal and interest that
are transferred under section 13 of this act, and all other sources. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after legislative appropriation for loans or
grants under this chapter. Any expenditures of federal moneys must conform to
applicable federal law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. (1)
The department shall develop guidelines for rural Washington loan funds to be
used to fund local economic development revolving loan funds. The department
shall consider the selection process for grantees, loan quality criteria, legal
and regulatory issues, and ways to minimize duplication between development
loan funds and local economic development revolving loan funds.

(2)
The department may make loans or grants from the rural Washington loan fund to
local governments to capitalize new, or to recapitalize existing, economic
development revolving loan funds in distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. The
department shall develop performance standards for judging the effectiveness of
the program including, to the extent possible, examining the effectiveness of
loans or grants with regard to:

(1)
Creation of jobs for individuals of low and moderate income;

(2)
Retention of existing employment;

(3)
Creation of new employment opportunities;

(4)
Diversification of the economic base of local communities;

(5)
Establishment of employee cooperatives;

(6)
Providing assistance in cases of employee buyouts of firms to prevent the loss
of existing employment;

(7)
The degree of risk assumed by the rural Washington loan fund, with emphasis on
loans which did not receive financing from commercial lenders, but which are
considered financially sound.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. Any
funds appropriated by the legislature to the rural Washington loan fund for
purposes of the timber recovery act shall be used for development loans in
rural natural resources impact areas as defined in RCW 43.31.601.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22.
Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the department is
authorized to approve applications of minority and women-owned businesses for
loans or loan guarantees from the fund. Applications approved by the
department under this chapter must conform to applicable federal requirements.
The department shall prioritize available funds for loan guarantees rather than
loans when possible. The department may enter into agreements with other
public or private lending institutions to develop a joint loan guarantee
program for minority and women-owned businesses. If such a program is
developed, the department may provide funds, in conjunction with the other
organizations, to operate the program. This section does not preclude the
department from making individual loan guarantees.

To
the maximum extent practicable, the department shall make available to minority
and women-owned businesses, on an equal basis, funds available under this
section. The department shall submit to the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives quarterly reports that detail the number of
loans approved and the characteristics of the recipients by ethnic and gender
groups.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. The
department may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private
sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and
benefit of the purposes of this chapter, and the department may spend gifts,
grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources according to
their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates
RCW 42.17.710.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

PART
IV

PERFORMANCE
REVIEW

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. A
new section is added to chapter 44.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall work with the department
of community, trade, and economic development and the department of revenue to
establish performance-based measurements for programs and incentives designed
specifically to assist in job creation and retention or job expansion.

(2)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct performance
evaluations on programs and incentives designed specifically to assist in job
creation and retention or job expansion. The joint legislative audit and
review committee may contract for services to conduct the performance
evaluations. The following programs and incentives are subject to performance
evaluations under this section:

(a)
The community development finance program under RCW 43.63A.075;

(b)
The public works trust fund - rural natural resources loan program under RCW
43.160.212;

(c)
The rural Washington loan fund program under sections 10 through 23 of this
act;

(d)
The Washington state rural development council under RCW 43.31.855;

(e)
The community economic revitalization board program under chapter 43.160 RCW;

(f)
The distressed area sales tax deferral/exemption program under chapter 82.60
RCW;

(g)
The distressed area business and occupation tax credit for job creation program
under chapter 82.62 RCW;

(h)
The distressed area business and occupation tax credit for job training program
under RCW 82.04.433;

(i)
The distressed county sales tax credit program under RCW 82.14.370;

(j)
The tax credit for international service jobs in community empowerment zones
program in RCW 82.04.44525; and

(k)
The tax remittance for warehouse and grain elevators program under RCW
82.08.820.

(3)
The costs of the performance reviews shall be paid from funds appropriated by
the legislature to the specific program or, if no funding is provided, by the
administering agency's funds. The findings and recommendations shall be
submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000,
December 1, 2004, and December 1, 2008.

PART
V

TECHNICAL
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26.
Sections 10 through 24 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.168.010 and 1985 c 164 s 1;

(2) RCW
43.168.020 and 1996 c 290 s 3, 1995 c 226 s 27, 1993 c 280 s 56,
1991 c 314 s 19, 1988 c 42 s 18, 1987 c 461 s 2, & 1985 c 164 s 2;

(3) RCW
43.168.031 and 1995 c 399 s 92 & 1988 c 186 s 7;

(4) RCW
43.168.040 and 1987 c 461 s 3 & 1985 c 164 s 4;

(5) RCW
43.168.050 and 1993 c 512 s 12, 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 74, 1989 c
430 s 9, 1987 c 461 s 4, 1986 c 204 s 2, & 1985 c 164 s 5;

(6) RCW
43.168.060 and 1985 c 164 s 6;

(7) RCW
43.168.070 and 1993 c 512 s 14, 1987 c 461 s 5, & 1985 c 164 s
7;

(8) RCW
43.168.090 and 1985 c 164 s 9;

(9) RCW
43.168.100 and 1993 c 512 s 15, 1986 c 204 s 1, & 1985 c 164 s
10;

(10) RCW
43.168.110 and 1992 c 235 s 11 & 1985 c 164 s 11;

(11) RCW
43.168.120 and 1987 c 461 s 6;

(12) RCW
43.168.130 and 1998 c 245 s 52 & 1987 c 461 s 7;

(13) RCW
43.168.140 and 1995 c 226 s 28 & 1991 c 314 s 20;

(14) RCW
43.168.150 and 1993 c 512 s 13; and

(15) RCW
43.168.900 and 1985 c 164 s 15.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 28. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---