BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.08.040 and 1971 c 81 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

At the time and place appointed for hearing said petition, or to
which the same may have been adjourned, if the court or judge thereof shall
have satisfactory proof that all parties interested in the land, real estate,
premises or other property described in said petition have been duly served
with said notice as prescribed herein, and shall be further satisfied by
competent proof that the contemplated use for which the lands, real estate,
premises, or other property sought to be appropriated is a public use of the
county, the court or judge thereof may make and enter an order adjudicating
that the contemplated use is really a public use of the county, and which order
shall be final unless review thereof to the supreme court or the court of
appeals be taken within five days after entry of such order, adjudicating that
the contemplated use for which the lands, real estate, premises or other
property sought to be appropriated is really a public use of the county, and
directing that determination be had of the compensation and damages to be paid
all parties interested in the land, real estate, premises, or other property
sought to be appropriated for the taking and appropriation thereof, together
with the injury, if any, caused by such taking or appropriation to the
remainder of the lands, real estate, premises, or other property from which the
same is to be taken and appropriated, after offsetting against any and all such
compensation and damages, special benefits, if any, accruing to such remainder
by reason of such appropriation and use by the county of such lands, real
estate, premises, and other property described in the petition; such
determination to be made by a jury, unless waived, in which event the compensation
or damages shall be determined by the court without a jury. Superior courts
shall ensure that proceedings under this chapter take precedence over all other
superior court cases except criminal cases.

---
END ---