BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.10.232 and 1986 c 257 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The attorney general shall have concurrent authority and power with the
prosecuting attorneys to investigate crimes and initiate and conduct
prosecutions upon the request of or with the concurrence of any of the
following:

(a)
The county prosecuting attorney of the jurisdiction in which the offense has
occurred;

(b)
The governor of the state of Washington; or

(c)
A majority of the committee charged with the oversight of the organized crime
intelligence unit.

(2)
Such request or concurrence shall be communicated in writing to the attorney
general.

(3)
Prior to any prosecution by the attorney general under this section, the
attorney general and the county in which the offense occurred shall reach an
agreement regarding the payment of all costs, including expert witness fees,
and defense attorneys' fees associated with any such prosecution.

(4) Subject to available funds and upon written request by a
city, town, or county law enforcement agency, the attorney general may provide
financial assistance to the law enforcement agency for the investigation of
extraordinary crimes. Financial assistance may include reimbursement of law
enforcement officers' salaries incurred in investigating extraordinary crimes.
In determining whether reimbursement is warranted, the attorney general may
consider such factors as the nature of the crime, the cost of the
investigation, and the particular agency's ability to carry the cost of
investigating the extraordinary crime.

---
END ---