BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.14.070 and 1997 c 62 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The classified civil service and provisions of this chapter shall include all
deputy sheriffs and other employees of the office of sheriff in each county
except the county sheriff in every county and an additional number of
positions, designated the unclassified service, determined as follows:

Unclassified

Staff Personnel Position Appointments

1 through 10 2

11
through 20 3

21
through 50 4

51 through 100 5

101
and over 6

(2)
The unclassified position appointments authorized by this section must include
selections from the following positions up to the limit of the number of
positions authorized: Undersheriff, inspector, chief criminal deputy, chief
civil deputy, jail superintendent, and administrative assistant or
administrative secretary. The initial selection of specific positions to be
exempt shall be made by the sheriff, who shall notify the civil service
commission of his or her selection. Subsequent changes in the designation of
which positions are to be exempt may be made only with the concurrence of the
sheriff and the civil service commission, and then only after the civil service
commission has heard the issue in open meeting. Should the position or
positions initially selected by the sheriff to be exempt (unclassified)
pursuant to this section be under the classified civil service at the time of
such selection, and should it (or they) be occupied, the employee(s) occupying
said position(s) shall have the right to return to the next highest position or
a like position under classified civil service.

(3)
In counties with a sheriff's department that operates the 911 emergency
communications system, in addition to the unclassified positions otherwise
authorized in ((subsections (1), (2), and (4) of)) this section, the
sheriff may designate one unclassified position for the 911 emergency
communications system.

(4)
The county legislative authority of any county with a population of five
hundred thousand or more operating under a home rule charter may designate
unclassified positions of administrative responsibility not to exceed twelve
positions.

(5) In counties where the sheriff's office has adopted a system
of community-oriented policing, in addition to the unclassified positions
otherwise authorized in this section, the sheriff may designate one
unclassified position to manage the community-oriented policing system.

---
END ---