BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that nonprofit educational foundations created to provide
financial and other support to public schools can play an important role in
enhancing the quality of education in Washington state. Educational
foundations are private nonprofit corporations that are organized to benefit
education in school districts and local communities. These foundations do not
supplant the role of the state. They are able to access private, federal, and
local resources not otherwise available to public schools, to devise innovative
solutions to solve problems, and to serve students in new and innovative ways.
Existing efforts supported or administered by foundations include drop-out prevention
programs, innovative classroom grants, and math clubs for girls.

The
legislature further finds that while the number of public school foundations in
Washington is increasing, only a small percentage of the school districts in
the state are assisted by foundations. In addition, many states have one
hundred to two hundred education foundations enhancing educational
opportunities for their students. Additional leadership and support from the
state in assisting in the establishment and development of foundations would
increase the number of foundations, and thereby increase the number of students
who would benefit from their support.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall enter into a
contract with one or more organizations or individuals to provide support,
guidance, training, and technical assistance to individuals and organizations
for the establishment and development of nonprofit educational foundations
established to provide financial support and services to assist public schools.

(2)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall solicit contract
proposals from the following: Washington state school directors' association,
northwest development officers association, Washington association of partners
in education, and other individuals and organizations that have the appropriate
experience and expertise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction
for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---