BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.41.129 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 417 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of licensing may keep copies or records of applications for
concealed pistol licenses provided for in RCW 9.41.070((,)) and
copies or records of applications for alien firearm licenses((, copies or
records of applications to purchase pistols provided for in RCW 9.41.090, and
copies or records of pistol transfers provided for in RCW 9.41.110)). The
copies and records shall not be disclosed except as provided in RCW 42.17.318.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.41.090 and 1996 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, no dealer may deliver a
pistol to the purchaser thereof until:

(a)
The purchaser produces a valid concealed pistol license and the dealer has
recorded the purchaser's name, license number, and issuing agency, such record
to be made in ((triplicate)) duplicate and processed as provided
in subsection (5) of this section. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), a
"valid concealed pistol license" does not include a temporary
emergency license, and does not include any license issued before July 1, 1996,
unless the issuing agency conducted a records search for disqualifying crimes
under RCW 9.41.070 at the time of issuance;

(b)
The dealer is notified in writing by the chief of police or the sheriff of the
jurisdiction in which the purchaser resides that the purchaser is eligible to
possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 and that the application to purchase is
approved by the chief of police or sheriff; or

(c)
Five business days, meaning days on which state offices are open, have elapsed
from the time of receipt of the application for the purchase thereof as provided
herein by the chief of police or sheriff designated in subsection (5) of this
section, and, when delivered, the pistol shall be securely wrapped and shall be
unloaded. However, if the purchaser does not have a valid permanent Washington
driver's license or state identification card or has not been a resident of the
state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the waiting period under this
subsection (1)(c) shall be up to sixty days.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in determining whether the
purchaser meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.040, the chief of police or
sheriff, or the designee of either, shall check with the national crime
information center, the Washington state patrol electronic data base, the
department of social and health services electronic data base, and with other
agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(b)
Once the system is established, a dealer shall use the state system and
national instant criminal background check system, provided for by the Brady
Handgun Violence Prevention Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.), to make criminal
background checks of applicants to purchase firearms. However, a chief of
police or sheriff, or a designee of either, shall continue to check the
department of social and health services' electronic data base and with other
agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether applicants are
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(3)
In any case under subsection (1)(c) of this section where the applicant has an
outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent
jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor, the dealer shall hold the delivery of
the pistol until the warrant for arrest is served and satisfied by appropriate
court appearance. The local jurisdiction for purposes of the sale shall
confirm the existence of outstanding warrants within seventy-two hours after
notification of the application to purchase a pistol is received. The local
jurisdiction shall also immediately confirm the satisfaction of the warrant on
request of the dealer so that the hold may be released if the warrant was for
an offense other than an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040
to possess a pistol.

(4)
In any case where the chief or sheriff of the local jurisdiction has reasonable
grounds based on the following circumstances: (a) Open criminal charges, (b)
pending criminal proceedings, (c) pending commitment proceedings, (d) an
outstanding warrant for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW
9.41.040 to possess a pistol, or (e) an arrest for an offense making a person
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol, if the records of
disposition have not yet been reported or entered sufficiently to determine
eligibility to purchase a pistol, the local jurisdiction may hold the sale and
delivery of the pistol beyond five days up to thirty days in order to confirm
existing records in this state or elsewhere. After thirty days, the hold will
be lifted unless an extension of the thirty days is approved by a local
district court or municipal court for good cause shown. A dealer shall be
notified of each hold placed on the sale by local law enforcement and of any application
to the court for additional hold period to confirm records or confirm the
identity of the applicant.

(5)
At the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol, the purchaser shall sign
in ((triplicate)) duplicate and deliver to the dealer an application
containing his or her full name, residential address, date and place of birth,
race, and gender; the date and hour of the application; the applicant's
driver's license number or state identification card number; a description of
the pistol including the make, model, caliber and manufacturer's number if
available at the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol. If the
manufacturer's number is not available, the application may be processed, but
delivery of the pistol to the purchaser may not occur unless the manufacturer's
number is recorded on the application by the dealer and transmitted to the
chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county in which the
purchaser resides; and a statement that the purchaser is eligible to possess a
pistol under RCW 9.41.040.

The
application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ,
federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are
prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in
federal court. State permission to purchase a firearm is not a defense to a
federal prosecution.

The
purchaser shall be given a copy of the department of fish and wildlife pamphlet
on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the fact that
local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law.

The
dealer shall, by the end of the business day, sign and attach his or her
address and deliver a copy of the application and such other documentation as
required under subsection (1) of this section to the chief of police of the
municipality or the sheriff of the county of which the purchaser is a resident.
The ((triplicate)) duplicate shall be retained by the dealer for
six years. The dealer shall deliver the pistol to the purchaser following the
period of time specified in this section unless the dealer is notified of an
investigative hold under subsection (4) of this section in writing by the chief
of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county, whichever is
applicable, denying the purchaser's application to purchase and the grounds
thereof. The application shall not be denied unless the purchaser is not
eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or federal law.

The
chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county shall retain
or destroy applications to purchase a pistol in accordance with the
requirements of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.

(6)
A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding identity or
eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a pistol is guilty of
false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(7)
This section does not apply to sales to licensed dealers for resale or to the
sale of antique firearms.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.41.110 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or transfer, or
have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or otherwise transfer, any
pistol without being licensed as provided in this section.

(2)
No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or transfer, or
have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or otherwise transfer, any
firearm other than a pistol without being licensed as provided in this section.

(3)
No dealer may sell or otherwise transfer, or expose for sale or transfer, or
have in his or her possession with intent to sell, or otherwise transfer, any
ammunition without being licensed as provided in this section.

(4)
The duly constituted licensing authorities of any city, town, or political
subdivision of this state shall grant licenses in forms prescribed by the
director of licensing effective for not more than one year from the date of
issue permitting the licensee to sell firearms within this state subject to the
following conditions, for breach of any of which the license shall be forfeited
and the licensee subject to punishment as provided in RCW 9.41.010 through
9.41.810. A licensing authority shall forward a copy of each license granted to
the department of licensing. The department of licensing shall notify the
department of revenue of the name and address of each dealer licensed under
this section.

(5)(a)
A licensing authority shall, within thirty days after the filing of an
application of any person for a dealer's license, determine whether to grant
the license. However, if the applicant does not have a valid permanent
Washington driver's license or Washington state identification card, or has not
been a resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the
licensing authority shall have up to sixty days to determine whether to issue a
license. No person shall qualify for a license under this section without
first receiving a federal firearms license and undergoing fingerprinting and a
background check. In addition, no person ineligible to possess a firearm under
RCW 9.41.040 or ineligible for a concealed pistol license under RCW 9.41.070
shall qualify for a dealer's license.

(b)
A dealer shall require every employee who may sell a firearm in the course of
his or her employment to undergo fingerprinting and a background check. An
employee must be eligible to possess a firearm, and must not have been
convicted of a crime that would make the person ineligible for a concealed
pistol license, before being permitted to sell a firearm. Every employee shall
comply with requirements concerning purchase applications and restrictions on
delivery of pistols that are applicable to dealers.

(6)(a)
Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, the business shall be
carried on only in the building designated in the license. For the purpose of
this section, advertising firearms for sale shall not be considered the
carrying on of business.

(b)
A dealer may conduct business temporarily at a location other than the building
designated in the license, if the temporary location is within Washington state
and is the location of a gun show sponsored by a national, state, or local
organization, or an affiliate of any such organization, devoted to the
collection, competitive use, or other sporting use of firearms in the
community. Nothing in this subsection (6)(b) authorizes a dealer to conduct
business in or from a motorized or towed vehicle.

In
conducting business temporarily at a location other than the building
designated in the license, the dealer shall comply with all other requirements
imposed on dealers by RCW 9.41.090, 9.41.100, and 9.41.110. The license of a
dealer who fails to comply with the requirements of RCW 9.41.080 and 9.41.090
and subsection (8) of this section while conducting business at a temporary
location shall be revoked, and the dealer shall be permanently ineligible for a
dealer's license.

(7)
The license or a copy thereof, certified by the issuing authority, shall be
displayed on the premises in the area where firearms are sold, or at the
temporary location, where it can easily be read.

(8)(a)
No pistol may be sold: (i) In violation of any provisions of RCW 9.41.010
through 9.41.810; nor (ii) may a pistol be sold under any circumstances unless
the purchaser is personally known to the dealer or shall present clear evidence
of his or her identity.

(b)
A dealer who sells or delivers any firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.080 is
guilty of a class C felony. In addition to any other penalty provided for by
law, the dealer is subject to mandatory permanent revocation of his or her
dealer's license and permanent ineligibility for a dealer's license.

(c)
The license fee for pistols shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars. The
license fee for firearms other than pistols shall be one hundred twenty-five
dollars. The license fee for ammunition shall be one hundred twenty-five
dollars. Any dealer who obtains any license under subsection (1), (2), or (3)
of this section may also obtain the remaining licenses without payment of any
fee. The fees received under this section shall be deposited in the account
under RCW 69.50.520.

(9)(a)
A true record in ((triplicate)) duplicate shall be made of every
pistol sold, in a book kept for the purpose, ((the form of which may be
prescribed by the director of licensing and)) shall be personally signed by
the purchaser and by the person effecting the sale, each in the presence of the
other, and shall contain the date of sale, the caliber, make, model and
manufacturer's number of the weapon, the name, address, occupation, and place
of birth of the purchaser, and a statement signed by the purchaser that
he or she is not ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(b)
One copy shall within six hours be sent by certified mail to the chief of
police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county of which the purchaser
is a resident((; the duplicate the dealer shall within seven days send to
the director of licensing)); the ((triplicate)) duplicate the
dealer shall retain for six years.

(10)
Subsections (2) through (9) of this section shall not apply to sales at
wholesale.

(11)
The dealer's licenses authorized to be issued by this section are general
licenses covering all sales by the licensee within the effective period of the
licenses. The department shall provide a single application form for dealer's
licenses and a single license form which shall indicate the type or types of
licenses granted.

(12) Except as provided in RCW 9.41.090, every city, town, and
political subdivision of this state is prohibited from requiring the purchaser
to secure a permit to purchase or from requiring the dealer to secure an
individual permit for each sale.

---
END ---