BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.005 and 1997 c 393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

((As
used in)) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions
in this section apply throughout this chapter((:)).

(1)
(("Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(2)
"Limit factor" means:

(a)
For taxing districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the
calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred six percent;

(b)
For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW
84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one
hundred six percent;

(c)
For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred six percent or one hundred
percent plus inflation; and

(3))) "Increase
percentage" means one percent, unless a different increase percentage
applies under section 2 of this act.

(2)
"Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW 84.04.140.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A taxing district other than the state may adopt an increase percentage under
this section if authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the
voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election
held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district
called by the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the
voters. An increase percentage under this section shall be effective for taxes
collected in the following year only. An election held pursuant to this
section shall be held not more than twelve months before the date on which the
proposed levy is to be made.

(2)
The taxing district may submit two proposed increase percentages to the
voters. One proposed increase percentage shall be not more than two and
one-half percent. The other proposed increase percentage shall be greater than
two and one-half percent, but not more than six percent. The ballot submitted
to the voters shall be printed so that a voter can express separately by making
one cross (X) for each of two preferences, first, as between either proposed
increase percentage and neither, and secondly, as between one increase
percentage and the other. If the majority of those voting on the first issue
is for neither, both fail and the increase percentage under this section shall
be zero. The votes on the second issue shall nevertheless be carefully counted
and made public. If a majority voting on the first issue is for either, then
the increase percentage receiving a majority of the votes on the second issue
shall be adopted.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.55.010 and 1997 c 3 s 202 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Except
as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing district in any year shall
be set so that the regular property taxes payable in the following year shall
not exceed the ((limit factor)) increase percentage multiplied by
the amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied for such district in the
highest of the three most recent years in which such taxes were levied for such
district plus an additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the
increase in assessed value in that district resulting from new construction,
improvements to property, and any increase in the assessed value of
state-assessed property by the regular property tax levy rate of that district
for the preceding year.

Sec.
4. RCW
84.55.020 and 1997 c 3 s 203 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Notwithstanding
the limitation set forth in RCW 84.55.010, the first levy for a taxing district
created from consolidation of similar taxing districts shall be set so that the
regular property taxes payable in the following year shall not exceed the ((limit
factor)) increase percentage multiplied by the sum of the amount of
regular property taxes lawfully levied for each component taxing district in
the highest of the three most recent years in which such taxes were levied for
such district plus the additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the
increase in assessed value in each component district resulting from new
construction and improvements to property by the regular property tax rate of
each component district for the preceding year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
84.55.0101 and 1997 c 3 s 204 (Referendum Bill No. 47);

(2) RCW
84.55.050 and 1989 c 287 s 1, 1986 c 169 s 1, 1979 ex.s. c 218 s
3, 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 109, & 1971 ex.s. c 288 s 24; and

(3) RCW
84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3, 1988 c 274 s 4, & 1986 c 107 s
3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---