BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the request of a member of the legislature, the ombudsman shall ask a
complainant to authorize the release to the member of all information related
to the complaint. If the complainant agrees to a release of information, the
ombudsman shall periodically inform the member of the status of the complaint,
and upon closure of the case, inform the member of how the case was resolved.

(2)
In performing an investigation of a complaint received by the ombudsman, the
ombudsman must consider all the documents provided by the complainant.

(3)
The ombudsman shall track the number of complaints regarding employees of each
community services office. If the number of complaints regarding a community
services office is significantly higher than the number of complaints received
regarding other offices, the ombudsman shall inform the governor of the number
of complaints regarding the office and the nature of the complaints.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

Prior to terminating the placement of a child in a foster home due
to findings of abuse or neglect that involve injury to the child, the
department shall have the child's injuries examined by a physician.

---
END ---