BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Community gardens increase the effectiveness of local communities to take care
of themselves, improve family interaction, increase the amount of fresh produce
that families consume, improve people's ability to work in group situations,
and reduce crime;

(b)
Many community gardens are managed by volunteers; and

(c)
The cooperative extension service of Washington State University does not have
the necessary resources to start, manage, and maintain community gardens.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature to support the development of community
gardens through the services of the cooperative extension of Washington State
University.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to Washington State University for: Competitive grants to
nonprofit organizations qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code to establish or maintain existing community gardens, and to
provide gardening education and organizational development facilitation. This
appropriation is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
Amounts distributed as grants must be matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis with
nonstate sources. The match may include cash or other in-kind contributions;
and

(2)
Washington State University may retain not more than ten percent of the amount
allocated for grants for costs associated with administering the grants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to Washington State University for: Competitive grants to
nonprofit organizations qualified under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code to establish or maintain existing community gardens, and to
provide gardening education and organizational development facilitation. This
appropriation is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
Amounts distributed as grants must be matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis with
nonstate sources. The match may include cash or other in-kind contributions;
and

(2) Washington State University may retain not more than ten
percent of the amount allocated for grants for costs associated with
administering the grants.

---
END ---