BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that:

(1)
It is the policy of this state to discourage vehicles from fleeing when
signaled to stop by legitimate law enforcement officers;

(2)
Vehicular flight presents serious and substantial risks to the public and law
enforcement officers;

(3)
Because of the substantial risk created by flight, it is appropriate to apply
the same standard of recklessness to a person charged with attempting to elude
a pursuing police vehicle as applied to persons charged with vehicular homicide
and vehicular assault; and

(4)
When a law enforcement officer signals a driver to stop, the driver should be
able to ascertain that the signal to stop is being given by a legitimate law
enforcement officer. However, law enforcement officers should be provided
reasonable flexibility regarding uniforms and vehicle markings.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.285 and 1998 c 207 s 4 and 1998 c 41 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
department shall forthwith revoke the license of any driver for the period of
one calendar year unless otherwise provided in this section, upon receiving a
record of the driver's conviction of any of the following offenses, when the
conviction has become final:

(1)
For vehicular homicide the period of revocation shall be two years. The
revocation period shall be tolled during any period of total confinement for
the offense;

(2)
Vehicular assault. The revocation period shall be tolled during any period of
total confinement for the offense;

(3)
Driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
narcotic drug, or under the influence of any other drug to a degree which
renders the driver incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle, for the period
prescribed in RCW 46.61.5055;

(4)
For attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle the period of revocation
shall be two years;

(5)
Any other felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used;

(((5)))
(6) Failure to stop and give information or render aid as required under
the laws of this state in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in
the death or personal injury of another or resulting in damage to a vehicle
that is driven or attended by another;

(((6)))
(7) Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement under oath
to the department under Title 46 RCW or under any other law relating to the
ownership or operation of motor vehicles;

(((7)))
(8) Reckless driving upon a showing by the department's records that the
conviction is the third such conviction for the driver within a period of two
years.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.311 and 1998 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a
motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year,
except as specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.342 or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), or 74.20A.320,
whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended by reason
of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has been committed,
pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or
probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. Whenever the license
or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect until
the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i)
The department shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee
shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(2)(a)
Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public
highways has been revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been
removed, is not entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored
until: (i) After the expiration of one year from the date the license or
privilege to drive was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable
revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; ((or))
(iv) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW
46.20.265; or (v) after the expiration of the applicable revocation period
provided by RCW 46.20.285.

(b)(i)
After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application
for a new license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount
of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or
46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon
the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit,
or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified.

(c)
Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving
ability of the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a
motor vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall
not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a)
Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV
of the nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or
46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other
state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical
control of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical
test of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.61.024 and 1983 c 80 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any driver of a motor vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to
immediately bring his vehicle to a stop and who drives his vehicle in a reckless
manner ((indicating a wanton or wilful disregard for the lives or property
of others)) while attempting to elude a pursuing police vehicle, after
being given a visual or audible signal to bring the vehicle to a stop, shall be
guilty of a class C felony. The signal given by the police officer may be by
hand, voice, emergency light, or siren. The officer giving such a signal shall
either be in uniform ((and his)) or, if the officer is in a
vehicle, the vehicle shall be appropriately marked showing it to be an
official police vehicle.

(2)
The license or permit to drive or any nonresident driving privilege of a person
convicted of a violation of this section shall be revoked by the department of
licensing for two years consecutive to any other period of suspension or
revocation. The revocation period is tolled during a period of total
confinement for an offense under this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1998 c 290 s 4, 1998 c 219 s 4, 1998 c 82 s 1, and 1998 c 78 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XIVMurder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

XIIIMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

XIRape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

XKidnapping 1 (RCW
9A.40.020)

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, a narcotic from Schedule
I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam, from Schedule I-V to someone under
18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 88.12.029)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Promoting Prostitution 1
(RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 88.12.029)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Vehicular Homicide, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft,
by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 88.12.029)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

VIBribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VPersistent prison
misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Abandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

IVResidential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW
9A.56.080)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
88.12.155(3))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 88.12.032)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Use of Proceeds of
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

IIICriminal Gang
Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2
(RCW 9A.42.030)

Abandonment of dependent
person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Extortion 2 (RCW
9A.56.130)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle
(RCW 46.61.024)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Theft of livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

IIUnlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Class B Felony Theft of Rental, Leased, or
Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

ITheft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Class C Felony Theft of
Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Possession of Stolen
Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

((Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle
(RCW 46.61.024)))

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Sec.
6. RCW
9.94A.360 and 1998 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The
offender score rules are as follows:

The
offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to
the nearest whole number.

(1)
A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing
for the offense for which the offender score is being computed. Convictions
entered or sentenced on the same date as the conviction for which the offender
score is being computed shall be deemed "other current offenses"
within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2)
Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be included in the
offender score. Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
ten consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other
than sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent five consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
Serious traffic convictions shall not be included in the offender score if,
since the last date of release from confinement (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community without
committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction. This
subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior convictions.

(3)
Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law.
Federal convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If
there is no clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is
one that is usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under
the relevant federal statute.

(4)
Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal
solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions
for completed offenses.

(5)(a)
In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all convictions separately, except:

(i)
Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the
same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields
the highest offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with
respect to other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served
concurrently or prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served
consecutively, whether those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as
separate offenses using the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in
RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one
offense, then the offense that yields the highest offender score shall be
used. The current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or
in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments,
or informations;

(ii)
In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1,
1986, for the purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult
convictions served concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile
convictions entered on the same date as one offense. Use the conviction for
the offense that yields the highest offender score.

(b)
As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that:
(i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii)
the concurrent relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii)
the concurrent timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or
parole revocation on the former offense.

(6)
If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the
present conviction were for a completed offense.

(7)
If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by
subsection (11) or (12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior
felony conviction and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony
conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8)
If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in
subsection (9), (10), (11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each
prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior
adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(9)
If the present conviction is for Murder 1 or 2, Assault 1, Assault of a Child
1, Kidnapping 1, Homicide by Abuse, or Rape 1, count three points for prior
adult and juvenile convictions for crimes in these categories, two points for
each prior adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one
point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each
prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(10)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in
subsection (8) of this section; however count two points for each prior adult
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior
juvenile Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11)
If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for
each adult or juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular
Assault; for each felony offense or serious traffic offense, count one point
for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction. If the
present conviction is for Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle, count
two points for each prior adult or juvenile conviction for that offense.
This subsection shall not apply when additional time is added to a sentence
pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2).

(12)
If the present conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each
adult prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in
subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13)
If the present conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW
72.66.060, Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or
Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape
convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one
point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14)
If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW
9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior
convictions as 1/2 point.

(15)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count
priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each
adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile
prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16)
If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections
(7) through (15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and
juvenile prior sex offense conviction.

(17) If the present conviction is for an offense committed while
the offender was under community placement, add one point.

---
END ---