BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.03.305 and 1995 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created a commission to be known as the Washington citizens' commission on
salaries for elected officials, to consist of sixteen members appointed by the
governor as provided in this section.

(1)
Nine of the sixteen commission members shall be selected by lot by the
secretary of state from among those registered voters eligible to vote at the
time persons are selected for appointment to full terms on the commission under
subsection (3) of this section. One member shall be selected from each
congressional district. The secretary shall establish policies and procedures
for conducting the selection by lot. The policies and procedures shall
include, but not be limited to, those for notifying persons selected and for
providing a new selection from a congressional district if a person selected
from the district declines appointment to the commission or if, following the
person's appointment, the person's position on the commission becomes vacant before
the end of the person's term of office.

(2)
The remaining seven of the sixteen commission members, all residents of this
state, shall be selected jointly by the speaker of the house of representatives
and the president of the senate. The persons selected under this subsection
shall have had experience in the field of personnel management. Of these seven
members, one shall be selected from each of the following five sectors in this
state: Private institutions of higher education; business; professional
personnel management; legal profession; and organized labor. Of the two
remaining members, one shall be a person recommended to the speaker and the
president by the chair of the Washington personnel resources board and one
shall be a person recommended by majority vote of the presidents of the state's
four-year institutions of higher education.

(3)
The secretary of state shall forward the names of persons selected under
subsection (1) of this section and the speaker of the house of representatives
and president of the senate shall forward the names of persons selected under
subsection (2) of this section to the governor who shall appoint these persons
to the commission. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the
names of persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be forwarded
to the governor not later than February 15, 1987, and not later than the
fifteenth day of February every four years ((thereafter)) through
1999. The terms of the members selected in 1999 shall terminate July 1, 2002,
and the names of persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be
forwarded to the governor not later than July 1, 2002. Of the sixteen names
forwarded to the governor in 2002, the governor shall by lot select four of the
persons selected under subsection (1) of this section and four of the persons
selected under subsection (2) of this section to serve two-year terms, with the
rest of the members serving four-year terms. Thereafter, except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, all members shall serve four-year terms and the
names of eight persons selected for appointment to the commission shall be
forwarded to the governor not later than the first day of July every two years.

(4)
((Members shall hold office for terms of four years, and)) No
person may be appointed to more than two ((such)) terms. No member of
the commission may be removed by the governor during his or her term of office
unless for cause of incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance
in office or for a disqualifying change of residence.

The
unexcused absence of any person who is a member of the commission from two
consecutive meetings of the commission shall constitute the relinquishment of
that person's membership on the commission. Such a relinquishment creates a
vacancy in that person's position on the commission. A member's absence may be
excused by the chair of the commission upon the member's written request if the
chair believes there is just cause for the absence. Such a request must be
received by the chair before the meeting for which the absence is to be
excused. A member's absence from a meeting of the commission may also be
excused during the meeting for which the member is absent by the affirmative
vote of a majority of the members of the commission present at the meeting.

(5)
No state official, public employee, or lobbyist, or immediate family member of
the official, employee, or lobbyist, subject to the registration requirements
of chapter 42.17 RCW is eligible for membership on the commission.

As
used in this subsection the phrase "immediate family" means the
parents, spouse, siblings, children, or dependent relative of the official,
employee, or lobbyist whether or not living in the household of the official,
employee, or lobbyist.

(6) Upon a vacancy in any position on the commission, a successor
shall be selected and appointed to fill the unexpired term. The selection and
appointment shall be concluded within thirty days of the date the position
becomes vacant and shall be conducted in the same manner as originally
provided.

---
END ---