BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.02.020 and 1997 c 452 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
only as expressly provided in chapters 67.28 and 82.14 RCW, the state preempts
the field of imposing taxes upon retail sales of tangible personal property,
the use of tangible personal property, parimutuel wagering authorized pursuant
to RCW 67.16.060, conveyances, and cigarettes, and no county, town, or other
municipal subdivision shall have the right to impose taxes of that nature.
Except as provided in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090, no county, city, town,
or other municipal corporation shall impose any tax, fee, or charge, either
direct or indirect, on the construction or reconstruction of residential
buildings, commercial buildings, industrial buildings, or on any other building
or building space or appurtenance thereto, or on the development, subdivision,
classification, or reclassification of land. However, this section does not
preclude dedications of land or easements within the proposed development or
plat which the county, city, town, or other municipal corporation can
demonstrate are reasonably necessary as a direct result of the proposed
development or plat to which the dedication of land or easement is to apply.

This
section does not prohibit voluntary agreements with counties, cities, towns, or
other municipal corporations that allow a payment in lieu of a dedication of
land or to mitigate a direct impact that has been identified as a consequence
of a proposed development, subdivision, or plat. A local government shall not
use such voluntary agreements for local off-site transportation improvements
within the geographic boundaries of the area or areas covered by an adopted
transportation program authorized by chapter 39.92 RCW. Any such voluntary
agreement is subject to the following provisions:

(1)
The payment shall be held in a reserve account and may only be expended to fund
a capital improvement agreed upon by the parties to mitigate the identified,
direct impact;

(2)
The payment shall be expended in all cases within five years of collection; and

(3)
Any payment not so expended shall be refunded with interest at the rate applied
to judgments to the property owners of record at the time of the refund;
however, if the payment is not expended within five years due to delay
attributable to the developer, the payment shall be refunded without interest.

No
county, city, town, or other municipal corporation shall require any payment as
part of such a voluntary agreement which the county, city, town, or other
municipal corporation cannot establish is reasonably necessary as a direct
result of the proposed development or plat.

Nothing
in this section prohibits cities, towns, counties, or other municipal
corporations from collecting reasonable fees from an applicant for a permit or
other governmental approval to cover the cost to the city, town, county, or
other municipal corporation of processing applications, inspecting and
reviewing plans, or preparing detailed statements required by chapter 43.21C
RCW.

This
section does not limit the existing authority of any county, city, town, or
other municipal corporation to impose special assessments on property
specifically benefitted thereby in the manner prescribed by law.

Nothing
in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from imposing or permits
counties, cities, or towns to impose water, sewer, natural gas, drainage
utility, and drainage system charges: PROVIDED, That ((no such charge shall
exceed the proportionate share of)) such utility or system's capital costs
((which the county, city, or town can demonstrate are attributable to the
property being charged: PROVIDED FURTHER, That these provisions shall not be
interpreted to expand or contract any existing authority of counties, cities,
or towns to impose such charges)) or any capacity charges must be
recovered using rate-based user charges and such utility or system may not
charge hookup fees that are above actual physical connection costs.

Nothing
in this section prohibits a transportation benefit district from imposing fees
or charges authorized in RCW 36.73.120 nor prohibits the legislative authority
of a county, city, or town from approving the imposition of such fees within a
transportation benefit district.

Nothing
in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from imposing
transportation impact fees authorized pursuant to chapter 39.92 RCW.

Nothing
in this section prohibits counties, cities, or towns from requiring property
owners to provide relocation assistance to tenants under RCW 59.18.440 and
59.18.450.

This
section does not apply to special purpose districts formed and acting pursuant
to Titles 54, 57, or 87 RCW, nor is the authority conferred by these titles
affected.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.58.570 and 1996 c 230 s 1602 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A metropolitan municipal corporation that is engaged in the transmission,
treatment, and disposal of sewage may impose a capacity charge on users of the
metropolitan municipal corporation's sewage facilities when the user connects,
reconnects, or establishes a new service. The capacity charge shall be
approved by the council of the metropolitan municipal corporation and reviewed
and reapproved annually.

(2)
The capacity charge shall be based upon the cost of the sewage facilities'
excess capacity that is necessary to provide sewerage treatment for new users
to the system. The capacity charge, which may be collected over a period of
fifteen years, shall not exceed:

(a)
Seven dollars per month per residential customer equivalent for connections and
reconnections occurring prior to January 1, 1996; and

(b)
Ten dollars and fifty cents per month per residential customer equivalent for
connections and reconnections occurring after January 1, 1996, and prior to
January 1, 2001.

For
connections and reconnections occurring after January 1, 2001, the capacity
charge ((shall not exceed fifty percent of the basic sewer rate per
residential customer equivalent established by the metropolitan municipal
corporation at the time of the connection or reconnection)) must be
recovered using rate-based user charges and the metropolitan municipal
corporation shall not charge hookup fees that are above actual physical
connection costs.

(3)
The capacity charge for a building other than a single-family residence shall
be based on the projected number of residential customer equivalents to be represented
by the building, considering its intended use.

(4)
The council of the metropolitan municipal corporation shall enforce the
collection of the capacity charge in the same manner provided for the
collection, enforcement, and payment of rates and charges for water-sewer
districts provided in RCW 57.08.081. At least thirty days before commencement
of an action to foreclose a lien for a capacity charge, the metropolitan
municipal corporation shall send written notice of delinquency in payment of the
capacity charge to any first mortgage or deed of trust holder of record at the
address of record.

(5)
As used in this section, "sewage facilities" means capital projects
identified since January 1, 1982, to July 23, 1989, in the metropolitan
municipal corporation's comprehensive water pollution abatement plan.
"Residential customer equivalent" shall have the same meaning used by
the metropolitan municipal corporation in determining rates and charges at the
time the capacity charge is imposed.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.67.020 and 1997 c 447 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
city and town may construct, condemn and purchase, acquire, add to, maintain,
conduct, and operate systems of sewerage and systems and plants for refuse collection
and disposal together with additions, extensions, and betterments thereto,
within and without its limits, with full jurisdiction and authority to manage,
regulate, and control them and to fix, alter, regulate, and control the rates
and charges for their use. The rates charged must be uniform for the same
class of customers or service and facilities furnished and any capacity
charges must be recovered using rate-based user charges and there shall not be
hookup fees that are above actual physical connection costs.

In
classifying customers served or service and facilities furnished by such system
of sewerage, the city or town legislative body may in its discretion consider
any or all of the following factors: (1) The difference in cost of service and
facilities to the various customers; (2) the location of the various customers
within and without the city or town; (3) the difference in cost of maintenance,
operation, repair, and replacement of the various parts of the system; (4) the
different character of the service and facilities furnished various customers;
(5) the quantity and quality of the sewage delivered and the time of its
delivery; (6) the achievement of water conservation goals and the
discouragement of wasteful water use practices; (7) capital contributions made
to the system, including but not limited to, assessments; (8) the nonprofit
public benefit status, as defined in RCW 24.03.490, of the land user; and (9)
any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a ground for distinction.
Rates or charges for on-site inspection and maintenance services may not be
imposed under this chapter on the development, construction, or reconstruction
of property.

A
city or town may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in connection
with services provided under this chapter.

Under
this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank
of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector, trained
owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a program approved by
the state board of health or by a local health officer.

Before
adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility services, or incorporating
residences into an on-site inspection and maintenance or sewer utility under
this chapter, notification must be provided, prior to the applicable public
hearing, to all residences within the proposed service area that have on-site
systems permitted by the local health officer. The notice must clearly state
that the residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the service.

A city or town shall not provide on-site sewage system inspection,
pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services under this section
using city or town employees unless the on-site system is connected by a
publicly owned collection system to the city or town's sewerage system, and the
on-site system represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.
Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of state or local health
officers to carry out their responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec.
4. RCW
35.91.040 and 1965 c 7 s 35.91.040 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person, firm or corporation shall be granted a permit or be authorized to tap
into, or use any such water or sewer facilities or extensions thereof during
the period of time prescribed in such contract without first paying to the
municipality, in addition to any and all other costs and charges made or
assessed for such tap, or use, or for the water lines or sewers constructed in
connection therewith, the amount required by the provisions of the contract
under which the water or sewer facilities so tapped into or used were
constructed. All amounts so received by the municipality shall be paid out by
it under the terms of such contract within sixty days after the receipt
thereof. Whenever any tap or connection is made into any such contracted water
or sewer facilities without such payment having first been made, the governing
body of the municipality may remove, or cause to be removed, such unauthorized
tap or connection and all connecting tile, or pipe located in the facility
right of way and dispose of unauthorized material so removed without any
liability whatsoever. Any capacity charges must be recovered using
rate-based user charges and a municipality shall not charge hookup fees that
are above actual physical connection costs.

Sec.
5. RCW
35.92.020 and 1997 c 447 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A
city or town may construct, condemn and purchase, purchase, acquire, add to,
alter, maintain, and operate systems, plants, sites, or other facilities of
sewerage as defined in RCW 35.67.010, or solid waste handling as defined by RCW
70.95.030, and shall have full authority to manage, regulate, operate, control,
and to fix the price of service and facilities of those systems, plants, sites,
or other facilities within and without the limits of the city or town. The
rates charged shall be uniform for the same class of customers or service and
facilities. Any capacity charges must be recovered using rate-based user
charges and a city or town shall not charge hookup fees that are above actual
physical connection costs. In classifying customers served or service and
facilities furnished by a system or systems of sewerage, the legislative
authority of the city or town may in its discretion consider any or all of the
following factors: (1) The difference in cost of service and facilities to
customers; (2) the location of customers within and without the city or town;
(3) the difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair, and replacement
of the parts of the system; (4) the different character of the service and
facilities furnished to customers; (5) the quantity and quality of the sewage
delivered and the time of its delivery; (6) capital contributions made to the
systems, plants, sites, or other facilities, including but not limited to,
assessments; (7) the nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW
24.03.490, of the land user; and (8) any other factors that present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. Rates or charges for
on-site inspection and maintenance services may not be imposed under this
chapter on the development, construction, or reconstruction of property.

A
city or town may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in connection
with services provided under this chapter.

Under
this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank
of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector, trained
owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a program approved by
the state board of health or by a local health officer.

Before
adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility services, or incorporating
residences into an on-site inspection and maintenance or sewer utility under
this chapter, notification must be provided, prior to the applicable public
hearing, to all residences within the proposed service area that have on-site
systems permitted by the local health officer. The notice must clearly state
that the residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the service.

A city or town shall not provide on-site sewage system inspection,
pumping services, or other maintenance or repair services under this section
using city or town employees unless the on-site system is connected by a
publicly owned collection system to the city or town's sewerage system, and the
on-site system represents the first step in the sewage disposal process.
Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of state or local health
officers to carry out their responsibilities under any other applicable law.

Sec.
6. RCW
36.89.080 and 1998 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county legislative authority may provide by resolution for
revenues by fixing rates and charges for the furnishing of service to those
served or receiving benefits or to be served or to receive benefits from any
storm water control facility or contributing to an increase of surface water
runoff. Any capacity charges must be recovered using rate-based user
charges and a county shall not charge hookup fees that are above actual
physical connection costs. In fixing rates and charges, the county
legislative authority may in its discretion consider: (1) Services furnished
or to be furnished; (2) benefits received or to be received; (3) the character
and use of land or its water runoff characteristics; (4) the nonprofit public
benefit status, as defined in RCW 24.03.490, of the land user; (5) income level
of persons served or provided benefits under this chapter, including senior
citizens and disabled persons; or (6) any other matters which present a
reasonable difference as a ground for distinction. The service charges and
rates collected shall be deposited in a special fund or funds in the county
treasury to be used only for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost
and expense of maintaining and operating storm water control facilities, all or
any part of the cost and expense of planning, designing, establishing,
acquiring, developing, constructing and improving any of such facilities, or to
pay or secure the payment of all or any portion of any issue of general
obligation or revenue bonds issued for such purpose.

Sec.
7. RCW
36.94.140 and 1997 c 447 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
county, in the operation of a system of sewerage and/or water, shall have full
jurisdiction and authority to manage, regulate, and control it and to fix,
alter, regulate, and control the rates and charges for the service and
facilities to those to whom such service and facilities are available, and to
levy charges for connection to the system. The rates for availability of
service and facilities, and connection charges so charged must be uniform for
the same class of customers or service and facility.

In
classifying customers served, service furnished or made available by such
system of sewerage and/or water, or the connection charges, the county legislative
authority may consider any or all of the following factors:

(1)
The difference in cost of service to the various customers within or without
the area;

(2)
The difference in cost of maintenance, operation, repair and replacement of the
various parts of the systems;

(3)
The different character of the service and facilities furnished various
customers;

(4)
The quantity and quality of the sewage and/or water delivered and the time of
its delivery;

(5)
Capital contributions made to the system or systems, including, but not limited
to, assessments;

(6)
The cost of acquiring the system or portions of the system in making system
improvements necessary for the public health and safety;

(7)
The nonprofit public benefit status, as defined in RCW 24.03.490, of the land
user; and

(8)
Any other matters which present a reasonable difference as a ground for
distinction.

A
county may provide assistance to aid low-income persons in connection with
services provided under this chapter.

The
service charges and rates shall produce revenues sufficient to take care of the
costs of maintenance and operation, revenue bond and warrant interest and
principal amortization requirements, and all other charges necessary for the
efficient and proper operation of the system. Any capacity charges must be
recovered using rate-based user charges and a county shall not charge hookup
fees that are above actual physical connection costs.

Sec.
8. RCW
53.08.040 and 1989 c 298 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
district may improve its lands by dredging, filling, bulkheading, providing
waterways or otherwise developing such lands for industrial and commercial
purposes. A district may also acquire, construct, install, improve, and
operate sewer and water utilities to serve its own property and other property
owners under terms, conditions, and rates to be fixed and approved by the port
commission. Any capacity charges must be recovered using rate-based user
charges and a district shall not charge hookup fees that are above actual
physical connection costs. A district may also acquire, by purchase,
construction, lease, or in any other manner, and may maintain and operate other
facilities for the control or elimination of air, water, or other pollution,
including, but not limited to, facilities for the treatment and/or disposal of
industrial wastes, and may make such facilities available to others under terms,
conditions and rates to be fixed and approved by the port commission. Such
conditions and rates shall be sufficient to reimburse the port for all costs,
including reasonable amortization of capital outlays caused by or incidental to
providing such other pollution control facilities: PROVIDED, That no part of
such costs of providing any pollution control facility to others shall be paid
out of any tax revenues of the port: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That no port shall
enter into an agreement or contract to provide sewer and/or water utilities or
pollution control facilities if substantially similar utilities or facilities
are available from another source (or sources) which is able and willing to
provide such utilities or facilities on a reasonable and nondiscriminatory
basis unless such other source (or sources) consents thereto.

In
the event that a port elects to make such other pollution control facilities
available to others, it shall do so by lease, lease purchase agreement, or
other agreement binding such user to pay for the use of said facilities for the
full term of the revenue bonds issued by the port for the acquisition of said
facilities, and said payments shall at least fully reimburse the port for all
principal and interest paid by it on said bonds and for all operating or other
costs, if any, incurred by the port in connection with said facilities:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That where there is more than one user of any such
facilities, each user shall be responsible for its pro rata share of such costs
and payment of principal and interest. Any port intending to provide pollution
control facilities to others shall first survey the port district to ascertain
the potential users of such facilities and the extent of their needs. The port
shall conduct a public hearing upon the proposal and shall give each potential
user an opportunity to participate in the use of such facilities upon equal
terms and conditions.

Sec.
9. RCW
57.08.081 and 1998 c 285 s 2 and 1998 c 106 s 9 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The commissioners of any district shall provide for revenues by fixing rates
and charges for furnishing sewer and drainage service and facilities to those
to whom service is available or for providing water, such rates and charges to
be fixed as deemed necessary by the commissioners, so that uniform charges will
be made for the same class of customer or service and facility. Rates and
charges may be combined for the furnishing of more than one type of sewer or
drainage service and facilities. Any capacity charges must be recovered
using rate-based user charges and the district shall not charge hookup fees
that are above actual physical connection costs.

(2)
In classifying customers of such water, sewer, or drainage system, the board of
commissioners may in its discretion consider any or all of the following
factors: The difference in cost to various customers; the location of the
various customers within and without the district; the difference in cost of
maintenance, operation, repair, and replacement of the various parts of the
system; the different character of the service furnished various customers; the
quantity and quality of the service and facility furnished; the time of its
use; the achievement of water conservation goals and the discouragement of
wasteful practices; capital contributions made to the system including but not
limited to assessments; and any other matters which present a reasonable
difference as a ground for distinction. Rates shall be established as deemed
proper by the commissioners and as fixed by resolution and shall produce
revenues sufficient to take care of the costs of maintenance and operation,
revenue bond and warrant interest and principal amortization requirements, and all
other charges necessary for efficient and proper operation of the system.
Prior to furnishing services, a district may require a deposit to guarantee
payment for services. However, failure to require a deposit does not affect
the validity of any lien authorized by this section.

(3)
The commissioners shall enforce collection of connection charges, and rates and
charges for water supplied against property owners connecting with the system
or receiving such water, and for sewer and drainage services charged against
property to which and its owners to whom the service is available, such charges
being deemed charges against the property served, by addition of penalties of
not more than ten percent thereof in case of failure to pay the charges at
times fixed by resolution. The commissioners may provide by resolution that
where either connection charges or rates and charges for services supplied are
delinquent for any specified period of time, the district shall certify the
delinquencies to the auditor of the county in which the real property is
located, and the charges and any penalties added thereto and interest thereon
at the rate of not more than the prime lending rate of the district's bank plus
four percentage points per year shall be a lien against the property upon which
the service was received, subject only to the lien for general taxes.

(4)
The district may, at any time after the connection charges or rates and charges
for services supplied or available and penalties are delinquent for a period of
sixty days, bring suit in foreclosure by civil action in the superior court of
the county in which the real property is located. The court may allow, in
addition to the costs and disbursements provided by statute, attorneys' fees,
title search and report costs, and expenses as it adjudges reasonable. The
action shall be in rem, and may be brought in the name of the district against
an individual or against all of those who are delinquent in one action. The
laws and rules of the court shall control as in other civil actions.

(5)
In addition to the right to foreclose provided in this section, the district
may also cut off all or part of the service after charges for water or sewer
service supplied or available are delinquent for a period of thirty days.

(6)
A district may determine how to apply partial payments on past due accounts.

(7) A district may provide a real property owner or the owner's
designee with duplicate bills for service to tenants, or may notify an owner or
the owner's designee that a tenant's service account is delinquent. However,
if an owner or the owner's designee notifies the district in writing that a
property served by the district is a rental property, asks to be notified of a
tenant's delinquency, and has provided, in writing, a complete and accurate
mailing address, the district shall notify the owner or the owner's designee of
a tenant's delinquency at the same time and in the same manner the district
notifies the tenant of the tenant's delinquency or by mail. When a district provides
a real property owner or the owner's designee with duplicates of tenant utility
service bills or notice that a tenant's utility account is delinquent, the
district shall notify the tenant that it is providing the duplicate bills or
delinquency notice to the owner or the owner's designee. After January 1,
1999, if a district fails to notify the owner of a tenant's delinquency after
receiving a written request to do so and after receiving the other information
required by this subsection (7), the district shall have no lien against the
premises for the tenant's delinquent and unpaid charges.

---
END ---