BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
At the time of closing of a sale of a residence to a low-income household
first-time home buyer, the seller shall credit to the buyer ninety-two and
three-tenths percent of the amount of tax that otherwise would be due under
this chapter if the buyer has provided the seller with a signed affidavit and
supporting documentation as to the buyer's status as a low-income household
first-time home buyer. The seller shall pay the remainder of the tax to the
county treasurer as provided in this chapter.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply for the purposes of this section.

(a)
"First-time home buyer" and "low-income household" are
defined as provided in RCW 43.185A.010.

(b)
"Residence" is defined as provided in RCW 84.36.383.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.45.060 and 1987 c 472 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the rate of
one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the selling price. ((An
amount equal to seven and seven-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax to
the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works assistance account
created in RCW 43.155.050.

(2)
There is imposed an additional excise tax through June 30, 1989, upon each sale
of real property at the rate of six one-hundredths of one percent of the
selling price. The tax imposed under this subsection shall be deposited in the
conservation area account under RCW 79.71.110.))

Sec.
3. RCW
82.45.180 and 1998 c 106 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For taxes collected by the county under this chapter, the county treasurer
shall collect a two-dollar fee on all transactions required by this chapter
where the transaction does not require the payment of tax. A total of two
dollars shall be collected in the form of a tax and fee, where the calculated
tax payment is less than two dollars. The county treasurer shall place one
percent of the proceeds of the tax imposed by this chapter and the treasurer's
fee in the county current expense fund to defray costs of collection and shall
pay over to the state treasurer and account to the department of revenue for
the remainder of the proceeds at the same time the county treasurer remits
funds to the state under RCW 84.56.280, including a statement of the amount
of tax that has been reduced under section 1 of this act. The state treasurer
shall deposit seven and seven-tenths percent of the proceeds of this tax in the
public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050, except that if the
tax has been reduced under section 1 of this act, the state treasurer shall
deposit one hundred percent of the proceeds of this tax in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050. The state treasurer shall
deposit ((the)) any remaining proceeds in the general fund for
the support of the common schools.

(2)
For taxes collected by the department of revenue under this chapter, the
department shall remit the tax to the state treasurer who shall deposit the
proceeds of any state tax ((in the general fund for the support of the
common schools)) as provided in subsection (1) of this section. The
state treasurer shall deposit the proceeds of any local taxes imposed under
chapter 82.46 RCW in the local real estate excise tax account hereby created in
the state treasury. Moneys in the local real estate excise tax account may be
spent only for distribution to counties, cities, and towns imposing a tax under
chapter 82.46 RCW. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local real estate excise tax account shall be
credited to the local real estate excise tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, and towns monthly. Monthly the state treasurer shall make
distribution from the local real estate excise tax account to the counties,
cities, and towns the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority. The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this
subsection without appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
deletion of former subsection (2) of RCW 82.45.060 by section 3 of this act is
merely a deletion of outdated material and shall not be construed as affecting
any existing right acquired or liability or obligation incurred under RCW
82.45.060 or under any rule or order adopted under RCW 82.45.060, nor as
affecting any proceeding instituted under RCW 82.45.060.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---