BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of home medical
equipment to an individual for personal use by the individual or a member of
the individual's immediate family.

(2)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Home medical equipment" means medical equipment or devices that are
used by a patient at home over an extended period of time for the treatment of
a medical condition. Home medical equipment is equipment that can withstand
repeated use and would not be useful to a person in the absence of illness or
injury. Home medical equipment includes, but is not limited to, wheelchairs,
hospital beds, standing aids, walking aids, bathroom aids, respirators,
splints, trusses, braces, crutches, lifting chairs connected and used in
conjunction with a lifting device, and parts and accessories of such items.

(b)
"Immediate family" means an individual's spouse, and child,
stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent, brother, half brother,
sister, or half sister of the individual.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the personal use of
home medical equipment, as defined in section 1 of this act, by an individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---