BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
sum of two million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for deposit into
the mobile home park purchase account under RCW 59.22.030.

---
END ---