BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.20.130 and 1993 c 66 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of the landlord to:

(1)
Comply with codes, statutes, ordinances, and administrative rules applicable to
the mobile home park;

(2)
Maintain the common premises and prevent the accumulation of stagnant water and
to prevent the detrimental effects of moving water when such condition is not
the fault of the tenant;

(3)
Keep any shared or common premises reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from
defects to reduce the hazards of fire or accident;

(4)
Keep all common premises of the mobile home park, not in the possession of
tenants, free of weeds or plant growth noxious and detrimental to the health of
the tenants and free from potentially injurious or unsightly objects and
condition;

(5)
Exterminate or make a reasonable effort to exterminate rodents, vermin, or
other pests dangerous to the health and safety of the tenant whenever
infestation exists on the common premises or whenever infestation occurs in the
interior of a mobile home as a result of infestation existing on the common
premises;

(6)
Maintain and protect all utilities provided to the mobile home in good working
condition. Maintenance responsibility shall be determined at that point where
the normal mobile home utilities "hook-ups" connect to those provided
by the landlord or utility company;

(7)
Respect the privacy of the tenants and shall have no right of entry to a mobile
home without the prior written consent of the occupant, except in case of
emergency or when the occupant has abandoned the mobile home. Such consent may
be revoked in writing by the occupant at any time. The ownership or management
shall have a right of entry upon the land upon which a mobile home is situated
for maintenance of utilities, to insure compliance with applicable codes,
statutes, ordinances, administrative rules, and the rental agreement and the
rules of the park, and protection of the mobile home park at any reasonable
time or in an emergency, but not in a manner or at a time which would interfere
with the occupant's quiet enjoyment;

(8)
Allow tenants freedom of choice in the purchase of goods and services, and not
unreasonably restrict access to the mobile home park for such purposes;

(9)
Maintain roads within the mobile home park in good condition; ((and))

(10)
Notify each tenant within five days after a petition has been filed by the
landlord for a change in the zoning of the land where the mobile home park is
located and make a description of the change available to the tenant; and

(11)
Provide tenants with a brochure that explains the tenant's rights and
responsibilities under this chapter. This brochure must be made available to
the tenant at the time the lease or rental agreement is signed.

A landlord shall not have a duty to repair a defective condition
under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to the tenant
under this chapter, if the defective condition complained of was caused by the
conduct of the tenant, the tenant's family, invitee, or other person acting
under the tenant's control, or if a tenant unreasonably fails to allow the
landlord access to the property for purposes of repair.

---
END ---