BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.02 RCW to read as follows:

As
part of the information provided to consumers electronically by the
commissioner through the internet, the commissioner shall provide information
on earthquake insurance and the risks of earthquakes in Washington. The
information shall include:

(1)
A statement regarding what the consumer must do to obtain earthquake insurance
and whether it is typically included in standard homeowners' insurance policies;

(2)
A description of typical coverage and benefits to consumers provided by
earthquake insurance;

(3)
A summary of typical premiums and deductibles for earthquake insurance; and

(4) A summary of or reference to information regarding the risk of
earthquakes in Washington, covering as many geographical areas of the state as
is feasible.

---
END ---