BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any provision of RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.815, the state
investment board may require a criminal history record check for conviction
records through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system, and
through the federal bureau of investigation, for the purpose of conducting
preemployment evaluations of prospective new appointees or employees for a
board staff position exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, or any
other position in which the employee will have authority for or access to funds
under the jurisdiction or responsibility of the investment board, or to data
security systems of the investment board or designs for such systems. The
record check shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington
state criminal identification fingerprint card, which shall be forwarded by the
state patrol to the federal bureau of investigation.

(2)
Information received by the investment board pursuant to this section shall be
made available by the investment board only to board employees involved in the
selection, hiring, background investigation, or job assignment of the person
who is the subject of the record check, or to that subject person, and it shall
be used only for the purposes of making, supporting, or defending decisions regarding
the appointment or hiring of persons for these positions, or securing any
necessary bonds or other requirements for such employment. Otherwise, the
reports, and information contained therein, shall remain confidential and shall
not be subject to the disclosure requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.

(3) Fees charged by the Washington state patrol, or the federal
bureau of investigation, for conducting these investigations and providing
these reports shall be paid by the investment board.

---
END ---