BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.33A.130 and 1981 c 3 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state treasurer may cause any securities in which the state investment board
deals to be registered in the name of a nominee without mention of any fiduciary
relationship, except that adequate records shall be maintained to identify the
actual owner of the security so registered. The securities so registered shall
be held in the physical custody of the state treasurer, the federal reserve
system, the designee of the state treasurer, or, at the election of the
designee and upon approval of the state treasurer, the Depository Trust Company
of New York City or its designees.

With respect to the securities, the nominee shall act only upon the
order of the ((state treasurer who shall act only on the direction of the))
state investment board. All rights to the dividends, interest, and sale
proceeds from the securities and all voting rights of the securities are vested
in the actual owners of the securities, and not in the nominee.

---
END ---