BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.36.050 and 1997 c 338 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of reckless endangerment when he or she recklessly engages
in conduct not amounting to drive-by shooting but that creates a substantial
risk of death or serious physical injury to another person.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is guilty of reckless
endangerment if the person stores or leaves a loaded firearm in a location
where the person knows, or reasonably should know, that a child is likely to
gain access, and a child obtains possession of the loaded firearm.

(3)
Subsection (2) of this section does not apply if:

(a)
The firearm is secured in a locked box, gun safe, other secure locked storage
space, or secured with a lock or any device that prevents the firearm from
discharging;

(b)
The child's access to the firearm is supervised by an adult;

(c)
The child's access to the firearm was obtained as a result of an unlawful
entry; or

(d)
The child's access to the firearm was in accordance with RCW 9.41.042.

(4)
If a death or serious injury occurs as a result of an alleged violation of
subsection (2) of this section, the prosecuting attorney may decline to
prosecute, even though technically sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in
situations where prosecution would serve no public purpose, would defeat the
purpose of the law in question, or would result in decreased respect for the
law.

(5)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Child" means a person under the age of sixteen years; and

(b)
The definitions in RCW 9.41.010 apply throughout this section.

(6)
Nothing in this section mandates how or where a firearm must be stored.

(7)
Reckless endangerment is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
When selling any firearm, every dealer shall offer to sell or give the
purchaser a locked box, a lock, or a device that prevents the firearm from
discharging.

(2)
Every store, shop, or sales outlet where firearms are sold, that is registered
as a dealer in firearms with the department of licensing, shall conspicuously
post, in a prominent location so that all patrons may take notice, the
following warning sign, to be provided by the department of licensing, in block
letters at least one inch in height:

"IT IS UNLAWFUL TO STORE OR LEAVE AN UNSECURED,
LOADED FIREARM WHERE A CHILD CAN AND DOES OBTAIN POSSESSION."

(3)
Every person who violates this section is guilty of a class 3 civil infraction
under chapter 7.80 RCW, and may be fined up to fifty dollars. However, no such
fines may be levied until thirty days have expired from the time warning signs
are distributed by the department of licensing.

(4) Nothing in this section mandates how or where a firearm must be
stored.

---
END ---