BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

A
city or town contiguous with Canada may contract with a Canadian corporation
for the purchase of water and for the construction, purchase, maintenance, and
supply of waterworks to furnish the city or town and other areas within its
water service area, and inhabitants thereof, and residents of Canada with an
ample supply of water.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

A city or town contiguous with Canada may contract with a Canadian
corporation for the discharge of sewage from all or any portion of the city's
or town's sewer service area into the sewer system of the Canadian
corporation. A city or town contiguous with Canada may contract with a
Canadian corporation for the construction, operation, or maintenance of sewers
and sewage treatment and disposal facilities for their joint use and benefit
upon such terms and conditions and for such period of time as the contracting
parties may determine, which may include vesting one of the contracting parties
with the sole authority to construct, operate, or maintain the facilities with
the other contracting party or parties paying an agreed-upon portion of the
expenses to the party with sole authority to construct, operate, or maintain
the facilities.

---
END ---