BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 28A.150.410 and 1997 c
141 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature shall establish for each school year in the appropriations act
a state-wide salary allocation schedule, for allocation purposes only, to be
used to distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional staff
salaries under RCW 28A.150.260.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall calculate salary allocations for
state funded basic education certificated instructional staff by determining
the district average salary for basic education and special education
instructional staff using the salary allocation schedule established pursuant
to this section.

(3)
Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits
received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to
determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule
and LEAP documents referenced in the biennial appropriations act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a)
The employee has a masters degree; or

(b)
The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1,
1992.

(4) Beginning in the 1999-2000 school year, the determination of
years of service for occupational therapists, physical therapists,
speech-language pathologists, audiologists, and nurses regulated under Title 18
RCW shall include experience in schools and other nonschool positions as
occupational therapists, physical therapists, speech-language pathologists,
audiologists, or nurses. The calculation of years of service for experience in
nonschool positions shall be as follows: Until the 2002-2003 school year,
every two years of service in nonschool positions shall be counted as one year
of service for purposes of this chapter. Beginning in the 2003-2004 school
year and thereafter, every one year of service in nonschool positions shall be
counted as one year of service for purposes of this chapter.

---
END ---