BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.390 and 1993 c 2 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

One
or more of the following civil remedies and sanctions may be imposed by court
order in addition to any other remedies provided by law:

(1)
If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this chapter by any
candidate or political committee probably affected the outcome of any election,
the result of said election may be held void and a special election held within
sixty days of such finding. Any action to void an election shall be commenced
within one year of the date of the election in question. It is intended that
this remedy be imposed freely in all appropriate cases to protect the right of
the electorate to an informed and knowledgeable vote.

(2)
If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign violates any of
the provisions of this chapter, his registration may be revoked or suspended
and he may be enjoined from receiving compensation or making expenditures for
lobbying: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That imposition of such sanction shall not excuse
said lobbyist from filing statements and reports required by this chapter.

(3)
Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter may be subject to
a civil penalty of not more than ((ten)) forty thousand dollars
for each such violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW
42.17.640 may be ordered to return a contribution illegally accepted and may
be subject to a civil penalty of ((ten)) forty thousand
dollars or three times the amount of the contribution illegally made or
accepted, whichever is greater.

(4)
Any person who fails to file a properly completed statement or report within
the time required by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty of ten
dollars per day for each day each such delinquency continues.

(5)
Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure may be subject to
a civil penalty equivalent to the amount he failed to report.

(6)
If a candidate or an officer of a candidate's authorized committee or of a
political committee is found to have intentionally violated this chapter, he or
she may be ordered to pay any civil penalty that is imposed from personal
funds.

(7)
The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act herein
prohibited, or to compel the performance of any act required herein.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.17.395 and 1989 c 175 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may (a) determine whether an actual violation of this chapter
has occurred; and (b) issue and enforce an appropriate order following such
determination.

(2)
The commission, in cases where it chooses to determine whether an actual
violation of this chapter has occurred, shall hold a hearing pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to make such determination.
Any order that the commission issues under this section shall be pursuant to
such hearing.

(3)
In lieu of holding a hearing or issuing an order under this section, the
commission may refer the matter to the attorney general or other enforcement
agency as provided in RCW 42.17.360.

(4)
The person against whom an order is directed under this section shall be
designated as the respondent. The order may require the respondent to cease
and desist from the activity that constitutes a violation and in addition, or
alternatively, may impose one or more of the remedies provided in RCW
42.17.390(((1) (b), (c), (d), or (e): PROVIDED, That)) (2), (3),
(4), (5), or (6). However, no individual penalty assessed by the
commission may exceed ((one)) four thousand dollars, and in any
case where multiple violations are involved in a single complaint or hearing,
the maximum aggregate penalty may not exceed ((two)) ten thousand
((five hundred)) dollars.

(5)
An order issued by the commission under this section shall be subject to
judicial review under the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. If
the commission's order is not satisfied and no petition for review is filed
within thirty days as provided in RCW 34.05.542, the commission may petition a
court of competent jurisdiction of any county in which a petition for review
could be filed under that section, for an order of enforcement. Proceedings in
connection with the commission's petition shall be in accordance with RCW
42.17.397.

(6)
A candidate who has not complied with an order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or
this section, and the remedies imposed thereunder, shall not solicit or accept
contributions or make expenditures until the candidate has complied with the
order and the remedies so imposed.

(7)(a)
A political committee that has not complied with an order issued under RCW
42.17.390 or this section, and the remedies imposed thereunder, shall not
solicit or accept contributions or make expenditures until it has complied with
the order and the remedies so imposed. This restriction applies to the
political committee against whom the order and remedies were issued as well as
a political committee that has a majority of the same officers as the committee
that is subject to the order.

(b)
If an officer of a political committee has not complied with an order issued
under RCW 42.17.390 or this section, and the remedies imposed thereunder, then
the political committee shall not solicit or accept contributions or make
expenditures until the officer has complied with the order and the remedies so
imposed. This restriction applies to the committee of which the individual
subject to the order was an officer at the time of the violation as well as any
other political committee of which the individual is an officer.

(8)
A person who has not complied with an order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or this
section, and the remedies imposed thereunder, shall not register as a lobbyist,
receive compensation as a lobbyist, or make expenditures for lobbying expenses
until the person has complied with the order and the remedies so imposed. If
the person is presently registered as a lobbyist or a lobbyist employer, the
commission may suspend or revoke the person's registration.

(9)
A sponsor of a grass roots lobbying campaign that has not complied with an
order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or this section, and the remedies imposed
thereunder, may not receive contributions or make expenditures for grass roots
lobbying purposes until the sponsor has complied with the order and the
remedies so imposed.

Sec.
3. RCW
42.17.400 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 294 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The attorney general and the prosecuting authorities of political subdivisions
of this state may bring civil actions in the name of the state for any
appropriate civil remedy, including but not limited to the special remedies
provided in RCW 42.17.390.

(2)
The attorney general and the prosecuting authorities of political subdivisions
of this state may investigate or cause to be investigated the activities of any
person who there is reason to believe is or has been acting in violation of
this chapter, and may require any such person or any other person reasonably
believed to have information concerning the activities of such person to appear
at a time and place designated in the county in which such person resides or is
found, to give such information under oath and to produce all accounts, bills,
receipts, books, papers, and documents ((which)) that may
be relevant or material to any investigation authorized under this chapter.

(3)
When the attorney general or the prosecuting authority of any political
subdivision of this state requires the attendance of any person to obtain such
information or the production of the accounts, bills, receipts, books, papers,
and documents ((which)) that may be relevant or material to any
investigation authorized under this chapter, he shall issue an order setting
forth the time when and the place where attendance is required and shall cause
the ((same)) order to be delivered to or sent by ((registered))
certified mail to the person at least fourteen days before the date
fixed for attendance. ((Such)) The order ((shall have)) has
the same force and effect as a subpoena, ((shall be)) is
effective state-wide, and, upon application of the attorney general or ((said))
the prosecuting authority, obedience to the order may be enforced by any
superior court judge in the county where the person receiving it resides or is
found, in the same manner as though the order were a subpoena. The court,
after hearing, for good cause, and upon application of any person aggrieved by
the order, ((shall have the right to)) may alter, amend, revise,
suspend, or postpone all or any part of its provisions. In any case where the
order is not enforced by the court according to its terms, the reasons for the
court's actions ((shall)) must be clearly stated in writing, and
((such)) the action ((shall be)) is subject to
review by the appellate courts by certiorari or other appropriate proceeding.

(4)
Any person who has notified the commission, the attorney general,
and the prosecuting attorney in the county in which the violation occurred in
writing that there is reason to believe that some provision of this chapter is
being or has been violated may himself bring in the name of the state any of
the actions (hereinafter referred to as a citizen's action) authorized under
this chapter. This citizen action may be brought only if the commission has
failed to bring the matter to a hearing under RCW 42.17.395 or if the
attorney general and the prosecuting attorney have failed to commence ((an))
a court action ((hereunder)) under this section within ((forty-five))
one hundred twenty days after ((such)) the notice and ((such))
the person has thereafter further notified the commission, the
attorney general, and the prosecuting attorney that ((said))
that person will commence a citizen's action within ten days upon their
failure so to do, and the commission, the attorney general, and
the prosecuting attorney have in fact failed to bring such action within ten
days of receipt of ((said)) the second notice. If the person who
brings the citizen's action prevails, the judgment awarded ((shall))
escheats to the state, but ((he shall be)) the person who
brought the action is entitled to be reimbursed by the ((state of
Washington)) defendant for costs and attorney's fees he has
incurred((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in the case of a
citizen's action ((which)) that is dismissed and ((which))
that the court also finds was brought without reasonable cause, the
court may order the person commencing the action to pay all costs of trial and
reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the defendant.

(5) In any action brought under this section, the court may award
to the state all costs of investigation and trial, including a reasonable
attorney's fee to be fixed by the court. If the violation is found to have
been intentional, the amount of the judgment, which shall for this purpose
include the costs, may be trebled as punitive damages. If damages or trebled
damages are awarded in such an action brought against a lobbyist, the judgment
may be awarded against the lobbyist, and the lobbyist's employer or employers
joined as defendants, jointly, severally, or both. If the defendant prevails,
he shall be awarded all costs of trial, and may be awarded a reasonable
attorney's fee to be fixed by the court to be paid by the state of Washington.

---
END ---