BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person who, within twenty-one days before an election, makes independent
expenditures totaling one thousand dollars or more to support a candidate or
oppose the candidate's opponent, or to support or oppose a ballot proposition,
shall file a special report of the independent expenditures with the commission
within twenty-four hours or on the first working day after the political
advertising paid for by the independent expenditures is published or otherwise
presented to the public. The report must also be filed at the same time with
the county elections officer of the county of residence for the candidate
supported or opposed by the independent expenditure, in the case of an
independent expenditure relating to a candidacy, or the county of residence of
the person making the expenditure, in the case of an independent expenditure in
support of or against a ballot proposition. A copy of the report must also be
mailed on the same day that the report is filed to each candidate running for
the office, in the case of an independent expenditure relating to a candidacy,
or the political committee supporting and the political committee opposing the
ballot proposition, in the case of an independent expenditure in support of or
against a ballot proposition. The special report must be filed by facsimile or
other electronic means, by guaranteed overnight delivery, or by personal
delivery.

(2)
If a person files a special report under this section he or she shall also file
a special report under this section for each subsequent independent expenditure
of any size supporting that candidate or opposing the candidate's opponent, or
supporting or opposing the ballot proposition.

(3)
The special report must include at least:

(a)
The name and address of the person making the expenditure;

(b)
The name and address of the person to whom the expenditure was made;

(c)
The purpose of or a description of the expenditure;

(d)
The date the expenditure was made and the date the political advertising was
first published or presented to the public;

(e)
The amount of the expenditure;

(f)
The name of the candidate supported or opposed by the expenditure, the office
sought, and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the candidate; or the
name of the ballot proposition supported or opposed by the expenditure and
whether the expenditure supports or opposes the ballot proposition;

(g)
A copy of the advertising if the expenditure is in the form of written
political advertising, or a written transcript of the advertising if the
expenditure is in the form of radio or television political advertising;

(h)
If the expenditure is undertaken by a political committee, the names, business
addresses, and employers of the principle officers and treasurer of the
political committee, if the principle officers and treasurer are acting on
behalf of their employers in making the independent expenditure, the name and
address of the five persons making the largest contributions to the political
committee, and a general description of the nature of interests represented by
the political committee, and each of the five persons, if nonindividuals,
making the largest contributions to the political committee; and

(i)
Any other information the commission may require by rule.

(4)
All persons reporting under RCW 42.17.080, 42.17.090, and 42.17.100 are subject
to the requirements of this section.

(5) A person making independent expenditures supporting a candidate
or opposing the candidate's opponent and reporting under RCW 42.17.080,
42.17.090, 42.17.100, or this section shall file with each required report an
affidavit or declaration of the person responsible for making the independent
expenditure that the expenditure was not made in cooperation, consultation, or
concert with, or at the request or suggestion of the candidate or the
candidate's agent, or with the encouragement or approval of the candidate or
the candidate's agent.

---
END ---