BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of the crime of failing to summon assistance if:

(a)
He or she knows that another person has suffered substantial bodily harm and is
in need of assistance;

(b)
He or she could reasonably summon assistance for the person in need without
danger to himself or herself and without interference with an important duty
owed to a third party;

(c)
He or she fails to summon assistance for the person in need; and

(d)
Another person is not summoning assistance for the person in need.

(2)
The duty to summon assistance is satisfied by making reasonable efforts to
summon emergency police, fire, or medical assistance that identifies the
location of the victim.

(3)
Except as provided in RCW 9A.76.050, failing to summon assistance is a
misdemeanor.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.76.050 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 9A.76.070, 9A.76.080, and 9A.76.090, a person "renders
criminal assistance" if, with intent to prevent, hinder, or delay the
apprehension or prosecution of another person who he or she knows has
committed a crime or juvenile offense or is being sought by law enforcement
officials for the commission of a crime or juvenile offense or has escaped from
a detention facility, he or she:

(1)
Harbors or conceals such person; or

(2)
Warns such person of impending discovery or apprehension; or

(3)
Provides such person with money, transportation, disguise, or other means of
avoiding discovery or apprehension; or

(4)
Prevents or obstructs, by use of force, deception, or threat, anyone from
performing an act that might aid in the discovery or apprehension of such
person; or

(5)
Conceals, alters, or destroys any physical evidence that might aid in the
discovery or apprehension of such person; or

(6)
Provides such person with a weapon; or

(7)
Violates section 1 of this act by failing to summon assistance for a victim of
such person's crime or juvenile offense.

Sec.
3. RCW
9A.76.070 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of rendering criminal assistance in the first degree if he or
she renders criminal assistance to a person who has committed or is being
sought for murder in the first degree or any class A felony or equivalent
juvenile offense.

(2)
Rendering criminal assistance in the first degree is((:

(a)
A gross misdemeanor if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence
that the actor is a relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060;

(b))) a
class C felony ((in all other cases)).

Sec.
4. RCW
9A.76.080 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 47 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of rendering criminal assistance in the second degree if he or
she renders criminal assistance to a person who has committed or is being
sought for a class B or class C felony or an equivalent juvenile offense or to
someone being sought for violation of parole, probation, or community
supervision.

(2)
Rendering criminal assistance in the second degree is((:

(a)
A misdemeanor if it is established by a preponderance of the evidence that the
actor is a relative as defined in RCW 9A.76.060;

(b))) a
gross misdemeanor ((in all other cases)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
9A.76.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.76.060 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act may be known and cited as the Joey Levick Act.

---
END ---