BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that the use of credit cards is an important tool for
consumers in today's economy. The legislature also finds that credit card
companies are in a superior bargaining position when marketing credit cards to
Washington consumers. The imposition of monthly late fees, in addition to
collecting interest, concerns the legislature as possibly excessive profits at
the expense of Washington consumers, particularly when there is little or no
grace period before the late fee is assessed.

(2)
A credit card company may not impose a late fee on the credit card of a
Washington consumer when the monthly payment is mailed on or before the payment
due date as shown by the post office cancellation mark stamped on the envelope.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Credit card company" means a state or federally chartered bank,
trust company, savings bank, or credit union, or other entity, located in or
outside Washington state, that issues credit cards to Washington residents or
services these credit cards.

(b)
"Credit card" means a card or device existing for the purpose of
obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit.

(4)
Credit card companies shall disclose to Washington consumers subsection (2) of
this section consistent with federal law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---