BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that financial institutions play a major role in the
economy of this state and in the financial security and well-being of citizens
of this state. While financial institutions are making significant strides in
reducing the likelihood of potential adverse impacts from the year 2000
computer issue, customers of these institutions likely will be concerned about
potential adverse impacts and what records they should maintain to ensure their
account balances are accurate should there be problems with records due to the
year 2000 computer issue.

(2)
Every bank, savings bank, savings and loan, and credit union shall provide a
written notice to all its customers with Washington addresses disclosing:

(a)
Whether the financial institution is considered year 2000 compliant by its
regulating agency or, if no specific finding is made by its regulating agency,
whether the financial institution has complied with all directives or
recommendations by its regulating agency related to the year 2000 issue; and

(b)
What records, receipts, or other information its customers should keep so that
should any year 2000 problems occur the customers can be sure their account
balances will be correct after any year 2000 problems are resolved.

(3)
The notice required under subsection (2) of this section shall be mailed no
later than November 1, 1999.

(4)
The department of financial institutions may provide technical assistance,
model notices, or other assistance to financial institutions to comply with
this section.

(5)
This section expires July 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---