BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.26.060 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 41 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A child, a child's natural mother, a man alleged or alleging himself to be the
father, a child's guardian, a child's personal representative, the state of
Washington, or any interested party may bring an action at any time for the
purpose of declaring the existence or nonexistence of the father and child
relationship.

(b)
A man presumed to be a child's father under RCW 26.26.040 may bring an action
for the purpose of declaring the nonexistence of the father and child
relationship only if the action is brought within a reasonable time after
obtaining knowledge of relevant facts. After the presumption has been
rebutted, paternity of the child by another man may be determined in the same
action, if he has been made a party.

(2)
In an action brought by the state pursuant to this chapter, the state may be
represented by either the prosecuting attorney for the county where the action
is brought or by the attorney general.

(3)
Regardless of its terms, no agreement between an alleged or presumed father and
the mother or child, shall bar an action under this section.

(4)
If an action under this section is brought before the birth of the child, all
proceedings may be stayed until after the birth, except service of process and
discovery, including the taking of depositions to perpetuate testimony.

(5)
Actions under this chapter may be maintained as to any child, whether born
before or after the enactment of this chapter.

(6)
A person convicted of any sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW may not bring an
action for the purposes of declaring the existence or nonexistence of a father
and child relationship with a child who was conceived and born as a result of
the offense.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.26.170 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 42 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
interested party, except a person convicted of any sex offense under chapter
9A.44 RCW in regard to a child who was conceived and born as a result of the
offense, may bring an action to determine the existence or nonexistence of
a mother and child relationship. Insofar as practicable, the provisions of
this chapter applicable to the father and child relationship apply.

Sec.
3. RCW
26.23.120 and 1998 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any information or records concerning individuals who owe a support obligation
or for whom support enforcement services are being provided which are obtained
or maintained by the Washington state support registry, the division of child
support, or under chapter 74.20 RCW shall be private and confidential and shall
only be subject to public disclosure as provided in subsection (2) of this
section.

(2)
The secretary of the department of social and health services may adopt rules:

(a)
That specify what information is confidential;

(b)
That specify the individuals or agencies to whom this information and these
records may be disclosed;

(c)
Limiting the purposes for which the information may be disclosed;

(d)
Establishing procedures to obtain the information or records; or

(e)
Establishing safeguards necessary to comply with federal law requiring
safeguarding of information.

(3)
The rules adopted under subsection (2) of this section shall provide for
disclosure of the information and records, under appropriate circumstances,
which shall include, but not be limited to:

(a)
When authorized or required by federal statute or regulation governing the
support enforcement program;

(b)
To the person the subject of the records or information, unless the information
is exempt from disclosure under RCW 42.17.310;

(c)
To government agencies, whether state, local, or federal, and including
federally recognized tribes, law enforcement agencies, prosecuting agencies,
and the executive branch, if the disclosure is necessary for child support
enforcement purposes or required under Title IV-D of the federal social
security act;

(d)
To the parties in a judicial or adjudicative proceeding upon a specific written
finding by the presiding officer that the need for the information outweighs
any reason for maintaining the privacy and confidentiality of the information
or records;

(e)
To private persons, federally recognized tribes, or organizations if the
disclosure is necessary to permit private contracting parties to assist in the
management and operation of the department;

(f)
Disclosure of address and employment information to the parties to an action
for purposes relating to a child support order, subject to the limitations in
subsections (4) and (5) of this section;

(g)
Disclosure of information or records when necessary to the efficient
administration of the support enforcement program or to the performance of
functions and responsibilities of the support registry and the division of
child support as set forth in state and federal statutes; or

(h)
Disclosure of the information or records when authorized under RCW 74.04.060.

(4)
Prior to disclosing the whereabouts of a physical custodian, custodial parent
or a child to the other parent or party, a notice shall be mailed, if
appropriate under the circumstances, to the parent or physical custodian whose
whereabouts are to be disclosed, at that person's last known address. The
notice shall advise the parent or physical custodian that a request for disclosure
has been made and will be complied with unless the department:

(a)
Receives a copy of a court order within thirty days which enjoins the
disclosure of the information or restricts or limits the requesting party's
right to contact or visit the parent or party whose address is to be disclosed
or the child;

(b)
Receives a hearing request within thirty days under subsection (5) of this
section; ((or))

(c)
Has reason to believe that the release of the information may result in
physical or emotional harm to the physical custodian whose whereabouts are to
be released, or to the child; or

(d)
Receives a statement from the custodial parent or physical custodian that the
person seeking disclosure was convicted of a sex offense under chapter 9A.44
RCW and is alleged to be the parent of the child who was conceived and born as
a result of the offense.

(5)
A person receiving notice under subsection (4) of this section may request an
adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, at which the person may show
that there is reason to believe that release of the information may result in
physical or emotional harm to the person or the child. The administrative law
judge shall determine whether the whereabouts of the person or child should be
disclosed based on subsection (4)(c) of this section, however no hearing is
necessary if the department has in its possession a protective order or an
order limiting visitation or contact.

(6)
The notice and hearing process in subsections (4) and (5) of this section do
not apply to protect the whereabouts of a noncustodial parent, unless that
parent has requested notice before whereabouts information is released. A
noncustodial parent may request such notice by submitting a written request to
the division of child support.

(7)
Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or restricting the
effect of RCW 42.17.260(9). Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent the disclosure of information and records if all details identifying an
individual are deleted or the individual consents to the disclosure.

(8)
It shall be unlawful for any person or agency in violation of this section to
solicit, publish, disclose, receive, make use of, or to authorize, knowingly
permit, participate in or acquiesce in the use of any lists of names for
commercial or political purposes or the use of any information for purposes
other than those purposes specified in this section. A violation of this
section shall be a gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
26.10.030 and 1998 c 130 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized for proceedings brought under chapter 26.50 RCW in
district or municipal courts, a child custody proceeding is commenced in the superior
court by a person other than a parent, by filing a petition seeking custody of
the child in the county where the child is permanently resident or where the
child is found, but only if the child is not in the physical custody of one of
its parents or if the petitioner alleges that neither parent is a suitable
custodian. Prior to a child custody hearing, the court shall determine if the
child is the subject of a pending dependency action.

(2)
Notice of a child custody proceeding shall be given to the child's parent,
guardian and custodian, who may appear and be heard and may file a responsive
pleading. The court may, upon a showing of good cause, permit the intervention
of other interested parties.

(3)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, persons who have been convicted
of a sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW are precluded from initiating or
participating in court action seeking custody or visitation of any child who
was conceived and born as a result of the offense.

Sec.
5. RCW
26.09.020 and 1997 c 58 s 945 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A petition in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or
for a declaration concerning the validity of a marriage, shall allege the
following:

(a)
The last known residence of each party;

(b)
The social security number of each party;

(c)
The date and place of the marriage;

(d)
If the parties are separated the date on which the separation occurred;

(e)
The names, ages, and addresses of any child dependent upon either or both
spouses and whether the wife is pregnant;

(f)
Any arrangements as to the residential schedule of, decision making for,
dispute resolution for, and support of the children and the maintenance of a
spouse;

(g)
A statement specifying whether there is community or separate property owned by
the parties to be disposed of;

(h)
The relief sought.

(2)
Either or both parties to the marriage may initiate the proceeding.

(3)
Parties who have been convicted of a sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW are
precluded from seeking custody, decision making, or visitation of any child who
was conceived and born as a result of the offense.

(4) The petitioner shall complete and file with the petition
a certificate under RCW 70.58.200 on the form provided by the department of
health.

---
END ---