BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax
amounts received by a nonprofit corporation organized under chapter 24.03 RCW
as payments or contributions from the state or any county, city, town,
municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, port district, or public
corporation for the promotion of conventions and tourism.

---
END ---