BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature declares that changes in technology and the structure of the
telecommunications industry have produced conditions under which traditional
rate of return, rate base regulation of telecommunications companies is not the
most efficient means of facilitating the broad deployment of advanced
telecommunications services and high bandwidth infrastructure, while providing
rate certainty to basic consumers. The legislature further declares that price
cap regulation, as defined in this section, will reduce regulatory delay and
costs, encourage innovation in services, promote efficiency, facilitate the
broad dissemination of new technologies to all classes of ratepayers, enhance
the ability of telecommunications companies to respond to competition, ensure
that telecommunications companies do not have the opportunity to exercise
substantial market power absent effective competition, and provide fair, just,
and reasonable rates for all ratepayers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A new
section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any incumbent local exchange carrier may elect to have the rates, terms, and
conditions for its telecommunications services determined under the provisions
of this section. The provisions of RCW 80.36.135 are separate and distinct
from this section and do not apply to companies regulated under this section.

(2)
An incumbent local exchange carrier shall file a notice of its intent with the
commission to be an electing company and to be regulated under this section. A
company that so elects may not later rescind that election and return to its
preelection form of regulation.

(3)
Upon such a filing, all rates, terms, and conditions for the services provided
by that incumbent local exchange carrier contained in the tariffs, price lists,
or end-user contracts that were in effect on the date of election under this
section shall be deemed fair, just, and reasonable.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall restrict any customer's right to enforce any relevant
quality of service rules and standards. Not later than one hundred eighty days
from the effective date of this section, the commission shall complete a
proceeding to ensure that all such rules and standards are applied equally to
all telecommunications providers.

(5)
Nothing in this section shall restrict any telecommunications company's right
to petition the commission to enforce rules, standards, and prices related to
the provision of wholesale services.

(6)
The rates for basic telecommunications services, as defined in RCW
80.36.600(7)(b), that were in effect on the date of filing of a notice of
election by a local exchange carrier under subsection (2) of this section,
shall be the maximum that the local exchange carrier may charge for such services.
The rates for other services offered by the company, in the exchange or wire
center areas they are offered at the time of such filing, shall be the maximum
that the local exchange carrier may charge for a period of three years after
such a filing. Government mandated charges, including but not limited to those
for excise or gross receipts taxes, 911 service, the Washington telephone
assistance program, or universal service are not part of a local exchange
carrier's rates. An electing company may adjust rates subject to this
subsection effective on ten days' notice, without commission approval, so long
as no rate exceeds the maximum set by this subsection.

(7)
Subsection (6) of this section does not apply to services classified as
competitive under RCW 80.36.330. Services shall be classified as competitive
under RCW 80.36.330 in a geographic area such as a company's exchange or wire
center serving area, or geographically defined subunit thereof, and for a
specific customer class. The commission shall make a determination under this
subsection within thirty days of receiving a petition from an electing company
and shall give great weight to whether other telecommunications companies are
offering or can easily offer like or similar services to a majority of
customers within the relevant customer class and exchange or wire center
serving areas.

(8)
Price cap regulation shall replace the current rate base, rate of return form
of regulation by the commission of an electing company. The commission shall not
consider rate of return, rate base or the earnings of an electing company in
connection with its oversight of an electing company's operations.

(9)
In order to eliminate regulatory requirements not needed to implement this
section, an electing company is not subject to the following statutory
provisions: RCW 80.04.130 (1) and (2), 80.04.300 through 80.04.360, 80.36.110,
80.36.140, 80.36.150, and chapter 80.16 RCW.

(10)
Electing companies are exempt from the provisions of RCW 80.36.170 and
80.36.180, and are instead subject to the provisions of sections 3 and 4 of
this act.

(11)
An electing company may establish rates for new services or existing services
deployed in exchange or wire center serving areas where they are not deployed
at the date of election by filing a tariff or price list with the commission.
The tariff or price list shall be effective upon filing or at such future time
as the company shall designate, and is not subject to commission approval. The
tariffs or price lists shall be printed and kept open to public inspection at
those locations the commission may designate. So long as rates for services
are in accordance with this section, the rates are deemed just and reasonable.

(12)
An electing company may package any of its services with any other service it
or its affiliates may offer, with or without a discount, provided that services
whose rates are capped under this section may be purchased separately at the
existing tariff rate. An electing company shall not offer services at rates
that are below cost except pursuant to a promotional offering.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

No
telecommunications company shall make or give any undue or unreasonable
preference or advantage to any person, corporation, or locality, or subject any
particular person, corporation, or locality to any undue or unreasonable
prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever. The commission shall have
primary jurisdiction to determine whether any rate, regulation, or practice of
a telecommunications company violates this section. This section does not
apply to contracts offered by a telecommunications company classified as
competitive under RCW 80.36.320 or to services classified as competitive under
RCW 80.36.330 or to new services or to existing services deployed in exchange
or wire center serving areas where they are not deployed at the date of
election offered under section 2(11) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

No telecommunications company shall, directly or indirectly, or by
any special rate, rebate, drawback, or other device or method, unduly or
unreasonably charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person or corporation
a greater or less compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered with
respect to communication by telecommunications or in connection therewith,
except as authorized in this title or Title 81 RCW than it charges, demands,
collects, or receives from any other person or corporation for doing a like and
contemporaneous service with respect to communication by telecommunications
under the same or substantially the same circumstances and conditions. The
commission shall have primary jurisdiction to determine whether any rate,
regulation, or practice of a telecommunications company violates this section.
This section does not apply to contracts offered by a telecommunications
company classified as competitive under RCW 80.36.320 or for services
classified as competitive under RCW 80.36.330 or to new services or to existing
services deployed in exchange or wire center serving areas where they are not
deployed at the date of election offered under section 2(11) of this act.

---
END ---