BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the practice of substitution of named subcontractors for
reasons other than those under RCW 39.30.060(2) in connection with the
construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or public work of
the state or a state agency or municipality as defined under RCW 39.04.010 or
an institution of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016 can deprive
the public of the full value of its public works construction budget, can
adversely affect competition among bidders and subcontractors, and can lead to
insolvencies and loss of wages to employees.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.30.060 and 1995 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every invitation to bid on a contract that is expected to cost in excess of one
hundred thousand dollars for the construction, alteration, or repair of any
public building or public work of the state or a state agency or municipality
as defined under RCW 39.04.010((,)) or an institution of higher
education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, or a school district shall require
each bidder to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour after the
published bid submittal time, the names of ((the)) each
subcontractor((s)) whose subcontract amount is more than ten percent of
the bid price with whom the bidder, if awarded the contract, will subcontract
for performance of the work designated on the list to be submitted with the
bid. Failure to name each such subcontractor((s)) or naming
of two or more subcontractors for the same work shall render the bidder's
bid nonresponsive and, therefore, void.

(2)
A bidder whose bid is accepted shall not substitute another subcontractor for a
subcontractor who is named under subsection (1) of this section unless:

(a)
The awarding authority objects to the subcontractor and requests in writing a
change in the subcontractor; or

(b)
The substitution is approved by the awarding authority, and any of the
following applies:

(i) The subcontractor, after having a
reasonable opportunity, fails or refuses to execute a written contract with the
bidder when such subcontract was offered to the subcontractor with the same
terms that all other subcontractors on the project were offered;

(ii) The named subcontractor files for
bankruptcy or becomes insolvent;

(iii) The named subcontractor fails or
refuses to perform its subcontract within a reasonable time;

(iv) The named subcontractor fails, refuses,
or is unable to furnish a performance bond and payment bond where the named
subcontractor agreed in writing to furnish a performance and payment bond
before being named by the bidder under subsection (1) of this section;

(v) When the bidder demonstrates to the
awarding agency that the name of the subcontractor was listed as a result of a
good faith, inadvertent clerical error;

(vi) When the named subcontractor is not
registered under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW; or

(vii) When the bidder determines that the
work performed by the named subcontractor is substantially unsatisfactory and
not in substantial accordance with the contract documents or that the
subcontractor is substantially delaying or disrupting the progress of the work.

(3) Substitution of
named subcontractors for reasons other than those under subsection (2) of this
section is prohibited. Any bidder who violates this section is liable to the
named subcontractor in the amount of ten percent of the substituted
subcontractor's bid price or subcontract price. Legal action to enforce this
section shall be brought in the superior court of the county in which the work
is to be performed and the prevailing party in such an action is entitled to
recover reasonable attorneys' fees, costs, and disbursements.

--- END ---