BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that airports are notoriously difficult to site in populated
areas, even when the proposed airport may not be built for twenty or thirty
years. Regional governments may recognize the need for a new airport, and
perhaps even attempt to plan for it. But as has been demonstrated repeatedly
in Washington state and elsewhere, regional and local public officials are
unwilling, and sometimes unable, to site controversial, yet essential, airports
because of political pressure. The legislature intends the airport siting
council to site airports that will ensure the long-term air capacity needs of
Washington state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The airport siting council is established consisting of the following members:
(a) The secretary of the department of transportation, or a designee; (b) the director
of the department of community, trade, and economic development, or a designee;
(c) a member of the transportation commission appointed by the governor, who
shall be the chair of the council; (d) two members of the general public with
special knowledge or background in airport issues, appointed by the governor;
and (e) a member of a growth management hearings board, selected by the
governor and serving in a nonvoting capacity.

The
two members of the general public who are appointed by the governor shall serve
for staggered four-year terms of office, calculated from the first day of
January in the year in which they are appointed. Staggering of terms of office
will be established by the appointment of the initial appointees, one of whom
shall be appointed to a four-year term of office and the other appointed to a
two-year term of office.

The
member of a growth management hearings board must be a member of the growth
management hearings board that hears appeals from actions taken under the
Growth Management Act by counties not located in the region in which the
proposed airport project under consideration is located or that is subject to
the proposed transportation plan under consideration.

(2)
The chair of the council may designate another councilmember to serve as the
acting chair in the absence of the chair. The department of transportation
shall provide all administrative and staff support for the council.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
the transportation commission finds that all of the following have occurred, it
may declare an impasse and refer the issue to the airport siting council: (1)
A regional transportation plan does not satisfactorily address the state's
interest as defined in RCW 47.06.040 with respect to planning for
transportation needs through siting of an airport; (2) there has been ample
time to address siting of an airport in the regional transportation plan and
local comprehensive plans, but either no decision has been reached or the
process has resulted in a decision that will not address the state's
transportation needs as set forth in RCW 47.06.040; (3) the process prescribed
in RCW 36.70A.106 by which the department of transportation reviews and
suggests changes to the regional transportation plans and local comprehensive
plans with respect to airport siting needs has been exhausted; (4) the
department of transportation has sought by all reasonable means to encourage
local governments and regional bodies to cooperate in a planning and
decision-making process that addresses in a timely manner state-wide airport
siting needs; (5) the transportation commission has notified the local
governments and regional bodies responsible for the regional transportation
plan of its intent to declare an impasse; and (6) the local governments and
regional bodies responsible for the regional transportation plan have failed to
show cause within sixty days of such notification that an impasse should not be
declared.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
transportation commission must declare an impasse by July 1, 2000, regarding
the search for a supplemental airport in the Puget Sound region or replacement
for Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The airport siting council shall convene to make recommendations to the
governor whenever the transportation commission passes a resolution declaring
that an impasse exists in the siting of an airport of state-wide significance,
as provided in section 3 of this act. The council has one hundred eighty days
after the date on which the transportation commission resolution is passed to
make a recommendation regarding the siting of the airport of state-wide
significance and to communicate its recommendation in writing to the governor.

(2)
The responsibility of the council is to make airport siting recommendations
that reflect the interest of the entire state. Accordingly, the council is not
limited to the options examined by the regional or local authority, and may
also consider alternative sites outside the region. In forming its
recommendation the council shall review existing information and analyses
regarding the siting issue, including both technical data and the
decision-making process that failed to produce a resolution. The council may
also hire staff for technical evaluation, analysis, and research associated
with the preparation of its siting recommendation. The council may also
consider relationships between the proposed facility and other existing or
planned transportation facilities of state-wide interest such as airports, rail
services, ferry systems, or highways.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The governor must accept or reject the siting council's recommendation within
sixty days. If the governor rejects the siting council's recommendation, he or
she may request the siting council to provide an alternative recommendation
within thirty days. The governor has another sixty days to accept or reject
the siting council's alternative recommendation. Once the governor has made a
decision, the governor must inform in writing the members of the airport siting
council, the transportation commission, the chair(s) of the legislative
transportation committee, the county or city affected, and the regional
transportation planning organization located in the region in which the
transportation project will be sited.

(2)
Subject to the conditions set forth in section 8(2) of this act, a decision by
the governor binds the state and each of its political subdivisions, such as
departments, agencies, divisions, bureaus, commissions, boards, counties,
cities, towns, ports, and special districts, whether a political subdivision is
a member of the council or not, regarding approval of a site and the
construction and operation of a proposed airport.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
legislature may invalidate the governor's decision if two-thirds of each house
votes to object to his or her choice of sites. The legislature must vote by
the end of the legislative session convened after the governor's decision.
This will ensure that the legislature has at least one full legislative session
for deliberation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
This chapter supersedes other laws for establishing the location of airports of
state-wide significance or rules adopted under state law for establishing the
location of airports of state-wide significance.

(2)
However, the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under it do not
supersede the State Environmental Policy Act, the State Clean Air Act, the
State Clean Water Act, the Shoreline Management Act, the laws relating to solid
and hazardous waste management, and all the related portions of the Washington Administrative
Code that implement these environmental laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 47.06 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature declares to be of state-wide significance any airports designated
by the department as included in its plan as determined by its own functional
classification system and criteria. The department shall assert leadership and
cooperate with regional transportation planning organizations, counties,
cities, transit agencies, public ports, and the private sector, by including in
the state's multimodal transportation plan improvements to transportation
facilities and services of state-wide significance. Improvements to facilities
and services of state-wide significance identified in the state-wide multimodal
transportation plan developed under RCW 47.01.071(3) are considered essential
public facilities under RCW 36.70A.200.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 47.80 RCW to read as follows:

The
regional transportation planning organization must adopt a regional
transportation plan that adequately implements the decision of the governor to
site an airport of state-wide significance, as provided in section 6 of this
act.

Sec.
11. RCW
36.70A.200 and 1998 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning under this
chapter shall include a process for identifying and siting essential public
facilities. Essential public facilities include those facilities that are
typically difficult to site, such as airports, state education facilities and
state or regional transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state
and local correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and
in-patient facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health
facilities, and group homes. If the process of siting an airport fails, the
airport shall be sited by the process set forth in chapter 47.-- RCW (sections
1 through 8 of this act).

(2)
The office of financial management shall maintain a list of those essential
state public facilities that are required or likely to be built within the next
six years. The office of financial management may at any time add facilities
to the list. No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may
preclude the siting of essential public facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the transportation
fund to the department of transportation for the purposes of section 5 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---