BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
1

FINDINGS AND INTENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Universal service has long been a state policy. Universal service has assured
that all citizens have access to affordable telephone service. For reasons
such as geography or population density, it may cost more to provide telephone
service for some consumers than for others. Historically, universal service
has been primarily supported through a system of hidden and implicit subsidies,
but these hidden and implicit subsidies are incongruous with the development of
a competitive telecommunications industry;

(b)
A new universal service program supported by explicit contributions is needed
to ensure that consumers in all regions of the state have access to
telecommunications, advanced telecommunications, and information services that
are reasonably comparable to those services provided in urban areas and that
are available at rates that are reasonably comparable to rates charged for
similar services in urban locations;

(c)
Current prices paid by consumers for basic telecommunications services are
affordable, as evidenced by a telephone penetration rate of 94.8 percent for
Washington households; and

(d)
State regulation of the telecommunications industry should focus less on price
regulation and more on the promotion of competition.

(2)
The legislature intends that modification of state telecommunications
regulation shall achieve the following goals:

(a)
Ensure that all citizens and businesses have reasonable access to a modern
telecommunications network to the benefit of all telecommunications ratepayers
in the state;

(b)
Protect consumers by maintaining prices for noncompetitive telecommunications
services at affordable levels;

(c)
Facilitate the development of an advanced telecommunications and information
services infrastructure in rural, insular, and high-cost locations so that the
benefits of competition in telecommunications, advanced telecommunications, and
information services, as contemplated by the federal telecommunications act of
1996, P.L. 104-104, reach not only urban areas but also other areas of the
state on a reasonably comparable and timely basis;

(d)
Minimize reliance upon implicit subsidies for universal service by maximizing
reliance upon explicit subsidies through explicit contributions to a universal
service fund, transfers from which will preserve and enhance a ubiquitous
telecommunications network by ensuring rates and service quality in rural,
insular, and high-cost locations at levels that are reasonably comparable to
those in other areas; and

(e)
Accelerate innovation and promotion of telecommunications competition by
providing a new alternative to rate-based, rate-of-return regulation and by
strengthening enforcement of interconnection agreements and removing other
barriers to competitive entry.

PART
2

UNIVERSAL SERVICE‑-TWO
PROGRAMS ESTABLISHED

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

Consistent
with the legislative findings and goals under section 1 of this act, a
universal service system, not inconsistent with the requirements of 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 254, shall be established. This universal service system shall be divided
into two separate programs: A basic telecommunications services program and a telecommunications
infrastructure program.

(1)
The commission shall establish the basic telecommunications services program to
provide specific, sufficient, and competitively and technologically neutral
support for basic telecommunications services for telecommunications access
lines located in high-cost locations. Basic telecommunications services are as
listed in section 8 of this act.

(2)
The Washington economic development finance authority shall establish and
administer the telecommunications infrastructure program in coordination with
the department of revenue. Under this program business and occupation tax
credits will be utilized to promote the development of an advanced
telecommunications and information services infrastructure in high-cost locations
so that advanced telecommunications and information services may be offered in
high-cost locations at rates and standards of quality comparable to those
offered urban and other low-cost customers.

PART
3

UNIVERSAL
SERVICE SYSTEM‑-

BASIC TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES
PROGRAM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 through 9 of this act
and RCW 80.36.610 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the universal service fund
designated under section 4 of this act.

(2)
"Advanced telecommunications provider" means any person, corporation,
partnership, or association that operates equipment and facilities capable of
distributing digital communications signals for the transmission of voice,
data, image, and video over distance for either self use or the provision of
such services to others.

(3)
"Eligible telecommunications provider" means a telecommunications
carrier that has met the criteria established by the commission under section 8
of this act and is qualified to receive distributions from the universal
service fund for the provision of basic telecommunications services in
high-cost locations.

(4)
"End-user telecommunications revenue" means the telecommunications
carriers' international, interstate, and intrastate revenues derived from
Washington end-users for telecommunications and telecommunications services.

(5)
"Federal universal service program" means a universal service program
established under 47 U.S.C. Secs. 214(e) and 254.

(6)
"Federal universal service support" means moneys paid under 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 254(e) to eligible telecommunications carriers that provide basic
telecommunications services in high-cost locations.

(7)
"High-cost location" means a rural, insular, or other location where
the cost of providing telecommunications services is greater than an
appropriate price benchmark as provided in section 5 of this act.

(8)
"Incumbent local exchange carrier" as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec.
251(h)(1), means, with respect to an area, the local exchange carrier that:

(a)
On February 8, 1996, provided telephone exchange service in such area; and

(b)(i)
On February 8, 1996, was deemed to be a member of the exchange carrier
association pursuant to section 69.601(b) of the federal communications
commission's regulations (47 C.F.R. 69.601(b)); or

(ii)
Is a person or entity that, on or after February 8, 1996, became a successor or
assign of a member described in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(9)
"Primary telecommunications line" means the first access line that
provides a connection to the public switched telecommunications network for
each residential or business customer.

(10)
"Telecommunications," as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(43), means the
transmission, between or among points specified by the user, of information of
the user's choosing, without change in the form or content of the information
as sent and received.

(11)
"Telecommunications access line" means the connection of the end-user
customer to the local and toll public switched telecommunications network.

(12)
"Telecommunications carrier" has the same meaning as that term is
defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(44) on the effective date of this act.

(13)
"Telecommunications services," as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(46),
means the offering of telecommunications for a fee directly to the public, or
to such classes of users as to be effectively available directly to the public,
regardless of the facilities used.

(14)
"Universal service fund" means the basic telecommunications services
universal service fund created in section 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In establishing the basic telecommunications services program under section 2
of this act, the commission shall create a basic telecommunications services
universal service fund. This fund shall be outside the state treasury and
transfers from the universal service fund shall not be subject to
appropriation. The universal service fund shall include contributions by
telecommunications carriers as provided in subsection (5) of this section,
penalties imposed and paid under section 7 of this act, and other moneys
authorized to be deposited in the universal service fund by law or by order of
any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2)
Basic telecommunications services are as listed in section 5(1) of this act.

(3)
Each year the commission shall set by order the full and adjusted sizes of the
universal service fund as follows:

(a)
If a federal universal service program provides federal universal service
support for:

(i)
Only primary telecommunications access lines located in high-cost locations,
then the commission shall set the full size of the universal service fund at
the amount of money needed to provide support for basic telecommunications
services for one primary telecommunications access line per each residential or
business customer located in a high-cost location;

(ii)
All telecommunications access lines located in high-cost locations, then the
commission shall set the full size of the universal service fund at the amount
of money needed to provide support for basic telecommunications services for
all telecommunications access lines located in a high-cost location.

(b)
If federal universal service support is uncertain because a federal universal
service program has not begun, or has terminated or is expected to terminate,
then the commission shall set the full size of the universal service fund at
the amount of money needed to provide support for basic telecommunications
services for one primary telecommunications access line per each residential or
business customer located in a high-cost location.

(c)
After determining the full size of the universal service fund, the commission
shall determine the adjusted universal service fund size. The adjusted
universal service fund size shall equal the full universal service fund size
minus:

(i)
Any universal service fund balance in excess of ten million dollars carried
over from the previous year; and

(ii)
The amount of federal universal service support expected to be distributed
during the year to eligible telecommunications carriers for their provision of
basic telecommunications services in high-cost locations located in this state.

(4)
To determine the amount of money needed to provide universal service support
for basic telecommunications services for a telecommunications access line
located in a high-cost location, the commission shall:

(a)
Set price benchmarks as provided in section 5 of this act; and

(b)
Compute the amount of universal service support needed per telecommunications access
line located in a high-cost area as the difference between the cost to provide
basic telecommunications services and the appropriate price benchmark amount.

(5)(a)
The commission shall require every telecommunications carrier to contribute to
the universal service fund on an equitable and nondiscriminatory basis.

(b)
The sum of all contributions shall equal the amount of money set as the
adjusted size of the universal service fund under subsection (3) of this
section plus an amount collected to cover the universal service fund
administrator's budget. The budget shall be determined as provided in
subsection (6) of this section.

(c)
Annually the commission shall establish each carrier's contribution based on
each carrier's proportionate share of total end-user telecommunications
revenue.

(6)
The universal service fund shall be administered by an independent fund
administrator selected by the commission according to criteria established
under subsection (10) of this section. Prior to each year, the commission
shall establish and approve a budget for universal service administration.
Administrative expenses shall be paid out of the administrator's expenses
account of the universal service fund after approval by the commission. The
administrator may establish accounts in one or more independent financial
institutions. Annually the administrator's administration of the universal
service fund shall be subject to audit.

(7)
The universal service fund shall be divided into two separate accounts:

(a)
The administrator's expenses account; and

(b)
The basic telecommunications services account.

(8)
The administrator shall deposit the amount of contributions collected to cover
the administrator's budget into the administrator's expenses account and the
remaining contributions to the basic telecommunications services account.

(9)(a)
Each telecommunications carrier shall provide information the commission or the
administrator deems necessary for the implementation and operation of the
program, including, but not limited to, information on costs to the company to
provide service in high-cost locations.

(b)
The provisions of RCW 80.04.095 shall apply to any information submitted under
this subsection.

(10)
In establishing the universal service program, the commission shall adopt rules
as needed to establish and operate the universal service program, and that are
consistent with the legislative direction provided by this act. At a minimum,
the rules shall include the following:

(a)
Provisions for the operation of the universal service fund;

(b)
Criteria for the selection of an independent third party administrator of the
universal service fund through a competitive bid process;

(c)
Reporting requirements for telecommunications carriers; and

(d)
The methodology for minimizing the implicit sources of support as new explicit
sources of universal service support are established.

(11)
The commission may delegate to the commission secretary or other staff the
authority to resolve disputes, approve expenses of the administrator, and make
other administrative decisions necessary to the administration and supervision
of the program consistent with the relevant statutes and commission rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall set separate residential and business price benchmarks for
each telephone exchange area located in a high-cost location. The price benchmarks
for each telephone exchange area shall equal the amount that an incumbent local
exchange carrier charged per single residential or business wireline
telecommunications access line on January 1, 1999, for the following package of
basic telecommunications services:

(a)
Single-party service;

(b)
Voice grade access to the public switched network;

(c)
Support for local usage;

(d)
Dual tone multifrequency signaling (touch-tone);

(e)
Access to emergency services (E911);

(f)
Access to operator services;

(g)
Access to interexchange services;

(h)
Access to directory assistance and white pages directory; and

(i)
Toll limitation services.

(2)
In the event that one of these basic telecommunications services was not
available in a given local telephone exchange on January 1, 1999, then the
price benchmarks shall be set at the amount that was charged for those basic
telecommunications services listed in subsection (1) of this section that were
available on January 1, 1999.

(3)
If two or more incumbent local exchange carriers provided basic
telecommunications service in the same telephone exchange on January 1, 1999,
the price benchmarks shall be set at the highest amounts that were charged by
an incumbent local exchange carrier for basic telecommunications services for
residential or business wireline telecommunications access lines located in
that exchange on January 1, 1999.

(4)
When a telecommunications access line for a customer located in a given
telephone exchange area is provided by a nonwireline carrier, the price
benchmark for this nonwireline telecommunications access line shall equal the
business benchmark set for a wireline telecommunications access line for that
telephone exchange area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A new
section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall coordinate the state universal service program with any
federal universal service program. The commission shall establish rules which
the independent fund administrator shall use to jointly administer federal and
state universal service support, if such joint administration is permitted by
federal law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, the commission may impose
penalties for delays in making the required reports or contributions under the
universal service program basic telecommunications services established in
section 2 of this act. Such penalties shall be calculated as a percentage of
the carrier's required contribution for the previous calendar year. The
penalties shall be as follows:

(a)
For delays of more than seven days but less than fourteen days, two percent;

(b)
For delays of at least fourteen days but less than twenty-one days, four
percent;

(c)
For delays of at least twenty-one days but less than twenty-eight days, six
percent;

(d)
For delays of twenty-eight days or more, eight percent; and

(e)
For delays of thirty-five days or more, in the commission's discretion, an
additional two percent per week.

(2)
If a carrier owed no contributions for the previous calendar year, then the
penalties shall be as follows:

(a)
For late payment of required contributions, the penalties shall be calculated
by multiplying the percentages set forth in subsection (1) of this section
against the amount of the required contributions that is past due; and

(b)
For late filing of a required report, the penalty shall be one hundred dollars
for every day that a report is late.

(3)
Any penalties imposed by the commission under this section shall be paid to the
universal service fund's basic telecommunications services account.

(4)
In addition to any penalties imposed under this section, the administrator may
withhold distributions from the basic telecommunications services account to
any eligible telecommunications carrier that fails to submit information as
required under this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

To
implement the basic telecommunications services program established under
section 2 of this act, the commission shall:

(1)
Establish criteria for designating telecommunications carriers as being
eligible to receive distributions from the universal service fund's basic
telecommunications services account for the provision of basic
telecommunications services in high-cost locations. The criteria may include a
requirement that a carrier serve all persons requesting service within a
geographical area for which designation is to be made;

(2)
Designate telecommunications carriers as eligible telecommunications carriers
under the criteria established under subsection (1) of this section;

(3)
Provide specific, sufficient, competitively neutral, and technologically
neutral universal service support for basic telecommunications services for one
primary line per residential or business customer located in a high-cost
location. In the event that a federal universal service program provides
explicit support for all telecommunications lines located in a high-cost
location, then the commission shall provide specific, sufficient, competitively
neutral, and technologically neutral universal service support for all
telecommunications lines located in a high-cost location;

(4)
Designate by rule the following services as basic telecommunications services:

(a)
Single-party service;

(b)
Voice grade access to the public switched network;

(c)
Support for local usage;

(d)
Dual tone multifrequency signaling (touch-tone);

(e)
Access to emergency services (E911);

(f)
Access to operator services;

(g)
Access to interexchange services;

(h)
Access to directory assistance and white pages directory; and

(i)
Toll limitation services;

(5)
Periodically recommend to the legislature that additional services be
designated as basic telecommunications services. In determining whether
additional services should be recommended to the legislature for designation as
basic services, the commission shall take into account advances in
telecommunications and information technologies and services and shall consider
the extent to which such telecommunications services:

(a)
Are essential to education, public health, or public safety;

(b)
Have, through the operation of market choices by customers, been subscribed to
by a substantial majority of residential customers;

(c)
Are being deployed in public telecommunications networks by telecommunications
carriers; and

(d)
Are consistent with the public interest, convenience, and necessity; and

(6)
Establish by rule the criteria and method to be used by the administrator for
making distributions from the universal service fund's basic telecommunications
services account to eligible telecommunications carriers serving high-cost
locations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission periodically shall audit, or contract for an audit of, telecommunications
carriers that receive universal service support under section 8 of this act to
ensure that the support is used only for the purposes of the basic
telecommunications services subprogram.

Sec.
10. RCW
80.36.610 and 1998 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
The commission is authorized to take actions, conduct proceedings, and enter
orders as permitted or contemplated for a state commission under the federal
telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56), ((but the
commission's authority to either establish a new state program or to adopt new
rules to preserve and advance universal service under section 254(f) of the
federal act is limited to the actions expressly authorized by RCW 80.36.600))
provided that such actions, proceedings, and orders are consistent with the
legislative direction provided by this section, sections 1 through 9, 13, and
15 through 17 of this act, and RCW 43.163.010, 43.163.005, and 43.163.120.
The commission may establish by rule fees to be paid by persons seeking
commission action under the federal act, and by parties to proceedings under
that act, to offset in whole or part the commission's expenses that are not
otherwise recovered through fees in implementing the act((, but new fees or
assessments charged telecommunications carriers to either establish a state
program or to adopt rules to preserve and advance universal service under
section 254(f) of the federal act do not take effect until the legislature has
approved a state universal service program.

(2)
The legislature intends that under the future universal service program
established in this state:

(a)
Every telecommunications carrier that provides intrastate telecommunications
services shall contribute, on an equitable and nondiscriminatory basis, to the
preservation and advancement of universal service in the state;

(b)
The contributions shall be competitively and technologically neutral; and

(c)
The universal service program to be established in accordance with RCW
80.36.600 shall not be inconsistent with the requirements of 47 U.S.C. Sec. 254)).

PART
4

UNIVERSAL
SERVICE SYSTEM‑-

TELECOMMUNICATIONS
INFRASTRUCTURE PROGRAM

Sec.
11. RCW
43.163.005 and 1990 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Economic
development is essential to the health, safety, and welfare of all Washington
citizens by broadening and strengthening state and local tax bases, providing
meaningful employment opportunities and thereby enhancing the quality of life.
Economic development increasingly is dependent upon the ability of small-sized
and medium-sized businesses and farms to finance growth and trade activities.
Many of these businesses face an unmet need for capital that limits their
growth. These unmet capital needs are a problem in both urban and rural areas
which cannot be solved by the private sector alone. There presently exist some
federal programs, private credit enhancements and other financial tools to
complement the private banking industry in providing this needed capital. More
research is needed to develop effective strategies to enhance access to capital
and thereby stimulate economic development.

Economic
development is also increasingly dependent upon the existence of an advanced
telecommunications and information infrastructure. For a healthy economy,
businesses located in rural, insular, and other high-cost locations need access
to advanced telecommunications and information services at rates and standards
of quality that are reasonably comparable to rates and standards of quality
that are offered in urban and other low-cost locations.

It
is the purpose of this chapter to establish a state economic development
finance authority to act as a financial conduit that, without using state funds
or lending the credit of the state or local governments, can issue nonrecourse
revenue bonds, and participate in federal, state, and local economic
development programs to help facilitate access to needed capital by Washington
businesses that cannot otherwise readily obtain needed capital on terms and
rates comparable to large corporations, and can help local governments obtain
capital more efficiently. It is also a primary purpose of this chapter to
encourage the employment and retention of Washington workers at meaningful
wages and to develop innovative approaches to the problem of unmet capital
needs. An additional purpose of this chapter is to provide guidance and
direction in facilitating the development of an advanced telecommunications and
information services infrastructure in rural, insular, and high-cost locations
so that the benefits of competition in telecommunications, advanced
telecommunications, and information services reach not only urban areas but
also other areas of the state on a reasonably comparable and timely basis.
This chapter is enacted to accomplish these and related purposes and shall be
construed liberally to carry out its purposes and objectives.

Sec.
12. RCW
43.163.010 and 1994 c 238 s 1 and 1994 c 92 s 498 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following words and terms have the following
meanings, unless the context requires otherwise:

(1)
"Advanced telecommunications provider" means any person,
corporation, partnership, or association that operates equipment and facilities
capable of distributing digital communications signals for the transmission of
voice, data, image, and video over distance for either self use or the
provision of such services to others;

(2)
"Authority" means the Washington economic development finance
authority created under RCW 43.163.020 or any board, body, commission,
department or officer succeeding to the principal functions of the authority or
to whom the powers conferred upon the authority shall be given by law;

(((2)))
(3) "Bonds" means any bonds, notes, debentures, interim
certificates, conditional sales or lease financing agreements, lines of credit,
forward purchase agreements, investment agreements, and other banking or
financial arrangements, guaranties, or other obligations issued by or entered
into by the authority. Such bonds may be issued on either a tax-exempt or
taxable basis;

(((3)))
(4) "Borrower" means one or more public or private persons or
entities acting as lessee, purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower who has obtained
or is seeking to obtain financing either from the authority or from an eligible
banking organization that has obtained or is seeking to obtain funds from the
authority to finance a project. A borrower may include a party who transfers
the right of use and occupancy to another party by lease, sublease or
otherwise, or a party who is seeking or has obtained a financial guaranty from
the authority;

(((4)))
(5) "Economic development activities" means activities related
to: Manufacturing, processing, research, production, assembly, tooling,
warehousing, pollution control, energy generating, conservation, transmission,
sports facilities, and industrial parks;

(6)
"Eligible banking organization" means any organization subject to
regulation by the director of the department of financial institutions, any
national bank, federal savings and loan association, and federal credit union
located within this state;

(((5)))
(7) "Eligible export transaction" means any preexport or
export activity by a person or entity located in the state of Washington
involving a sale for export and product sale which, in the judgment of the
authority: (a) Will create or maintain employment in the state of Washington,
(b) will obtain a material percent of its value from manufactured goods or
services made, processed or occurring in Washington, and (c) could not
otherwise obtain financing on reasonable terms from an eligible banking
organization;

(((6)))
(8) "Eligible farmer" means any person who is a resident of
the state of Washington and whose specific acreage qualifying for receipts from
the federal department of agriculture under its conservation reserve program is
within the state of Washington;

(((7)))
(9) "Eligible person" means an individual, partnership,
corporation, or joint venture carrying on business, or proposing to carry on
business within the state and is seeking financial assistance under RCW
43.163.210;

(((8)))
(10) "Financing agreements" means a contractual arrangement with
an eligible person whereby the authority obtains rights from or in an invention
or product or proceeds from an invention or product in exchange for the
granting of financial and other assistance to the person;

(11)
"Financial assistance" means the infusion of capital to persons for
use in the development and exploitation of specific inventions and products;

(((9)))
(12) "Financing document" means an instrument executed by the
authority and one or more persons or entities pertaining to the issuance of or
security for bonds, or the application of the proceeds of bonds or other funds
of, or payable to, the authority. A financing document may include, but need
not be limited to, a lease, installment sale agreement, conditional sale
agreement, mortgage, loan agreement, trust agreement or indenture, security
agreement, letter or line of credit, reimbursement agreement, insurance policy,
guaranty agreement, or currency or interest rate swap agreement. A financing
document also may be an agreement between the authority and an eligible banking
organization which has agreed to make a loan to a borrower;

(((10)))
(13) "High-cost location" means a rural, insular, or other
location where the cost of providing telecommunications services is greater
than an appropriate price benchmark as provided in section 5 of this act;

(14)
"Plan" means the general plan of economic development finance
objectives developed and adopted by the authority, and updated from time to
time, as required under RCW 43.163.090. This plan is distinct from the
telecommunications infrastructure grants plan developed under section 13(5) of
this act;

(((11)
"Economic development activities" means activities related to:
Manufacturing, processing, research, production, assembly, tooling,
warehousing, pollution control, energy generating, conservation, transmission,
and sports facilities and industrial parks;

(12))) (15)
"Project costs" means costs of:

(a)
Acquisition, lease, construction, reconstruction, remodeling, refurbishing,
rehabilitation, extension, and enlargement of land, rights to land, buildings,
structures, docks, wharves, fixtures, machinery, equipment, excavations,
paving, landscaping, utilities, approaches, roadways and parking, handling and
storage areas, and similar ancillary facilities, and any other real or personal
property included in an economic development activity;

(b)
Architectural, engineering, consulting, accounting, and legal costs related
directly to the development, financing, acquisition, lease, construction,
reconstruction, remodeling, refurbishing, rehabilitation, extension, and
enlargement of an activity included under subsection (((11))) (5)
of this section, including costs of studies assessing the feasibility of an
economic development activity;

(c)
Finance costs, including the costs of credit enhancement and discounts, if any,
the costs of issuing revenue bonds, and costs incurred in carrying out any
financing document;

(d)
Start-up costs, working capital, capitalized research and development costs,
capitalized interest during construction and during the eighteen months after
estimated completion of construction, and capitalized debt service or repair
and replacement or other appropriate reserves;

(e)
The refunding of any outstanding obligations incurred for any of the costs
outlined in this subsection; and

(f)
Other costs incidental to any of the costs listed in this section;

(((13)))
(16) "Product" means a product, device, technique, or process
that is or may be exploitable commercially. "Product" does not refer
to pure research, but shall be construed to apply to products, devices,
techniques, or processes that have advanced beyond the theoretic stage and are
readily capable of being, or have been, reduced to practice;

(((14)
"Financing agreements" means, and includes without limitation, a
contractual arrangement with an eligible person whereby the authority obtains
rights from or in an invention or product or proceeds from an invention or
product in exchange for the granting of financial and other assistance to the
person.)) (17) "Telecommunications infrastructure improvement"
means the construction or upgrade of real property or tangible personal
property used to distribute digital communications signals for the transmission
of voice, data, image, and video over distance. It includes, but is not
limited to, activities such as the laying of fiber optic cable, the
construction of terrestrial facilities to support digital communications by
satellite, and the construction of towers and other facilities to support
digital communications through nonwireline technologies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 43.163 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In implementing a telecommunications infrastructure program established under
section 2 of this act, the authority shall review applications for business and
occupation tax credits on a competitive basis, in accordance with criteria
adopted under the telecommunications infrastructure plan under subsection (5)
of this section.

(2)
The authority shall recommend to the department of revenue which tax credit
applications should be approved, provided that each year the total amount of
tax credits recommended for approval does not exceed the available amount of
tax credits computed under section 15 of this act. Each year the authority
shall deliver to the department of revenue a list of the telecommunications
infrastructure tax credits recommended for approval.

(3)
The department of revenue shall approve applications for these
telecommunications infrastructure tax credits as provided in section 16 of this
act.

(4)
The authority shall allow a joint tax credit application to be submitted under
this section when two or more advanced telecommunications providers intend to
jointly construct a telecommunications infrastructure improvement.

(5)
As a guide for operating the telecommunications infrastructure program, the
authority shall prepare a telecommunications infrastructure plan addressing,
but not limited to, the following:

(a)
The manner in which business and residential consumers located in high-cost
locations and advanced telecommunications providers will be informed about the
business and occupation tax credits available on a competitive basis for
telecommunications infrastructure improvements made in high-cost locations;

(b)
Criteria for evaluating and ranking tax credit applications. At a minimum the
criteria must include consideration of the following factors:

(i)
The number of jobs to be created or retained as a result of a
telecommunications infrastructure improvement in a high-cost location;

(ii)
Comparability between rates generally charged for advanced telecommunications
and information services in urban and other low-cost locations of the state to
the rates that that tax credit applicant indicates it will charge customers in
the high-cost location where the infrastructure improvement is to be made, if
the applicant will provide advanced telecommunications and information services
to others;

(iii)
The size of the telecommunications bandwidth that will be made available to
consumers in a high-cost location as a result of the telecommunications
infrastructure improvement;

(iv)
The amount of money that an applicant will spend from its own funds, in excess
of the expenditure amount for which a tax credit application is made, to make a
telecommunications infrastructure improvement in a high-cost location; and

(v)
The geographical distribution of the tax credits to be recommended for
approval;

(c)
Information that tax credit applicants shall be required to provide with their
applications. At a minimum a tax credit applicant must attach to the
application a list of the businesses that have requested advanced
telecommunications and information services which cannot be supported by the
existing telecommunications infrastructure located in the area where the
telecommunications infrastructure improvement is to be made. The list shall
indicate for each business the number of jobs expected to be created or
retained as a result of the telecommunications infrastructure improvement.

(6)
No more than fifteen percent of tax credits recommended for approval in any one
year shall be for telecommunications infrastructure projects located in the
same county.

(7)
No more than fifteen percent of the tax credits recommended for approval in any
one year shall be for telecommunications infrastructure projects to be
constructed by the same advanced telecommunications provider or its affiliates.

(8)
The authority shall conduct at least one public hearing on its
telecommunications infrastructure plan before adoption. A plan shall be
adopted by resolution of the authority no later than one year after the
effective date of this act. The authority may periodically update its
telecommunications infrastructure plan as the authority deems necessary, but
changes shall take effect at the beginning of the calendar year following
adoption of the changes by resolution.

(9)
This section expires December 31, 2005.

Sec.
14. RCW
43.163.120 and 1998 c 245 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

The
authority shall receive no appropriation of state funds. The department of
community, trade, and economic development shall provide staff to the authority,
to the extent permitted by law, to enable the authority to accomplish its
purposes; the staff from the department of community, trade, and economic
development may assist the authority in organizing itself and in designing
programs, but shall not be involved in the issuance of bonds ((or)),
in making credit decisions regarding financing provided to borrowers by the
authority, or in reviewing and recommending for approval application for
telecommunications infrastructure tax credits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

For
purposes of the universal service telecommunications infrastructure program
established in section 2 of this act, each calendar year the available amount of
tax credits shall be determined as follows:

(1)
In Washington the average rate of growth in gross revenues for telephone
businesses during calendar years 1992 through 1996 was seven percent. For
purposes of this section, seven percent shall be the base growth rate.

(2)
Every October the department of revenue shall:

(a)
Compute total tax paid under this chapter by businesses in North American
industry classification system code 5133 for the last two calendar years. If
at any time the United States office of management and budget or a successor
agency should change or replace the present North American industry
classification code system, the department of revenue shall use the code system
issued by the office of management and budget or its successor agency to
determine the code corresponding to the one listed in this definition;

(b)
Compute the rate of growth that occurred in taxes paid under this chapter by
telecommunications businesses by subtracting total taxes paid from two calendar
years ago from last calendar year's total taxes paid and then dividing this
amount by total taxes paid from two calendar years ago;

(c)
Compare the growth rate computed under (b) of this subsection to the base
growth rate. If the rate of growth computed under (b) of this subsection
exceeds the base growth rate, then the department of revenue shall subtract the
base growth rate from the growth rate computed under (b) of this subsection and
multiply this amount against total taxes paid by telecommunications businesses for
the last calendar year. The product of this calculation or thirty million
dollars, whichever is less, shall be the amount of tax credits available for
the calendar year beginning on January 1st for the telecommunications
infrastructure program;

(d)
If the rate of growth computed under (b) of this subsection is less than the
base growth rate, then no moneys shall be available for tax credits; and

(e)
By October 15th of each year the department of revenue shall inform the
Washington economic development finance authority of the amount of tax credits
available for the telecommunications infrastructure program.

(3)
This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
An advanced telecommunications provider may be allowed credits against tax due
under this chapter or chapter 82.16 RCW for expenses incurred in constructing
telecommunications infrastructure improvements in high-cost locations. Credits
approved by the department under subsection (2) of this section may be claimed
over a three-year period but may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter and chapter 82.16 RCW during the three-year
period.

(b)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(i)
"Advanced telecommunications provider" means any person, corporation,
partnership, or association that operates equipment and facilities capable of
distributing digital communications signals for the transmission of voice,
data, image, and video over distance for either self use or the provision of
such services to others.

(ii)
"High-cost location" means a rural, insular, or other location where
the cost of providing telecommunications services is greater than an
appropriate price as provided in section 5 of this act.

(iii)
"Telecommunications infrastructure improvement" means the
construction or upgrade of real property or tangible personal property used to
distribute digital communications signals for the transmission of voice, data,
image, and video over distance. It includes, but is not limited to, activities
such as the laying of fiber optic cable, the construction of terrestrial
facilities to support digital communications by satellite, and the construction
of towers and other facilities to support digital communications through
nonwireline technologies.

(2)
The department shall approve a tax credit application and allow a person to
claim a tax credit under this section, if the Washington economic development
and finance authority has recommended the tax credit application for approval
to the department as provided in section 13 of this act.

(3)(a)
A person is required to repay any tax credits received plus interest if the
person who claims a tax credit under this section fails to:

(i)
Construct a telecommunications infrastructure improvement in accordance with
the specifications for bandwidth, rates, and other criteria that the person
indicated the improvement would meet in the tax credit application; or

(ii)
Complete the telecommunications infrastructure improvement within three years
of the tax credit application being approved by the department.

(b)
The Washington economic development finance authority shall be responsible for
informing the department of revenue when a tax credit recipient must repay tax
credits received plus interest.

(4)
This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An advanced telecommunications provider may be allowed credits against tax due
under this chapter or chapter 82.04 RCW for expenses incurred in constructing
telecommunications infrastructure improvements in high-cost locations, as
provided in section 16 of this act.

(2)
This section expires December 31, 2005.

PART
5

NEW PRICE
CAP REGULATORY OPTION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 80.36.135, an incumbent local exchange
carrier may elect to have the rates, terms, and conditions for its noncompetitive
telecommunications services determined under the provisions of this section.

(b)
Noncompetitive telecommunications services are telecommunications services that
have not been determined to be competitive telecommunications services under
RCW 80.36.330 and that have not been presumed to be competitive under
subsection (7) of this section.

(c)
For the purposes of this section, an "incumbent local exchange
carrier" as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 251(h)(1), means, with respect to an
area, the local exchange carrier that:

(i)
On February 8, 1996, provided telephone exchange service in such area; and

(ii)(A)
On February 8, 1996, was deemed to be a member of the exchange carrier
association under section 69.601(b) of the federal communication commission's
regulations (47 C.F.R. 69.601(b)); or

(B)
Is a person or entity that, on or after February 8, 1996, became a successor or
assign of a member described in (c)(ii)(A) of this subsection.

(2)
An incumbent local exchange carrier shall file a notice of its intent with the
commission to be an electing company and to be regulated under this section.

(3)
Upon such a filing, all rates, terms, and conditions for noncompetitive
telecommunications services provided by the incumbent local exchange carrier
that were contained in the tariffs and end-user contracts in effect on the date
of election under this section shall be deemed fair, just, and reasonable.

(4)
Nothing in this section restricts any customer's right to enforce any quality
of service rules and standards. Not later than one hundred eighty days from
the effective date of this act, the commission shall complete a proceeding to
ensure that all such rules and standards are applied equally to all
telecommunications providers.

(5)
Nothing in this section restricts any telecommunications company's right to
enforce wholesale rules and standards.

(6)
The rates for telecommunications services that were in effect on the date of
filing of a notice of election by an incumbent local exchange carrier under
subsection (3) of this section shall be the maximum amount that such incumbent
local exchange carrier may charge for such services. An electing company may
adjust prices subject to this subsection effective on ten days' notice, without
commission approval, so long as no price exceeds the maximum amount set by this
subsection.

(7)(a)
Whenever an electing company offers a service that was not available in a given
exchange or wire center on the date that the company elected to be regulated
under this section, the subsequent introduction of the service in the exchange
or wire center shall be presumed to be an offering of a competitive
telecommunications service if it is a new service. A new service is a service
that provides a significant difference in transmission speed, capability,
functionality, or reliability in comparison to the services that existed in the
exchange or wire center on the date that a company elected to be regulated
under this section.

(b)
The provisions of (a) of this subsection shall not apply if the service
introduced into an exchange or wire center area after the date that a company
elected to be regulated under this section is a basic telecommunications
service. The total amount charged a consumer for basic telecommunications
services shall not exceed the price benchmarks set for basic telecommunications
services under section 5 of this act.

(8)
Price cap regulation shall replace the current rate-base, rate-of-return form
of regulation by the commission of an electing company. The commission shall
not consider rate-of-return, rate-base, or earnings of an electing company in
connection with its oversight of an electing company's operations.

(9)
An electing company under this section shall not be subject to the provisions
of the following: RCW 80.04.130 (1) and (2), chapter 80.16 RCW, RCW 80.36.110,
80.36.140, and 80.36.150 (1) and (2).

Sec.
19. RCW
80.36.330 and 1998 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may classify a telecommunications service provided by a
telecommunications company as a competitive telecommunications service if the
service is subject to effective competition. Effective competition means that
customers of the service have reasonably available alternatives and that the
service is not provided to a significant captive customer base. In determining
whether a service is competitive, factors the commission shall consider include
but are not limited to:

(a)
The number and size of alternative providers of services;

(b)
The extent to which services are available from alternative providers in the
relevant market;

(c)
The ability of alternative providers to make functionally equivalent or
substitute services readily available at competitive rates, terms, and
conditions; and

(d)
Other indicators of market power, which may include market share, growth in market
share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of providers of services.

(2)
When the commission finds that a telecommunications company has demonstrated
that a telecommunications service is competitive, the commission may permit the
service to be provided under a price list effective on ten days notice to the
commission and customers. The commission shall prescribe the form of notice.
The commission may adopt procedural rules necessary to implement this section.

(3)
Prices or rates charged for competitive telecommunications services shall cover
their cost. The commission shall determine proper cost standards to implement
this section, provided that in making any assignment of costs or allocating any
revenue requirement, the commission shall act to preserve affordable universal
telecommunications service.

(4)
The commission may investigate prices for competitive telecommunications
services upon complaint. In any complaint proceeding initiated by the
commission, the telecommunications company providing the service shall bear the
burden of proving that the prices charged cover cost, and are fair, just, and
reasonable.

(5)
Telecommunications companies shall provide the commission with all data it
deems necessary to implement this section.

(6)
No losses incurred by a telecommunications company in the provision of
competitive services may be recovered through rates for noncompetitive
services. The commission may order refunds or credits to any class of
subscribers to a noncompetitive telecommunications service which has paid
excessive rates because of below cost pricing of competitive telecommunications
services.

(7)(a)
The commission may reclassify any competitive telecommunications service if
reclassification would protect the public interest.

(b)
If the reclassification is for a service provided by a company that has elected
to be regulated under section 18 of this act, the company shall not charge a
price for the reclassified service exceeding the amount charged for the service
prior to its classification as a competitive service.

(8)
The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and 80.36.180 in
whole or in part for a service classified as competitive if it finds that
competition will serve the same purpose and protect the public interest.

(9)
In designating telecommunications services as competitive telecommunications
services for a company that has elected to be regulated under section 18 of
this act:

(a)
The commission may make classifications apply to a particular telephone
exchange or wire center area and to a specific customer class.

(b)
In determining whether a service should be designated as a competitive
telecommunications service for a given telephone exchange or wire center area,
the commission shall give great weight to evidence showing that other
telecommunications companies are offering like or similar services to a
majority of customers located within the relevant customer class and telephone exchange
or wire center area.

PART
6

INTERCONNECTION
ENFORCEMENT AND PREVENTING OTHER

ANTICOMPETITIVE
PRACTICES OR ACTS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may handle on an expedited basis, as provided in this section,
any complaint that a telecommunications company has violated:

(a)
Any agreement approved by the commission under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 252(e); or

(b)
Any act or practice which the commission may identify by rule as serving as a
barrier to competitive entry in the telecommunications market.

(2)
Before filing a complaint with the commission, the complainant must serve
notice to the respondent telecommunications company of its intent to file a complaint
with the commission alleging a violation under subsection (1) of this section
and provide a period of five working days for the alleged violation to be
corrected.

(3)
If the respondent telecommunications company fails to cure the alleged
violation within the five-day period, the complainant may file a complaint and
application for expedited review with the commission and serve the respondent
with the same. The complainant shall attach to the complaint a copy of the
written notification that was served on the respondent telecommunications
company and any written response that was received thereto.

(4)
The respondent telecommunications company shall have five working days to
answer the complaint and shall file its answer and any other responsive
pleadings with the commission and serve the complainant with the same.

(5)
Within five working days after a complaint and application for expedited review
is filed with the commission, all parties shall serve on each other any
discovery requests for the production of data. Each party shall have ten days
to respond to the other party's requests. Any objections to the discovery
requests shall be served on the other party and filed with the commission
within five working days after receipt of the discovery request.

(6)(a)
Once the respondent files an answer to the complaint, the commission or its
designee shall determine within three working days whether to:

(i)
Approve the application for expedited review and begin an expedited
adjudicative proceeding under this section;

(ii)
Deny the application and proceed with a regular adjudicative proceeding under
RCW 80.04.110; or

(iii)
Dismiss the application as frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause.

(b)
If the commission or its designee dismisses the complaint as frivolous and
advanced without reasonable cause, the commission or its designee shall require
the complainant to reimburse the commission and the respondent for costs
incurred to the date of dismissal in responding to the complaint.

(7)
In determining whether to approve an application for expedited review, the
commission or its designee shall consider whether the complainant is likely to
suffer irreparable harm in its ability to serve customers if the alleged
violation under subsection (1) of this section continues unabated.

(8)
If an application for expedited review is approved:

(a)
The commission shall designate a commissioner or other person to preside over
the expedited adjudicative proceeding;

(b)
Within fourteen days of approving the application for expedited review, the
presiding officer shall schedule a prehearing conference which may be conducted
by telephone. During the prehearing conference the presiding officer shall:

(i)
Resolve all outstanding discovery disputes and establish a schedule for
completion of any additional discovery; and

(ii)
Confirm that an attempt to resolve the dispute through nonbinding mediation
under section 21 of this act has been or is being conducted;

(c)
The presiding officer shall schedule a hearing to commence within thirty-five
days of the complaint being filed. During the hearing evidence may be
presented by the parties and commission staff both orally and in written form.
Any individual who testifies either orally or in written form must be available
for cross-examination;

(d)
The presiding officer shall issue a recommended decision in written form within
sixty days of the complaint being filed. The presiding officer's recommended
decision shall be based on the facts and no finding of an intent to impede
market entry by a competitor shall be necessary in order to determine that a
violation has occurred. The recommended decision shall set forth the reasoning
for the decision and, if the recommended decision finds that a violation under
subsection (1) of this section has occurred, directions and a deadline for
correcting the violation. The recommended decision shall state the amount of
any penalties imposed under section 22 of this act;

(e)
The commission shall hear the arguments or comments of the parties regarding
the recommended decision at a regular or special open public meeting. The
parties may submit written comments to the commission prior to the meeting
under the schedule established in the recommended decision. The commission
shall conduct this session within ten days after the date of the recommended
decision;

(f)
The commission shall serve a final decision on the parties, in the form of a
commission order, resolving the issues within ten days of the hearing conducted
under (e) of this subsection. The order shall be based on the facts and no
finding of an intent to impede market entry by a competitor shall be necessary
in order to determine that a violation has occurred. The order shall set forth
the reasoning for the final decision and, if the final decision finds that a
violation under subsection (1) of this section has occurred, directions and a
deadline for correcting the violation. The final decision shall state the
amount of any penalties imposed under section 22 of this act;

(g)
Within ten days after the commission serves its order under (f) of this
subsection, the parties may petition for reconsideration. A petition for
reconsideration is denied unless the commission by separate decision grants the
petition within ten days after it is filed, or such longer time established by
the commission secretary. If a party files a petition for reconsideration, the
commission may, in its discretion, request that an answer be filed or call for
additional comments, briefing, evidence, or argument from the parties. Filing
a petition for reconsideration of the order does not stay the effect of the
order.

(9)
In conducting an expedited review of a complaint under this section, the
commission may at any time issue an order granting emergency relief for the
complainant if the commission finds that:

(a)
The respondent has failed to file a timely answer to a complaint, has not met
discovery deadlines, has failed to attend the required mediation session under
section 21 of this act, has failed to attend required hearings, or has
otherwise failed to comply with a request made by the presiding officer or by
the commission;

(b)
The complainant is likely to suffer irreparable harm in its ability to serve
customers if emergency relief is not granted;

(c)
The emergency relief sought is technically feasible; and

(d)
An order granting emergency relief is in the public interest.

(10)
An order for emergency relief shall direct the respondent telecommunications
company to act or refrain from acting as the commission finds necessary to
avoid, prevent, or mitigate the complained of harm. An order for emergency
relief shall set a deadline for the respondent telecommunications company to
comply with the order before penalties are imposed under section 22 of this
act. The order granting emergency relief shall remain in effect until the
commission issues a final order deciding the complaint filed under subsection
(3) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the commission or its designee approves an application for expedited
review of a complaint under section 20 of this act, the commission or its
designee shall conduct at least one mediation session with the parties.

(2)
The mediation session shall be held no later than the date scheduled for a
prehearing conference under section 20(8) of this act. An individual with
authority to negotiate and settle the matter shall be present from each party.

(3)
The mediation session shall be confidential and any verbal statements made
during the session shall not be disclosed.

(4)
Any agreement of the parties resolving any disputed issue shall be submitted to
the mediator for approval. Approval shall be granted unless the mediator finds
that the agreement is based upon a mistake in material fact or that the
agreement is not in the public interest. The approved agreement shall be
deemed to constitute a final order of the commission, unless the commission
enters its own order within six working days following the mediator's approval
of the agreement.

(5)
Any agreement or order resolving a dispute through mediation shall be
considered part of the public record and shall be made available by the
commission upon request.

(6)
Willful or negligent failure to attend the mediation conference or to comply
with the mediator's directions shall be reported to the mediator or the
commission in writing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the commission or its designee finds that a violation under section 20(1) of
this act has occurred, the commission may impose penalties up to one hundred
thousand dollars per violation. Additionally, the commission or its designee
may impose a penalty up to one hundred thousand dollars for each day that a
violation continues beyond the deadline set in the final decision issued under
section 20(8) of this act.

(2)
If parties are able to resolve a dispute through mediation, as provided in
section 21 of this act, there shall be no initial assessment of penalties.
However, if a violation is not corrected by the date specified in any mediation
agreement, the commission or its designee may impose a penalty up to one
hundred thousand dollars for each day beyond the specified date that a
violation continues.

(3)
If the commission issues an order granting emergency relief under section 20(9)
of this act and the respondent telecommunications company fails to comply with
the deadline set in that order, then the commission or its designee may impose
a penalty up to one hundred thousand dollars for each day beyond the deadline
that noncompliance continues.

(4)
In determining the amount of any penalties imposed under subsections (1)
through (3) of this section, the commission or its designee shall take into
account the appropriateness of the penalties with respect to the gravity of the
violation, the size of the respondent telecommunications company's Washington
operations, and the respondent telecommunications company's history of previous
violations. In no case shall a penalty imposed per violation exceed one-half
of one percent of a respondent telecommunications company's gross revenues from
its Washington operations during the previous year. If a respondent Washington
telecommunications company had no Washington operations during the previous
year, then the penalty imposed per violation under this section shall not
exceed five thousand dollars.

(5)
Any imposition of penalties shall be by order of the commission, after
providing for notice and a hearing.

(6)
Penalties imposed under this section shall be in addition to any monetary
payments ordered by the commission under an interconnection agreement and shall
not restrict a complainant's ability to recover damages under any other remedy
that may be available under any other provision of state or federal law.

(7)
Payment of penalties imposed under this section shall be made to the public
service revolving fund within thirty days of issuance by the commission of an
order imposing penalties. The commission may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction for enforcement of its order requiring payment of penalties
imposed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To the extent that the provisions of this section and sections 20 through 22 of
this act may differ with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, the provisions of this section and sections 20
through 22 of this act shall govern.

(2)
In implementing the provisions of this section and sections 20 through 22 of
this act, the commission may:

(a)
Adopt rules as needed; and

(b)
Obtain external resources and contract for outside persons to serve as
presiding officers, mediators, or consultants for the purposes of facilitating
the prompt disposition of expedited proceedings authorized under section 20 of
this act.

PART
7

MISCELLANEOUS
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
80.36.600 and 1998 c 337 s 1; and

(2) RCW
80.36.620 and 1998 c 337 s 3.

---
END ---