BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.36.031 and 1998 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of assault in the third degree if he or she, under
circumstances not amounting to assault in the first or second degree:

(a)
With intent to prevent or resist the execution of any lawful process or mandate
of any court officer or the lawful apprehension or detention of himself or
another person, assaults another; or

(b)
Assaults a person employed ((as a transit operator or driver)) by a
public or private transit company or a contracted transit service provider
while that person is performing his or her official duties at the time of the
assault; or

(c)
Assaults a person using transit equipment, services, or facilities; or

(d)
Assaults a ((school bus driver)) person employed by a school
district transportation service or a private company under contract for
transportation services with a school district while the ((driver)) person
is performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(((d)))
(e) With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm to another person by
means of a weapon or other instrument or thing likely to produce bodily harm;
or

(((e)))
(f) Assaults a fire fighter or other employee of a fire department,
county fire marshal's office, county fire prevention bureau, or fire protection
district who was performing his or her official duties at the time of the
assault; or

(((f)))
(g) With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm accompanied by
substantial pain that extends for a period sufficient to cause considerable
suffering; or

(((g)))
(h) Assaults a law enforcement officer or other employee of a law
enforcement agency who was performing his or her official duties at the time of
the assault; or

(((h)))
(i) Assaults a nurse, physician, or health care provider who was
performing his or her nursing or health care duties at the time of the
assault. For purposes of this subsection: "Nurse" means a person
licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; "physician" means a person licensed
under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW; and "health care provider" means a
person certified under chapter 18.71 or 18.73 RCW who performs emergency
medical services or a person regulated under Title 18 RCW and employed by, or
contracting with, a hospital licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

(2) Assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

---
END ---