BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW to read as follows:

In any civil action for the killing of a domestic animal, a
successful plaintiff is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and court
costs. In addition, the court may impose on any liable party a civil penalty
of no more than twenty-five hundred dollars to be paid to the plaintiff.

---
END ---