BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter shall not apply to the gross sales or the gross income received by
a new small business located in an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.62.010.

(2)
As used in this section:

(a)
"New small business" means a business that: (i) Obtained or was
required to obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for the first
time during the thirty-six months immediately preceding the date in which an
exemption is claimed under this section; and (ii) for the business, the value
of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, from all
business activities, is less than five million dollars per year.

(b)
For out-of-state entities first engaging in business in this state, "new
small business" means a person or company, as defined in RCW 82.04.030,
located outside this state that: (i) Obtained or was required to obtain
registration with any state, federal, or foreign agency for the first time
during the thirty-six months immediately preceding the date in which an
exemption is claimed under this section; and (ii) for the business, the value
of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the business, from all
business activities, is less than five million dollars per year.

(c)
"New small business" does not include:

(i)
A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or transferred, unless the
majority of the activities to be conducted after restructuring, reorganization,
or transferral are significantly different from the activities previously
conducted;

(ii)
A new branch location or other facility; or

(iii) A business that is substantially similar to a business
currently operated, or operated within the past ten years, by the same
principals.

---
END ---