BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.38.080 and 1998 c 176 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter, the use of fuel for:

(a)
Street and highway construction and maintenance purposes in motor vehicles
owned and operated by the state of Washington, or any county or municipality;

(b)
Publicly owned fire fighting equipment;

(c)
Special mobile equipment as defined in RCW 46.04.552;

(d)
Power pumping units or other power take-off equipment of any motor vehicle
which is accurately measured by metering devices that have been specifically
approved by the department or which is established by any of the following
formulae:

(i)
Pumping propane, or fuel or heating oils or milk picked up from a farm or dairy
farm storage tank by a power take-off unit on a delivery truck, at a rate
determined by the department: PROVIDED, That claimant when presenting his or
her claim to the department in accordance with this chapter, shall provide to
the claim, invoices of propane, or fuel or heating oil delivered, or such other
appropriate information as may be required by the department to substantiate
his or her claim;

(ii)
Operating a power take-off unit on a cement mixer truck or a load compactor on
a garbage truck at the rate of twenty-five percent of the total gallons of fuel
used in such a truck; or

(iii)
The department is authorized to establish by rule additional formulae for
determining fuel usage when operating other types of equipment by means of
power take-off units when direct measurement of the fuel used is not feasible.
The department is also authorized to adopt rules regarding the usage of on
board computers for the production of records required by this chapter;

(e)
Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States government;

(f)
Heating purposes;

(g)
Moving a motor vehicle on a public highway between two pieces of private
property when said moving is incidental to the primary use of the motor
vehicle;

(h)
Transportation services for persons with special transportation needs by a
private, nonprofit transportation provider regulated under chapter 81.66 RCW;

(i)
Vehicle refrigeration units, mixing units, or other equipment powered by
separate motors from separate fuel tanks; ((and))

(j)
The operation of a motor vehicle as a part of or incidental to logging
operations upon a highway under federal jurisdiction within the boundaries of a
federal area if the federal government requires a fee for the privilege of
operating the motor vehicle upon the highway, the proceeds of which are
reserved for constructing or maintaining roads in the federal area, or requires
maintenance or construction work to be performed on the highway for the
privilege of operating the motor vehicle on the highway; and

(k)
Motor vehicles that are: (i) Owned and operated by an institution of higher
education; and (ii) used solely in research and development activities for the
testing of alternative fuels to power vehicles.

(2)
There is exempted from the tax imposed by this chapter the removal or entry of
special fuel under the following circumstances and conditions:

(a)
If it is the removal from a terminal or refinery of, or the entry or sale of, a
special fuel if all of the following apply:

(i)
The person otherwise liable for the tax is a licensee other than a dyed special
fuel user or international fuel tax agreement licensee;

(ii)
For a removal from a terminal, the terminal is a licensed terminal; and

(iii)
The special fuel satisfies the dyeing and marking requirements of this chapter;

(b)
If it is an entry or removal from a terminal or refinery of taxable special
fuel transferred to a refinery or terminal and the persons involved, including
the terminal operator, are licensed; and

(c)(i)
If it is a special fuel that, under contract of sale, is shipped to a point
outside this state by a supplier by means of any of the following:

(A)
Facilities operated by the supplier;

(B)
Delivery by the supplier to a carrier, customs broker, or forwarding agent,
whether hired by the purchaser or not, for shipment to the out-of-state point;

(C)
Delivery by the supplier to a vessel clearing from port of this state for a
port outside this state and actually exported from this state in the vessel.

(ii)
For purposes of this subsection (2)(c):

(A)
"Carrier" means a person or firm engaged in the business of
transporting for compensation property owned by other persons, and includes
both common and contract carriers; and

(B)
"Forwarding agent" means a person or firm engaged in the business of
preparing property for shipment or arranging for its shipment.

(3)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, every urban passenger
transportation system and carriers as defined by chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW
shall be exempt from the provisions of this chapter requiring the payment of
special fuel taxes. For the purposes of this section "urban passenger
transportation system" means every transportation system, publicly or
privately owned, having as its principal source of revenue the income from
transporting persons for compensation by means of motor vehicles and/or
trackless trolleys, each having a seating capacity for over fifteen persons
over prescribed routes in such a manner that the routes of such motor vehicles
and/or trackless trolleys, either alone or in conjunction with routes of other
such motor vehicles and/or trackless trolleys subject to routing by the same
transportation system, shall not extend for a distance exceeding twenty-five
road miles beyond the corporate limits of the county in which the original
starting points of such motor vehicles are located: PROVIDED, That no refunds
or credits shall be granted on special fuel used by any urban transportation
vehicle or vehicle operated pursuant to chapters 81.68 and 81.70 RCW on any
trip where any portion of said trip is more than twenty-five road miles beyond
the corporate limits of the county in which said trip originated.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.08.0255 and 1998 c 176 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:

(a)
Motor vehicle fuel used in aircraft by the manufacturer thereof for research,
development, and testing purposes; and

(b)
Motor vehicle and special fuel if:

(i)
The fuel is purchased for the purpose of public transportation and the
purchaser is entitled to a refund or an exemption under RCW 82.36.275 or
82.38.080(3); ((or))

(ii)
The fuel is purchased by a private, nonprofit transportation provider certified
under chapter 81.66 RCW and the purchaser is entitled to a refund or an
exemption under RCW 82.36.285 or 82.38.080(1)(h); ((or))

(iii)
The fuel is taxable under chapter 82.36 or 82.38 RCW; or

(iv)
The fuel is purchased by an institution of higher education and used solely in
research and development activities for the testing of alternative fuels to
power vehicles.

(2) Any person who has paid the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 on the
sale of special fuel delivered in this state shall be entitled to a credit or
refund of such tax with respect to fuel subsequently established to have been
actually transported and used outside this state by persons engaged in
interstate commerce. The tax shall be claimed as a credit or refunded through
the tax reports required under RCW 82.38.150.

---
END ---