BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to provide a tax incentive program to encourage
the hiring of dislocated workers in distressed areas by allowing employers in
distressed areas to take business and occupation tax credits for expenses
related to providing job training for newly hired production employees in
distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter, the value of
state-approved, employer-provided or sponsored job training services designed
to enhance the job-related performance of newly hired production employees, for
businesses located in eligible areas as defined in RCW 82.62.010.

(2)
The value of the state-approved, job training services provided by the employer
to the employee, without charge, shall be determined by the allocation of the
cost method using generally accepted accounting standards.

(3)
The credit allowed under this section shall be limited to an amount equal to
the value of the state-approved, job training services determined under
subsection (2) of this section. The credit may be taken in the tax year
following the provision of the job training services.

(4)
Prior to claiming the credit under this section, the business must obtain
approval of the proposed job training service from the employment security
department. The employer's request for approval must include a description of
the proposed job training service, how the job training will enhance the
employee's performance, and the cost of the proposed job training.

(5)
The employee being trained for which a training tax credit is taken must remain
on the payroll of the employer a minimum of twelve months after the training.
The employee must have been a resident of the county in which the employer is
located and not been employed at the time of beginning employment with
business.

(6)
This section only applies to training in respect to eligible business projects
for which an application is approved on or after June 30, 1999.

(7) "Production employees" as used in this section refers
to nonmanagerial employees earning, or to earn as a result of the training, a
minimum of eight dollars per hour.

---
END ---