BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All state agencies that maintain a toll-free telephone hot line for reporting
violations, shall maintain an internet web site that allows the public to
report violations to the agency. The agency-maintained web site shall allow
the public to report violations through the internet as an alternative to
making a toll-free telephone call to the agency.

(2)
The agency shall investigate the reported violation, and shall report the
results of its findings back to each person who reported the violation, if
requested to do so by the person making the report.

(3) The department shall conduct a public information program in
order to inform the public about the existence and purpose of its web site and
its toll-free telephone hot line.

---
END ---