BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.220.020 and 1990 c 33 s 218 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following words and phrases whenever used in chapter 28A.220 RCW shall have the
following meaning:

(1)
"Superintendent" or "state superintendent" shall mean the
superintendent of public instruction.

(2)
"Traffic safety education course" shall mean an accredited course of
instruction in traffic safety education which shall consist of two phases,
classroom instruction, and laboratory experience. "Laboratory
experience" shall include on-street, driving range, or simulator
experience or some combination thereof. Each phase shall meet basic course
requirements which shall be established by the superintendent of public
instruction and each part of said course shall be taught by a qualified teacher
of traffic safety education. Any portions of the course may be taught after
regular school hours or on Saturdays as well as on regular school days or as a
summer school course, at the option of the local school districts.

(3)
"Qualified teacher of traffic safety education" shall mean an
instructor certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW and
certificated by the superintendent of public instruction to teach either the
classroom phase or the laboratory phase of the traffic safety education course,
or both, under regulations promulgated by the superintendent: PROVIDED, That
the laboratory experience phase of the traffic safety education course may be
taught by instructors certificated under rules promulgated by the
superintendent of public instruction, exclusive of any requirement that the
instructor be certificated under the provisions of chapter 28A.410 RCW; or,
solely for the purposes of providing home-based instruction under section 2 of
this act, a parent providing home-based instruction in accordance with chapter
28A.200 RCW and section 2 of this act. Professional instructors
certificated under the provisions of chapter 46.82 RCW, and participating in
this program, shall be subject to reasonable qualification requirements jointly
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and the director of
licensing.

(4)
"Realistic level of effort" means the classroom and laboratory
student learning experiences considered acceptable to the superintendent of
public instruction that must be satisfactorily accomplished by the student in
order to successfully complete the traffic safety education course.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.220 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a list of parent-led
traffic safety and driver's education courses that are nationally recognized or
approved for use in other states. The list shall be made available to parents
providing home-based instruction in accordance with chapter 28A.200 RCW.
Parents providing home-based instruction who are interested in using any of the
courses on the list shall certify to the superintendent that:

(a)
The parent providing the instruction has a current driver's license issued by
the state of Washington;

(b)
The parent providing the instruction has not been convicted of criminally
negligent vehicular homicide or driving while intoxicated within the last ten
years; and

(c)
The parent providing the instruction has not been disabled because of mental
illness.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not authorize the superintendent of public
instruction to require a parent to undergo a background investigation. The
superintendent of public instruction may request the driving record of the
parent providing the instruction in order to confirm that the parent is in
compliance with requirements of subsection (1) of this section. The
superintendent may not require the parent to submit records verifying the parent's
mental health history.

(3)
Each parent-led course identified by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction must include, at a minimum, the following:

(a)
The equivalent of thirty hours of classroom instruction;

(b)
The equivalent of fifty hours of street driving, including highway driving;

(c)
Instruction concerning alcohol and drug use and its effects on driving; and

(d)
Materials for the parent to use to evaluate the driving skills achieved by the
student after completing the course.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction may not require
parents interested in using a parent-led traffic safety or driver's education
course identified by the office to participate in instructional classes to
verify the parent's ability to use the course effectively.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.100 and 1990 c 250 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of licensing shall not consider an application of any minor under
the age of eighteen years for a driver's license or the issuance of a
motorcycle endorsement for a particular category unless:

(1)
The application is also signed by a parent or guardian having the custody of
such minor, or in the event a minor under the age of eighteen has no father,
mother, or guardian, then a driver's license shall not be issued to the minor
unless his or her application is also signed by the minor's employer; and

(2)
The applicant has satisfactorily completed a traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW 28A.220.020, conducted by a recognized secondary school, that
meets the standards established by the office of the state superintendent of
public instruction ((or)), the applicant has satisfactorily
completed a traffic safety education course, conducted by a commercial driving
instruction enterprise, that meets the standards established by the office of
the superintendent of public instruction and is officially approved by that
office on an annual basis, or the applicant has successfully completed a
parent-led traffic safety or driver's education course in accordance with
section 2 of this act for students receiving home-based instruction:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the director may upon a showing that an applicant was
unable to take or complete a driver education course waive that requirement if
the applicant shows to the satisfaction of the department that a need exists
for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle and he or she has the ability to
operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to jeopardize the safety of
persons or property, under rules to be promulgated by the department in concert
with the supervisor of the traffic safety education section, office of the
superintendent of public instruction. For a person under the age of eighteen
years to obtain a motorcycle endorsement, he or she must successfully complete
a motorcycle safety education course that meets the standards established by the
department of licensing.

The department may waive any education requirement under this
subsection for an applicant previously licensed to drive a motor vehicle or
motorcycle outside this state if the applicant provides proof satisfactory to
the department that he or she has had education equivalent to that required
under this subsection.

---
END ---