BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.70.115 and 1986 c 241 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If it appears to the director that a person has engaged or is about to engage
in an act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter, or a rule
adopted or an order issued under this chapter, the director may issue an order
directing the person to cease and desist from continuing the act or practice.
Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing shall be given. The
director may issue a temporary order pending a hearing. The temporary order
shall remain in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and shall
become final if the person to whom the notice is addressed does not request a
hearing within fifteen days after receipt of the notice.

(2) The director may levy and collect a civil penalty, in an
amount not to exceed one thousand dollars for each violation, against a person
found by the director to be in violation of this chapter or a rule adopted
under this chapter. A person against whom a civil penalty has been imposed
must receive reasonable notice and an opportunity for a hearing on the issue.
The civil penalty is due ten days after receipt of the notice, or if a hearing
is requested, upon a final adjudication of the issue.

---
END ---