BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The sum of one million dollars per fiscal year, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of health
for the purpose of making available breast and cervical cancer screening to
low-income women. To assure that this total annual appropriation is available,
one million dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000;
and one million dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2001.

(2) These appropriations shall be targeted for services to women
ages forty through forty-nine. The department of health shall limit
departmental administrative expenses to no more than ten percent of the total
appropriation for this purpose. The department of health shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2000, and annually thereafter on departmental
administrative expenditures, county administrative expenditures, direct service
expenditures, and numbers of women served. This report shall provide detailed
data and expenditures for each service provided.

---
END ---