BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
During 1997 and 1998, a committee of the state board of education reviewed all
board rules and related authorizing statutes. Based on the findings and
recommendations resulting from the review, the state board prepared a report to
the legislature requesting action be taken. It is the intent of this act to
implement recommendations of the state board of education.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.150.250 and 1990 c 33 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

From
those funds made available by the legislature for the current use of the common
schools, the superintendent of public instruction shall distribute annually as
provided in RCW 28A.510.250 to each school district of the state operating a
program approved by the state board of education an amount which, when combined
with an appropriate portion of such locally available revenues, other than
receipts from federal forest revenues distributed to school districts pursuant
to RCW 28A.520.010 and 28A.520.020, as the superintendent of public instruction
may deem appropriate for consideration in computing state equalization support,
excluding excess property tax levies, will constitute a basic education
allocation in dollars for each annual average full time equivalent student
enrolled, based upon one full school year of one hundred eighty days, except
that for kindergartens one full school year shall be one hundred eighty half
days of instruction, or the equivalent as provided in RCW 28A.150.220.

Basic
education shall be considered to be fully funded by those amounts of dollars
appropriated by the legislature pursuant to RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 to
fund those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 in accordance
with the formula and ratios provided in RCW 28A.150.260 and those amounts of
dollars appropriated by the legislature to fund the salary requirements of RCW
28A.150.100 and 28A.150.410.

((Operation
of a program approved by the state board of education, for the purposes of this
section, shall include a finding that the ratio of students per classroom
teacher in grades kindergarten through three is not greater than the ratio of
students per classroom teacher in grades four and above for such district:
PROVIDED, That for the purposes of this section, "classroom teacher"
shall be defined as an instructional employee possessing at least a provisional
certificate, but not necessarily employed as a certificated employee, whose
primary duty is the daily educational instruction of students: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board of education shall adopt rules and regulations to
insure compliance with the student/teacher ratio provisions of this section,
and such rules and regulations shall allow for exemptions for those special
programs and/or school districts which may be deemed unable to practicably meet
the student/teacher ratio requirements of this section by virtue of a small
number of students.))

If
a school district's basic education program fails to meet the basic education
requirements enumerated in RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.220, the
state board of education shall require the superintendent of public instruction
to withhold state funds in whole or in part for the basic education allocation
until program compliance is assured: PROVIDED, That the state board of
education may waive this requirement in the event of substantial lack of
classroom space.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.205.010 and 1993 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this chapter, unless the context thereof shall clearly indicate to
the contrary:

"Education
center" means any ((private)) nonpublic school operated on a
profit or nonprofit basis which does the following:

(a)
Is devoted to the teaching of basic academic skills, including specific attention
to improvement of student motivation for achieving, and employment orientation.

(b)
Operates on a clinical, client centered basis. This shall include, but not be
limited to, performing diagnosis of individual educational abilities,
determination and setting of individual goals, prescribing and providing
individual courses of instruction therefor, and evaluation of each individual
client's progress in his or her educational program.

(c)
Conducts courses of instruction by professionally trained personnel
certificated by the state board of education according to rules ((and
regulations promulgated)) adopted for the purposes of this chapter
and providing, for certification purposes, that a year's teaching experience in
an education center shall be deemed equal to a year's teaching experience in a
common or ((private)) nonpublic school.

(2)
For purposes of this chapter, basic academic skills shall include the study of
mathematics, speech, language, reading and composition, science, history,
literature and political science or civics, as any or all of these subjects
are identified under RCW 28A.150.210 and for which essential academic learning
requirements have been established under RCW 28A.630.885(3)(a); it shall
not include courses of a vocational training nature and shall not include
courses deemed nonessential to the accrediting of the common schools or the
approval of ((private)) nonpublic schools under RCW 28A.305.130.

(3)
The state board of education shall certify an education center only upon
application and (a) determination that such school comes within the definition
thereof as set forth in subsection (1) ((above)) of this section
and (b) demonstration on the basis of actual educational performance of such
applicants' students which shows after consideration of their students'
backgrounds, educational gains that are a direct result of the applicants'
educational program. Such certification may be withdrawn if the board finds
that a center fails to provide adequate instruction in basic academic skills.
No education center certified by the state board of education pursuant to this
section shall be deemed a common school under RCW 28A.150.020 or a ((private))
nonpublic school for the purposes of RCW 28A.195.010 through
28A.195.050.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.205.020 and 1997 c 265 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Only
eligible common school dropouts shall be enrolled in a certified education
center for reimbursement by the superintendent of public instruction as
provided in RCW 28A.205.040. A person is not an eligible common school dropout
if: (1) The person has completed high school, (2) the person has not reached
his or her twelfth birthday or has passed his or her twentieth birthday, (3)
the person shows proficiency beyond the high school level in a test approved by
the ((superintendent of public instruction)) state board of education
to be given as part of the initial diagnostic procedure, or (4) less than one
month has passed after the person has dropped out of any common school and the
education center has not received written verification from a school official
of the common school last attended in this state that the person is no longer
in attendance at the school. A person is an eligible common school dropout
even if one month has not passed since the person dropped out if the board of
directors or its designee, of that common school, requests the center to admit
the person because the person has dropped out or because the person is unable
to attend a particular common school because of disciplinary reasons, including
suspension and/or expulsion. The fact that any person may be subject to RCW
28A.225.010 through ((28A.225.150)) 28A.225.140, 28A.200.010, and
28A.200.020 shall not affect his or her qualifications as an eligible common
school dropout under this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.205.040 and 1990 c 33 s 183 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
From funds appropriated for that purpose, the superintendent of public
instruction shall pay fees to a certified ((clinic)) center
on a monthly basis for each student enrolled in compliance with RCW
28A.205.020((, fees in accordance with the following conditions:

(1)(a)
The fee for the initial diagnostic procedure shall be not more than fifty
dollars per student, and hourly fees for each student shall be sixteen dollars
if the class size is no greater than one, ten dollars if the class size is at
least two and no greater than five, and five dollars if the class size is at
least six: PROVIDED, That)). The superintendent
shall set fees by rule.

(b)
Revisions in such fees proposed by an education ((clinic)) center
shall become effective after thirty days notice unless the superintendent finds
such a revision is unreasonable in which case the revision shall not take
effect((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). An education ((clinic))
center may, within fifteen days after such a finding by the
superintendent, file notification of appeal with the state board of education
which shall, no later than its second regularly scheduled meeting following
notification of such appeal, either grant or deny the proposed revision((:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The administration of any general
education development test shall not be a part of such initial diagnostic
procedure.

(((b)))
(c) Reimbursements shall not be made for students who are absent.

(((c)))
(d) No ((clinic)) center shall make any charge to any
student, or the student's parent, guardian or custodian, for whom a fee is
being received under the provisions of this section.

(2)
Payments shall be made from available funds first to those ((clinic(s) which))
centers that have in the judgment of the superintendent demonstrated superior
performance based upon consideration of students' educational gains taking into
account such students' backgrounds, and upon consideration of cost
effectiveness. In considering the cost effectiveness of nonprofit ((clinics))
centers the superintendent shall take into account not only payments
made under this section but also factors such as tax exemptions, direct and
indirect subsidies or any other cost to taxpayers at any level of government
which result from such nonprofit status.

(3)
To be eligible for such payment, every such ((clinic)) center,
without prior notice, shall permit a review of its accounting records by
personnel of the state auditor during normal business hours.

(4)
If total funds for this purpose approach depletion, the superintendent shall
notify the ((clinics)) centers of the date after which further
funds for reimbursement of the ((clinics')) centers' services
will be exhausted.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.225.160 and 1986 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided by law, it is the general policy of the state that the
common schools shall be open to the admission of all persons who are five years
of age and less than twenty-one years residing in that school district. Except
as otherwise provided by law or rules adopted by the state board of
education, ((the state board of education is hereby authorized to adopt
rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW which)) districts may
establish uniform entry qualifications, including but not limited to birth date
requirements, for admission to kindergarten and first grade programs of the
common schools. Such rules may provide for exceptions based upon the ability,
or the need, or both, of an individual student. For the purpose of complying
with any rule adopted by the state board of education which authorizes a
preadmission screening process as a prerequisite to granting exceptions to the
uniform entry qualifications, a school district may collect fees ((not to
exceed seventy-five dollars per preadmission student)) to cover expenses
incurred in the administration of ((such a)) any preadmission
screening process: PROVIDED, That in so establishing such fee or fees, the
district shall adopt regulations for waiving and reducing such fees in the
cases of those persons whose families, by reason of their low income, would
have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.300.040 and 1992 c 198 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the powers and
duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:

(1)
To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public schools of the
state((.));

(2)
To report to the governor and the legislature such information and data as may
be required for the management and improvement of the schools((.));

(3)
To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of study, rules ((and
regulations)) for the government of the common schools, ((questions
prepared for the examination of persons as provided for in RCW 28A.305.130(9),))
and such other material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the
duties of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to educational
service district superintendents((.));

(4)
To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties as
superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending educational
meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, of consulting educational service
district superintendents or other school officials((.));

(5)
To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the Washington state
common school code, copies of which shall be provided in such numbers as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction at no cost to those
public agencies within the common school system and which shall be sold at
approximate actual cost of publication and distribution per volume to all other
public and nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules ((and regulations)) related to the common schools,
and such other matter as the state superintendent or the state board of
education shall determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be
transmitted to the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's
account within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount((.));

(6)
To act as ex officio member and the chief executive officer of the state board
of education((.));

(7)
To act as the administrator for rules adopted under RCW 28A.305.130 (1)
through (5), (7), and (8);

(8)
To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to the
superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or districts of
the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers filed in the
superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official acts, may, or upon
request, shall be certified by the superintendent and attested by the
superintendent's official seal, and when so certified shall be evidence of the
papers or acts so certified to((.));

(((8)))
(9) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of the
president, manager, or principal of every educational institution in this
state, a report as required by the superintendent of public instruction; and it
is the duty of every president, manager or principal, to complete and return
such forms within such time as the superintendent of public instruction shall
direct((.));

(((9)))
(10) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state((.));

(((10)))
(11) To issue certificates as provided by law((.));

(((11)))
(12) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the state,
all books and papers pertaining to the business of the superintendent's office,
and to keep and preserve in the superintendent's office a complete record of
statistics, as well as a record of the meetings of the state board of
education((.));

(((12)))
(13) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent in
writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that may be
submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal from the
decision of any educational service district superintendent; and the
superintendent shall publish his or her rulings and decisions from time to time
for the information of school officials and teachers; and the superintendent's
decision shall be final unless set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction((.));

(((13)))
(14) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties((.));

(((14)))
(15) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents and papers
of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or which may have
been received by the superintendent's for the use of the superintendent's office((.));

(((15)))
(16) To administer family services and programs to promote the state's
policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025((.));

(((16)))
(17) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.305.130 and 1997 c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of
education shall:

(1)
Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school
administrator, and school specialized personnel certification offered by all
institutions of higher education within the state which may be accredited and
whose graduates may become entitled to receive such certification((.));

(2)
Conduct every five years a review of the program approval standards, including
the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of
preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff associates((.));

(3)
Investigate the character of the work required to be performed as a condition
of entrance to and graduation from any institution of higher education in this
state relative to such certification as provided for in subsection (1) ((above))
of this section, and prepare a list of accredited institutions of higher
education of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded such
certificates((.));

(4)(a)
The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a teacher certification
candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher preparation program requirements through
work experience as a classified teacher's aide in a public or nonpublic
school ((or private school)) meeting the requirements of RCW
28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are not limited to, limitations
based upon the recency of the teacher preparation candidate's teacher aide work
experience, and limitations based on the amount of work experience that may
apply toward teacher preparation program requirements under this chapter((.));

(b)
The state board of education shall require that at the time of the individual's
enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the supervising teacher and the
building principal shall jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of
the higher education institution at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a
written assessment of the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment
shall contain such information as determined by the state board of education
and shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities
with children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and that the
candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the
type of work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the
candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should be
substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance with
such rules as may be established by the state board of education under this
section, the teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution
where the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work
experience((.));

(5)
Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1)
((above)) of this section and specify the types and kinds of
certificates necessary for the several departments of the common schools by
rule ((or regulation in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.));

(6)
Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be
established by the state board of education, all schools that apply for
accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010, ((private))
nonpublic schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That no ((private)) nonpublic
school may be approved that operates a kindergarten program only: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no public or ((private)) nonpublic schools shall be
placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as secret societies are
knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school officials: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require all or certain
classifications of the public schools to conduct and participate in such
preaccreditation examination and evaluation processes as may now or hereafter
be established by the board((.));

(7)
Establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and
certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this state,
including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute, or provisional
duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or
as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that the initial
application for certification shall require a record check of the applicant
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through
the federal bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check
shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The superintendent of public instruction may
waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the
two years before application;

(8)
In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of
American sign language, consult with the national association of the deaf,
"sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington
state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language
instructors;

(9)
Make rules ((and regulations)) governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new grades in
grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are
established the district must obtain prior approval of the state board((.));

(((8)))
(10) Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the board
shall deem necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general government of
the common schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of attendance, prevent
truancy, secure efficiency, and promote the true interest of the common
schools((.));

(((9)))
(11) Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce ((regulations))
rules within the common schools so as to meet the educational needs of
students and articulate with the institutions of higher education and unify the
work of the public school system((.));

(((10)))
(12) Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization and
reorganization of school districts under RCW 28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680
and 28A.315.900((.));

(((11)))
(13) By rule ((or regulation promulgated)) adopted upon
the advice of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of
fire protection, provide for instruction of pupils in the public and ((private))
nonpublic schools carrying out a K through 12 program, or any part
thereof, so that in case of sudden emergency they shall be able to leave their
particular school building in the shortest possible time or take such other
steps as the particular emergency demands, and without confusion or panic; such
rules ((and regulations)) shall be published and distributed to
certificated personnel throughout the state whose duties shall include a
familiarization therewith as well as the means of implementation thereof at
their particular school((.)); and

(((12)))
(14) Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.

The
state board of education ((is given the authority to promulgate)) may
adopt information and rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for
purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.

Sec.
9. RCW
4.24.550 and 1998 c 220 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public agencies are authorized to release information to the public regarding
sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when the agency determines that
disclosure of the information is relevant and necessary to protect the public
and counteract the danger created by the particular offender. This
authorization applies to information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or
convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense
as defined by RCW 9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the
indeterminate sentence review board as the result of a sex offense or
kidnapping offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually violent predator
under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d)
any person found not guilty of a sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of
insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand
trial for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(2)
The extent of the public disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall
be rationally related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the
community; (b) the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or
is regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for
information to enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3)
Local law enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in
determining the extent of a public disclosure made under this section: (a) For
offenders classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with
other appropriate law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon request,
relevant, necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the
offense and to any individual community member who lives near the residence
where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; (b) for
offenders classified as risk level II, the agency may also disclose relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to public and ((private)) nonpublic
schools, child day care centers, family day care providers, businesses and
organizations that serve primarily children, women, or vulnerable adults, and
neighbors and community groups near the residence where the offender resides,
expects to reside, or is regularly found; and (c) for offenders classified as
risk level III, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate
information to the public at large.

(4)
Local law enforcement agencies that disseminate information pursuant to this
section shall: (a) Review available risk level classifications made by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and
the indeterminate sentence review board; (b) assign risk level classifications
to all offenders about whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a
good faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days
before the offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves
from another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of the
offender's move, except that in no case may this notification provision be
construed to require an extension of an offender's release date. The juvenile
court shall provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant
information on offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely manner.

(5)
An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as
defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability for damages for any
discretionary risk level classification decisions or release of relevant and
necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or
agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this
section applies to risk level classification decisions and the release of
relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure
is authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or official to
classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health services, or the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and
necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by
itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided
under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information
to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.

(6)
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall
impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency
for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(7)
Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated
in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be
provided by law.

(8)
When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an offender
differently than the offender is classified by the department of corrections,
the department of social and health services, or the indeterminate sentence
review board, the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the
appropriate department or the board and submit its reasons supporting the
change in classification.

Sec.
10. RCW
9.41.280 and 1996 c 295 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on, public or ((private))
nonpublic elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided
transportation, or areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public
or ((private)) nonpublic schools:

(a)
Any firearm;

(b)
Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c)
Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of two
or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with
wire, rope, or other means;

(d)
Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any aspect; or

(e)
Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB,
pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide,
or other gas.

(2)
Any such person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. If any person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any
revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is
prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three
years. The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of
licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.

Any
violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school
students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in
accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall
promptly notify law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding
any allegation or indication of such violation.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a)
Any student or employee of a private military academy when on the property of
the academy;

(b)
Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school district security
activities;

(c)
Any person who is involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or
firearms safety course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms
of collectors or instructors are handled or displayed;

(d)
Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or air gun
competition approved by the school or school district;

(e)
Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW
9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while
picking up or dropping off a student;

(f)
Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a
firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or
concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while conducting
legitimate business at the school;

(g)
Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an
unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at
the school; or

(h)
Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local government agency.

(4)
Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who
possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be
used in martial arts classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section,
firearms are not permitted in a public or ((private)) nonpublic
school building.

(6)
"GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities giving
warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on school grounds.

Sec.
11. RCW
9.61.160 and 1977 ex.s. c 231 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for any person to threaten to bomb or otherwise injure any
public or ((private)) nonpublic school building, any place of
worship or public assembly, any governmental property, or any other building,
common carrier, or structure, or any place used for human occupancy; or to
communicate or repeat any information concerning such a threatened bombing or
injury, knowing such information to be false and with intent to alarm the
person or persons to whom the information is communicated or repeated.

Sec.
12. RCW
13.40.160 and 1997 c 338 s 25 and 1997 c 265 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is
determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.

(a)
When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW 13.40.0357
option A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard
ranges, except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this section.
The disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.

(b)
When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days,
commitment shall be to the department for the standard range of confinement,
except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this section.

(2)
If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition
within the standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall
impose a disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of
RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported
by clear and convincing evidence.

A
disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and shall be
comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a combination thereof.
When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement
exceeding thirty days, the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term,
and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A
disposition outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(3)
Where a respondent is found to have committed an offense for which the
respondent declined to enter into a diversion agreement, the court shall impose
a term of community supervision limited to the conditions allowed in a
diversion agreement as provided in RCW 13.40.080(2).

(4)
When a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a
sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030,
and has no history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the
motion of the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine
whether the respondent is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
respondent's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the respondent's social, educational, and employment
situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the
sources of the evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i)
Frequency and type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(iii)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or
others;

(iv)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(v)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After
receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this special sex
offender disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the
offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the
court determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is
appropriate, then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the
standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons
for its conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice,
the court shall impose a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend
the execution of the disposition and place the offender on community
supervision for at least two years. As a condition of the suspended
disposition, the court may impose the conditions of community supervision and
other conditions, including up to thirty days of confinement and requirements
that the offender do any one or more of the following:

(b)(i)
Devote time to a specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or inpatient
sex offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that
offense. A community mental health center may not be used for such treatment
unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex offender treatment. The
respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or treatment
conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the probation counselor, and
the court, and shall not change providers without court approval after a
hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object to the change;

(iii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
probation counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational
program, or employment;

(iv)
Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a
sex offender treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the
court;

(v)
Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community service,
or any combination thereof;

(vii)
Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably
related to the offense;

(viii)
Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation bond; or

(ix)
The court shall order that the offender may not attend the public or approved
((private)) nonpublic elementary, middle, or high school attended
by the victim or the victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians of the
offender are responsible for transportation or other costs associated with the
offender's change of school that would otherwise be paid by the school
district. The court shall send notice of the disposition and restriction on
attending the same school as the victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved
((private)) nonpublic school the juvenile will attend, if known,
or if unknown, to the approved ((private)) nonpublic schools and
the public school district board of directors of the district in which the
juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice must be sent at the
earliest possible date but not later than ten calendar days after entry of the
disposition.

The
sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the
respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following:
Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment
activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other
material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At
the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the
court considers appropriate.

Except
as provided in this subsection (4), after July 1, 1991, examinations and
treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health pursuant to
chapter 18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile
sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that:
(A) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another
state for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B)
no certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this subsection (4) and the rules adopted by the
department of health.

If
the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that
the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court
may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court may
impose a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions of
the disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and up
to thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously
served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is
being revoked.

For
purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property
as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a
known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A
disposition entered under this subsection (4) is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

(5)
If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.165.

(6)
RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of
possessing a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in
which a special finding is entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.

(7)
Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention
prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically
state the number of days of credit for time served.

(8)
Except as provided under subsection (4) or (5) of this section or RCW
13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the execution
of the disposition.

(9)
In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition
exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

Sec.
13. RCW
13.40.215 and 1997 c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, at the earliest possible
date, and in no event later than thirty days before discharge, parole, or any
other authorized leave or release, or before transfer to a community
residential facility, the secretary shall send written notice of the discharge,
parole, authorized leave or release, or transfer of a juvenile found to have
committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, to the following:

(i)
The chief of police of the city, if any, in which the juvenile will reside;

(ii)
The sheriff of the county in which the juvenile will reside; and

(iii)
The approved ((private)) nonpublic schools and the common school
district board of directors of the district in which the juvenile intends to
reside or the approved ((private)) nonpublic school or public
school district in which the juvenile last attended school, whichever is
appropriate, except when it has been determined by the department that the
juvenile is twenty-one years old; is not required to return to school under
chapter 28A.225 RCW; or will be in the community for less than seven
consecutive days on approved leave and will not be attending school during that
time.

(b)
After July 27, 1997, the department shall send a written notice to approved ((private))
nonpublic and public schools under the same conditions identified in
subsection (1)(a)(iii) of this section when a juvenile adjudicated of any
offense is transferred to a community residential facility.

(c)
The same notice as required by (a) of this subsection shall be sent to the
following, if such notice has been requested in writing about a specific
juvenile:

(i)
The victim of the offense for which the juvenile was found to have committed or
the victim's next of kin if the crime was a homicide;

(ii)
Any witnesses who testified against the juvenile in any court proceedings
involving the offense; and

(iii)
Any person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney.

Information
regarding victims, next of kin, or witnesses requesting the notice, information
regarding any other person specified in writing by the prosecuting attorney to
receive the notice, and the notice are confidential and shall not be available
to the juvenile. The notice to the chief of police or the sheriff shall
include the identity of the juvenile, the residence where the juvenile will
reside, the identity of the person, if any, responsible for supervising the
juvenile, and the time period of any authorized leave.

(d)
The thirty-day notice requirements contained in this subsection shall not apply
to emergency medical furloughs.

(e)
The existence of the notice requirements in this subsection will not require
any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after
notification.

(2)(a)
If a juvenile found to have committed a violent offense, a sex offense, or
stalking escapes from a facility of the department, the secretary shall
immediately notify, by the most reasonable and expedient means available, the
chief of police of the city and the sheriff of the county in which the juvenile
resided immediately before the juvenile's arrest. If previously requested, the
secretary shall also notify the witnesses and the victim of the offense which
the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of kin if the
crime was a homicide. If the juvenile is recaptured, the secretary shall send
notice to the persons designated in this subsection as soon as possible but in
no event later than two working days after the department learns of such
recapture.

(b)
The secretary may authorize a leave, for a juvenile found to have committed a
violent offense, a sex offense, or stalking, which shall not exceed forty-eight
hours plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or
critical illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may
authorize a leave, which shall not exceed the time medically necessary, to
obtain medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the
department. Prior to the commencement of an emergency or medical leave, the secretary
shall give notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the
jurisdiction in which the juvenile will be during the leave period. The notice
shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the leave, the
residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the person
responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave. If previously
requested, the department shall also notify the witnesses and victim of the
offense which the juvenile was found to have committed or the victim's next of
kin if the offense was a homicide.

In
case of an emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all or any
portion of the requirements for leaves pursuant to RCW 13.40.205 (2)(a), (3),
(4), and (5).

(3)
If the victim, the victim's next of kin, or any witness is under the age of
sixteen, the notice required by this section shall be sent to the parents or
legal guardian of the child.

(4)
The secretary shall send the notices required by this chapter to the last address
provided to the department by the requesting party. The requesting party shall
furnish the department with a current address.

(5)
Upon discharge, parole, or other authorized leave or release, a convicted
juvenile sex offender shall not attend a public or approved ((private)) nonpublic
elementary, middle, or high school that is attended by a victim or a sibling of
a victim of the sex offender. The parents or legal guardians of the convicted
juvenile sex offender shall be responsible for transportation or other costs
associated with or required by the sex offender's change in school that
otherwise would be paid by a school district. Upon discharge, parole, or other
authorized leave or release of a convicted juvenile sex offender, the secretary
shall send written notice of the discharge, parole, or other authorized leave
or release and the requirements of this subsection to the common school
district board of directors of the district in which the sex offender intends
to reside or the district in which the sex offender last attended school,
whichever is appropriate. The secretary shall send a similar notice to any
approved ((private)) nonpublic school the juvenile will attend,
if known, or if unknown, to the approved ((private)) nonpublic
schools within the district the juvenile resides or intends to reside.

(6)
For purposes of this section the following terms have the following meanings:

(a)
"Violent offense" means a violent offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
"Sex offense" means a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030;

(c)
"Stalking" means the crime of stalking as defined in RCW 9A.46.110;

(d)
"Next of kin" means a person's spouse, parents, siblings, and
children.

Sec.
14. RCW
18.29.050 and 1997 c 37 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person licensed as a dental hygienist in this state may remove deposits and
stains from the surfaces of the teeth, may apply topical preventive or
prophylactic agents, may polish and smooth restorations, may perform root planing
and soft-tissue curettage, and may perform other dental operations and services
delegated to them by a licensed dentist: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That licensed
dental hygienists shall in no event perform the following dental operations or
services:

(1)
Any surgical removal of tissue of the oral cavity;

(2)
Any prescription of drugs or medications requiring the written order or
prescription of a licensed dentist or physician;

(3)
Any diagnosis for treatment or treatment planning; or

(4)
The taking of any impression of the teeth or jaw, or the relationships of the
teeth or jaws, for the purpose of fabricating any intra-oral restoration,
appliance, or prosthesis.

Such
licensed dental hygienists may perform dental operations and services only
under the supervision of a licensed dentist, and under such supervision may be
employed by hospitals, boards of education of public or ((private)) nonpublic
schools, county boards, boards of health, or public or charitable institutions,
or in dental offices.

Sec.
15. RCW
18.71.030 and 1996 c 178 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to apply to or interfere in any way with the
practice of religion or any kind of treatment by prayer; nor shall anything in
this chapter be construed to prohibit:

(1)
The furnishing of medical assistance in cases of emergency requiring immediate
attention;

(2)
The domestic administration of family remedies;

(3)
The administration of oral medication of any nature to students by public
school district employees or ((private)) nonpublic elementary or
secondary school employees as provided for in chapter 28A.210 RCW;

(4)
The practice of dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, nursing,
chiropractic, podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, naturopathy, or any
other healing art licensed under the methods or means permitted by such
license;

(5)
The practice of medicine in this state by any commissioned medical officer
serving in the armed forces of the United States or public health service or
any medical officer on duty with the United States veterans administration
while such medical officer is engaged in the performance of the duties
prescribed for him or her by the laws and regulations of the United States;

(6)
The practice of medicine by any practitioner licensed by another state or
territory in which he or she resides, provided that such practitioner shall not
open an office or appoint a place of meeting patients or receiving calls within
this state;

(7)
The practice of medicine by a person who is a regular student in a school of
medicine approved and accredited by the commission, however, the performance of
such services be only pursuant to a regular course of instruction or
assignments from his or her instructor, or that such services are performed
only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this
chapter;

(8)
The practice of medicine by a person serving a period of postgraduate medical
training in a program of clinical medical training sponsored by a college or
university in this state or by a hospital accredited in this state, however,
the performance of such services shall be only pursuant to his or her duties as
a trainee;

(9)
The practice of medicine by a person who is regularly enrolled in a physician
assistant program approved by the commission, however, the performance of such
services shall be only pursuant to a regular course of instruction in said
program and such services are performed only under the supervision and control
of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter;

(10)
The practice of medicine by a licensed physician assistant which practice is
performed under the supervision and control of a physician licensed pursuant to
this chapter;

(11)
The practice of medicine, in any part of this state which shares a common
border with Canada and which is surrounded on three sides by water, by a
physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery in Canada or any province
or territory thereof;

(12)
The administration of nondental anesthesia by a dentist who has completed a
residency in anesthesiology at a school of medicine approved by the commission,
however, a dentist allowed to administer nondental anesthesia shall do so only
under authorization of the patient's attending surgeon, obstetrician, or
psychiatrist, and the commission has jurisdiction to discipline a dentist
practicing under this exemption and enjoin or suspend such dentist from the
practice of nondental anesthesia according to this chapter and chapter 18.130
RCW;

(13)
Emergency lifesaving service rendered by a physician's trained emergency
medical service intermediate life support technician and paramedic, as defined
in RCW 18.71.200, if the emergency lifesaving service is rendered under the
responsible supervision and control of a licensed physician;

(14)
The provision of clean, intermittent bladder catheterization for students by
public school district employees or ((private)) nonpublic school
employees as provided for in RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280.

Sec.
16. RCW
18.79.290 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 429 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In accordance with rules adopted by the commission, public school districts and
((private)) nonpublic schools that offer classes for any of
grades kindergarten through twelve may provide for clean, intermittent bladder
catheterization of students or assisted self-catheterization of students who
are in the custody of the school district or ((private)) nonpublic
school at the time. After consultation with staff of the superintendent of
public instruction, the commission shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW, that provide for the following and such other matters as the
commission deems necessary to the proper implementation of this section:

(a)
A requirement for a written, current, and unexpired request from a parent,
legal guardian, or other person having legal control over the student that the
school district or ((private)) nonpublic school provide for the
catheterization of the student;

(b)
A requirement for a written, current, and unexpired request from a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, that catheterization of the student
be provided for during the hours when school is in session or the hours when
the student is under the supervision of school officials;

(c)
A requirement for written, current, and unexpired instructions from an advanced
registered nurse practitioner or a registered nurse licensed under this chapter
regarding catheterization that include (i) a designation of the school district
or ((private)) nonpublic school employee or employees who may
provide for the catheterization, and (ii) a description of the nature and
extent of any required supervision; and

(d)
The nature and extent of acceptable training that shall (i) be provided by a
physician, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or registered nurse licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, or this chapter, and (ii) be required of
school district or ((private)) nonpublic school employees who
provide for the catheterization of a student under this section, except that a
licensed practical nurse licensed under this chapter is exempt from training.

(2)
This section does not require school districts to provide intermittent bladder
catheterization of students.

Sec.
17. RCW
19.142.010 and 1990 c 55 s 1 and 1990 c 33 s 556 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Business day" means any day except a Sunday or a legal holiday.

(2)
"Buyer" or "member" means a person who purchases health
studio services.

(3)
"Health studio" includes any person or entity engaged in the sale of
instruction, training, assistance or use of facilities which purport to assist
patrons to improve their physical condition or appearance through physical
exercise, body building, weight loss, figure development, the martial arts, or
any other similar activity. For the purposes of this chapter, "health
studio" does not include: (a) Public common schools, ((private)) nonpublic
schools approved under RCW 28A.195.010, and public or private institutions of
higher education; (b) persons providing professional services within the scope
of a person's license under Title 18 RCW; (c) bona fide nonprofit organizations
which have been granted tax-exempt status by the Internal Revenue Service, the
functions of which as health studios are only incidental to their overall
functions and purposes; (d) a person or entity which offers physical exercise,
body building, figure development or similar activities as incidental features
of a plan of instruction or assistance relating to diet or control of eating
habits; (e) bona fide nonprofit corporations organized under chapter 24.03 RCW
which have members and whose members have meaningful voting rights to elect and
remove a board of directors which is responsible for the operation of the
health club and corporation; and (f) a preexisting facility primarily offering
aerobic classes, where the initiation fee is less than fifty dollars and no
memberships are sold which exceed one year in duration. For purposes of this
subsection, "preexisting facility" means an existing building used
for health studio services covered by the fees collected.

(4)
"Health studio services" means instruction, services, privileges, or
rights offered for sale by a health studio. "Health studio services"
do not include: (a) Instruction or assistance relating to diet or control of
eating habits not involving substantial on-site physical exercise, body
building, figure development, or any other similar activity; or (b)
recreational or social programs which either involve no physical exercise or
exercise only incidental to the program.

(5)
"Initiation or membership fee" means a fee paid either in a lump sum
or in installments within twelve months of execution of the health studio
services contract on a one-time basis when a person first joins a health studio
for the privilege of belonging to the health studio.

(6)
"Special offer or discount" means any offer of health studio services
at a reduced price or without charge to a prospective member.

(7)
"Use fees or dues" means fees paid on a regular periodic basis for
use of a health studio. This does not preclude prepayment of use fees at the
buyer's option.

Sec.
18. RCW
26.09.225 and 1991 sp.s. c 28 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each parent shall have full and equal access to the education and health care
records of the child absent a court order to the contrary. Neither parent may
veto the access requested by the other parent.

(2)
Educational records are limited to academic, attendance, and disciplinary
records of public and ((private)) nonpublic schools in all grades
kindergarten through twelve and any form of alternative school for all periods
for which child support is paid or the child is the dependent in fact of the
parent requesting access to the records.

(3)
Educational records of postsecondary educational institutions are limited to
enrollment and academic records necessary to determine, establish, or continue
support ordered pursuant to RCW 26.19.090.

Sec.
19. RCW
28A.150.350 and 1990 c 33 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"((Private)) Nonpublic school student" shall mean any
student enrolled full time in a ((private)) nonpublic school;

(b)
"School" shall mean any primary, secondary or vocational school;

(c)
"School funding authority" shall mean any nonfederal governmental
authority which provides moneys to common schools;

(d)
"Part time student" shall mean and include: Any student enrolled in
a course of instruction in a ((private)) nonpublic school and
taking courses at and/or receiving ancillary services offered by any public
school not available in such ((private)) nonpublic school; or any
student who is not enrolled in a ((private)) nonpublic school and
is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010 which instruction
includes taking courses at or receiving ancillary services from the local
school district or both; or any student involved in any work training program
and taking courses in any public school, which work training program is
approved by the school board of the district in which such school is located.

(2)
The board of directors of any school district is authorized and, in the same
manner as for other public school students, shall permit the enrollment of and
provide ancillary services for part time students: PROVIDED, That this section
shall only apply to part time students who would be otherwise eligible for full
time enrollment in the school district.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall recognize the costs to each
school district occasioned by enrollment of and/or ancillary services provided
for part time students authorized by subsection (2) of this section and shall
include such costs in the distribution of funds to school districts pursuant to
RCW 28A.150.260. Each school district shall be reimbursed for the costs or a
portion thereof, occasioned by attendance of and/or ancillary services provided
for part time students on a part time basis, by the superintendent of public
instruction, according to law.

(4)
Each school funding authority shall recognize the costs occasioned to each
school district by enrollment of and ancillary services provided for part time
students authorized by subsection (2) of this section, and shall include said
costs in funding the activities of said school districts.

(5)
The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to adopt rules ((and
regulations)) to carry out the purposes of RCW 28A.150.260 and 28A.150.350.

Sec.
20. RCW
28A.160.020 and 1990 c 33 s 133 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
school district board of directors may authorize children attending a ((private))
nonpublic school approved in accordance with RCW 28A.195.010 to ride a
school bus or other student transportation vehicle to and from school so long
as the following conditions are met:

(1)
The board of directors shall not be required to alter those bus routes or stops
established for transporting public school students;

(2)
((Private)) Nonpublic school students shall be allowed to ride on
a seat-available basis only; and

(3)
The board of directors shall charge an amount sufficient to reimburse the
district for the actual per seat cost of providing such transportation.

Sec.
21. RCW
28A.160.115 and 1990 c 241 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

On
highways divided into separate roadways as provided in RCW 46.61.150 and
highways with three or more marked traffic lanes, public school district bus
routes and ((private)) nonpublic school bus routes shall serve
each side of the highway so that students do not have to cross the highway,
unless there is a traffic control signal as defined in RCW 46.04.600 or an
adult crossing guard within three hundred feet of the bus stop to assist
students while crossing such multiple-lane highways.

Sec.
22. RCW
28A.170.090 and 1995 c 335 s 205 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall select school districts and
cooperatives of school districts to receive grants for drug and alcohol abuse
prevention and intervention programs for students in kindergarten through
twelfth grade, from funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose.
The minimum annual grant amount per district or cooperative of districts shall
be twenty thousand dollars. Factors to be used in selecting proposals for
funding and in determining grant awards shall be developed in consultation with
the substance abuse advisory committee appointed under RCW 28A.170.050, with
the intent of targeting funding to districts with high-risk populations. These
factors may include:

(a)
Characteristics of the school attendance areas to be served, such as the number
of students from low-income families, truancy rates, juvenile justice
referrals, and social services caseloads;

(b)
The total number of students who would have access to services; and

(c)
Participation of community groups and law enforcement agencies in drug and
alcohol abuse prevention and intervention activities.

(2)
The application procedures for grants under this section shall include
provisions for comprehensive planning, establishment of a school and community
substance abuse advisory committee, and documentation of the district's needs
assessment. Planning and application for grants under this section may be
integrated with the development of other substance abuse awareness programs by
school districts. School districts shall, to the maximum extent feasible,
coordinate the use of grants provided under this section with other funding
available for substance abuse awareness programs. School districts should
allocate resources giving emphasis to drug and alcohol abuse intervention
services for students in grades five through nine. Grants may be used to
provide services for students who are enrolled in approved ((private)) nonpublic
schools.

(3)
School districts receiving grants under this section shall be required to
establish a means of accessing formal assessment services for determining
treatment needs of students with drug and alcohol problems. The grant
applications submitted by districts shall identify the districts' plan for
meeting this requirement.

(4)
School districts receiving grants under this section shall be required to
perform biennial evaluations of their drug and alcohol abuse prevention and
intervention programs, and to report on the results of these evaluations to the
superintendent of public instruction.

(5)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to implement RCW
28A.170.080 and 28A.170.090.

Sec.
23. RCW
28A.195.010 and 1993 c 336 s 1101 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby recognizes that ((private)) nonpublic schools
should be subject only to those minimum state controls necessary to insure the
health and safety of all the students in the state and to insure a sufficient
basic education to meet usual graduation requirements. The state, any agency
or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any specific educational or
other programs for ((private)) nonpublic schools except as ((hereinafter))
provided in this section ((provided)).

Principals
of ((private)) nonpublic schools or superintendents of ((private))
nonpublic school districts shall file each year with the state
superintendent of public instruction a statement certifying that the minimum
requirements hereinafter set forth are being met, noting any deviations. After
review of the statement, the state superintendent will notify schools or school
districts of those deviations which must be corrected. In case of major
deviations, the school or school district may request and the state board of
education may grant provisional status for one year in order that the school or
school district may take action to meet the requirements. Minimum requirements
shall be as follows:

(1)
The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less
than one hundred eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum program
hour offerings as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220.

(2)
The school day shall be the same as that required in RCW 28A.150.030 and
28A.150.220, except that the percentages of total program hour offerings as
prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 for basic skills, work skills, and optional
subjects and activities shall not apply to ((private)) nonpublic
schools or ((private)) nonpublic sectarian schools.

(3)
All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification
except as follows:

(a)
Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in
public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach
those courses.

(b)
In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification
may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general
supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction reporting and explaining such
circumstances.

(4)
An approved ((private)) nonpublic school may operate an extension
program for parents, guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to
teach children in their custody. The extension program shall require at a
minimum that:

(a)
The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of
the approved ((private)) nonpublic school who is certified under chapter
28A.410 RCW;

(b)
The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian, or person having
legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and
subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c)
The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per
week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the
approved ((private)) nonpublic school extension program;

(d)
Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person; and

(e)
The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled
in the approved ((private)) nonpublic school's extension program.

(5)
Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against
loss or damage.

(6)
The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the
program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building
shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. However, the state
board shall not require ((private)) nonpublic school students to
meet the student learning goals, obtain a certificate of mastery to graduate
from high school, to master the essential academic learning requirements, or to
be assessed pursuant to RCW 28A.630.885. However, ((private)) nonpublic
schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to have their students master these
essential academic learning requirements, take these assessments, and obtain
certificates of mastery. A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or
custodian shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a parent,
guardian, or person having legal custody is instructing his or her child under
subsection (4) of this section.

(7)
((Private)) Nonpublic school curriculum shall include instruction
of the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language,
social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for
meeting state board of education graduation requirements.

(8)
Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy
statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school
district.

All
decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material,
curriculum, except as provided in subsection (7) ((above provided))
of this section, school rules and administration, or other matters not
specifically referred to in this section, shall be the responsibility of the
administration and administrators of the particular ((private)) nonpublic
school involved.

Sec.
24. RCW
28A.195.020 and 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state recognizes the following rights of every ((private)) nonpublic
school:

(1)
To teach their religious beliefs and doctrines, if any; to pray in class and in
assemblies; to teach patriotism including requiring students to salute the flag
of the United States if that be the custom of the particular ((private))
nonpublic school.

(2)
To require that there shall be on file the written consent of parents or
guardians of students prior to the administration of any psychological test or
the conduct of any type of group therapy.

Sec.
25. RCW
28A.195.030 and 1974 ex.s. c 92 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
((private)) nonpublic school may appeal the actions of the state
superintendent of public instruction or state board of education as provided in
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
26. RCW
28A.195.050 and 1984 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction is hereby directed to appoint a ((private))
nonpublic school advisory committee that is broadly representative of
educators, legislators, and various ((private)) nonpublic school
groups in the state of Washington.

Sec.
27. RCW
28A.195.060 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of the administrative or executive authority of every ((private))
nonpublic school in this state to report to the educational service
district superintendent on or before the thirtieth day of June in each year, on
a form to be furnished, such information as may be required by the
superintendent of public instruction, to make complete the records of education
work pertaining to all children residing within the state.

Sec.
28. RCW
28A.195.070 and 1997 c 266 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If
a student who previously attended an approved ((private)) nonpublic
school enrolls in a public school but has not paid tuition, fees, or fines at
the approved ((private)) nonpublic school, the approved ((private))
nonpublic school may withhold the student's official transcript, but
shall transmit information to the public school about the student's academic
performance, special placement, immunization records, and records of
disciplinary action.

Sec.
29. RCW
28A.200.010 and 1995 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4)
shall have the duty to:

(1)
File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to
cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction. The statement shall
include the name and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated
person will be supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format prescribed
by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file the
statement by September 15 of the school year or within two weeks of the
beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the
superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides or
the district that accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a
transfer student of the nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer
under RCW 28A.225.220;

(2)
Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments and
immunization records, together with any other records that are kept relating to
the instructional and educational activities provided, are forwarded to any
other public or ((private)) nonpublic school to which the child
transfers. At the time of a transfer to a public school, the superintendent of
the local school district in which the child enrolls may require a standardized
achievement test to be administered and shall have the authority to determine
the appropriate grade and course level placement of the child after
consultation with parents and review of the child's records; and

(3)
Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the state board of
education is administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or
that an annual assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a
certificated person who is currently working in the field of education. The
state board of education shall not require these children to meet the student
learning goals, master the essential academic learning requirements, to take
the assessments, or to obtain a certificate of mastery pursuant to RCW
28A.630.885. The standardized test administered or the annual academic
progress assessment written shall be made a part of the child's permanent
records. If, as a result of the annual test or assessment, it is determined
that the child is not making reasonable progress consistent with his or her age
or stage of development, the parent shall make a good faith effort to remedy
any deficiency.

Failure
of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure
of such parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW
28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section
shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW
28A.225.010(4).

Sec.
30. RCW
28A.210.070 and 1990 c 33 s 191 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170:

(1)
"Chief administrator" shall mean the person with the authority and
responsibility for the immediate supervision of the operation of a school or
day care center as defined in this section or, in the alternative, such other
person as may hereafter be designated in writing for the purposes of RCW
28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170 by the statutory or corporate board of
directors of the school district, school, or day care center or, if none, such
other persons or person with the authority and responsibility for the general
supervision of the operation of the school district, school or day care center.

(2)
"Full immunization" shall mean immunization against certain
vaccine-preventable diseases in accordance with schedules and with immunizing
agents approved by the state board of health.

(3)
"Local health department" shall mean the city, town, county, district
or combined city-county health department, board of health, or health officer
which provides public health services.

(4)
"School" shall mean and include each building, facility, and location
at or within which any or all portions of a preschool, kindergarten and grades
one through twelve program of education and related activities are conducted
for two or more children by or in behalf of any public school district and by
or in behalf of any ((private)) nonpublic school or ((private))
nonpublic institution subject to approval by the state board of
education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130(6), 28A.195.010 through 28A.195.050, and
28A.410.120.

(5)
"Day care center" shall mean an agency which regularly provides care
for a group of thirteen or more children for periods of less than twenty-four
hours and is licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(6)
"Child" shall mean any person, regardless of age, in attendance at a
public or ((private)) nonpublic school or a licensed day care
center.

Sec.
31. RCW
28A.210.080 and 1990 c 33 s 192 are each amended to read as follows:

The
attendance of every child at every public and ((private)) nonpublic
school in the state and licensed day care center shall be conditioned upon the
presentation before or on each child's first day of attendance at a particular
school or center, of proof of either (1) full immunization, (2) the initiation
of and compliance with a schedule of immunization, as required by rules of the
state board of health, or (3) a certificate of exemption as provided for in RCW
28A.210.090. The attendance at the school or the day care center during any subsequent
school year of a child who has initiated a schedule of immunization shall be
conditioned upon the presentation of proof of compliance with the schedule on
the child's first day of attendance during the subsequent school year. Once
proof of full immunization or proof of completion of an approved schedule has
been presented, no further proof shall be required as a condition to attendance
at the particular school or center.

Sec.
32. RCW
28A.210.110 and 1991 c 3 s 291 are each amended to read as follows:

A
child's proof of immunization or certification of exemption shall be presented
to the chief administrator of the public or ((private)) nonpublic
school or day care center or to his or her designee for that purpose. The
chief administrator shall:

(1)
Retain such records pertaining to each child at the school or day care center
for at least the period the child is enrolled in the school or attends such
center;

(2)
Retain a record at the school or day care center of the name, address, and date
of exclusion of each child excluded from school or the center pursuant to RCW
28A.210.120 for not less than three years following the date of a child's
exclusion;

(3)
File a written annual report with the department of health on the immunization
status of students or children attending the day care center at a time and on
forms prescribed by the department of health; and

(4)
Allow agents of state and local health departments access to the records
retained in accordance with this section during business hours for the purposes
of inspection and copying.

Sec.
33. RCW
28A.210.120 and 1990 c 33 s 196 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of the chief administrator of every public and ((private))
nonpublic school and day care center to prohibit the further presence at
the school or day care center for any and all purposes of each child for whom
proof of immunization, certification of exemption, or proof of compliance with
an approved schedule of immunization has not been provided in accordance with
RCW 28A.210.080 and to continue to prohibit the child's presence until such
proof of immunization, certification of exemption, or approved schedule has
been provided. The exclusion of a child from a school shall be accomplished in
accordance with rules of the state board of education. The exclusion of a
child from a day care center shall be accomplished in accordance with rules of
the department of social and health services. Prior to the exclusion of a
child, each school or day care center shall provide written notice to the
parent(s) or legal guardian(s) of each child or to the adult(s) in loco
parentis to each child, who is not in compliance with the requirements of RCW
28A.210.080. The notice shall fully inform such person(s) of the following:
(1) The requirements established by and pursuant to RCW 28A.210.060 through
28A.210.170; (2) the fact that the child will be prohibited from further
attendance at the school unless RCW 28A.210.080 is complied with; (3) such
procedural due process rights as are hereafter established pursuant to RCW
28A.210.160 and/or 28A.210.170, as appropriate; and (4) the immunization
services that are available from or through the local health department and
other public agencies.

Sec.
34. RCW
28A.210.160 and 1990 c 33 s 199 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state board of education shall and is hereby empowered to adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW which establish the procedural and substantive due process
requirements governing the exclusion of children from public and ((private))
nonpublic schools pursuant to RCW 28A.210.120.

Sec.
35. RCW
28A.210.260 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 720 are each amended to read as follows:

Public
school districts and ((private)) nonpublic schools which conduct
any of grades kindergarten through the twelfth grade may provide for the
administration of oral medication of any nature to students who are in the
custody of the school district or school at the time of administration, but are
not required to do so by this section, subject to the following conditions:

(1)
The board of directors of the public school district or the governing board of
the ((private)) nonpublic school or, if none, the chief
administrator of the ((private)) nonpublic school shall adopt
policies which address the designation of employees who may administer oral
medications to students, the acquisition of parent requests and instructions,
and the acquisition of dentist and physician requests and instructions
regarding students who require medication for more than fifteen consecutive
school days, the identification of the medication to be administered, the means
of safekeeping medications with special attention given to the safeguarding of
legend drugs as defined in chapter 69.41 RCW, and the means of maintaining a
record of the administration of such medication;

(2)
The board of directors shall seek advice from one or more licensed physicians
or nurses in the course of developing the foregoing policies;

(3)
The public school district or ((private)) nonpublic school is in
receipt of a written, current and unexpired request from a parent, or a legal
guardian, or other person having legal control over the student to administer
the medication to the student;

(4)
The public school district or the ((private)) nonpublic school is
in receipt of (a) a written, current and unexpired request from a licensed
physician or dentist for administration of the medication, as there exists a
valid health reason which makes administration of such medication advisable
during the hours when school is in session or the hours in which the student is
under the supervision of school officials, and (b) written, current and
unexpired instructions from such physician or dentist regarding the
administration of prescribed medication to students who require medication for
more than fifteen consecutive work days;

(5)
The medication is administered by an employee designated by or pursuant to the
policies adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and in substantial
compliance with the prescription of a physician or dentist or the written
instructions provided pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;

(6)
The medication is first examined by the employee administering the same to
determine in his or her judgment that it appears to be in the original
container and to be properly labeled; and

(7)
The board of directors shall designate a professional person licensed pursuant
to chapter 18.71 RCW or chapter 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses
and advanced registered nurse practitioners, to train and supervise the
designated school district personnel in proper medication procedures.

Sec.
36. RCW
28A.210.270 and 1990 c 33 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the event a school employee administers oral medication to a student
pursuant to RCW 28A.210.260 in substantial compliance with the prescription of
the student's physician or dentist or the written instructions provided
pursuant to RCW 28A.210.260(4), and the other conditions set forth in RCW 28A.210.260
have been substantially complied with, then the employee, the employee's school
district or school of employment, and the members of the governing board and
chief administrator thereof shall not be liable in any criminal action or for
civil damages in their individual or marital or governmental or corporate or
other capacities as a result of the administration of the medication.

(2)
The administration of oral medication to any student pursuant to RCW
28A.210.260 may be discontinued by a public school district or ((private))
nonpublic school and the school district or school, its employees, its
chief administrator, and members of its governing board shall not be liable in
any criminal action or for civil damages in their governmental or corporate or
individual or marital or other capacities as a result of the discontinuance of
such administration: PROVIDED, That the chief administrator of the public
school district or ((private)) nonpublic school, or his or her
designee, has first provided actual notice orally or in writing in advance of
the date of discontinuance to a parent or legal guardian of the student or
other person having legal control over the student.

Sec.
37. RCW
28A.210.280 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 721 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public school districts and ((private)) nonpublic schools that
offer classes for any of grades kindergarten through twelve may provide for
clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of students, or assisted
self-catheterization of students pursuant to RCW 18.79.290, if the
catheterization is provided for in substantial compliance with:

(a)
Rules adopted by the state nursing care quality assurance commission and the
instructions of a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner
issued under such rules; and

(b)
Written policies of the school district or ((private)) nonpublic
school which shall be adopted in order to implement this section and shall be
developed in accordance with such requirements of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW
as may be applicable.

(2)
This section does not require school districts to provide intermittent bladder
catheterization of students.

Sec.
38. RCW
28A.210.290 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 722 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the event a school employee provides for the catheterization of a student
pursuant to RCW 18.79.290 and 28A.210.280 in substantial compliance with (a)
rules adopted by the state nursing care quality assurance commission and the instructions
of a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner issued under
such rules, and (b) written policies of the school district or ((private))
nonpublic school, then the employee, the employee's school district or
school of employment, and the members of the governing board and chief
administrator thereof shall not be liable in any criminal action or for civil
damages in their individual, marital, governmental, corporate, or other
capacity as a result of providing for the catheterization.

(2)
Providing for the catheterization of any student pursuant to RCW 18.79.290 and
28A.210.280 may be discontinued by a public school district or ((private))
nonpublic school and the school district or school, its employees, its
chief administrator, and members of its governing board shall not be liable in
any criminal action or for civil damages in their individual, marital,
governmental, corporate, or other capacity as a result of the discontinuance:
PROVIDED, That the chief administrator of the public school district or ((private))
nonpublic school, or his or her designee, has first provided actual
notice orally or in writing in advance of the date of discontinuance to a
parent or legal guardian of the student or other person having legal control
over the student: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the public school district otherwise
provides for the catheterization of the student to the extent required by
federal or state law.

Sec.
39. RCW
28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and under eighteen
years of age shall cause such child to attend the public school of the district
in which the child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and
therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session
unless:

(a)
The child is attending an approved ((private)) nonpublic school
for the same time or is enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW
28A.195.010(4);

(b)
The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (4) of
this section;

(c)
The child is attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(d)
The school district superintendent of the district in which the child resides
shall have excused such child from attendance because the child is physically
or mentally unable to attend school, is attending a residential school operated
by the department of social and health services, is incarcerated in an adult
correctional facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his
or her parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the
parent: PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed
to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be
claimed as full time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise
have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and
shall not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220;
or

(e)
The child is sixteen years of age or older and:

(i)
The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that
the child should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated
in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;

(ii)
The child has already met graduation requirements in accordance with state
board of education rules ((and regulations)); or

(iii)
The child has received a certificate of educational competence under rules ((and
regulations)) established by the state board of education under RCW
28A.305.190.

(2)
A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent, guardian, or person
having legal custody of a child.

(3)
An approved ((private)) nonpublic school for the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under ((regulations))
rules established by the state board of education pursuant to RCW
28A.305.130.

(4)
For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW, instruction shall be
home-based if it consists of planned and supervised instructional and related
educational activities, including a curriculum and instruction in the basic
skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social
studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an
appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours equivalent to the
total annual program hours per grade level established for approved ((private))
nonpublic schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such
activities are:

(a)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and are
supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of
this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter
28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated
person" means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of
objectives consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average
of one contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the
certificated person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the
certificated person. The number of children supervised by the certificated
person shall not exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or

(b)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has
either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours or its equivalent
in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a
postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or

(c)
Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based
instruction by the superintendent of the local school district in which the
child resides.

(5)
The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less structured and
more experiential than the instruction normally provided in a classroom
setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section relating
to the nature and quantity of instructional and related educational activities
shall be liberally construed.

Sec.
40. RCW
28A.225.090 and 1998 c 296 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to:

(a)
Attend the child's current school;

(b)
If there is space available and the program can provide educational services
appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an
alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention
program, or another public educational program;

(c)
Attend a ((private)) nonpublic nonsectarian school or program
including an education center. Before ordering a child to attend an approved
or certified ((private)) nonpublic nonsectarian school or
program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and ((private)) nonpublic
programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the
child; and (iii) find that the ((private)) nonpublic school or
program is willing to accept the child and will not charge any fees in addition
to those established by contract with the student's school district. If the
court orders the child to enroll in a ((private)) nonpublic
school or program, the child's school district shall contract with the school
or program to provide educational services for the child. The school district
shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate that exceeds the state
general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly basis generated by the
child and received by the district. A school district shall not be required to
enter into a contract that is longer than the remainder of the school year. A
school district shall not be required to enter into or continue a contract if
the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d)
Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or

(e)
Submit to testing for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a
determination that such testing is appropriate to the circumstances and
behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the
mandatory attendance law.

(2)
If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may order the
child to be punished by detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may
impose alternatives to detention such as community service. Failure by a child
to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall not be punishable by
detention for a period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(3)
Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010 or
28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of
unexcused absence from school. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with
violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence
in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that
the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020.
The court may order the parent to provide community service instead of imposing
a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the
condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall
participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's
attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or
conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a
child's absence.

Sec.
41. RCW
28A.225.330 and 1997 c 266 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When enrolling a student who has attended school in another school district,
the school enrolling the student may request the parent and the student to
briefly indicate in writing whether or not the student has:

(a)
Any history of placement in special educational programs;

(b)
Any past, current, or pending disciplinary action;

(c)
Any history of violent behavior, or behavior listed in RCW 13.04.155;

(d)
Any unpaid fines or fees imposed by other schools; and

(e)
Any health conditions affecting the student's educational needs.

(2)
The school enrolling the student shall request the school the student
previously attended to send the student's permanent record including records of
disciplinary action, attendance, immunization records, and academic
performance. If the student has not paid a fine or fee under RCW 28A.635.060,
or tuition, fees, or fines at approved ((private)) nonpublic
schools the school may withhold the student's official transcript, but shall
transmit information about the student's academic performance, special
placement, immunization records, and records of disciplinary action. If the
official transcript is not sent due to unpaid tuition, fees, or fines, the
enrolling school shall notify both the student and parent or guardian that the
official transcript will not be sent until the obligation is met, and failure to
have an official transcript may result in exclusion from extracurricular
activities or failure to graduate.

(3)
If information is requested under subsection (2) of this section, the
information shall be transmitted within two school days after receiving the
request and the records shall be sent as soon as possible. Any school district
or district employee who releases the information in compliance with this
section is immune from civil liability for damages unless it is shown that the
school district employee acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The
state board of education shall provide by rule for the discipline under chapter
28A.410 RCW of a school principal or other chief administrator of a public
school building who fails to make a good faith effort to assure compliance with
this subsection.

(4)
Any school district or district employee who releases the information in
compliance with federal and state law is immune from civil liability for
damages unless it is shown that the school district or district employee acted
with gross negligence or in bad faith.

Sec.
42. RCW
28A.300.240 and 1991 c 128 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall annually make available to
school districts and approved ((private)) nonpublic schools, from
data supplied by the secretary of state, the names of international student
exchange visitor placement organizations registered under chapter 19.166 RCW to
place students in public schools in the state and a summary of the information
the organizations have filed with the secretary of state under chapter 19.166
RCW.

(2)
The superintendent shall provide general information and assistance to school
districts regarding international student exchange visitors, including, to the
extent feasible with available resources, information on the type of visa
required for enrollment, how to promote positive educational experiences for
visiting exchange students, and how to integrate exchange students into the
school environment to benefit the education of both the exchange students and
students in the state.

Sec.
43. RCW
28A.305.010 and 1992 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state board of education shall be comprised of one member from each
congressional district of the state, not including any congressional district
at large, elected by the members of the boards of directors of school districts
thereof, as hereinafter in this chapter provided, the superintendent of public
instruction and one member elected at large, as provided in this chapter, by
the members of the boards of directors of all ((private)) nonpublic
schools in the state meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The member
representing ((private)) nonpublic schools shall not vote on
matters affecting public schools. If there is a dispute about whether or not
an issue directly affects public schools, the dispute shall be settled by a
majority vote of the other members of the board.

Sec.
44. RCW
28A.305.020 and 1990 c 33 s 258 are each amended to read as follows:

Not
later than the twenty-fifth day of August of each year, the superintendent of
public instruction shall call for the following elections to be held: An
election in each congressional district within which resides a member of the
state board of education whose term of membership will end on the second Monday
of January next following, and an election of the member of the state board of
education representing ((private)) nonpublic schools if the term
of membership will end on the second Monday of January next following. The
superintendent of public instruction shall give written notice thereof to each
member of the board of directors of each common school district in such
congressional district, and to the chair of the board of directors of each ((private))
nonpublic school who shall distribute said notice to each member of the
((private)) nonpublic school board. Such notice shall include
the election calendar and rules ((and regulations)) established by the
superintendent of public instruction for the conduct of the election.

Sec.
45. RCW
28A.305.040 and 1990 c 33 s 260 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Candidates for membership on the state board of education shall file
declarations of candidacy with the superintendent of public instruction on
forms prepared by the superintendent. Declarations of candidacy may be filed
by person or by mail not earlier than the first day of September, or later than
the sixteenth day of September. The superintendent of public instruction may
not accept any declaration of candidacy that is not on file in the
superintendent's office or is not postmarked before the seventeenth day of September,
or if not postmarked or the postmark is not legible, if received by mail after
the twenty-first day of September. No person employed in any school, college,
university, or other educational institution or any educational service
district superintendent's office or in the office of superintendent of public
instruction shall be eligible for membership on the state board of education
and each member elected who is not representative of the ((private)) nonpublic
schools in this state and thus not running-at-large must be a resident of the
congressional district from which he or she was elected. No member of a board
of directors of a local school district or ((private)) nonpublic
school shall continue to serve in that capacity after having been elected to
the state board.

(2)
The prohibitions against membership upon the board of directors of a school
district or school and against employment, as well as the residence
requirement, established by this section, are conditions to the eligibility of
state board members to serve as such which apply throughout the terms for which
they have been elected or appointed. Any state board member who hereafter
fails to meet one or more of the conditions to eligibility shall be deemed to
have immediately forfeited his or her membership upon the board for the balance
of his or her term: PROVIDED, That such a forfeiture of office shall not
affect the validity of board actions taken prior to the date of notification to
the board during an open public meeting of the violation.

Sec.
46. RCW
28A.305.050 and 1990 c 33 s 261 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
member of the board of directors of each school district in each congressional
district shall be eligible to vote for the candidates who reside in his or her
congressional district. Each chair of the board of directors of each eligible
((private)) nonpublic school shall cast a vote for the candidate
receiving a majority in an election to be held as follows: Each member of the
board of directors of each eligible ((private)) nonpublic school
shall vote for candidates representing the ((private)) nonpublic
schools in an election of the board, the purpose of which is to determine the
board's candidate for the member representing ((private)) nonpublic
schools on the state board. Not later than the first day of October the
superintendent of public instruction shall mail to each member of each common
school district board of directors and to each chair of the board of directors
of each ((private)) nonpublic school, the proper ballot and
voting instructions for his or her congressional district together with
biographical data concerning each candidate listed on such ballot, which data
shall have been prepared by the candidate.

Sec.
47. RCW
28A.305.060 and 1990 c 33 s 262 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
member of the state board of education shall be elected by a majority of the
electoral points accruing from all the votes cast at the election for all
candidates for the position. All votes shall be cast by mail addressed to the
superintendent of public instruction and no votes shall be accepted for
counting if postmarked after the sixteenth day of October, or if not postmarked
or the postmark is not legible, if received by mail after the twenty-first day
of October following the call of the election. The superintendent of public
instruction and an election board comprised of three persons appointed by the
state board of education shall count and tally the votes and the electoral
points accruing therefrom not later than the twenty-fifth day of October. The
votes shall be counted and tallied and electoral points determined in the
following manner for the ballot cast by common school district board directors:
Each vote cast by a school director shall be accorded as many electoral points
as there are enrolled students in that director's school district as determined
by the enrollment reports forwarded to the state superintendent of public
instruction for apportionment purposes for the month of September of the year
of election: PROVIDED, That school directors from a school district which has
more than five directors shall have their electoral points based upon
enrollment recomputed by multiplying such number by a fraction, the denominator
of which shall be the number of directors in such district, and the numerator
of which shall be five; the electoral points shall then be tallied for each
candidate as the votes are counted; and it shall be the majority of electoral
points which determines the winning candidate. The votes shall be counted and
electoral points determined in the following manner for the ballots cast by
chairs of the board of directors of each ((private)) nonpublic
school: Each vote cast by a ((private)) nonpublic school board
shall be accorded as many electoral points as the number of enrolled students
in the respective school as determined by enrollment reports forwarded to the
superintendent of public instruction for the month of September in the year
previous to the year of election and it shall be the majority of electoral
points which determines the winning candidate. If no candidate receives a
majority of the electoral points cast, then, not later than the first day of
November, the superintendent of public instruction shall call a second election
to be conducted in the same manner and at which the candidates shall be the two
candidates receiving the highest number of electoral points accruing from such
votes cast. No vote cast at such second election shall be received for
counting if postmarked after the sixteenth day of November, or if not
postmarked or the postmark is not legible, if received by mail after the
twenty-first day of November and the votes shall be counted as hereinabove
provided on the twenty-fifth day of November. The candidate receiving a
majority of electoral points accruing from the votes at any such second
election shall be declared elected. In the event of a tie in such second
election, the candidate elected shall be determined by a chance drawing of a
nature established by the superintendent of public instruction. Within ten
days following the count of votes in an election at which a member of the state
board of education is elected, the superintendent of public instruction shall
certify to the secretary of state the name or names of the persons elected to
be members of the state board of education.

Sec.
48. RCW
28A.305.070 and 1980 c 179 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
common school district board member or any ((private)) nonpublic
school board member eligible to vote for a candidate for membership on the
state board of education or any candidate for the position, within ten days
after the state superintendent of public instruction's certification of
election, may contest the election of the candidate for any of the following
causes:

(1)
For malconduct on the part of the state superintendent of public instruction or
any member of the election board with respect to such election;

(2)
Because the person whose right is being contested was not eligible for
membership on the state board of education at the time the person was certified
as elected;

(3)
Because the person whose right is being contested gave a bribe or reward to a
voter or to an inspector, judge or clerk of the election for the purpose of
procuring the person's election, or offered to do so;

(4)
On account of illegal votes.

An
action contesting an election pursuant to this section shall be conducted in
compliance with RCW 29.65.020 and 29.65.040 through 29.65.120, as now or
hereafter amended.

Sec.
49. RCW
28A.310.180 and 1990 c 33 s 276 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to other powers and duties as provided by law, every educational service
district board shall:

(1)
Comply with rules ((or regulations)) of the state board of education and
the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)
If the district board deems necessary, establish and operate for the schools
within the boundaries of the educational service district a depository and
distribution center for films, tapes, charts, maps, and other instructional
material as recommended by the school district superintendents within the
service area of the educational service district: PROVIDED, That the district
may also provide the services of the depository and distribution center to ((private))
nonpublic schools within the district so long as such ((private))
nonpublic schools pay such fees that reflect actual costs for services
and the use of instructional materials as may be established by the educational
service district board.

(3)
Establish cooperative service programs for school districts within the
educational service district and joint purchasing programs for schools within
the educational service district pursuant to RCW 28A.320.080(3): PROVIDED,
That on matters relating to cooperative service programs the board and
superintendent of the educational service district shall seek the prior advice
of the superintendents of local school districts within the educational service
district.

(4)
Establish direct student service programs for school districts within the
educational service district including pupil transportation. However, for the
provision of state-funded pupil transportation for special education
cooperatives programs for special education conducted under RCW 28A.155.010
through 28A.155.100, the educational service district, with the consent of the
participating school districts, shall be entitled to receive directly state apportionment
funds for that purpose: PROVIDED, That the board of directors and
superintendent of a local school district request the educational service
district to perform said service or services: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
educational service district board of directors and superintendents agree to
provide the requested services: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the provisions of
chapter 39.34 RCW are strictly adhered to: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
educational service district board of directors may contract with the school
for the deaf and the school for the blind to provide transportation services.

Sec.
50. RCW
28A.315.050 and 1985 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons
possessing the status of any of the following positions shall not be eligible
to be a member of a regional committee: The superintendent of public
instruction, a member of the state board of education, an educational service
district superintendent, a member of a board of directors of a school district,
a member of an educational service district board, a member of a governing
board of either a ((private)) nonpublic school or a ((private))
nonpublic school district which conducts any grades kindergarten through
twelve, officers appointed by any such governing board, and employees of a
school district, an educational service district, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, a ((private)) nonpublic
school, or a ((private)) nonpublic school district.

Sec.
51. RCW
28A.320.080 and 1995 c 77 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
board of directors, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall:

(1)
Provide for the expenditure of a reasonable amount for suitable commencement
exercises;

(2)
In addition to providing free instruction in lip reading for children disabled
by defective hearing, make arrangements for free instruction in lip reading to
adults disabled by defective hearing whenever in its judgment such instruction
appears to be in the best interests of the school district and adults
concerned;

(3)
Join with boards of directors of other school districts or an educational
service district pursuant to RCW 28A.310.180(3), or both such school districts
and educational service district in buying supplies, equipment and services by
establishing and maintaining a joint purchasing agency, or otherwise, when
deemed for the best interests of the district, any joint agency formed
hereunder being herewith authorized and empowered to issue interest bearing
warrants in payment of any obligation owed: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That those
agencies issuing interest bearing warrants shall assign accounts receivable in
an amount equal to the amount of the outstanding interest bearing warrants to
the county treasurer issuing such interest bearing warrants: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That the joint purchasing agency shall consider the request of any one or more
((private)) nonpublic schools requesting the agency to jointly
buy supplies, equipment, and services including but not limited to school bus
maintenance services, and, after considering such request, may cooperate with
and jointly make purchases with ((private)) nonpublic schools of
supplies, equipment, and services, including but not limited to school bus
maintenance services, so long as such ((private)) nonpublic
schools pay in advance their proportionate share of the costs or provide a
surety bond to cover their proportionate share of the costs involved in such
purchases;

(4)
Consider the request of any one or more ((private)) nonpublic
schools requesting the board to jointly buy supplies, equipment and services
including but not limited to school bus maintenance services, and, after
considering such request, may provide such joint purchasing services:
PROVIDED, That such ((private)) nonpublic schools pay in advance
their proportionate share of the costs or provide a surety bond to cover their
proportionate share of the costs involved in such purchases; and

(5)
Prepare budgets as provided for in chapter 28A.505 RCW.

Sec.
52. RCW
28A.320.130 and 1993 c 347 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
school district and each ((private)) nonpublic school approved
under chapter 28A.195 RCW shall report to the superintendent of public
instruction by January 31st of each year all known incidents involving the
possession of weapons on school premises, on transportation systems, or in
areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or ((private))
nonpublic schools, in violation of RCW 9.41.280 in the year preceding
the report. The superintendent shall compile the data and report it to the
house of representatives, the senate, and the governor.

Sec.
53. RCW
28A.335.040 and 1991 c 116 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every school district board of directors is authorized to permit the rental,
lease, or occasional use of all or any portion of any surplus real property
owned or lawfully held by the district to any person, corporation, or
government entity for profit or nonprofit, commercial or noncommercial
purposes: PROVIDED, That the leasing or renting or use of such property is for
a lawful purpose and does not interfere with conduct of the district's
educational program and related activities: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the lease
or rental agreement entered into shall include provisions which permit the
recapture of the leased or rented surplus property of the district should such
property be needed for school purposes in the future except in such cases
where, due to proximity to an international airport, land use has been so
permanently altered as to preclude the possible use of the property for a school
housing students and the school property has been heavily impacted by
surrounding land uses so that a school housing students would no longer be
appropriate in that area.

(2)
Authorization to rent, lease or permit the occasional use of surplus school property
under this section, RCW 28A.335.050 and 28A.335.090 is conditioned on the
establishment by each school district board of directors of a policy governing
the use of surplus school property.

(3)
The board of directors of any school district desiring to rent or lease any
surplus real property owned by the school district shall publish a written
notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district for rentals
or leases totalling ten thousand dollars or more in value. School districts shall
not rent or lease the property for at least forty-five days following the
publication of the newspaper notice.

(4)
((Private)) Nonpublic schools shall have the same rights as any
other person or entity to submit bids for the rental or lease of surplus real
property and to have such bids considered along with all other bids: PROVIDED,
That the school board may establish reasonable conditions for the use of such
real property to assure the safe and proper operation of the property in a
manner consistent with board policies.

Sec.
54. RCW
28A.335.120 and 1995 c 358 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board of directors of any school district of this state may:

(a)
Sell for cash, at public or private sale, and convey by deed all interest of
the district in or to any of the real property of the district which is no
longer required for school purposes; and

(b)
Purchase real property for the purpose of locating thereon and affixing thereto
any house or houses and appurtenant buildings removed from school sites owned
by the district and sell for cash, at public or private sale, and convey by
deed all interest of the district in or to such acquired and improved real
property.

(2)
When the board of directors of any school district proposes a sale of school
district real property pursuant to this section and the value of the property
exceeds seventy thousand dollars, the board shall publish a notice of its
intention to sell the property. The notice shall be published at least once
each week during two consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper with a general
circulation in the area in which the school district is located. The notice
shall describe the property to be sold and designate the place where and the
day and hour when a hearing will be held. The board shall hold a public
hearing upon the proposal to dispose of the school district property at the
place and the day and hour fixed in the notice and admit evidence offered for
and against the propriety and advisability of the proposed sale.

(3)
The board of directors of any school district desiring to sell surplus real
property shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the
school district. School districts shall not sell the property for at least forty-five
days following the publication of the newspaper notice.

(4)
((Private)) Nonpublic schools shall have the same rights as any
other person or entity to submit bids for the purchase of surplus real property
and to have such bids considered along with all other bids.

(5)
Any sale of school district real property authorized pursuant to this section
shall be preceded by a market value appraisal by a professionally designated
real estate appraiser as defined in RCW 74.46.020 selected by the board of directors
and no sale shall take place if the sale price would be less than ninety
percent of the appraisal made by the professionally designated real estate
appraiser: PROVIDED, That if the property has been on the market for one year
or more the property may be reappraised and sold for not less than seventy-five
percent of the reappraised value with the unanimous consent of the board.

(6)
If in the judgment of the board of directors of any district the sale of real
property of the district not needed for school purposes would be facilitated
and greater value realized through use of the services of licensed real estate
brokers, a contract for such services may be negotiated and concluded:
PROVIDED, That the use of a licensed real estate broker will not eliminate the
obligation of the board of directors to provide the notice described in this
section: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the fee or commissions charged for any broker
services shall not exceed seven percent of the resulting sale value for a
single parcel: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any professionally designated real
estate appraiser as defined in RCW 74.46.020 selected by the board to appraise
the market value of a parcel of property to be sold may not be a party to any
contract with the school district to sell such parcel of property for a period
of three years after the appraisal.

(7)
If in the judgment of the board of directors of any district the sale of real
property of the district not needed for school purposes would be facilitated
and greater value realized through sale on contract terms, a real estate sales
contract may be executed between the district and buyer: PROVIDED, That the
terms and conditions of any such sales contract must comply with rules ((and
regulations)) of the state board of education, ((herein)) authorized
in this section, governing school district real property contract sales.

Sec.
55. RCW
28A.335.180 and 1997 c 264 s 1 and 1997 c 104 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, school districts, educational
service districts, or any other state or local governmental agency concerned
with education, when declaring texts and other books, equipment, materials or
relocatable facilities as surplus, shall, prior to other disposal thereof,
serve notice in writing in a newspaper of general circulation in the school
district and to any public school district or ((private)) nonpublic
school in Washington state annually requesting such a notice, that the same is
available for sale, rent, or lease to public school districts or approved ((private))
nonpublic schools, at depreciated cost or fair market value, whichever
is greater: PROVIDED, That students wishing to purchase texts pursuant to RCW
28A.320.230(2) shall have priority as to such texts. The notice requirement in
this section does not apply to the sale or transfer of assistive devices under
RCW 28A.335.205 or chapter 72.40 RCW. Such districts or agencies shall not
otherwise sell, rent or lease such surplus property to any person, firm,
organization, or nongovernmental agency for at least thirty days following
publication of notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the school
district.

(2)
In lieu of complying with subsection (1) of this section, school districts and
educational service districts may elect to grant surplus personal property to a
federal, state, or local governmental entity, or to indigent persons, at no
cost on the condition the property be used for preschool through twelfth grade
educational purposes, or elect to loan surplus personal property to a
nonreligious, nonsectarian ((private)) nonpublic entity on the
condition the property be used for the preschool through twelfth grade
education of members of the public on a nondiscriminatory basis.

Sec.
56. RCW
28A.410.090 and 1996 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any certificate or permit authorized under the provisions of this chapter,
chapter 28A.405 RCW, or rules promulgated thereunder may be revoked or
suspended by the authority authorized to grant the same based upon a criminal
records report authorized by law, or upon the complaint of any school district
superintendent, educational service district superintendent, or ((private))
nonpublic school administrator for immorality, violation of written
contract, unprofessional conduct, intemperance, or crime against the law of the
state.

If
the superintendent of public instruction has reasonable cause to believe that
an alleged violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it has occurred,
but no complaint has been filed pursuant to this chapter, and that a school
district superintendent, educational service district superintendent, or ((private))
nonpublic school administrator has sufficient notice of the alleged
violation and opportunity to file a complaint, the superintendent of public
instruction may cause an investigation to be made of the alleged violation,
together with such other matters that may be disclosed in the course of the
investigation related to certificated personnel.

(2)
Any such certificate or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405
RCW shall be revoked by the authority authorized to grant the certificate upon
a guilty plea or the conviction of any felony crime involving the physical
neglect of a child under chapter 9A.42 RCW, the physical injury or death of a
child under chapter 9A.32 or 9A.36 RCW (excepting motor vehicle violations
under chapter 46.61 RCW), sexual exploitation of a child under chapter 9.68A
RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim,
promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, the sale or purchase
of a minor child under RCW 9A.64.030, or violation of similar laws of another jurisdiction.
The person whose certificate is in question shall be given an opportunity to be
heard. Mandatory permanent revocation upon a guilty plea or the conviction of
felony crimes specified under this subsection shall apply to such convictions
or guilty pleas which occur after July 23, 1989. Revocation of any certificate
or permit authorized under this chapter or chapter 28A.405 RCW for a guilty
plea or criminal conviction occurring prior to July 23, 1989, shall be subject
to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
57. RCW
28D.02.010 and 1996 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The K-20 telecommunications oversight and policy committee is established to:
Adopt policy goals and objectives for a K-20 telecommunications system, adopt a
network design and implementation plan, and authorize release of funds for
network purposes.

(2)
The duties of the committee shall include, but need not be limited to:

(a)
The adoption of system goals and objectives and timelines for submission of the
proposed plans under RCW 28D.02.030 through 28D.02.050 and 28D.02.070 by June
1, 1996;

(b)
The authorization of the construction and acquisition of a network backbone
upon its approval of phase one of a technical plan for the network as specified
in RCW 28D.02.070(1);

(c)
The preparation and subsequent updates of a network design and implementation
plan that includes locations to be served by the network, service delivery
specifications, a network governance structure, other appropriate components,
and a phased technical plan in accordance with RCW 28D.02.070(2). The plan
shall be adopted after considering the recommendations of the information
services board, the higher education coordinating board, and the superintendent
of public instruction;

(d)
The preparation of an implementation plan that prioritizes access to the
network backbone and other telecommunication components; and

(e)
The authorization of the release of funds for expenditures to construct the network
and distance education components.

(3)
By April 15, 1996, the department of information services shall convene the
committee. The committee shall include the following voting members or their
designees: The governor; one member from each caucus of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate; one member from each caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; the
superintendent of public instruction; the chair of the higher education coordinating
board; and the chair of the information services board. On a nonvoting basis,
the committee shall include the following members or their designees: One
community college or technical college president, appointed by the state board
for community and technical colleges; one president of a public baccalaureate
institution, appointed by the council of presidents; the state librarian; one
educational service district superintendent, one school district
superintendent, and one representative of an approved ((private)) nonpublic
school, each appointed by the superintendent of public instruction; one
representative of independent nonprofit baccalaureate institutions, appointed
by the Washington friends of higher education; and one representative of the
computer or telecommunications industry, appointed by the information services
board. The voting members must reach a consensus in approving the network
design and implementation plan. The department shall provide staff support to
the committee.

Sec.
58. RCW
35.58.250 and 1965 c 7 s 35.58.250 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
in accordance with an agreement made as provided herein, upon the effective
date on which the metropolitan municipal corporation commences to perform the
metropolitan transportation function, no person or private corporation shall
operate a local public passenger transportation service within the metropolitan
area with the exception of taxis, busses owned or operated by a school district
or ((private)) nonpublic school, and busses owned or operated by
any corporation or organization solely for the purposes of the corporation or
organization and for the use of which no fee or fare is charged.

An
agreement may be entered into between the metropolitan municipal corporation
and any person or corporation legally operating a local public passenger
transportation service wholly within or partly within and partly without the
metropolitan area and on said effective date under which such person or
corporation may continue to operate such service or any part thereof for such
time and upon such terms and conditions as provided in such agreement. Where
any such local public passenger transportation service will be required to
cease to operate within the metropolitan area, the commission may agree with
the owner of such service to purchase the assets used in providing such
service, or if no agreement can be reached, the commission shall condemn such
assets in the manner provided herein for the condemnation of other properties.

Wherever
a privately owned public carrier operates wholly or partly within a
metropolitan municipal corporation, the Washington utilities and transportation
commission shall continue to exercise jurisdiction over such operation as
provided by law.

Sec.
59. RCW
36.57A.100 and 1977 ex.s. c 44 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
in accordance with an agreement made as provided in this section or in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 36.57A.090(3) as now or hereafter
amended, upon the effective date on which the public transportation benefit
area commences to perform the public transportation service, no person or
private corporation shall operate a local public passenger transportation
service within the public transportation benefit area with the exception of
taxis, buses owned or operated by a school district or ((private)) nonpublic
school, and buses owned or operated by any corporation or organization solely
for the purposes of the corporation or organization and for the use of which no
fee or fare is charged.

An
agreement may be entered into between the public transportation benefit area
authority and any person or corporation legally operating a local public
passenger transportation service wholly within or partly within and partly
without the public transportation benefit area and on said effective date under
which such person or corporation may continue to operate such service or any
part thereof for such time and upon such terms and conditions as provided in
such agreement. Such agreement shall provide for a periodic review of the
terms and conditions contained therein. Where any such local public passenger
transportation service will be required to cease to operate within the public
transportation benefit area, the public transportation benefit area authority
may agree with the owner of such service to purchase the assets used in
providing such service, or if no agreement can be reached, the public
transportation benefit area authority shall condemn such assets in the manner
and by the same procedure as is or may be provided by law for the condemnation
of other properties for cities of the first class, except insofar as such laws
may be inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Wherever
a privately owned public carrier operates wholly or partly within a public
transportation benefit area, the Washington utilities and transportation
commission shall continue to exercise jurisdiction over such operation as
provided by law.

Sec.
60. RCW
46.04.521 and 1995 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

School
bus means every motor vehicle used regularly to transport children to and from
school or in connection with school activities, which is subject to the
requirements set forth in the most recent edition of "Specifications for
School Buses" published by the state superintendent of public instruction,
but does not include buses operated by common carriers in urban transportation
of school children or private carrier buses operated as school buses in the
transportation of children to and from ((private)) nonpublic
schools or school activities.

Sec.
61. RCW
46.16.035 and 1990 c 33 s 584 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
bus or vehicle owned and operated by a ((private)) nonpublic
school or schools meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010 and used by that
school or schools primarily to transport children to and from school or to
transport children in connection with school activities shall be exempt from
the payment of license fees for the licensing thereof as in this chapter
provided. A license issued by the department for such bus or vehicle shall be
considered an exempt license under RCW 82.44.010.

Sec.
62. RCW
46.37.193 and 1997 c 80 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
school bus and private carrier bus, in addition to any other equipment or
distinctive markings required by this chapter, shall bear upon the front and
rear thereof, above the windows thereof, plainly visible signs containing only the
words "school bus" on a school bus and only the words "private
carrier bus" on a private carrier bus in letters not less than eight
inches in height, and in addition shall be equipped with visual signals meeting
the requirements of RCW 46.37.190. School districts may affix signs designed
according to RCW 46.61.380 informing motorists of the monetary penalty for
failure to stop for a school bus when the visual signals are activated.

However,
a private carrier bus that regularly transports children to and from a ((private))
nonpublic school or in connection with school activities may display the
words "school bus" in a manner provided in this section and need not
comply with the requirements set forth in the most recent edition of
"Specifications for School Buses" published by the superintendent of
public instruction.

Sec.
63. RCW
46.37.630 and 1995 c 141 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
((private)) nonpublic school bus is subject to the requirements
set forth in the National Standards for School Buses established by the
national safety council in effect at the time of the bus manufacture, as
adopted by rule by reference by the chief of the Washington state patrol. A ((private))
nonpublic school bus manufactured before 1980 must meet the minimum
standards set forth in the 1980 edition of the National Standards for School
Buses.

Sec.
64. RCW
46.61.385 and 1990 c 33 s 585 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction, through the superintendent of schools of
any school district, or other officer or board performing like functions with
respect to the schools of any other educational administrative district, may
cause to be appointed voluntary adult recruits as supervisors and, from the
student body of any public or ((private)) nonpublic school or
institution of learning, students, who shall be known as members of the
"school patrol" and who shall serve without compensation and at the
pleasure of the authority making the appointment.

The
members of such school patrol shall wear an appropriate designation or insignia
identifying them as members of the school patrol when in performance of their
duties, and they may display "stop" or other proper traffic directional
signs or signals at school crossings or other points where school children are
crossing or about to cross a public highway, but members of the school patrol
and their supervisors shall be subordinate to and obey the orders of any peace
officer present and having jurisdiction.

School
districts, at their discretion, may hire sufficient numbers of adults to serve
as supervisors. Such adults shall be subordinate to and obey the orders of any
peace officer present and having jurisdiction.

Any
school district having a school patrol may purchase uniforms and other
appropriate insignia, traffic signs and other appropriate materials, all to be
used by members of such school patrol while in performance of their duties, and
may pay for the same out of the general fund of the district.

It
shall be unlawful for the operator of any vehicle to fail to stop his vehicle
when directed to do so by a school patrol sign or signal displayed by a member
of the school patrol engaged in the performance of his duty and wearing or
displaying appropriate insignia, and it shall further be unlawful for the
operator of a vehicle to disregard any other reasonable directions of a member
of the school patrol when acting in performance of his duties as such.

School
districts may expend funds from the general fund of the district to pay
premiums for life and accident policies covering the members of the school
patrol in their district while engaged in the performance of their school
patrol duties.

Members
of the school patrol shall be considered as employees for the purposes of RCW
28A.400.370.

Sec.
65. RCW
66.24.010 and 1998 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, and the holder
thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license.

(2)
For the purpose of considering any application for a license, the board may
cause an inspection of the premises to be made, and may inquire into all
matters in connection with the construction and operation of the premises. For
the purpose of reviewing any application for a license and for considering the
denial, suspension or revocation of any license, the liquor control board may
consider any prior criminal conduct of the applicant and the provisions of RCW
9.95.240 and of chapter 9.96A RCW shall not apply to such cases. The board
may, in its discretion, grant or refuse the license applied for. Authority to
approve an uncontested or unopposed license may be granted by the board to any
staff member the board designates in writing. Conditions for granting such
authority shall be adopted by rule. No retail license of any kind may be
issued to:

(a)
A person who has not resided in the state for at least one month prior to
making application, except in cases of licenses issued to dining places on
railroads, boats, or aircraft;

(b)
A copartnership, unless all of the members thereof are qualified to obtain a
license, as provided in this section;

(c)
A person whose place of business is conducted by a manager or agent, unless
such manager or agent possesses the same qualifications required of the
licensee;

(d)
A corporation or a limited liability company, unless it was created under the
laws of the state of Washington or holds a certificate of authority to transact
business in the state of Washington.

(3)(a)
The board may, in its discretion, subject to the provisions of RCW 66.08.150,
suspend or cancel any license; and all rights of the licensee to keep or sell
liquor thereunder shall be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.

(b)
The board shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who
has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and
health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If
the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement
during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic
upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and
health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

(c)
The board may request the appointment of administrative law judges under
chapter 34.12 RCW who shall have power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas for
the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts,
documents, and testimony, examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any
inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under
such rules ((and regulations)) as the board may adopt.

(d)
Witnesses shall be allowed fees and mileage each way to and from any such
inquiry, investigation, hearing, or proceeding at the rate authorized by RCW
34.05.446, as now or hereafter amended. Fees need not be paid in advance of
appearance of witnesses to testify or to produce books, records, or other legal
evidence.

(e)
In case of disobedience of any person to comply with the order of the board or
a subpoena issued by the board, or any of its members, or administrative law
judges, or on the refusal of a witness to testify to any matter regarding which
he or she may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the superior court of the
county in which the person resides, on application of any member of the board
or administrative law judge, shall compel obedience by contempt proceedings, as
in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from said
court or a refusal to testify therein.

(4)
Upon receipt of notice of the suspension or cancellation of a license, the
licensee shall forthwith deliver up the license to the board. Where the
license has been suspended only, the board shall return the license to the
licensee at the expiration or termination of the period of suspension. The
board shall notify all vendors in the city or place where the licensee has its
premises of the suspension or cancellation of the license; and no employee may
allow or cause any liquor to be delivered to or for any person at the premises
of that licensee.

(5)(a)
At the time of the original issuance of a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license, the board shall prorate the license fee charged to the new licensee
according to the number of calendar quarters, or portion thereof, remaining
until the first renewal of that license is required.

(b)
Unless sooner canceled, every license issued by the board shall expire at
midnight of the thirtieth day of June of the fiscal year for which it was
issued. However, if the board deems it feasible and desirable to do so, it may
establish, by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, a system for staggering the
annual renewal dates for any and all licenses authorized by this chapter. If
such a system of staggered annual renewal dates is established by the board,
the license fees provided by this chapter shall be appropriately prorated
during the first year that the system is in effect.

(6)
Every license issued under this section shall be subject to all conditions and
restrictions imposed by this title or by the ((regulations)) rules
in force from time to time. All conditions and restrictions imposed by the
board in the issuance of an individual license shall be listed on the face of
the individual license along with the trade name, address, and expiration date.

(7)
Every licensee shall post and keep posted its license, or licenses, in a
conspicuous place on the premises.

(8)
Before the board shall issue a license to an applicant it shall give notice of
such application to the chief executive officer of the incorporated city or
town, if the application be for a license within an incorporated city or town,
or to the county legislative authority, if the application be for a license
outside the boundaries of incorporated cities or towns; and such incorporated
city or town, through the official or employee selected by it, or the county
legislative authority or the official or employee selected by it, shall have
the right to file with the board within twenty days after date of transmittal
of such notice, written objections against the applicant or against the
premises for which the license is asked, and shall include with such objections
a statement of all facts upon which such objections are based, and in case
written objections are filed, may request and the liquor control board may in
its discretion hold a formal hearing subject to the applicable provisions of
Title 34 RCW. Upon the granting of a license under this title the board shall
send a duplicate of the license or written notification to the chief executive
officer of the incorporated city or town in which the license is granted, or to
the county legislative authority if the license is granted outside the
boundaries of incorporated cities or towns.

(9)
Before the board issues any license to any applicant, it shall give (a) due
consideration to the location of the business to be conducted under such
license with respect to the proximity of churches, schools, and public
institutions and (b) written notice by certified mail of the application to churches,
schools, and public institutions within five hundred feet of the premises to be
licensed. The board shall issue no beer retailer license for either
on-premises or off-premises consumption or wine retailer license for either
on-premises or off-premises consumption or spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
license covering any premises not now licensed, if such premises are within
five hundred feet of the premises of any tax-supported public elementary or
secondary school measured along the most direct route over or across
established public walks, streets, or other public passageway from the outer
property line of the school grounds to the nearest public entrance of the
premises proposed for license, and if, after receipt by the school or public
institution of the notice as provided in this subsection, the board receives
written notice, within twenty days after posting such notice, from an official
representative or representatives of the school within five hundred feet of
said proposed licensed premises, indicating to the board that there is an
objection to the issuance of such license because of proximity to a school.
For the purpose of this section, church shall mean a building erected for and
used exclusively for religious worship and schooling or other activity in
connection therewith. No liquor license may be issued or reissued by the board
to any motor sports facility or licensee operating within the motor sports
facility unless the motor sports facility enforces a program reasonably
calculated to prevent alcohol or alcoholic beverages not purchased within the
facility from entering the facility and such program is approved by local law
enforcement agencies. It is the intent under this subsection that a retail
license shall not be issued by the board where doing so would, in the judgment
of the board, adversely affect a ((private)) nonpublic school
meeting the requirements for ((private)) nonpublic schools under
Title 28A RCW, which school is within five hundred feet of the proposed
licensee. The board shall fully consider and give substantial weight to
objections filed by ((private)) nonpublic schools. If a license
is issued despite the proximity of a ((private)) nonpublic
school, the board shall state in a letter addressed to the ((private)) nonpublic
school the board's reasons for issuing the license.

(10)
The restrictions set forth in subsection (9) of this section shall not prohibit
the board from authorizing the assumption of existing licenses now located
within the restricted area by other persons or licenses or relocations of
existing licensed premises within the restricted area. In no case may the
licensed premises be moved closer to a church or school than it was before the
assumption or relocation.

(11)
Nothing in this section prohibits the board, in its discretion, from issuing a
temporary retail or distributor license to an applicant assuming an existing
retail or distributor license to continue the operation of the retail or
distributor premises during the period the application for the license is
pending and when the following conditions exist:

(a)
The licensed premises has been operated under a retail or distributor license
within ninety days of the date of filing the application for a temporary
license;

(b)
The retail or distributor license for the premises has been surrendered
pursuant to issuance of a temporary operating license;

(c)
The applicant for the temporary license has filed with the board an application
to assume the retail or distributor license at such premises to himself or
herself; and

(d)
The application for a temporary license is accompanied by a temporary license
fee established by the board by rule.

A
temporary license issued by the board under this section shall be for a period
not to exceed sixty days. A temporary license may be extended at the
discretion of the board for an additional sixty-day period upon payment of an
additional fee and upon compliance with all conditions required in this
section.

Refusal
by the board to issue or extend a temporary license shall not entitle the
applicant to request a hearing. A temporary license may be canceled or
suspended summarily at any time if the board determines that good cause for
cancellation or suspension exists. RCW 66.08.130 and chapter 34.05 RCW shall
apply to temporary licenses.

Application
for a temporary license shall be on such form as the board shall prescribe. If
an application for a temporary license is withdrawn before issuance or is
refused by the board, the fee which accompanied such application shall be
refunded in full.

Sec.
66. RCW
69.50.435 and 1997 c 30 s 2 and 1997 c 23 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(a)
Any person who violates RCW 69.50.401(a) by manufacturing, selling, delivering,
or possessing with the intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver a controlled
substance listed under that subsection or who violates RCW 69.50.410 by selling
for profit any controlled substance or counterfeit substance classified in
schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of marihuana to a
person:

(1)
In a school;

(2)
On a school bus;

(3)
Within one thousand feet of a school bus route stop designated by the school
district;

(4)
Within one thousand feet of the perimeter of the school grounds;

(5)
In a public park;

(6)
In a public housing project designated by a local governing authority as a
drug-free zone;

(7)
On a public transit vehicle;

(8)
In a public transit stop shelter;

(9)
At a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local governing
authority; or

(10)
Within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a facility designated under (9) of
this subsection, if the local governing authority specifically designates the
one thousand foot perimeter

may be
punished by a fine of up to twice the fine otherwise authorized by this
chapter, but not including twice the fine authorized by RCW 69.50.406, or by
imprisonment of up to twice the imprisonment otherwise authorized by this
chapter, but not including twice the imprisonment authorized by RCW 69.50.406,
or by both such fine and imprisonment. The provisions of this section shall
not operate to more than double the fine or imprisonment otherwise authorized
by this chapter for an offense.

(b)
It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the
person was unaware that the prohibited conduct took place while in a school or
school bus or within one thousand feet of the school or school bus route stop,
in a public park, in a public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone, on a public transit vehicle, in a public transit
stop shelter, at a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by the local
governing authority, or within one thousand feet of the perimeter of a facility
designated under subsection (a)(9) of this section, if the local governing
authority specifically designates the one thousand foot perimeter.

(c)
It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section or any
other prosecution under this chapter that persons under the age of eighteen
were not present in the school, the school bus, the public park, the public
housing project designated by a local governing authority as a drug-free zone,
or the public transit vehicle, or at the school bus route stop, the public
transit vehicle stop shelter, at a civic center designated as a drug-free zone
by the local governing authority, or within one thousand feet of the perimeter
of a facility designated under subsection (a)(9) of this section, if the local
governing authority specifically designates the one thousand foot perimeter at
the time of the offense or that school was not in session.

(d)
It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section
that the prohibited conduct took place entirely within a private residence,
that no person under eighteen years of age or younger was present in such
private residence at any time during the commission of the offense, and that
the prohibited conduct did not involve delivering, manufacturing, selling, or
possessing with the intent to manufacture, sell, or deliver any controlled
substance in RCW 69.50.401(a) for profit. The affirmative defense established
in this section shall be proved by the defendant by a preponderance of the
evidence. This section shall not be construed to establish an affirmative
defense with respect to a prosecution for an offense defined in any other
section of this chapter.

(e)
In a prosecution under this section, a map produced or reproduced by any
municipality, school district, county, transit authority engineer, or public
housing authority for the purpose of depicting the location and boundaries of
the area on or within one thousand feet of any property used for a school,
school bus route stop, public park, public housing project designated by a
local governing authority as a drug-free zone, public transit vehicle stop
shelter, or a civic center designated as a drug-free zone by a local governing
authority, or a true copy of such a map, shall under proper authentication, be
admissible and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the location and
boundaries of those areas if the governing body of the municipality, school
district, county, or transit authority has adopted a resolution or ordinance
approving the map as the official location and record of the location and
boundaries of the area on or within one thousand feet of the school, school bus
route stop, public park, public housing project designated by a local governing
authority as a drug-free zone, public transit vehicle stop shelter, or civic
center designated as a drug-free zone by a local governing authority. Any map
approved under this section or a true copy of the map shall be filed with the
clerk of the municipality or county, and shall be maintained as an official
record of the municipality or county. This section shall not be construed as
precluding the prosecution from introducing or relying upon any other evidence
or testimony to establish any element of the offense. This section shall not
be construed as precluding the use or admissibility of any map or diagram other
than the one which has been approved by the governing body of a municipality,
school district, county, transit authority, or public housing authority if the
map or diagram is otherwise admissible under court rule.

(f)
As used in this section the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"School" has the meaning under RCW 28A.150.010 or 28A.150.020. The
term "school" also includes a ((private)) nonpublic
school approved under RCW 28A.195.010;

(2)
"School bus" means a school bus as defined by the superintendent of
public instruction by rule which is owned and operated by any school district
and all school buses which are privately owned and operated under contract or
otherwise with any school district in the state for the transportation of
students. The term does not include buses operated by common carriers in the
urban transportation of students such as transportation of students through a
municipal transportation system;

(3)
"School bus route stop" means a school bus stop as designated by a
school district;

(4)
"Public park" means land, including any facilities or improvements on
the land, that is operated as a park by the state or a local government;

(5)
"Public transit vehicle" means any motor vehicle, street car, train,
trolley vehicle, or any other device, vessel, or vehicle which is owned or
operated by a transit authority and which is used for the purpose of carrying
passengers on a regular schedule;

(6)
"Transit authority" means a city, county, or state transportation
system, transportation authority, public transportation benefit area, public
transit authority, or metropolitan municipal corporation within the state that
operates public transit vehicles;

(7)
"Stop shelter" means a passenger shelter designated by a transit
authority;

(8)
"Civic center" means a publicly owned or publicly operated place or
facility used for recreational, educational, or cultural activities;

(9)
"Public housing project" means the same as "housing
project" as defined in RCW 35.82.020.

Sec.
67. RCW
71A.14.070 and 1988 c 176 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order for the developmental disability board to plan, coordinate, and provide
required services for persons with developmental disabilities, the county
governing authority and the board shall be eligible to obtain such confidential
information from public or ((private)) nonpublic schools and the
department as is necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter. Such
information shall be kept in accordance with state law and rules promulgated by
the secretary under chapter 34.05 RCW to permit the use of the information to
coordinate and plan services. All persons permitted to have access to or to
use such information shall sign an oath of confidentiality, substantially as follows:

"As
a condition of obtaining information from (fill in facility, agency, or person)
I, . . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information
obtained in the course of using such confidential information, where release of
such information may possibly make the person who received such services
identifiable. I recognize that unauthorized release of confidential
information may subject me to civil liability under state law."

Sec.
68. RCW
72.05.430 and 1998 c 269 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the department operates, or the secretary enters a contract to
operate, a community facility, the placement and supervision of juveniles must
be accomplished in accordance with this section.

(2)
The secretary shall require that any juvenile placed in a community facility
and who is employed or assigned as a volunteer be subject to monitoring for
compliance with requirements for attendance at his or her job or assignment.
The monitoring requirements shall be included in a written agreement between
the employer or supervisor, the secretary or chief operating officer of the
contracting agency, and the juvenile. The requirements shall include, at a
minimum, the following:

(a)
Acknowledgment of the juvenile's offender status;

(b)
The name, address, and telephone number of the community facility at which the
juvenile resides;

(c)
The twenty-four-hour telephone number required under RCW 72.05.410;

(d)
The name and work telephone number of all persons responsible for the
supervision of the juvenile;

(e)
A prohibition on the juvenile's departure from the work or volunteer site
without prior approval of the person in charge of the community facility;

(f)
A prohibition on personal telephone calls except to the community facility;

(g)
A prohibition on receiving compensation in any form other than a negotiable
instrument;

(h)
A requirement that rest breaks during work hours be taken only in those areas
at the location which are designated for such breaks;

(i)
A prohibition on visits from persons not approved in advance by the person in
charge of the community facility;

(j)
A requirement that any unexcused absence, tardiness, or departure by the juvenile
be reported immediately upon discovery to the person in charge of the community
facility;

(k)
A requirement that any notice from the juvenile that he or she will not report
to the work or volunteer site be verified as legitimate by contacting the person
in charge of the community facility; and

(l)
An agreement that the community facility will conduct and document random
visits to determine compliance by the juvenile with the terms of this section.

(3)
The secretary shall require that any juvenile placed in a community facility
and who is enrolled in a public or ((private)) nonpublic school
be subject to monitoring for compliance with requirements for attendance at his
or her school. The monitoring requirements shall be included in a written
agreement between the school district or appropriate administrative officer,
the secretary or chief operating officer of the contracting agency, and the
juvenile. The requirements shall include, at a minimum, the following:

(a)
Acknowledgment of the juvenile's offender status;

(b)
The name, address, and telephone number of the community facility at which the
juvenile resides;

(c)
The twenty-four-hour telephone number required under RCW 72.05.410;

(d)
The name and work telephone number of at least two persons at the school to
contact if issues arise concerning the juvenile's compliance with the terms of
his or her attendance at school;

(e)
A prohibition on the juvenile's departure from the school without prior
approval of the appropriate person at the school;

(f)
A prohibition on personal telephone calls except to the community facility;

(g)
A requirement that the juvenile remain on school grounds except for authorized
and supervised school activities;

(h)
A prohibition on visits from persons not approved in advance by the person in
charge of the community facility;

(i)
A requirement that any unexcused absence or departure by the juvenile be
reported immediately upon discovery to the person in charge of the community
facility;

(j)
A requirement that any notice from the juvenile that he or she will not attend
school be verified as legitimate by contacting the person in charge of the
community facility; and

(k)
An agreement that the community facility will conduct and document random
visits to determine compliance by the juvenile with the terms of this section.

(4)
The secretary shall require that when any juvenile placed in a community
facility is employed, assigned as a volunteer, or enrolled in a public or ((private))
nonpublic school:

(a)
Program staff members shall make and document periodic and random
accountability checks while the juvenile is at the school or work facility;

(b)
A program counselor assigned to the juvenile shall contact the juvenile's
employer, teacher, or school counselor regularly to discuss school or job
performance-related issues.

(5)
The department shall maintain a copy of all agreements executed under this
section. The department shall also provide each affected juvenile with a copy
of every agreement to which he or she is a party. The service provider shall
maintain a copy of every agreement it executes under this section.

Sec.
69. RCW
72.65.220 and 1997 c 348 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department or a private or public entity under contract with the department
may establish or relocate for the operation of a work release or other
community-based facility only after public notifications and local public
meetings have been completed consistent with this section.

(2)
The department and other state agencies responsible for siting
department-owned, operated, or contracted facilities shall establish a process
for early and continuous public participation in establishing or relocating
work release or other community-based facilities. This process shall include
public meetings in the local communities affected, opportunities for written
and oral comments, and wide dissemination of proposals and alternatives,
including at least the following:

(a)
When the department or a private or public entity under contract with the
department has selected three or fewer sites for final consideration of a
department-owned, operated, or contracted work release or other community-based
facility, the department or contracting organization shall make public
notification and conduct public hearings in the local communities of the final
three or fewer proposed sites. An additional public hearing after public
notification shall also be conducted in the local community selected as the
final proposed site.

(b)
Notifications required under this section shall be provided to the following:

(i)
All newspapers of general circulation in the local area and all local radio
stations, television stations, and cable networks;

(ii)
Appropriate school districts, ((private)) nonpublic schools,
kindergartens, city and county libraries, and all other local government
offices within a one-half mile radius of the proposed site or sites;

(iii)
The local chamber of commerce, local economic development agencies, and any
other local organizations that request such notification from the department;
and

(iv)
In writing to all residents and/or property owners within a one-half mile
radius of the proposed site or sites.

(3) When the department contracts for the operation of a work
release or other community-based facility that is not owned or operated by the
department, the department shall require as part of its contract that the
contracting entity comply with all the public notification and public hearing
requirements as provided in this section for each located and relocated work
release or other community-based facility.

---
END ---