BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
During 1997 and 1998, a committee of the state board of education reviewed all
board rules and related authorizing statutes. Based on the findings and
recommendations resulting from the review, the state board prepared a report to
the legislature requesting action be taken. It is the intent of this act to
implement recommendations of the state board of education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.350

RCW
28A.315.380

RCW
28A.315.390

RCW
28A.315.400

RCW
28A.315.410

RCW
28A.315.420

RCW
28A.315.430

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.450

RCW
28A.315.650

RCW
28A.315.470

RCW
28A.315.480

RCW
28A.315.490

RCW
28A.315.500

RCW
28A.315.530

RCW
28A.315.510

RCW
28A.315.540

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.570

RCW
28A.315.460

RCW
28A.315.600

RCW
28A.315.610

RCW
28A.315.620

RCW
28A.315.630

RCW
28A.315.670

RCW
28A.315.680

RCW
28A.315.550

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.560

RCW
28A.315.580

RCW
28A.315.590

RCW
28A.315.593

RCW
28A.315.660

RCW
28A.315.597

RCW
28A.315.640

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
28A.04.172 and 1987 c 525 s 214;

(2) RCW
28A.410.010 and 1992 c 159 s 3 & 1992 c 60 s 2; and

(3) RCW
28A.410.013 and 1995 c 222 s 1.

---
END ---