BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If an error has occurred in the levy of property taxes that has caused all
taxpayers within a taxing district, other than the state, to pay an incorrect
amount of property tax, the assessor shall correct the error by making an
appropriate adjustment to the levy for that taxing district in the succeeding
year. The adjustment shall be made without including any interest. If the
governing authority of the taxing district determines that the amount of the
adjustment in the succeeding year is so large as to cause a hardship for the
taxing district or the taxpayers within the district, the adjustment may be
made on a proportional basis over a period of not more than three consecutive
years.

(a)
A correction of an error in the levying of property taxes shall not be made for
any period more than three years preceding the year in which the error is
discovered.

(b)
When calculating the levy limitation under chapter 84.55 RCW for levies made
following the discovery of an error, the assessor shall determine and use the
correct levy amount for the year or years being corrected as though the error
had not occurred. The amount of the adjustment determined under this
subsection (1) shall not be considered when calculating the levy limitation.

(c)
If the taxing district in which a levy error has occurred does not levy
property taxes in the year the error is discovered, or for a period of more
than three years subsequent to the year the error was discovered, an adjustment
shall not be made.

(2)
If an error has occurred in the distribution of property taxes so that property
tax collected has been incorrectly distributed to a taxing district or taxing
districts wholly or partially within a county, the treasurer of the county in
which the error occurred shall correct the error by making an appropriate
adjustment to the amount distributed to that taxing district or districts in
the succeeding year. The adjustment shall be made without including any
interest. If the treasurer, in consultation with the governing authority of
the taxing district or districts affected, determines that the amount of the
adjustment in the succeeding year is so large as to cause a hardship for the
taxing district or districts, the adjustment may be made on a proportional
basis over a period of not more than three consecutive years. A correction of
an error in the distribution of property taxes shall not be made for any period
more than three years preceding the year in which the error is discovered.

(3) This section takes effect January 1, 2000, and applies to
errors that occurred not more than three years before January 1, 2000.

---
END ---