BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.09.191 and 1996 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The permanent parenting plan shall not require mutual decision-making or
designation of a dispute resolution process other than court action if it is
found that a parent has engaged in any of the following conduct: (a) Willful
abandonment that continues for an extended period of time or substantial
refusal to perform parenting functions; (b) physical, sexual, or a pattern of
emotional abuse of a child; or (c) a history of acts of domestic violence as
defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes
grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm.

(2)(a)
The parent's residential time with the child shall be limited if it is found
that the parent has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i) Willful
abandonment that continues for an extended period of time or substantial
refusal to perform parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of
emotional abuse of a child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as
defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes
grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been
convicted as an adult of a sex offense under:

(A)
RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(B)
RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(C)
RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(D)
RCW 9A.44.089;

(E)
RCW 9A.44.093;

(F)
RCW 9A.44.096;

(G)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this
subsection;

(H)
Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A)
through (H) of this subsection;

(J)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This
subsection (2)(a) shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this subsection applies.

(b)
The parent's residential time with the child shall be limited if it is found
that the parent resides with a person who has engaged in any of the following
conduct: (i) Physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child;
(ii) a history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or
an assault or sexual assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of
such harm; or (iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile
has been adjudicated of a sex offense under:

(A)
RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(B)
RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(C)
RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(D)
RCW 9A.44.089;

(E)
RCW 9A.44.093;

(F)
RCW 9A.44.096;

(G)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this
subsection;

(H)
Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A)
through (H) of this subsection;

(J)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This
subsection (2)(b) shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this subsection applies.

(c)
If a parent has been found to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or
under an analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain
the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter. If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found
to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute
of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact with
the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that person's presence.

(d)
There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been convicted as an
adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection poses a
present danger to a child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the
court shall restrain the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise
be allowed under this chapter:

(i)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five
years older than the other person;

(ii)
RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii)
RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(iv)
RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(v)
RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi)
RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(vii)
RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (d)(i) through
(vii) of this subsection;

(ix)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(e)
There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides with a person who,
as an adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile has been adjudicated, of the
sex offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of abuse or harm when that parent exercises residential time in the
presence of the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the
presumption, the court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's
child except for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated
person's presence:

(i)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five
years older than the other person;

(ii)
RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii)
RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(iv)
RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(v)
RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi)
RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years older
than the victim;

(vii)
RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (e)(i) through
(vii) of this subsection;

(ix)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(f)
The presumption established in (d) of this subsection may be rebutted only
after a written finding that:

(i)
If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent
requesting residential time, (A) contact between the child and the offending
parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, and (B) the
offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is
engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a
court, and the treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and
poses minimal risk to the child; or

(ii)
If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent
requesting residential time, (A) contact between the child and the offending
parent is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is
in or has been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor
believes such contact between the child and the offending parent is in the
child's best interest, and (C) the offending parent has successfully engaged in
treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such
treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes
such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(g)
The presumption established in (e) of this subsection may be rebutted only
after a written finding that:

(i)
If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who
is residing with the parent requesting residential time, (A) contact between
the child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and that parent is able to protect the child in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person
has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and
making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii)
If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is
residing with the parent requesting residential time, (A) contact between the
child and the parent in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has
been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes
such contact between the child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated
person in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in the child's
best interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has successfully
engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in
such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider
believes contact between the parent and child in the presence of the convicted
or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(h)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (f) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent who has
been convicted as an adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection to have residential time with the child supervised by a neutral
and independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such
residential time. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact
between the child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence,
that the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm.
The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on
the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no
longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

(i)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing
with a person who has been adjudicated as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have residential time with the child
in the presence of the person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a
neutral and independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision
of such residential time. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for
contact between the child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the
evidence, that the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child
from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon
finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or is no longer willing or capable of protecting the child.

(j)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing
with a person who, as an adult, has been convicted of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have residential time with the child
in the presence of the convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent
adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such residential
time. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the
child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor
is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall
revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence,
that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or
capable of protecting the child.

(k)
A court shall not order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a
child of the offending parent who was sexually abused by that parent. A court
may order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child who was
not sexually abused by the parent after the presumption under (d) of this
subsection has been rebutted and supervised residential time has occurred for
at least two years with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses
involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW
and (i) the sex offense of the offending parent was not committed against a
child of the offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that unsupervised
contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treating child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least
one period of residential time between the parent and the child, and after
consideration of evidence of the offending parent's compliance with community
supervision requirements, if any. If the offending parent was not ordered by a
court to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the parent shall
obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex offender
treatment provider indicating that the offender has the lowest likelihood of
risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent and a child.

(l)
A court may order unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may
occur in the presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection who resides with the parent after the
presumption under (e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised
residential time has occurred for at least two years during which time the
adjudicated juvenile has had no further arrests, adjudications, or convictions
of sex offenses involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or
chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i) the court finds that unsupervised contact between
the child and the parent that may occur in the presence of the adjudicated
juvenile is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after
consideration of the testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health
counselor, or social worker with expertise in treatment of child sexual abuse
victims who has supervised at least one period of residential time between the
parent and the child in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile, and after
consideration of evidence of the adjudicated juvenile's compliance with
community supervision or parole requirements, if any. If the adjudicated
juvenile was not ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex
offenders, then the adjudicated juvenile shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation
conducted by a state-certified sex offender treatment provider indicating that
the adjudicated juvenile has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before
the court grants unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may
occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile who is residing with the
parent.

(m)(i)
The limitations imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of this subsection shall
be reasonably calculated to protect the child from the physical, sexual, or
emotional abuse or harm that could result if the child has contact with the
parent requesting residential time. If the court expressly finds based on the
evidence that limitations on the residential time with the child will not
adequately protect the child from the harm or abuse that could result if the
child has contact with the parent requesting residential time, the court shall
restrain the parent requesting residential time from all contact with the
child.

(ii)
The court shall not enter an order under (a) of this subsection allowing a
parent to have contact with a child if the parent has been found by clear and
convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in
a dependency action to have sexually abused the child, except upon
recommendation by an evaluator or therapist for the child that the child is
ready for contact with the parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The
court shall not enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child
in the offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been
found by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance
of the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually abused a child, unless
the court finds that the parent accepts that the person engaged in the harmful
conduct and the parent is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm from the person.

(iii)
If the court limits residential time under (a) or (b) of this subsection to
require supervised contact between the child and the parent, the court shall
not approve of a supervisor for contact between a child and a parent who has
engaged in physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child
unless the court finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor accepts that
the harmful conduct occurred and is willing to and capable of protecting the
child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon
finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

(n)
If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that contact between the
parent and the child will not cause physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or
harm to the child and that the probability that the parent's or other person's
harmful or abusive conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the
child's best interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and
(iii) of this subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the parent's
conduct did not have an impact on the child, then the court need not apply the
limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight
given to the existence of a protection order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as
to domestic violence is within the discretion of the court. This subsection
shall not apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and
(m)(ii) of this subsection apply.

(3)
A parent's involvement or conduct may have an adverse effect on the child's
best interests, and the court may preclude or limit any provisions of the
parenting plan, if any of the following factors exist:

(a)
A parent's neglect or substantial nonperformance of parenting functions;

(b)
A long-term emotional or physical impairment which interferes with the parent's
performance of parenting functions as defined in RCW 26.09.004;

(c)
A long-term impairment resulting from drug, alcohol, or other substance abuse
that interferes with the performance of parenting functions;

(d)
The absence or substantial impairment of emotional ties between the parent and
the child;

(e)
The abusive use of conflict by the parent which creates the danger of serious
damage to the child's psychological development;

(f)
A parent has withheld from the other parent access to the child for a
protracted period without good cause; or

(g)
Such other factors or conduct as the court expressly finds adverse to the best
interests of the child.

(4)
The court shall terminate or preclude a parent's residential time with a
minor child if the parent has been convicted of aggravated first degree murder,
as the crime is defined in RCW 10.95.020, or murder in the first degree, as the
crime is defined in RCW 9A.32.030, and the victim is the child's other parent.
However, if the child is sufficiently mature to express reasoned and
independent preferences and wishes to have court-ordered residential time with
the parent, the court may enter an order granting residential time. Absent a
court order granting residential time or visitation, no person shall bring
about any visitation of the minor child and the parent without the consent of
the child's custodian or legal guardian.

(5)
In entering a permanent parenting plan, the court shall not draw any
presumptions from the provisions of the temporary parenting plan.

(((5)))
(6) In determining whether any of the conduct described in this section
has occurred, the court shall apply the civil rules of evidence, proof, and
procedure.

(((6)))
(7) For the purposes of this section, a parent's child means that
parent's natural child, adopted child, or stepchild.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.10.160 and 1996 c 303 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A parent not granted custody of the child is entitled to reasonable visitation
rights except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section.

(2)(a)
Visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent
seeking visitation has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i) Willful
abandonment that continues for an extended period of time or substantial
refusal to perform parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of
emotional abuse of a child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as
defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes
grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been
convicted as an adult of a sex offense under:

(A)
RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(B)
RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(C)
RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(D)
RCW 9A.44.089;

(E)
RCW 9A.44.093;

(F)
RCW 9A.44.096;

(G)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this
subsection;

(H)
Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A)
through (H) of this subsection;

(J)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This
subsection (2)(a) shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this subsection applies.

(b)
The parent's visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found that the
parent resides with a person who has engaged in any of the following conduct:
(i) Physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a
history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an
assault or sexual assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such
harm; or (iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has
been adjudicated of a sex offense under:

(A)
RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(B)
RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(C)
RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(D)
RCW 9A.44.089;

(E)
RCW 9A.44.093;

(F)
RCW 9A.44.096;

(G)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this
subsection;

(H)
Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A)
through (H) of this subsection;

(J)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This
subsection (2)(b) shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this subsection applies.

(c)
If a parent has been found to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or
under an analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain
the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter. If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found
to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute
of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that person's
presence.

(d)
There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been convicted as an
adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection poses a
present danger to a child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the
court shall restrain the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise
be allowed under this chapter:

(i)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five
years older than the other person;

(ii)
RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii)
RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(iv)
RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(v)
RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi)
RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(vii)
RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (d)(i) through
(vii) of this subsection;

(ix)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(e)
There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides with a person who,
as an adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile has been adjudicated, of the
sex offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of abuse or harm when that parent exercises visitation in the presence of
the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the presumption,
the court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child except
for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated person's
presence:

(i)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five
years older than the other person;

(ii)
RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii)
RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(iv)
RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(v)
RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi)
RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(vii)
RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (e)(i) through
(vii) of this subsection;

(ix)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(f)
The presumption established in (d) of this subsection may be rebutted only
after a written finding that:

(i)
If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent
requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent
is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending
parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in
and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii)
If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent
requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent
is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or
has been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes
such contact between the child and the offending parent is in the child's best
interest, and (C) the offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment
for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if
any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes such contact is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(g)
The presumption established in (e) of this subsection may be rebutted only
after a written finding that:

(i)
If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who
is residing with the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the
child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and that parent is able to protect the child in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person
has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and
making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii)
If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is
residing with the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child
and the parent in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has
been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes
such contact between the child and the parent residing with the convicted or
adjudicated person in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in
the child's best interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making
progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes contact between the parent and child in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child.

(h)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (f) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent who has
been convicted as an adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection to have visitation with the child supervised by a neutral and
independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such
visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between
the child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that
the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer
willing or capable of protecting the child.

(i)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing
with a person who has been adjudicated as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence of the person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and
independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such
visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between
the child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that
the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer
willing or capable of protecting the child.

(j)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing
with a person who, as an adult, has been convicted of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence of the convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult
and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(k)
A court shall not order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a
child of the offending parent who was sexually abused by that parent. A court
may order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child who was
not sexually abused by the parent after the presumption under (d) of this
subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred for at
least two years with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses
involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW
and (i) the sex offense of the offending parent was not committed against a
child of the offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that unsupervised
contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treating child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least
one period of visitation between the parent and the child, and after
consideration of evidence of the offending parent's compliance with community
supervision requirements, if any. If the offending parent was not ordered by a
court to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the parent shall
obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex offender
treatment provider indicating that the offender has the lowest likelihood of
risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent and a child.

(l)
A court may order unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may
occur in the presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection who resides with the parent after the
presumption under (e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised
visitation has occurred for at least two years during which time the
adjudicated juvenile has had no further arrests, adjudications, or convictions
of sex offenses involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or
chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i) the court finds that unsupervised contact between
the child and the parent that may occur in the presence of the adjudicated
juvenile is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after
consideration of the testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health
counselor, or social worker with expertise in treatment of child sexual abuse
victims who has supervised at least one period of visitation between the parent
and the child in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile, and after
consideration of evidence of the adjudicated juvenile's compliance with
community supervision or parole requirements, if any. If the adjudicated
juvenile was not ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex offenders,
then the adjudicated juvenile shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted
by a state-certified sex offender treatment provider indicating that the
adjudicated juvenile has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before the
court grants unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may
occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile who is residing with the
parent.

(m)(i)
The limitations imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of this subsection shall
be reasonably calculated to protect the child from the physical, sexual, or
emotional abuse or harm that could result if the child has contact with the
parent requesting visitation. If the court expressly finds based on the
evidence that limitations on visitation with the child will not adequately
protect the child from the harm or abuse that could result if the child has
contact with the parent requesting visitation, the court shall restrain the
person seeking visitation from all contact with the child.

(ii)
The court shall not enter an order under (a) of this subsection allowing a
parent to have contact with a child if the parent has been found by clear and
convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in
a dependency action to have sexually abused the child, except upon
recommendation by an evaluator or therapist for the child that the child is
ready for contact with the parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The
court shall not enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child
in the offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been
found by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance
of the evidence in a dependency action to have sexually abused a child, unless
the court finds that the parent accepts that the person engaged in the harmful
conduct and the parent is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm from the person.

(iii)
If the court limits visitation under (a) or (b) of this subsection to require
supervised contact between the child and the parent, the court shall not
approve of a supervisor for contact between a child and a parent who has
engaged in physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child
unless the court finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor accepts that
the harmful conduct occurred and is willing to and capable of protecting the
child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon
finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

(n)
If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that contact between the
parent and the child will not cause physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or
harm to the child and that the probability that the parent's or other person's
harmful or abusive conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the
child's best interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and
(iii) of this subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the parent's
conduct did not have an impact on the child, then the court need not apply the
limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight
given to the existence of a protection order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as
to domestic violence is within the discretion of the court. This subsection
shall not apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and
(m)(ii) of this subsection apply.

(3)
The court shall not enter an order granting visitation rights to a parent if
the parent has been convicted of aggravated first degree murder, as the crime
is defined in RCW 10.95.020, or murder in the first degree, as the crime is
defined in RCW 9A.32.030, and the victim is the child's other parent. However,
if the child is sufficiently mature to express reasoned and independent
preferences and wishes to have court-ordered visitation with the parent, the
court may enter an order granting visitation. Absent a court order granting
visitation, no person shall bring about the visitation of the child and the
parent without the consent of the child's custodian or legal guardian.

(4)
Any person may petition the court for visitation rights at any time including,
but not limited to, custody proceedings. The court may order visitation rights
for any person when visitation may serve the best interest of the child whether
or not there has been any change of circumstances.

(((4)))
(5) The court may modify an order granting or denying visitation rights
whenever modification would serve the best interests of the child.
Modification of a parent's visitation rights shall be subject to the
requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(((5))) (6) For the purposes of this section, a
parent's child means that parent's natural child, adopted child, or stepchild.

---
END ---