BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

A
port district may expend money to assist school districts in constructing,
improving, or repairing school facilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
53.54.030 and 1993 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, in developing a remedial program, the port
commission may utilize one or more of the following programs:

(1)
Acquisition of property or property rights within the impacted area, which
shall be deemed necessary to accomplish a port purpose. The port district may
purchase such property or property rights by time payment notwithstanding the
time limitations provided for in RCW 53.08.010. The port district may mortgage
or otherwise pledge any such properties acquired to secure such transactions.
The port district may assume any outstanding mortgages.

(2)
Transaction assistance programs, including assistance with real estate fees and
mortgage assistance, and other neighborhood remedial programs as compensation
for impacts due to aircraft noise and noise associated conditions. Any such
programs shall be in connection with properties located within an impacted area
and shall be provided upon terms and conditions as the port district shall
determine appropriate.

(3)
Programs of soundproofing structures located within an impacted area. Such
programs may be executed without regard to the ownership, provided the owner
waives damages and conveys an easement for the operation of aircraft, and for
noise and noise associated conditions therewith, to the port district.

(4)
A program to assist school districts with soundproofing structures located
within an impacted area and improving indoor air quality in those structures
that have been soundproofed. Any construction, improvement, or repair to
school structures to abate aircraft noise or correct indoor air quality shall
be completed to a standard equivalent to the noise and air quality levels at
similar structures operated by the same school district outside the impacted
area. The program shall include costs associated with monitoring noise and air
quality levels in the structures and maintaining the soundproofing and air
quality systems in the structures to the level of performance at the time of
installation.

(5)
Mortgage insurance of private owners of lands or improvements within such noise
impacted area where such private owners are unable to obtain mortgage insurance
solely because of noise impact. In this regard, the port district may
establish reasonable regulations and may impose reasonable conditions and
charges upon the granting of such mortgage insurance: PROVIDED, That such fees
and charges shall at no time exceed fees established for federal mortgage
insurance programs for like service.

(((5)))
(6) An individual property may be provided benefits by the port district
under each of the programs described in subsections (1) through (((4))) (3)
and (5) of this section. However, an individual property may not be
provided benefits under any one of these programs more than once, unless the
property is subjected to increased aircraft noise or differing aircraft noise
impacts that would have afforded different levels of mitigation, even if the
property owner had waived all damages and conveyed a full and unrestricted
easement.

(((6)))
(7) Management of all lands, easements, or development rights acquired,
including but not limited to the following:

(a)
Rental of any or all lands or structures acquired;

(b)
Redevelopment of any such lands for any economic use consistent with airport
operations, local zoning and the state environmental policy;

(c)
Sale of such properties for cash or for time payment and subjection of such
property to mortgage or other security transaction: PROVIDED, That any such
sale shall reserve to the port district by covenant an unconditional right of
easement for the operation of all aircraft and for all noise or noise
conditions associated therewith.

(((7))) (8) A property shall be considered within the
impacted area if any part thereof is within the impacted area.

---
END ---