BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
1

COMMISSION ON EDUCATIONAL
ACCOUNTABILITY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. (1)
The Washington commission on educational accountability is established.

(2)
The commission shall consist of seven members selected as follows:

(a)
One member shall be appointed by and shall represent but shall not be the
superintendent of public instruction;

(b)
Two members shall be appointed by and shall represent the governor;

(c)
Two members shall represent but shall not be members of the house of
representatives. The two members, one nominated by each major caucus, shall be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(d)
Two members shall represent but shall not be members of the senate. The two
members, one nominated by each major caucus, shall be appointed by the
president of the senate.

(3)
The commission shall appoint a chair from among the commission members.

(4)
Appointees shall be qualified individuals who are supportive of educational
improvement, who have a positive record of service, and who will devote
sufficient time to the responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the
objectives of the commission are achieved.

(5)
Each appointing authority shall appoint its initial commission members by July
1, 1999. The first meeting of the commission shall be convened by the
superintendent of public instruction no later than July 30, 1999. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide staff support to the
commission until the commission has hired its own staff.

(6)
Members shall serve for terms of four years, with the terms expiring on June
30th of the fourth year of the term. However, in the case of the initial
members, one of the members appointed by the governor shall serve for a
three-year term and both members appointed by the house of representatives
shall serve for two-year terms, with each of the terms expiring on June 30th of
the applicable year.

(7)
Each appointing authority shall fill any vacancies in appointments that may
occur.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. By
September 5, 2000, the Washington commission on educational accountability
shall recommend accountability policies to the governor and to the education
and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. The policies
shall include, but need not be limited to:

(1)
A graduated series of increasingly intensive school district and state
intervention strategies for schools in which low-performance persists over an
identified period of time, including options for budgeting and personnel.

(a)
The strategies shall be formulated in accordance with the assumption that
school districts have primary responsibility for intervening in schools with
relatively large numbers of students who are not achieving the essential
academic learning requirements. However, if after a period of time, school
district intervention is not successful, state intervention may be necessary.

(b)
The strategies shall also be formulated in accordance with the assumption that
the longer low performance persists, the less control and decision-making
authority a school shall retain.

(c)
In its deliberations, the commission may consider intervention strategies
underway in Washington and other states, such as the type of graduated
intervention system adopted by the Seattle school district;

(2)
Additional assistance measures for students and schools; and

(3)
Rewards for successful schools and school districts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. The
accountability duties of the Washington commission on educational
accountability shall include, but are not limited to the following:

(1)
The adoption of goals for Washington's educational accountability system,
including the establishment of timelines for improving student performance for
all subjects assessed in the Washington assessment of student learning.
However, before each goal is implemented, the commission shall present the goal
to the education and fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the
senate for the committees' review and comment;

(2)
The adoption of categories of school performance from successful to failed.
The definitions may include a recognition of student achievement and a
recognition of improvements in student performance;

(3)
The identification of objective, systematic measures for each identified
category;

(4)
The identification of performance incentive systems that have improved student
achievement;

(5)
The identification of schools in which state intervention measures will be
needed and the determination of appropriate intervention strategies;

(6)
The determination of appropriate choice options within and outside the school
district for students attending failed schools. The options shall include, but
need not be limited to vocational education opportunities;

(7)
A recommendation to the superintendent of public instruction of schools to be
recognized for two types of accomplishments, student achievement and
improvements in student achievement;

(8)
The adoption of performance standards for determining if a student has
successfully completed the Washington assessment of student learning. The
commission shall set such performance standards in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and after considering any recommendations
that may be developed by such advisory committees as the commission may choose
to establish for the purposes of this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. The
powers and duties of the Washington commission on educational accountability
shall include, but need not be limited to:

(1)
The adoption of necessary rules;

(2)
The establishment of advisory committees, which may include persons who are not
members of the commission;

(3)
The hiring of necessary staff and the determination of the staff's duties and
compensation. However, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide most of the technical assistance and logistical support needed by
the commission;

(4)
The receipt of per diem and travel allowances as permitted under RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060; and

(5)
The holding of meetings and public hearings, including hearings on possible
state interventions. If the commission finds that the school district's
efforts have failed to improve student achievement over a reasonable period of
time, the commission may recommend that the superintendent of public
instruction implement one or more intervention strategies as may be authorized
by law. At the direction of the commission, the superintendent shall intervene
in the school district and take corrective actions authorized by law.

PART
2

REPORTING
RESULTS

Sec.
201. RCW
28A.630.889 and 1998 c 319 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall:

(a)
Report to schools, school districts, and the legislature on the results of the
((fourth grade)) Washington assessment of student learning; and

(b)
Post individual school results of the ((fourth grade)) Washington
assessment of student learning on the superintendent of public instruction's
internet world-wide web site.

(2)
The reports shall include the assessment results by school and school district,
and include changes over time. Results shall be reported as follows:

(a)
The percentage of students meeting the standards;

(b)
The percentage of students performing at each level of the assessment; and

(c)
A learning improvement index that shows changes in student performance within
the different levels of student learning reported on the Washington assessment
of student learning.

(3)
Data regarding the different characteristics of schools, such as poverty
levels, percent of English as a second language students, dropout rates,
attendance, percent of students in special education, and student mobility
shall also be reported so that districts and schools can learn from the
improvement efforts of other schools and districts with similar
characteristics.

(4)
To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and districts that
test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not be reported.

(5)
The Washington commission on educational accountability shall annually review
the reporting system to ensure fairness, accuracy, timeliness, and equity of
opportunity, especially with regard to schools with special circumstances and
unique populations of students, and recommend to the superintendent of public
instruction needed improvements.

(6)
The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the percentage and
number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted
from taking the assessments by schools and school districts to ensure the
exemptions are in compliance with exemption guidelines.

(((2)
This section expires July 1, 2006.))

Sec.
202. RCW
28A.320.205 and 1993 c 336 s 1006 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning with the 1994-95 school year, to provide the local community and
electorate with access to information on the educational programs in the
schools in the district, each school shall publish annually a school
performance report and deliver the report to each parent with children enrolled
in the school and make the report available to the community served by the
school. The annual performance report shall be in a form that can be easily
understood and be used by parents, guardians, and other members of the
community who are not professional educators to make informed educational
decisions. As data from the assessments in RCW 28A.630.885 becomes available,
the annual performance report should enable parents, educators, and school
board members to determine whether students in the district's schools are
attaining mastery of the student learning goals under RCW 28A.150.210, and
other important facts about the schools' performance in assisting students to
learn. The annual report shall make comparisons to a school's performance in
preceding years and shall ((project goals in performance categories)) include
school level goals under RCW 28A.630.887, student performance relative to the
goals and the percentage of students performing at each level of the
assessment, a comparison of student performance at each level of the assessment
to the previous year's performance, and information regarding school-level
plans to achieve the goals.

(2)
The annual performance report shall include, but not be limited to: (a)
A brief statement of the mission of the school and the school district; (b)
enrollment statistics including student demographics; (c) expenditures
per pupil for the school year; (d) a summary of student scores on all
mandated tests, and a comparison of those scores with comparable Washington
schools of similar demographic characteristics; (e) a concise annual
budget report; (f) student attendance, graduation, and dropout rates; (g)
information regarding the use and condition of the school building or
buildings; (h) a brief description of the ((restructuring)) learning
improvement plans for the school; (i) school safety indicators,
including but not limited to, the number of suspensions and of violent
incidents a year at the school and at school-sponsored events; (j) information
on the credentials of teachers in the school, including, but not limited to,
the number of teachers with advanced degrees, the number teaching out of their
endorsement areas, the average number of years teachers in the school have been
teaching, and the number of teachers who have passed Washington's teacher
assessments; (k) the types of choice options available to students at the
school, including vocational education opportunities; and (l) an
invitation to all parents and citizens to participate in school activities.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop by June 30, 1994, and
update periodically, a model report form, which shall also be adapted for
computers, that schools may use to meet the requirements of subsections (1) and
(2) of this section. In order to make school performance reports broadly
accessible to the public, the superintendent of public instruction, to the
extent feasible, shall make information on each school's report available on or
through the superintendent's internet web site.

PART
3

ASSISTANCE
TO SCHOOLS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. (1)
To the extent funds are appropriated, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction annually shall allocate accountability implementation funds
to school districts. The purposes of the funds are to: Develop and update
student learning improvement plans; implement curriculum materials and
instructional strategies; provide staff professional development to implement
the selected curricula and instruction; develop and implement assessment
strategies and training in assessment scoring; and fund other activities
intended to improve student learning for all students, including students with
diverse needs. Activities funded by the allocations must be consistent with
the school or district improvement plan, designed to improve the ability of
teachers and other instructional certificated and classified staff to assist
students in meeting the essential academic learning requirements, and designed
to achieve state and local accountability goals.

(2)
To be eligible for allocations in the 1999-2000 school year, school district
superintendents and principals must certify that activities funded by
accountability implementation funds will be in accordance with the requirements
of this act. To be eligible for funds in the 2000-01 school year and thereafter,
school district superintendents and school principals must certify that they
have analyzed the use of state, federal, and local funds used for professional
development and planning and that these funds will be used in an effective
manner to improve student learning.

(3)
Schools receiving funds shall develop, update as needed, and keep on file a
school student learning improvement plan to achieve the student learning goals
and essential academic learning requirements and to implement the assessment
system as it is developed. The plan shall delineate how the accountability
implementation funds will be used to accomplish the requirements of this
section. The plan shall be made available to the public and to others upon
request.

(4)
The amount of allocations shall be determined in the omnibus appropriations
act.

(5)
The state schools for the deaf and blind are eligible to receive allocations
under this section.

(6)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt timelines and rules as
necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the program, and require that
schools and districts submit reports regarding the use of the funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. (1)
In order to increase the availability and quality of technical assistance
state-wide, the superintendent of public instruction, subject to available
funding, may employ school improvement coordinators and school improvement
specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts. The improvement
specialists shall serve on a rotating basis and shall not be permanent
employees.

(2)
The types of assistance provided by the improvement coordinators and
specialists may include, but need not be limited to:

(a)
Assistance to schools to use student performance data and develop improvement
plans based on those data;

(b)
Consultation with schools and districts concerning their performance on the
Washington assessment of student learning and other assessments;

(c)
Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic
learning requirements and the Washington assessment of student learning and
that meets the needs of diverse learners;

(d)
Assistance in the identification and implementation of research-based
instructional practices;

(e)
Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional strategies and
classroom-based assessment;

(f)
Assistance in developing and implementing family and community involvement
programs; and

(g)
Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to improve student
learning.

(3)
To the extent funds are appropriated, the superintendent of public instruction
shall grant funds to schools for short-term, intensive, tailored assistance to
develop and implement comprehensive improvement plans that are based on
reliable research and effective practices. Recommendations regarding the
criteria for granting funds shall be made by the Washington commission on
educational accountability to the superintendent of public instruction.
Priority for funds shall be given to schools that need to improve student
achievement substantially. The funds under this section are intended to
stimulate comprehensive, school-wide change, rather than a piecemeal,
fragmented approach to school improvement. Grant funds may not be awarded
unless the following conditions are met:

(a)
School districts must seek comprehensive recommendations from a helping corps
technical assistance team formed by the superintendent of public instruction;

(b)
Comprehensive improvement plans must be consistent with the recommendations of
a helping corps technical assistance team formed by the superintendent of
public instruction; and

(c)
The coordinator or director of the helping corps technical assistance team must
certify that the comprehensive improvement plan is consistent with the
technical assistance team recommendations.

(4)
To be considered comprehensive, plans must integrate, in a coherent manner, the
following components:

(a)
Effective, research-based methods and strategies;

(b)
Comprehensive design with aligned components;

(c)
High quality and continuous teacher and staff professional development and
training;

(d)
Measurable goals and benchmarks;

(e)
Support within the school;

(f)
Family and community involvement;

(g)
External technical support and assistance;

(h)
Measures to improve school security and supportive learning environments;

(i)
Evaluation strategies; and

(j)
Coordination of available federal, state, local, and private resources.

(5)
When determining grant recipients, the following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
Results of the Washington assessment of student learning;

(b)
Student achievement evidence from district or other state assessments;

(c)
The level of improvement in student achievement over time;

(d)
Whether the criteria in subsection (2) of this section have been met; and

(e)
The likelihood that the proposed application will lead to a plan and actions
that will result in improved student achievement.

(6)
Subject to available funding, individual grants shall be awarded for a period
of two years.

(7)
Grant applications shall be approved by the school district board of directors
before submission of the application to the superintendent of public
instruction.

PART
4

ACCOUNTABILITY GOALS,
INCLUDING GOALS IN READING AND MATHEMATICS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. The
mid-term goal of the state's accountability system is that eighty percent or
more of all public school students state-wide meet the state standards on the
Washington assessment of student learning within a decade after the
administration of each assessment is required state-wide.

Sec.
402. RCW
28A.630.887 and 1998 c 319 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((By December 15, 1998,)) Each school district board of directors
shall:

(a)
Select the reading standard results on either the 1997 or 1998 fourth grade
Washington assessment of student learning as the school district's initial
baseline reading standard. Districts may select the 1997 results only if
all of the elementary schools with fourth grade students administered the
assessment;

(b)
Establish a three-year, district-wide goal to increase, by the end of the
2000-01 school year, the percentage of students who meet or exceed the reading
standard on the fourth grade Washington assessment of student learning. The ((three-year))
2000-01 percentage increase goal may not be less than the district's
total percentage of students who did not meet the baseline reading standard
multiplied by twenty-five percent;

(c)
Specify the annual district-wide percentage improvement increments to meet the
((three-year)) 2000-01 goal; and

(d)
Direct each elementary school to establish a three-year goal for its fourth
grade students, subject to approval by the board. The aggregate of the
elementary school goals must meet or exceed the district-wide goals
established by the board.

(2)
Each school district board of directors shall:

(a)
By December 15, 2000, select the reading standard results on either the 1998,
1999, or 2000 seventh grade Washington assessment of student learning as the
school district's seventh grade baseline reading standard;

(b)
Establish a district-wide goal to increase, by the end of the 2002-03 school
year, the percentage of students who meet or exceed the reading standard on the
seventh grade Washington assessment of student learning. The 2002-03
percentage increase goal may not be less than the district's total percentage
of students who did not meet the baseline reading standard multiplied by
twenty-five percent;

(c)
Specify the annual district-wide percentage improvement increments necessary to
meet the seventh grade reading goal; and

(d)
Direct each middle or junior high school, as appropriate, to establish reading
goals for its seventh grade students, subject to approval by the board. The
aggregate of the middle or junior high school goals must meet or exceed the
district-wide goals established by the board.

(3)
Each school district board of directors shall:

(a)
By December 15, 2000, select the mathematics standard results on either the
1998 or 1999 fourth grade Washington assessment of student learning as the
school district's fourth grade baseline mathematics standard;

(b)
By December 15, 2001, select the mathematics standard results on either the
2000 or 2001 seventh grade Washington assessment of student learning as the
school district's seventh grade baseline mathematics baseline. However, the
district may select the 2000 results only if all of the middle or junior high
schools with seventh grade students administered the assessment;

(c)
Establish a district-wide goal to increase, by the end of the 2002-03 school
year, the percentage of students who meet or exceed the mathematics standard on
the fourth grade Washington assessment of student learning. The 2002-03
percentage increase goal may not be less than the district's total percentage
of students who did not meet the baseline mathematics standard multiplied by
twenty-five percent;

(d)
Establish a district-wide goal to increase, by the end of the 2003-04 school
year, the percentage of students who meet or exceed the mathematics standard on
the seventh grade Washington assessment of student learning. The 2003-04
percentage increase goal may not be less than the district's total percentage
of students who did not meet the baseline mathematics standard multiplied by
twenty-five percent;

(e)
Specify the annual district-wide percentage improvement increments necessary to
meet each mathematics goal; and

(f)
Direct each elementary and middle or junior high school, as appropriate, to
establish mathematics goals for its fourth grade or seventh grade students,
subject to approval by the board. The aggregate of the goals for each grade
level must meet or exceed the district-wide goals established by the board for
that grade level.

(4)
Each school district board of directors shall:

(a)
Annually report ((biannually)) to parents ((in writing))
and to the community in a public meeting and annually report in writing
the following information:

(i)
District-wide and school-level three-year goals;

(ii)
Student performance relative to the goals; and

(iii)
District-wide and school-level plans to achieve the reading and mathematics
goals in kindergarten through ((fourth)) seventh grade,
including ((grade-level expectations,)) curriculum and instruction,
parental or guardian involvement, and resources available to parents and
guardians to help students meet the reading and mathematics standards;

(b)
Report annually ((to the superintendent of public instruction and)) in a
news release to the local media the district's progress toward meeting the
district-wide and school-level goals; and

(c)
Include the ((reported information)) school-level goals, student
performance relative to the goals, and a summary of school-level plans to
achieve the goals in each school's annual school performance report under
RCW 28A.320.205. This shall be considered one of the annual written reports
required in (a) of this subsection.

(((3)))
(5) Schools and school districts in which ten or fewer students are eligible
to be assessed in a grade level are not required to establish or report
numerical improvement goals and performance relative to the goals, but are
required to report to parents and the community their plans to improve reading
achievement in kindergarten through seventh grade and mathematics achievement
in kindergarten through seventh grade.

(6)
By December 1, 2000, and by December 31st annually thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall report to the education committees
of the house of representatives and the senate on the progress that has been
made in achieving the ((three-year)) reading and mathematics goals,
and provide recommendations to the legislature on setting reading goals for the
next three years.

(((4)
This section expires July 1, 2006.))

(7)
By August 1, 2000, the superintendent shall complete an objective analysis of
the fourth grade mathematics assessment. The analysis shall include, but need
not be limited to, the student developmental level required to achieve the
fourth grade standard successfully and the extent to which the assessment
measures a student's computational skills, problem-solving skills, math
communications skills, and a breakdown of other skills assessed. The analysis
shall include the percentage of items that: Require students to use
computational skills without the use of technology; require the use of
technology to complete an item; measure mathematics communication skills;
measure problem-solving skills; and measure other skills included in the
mathematics assessment. The superintendent of public instruction shall consult
recognized experts with differing views on the instruction of mathematics, and
report the results of the analysis to the governor and the education committees
of the house of representatives and the senate by August 15, 2000.

PART
5

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. The
specifications of a study of the learning assistance program shall be provided
in the omnibus appropriations act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. (1)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 101 of this act, referencing section
101 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 101 of this act is null
and void.

(2)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 102 of this act, referencing section
102 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 102 of this act is null
and void.

(3)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 103 of this act, referencing section
103 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 103 of this act is null
and void.

(4)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 104 of this act, referencing section
104 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 104 of this act is null
and void.

(5)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 301 of this act, referencing section
301 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 301 of this act is null
and void.

(6)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 302 of this act, referencing section
302 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 302 of this act is null
and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 1998 c
225 s 3 (uncodified);

(2) 1995 c
209 s 3 (uncodified); and

(3) 1995 c
209 s 2 & 1992 c 141 s 203 (uncodified).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504. RCW
28A.300.138 (Student learning improvement grants) and 1994 c 245 s
1 & 1993 c 336 s 301 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 505. PART
HEADINGS NOT LAW. Part headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 506.
Sections 101 through 104, 301, 302, and 401 of this act constitute a new
chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 507. RCW
28A.630.887 is recodified as a new section in the chapter created in section
506 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 508.
Sections 101 and 503 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---