BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.010 and 1997 c 58 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A family that includes an adult who has received temporary assistance for needy
families for sixty months after July 27, 1997, shall be ineligible for further
temporary assistance for needy families assistance.

(2)
For the purposes of applying the rules of this section, the department shall
count any month in which an adult family member received a temporary assistance
for needy families cash assistance grant unless the assistance was provided
when the family member was a minor child and not the head of the household or
married to the head of the household or the adult met the good cause
criteria for exemption from work requirements under section 2 of this act.

(3)
The department shall refer recipients who require specialized assistance to
appropriate department programs, crime victims' programs through the department
of community, trade, and economic development, or the crime victims'
compensation program of the department of labor and industries.

(4)
The department may exempt a recipient and the recipient's family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section by reason of hardship or if the
recipient meets the family violence options of section 402(A)(7) of Title IVA
of the federal social security act as amended by P.L. 104-193. The number of
recipients and their families exempted from subsection (1) of this section for
a fiscal year shall not exceed twenty percent of the average monthly number of
recipients and their families to which assistance is provided under the
temporary assistance for needy families program.

(5)
The department shall not exempt a recipient and his or her family from the
application of subsection (1) of this section until after the recipient has
received fifty-two months of assistance under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

Each
recipient approved to receive temporary assistance for needy families shall be
subject to an employability screening after determination of program
eligibility and before referral to job search. If the employability screening
determines the recipient meets the criteria specified in RCW 74.08A.270 for a
good cause exemption to work requirements, the department shall defer the job
search requirement under RCW 74.08A.285 and work requirement under RCW
74.08A.260.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.08A.260 and 1997 c 58 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

Recipients
who have not obtained a deferral under section 2 of this act, or paid,
unsubsidized employment by the end of the job search component ((authorized
in section 312 of this act)) shall be referred to a work activity.

(1)
Each recipient shall be assessed immediately upon completion of the job search
component. Assessments shall be based upon factors that are critical to
obtaining employment, including but not limited to education, employment
strengths, and employment history. Assessments may be performed by the
department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be based on a
uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be accepted by all agencies
and organizations serving the recipient. Based on the assessment, an
individual responsibility plan shall be prepared that: (a) Sets forth an
employment goal and a plan for moving the recipient immediately into
employment; (b) contains the obligation of the recipient to become and remain
employed; (c) moves the recipient into whatever employment the recipient is
capable of handling as quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services
available to the recipient to enable the recipient to obtain and keep
employment.

(2)
Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and do not qualify
for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall engage in self‑directed
service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.

(3)
If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities required by the
department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the recipient's share, and
may, if the department determines it appropriate, be terminated.

(4)
The department may waive the penalties required under subsection (3) of this
section, subject to a finding that the recipient refused to engage in work for
good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.

(5)
In implementing this section, the department shall assign the highest priority
to the most employable clients, including adults in two-parent families and
parents in single-parent families that include older preschool or school-age
children to be engaged in work activities.

(6)
In consultation with the recipient, the department or contractor shall place
the recipient into a work activity that is available in the local area where
the recipient resides.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.08A.270 and 1997 c 58 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

Good
cause reasons for failure to participate in WorkFirst program components
include: (1) Situations where the recipient is a parent or other relative
personally providing care for a child under the age of six years, and formal or
informal child care, or day care for an incapacitated individual living in the
same home as a dependent child, is necessary for an individual to participate
or continue participation in the program or accept employment, and such care is
not available, and the department fails to provide such care; or (2) ((until
June 30, 1999,)) if the recipient is a parent with a child under the age of
one year. A parent may only receive this exemption for a total of twelve
months, which may be consecutive or nonconsecutive; or (3) ((after June 30,
1999,)) if the recipient is a ((parent with a child under three months
of age)) victim of domestic violence and qualifies for a waiver under
the family violence option and not otherwise exempted under RCW 74.08A.010(4);
or (4) if the recipient is meeting the work requirements prescribed by federal
law and still receiving a grant; or (5) if the recipient is the caretaker or
parent of an incapacitated child; or (6) if the recipient is incapacitated; or
(7) if the recipient is fifty-five years of age or older and is the grandparent
or nonparent relative of the dependent child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

The
department is directed to structure the use of federal and state funds in a
manner that implements provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of 1999
(this act) and complies with temporary assistance for needy families federal
requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall adopt rules providing for the review of recipients granted
deferrals under section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

---
END ---