BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that cities and towns throughout the state face a crisis
in their ability to meet growing local transportation needs. Additionally, the
need for transportation revenue in the seventeen cities and towns that had
implemented the street utility was heightened by the 1995 decision of the state
supreme court that invalidated residential street utility charges imposed under
the authority of section 2, chapter 141, Laws of 1991. The legislature
recognizes the need to assist cities and towns to replace the local funding
that would have been available to them had RCW 82.80.050 been upheld and to
provide additional local transportation revenue options to all cities.

The
legislature intends to provide cities and towns the local option, with voter
approval, to authorize a city street district levy, similar to the existing
county road district levy in RCW 36.82.040, to be levied by the county
legislative authority for the city pursuant to RCW 84.52.030 or by the city
legislative authority in a city having a population of three hundred thousand
or more. Additionally, cities and towns are provided the local option, subject
to voter referendum, to increase the local sales and use tax, and to impose a
business and occupation tax of up to two percent on retail sales in the city or
town of motor vehicle and special fuel. Transportation benefit districts are
provided the local option to impose a vehicle license fee if that fee has not
been imposed by the county in which the transportation benefit district is
located. Moreover, the rate for the county-wide local option fuel tax
authorized under RCW 82.80.010 should be increased to twenty percent of the
state motor vehicle and special fuel tax rate.

A
city, town, or transportation benefit district may use any combination of the
available options.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.80.020 and 1998 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county, or subject to subsection (7) of this
section, a ((qualifying city or town)) transportation benefit
district located in a county that has not imposed a fifteen-dollar fee
under this section, may fix and impose an additional fee, not to exceed fifteen
dollars per vehicle, for each vehicle that is subject to license fees under RCW
46.16.060 and for each vehicle that is subject to RCW 46.16.070 with an unladen
weight of six thousand pounds or less, and that is determined by the department
of licensing to be registered within the boundaries of the county or the
transportation benefit district, as the case may be.

(2)
The department of licensing shall administer and collect ((the)) fees
imposed under this section. The department shall deduct a percentage
amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes
collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer for
monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

(3)
The proceeds of ((this)) fees imposed under this section by counties
or transportation benefit districts shall be used strictly for
transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

(4)
A county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation benefit
district imposing this fee or initiating an exemption process shall delay
the effective date at least six months from the date the ordinance is enacted
to allow the department of licensing to implement administration and collection
of or exemption from the fee.

(5)
The legislative authority of a county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation
benefit district may develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen
dollar)) fee imposed under this section for the registered owners of
vehicles residing within the boundaries of the county or ((qualifying city
or town)) transportation benefit district: (a) Who are sixty-one
years old or older at the time payment of the fee is due and whose household
income for the previous calendar year is less than an amount prescribed by the
county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation benefit district
legislative authority; or (b) who have a physical disability.

(6)
The legislative authority of a county or ((qualifying city or town)) transportation
benefit district shall develop and initiate an exemption process of the ((fifteen-dollar))
fee for vehicles registered within the boundaries of the county that are
licensed under RCW 46.16.374.

(7)
((For purposes of this section, a "qualifying city or town" means
a city or town residing within a county having a population of greater than
seventy-five thousand in which is located all or part of a national monument.))
A ((qualifying city or town)) transportation benefit district may
impose the fee authorized in subsection (1) of this section subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(((a)
The city or town may impose the fee only if authorized to do so by a majority
of voters voting at a general or special election on a proposition for that
purpose. At a minimum, the ballot measure shall contain: (i) A description of
the transportation project proposed for funding, properly identified by
mileposts or other designations that specify the project parameters; (ii) the
proposed number of months or years necessary to fund the city or town's share
of the project cost; and (iii) the amount of fee to be imposed for the project.

(b))) The
((city or town)) transportation benefit district may not impose a
fee that, if combined with the county fee, exceeds fifteen dollars. If a
county imposes or increases a fee under this section that, if combined with the
fee imposed by a ((city or town)) transportation benefit district,
exceeds fifteen dollars, the ((city or town)) transportation benefit
district fee shall be reduced or eliminated as needed so that in no ((city
or town)) transportation benefit district does the combined fee
exceed fifteen dollars. All revenues from county-imposed fees shall be
distributed as called for in RCW ((82.80.020)) 82.80.080.

(((c)
Any fee imposed by a city or town under this section shall expire at the end of
the term of months or years provided in the ballot measure, or when the city or
town's bonded indebtedness on the project is retired, whichever is sooner.))

(8)
((The)) Fees imposed ((under subsection (7) of this
section shall apply only to renewals and)) by transportation benefit
districts shall not apply to ((ownership transfer transactions)) vehicles
sold by a vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.80.080 and 1998 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less authorized deductions,
generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.80.020,
levied by counties to the levying counties, and cities contained in those
counties, based on the relative per capita population. County population for
purposes of this section is equal to one and one-half of the unincorporated
population of the county. In calculating the distributions, the state
treasurer shall use the population estimates prepared by the state office of
financial management and shall further calculate the distribution based on
information supplied by the departments of licensing and revenue, as
appropriate.

(2)
The state treasurer shall distribute revenues, less authorized deductions,
generated by the local option taxes authorized in RCW ((82.80.010 and))
82.80.020 levied by ((qualifying cities and towns)) transportation
benefit districts to the levying ((cities and towns)) transportation
benefit districts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. For
the purpose of efficient administration of the streets and for other
transportation purposes of each city or town, the legislative authority may
establish in its respective city or town a city street district, if authorized
to do so by a majority of its voters voting at a general or special election on
a proposition for that purpose, and shall cause its action in so doing to be
entered upon its records.

The
city street district must be coterminous with the city or town. Territory
later annexed into the city or town automatically becomes part of the city
street district, and territory ceasing to be part of the city or town
automatically ceases to be part of the city street district.

A
city street district may be disestablished, effective at the start of a new
calendar year, by action of the city or town legislative authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Each
city or town that has established a city street district must create an account
to be known as the city street district account. Any funds accruing to and to
be deposited in the city street district account arising from a levy in a city
street district must be expended for proper city street and other
transportation purposes, in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. For
the purpose of raising revenue for establishing, laying out, constructing,
altering, repairing, improving, and maintaining city streets and bridges, and
for other proper city transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070,
a city or town that has created a city street district must make a uniform tax
levy throughout each city street district of an amount not to exceed fifty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of the last assessed valuation of
the taxable property in the city street district. This tax levy must be made
annually at the time of making the property tax levy for general purposes, and
must be made by the county legislative authority for the city pursuant to RCW 84.52.030,
or by the city legislative authority in a city having a population of three
hundred thousand or more. All funds accruing from the levy must be credited to
and deposited in the city street district account.

Sec.
7. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these
levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The certified levy of a city street
district shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent
of the true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the
combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one
percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property, then the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that
is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the combined rate no
longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall
be eliminated; (((b))) (c) if the combined rate of regular property
tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed
under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be
eliminated; and (((c))) (d) if the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified ((property tax)) levy ((rates of those junior
taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130))
of a city street district shall be reduced ((on a pro rata basis))
or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of ((flood control zone)) those
junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and
67.38.130 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations,
the certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations,
the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts,
other than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent
per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park
districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation
levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or
eliminated;

(((d)
Fourth)) (e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(((e)
Fifth)) (f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec.
8. RCW
84.52.120 and 1995 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
metropolitan park district with a population of one hundred fifty thousand or
more may submit a ballot proposition to voters of the district authorizing the
protection of the district's tax levy from prorationing under RCW 84.52.010(2)
by imposing all or any portion of the district's twenty-five cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation tax levy outside of the five dollar and ninety
cent per thousand dollar of assessed valuation limitation established under RCW
84.52.043(2), if those taxes otherwise would be prorated under RCW
84.52.010(2)(((c))) (d), for taxes imposed in any year on or
before the first day of January six years after the ballot proposition is
approved. A simple majority vote of voters voting on the proposition is
required for approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Cities and towns may fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this section, to be used strictly for transportation purposes in
accordance with RCW 82.80.070. The tax authorized pursuant to this section
shall be in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030 and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to chapters
82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the city or
town imposing the tax. The rate of such tax shall be equal to one-tenth of one
percent of the selling price, in the case of a sales tax, or value of the
article used, in the case of a use tax. The exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and
82.12.820 are for the state portion of the sales and use tax and do not extend
to the tax authorized in this section.

(2)
The legislative authority of a city or town may limit the purposes or length of
time for which a sales and use tax authorized by this section will be imposed.
If the legislative authority determines to impose a sales and use tax only to
provide funds for a specific transportation project or projects, an ordinance
imposing the sales and use tax under this section shall contain, at a minimum:

(a)
A description of the transportation project or projects proposed for funding,
properly identified by mileposts or other designations that specify the project
parameters;

(b)
The proposed number of months or years expected to be necessary to fund the
city's or town's share of the project costs; and

(c)
The tax rate of the proposed sales and use tax.

(3)
If a limited purpose was specified in an ordinance, the city or town
legislative authority must certify completion of payment when the costs of each
specific project for which the city or town sales and use tax was imposed have
been fully paid, including the retirement of any debt issued for the project.
Upon certification of completion of payment for all the projects, the sales and
use tax imposed to pay for the projects shall cease.

(4)
In no event shall the tax under this section begin at a date other than the
beginning of a calendar quarter or end at a date other than the end of a
calendar quarter.

(5)
The administrative provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW apply to the tax imposed
under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 82.80 RCW to read as follows:

Cities
and towns that impose a tax under section 9 of this act may contract with the
state department of revenue or other appropriate entities for administration
and collection of that tax.

Sec.
11. RCW
82.36.440 and 1991 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege, or occupational
tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or distributing motor vehicle
fuel, and no city, town, county, township or other subdivision or municipal
corporation of the state shall levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured
by the sale, receipt, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, except as
provided in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.47.020, and except that a city or town may
impose its license fee or tax upon the business of making retail sales of motor
vehicle fuel within the limits of the city or town at a rate of up to two
percent of the gross receipts from retail sales of motor vehicle fuel within
the limits of the city or town. The imposition or increase in rate of any such
city or town license fee or tax shall be subject to the referendum procedure in
RCW 35.21.706, but shall not be subject to the limitations of RCW 35.21.710.

Sec.
12. RCW
82.38.280 and 1991 c 173 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
tax levied in this chapter is in lieu of any excise, privilege, or occupational
tax upon the business of manufacturing, selling, or distributing special fuel,
and no city, town, county, township or other subdivision or municipal
corporation of the state shall levy or collect any excise tax upon or measured
by the sale, receipt, distribution, or use of special fuel, except as provided
in RCW 82.80.010 and 82.47.020, and except that a city or town may impose
its license fee or tax upon the business of making retail sales of special fuel
within the limits of the city or town at a rate of up to two percent of the
gross receipts from retail sales of special fuel within the limits of the city
or town. The imposition or increase in rate of any such city or town license
fee or tax shall be subject to the referendum procedure in RCW 35.21.706, but
shall not be subject to the limitations of RCW 35.21.710.

Sec.
13. RCW
35.21.710 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
city which imposes a license fee or tax upon business activities consisting of
the making of retail sales of tangible personal property which are measured by
gross receipts or gross income from such sales, shall impose such tax at a
single uniform rate upon all such business activities. The taxing authority
granted to cities for taxes upon business activities measured by gross receipts
or gross income from sales shall not exceed a rate of .0020; except that any
city with an adopted ordinance at a higher rate, as of January 1, 1982 shall be
limited to a maximum increase of ten percent of the January 1982 rate, not to
exceed an annual incremental increase of two percent of current rate:
PROVIDED, That any adopted ordinance which classifies according to different
types of business or services shall be subject to both the ten percent and the
two percent annual incremental increase limitation on each tax rate: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That all surtaxes on business and occupation classifications in effect
as of January 1, 1982, shall expire no later than December 31, 1982, or by
expiration date established by local ordinance. Cities which impose a license
fee or tax upon business activities consisting of the making of retail sales of
tangible personal property which are measured by gross receipts or gross income
from such sales shall be required to submit an annual report to the state
auditor identifying the rate established and the revenues received from each
fee or tax. This section shall not apply to any business activities subject to
the tax imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW, by RCW 82.36.440, or by RCW 82.38.280.
For purposes of this section, the providing to consumers of competitive
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, shall be deemed to be the
retail sale of tangible personal property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of a city or town may limit the purposes or length of
time for which a license fee or tax, or a portion thereof, authorized by RCW
82.36.440 or 82.38.280 will be imposed. If the legislative authority
determines that a license fee or tax upon the business of making retail sales
of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel, or a portion thereof, shall be
authorized only to provide funds for a specific transportation project or
projects, the ordinance or resolution authorizing or increasing the rate of a
license fee or tax shall contain, at a minimum:

(1)
A description of the transportation project or projects proposed for funding,
properly identified by mileposts or other designations that specify the project
parameters; and

(2)
The proposed number of months or years expected to be necessary to fund the
city's or town's share of the project costs.

If
a limited purpose was specified in an ordinance or resolution authorizing the
license fee or tax, or portion thereof, the city or town legislative authority
must certify the completion of payment when the costs of each specific project
for which the license fee or tax was authorized have been fully paid, including
the retirement of any debt issued for the project. Upon certification of
completion of payment for all the projects, the license fee or tax upon the
business of making retail sales of motor vehicle fuel or special fuel, or
portion thereof, authorized to pay for the projects shall cease.

Sec.
15. RCW
82.80.010 and 1998 c 176 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the conditions of this section, any county may levy, by approval of
its legislative body and a majority of the registered voters of the county
voting on the proposition at a general or special election, additional excise
taxes equal to ((ten)) twenty percent of the state-wide motor
vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 on each gallon of motor vehicle fuel
as defined in RCW 82.36.010 and on each gallon of special fuel as defined in
RCW 82.38.020 sold within the boundaries of the county. Vehicles paying an
annual license fee under RCW 82.38.075 are exempt from the county fuel excise
tax. An election held under this section must be held not more than twelve
months before the date on which the proposed tax is to be levied. The ballot
setting forth the proposition shall state the tax rate that is proposed. The
county's authority to levy additional excise taxes under this section includes
the incorporated and unincorporated areas of the county. The additional excise
taxes are subject to the same exceptions and rights of refund as applicable to
other motor vehicle fuel and special fuel excise taxes levied under chapters
82.36 and 82.38 RCW. The proposed tax shall not be levied less than one month
from the date the election results are certified by the county election
officer. The commencement date for the levy of any tax under this section
shall be the first day of January, April, July, or October.

(2)
Every person subject to the tax shall pay, in addition to any other taxes
provided by law, an additional excise tax to the director of licensing at the
rate levied by a county exercising its authority under this section.

(3)
The state treasurer shall distribute monthly to the levying county and cities
contained therein the proceeds of the additional excise taxes collected under
this section, after the deductions for payments and expenditures as provided in
RCW 46.68.090 (1) and (2) and under the conditions and limitations provided in
RCW 82.80.080.

(4)
The proceeds of the additional excise taxes levied under this section shall be
used strictly for transportation purposes in accordance with RCW 82.80.070.

(5)
The department of licensing shall administer and collect the county fuel
taxes. The department shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, for administrative, collection, refund, and audit expenses incurred.
The remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer
for monthly distribution under RCW 82.80.080.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 4 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

---
END ---