BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.62.035 and 1997 c 429 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of financial management shall determine the population of each county of
the state annually as of April 1st of each year and on or before July 1st of
each year shall file a certificate with the secretary of state showing its
determination of the population for each county. The office of financial
management also shall determine the percentage increase in population for each
county over the preceding ten-year period, as of April 1st, and shall file a
certificate with the secretary of state by July 1st showing its determination.
At least once every five years or upon the availability of decennial census
data, whichever is later, the office of financial management shall prepare
twenty-year growth management planning population projections required by RCW
36.70A.110 for each county that adopts a comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040
and shall review these projections with such counties and the cities in those
counties before final adoption. The county and its cities may provide to the
office such information as they deem relevant to the office's projection, and
the office shall consider and comment on such information before adoption.
Each projection shall be expressed as a reasonable range developed within the
standard state high and low projection. The middle range shall represent the
office's estimate of the most likely population projection for the county. If
any city or county believes that a projection will not accurately reflect
actual population growth in a county, it may petition the office to revise the
projection accordingly. The office shall revise the projection if the
projection does not reflect information regarding adequate domestic water
supply as provided in RCW 36.70A.210(3)(h). The office shall complete the
first set of ranges for every county by December 31, 1995.

A
comprehensive plan adopted or amended before December 31, 1995, shall not be
considered to be in noncompliance with the twenty-year growth management
planning population projection if the projection used in the comprehensive plan
is in compliance with the range later adopted under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that counties are regional governments within their
boundaries, and cities are primary providers of urban governmental services
within urban growth areas. For the purposes of this section, a
"county-wide planning policy" is a written policy statement or
statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which
county and city comprehensive plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this
chapter. This framework shall ensure that city and county comprehensive plans
are consistent as required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to alter the land-use powers of cities.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in
whole or in part within the county as follows:

(a)
No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority
of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with representatives of each city located
within the county for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that
will provide a framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In
other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county
adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial
management.

(b)
The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide planning policy
specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner in which the
county and the cities agree to all procedures and provisions including but not
limited to desired planning policies, deadlines, ratification of final
agreements and demonstration thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities
associated therewith.

(c)
If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of
cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately
impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d)
If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no
agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management
in any other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or
reasons for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate,
the governor may immediately request the assistance of the department of
community, trade, and economic development to mediate any disputes that
preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes
that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions from
those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or cities for failure
to reach an agreement as provided in this section. The governor shall specify
the reason or reasons for the imposition of any sanction.

(e)
No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later
than fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management the county
legislative authority of any other county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to
the process provided under this section and that is consistent with the
agreement pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public
hearing or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.

(3)
A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a)
Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of
urban services to such development;

(c)
Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide or state-wide
nature, including transportation facilities of state-wide significance as
defined in RCW 47.06.140;

(d)
Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e)
Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all
economic segments of the population and parameters for its distribution;

(f)
Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g)
Policies for county-wide economic development and employment; ((and))

(h)
Policies that consider the present and future availability of adequate
domestic water supplies and that provide, where applicable, for a collaborative
process with special purpose districts that provide domestic water services;
and

(i)
An analysis of the fiscal impact.

(4)
Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the
county-wide planning policy adoption process. Adopted county-wide planning
policies shall be adhered to by state agencies.

(5)
Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the requirements of
this section may result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a
county or city within the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing
a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to
adopt a county-wide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or
sanctions are fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a
county-wide planning policy.

(6)
Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide planning policy to
the growth management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the
county-wide planning policy.

(7) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with
contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties, according to the
process established under this section or other processes agreed to among the
counties and cities within the affected counties throughout the multicounty
region.

---
END ---