BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.47.010 and 1993 c 492 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
A significant percentage of the population of this state does not have
reasonably available insurance or other coverage of the costs of necessary
basic health care services;

(b)
This lack of basic health care coverage is detrimental to the health of the
individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare, and results in
substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial health care, often at the
expense of health care providers, health care facilities, and all purchasers of
health care, including the state; and

(c)
The use of managed health care systems has significant potential to reduce the
growth of health care costs incurred by the people of this state generally, and
by low-income pregnant women, and at-risk children and adolescents who need
greater access to managed health care.

(2)
The purpose of this chapter is to provide or make more readily available
necessary basic health care services in an appropriate setting to working
persons and others who lack coverage, at a cost to these persons that does not
create barriers to the utilization of necessary health care services. To that
end, this chapter establishes a program to be made available to those residents
not eligible for medicare who share in a portion of the cost or who pay the
full cost of receiving basic health care services from a managed health care
system.

(3)
It is not the intent of this chapter to provide health care services for those
persons who are presently covered through private employer-based health plans,
nor to replace employer-based health plans. However, the legislature
recognizes that cost-effective and affordable health plans may not always be
available to small business employers. Further, it is the intent of the
legislature to expand, wherever possible, the availability of private health
care coverage and to discourage the decline of employer-based coverage.

(4)(a)
It is the purpose of this chapter to acknowledge the initial success of this
program that has (i) assisted thousands of families in their search for
affordable health care; (ii) demonstrated that low-income, uninsured families
are willing to pay for their own health care coverage to the extent of their
ability to pay; and (iii) proved that local health care providers are willing
to enter into a public-private partnership as a managed care system.

(b)
As a consequence, the legislature intends to extend an option to enroll to
certain citizens above two hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines
within the state who reside in communities where the plan is operational and
who collectively or individually wish to exercise the opportunity to purchase
health care coverage through the basic health plan if the purchase is done at
no cost to the state. It is also the intent of the legislature to allow
employers and other financial sponsors to financially assist such individuals
to purchase health care through the program so long as such purchase does not
result in a lower standard of coverage for employees.

(c)
The legislature intends that, to the extent of available funds, the program be
available throughout Washington state to subsidized, children's health
initiative, and nonsubsidized enrollees. It is also the intent of the
legislature to enroll subsidized enrollees first, to the maximum extent
feasible.

(d)
The legislature directs that the basic health plan administrator identify
enrollees who are likely to be eligible for medical assistance and assist these
individuals in applying for and receiving medical assistance. The
administrator and the department of social and health services shall implement
a seamless system to coordinate eligibility determinations and benefit coverage
for enrollees of the basic health plan and medical assistance recipients.

(e)
It is the intent of this chapter that the children's health initiative program
provide health care services to children's health initiative enrollees who do
not have access to medical assistance and are not insured at the time of
enrollment.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.47.020 and 1997 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system
of enrollment and payment on a prepaid capitated basis for basic health care
services, administered by the plan administrator through participating managed
health care systems, created by this chapter.

(2)
"Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan administrator,
who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington state health
care authority.

(3)
"Managed health care system" means any health care organization,
including health care providers, insurers, health care service contractors,
health maintenance organizations, or any combination thereof, that provides
directly or by contract basic health care services, as defined by the
administrator and rendered by duly licensed providers, on a prepaid capitated
basis to a defined patient population enrolled in the plan and in the managed
health care system.

(4)
"Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the
individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for
medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator; (c) who is not eligible for the children's health initiative
program; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health
care system participating in the plan; (((d))) (e) whose gross
family income at the time of enrollment does not exceed twice the federal
poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by the
federal department of health and human services; and (((e))) (f)
who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a particular managed
health care system in return for periodic payments to the plan.

(5)
"Children's health initiative enrollee" means a child enrolled in
the children's health initiative program in compliance with P.L. 105-33,
Subtitle J, the state children's health insurance program under Title XXI of
the federal social security act: (a) Who is under the age of nineteen; (b) who
is not eligible for medicare; (c) who is not confined or residing in a
government-operated institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria
adopted by the administrator; (d) who resides in an area of the state served by
a managed health care system participating in the plan; (e) whose gross family
income at the time of enrollment exceeds two hundred percent, but does not
exceed two hundred fifty percent, of the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and
human services; (f) who meets other eligibility requirements as determined by
the administrator; (g) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments to the
plan; and (h) who has a special health care need. Children with special needs
are those who have a chronic health condition that is expected to last at least
one year and have significant sequelae requiring ongoing extensive medical
intervention and extensive family management. Some chronic illnesses are
defining and life long and will require a moderate to high level of indefinite
medical and family management. Examples of these conditions are birth defects
including genetic, congenital, or acquired disorders; developmental
disabilities; and chronic illnesses such as diabetes, sickle cell disease,
cystic fibrosis, muscular dystrophy, and cerebral palsy. Children who have
these disorders, as diagnosed by their primary care or specialty physician,
should be eligible for the Washington state children's health insurance program
with minimal ongoing evaluation. There are other conditions that will be
severe initially but improve over time as a result of appropriate treatment.
These children will require extensive medical services and extensive family
management for a limited time. Examples of these conditions are malignancies,
chronic respiratory disease of prematurity, and severe injuries. Children with
these conditions should be initially eligible for the children's health
insurance program. To continue in the children's health insurance program
eligibility must be reviewed on an annual basis by a physician experienced in
children with special health care needs. Additionally, if appropriate, a
review of family management needs would be conducted by a health/social service
provider experienced in working with families of children with special health
care needs.

(6)
"Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus
the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for
medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator; (c) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic
health care coverage from a particular managed health care system; and (e) who
pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan,
without any subsidy from the plan.

(((6)))
(7) "Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of
periodic payment the administrator makes to a managed health care system on
behalf of a subsidized or children's health initiative enrollee plus the
administrative cost to the plan of providing the plan to that subsidized or children's
health initiative enrollee, and the amount determined to be the subsidized or
children's health initiative enrollee's responsibility under RCW
70.47.060(2).

(((7)))
(8) "Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross family
income which an individual, their employer or another financial sponsor makes
to the plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized ((enrollee
or a)), children's health initiative, or nonsubsidized enrollee.

(((8)))
(9) "Rate" means the per capita amount, negotiated by the
administrator with and paid to a participating managed health care system, that
is based upon the enrollment of subsidized, children's health initiative,
and nonsubsidized enrollees in the plan and in that system.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.47.030 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 913 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in the state
treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this program shall be
deposited in the basic health plan trust account and may be expended without
further appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used exclusively for the
purposes of this chapter, including payments to participating managed health
care systems on behalf of enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of
administering the plan.

During
the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the basic
health plan trust account to the state general fund.

(2)
The basic health plan subscription account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or on behalf of
nonsubsidized enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
nonsubsidized enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the
plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW,
but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

(3)
The administrator shall take every precaution to see that none of the funds in
the separate accounts created in this section or that any premiums paid either
by subsidized, children's health initiative, or nonsubsidized enrollees
are commingled in any way, except that the administrator may combine funds
designated for administration of the plan into a single administrative account.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.47.060 and 1998 c 314 s 17 and 1998 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
administrator has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care
services, including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital
services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be
necessary for basic health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that funds are available, offer as basic health plan services chemical
dependency services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services shall
increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by more than
five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management. All subsidized, children's health initiative, and
nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed health care system under
the Washington basic health plan shall be entitled to receive covered basic health
care services in return for premium payments to the plan. The schedule of
services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health care and shall
include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care.
However, with respect to coverage for groups of subsidized enrollees who are
eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through the medical
assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not
contract for such services except to the extent that such services are
necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to maintain continuity
of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care provider. The
schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule of basic health
care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger, for those
subsidized, children's health initiative, or nonsubsidized enrollees who
choose to secure basic coverage through the plan only for their dependent
children. In designing and revising the schedule of services, the
administrator shall consider the guidelines for assessing health services under
the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as the
administrator deems appropriate. Consistent with RCW 70.47.010(4)(e), the
administrator shall design the children's health initiative program with
benefit structures that comply with P.L. 105-33, Subtitle J, the state
children's health insurance program under Title XXI of the federal social
security act and that may differ from the benefit structures offered to
subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees.

However,
with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive
prenatal and postnatal services through the medical assistance program under
chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services
except to the extent that the services are necessary over not more than a
one-month period in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of
pregnancy by the managed care provider.

(2)(a)
To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator
from subsidized and children's health initiative enrollees that is based
upon gross family income, giving appropriate consideration to family size and
the ages of all family members. The enrollment of children shall not require
the enrollment of their parent or parents who are eligible for the plan. The
structure of periodic premiums shall be applied to subsidized and children's
health initiative enrollees entering the plan as individuals pursuant to
subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the plan due
from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to subsection
(((10))) (11) of this section.

(b)
To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized
enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the
state for the plan plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(c)
An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of a
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator.

(d)
To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing coverage identical
to the basic health plan, as configured on January 1, 1996, a basic health plan
model plan with uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.

(3)
To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost sharing due a managed
health care system from subsidized, children's health initiative, and
nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure shall discourage inappropriate enrollee
utilization of health care services, and may utilize copayments, deductibles,
and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but shall not be so costly to enrollees as
to constitute a barrier to appropriate utilization of necessary health care
services.

(4)
To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an
overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the
administrator finds that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the
administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger
no longer exists.

(5)
To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized and children's health
initiative enrollees, as defined in RCW 70.47.020. The level of subsidy
provided to persons who qualify may be based on the lowest cost plans, as
defined by the administrator.

(6)
To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery of services and
availability of the plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations
contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7)
To solicit and accept applications from managed health care systems, as defined
in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under
the plan. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health
care services are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection
of two or more participating managed health care systems. In adopting any
rules or procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make suitable
allowance for the need for health care services and the differences in local
availability of health care resources, along with other resources, within and
among the several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become
eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue to receive
services from their existing providers within the managed health care system if
such providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.

(8)
To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized, children's
health initiative, and nonsubsidized enrollees, deposit them in the basic
health plan operating account, keep records of enrollee status, and authorize
periodic payments to managed health care systems on the basis of the number of
enrollees participating in the respective managed health care systems.

(9)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan,
on behalf of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for
enrollment in the Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale premiums.
Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption support
program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes
of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill the
enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of
up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define
the appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement
the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No
subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110,
who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter
74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the
plan, on behalf of their dependent children, for enrollment as children's
health initiative enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment
periods for enrollees as may be necessary, and to determine, upon application
and on a reasonable schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any
enrollee, eligibility due to current gross family income. No assistance may be
paid with respect to any children's health initiative enrollee whose current
gross family income is less than two hundred percent or greater than two
hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW
70.47.110, who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care services
under chapter 74.09 RCW. If, as a result of an eligibility review, the
administrator determines that a children's health initiative enrollee's gross
family income is greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty
level and that the enrollee knowingly failed to inform the plan of such
increase in income, the administrator may bill the enrollee for the assistance
paid on the enrollee's behalf during the period of time that the enrollee's
gross family income was greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal
poverty level. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent
good cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements
that are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll
in the plan.

(11)
To accept applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their
employees, spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. The administrator may
require all or the substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures necessary to
facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed
health care system. The administrator may require that a business owner pay at
least an amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its
portion of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare
who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care
coverage and services from a managed care system participating in the plan.
The administrator shall adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or
from all such enrollees whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator
with the participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(((11)))
(12) To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed
health care system in return for the provision of covered basic health care
services to enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of covered basic
health care services will be the same for similar enrollees, the rates
negotiated with participating managed health care systems may vary among the
systems. In negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator
shall consider the characteristics of the populations served by the respective
systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve the
resources of the basic health plan trust account, and other factors the
administrator finds relevant.

(((12)))
(13) To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by
participating managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee access to
good quality basic health care, to require periodic data reports concerning the
utilization of health care services rendered to enrollees in order to provide
adequate information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of
participating managed health care systems to assure compliance with the
purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed
health care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care
systems and to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and
the department of health, to minimize duplication of effort.

(((13)))
(14) To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based
health care coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and
federal statutes that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the
state.

(((14)))
(15) To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and to
integrate it into the plan wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(((15)))
(16) To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for rural
residents, underserved populations, and persons of color.

(((16))) (17) In consultation with appropriate state
and local government agencies, to establish criteria defining eligibility for
persons confined or residing in government-operated institutions.

---
END ---