BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act shall be known as the shared parental responsibility act.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.09.004 and 1987 c 460 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Temporary parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the child
pending final resolution of any action for dissolution of marriage, declaration
of invalidity, or legal separation which is incorporated in a temporary order.

(2)
"Permanent parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the child,
including allocation of parenting functions, which plan is incorporated in any
final decree or decree of modification in an action for dissolution of
marriage, declaration of invalidity, or legal separation.

(3)
"Parenting functions" means those aspects of the parent-child
relationship in which the parent makes decisions and performs functions
necessary for the care and growth of the child. Parenting functions include:

(a)
Maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing relationship with the
child;

(b)
Attending to the daily needs of the child, such as feeding, clothing, physical
care and grooming, supervision, health care, and day care, and engaging in
other activities which are appropriate to the developmental level of the child
and that are within the social and economic circumstances of the particular
family;

(c)
Attending to adequate education for the child, including remedial or other
education essential to the best interests of the child;

(d)
Assisting the child in developing and maintaining appropriate interpersonal
relationships;

(e)
Exercising appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare, consistent with
the child's developmental level and the family's social and economic
circumstances; and

(f)
Providing for the financial support of the child.

(4)
"Shared parental responsibility" means shared residential placement
and mutual decision-making authority.

(5)
"Shared residential placement" means an order awarding each of the
parents significant periods of time, in which a child resides with or is under
the care and supervision of each of the parents so as to assure the child
frequent and continuing contact with both parents. "Shared residential
placement" does not necessarily mean the child's time with each parent
should be exactly the same in length nor does it necessarily mean the child
must alternate his or her residence between the households of the parents for
brief and substantially equal intervals of time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, absent a preponderance of
the evidence to the contrary, there is a presumption that shared parental
responsibility is in the best interests of a minor child or children.

(2)
There shall not be a presumption that shared parental responsibility is in the
best interest of the minor child or children when:

(a)
The parents have agreed to an award of residential placement or decision-making
authority to only one parent; or

(b)
The court finds that shared parental responsibility would be detrimental to the
child or children; or

(c)
One of the parents is found by the court to have a history of acts of domestic
violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010.

(3)
If the court declines to enter a shared parental responsibility order, the
court shall enter findings of fact and conclusions of law stating the reasons
for declining to enter a shared parental responsibility order.

Sec.
4. RCW
26.09.187 and 1989 c 375 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS. The court shall not order a dispute resolution
process, except court action, when it finds that any limiting factor under RCW
26.09.191 applies, or when it finds that either parent is unable to afford the
cost of the proposed dispute resolution process. If a dispute resolution
process is not precluded or limited, then in designating such a process the
court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

(a)
Differences between the parents that would substantially inhibit their
effective participation in any designated process;

(b)
The parents' wishes or agreements and, if the parents have entered into
agreements, whether the agreements were made knowingly and voluntarily; and

(c)
Differences in the parents' financial circumstances that may affect their
ability to participate fully in a given dispute resolution process.

(2)
ALLOCATION OF DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY.

(a)
AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES. The court shall approve agreements of the
parties allocating decision-making authority, or specifying rules in the areas
listed in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a), when it finds that:

(i)
The agreement is consistent with any limitations on a parent's decision-making
authority mandated by RCW 26.09.191; and

(ii)
The agreement is knowing and voluntary.

(b)
SOLE DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. The court shall order sole decision-making to
one parent when it finds that:

(i)
A limitation on the other parent's decision-making authority is mandated by RCW
26.09.191;

(ii)
Both parents are opposed to mutual decision making;

(iii)
One parent is opposed to mutual decision making, and such opposition is
reasonable based on the criteria in (c) of this subsection;

(c)
MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. Except as provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the court shall consider the following criteria in allocating
decision-making authority:

(i)
The existence of a limitation under RCW 26.09.191;

(ii)
The history of participation of each parent in decision making in each of the
areas in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a);

(iii)
Whether the parents have a demonstrated ability and desire to cooperate with
one another in decision making in each of the areas in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a); and

(iv)
The parents' geographic proximity to one another, to the extent that it affects
their ability to make timely mutual decisions.

(3)
RESIDENTIAL PROVISIONS.

(a)
The court shall make residential provisions for each child which encourage each
parent to maintain a loving, stable, and nurturing relationship with the child,
consistent with the child's developmental level and the family's social and
economic circumstances. The child's residential schedule shall be consistent
with RCW 26.09.191. There is a presumption that the child's residential
schedule shall provide shared parental responsibility in accordance with
section 3 of this act. Where the limitations of RCW 26.09.191 ((are not
dispositive of the child's residential schedule)) do not apply, the
court shall consider the following factors:

(i)
The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's relationship with
each parent, including whether a parent has taken greater responsibility for
performing parenting functions relating to the daily needs of the child;

(ii)
The agreements of the parties, provided they were entered into knowingly and
voluntarily;

(iii)
Each parent's past and potential for future performance of parenting functions;

(iv)
The emotional needs and developmental level of the child;

(v)
The child's relationship with siblings and with other significant adults, as
well as the child's involvement with his or her physical surroundings, school,
or other significant activities;

(vi)
The wishes of the parents and the wishes of a child who is sufficiently mature
to express reasoned and independent preferences as to his or her residential
schedule; and

(vii)
Each parent's employment schedule, and shall make accommodations consistent
with those schedules.

Factor
(i) shall be given the greatest weight.

(b)
The court may order that a child frequently alternate his or her residence
between the households of the parents for brief and substantially equal
intervals of time only if the court finds the following:

(i)
No limitation exists under RCW 26.09.191;

(ii)(A)
The parties have agreed to such provisions and the agreement was knowingly and
voluntarily entered into; or

(B)
The parties have a satisfactory history of cooperation and shared performance
of parenting functions; the parties are available to each other, especially in
geographic proximity, to the extent necessary to ensure their ability to share
performance of the parenting functions; and

(iii)
The provisions are in the best interests of the child.

Sec.
5. RCW
26.09.170 and 1997 c 58 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of RCW 26.09.070, the provisions
of any decree respecting maintenance or support may be modified: (a) Only as
to installments accruing subsequent to the petition for modification or motion
for adjustment except motions to compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall
be effective as of the first date specified in the decree for implementing the
adjustment; and, (b) except as otherwise provided in subsections (4), (5), (8),
and (9) of this section, only upon a showing of a substantial change of
circumstances. The provisions as to property disposition may not be revoked or
modified, unless the court finds the existence of conditions that justify the
reopening of a judgment under the laws of this state.

(2)
Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree the
obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the death of either
party or the remarriage of the party receiving maintenance.

(3)
Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree,
provisions for the support of a child are terminated by emancipation of the
child or by the death of the parent obligated to support the child.

(4)
An order of child support may be modified one year or more after it has been
entered without showing a substantial change of circumstances:

(a)
If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on either party or
the child;

(b)
If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support which was based
on guidelines which determined the amount of support according to the child's
age, and the child is no longer in the age category on which the current
support amount was based;

(c)
If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there is a need to
extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete high school; or

(d)
To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent with RCW
26.09.100.

(5)
An order or decree entered prior to June 7, 1984, may be modified without
showing a substantial change of circumstances if the requested modification is
to:

(a)
Require health insurance coverage for a child named therein; or

(b)
Modify an existing order for health insurance coverage.

(6)
An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment, by itself, is
not a substantial change of circumstances.

(7)
The department of social and health services may file an action to modify an
order of child support if public assistance money is being paid to or for the
benefit of the child and the child support order is twenty-five percent or more
below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard calculation
as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and reasons for the deviation are not set forth in
the findings of fact or order. The determination of twenty-five percent or
more shall be based on the current income of the parties and the department
shall not be required to show a substantial change of circumstances if the
reasons for the deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or order.

(8)(a)
All child support decrees may be adjusted once every twenty-four months based
upon changes in the income of the parents without a showing of substantially
changed circumstances. Either party may initiate the adjustment by filing a
motion and child support worksheets.

(b)
A party may petition for modification in cases of substantially changed
circumstances under subsection (1) of this section at any time. However, if
relief is granted under subsection (1) of this section, twenty-four months must
pass before a motion for an adjustment under (a) of this subsection may be
filed.

(c)
If, pursuant to (a) of this subsection or subsection (9) of this section, the
court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation by more than thirty
percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the court may
implement the change in two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of
the order and the second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four
months must pass following the second change before a motion for an adjustment
under (a) of this subsection may be filed.

(d)
A parent who is receiving transfer payments who receives a wage or salary
increase may not bring a modification action pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section alleging that increase constitutes a substantial change of
circumstances.

(e)
The department of social and health services may file an action at any time to
modify an order of child support in cases of substantially changed
circumstances if public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of
the child. The determination of the existence of substantially changed
circumstances by the department that lead to the filing of an action to modify
the order of child support is not binding upon the court.

(9)
An order of child support may be adjusted twenty-four months from the date of
the entry of the decree or the last adjustment or modification, whichever is
later, based upon changes in the economic table or standards in chapter 26.19
RCW.

(10) A "substantial change in circumstances" includes
but is not limited to a parent's failure to exercise his or her residential
time under an order awarding shared residential placement, as defined in RCW
26.09.004(5), that results in a substantial increase in expenses to the other
parent.

---
END ---