BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Local telephone directory" means a publication listing telephone
numbers for various businesses in a certain geographic area and distributed
free of charge to some or all telephone subscribers in that area.

(2)
"Local telephone number" means a telephone number that can be dialed
without incurring long distance charges from telephones located within the area
covered by the local telephone directory in which the number is listed. The
term does not include long distance numbers, toll-free numbers, or 900 exchange
numbers listed in a local telephone directory.

(3)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability
partnership, corporation, or limited liability corporation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. No
person engaged in the selling, delivery, or solicitation of cut flowers, flower
arrangements, or floral products may misrepresent his, her, or its geographic
location by:

(1)
Listing a local telephone number in a local telephone directory if:

(a)
Calls to the telephone number are routinely forwarded or otherwise transferred
to a business location that is outside the calling area covered by the local
telephone directory; and

(b)
The listing fails to conspicuously disclose the locality and state in which the
business is located; or

(2)
Listing a business name in a local telephone directory if:

(a)
The name misrepresents the business's geographic location; and

(b)
The listing fails to disclose the locality and state in which the business is
located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this chapter are not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A
violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce
and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---