BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a perceived growth in the number of chemically
related illnesses and injuries suffered by workers and in the number of workers
with multiple chemical sensitivities created by work-related exposures; that
statistics kept by the department of labor and industries indicate that a
significant number of chemically related illness and injury claims are being
denied by the department and self-insured employers; that the very existence of
multiple chemical sensitivities as a workplace-related illness is being denied;
and that a significant number of injured workers with a chemically related
illness or injury is suffering physically, psychologically, and financially
from the failure of the industrial insurance system to cover their work-related
injury or illness.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
study shall be conducted of industrial insurance claims filed by workers who
have suffered chemically related illnesses or injuries during the period from
January 1, 1995, through December 31, 1998. At a minimum, the study shall
review:

(a)
The nature and severity of the illnesses or injuries reported in these
industrial insurance claims;

(b)
The disposition of these industrial insurance claims by the department of labor
and industries or self-insured employers;

(c)
The degree to which the lives of these claimants have changed from the time of
exposure to the time of the study, including physical and financial condition,
and the degree to which the change, if any, can be attributed to the chemical
exposure;

(d)
The extent to which the chemically related injury center of excellence at
Harborview medical center was used to guide adjudication of these claims; and

(e)
Recommendations for any changes that may be needed in the way the industrial
insurance system deals with chemically related illnesses and injuries.

(2)
The department must contract with an outside entity to conduct the study. The
contractor shall be selected by the director of the department of labor and
industries and two members of the workers' compensation advisory committee who
are designated for that purpose by the committee. The study shall be funded
within legislative appropriations from the medical aid fund, with self-insured
employers and the state fund each paying a pro rata share, based on the number
of worker hours, of the authorized expenditures.

(3) An interim report on the findings and recommendations of the
study must be provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December
31, 1999, and a final report by December 1, 2000.

---
END ---