BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In computing tax there may be deducted from the measure of tax by those engaged
in banking, loan, security, or other financial businesses, amounts derived as
interest on loans to small businesses located in a community empowerment zone.

(2)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Small business" means a sole proprietorship, limited liability
company, partnership, or corporation that is subject to taxation under this
chapter and that employs less than twenty-five employees.

(b) "Community empowerment zone" means an area designated
by the department of community, trade, and economic development under RCW
43.63A.700.

---
END ---