BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a need to increase economic opportunity in
economically distressed communities. The legislature further finds that
efforts to increase economic opportunity for residents of economically
distressed communities must involve a collaborative effort between community
and business development agencies, individual businesses, financial
institutions, public sector agencies, institutions of higher education, and
community residents. It is the intent of the legislature to support
institutions of higher education in the establishment of collaborative efforts
to provide technical assistance designed to increase economic opportunities for
residents of economically distressed communities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
There is established a joint pilot project, between the University of
Washington's business and economic development program and Washington State
University's small business development center, designed to provide technical
assistance to small business in economically distressed communities.

(2)
The purposes of the project are to:

(a)
Increase technical assistance to small businesses in both urban and rural
communities of the state;

(b)
Provide additional opportunities for students participating in the project to
apply educational learning while assisting small businesses;

(c)
Identify key predictors of success for businesses in economically distressed
communities; and

(d)
Develop models that can be replicated in other areas of the state to assist
small businesses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter, the value of a
contribution to a qualified institution of higher education for the purpose of
increasing business and economic development opportunities for residents in
distressed areas, for a business subject to taxation under this chapter.

(2)
The credit allowed under this section is limited to an amount equal to one
hundred percent of the value of the contribution. The total credits allowed
under this section shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars per calendar
year.

(3)
Prior to claiming the credit under this section, the business must obtain
approval of the proposed contribution from the qualified institution of higher
education and the department of revenue. The request of the business for
approval must include a description of the proposed contribution and an
estimate of the value of the proposed contribution.

(4)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Contribution" means either cash or other in-kind contributions or both.

(b)
"Qualified institution of higher education" means the University of
Washington or Washington State University.

(5)
This section shall expire on December 31, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the University of Washington for the purposes of section 2 of this act. No
portion of the appropriation under this section shall be used to pay indirect
costs of the University of Washington or Washington State University.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the University of Washington for the purposes of section 2 of this act. No
portion of the appropriation under this section shall be used to pay indirect
costs of the University of Washington or Washington State University.

---
END ---