BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall establish the Washington jobs initiative program. The
department shall provide grants to local governments for the purpose of
creating local programs designed to achieve livable wage jobs and promote
retention and upward mobility for low-income job seekers by supplying regional
employers with qualified workers and by working on job and job-related system
improvements.

(2)
Grants awarded under this section shall be used to develop strategies that:

(a)
Assist unemployed and underemployed residents to obtain livable wage jobs in
targeted sectors in the regional economy;

(b)
Help low-income residents access job opportunities with businesses that benefit
local government-led economic development efforts by establishing first-source
and voluntary hiring agreements with those businesses;

(c)
Create pathways to employment that are longer term and more intensive for
residents that are harder to serve due to chronic unemployment or lack of work
experience; and

(d)
Coordinate services of the public and private sector and community
organizations to provide outreach, recruitment, and job readiness services to
low-income job seekers.

(3)
The department shall develop, by rule, guidelines regarding the amount of funds
awarded to local governments, performance evaluation standards, and other
guidelines the department deems necessary for the administration of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes
of section 1 of this act.

(2) The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

---
END ---