BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
There are geographic areas within communities that are characterized by a lack
of employment opportunities, an average income level that is below the median
income level for the surrounding community, a lack of affordable housing,
deteriorating infrastructure, and a lack of facilities for community services,
job training, and education;

(b)
Strategies to encourage reinvestment in these areas by assisting local
businesses to become stronger and area residents to gain economic power involve
a variety of activities and partnerships;

(c)
Reinvestment in these areas cannot be accomplished with only governmental
resources and require a comprehensive approach that integrates various incentives,
programs, and initiatives to meet the economic, physical, and social needs of
the area;

(d)
Successful reinvestment depends on a local government's ability to coordinate
public resources in a cohesive, comprehensive strategy that is designed to
leverage long-term private investment in an area;

(e)
Reinvestment can strengthen the overall tax base through increased tax revenue
from expanded and new business activities and physical property improvement;

(f)
Local governments, in cooperation with area residents, can provide leadership
as well as planning and coordination of resources and necessary supportive
services to address reinvestment in the area; and

(g)
It is in the public interest to adopt a targeted approach to revitalization and
enlist the resources of all levels of government, the private sector,
community-based organizations, and community residents to revitalize an area.

(2)
The legislature declares that the purposes of the community empowerment zone
act are to:

(a)
Encourage reinvestment through strong partnerships and cooperation between all
levels of government, community-based organizations, area residents, and the
private sector;

(b)
Involve the private sector and stimulate private reinvestment through the
judicious use of public resources;

(c)
Target governmental resources to those areas of greatest need; and

(d)
Include all levels of government, community individuals, organizations, and the
private sector in the policy-making process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Area" means a geographic area within a local government that is
described by a close perimeter boundary.

(2)
"Community empowerment zone" means an area meeting the requirements
of RCW 43.63A.700 (as recodified by this act) and officially designated by the
director.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(5)
"Local government" means a city, code city, town, or county.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.63A.700 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department, in cooperation with the department of revenue, the employment
security department, and the office of financial management, ((shall)) may
approve applications submitted by local governments for an area's
designation as a community empowerment zone under this ((section)) chapter.
The application for designation shall be in the form and manner and
contain such information as the department may prescribe, provided that the
application ((for designation)) shall:

(a)
Contain information sufficient for the director to determine if the criteria
established in RCW 43.63A.710 (as recodified by this act) have been
met((.));

(b)
Be submitted on behalf of the local government by its chief elected official,
or, if none, by the governing body of the local government((.));

(c)
Contain a five-year community empowerment plan that ((describes the proposed
designated community empowerment zone's community development needs and present
a strategy for meeting those needs. The plan shall address the following
categories: Housing needs; public infrastructure needs, such as
transportation, water, sanitation, energy, and drainage/flood control; other
public facilities needs, such as neighborhood facilities or facilities for
provision of health, education, recreation, public safety, or other services;
community economic development needs, such as commercial/industrial
revitalization, job creation and retention considering the unemployment and
underemployment of area residents, accessibility to financial resources by area
residents and businesses, investment within the area, or other related
components of community economic development; and social service needs.

The
local government is required to provide a description of its strategy for
meeting the needs identified in this subsection (1)(c). As part of the
strategy, the local government is required to identify the needs for which
specific plans are currently in place and the source of funds expected to be
used. For the balance of the area's needs, the local government must identify
the source of funds expected to become available during the next two-year
period and actions the local government will take to acquire those funds.)) meets
the requirements of section 5 of this act; and

(d)
Certify that ((neighborhood)) area residents were given the
opportunity to participate in the development of the five-year community
empowerment strategy required under (((c) of this subsection)) section
5 of this act.

(2)
No local government shall submit more than two ((neighborhoods)) areas
to the department for possible designation as a ((designated)) community
empowerment zone under this ((section)) chapter.

(3)(a)(i)
Within ninety days after January 1, 1994, the director may designate up to six
((designated)) community empowerment zones from among the applications
((eligible)) submitted for designation as a ((designated))
community empowerment zone.

(ii)
After July 1, 1999, the director may designate up to an additional three
community empowerment zones from the applications submitted for designation as
a community empowerment zone. The director shall designate at least one of the
community empowerment zones in a county that is (A) located east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains; and (B) classified as a metropolitan statistical
area, as determined by the office of financial management.

(b)
The director shall make determinations of ((designated)) designation
as community empowerment zones on the basis of the following factors:

(i)
The strength and quality of the local government commitments to meet the needs
identified in the five-year community empowerment plan required under ((this))
section 5 of this act.

(ii)
The level of private ((commitments by private entities)) sector
commitment of additional resources and contributions to the ((designated
community empowerment zone)) area.

(iii)
The potential for revitalization of the area as a result of designation as a ((designated))
community empowerment zone.

(iv)
Other factors the director deems necessary.

(c)
The determination of the director as to the areas designated as community
empowerment zones shall be final.

(4)
Except as provided in section 6 of this act, an area that was designated a
community empowerment zone before January 1, 1996, under this section,
automatically and without additional action by the local government continues
its designation under this chapter.

(5)
The department may not designate additional community empowerment zones after
January 1, 2001, but may amend or rescind designations of community empowerment
zones in accordance with section 6 of this act.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.63A.710 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director may not designate an area as a ((designated)) community
empowerment zone unless that area meets the following requirements:

(a)
The area must be designated by the legislative authority of the local
government as an area to receive federal, state, and local assistance designed
to increase economic, physical, or social activity in the area;

(b)
The area must have at least fifty-one percent of the households in the area
with incomes at or below eighty percent of the county's median income, adjusted
for household size;

(c)
The average unemployment rate for the area, for the most recent twelve-month
period for which data is available must be at least one hundred twenty percent
of the average unemployment rate of the county; and

(d)
A five-year community empowerment plan for the area that meets the requirements
of ((RCW 43.63A.700(1)(c) and as further defined by the director)) section
5 of this act must be adopted.

(2)
The director may establish, by rule, such other requirements as the director
may reasonably determine necessary and appropriate to assure that the purposes
of this ((section)) chapter are satisfied.

(3)
In determining if an area meets the requirements of this section, the director
may consider data provided by the United States bureau of the census from the
most recent census or any other reliable data that the director determines to
be acceptable for the purposes for which the data is used.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The five-year community empowerment plan required under RCW 43.63A.700 (as
recodified by this act) shall contain information that describes the community
development needs of the proposed community empowerment zone and present a
strategy for meeting those needs. The plan shall address the following
categories:

(a)
Housing needs for all economic segments of the proposed community empowerment
zone;

(b)
Public infrastructure needs, such as transportation, water, sanitation, energy,
and drainage and flood control;

(c)
Other public facilities needs, such as neighborhood facilities or facilities
for provision of health, education, recreation, public safety, and other
services;

(d)
Community economic development needs, such as commercial and industrial
revitalization, job creation and retention considering the unemployment and
underemployment of area residents, accessibility to financial resources by area
residents and businesses, investment within the area, and other related
components of community economic development; and

(e)
Social service needs of residents in the proposed community empowerment zone.

(2)
The local government must provide a description of its strategy for meeting the
needs identified in subsection (1) of this section. As part of the community
empowerment zone strategy, the local government must identify the needs for
which specific plans are currently in place and the source of funds expected to
be used. For the balance of the area's needs, the local government must
identify the source of funds expected to become available during the next
two-year period and actions the local government will take to acquire those
funds.

(3)
The local government must submit an annual progress report, to the department,
that details the extent to which the local government is working to meet the
needs identified in the five-year community empowerment plan. If applicable,
the progress report shall also contain a discussion on the impediments to
meeting the needs outlined in the five-year community empowerment plan. The
department shall determine the date the annual progress reports are due from
each local government.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The terms or conditions of a community empowerment zone approved under this
chapter may be amended to:

(a)
Alter the boundaries of the community empowerment zone; or

(b)
Terminate the designation of a community empowerment zone.

(2)(a)
A request for an amendment under subsection (1)(a) of this section may not be
in effect until the department issues an amended designation for the community
empowerment zone that approves the requested amendment. The local government
must promptly file with the department a request for approval that contains
information the department deems necessary to evaluate the proposed changes and
its impact on the area's designation as a community empowerment zone under RCW
43.63A.710 (as recodified by this act). The local government must hold at
least two public hearings on the proposed changes and include the information
in its request for an amendment to its community empowerment zone.

(b)
The department shall approve or disapprove a proposed amendment to a community
empowerment zone within sixty days of its receipt of a request under subsection
(1)(a) of this section. The department may not approve changes in a community
empowerment zone that are not in conformity with this chapter.

(3)(a)
The termination of an area's designation as a community empowerment zone under
subsection (1)(b) of this section is not effective until the department issues
a finding stating the reasons for the termination. The local government may
file an appeal to the department's findings within sixty days of the notice to
terminate the area's designation. The department shall notify the local
government of the results within thirty days of the filing of the appeal.

(b)
A termination of an area's designation as a community empowerment zone shall
have no effect on benefits previously extended to individual businesses. The
local government may not commit benefits to a business after the effective date
of the termination of an area's designation as a community empowerment zone.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department shall administer this chapter and has the following powers and
duties:

(1)
To monitor the implementation of chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this
act) and submit reports evaluating the effectiveness of the program and any
suggestions for legislative changes to the governor and legislature by December
1, 1999, and every December 1st thereafter;

(2)
To prepare and submit an annual report to the legislature on the progress of
the areas designated as community empowerment zones under this chapter;

(3)
To provide information and appropriate assistance to persons desiring to locate
and operate a business in a community empowerment zone;

(4)
To assist local governments in obtaining federal designation as either an
empowerment zone or enterprise community;

(5)
To work with appropriate state agencies and the department to coordinate the
delivery of programs, including but not limited to housing, community and
economic development, small business assistance, social service, and employment
and training programs which are carried on in a community empowerment zone; and

(6)
To develop rules necessary for the administration of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
administration of a community empowerment zone is under the jurisdiction of the
local government. Each local government shall, by ordinance, designate a
community empowerment zone administrator for the area designated as a community
empowerment zone that is within its jurisdiction. A community empowerment zone
administrator must be an officer or employee of the local government. The
community empowerment zone administrator shall be the liaison between the local
government, the department, the business community, and labor and
community-based organizations within the community empowerment zone.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
chapter may be known and cited as the Washington community empowerment zone
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
Sections 1, 2, and 5 through 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

(2)
RCW 43.63A.700 and 43.63A.710, as amended by this act, are each recodified as
sections in chapter 43.-- RCW (sections 1, 2, and 5 through 9 of this act).

Sec.
11. RCW
82.60.020 and 1996 c 290 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3)
"Eligible area" means: (a) A county in which the average level of
unemployment for the three years before the year in which an application is filed
under this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for those years by
twenty percent; (b) a county that has a median household income that is less
than seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the previous
three years; (c) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the office of
federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of commerce,
in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which an application is filed under this chapter exceeds
the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty percent; (d) a
designated community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.63A.700 or a county
containing such a community empowerment zone; (e) a town with a population of
less than twelve hundred persons in those counties that are not covered under
(a) of this subsection that are timber impact areas as defined in RCW
43.31.601; (f) a county designated by the governor as an eligible area under
RCW 82.60.047; or (g) a county that is contiguous to a county that qualifies as
an eligible area under (a) or (f) of this subsection.

(4)(a)
"Eligible investment project" means:

(i)
An investment project in an eligible area as defined in subsection (3)(a), (b),
(c), (e), or (f) of this section; or

(ii)
That portion of an investment project in an eligible area as defined in
subsection (3)(d) or (g) of this section which is directly utilized to create
at least one new full-time qualified employment position for each three hundred
thousand dollars of investment on which a deferral is requested in an
application approved before July 1, 1994, and for each ((seven)) two
hundred fifty thousand dollars of investment on which a deferral is requested
in an application approved after June 30, 1994.

(b)
The lessor/owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless
the underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests
exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees
to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of
reduced rent payments.

(c)
For purposes of (a)(ii) of this subsection:

(i)
The department shall consider the entire investment project, including any
investment in machinery and equipment that otherwise qualifies for exemption
under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565, for purposes of determining the portion
of the investment project that qualifies for deferral as an eligible investment
project; and

(ii)
The number of new full-time qualified employment positions created by an
investment project shall be deemed to be reduced by the number of full-time
employment positions maintained by the recipient in any other community in this
state that are displaced as a result of the investment project.

(d)
"Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of an
investment project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW
82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to
generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the
cogeneration project is an integral part, or investment projects which have
already received deferrals under this chapter.

(5)
"Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or
qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction of the project.

(6)
"Manufacturing" means all activities of a commercial or industrial
nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to materials so
that as a result thereof a new, different, or useful substance or article of
tangible personal property is produced for sale or commercial or industrial use
and shall include the production or fabrication of specially made or custom
made articles. "Manufacturing" also includes computer programming,
the production of computer software, and other computer-related services, and
the activities performed by research and development laboratories and commercial
testing laboratories.

(7)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(8)
"Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing
floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing and research and
development activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other
facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such facilities
are an essential or an integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory
used for manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used
partly for manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of
the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.

(9)
"Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee
employed in the eligible investment project during the entire tax year.

(10)
"Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial and
research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and
necessary part of a manufacturing or research and development operation.
"Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software;
data processing equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating
structures; and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.

(11)
"Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(12)
"Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or process
before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection,
"commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market
testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or
process do not exceed one million dollars.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---