BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Under the constitutional framework and the laws of the state of Washington, the
governance structure for the state's public common school system is comprised
of the following bodies: The legislature, the governor, the superintendent of
public instruction, the state board of education, the educational service
district boards of directors, and local school district boards of directors.
The respective policy and administrative roles of each body are determined by
the state Constitution and statutes.

(2) Local school
districts are political subdivisions of the state and the organization of such
districts, including the powers, duties, and boundaries thereof, may be altered
or abolished by laws of the state of Washington.

PART
1

PURPOSE AND POLICY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101.
PURPOSE‑-POLICY. (1) It is the purpose of
this chapter to:

(a)
Incorporate into a single, comprehensive, school district organization law all
essential provisions governing:

(i)
The formation and establishment of new school districts;

(ii)
The alteration of the boundaries of existing districts; and

(iii)
The adjustment of the assets and liabilities of school districts when changes
are made under this chapter; and

(b)
Establish methods and procedures whereby changes in the school district system
may be brought about by the people concerned and affected.

(2)
It is the state's policy that decisions on proposed changes in school district
organization should be made, whenever possible, by negotiated agreement between
the affected school districts. If the districts cannot agree, the decision
shall be made by the regional committees on school district organization, based
on the committees' best judgment, taking into consideration the following
factors and factors under section 402 of this act:

(a)
A balance of local petition requests and the needs of the state-wide community
at large in a manner that advances the best interest of public education in the
affected school districts and communities, the educational service district,
and the state;

(b)
Responsibly serving all of the affected citizens and students by contributing
to logical service boundaries and recognizing a changing economic pattern
within the educational service districts of the state;

(c)
Enhancing the educational opportunities of pupils in the territory by reducing
existing disparities among the affected school districts' ability to provide
operating and capital funds through an equitable adjustment of the assets and
liabilities of the affected districts;

(d)
Promoting a wiser use of public funds through improvement in the school
district system of the educational service districts and the state; and

(e)
Other criteria or considerations as may be established in rule by the state
board of education.

(3)
It is neither the intent nor purpose of this chapter to apply to organizational
changes and the procedure therefor relating to capital fund aid by nonhigh
school districts as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW.

PART
2

GENERAL PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201.
REORGANIZATION OF DISTRICTS. (1) A new school district
may be formed comprising contiguous territory lying in either a single county
or in two or more counties. The new district may comprise:

(a)
Two or more whole school districts;

(b)
Parts of two or more school districts; and/or

(c)
Territory that is not a part of any school district if such territory is
contiguous to the district to which it is transferred.

(2)
The boundaries of existing school districts may be altered:

(a)
By the transfer of territory from one district to another district;

(b)
By the consolidation of one or more school districts with one or more school
districts; or

(c)
By the dissolution and annexation to a district of a part or all of one or more
other districts or of territory that is not a part of any school district:
PROVIDED, That such territory shall be contiguous to the district to which it
is transferred or annexed.

(3)
Territory may be transferred or annexed to or consolidated with an existing
school district without regard to county boundaries.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

CLASSIFICATION‑-NUMBERING
SYSTEM‑-CHANGE OF CLASSIFICATION. (1) The superintendent of public
instruction is responsible for the classification and numbering system of
school districts.

(2)
Any school district in the state that has a student enrollment in its public
schools of two thousand pupils or more, as shown by evidence acceptable to the
educational service district superintendent and the superintendent of public
instruction, is a school district of the first class. Any other school
district is a school district of the second class.

(3)
Whenever the educational service district superintendent finds that the
classification of a school district should be changed, and upon the approval of
the superintendent of public instruction, the educational service district
superintendent shall make an order in conformity with his or her findings and
alter the records of his or her office accordingly. Thereafter, the board of
directors of the district shall organize in the manner provided by law for the
organization of the board of a district of the class to which the district then
belongs.

(4)
Notwithstanding any other provision of chapter 43, Laws of 1975, the
educational service district superintendent, with the concurrence of the
superintendent of public instruction, may delay approval of a change in
classification of any school district for a period not exceeding three years
when, in fact, the student enrollment of the district within any such time
period does not exceed ten percent, either in a decrease or increase thereof.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203.
CONFLICTING OR INCORRECTLY DESCRIBED SCHOOL DISTRICT BOUNDARIES‑-CHANGES.
In case the boundaries of any of the school districts are conflicting or
incorrectly described, the educational service district board of directors,
after due notice and a public hearing, shall change, harmonize, and describe
them and shall so certify, with a complete transcript of boundaries of all
districts affected, such action to the state board for its approval or
revision. Upon receipt of notification of state board action, the educational
service district superintendent shall transmit to the county legislative
authority of the county or counties in which the affected districts are located
a complete transcript of the boundaries of all districts affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204.
DISTRICT BOUNDARY CHANGES‑-SUBMISSION TO COUNTY AUDITOR. (1) Any
district boundary changes shall be submitted to the county auditor by the
educational service district superintendent within thirty days after the
changes have been approved in accordance with this chapter. The superintendent
shall submit both legal descriptions and maps.

(2)
Any boundary changes submitted to the county auditor after the fourth Monday in
June of odd-numbered years does not take effect until the following calendar
year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205.
EFFECT OF CHANGES‑-EXISTING PROVISIONS NOT AFFECTED. (1) Any proposed
change in school district organization initiated before the effective date of
this act shall be considered under the laws and rules in effect before the
effective date of this act. This act applies to any proposed change in school
district organization initiated on or after the effective date of this act.

(2)
For purposes of this section, "initiated" means the filing of a
petition, the motion of a school board, or the report of an educational service
district. This section does not preclude the filing of a new petition on or
after the effective date of this act where the same or a similar proposal was
filed before the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206.
PERSONNEL AND SUPPLIES‑-EXPENSES‑-REIMBURSEMENT. (1) The
superintendent of public instruction shall furnish to the state board and to
regional committees the services of employed personnel and the materials and
supplies necessary to enable them to perform the duties imposed upon them by
this chapter and shall reimburse the members thereof for expenses necessarily
incurred by them in the performance of their duties, such reimbursement for
regional committee members to be in accordance with RCW 28A.315.090 (as
recodified by this act), and such reimbursement for state board members to be
in accordance with RCW 28A.305.120.

(2)
Costs that may be incurred by an educational service district in association
with school district negotiations under section 401 of this act and supporting
the regional committee under section 402 of this act shall be reimbursed by the
state from such funds as are appropriated for these purposes.

PART
3

REGIONAL COMMITTEES
ON SCHOOL DISTRICT ORGANIZATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301.
REGIONAL COMMITTEES‑-POWERS AND DUTIES. The powers and duties of each
regional committee are to:

(1)
Hear and approve or disapprove proposals for changes in the organization and
extent of school districts in the educational service districts when a hearing
on a proposal has been requested under section 401 of this act;

(2)
Act on notices and proposals from the educational service district under
section 501 of this act;

(3)
Make an equitable adjustment of the property and other assets and of the liabilities,
including bonded indebtedness and excess tax levies as otherwise authorized
under this section, as to the old school districts and the new district or
districts, if any, involved in or affected by a proposed change in the
organization and extent of the school districts;

(4)
Make an equitable adjustment of the bonded indebtedness outstanding against any
of the old and new districts whenever in its judgment such adjustment is
advisable, as to all of the school districts involved in or affected by any
change heretofore or hereafter effected;

(5)
Provide that territory transferred from a school district by a change in the
organization and extent of school districts shall either remain subject to, or
be relieved of, any one or more excess tax levies that are authorized for the
school district under RCW 84.52.053 before the effective date of the transfer
of territory from the school district;

(6)
Provide that territory transferred to a school district by a change in the
organization and extent of school districts shall either be made subject to, or
be relieved of, any one or more excess tax levies that are authorized for the
school district under RCW 84.52.053 before the effective date of the transfer
of territory to the school district;

(7)
Establish the date by which a committee-approved transfer of territory shall
take effect;

(8)
Hold and keep a record of a public hearing or public hearings (a) on every
proposal for the formation of a new school district or for the transfer from
one existing district to another of any territory in which children of school
age reside or for annexation of territory when the conditions set forth in RCW
28A.315.290 or 28A.315.320 prevail; and (b) on every proposal for adjustment of
the assets and of the liabilities of school districts provided for in this
chapter. Three members of the regional committee or two members of the
committee and the educational service district superintendent may be designated
by the committee to hold any public hearing that the committee is required to
hold. The regional committee shall cause notice to be given, at least ten days
prior to the date appointed for any such hearing, in one or more newspapers of
general circulation within the geographical boundaries of the school districts
affected by the proposed change or adjustment. In addition notice may be given
by radio and television, or either thereof, when in the committee's judgment the
public interest will be served thereby; and

(9)
Prepare and submit to the superintendent of public instruction from time to
time or, upon his or her request, reports and recommendations respecting the
urgency of need for school plant facilities, the kind and extent of the
facilities required, and the development of improved local school
administrative units and attendance areas in the case of school districts that
seek state assistance in providing school plant facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302.
POWERS AND DUTIES OF STATE BOARD. The powers and duties of the state board
with respect to this chapter shall be:

(1)
To aid regional committees in the performance of their duties by furnishing
them with plans of procedure, standards, data, maps, forms, and other necessary
materials and services essential to a study and understanding of the problems
of school district organization in their respective educational service
districts.

(2)
To hear appeals as provided in section 402 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303.
ANNUAL TRAINING. The superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with
the educational service districts and the Washington state school directors'
association, shall conduct an annual training meeting for the regional
committees, state board members, educational service district superintendents,
and local school district superintendents and boards of directors. Training
may also be provided upon request.

PART
4

TRANSFER
OF TERRITORY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401.
TRANSFER OF TERRITORY‑-REQUIREMENTS‑-RESPONSIBILITIES OF SCHOOL
DISTRICT BOARD OF DIRECTORS. (1) A proposed change in school district
organization by transfer of territory from one school district to another may
be initiated by a petition in writing presented to the educational service
district superintendent:

(a)
Signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters residing in the
territory proposed to be transferred; or

(b)
Signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors of one of the
districts affected by a proposed transfer of territory.

(2)
The petition shall state the name and number of each district affected,
describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be transferred, and state
the reasons for desiring the change and the number of children of school age,
if any, residing in the territory.

(3)
The educational service district superintendent shall not complete any transfer
of territory under this section that involves ten percent or more of the common
school student population of the entire district from which the transfer is
proposed, unless the educational service district superintendent has first
called and held a special election of the voters of the entire school district
from which the transfer of territory is proposed. The purpose of the election
is to afford those voters an opportunity to approve or reject the proposed
transfer. A simple majority shall determine approval or rejection.

(4)
The state board may establish rules limiting the frequency of petitions that
may be filed pertaining to territory included in whole or in part in a previous
petition.

(5)
Upon receipt of the petition, the educational service district superintendent
shall notify in writing the affected districts that:

(a)
Each school district board of directors, whether or not initiating a proposed
transfer of territory, is required to enter into negotiations with the affected
district or districts;

(b)
In the case of a citizen-initiated petition, the affected districts must
negotiate on the entire proposed transfer of territory;

(c)
The districts have ninety calendar days in which to agree to the proposed
transfer of territory;

(d)
The districts may request and shall be granted by the educational service
district superintendent one thirty-day extension to try to reach agreement; and

(e)
Any district involved in the negotiations may at any time during the ninety-day
period notify the educational service district superintendent in writing that
agreement will not be possible.

(6)
If the negotiating school boards cannot come to agreement about the proposed
transfer of territory, the educational service district superintendent, if
requested by the affected districts, shall appoint a mediator. The mediator has
thirty days to work with the affected school districts to see if an agreement
can be reached on the proposed transfer of territory.

(7)
If the affected school districts cannot come to agreement about the proposed
transfer of territory, and the districts do not request the services of a
mediator or the mediator was unable to bring the districts to agreement, either
district may file with the educational service district superintendent a
written request for a hearing by the regional committee.

(8)
If the affected school districts cannot come to agreement about the proposed
transfer of territory initiated by citizen petition, and the districts do not
request the services of a mediator or the mediator was unable to bring the
districts to agreement, the district in which the citizens who filed the
petition reside shall file with the educational service district superintendent
a written request for a hearing by the regional committee, unless a majority of
the citizen petitioners request otherwise.

(9)
Upon receipt of a notice under subsection (7) or (8) of this section, the
educational service district superintendent shall notify the chair of the
regional committee in writing within ten days.

(10)
Costs incurred by school districts under this section shall be reimbursed by
the state from such funds as are appropriated for this purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. TRANSFER
OF TERRITORY‑-REGIONAL COMMITTEE‑-RESPONSIBILITIES. (1) The chair
of the regional committee shall schedule a hearing on the proposed transfer of
territory at a location in the educational service district within sixty
calendar days of being notified under section 401 (7) or (8) of this act.

(2)
Within thirty calendar days of the hearing under subsection (1) of this
section, or final hearing if more than one is held by the committee, the
committee shall issue its written findings and decision to approve or
disapprove the proposed transfer of territory. The educational service
district superintendent shall transmit a copy of the committee's decision to
the superintendents of the affected school districts within ten calendar days.

(3)
In carrying out the purposes of section 101 of this act and in making decisions
as authorized under section 301(1) of this act, the regional committee shall
base its judgment upon whether and to the extent the proposed change in school
district organization complies with section 101(2) of this act and rules
adopted by the state board under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4)
State board rules under subsection (3) of this section shall provide for giving
consideration to all of the following:

(a)
The annual school performance reports required under RCW 28A.320.205 in the
affected districts and improvement of the educational opportunities of pupils
in the territory proposed for a change in school district organization;

(b)
The safety and welfare of pupils. For the purposes of this subsection,
"safety" means freedom or protection from danger, injury, or damage
and "welfare" means a positive condition or influence regarding
health, character, and well being;

(c)
The history and relationship of the property affected to the students and
communities affected, including, for example, inclusion within a single school
district, for school attendance and corresponding tax support purposes, of
entire master planned communities that were or are to be developed pursuant to
an integrated commercial and residential development plan with over one
thousand dwelling units;

(d)
Whether or not geographic accessibility warrants a favorable consideration of a
recommended change in school district organization, including remoteness or
isolation of places of residence and time required to travel to and from
school; and

(e)
All funding sources of the affected districts, equalization among school
districts of the tax burden for general fund and capital purposes through a
reduction in disparities in per pupil valuation when all funding sources are
considered, improvement in the economies in the administration and operation of
schools, and the extent the proposed change would potentially reduce or
increase the individual and aggregate transportation costs of the affected
school districts.

(5)(a)(i)
A petitioner or school district may appeal a decision by the regional committee
to approve a change in school district organization to the state board based on
the claim that the regional committee failed to follow the applicable statutory
and regulatory procedures or acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner. Any
such appeal shall be based on the record and the appeal must be filed within
thirty days of the final decision of the regional committee.

(ii)
If the state board finds that all applicable procedures were not followed or
that the regional committee acted in an arbitrary and capricious manner, it
shall refer the matter back to the regional committee with an explanation of
the board's findings. The regional committee shall rehear the proposal.

(iii)
If the state board finds that all applicable procedures were followed or that
the regional committee did not act in an arbitrary and capricious manner,
depending on the appeal, the educational service district shall be notified and
directed to implement the changes.

(b)
Any school district or citizen petitioner affected by a final decision of the
regional committee may seek judicial review of the committee's decision in
accordance with RCW 34.05.570.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403.
TRANSFER OF TERRITORY‑-APPROVAL OF PROPOSED TRANSFER‑-ORDER. (1)
Upon receipt by the educational service district superintendent of a written
agreement by two or more school districts to the transfer of territory between
the affected districts, the superintendent shall make an order establishing all
approved changes involving the alteration of the boundaries of the affected
districts. The order shall also establish all approved terms of the equitable
adjustment of assets and liabilities involving the affected districts. The
superintendent shall certify his or her action to each county auditor, each
county treasurer, each county assessor, and the superintendents of all school
districts affected by the action.

(2)
Upon receipt by the educational service district superintendent of a written
order by the regional committee approving the transfer of territory between two
or more school districts, the superintendent shall make an order establishing
all approved changes involving the alteration of the boundaries of the affected
districts. The order may not be implemented before the period of appeal
authorized under section 402(5)(a)(i) of this act has ended. The order shall
also establish all approved terms of the equitable adjustment of assets and
liabilities involving the affected districts. The superintendent shall certify
his or her action to each county auditor, each county treasurer, each county
assessor, and the superintendents of all school districts affected by the
action.

PART
5

DISSOLUTION AND
ANNEXATION OF TERRITORY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501.
DISSOLUTION AND ANNEXATION OF CERTAIN DISTRICTS‑-ANNEXATION OF
NONDISTRICT PROPERTY. In case any school district has an average enrollment of
fewer than five kindergarten through eighth grade pupils during the preceding
school year or has not made a reasonable effort to maintain, during the
preceding school year at least the minimum term of school required by law, the
educational service district superintendent shall report that fact to the
regional committee, which committee shall dissolve the school district and
annex the territory thereof to some other district or districts. For the
purposes of this section, in addition to any other finding, "reasonable
effort" shall be deemed to mean the attempt to make up whatever days are
short of the legal requirement by conducting of school classes on any days to
include available holidays, though not to include Saturdays and Sundays, prior
to June 15th of that year. School districts operating an extended school year
program, most commonly implemented as a 45‑15 plan, shall be deemed to be
making a reasonable effort. In the event any school district has suffered any
interruption in its normal school calendar due to a strike or other work
stoppage or slowdown by any of its employees that district shall not be subject
to this section. In case any territory is not a part of any school district,
the educational service district superintendent shall present to the regional
committee a proposal for the annexation of the territory to some contiguous
district or districts.

PART
6

CONSOLIDATION
OF TERRITORY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601.
CONSOLIDATION‑-PETITION. (1) A proposed change in school district
organization by consolidation of territory from two or more school districts to
form a new school district may be initiated by:

(a)
A written petition presented to the educational service district superintendent
signed by ten or more registered voters residing:

(i)
In each whole district and in each part of a district proposed to be included
in any single new district; or

(ii)
In the territory of a proposed new district that comprises a part of only one
or more districts and approved by the boards of directors of the affected
school districts;

(b)
A written petition presented to the educational service district superintendent
signed by ten percent or more of the registered voters residing in such
affected areas or area without the approval of the boards of directors of the
affected school districts.

(2)
The petition shall state the name and number of each district involved in or
affected by the proposal to form the new district and shall describe the
boundaries of the proposed new district. No more than one petition for
consolidation of the same two school districts or parts thereof shall be
considered during a school fiscal year.

(3)
The educational service district superintendent may not complete any
consolidation of territory under this section unless he or she has first called
and held a special election of the voters of the affected districts to afford
those voters an opportunity to approve or reject the proposed consolidation. A
simple majority shall determine approval or rejection.

(4)
If a proposed change in school district organization by consolidation of
territory has been approved under this section, the educational service
district superintendent shall make an order establishing all approved changes
involving the alteration of the boundaries of the affected districts. The
order shall also establish all approved terms of the equitable adjustment of
assets and liabilities involving the affected districts. The superintendent
shall certify his or her action to each county auditor, each county treasurer,
each county assessor, and the superintendents of all school districts affected
by the action.

PART
7

ADJUSTMENT
OF ASSETS AND LIABILITIES‑-

BONDED
INDEBTEDNESS‑-SPECIAL ELECTIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701.
ADJUSTMENT OF ASSETS AND LIABILITIES. In determining an equitable adjustment
of assets and liabilities, the negotiating school districts and the regional
committee shall consider the following factors:

(1)
The number of school age children residing in each school district and in each
part of a district involved or affected by the proposed change in school
district organization;

(2)
The assessed valuation of the property located in each school district and in
each part of a district involved or affected by the proposed change in school
district organization;

(3)
The purpose for which the bonded indebtedness of any school district involved
or affected by the proposed change in school district organization was
incurred;

(4)
The history and relationship of the property affected to the students and
communities affected by the proposed change in school district organization;

(5)
Additional burdens to the districts affected by the proposed change in school
district organization as a result of the proposed organization;

(6)
The value, location, and disposition of all improvements located in the school
districts involved or affected by the proposed change in school district
organization;

(7)
The consideration of all other sources of funding; and

(8)
Any other factors that in the judgment of the school districts or regional
committee are important or essential to the making of an equitable adjustment
of assets and liabilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 702.
ADJUSTMENT OF INDEBTEDNESS. (1) The fact of the issuance of bonds by a school
district, heretofore or hereafter, does not prevent changes in the organization
and extent of school districts, regardless of whether or not such bonds or any
part thereof are outstanding at the time of change.

(2)
In case of any change:

(a)
The bonded indebtedness outstanding against any school district involved in or
affected by such change shall be adjusted equitably among the old school
districts and the new district or districts, if any, involved or affected; and

(b)
The property and other assets and the liabilities other than bonded
indebtedness of any school district involved in or affected by any such change
shall also be adjusted in the manner and to the effect provided for in this
section, except if all the territory of an old school district is included in a
single new district or is annexed to a single existing district, in which event
the title to the property and other assets and the liabilities other than
bonded indebtedness of the old district vests in and becomes the assets and
liabilities of the new district or of the existing district, as applicable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 703.
ADJUSTMENT OF BONDED INDEBTEDNESS‑-SPECIAL ELECTIONS. If adjustments of
bonded indebtedness are made between or among school districts in connection
with the alteration of the boundaries of the school districts under this
chapter, the order of the educational service district superintendent
establishing the terms of adjustment of bonded indebtedness shall provide and
specify:

(1)
In every case where bonded indebtedness is transferred from one school district
to another school district:

(a)
That such bonded indebtedness is assumed by the school district to which it is
transferred;

(b)
That thereafter such bonded indebtedness shall be the obligation of the school
district to which it is transferred;

(c)
That, if the terms of adjustment so provide, any bonded indebtedness thereafter
incurred by such transferee school district through the sale of bonds
authorized before the date its boundaries were altered shall be the obligation
of such school district including the territory added thereto; and

(d)
That taxes shall be levied thereafter against the taxable property located
within such school district as it is constituted after its boundaries were
altered, the taxes to be levied at the times and in the amounts required to pay
the principal of and the interest on the bonded indebtedness assumed or
incurred, as the same become due and payable.

(2)
In computing the debt limitation of any school district from which or to which
bonded indebtedness has been transferred, the amount of transferred bonded
indebtedness at any time outstanding:

(a)
Shall be an offset against and deducted from the total bonded indebtedness, if
any, of the school district from which the bonded indebtedness was transferred;
and

(b)
Shall be deemed to be bonded indebtedness solely of the transferee school
district that assumed the indebtedness.

(3)
In every case where adjustments of bonded indebtedness do

not
provide for transfer of bonded indebtedness from one school district to another
school district:

(a)
That the existing bonded indebtedness of each school district, the boundaries
of which are altered and any bonded indebtedness incurred by each such school
district through the sale of bonds authorized before the date its boundaries
were altered is the obligation of the school district in its reduced or
enlarged form, as the case may be; and

(b)
That taxes shall be levied thereafter against the taxable property located
within each such school district in its reduced or enlarged form, as the case
may be, at the times and in the amounts required to pay the principal of and
interest on such bonded indebtedness as the same become due and payable.

(4)
If a change in school district organization approved by the regional committee
concerns a proposal to form a new school district or a proposal for adjustment
of bonded indebtedness involving an established school district and one or more
former school districts now included therein pursuant to a vote of the people
concerned, a special election of the voters residing within the territory of
the proposed new district, or of the established district involved in a proposal
for adjustment of bonded indebtedness as the case may be, shall be held for the
purpose of affording those voters an opportunity to approve or reject such
proposals as concern or affect them.

(5)
In a case involving both the question of the formation of a new school district
and the question of adjustment of bonded indebtedness, the questions may be
submitted to the voters either in the form of a single proposition or as
separate propositions, whichever seems expedient to the educational service
district superintendent. When the regional committee has passed appropriate
resolutions for the questions to be submitted and the educational service
district superintendent has given notice thereof to the county auditor, the
special election shall be called and conducted, and the returns canvassed as in
regular school district elections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704.
NOTICE OF ELECTIONS. Notice of special elections as provided for in section
703 of this act shall be given by the county auditor as provided in RCW
29.27.080. The notice of election shall state the purpose for which the
election has been called and contain a description of the boundaries of the
proposed new district and a statement of any terms of adjustment of bonded
indebtedness on which to be voted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 705.
VOTE--DETERMINATION‑-ORDER‑-CERTIFICATION. (1) If a special
election is held to vote on a proposal or alternate proposals to form a new
school district, the votes cast by the registered voters in each component
district shall be tabulated separately. Any such proposition shall be
considered approved only if it receives a majority of the votes cast in each
separate district voting thereon.

(2)
If a special election is held to vote on a proposal for adjustment of bonded
indebtedness, the entire vote cast by the registered voters of the proposed new
district or of the established district as the case may be shall be tabulated.
Any such proposition shall be considered approved if sixty percent or more of
all votes cast thereon are in the affirmative.

(3)
In the event of approval of a proposition or propositions voted on at a special
election, the educational service district superintendent shall:

(a)
Make an order establishing such new school district or such terms of adjustment
of bonded indebtedness or both, as were approved by the registered voters and
shall also order such other terms of adjustment, if there are any, of property
and other assets and of liabilities other than bonded indebtedness as have been
approved by the state council; and

(b)
Certify his or her action to the county and school district officials specified
in section 403 of this act. The educational service district superintendent
may designate, with the approval of the superintendent of public instruction, a
name and number different from that of any component thereof, but must
designate the new district by name and number different from any other district
in existence in the county.

(4)
The educational service district superintendent shall fix as the effective date
of any order or orders he or she is required to make by this chapter, the date
specified in the order of final approval of any change in the organization and
extent of school districts or of any terms of adjustment of the assets and
liabilities of school districts subject, for taxing purposes, to the redrawing
of taxing district boundaries under RCW 84.09.030, by the regional committee.

(5)
Upon receipt of certification under this section, the superintendent of each
school district that is included in the new district shall deliver to the
superintendent of the new school district those books, papers, documents,
records, and other materials pertaining to the territory transferred.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 706.
REJECTION OF PROPOSAL‑-PROCEDURE. If a proposal for the formation of a
new school district and for adjustment of bonded indebtedness, or either, is
rejected by the registered voters at a special election, the matter is
terminated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 707.
CORPORATE EXISTENCE‑-PAYMENT OF BONDED INDEBTEDNESS‑-LEVY
AUTHORITY. (1) Each school district involved in or affected by any change made
in the organization and extent of school districts under this chapter retains
its corporate existence insofar as is necessary for the purpose, until the
bonded indebtedness outstanding against it on and after the effective date of
the change has been paid in full. This section may not be construed to
prevent, after the effective date of the change, such adjustments of bonded
indebtedness as are provided for in this chapter.

(2)
The county legislative authority shall provide, by appropriate levies on the
taxable property of each school district, for the payment of the bonded
indebtedness outstanding against it after any of the changes or adjustments
under this chapter have been effected.

(3)
In case any such changes or adjustments involve a joint school district, the
tax levy for the payment of any bonded indebtedness outstanding against the
joint district, after the changes or adjustments are effected, shall be made
and the proceeds thereof shall be transmitted, credited, and paid out in
conformity with the provisions of law applicable to the payment of the bonded
indebtedness of joint school districts.

Sec.
708. RCW
36.70A.035 and 1997 c 429 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The public participation requirements of this chapter shall include notice
procedures that are reasonably calculated to provide notice to property owners
and other affected and interested individuals, tribes, government agencies,
businesses, school districts, and organizations of proposed amendments
to comprehensive plans and development regulation. Examples of reasonable
notice provisions include:

(a)
Posting the property for site-specific proposals;

(b)
Publishing notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city, or
general area where the proposal is located or that will be affected by the
proposal;

(c)
Notifying public or private groups with known interest in a certain proposal or
in the type of proposal being considered;

(d)
Placing notices in appropriate regional, neighborhood, ethnic, or trade
journals; and

(e)
Publishing notice in agency newsletters or sending notice to agency mailing
lists, including general lists or lists for specific proposals or subject
areas.

(2)(a)
Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this subsection, if the legislative body
for a county or city chooses to consider a change to an amendment to a
comprehensive plan or development regulation, and the change is proposed after
the opportunity for review and comment has passed under the county's or city's
procedures, an opportunity for review and comment on the proposed change shall
be provided before the local legislative body votes on the proposed change.

(b)
An additional opportunity for public review and comment is not required under
(a) of this subsection if:

(i)
An environmental impact statement has been prepared under chapter 43.21C RCW
for the pending resolution or ordinance and the proposed change is within the
range of alternatives considered in the environmental impact statement;

(ii)
The proposed change is within the scope of the alternatives available for
public comment;

(iii)
The proposed change only corrects typographical errors, corrects
cross-references, makes address or name changes, or clarifies language of a
proposed ordinance or resolution without changing its effect;

(iv)
The proposed change is to a resolution or ordinance making a capital budget
decision as provided in RCW 36.70A.120; or

(v)
The proposed change is to a resolution or ordinance enacting a moratorium or
interim control adopted under RCW 36.70A.390.

(3)
This section is prospective in effect and does not apply to a comprehensive
plan, development regulation, or amendment adopted before July 27, 1997.

PART
8

MISCELLANEOUS
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 801. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
28A.305.150 (Classification, numbering system of school
districts--Rules and regulations for) and 1971 c 54 s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.04.130;;

(2) RCW
28A.315.010 (Purpose) and 1990 c 33 s 292 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.010;

(3) RCW
28A.315.030 (County regional committee members--Assignment of
committee member position numbers) and 1993 c 416 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 294, &
1985 c 385 s 30;

(4) RCW
28A.315.110 (Regional committees--Powers and duties) and 1991 c 288
s 2;

(5) RCW
28A.315.120 (Regional committees--Recommendations--Standards) and
1990 c 33 s 299, 1985 c 385 s 10, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.055;

(6) RCW
28A.315.130 (Changing conflicting or incorrectly described school
district boundaries) and 1985 c 385 s 11 & 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 26;

(7) RCW
28A.315.140 (Powers and duties of state board, generally) and 1990
c 33 s 300, 1987 c 100 s 2, 1985 c 385 s 12, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.060;

(8) RCW
28A.315.150 (Action upon board's report) and 1990 c 33 s 301, 1985
c 385 s 13, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 84, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 121, & 1969 ex.s.
c 223 s 28A.57.070;

(9) RCW
28A.315.160 (Adjustment of bonded indebtedness--Special election in
certain cases) and 1985 c 385 s 14, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 85, 1969 ex.s. c 176
s 122, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.075;

(10) RCW
28A.315.170 (Notice of election--Contents) and 1990 c 33 s 302,
1985 c 385 s 15, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 86, 1971 c 48 s 26, & 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.57.080;

(11) RCW
28A.315.180 (Vote, how determined--ESD superintendent's
order--Certification--Effective date) and 1990 c 33 s 303, 1985 c 385 s 16,
1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 87, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 123, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.090;

(12) RCW
28A.315.190 (Procedure upon rejection of proposal) and 1985 c 385 s
17 & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.100;

(13) RCW
28A.315.200 (Personnel and supplies to be furnished by state
superintendent--Expenses reimbursed) and 1990 c 33 s 304, 1985 c 385 s 18,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.110;

(14) RCW
28A.315.230 (Classes of districts--Change of classification) and
1991 c 116 s 25, 1990 c 33 s 306, & 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 3;

(15) RCW
28A.315.240 (Classes of districts--Change of classification--Delay
of authorized) and 1975 c 43 s 35;

(16) RCW
28A.315.250 (City or town districts) and 1997 c 47 s 1, 1985 c 385
s 19, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 90, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 126, & 1969 ex.s. c 223
s 28A.57.150;

(17) RCW
28A.315.260 (Reorganization of districts by transfer of territory
or annexation) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.160;

(18) RCW
28A.315.270 (Petition for reorganization--Conditions) and 1985 c
385 s 20, 1982 c 191 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 91, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 127,
& 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.170;

(19) RCW
28A.315.280 (Transfer of territory--By petition--By ESD
superintendent--When election required) and 1985 c 385 s 21, 1975 1st ex.s. c
275 s 92, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 128, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.180;

(20) RCW
28A.315.290 (Annexation of district bounded on three sides by high
school district) and 1985 c 385 s 22, 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 93, 1969 ex.s. c
176 s 129, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.190;

(21) RCW
28A.315.300 (Single school district for certain United States
military reservations--Mandated) and 1990 c 33 s 307 & 1972 ex.s. c 63 s 1;

(22) RCW
28A.315.310 (Single school district for certain United States
military reservations--Procedure--Limitations) and 1990 c 33 s 308, 1985 c 385
s 23, & 1972 ex.s. c 63 s 2;

(23) RCW
28A.315.320 (Dissolution and annexation of certain
districts--Annexation of nondistrict property) and 1985 c 385 s 24 &
1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 15 s 4;

(24) RCW
28A.315.330 (Adjustment of indebtedness--Basis) and 1969 ex.s. c
223 s 28A.57.210;

(25) RCW
28A.315.340 (Corporate existence retained to pay bonded
indebtedness--Tax levies--Joint school districts) and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s
28A.57.220; and

(26) RCW
28A.315.900 (Proceedings as of July 28, 1985--Effect of 1985 c 385)
and 1990 c 33 s 329 & 1985 c 385 s 38.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802. (1)
RCW 28A.315.020 and 28A.315.220 are recodified as new sections in chapter
28A.315 RCW, to be codified in Part 2 of this act before section 201.

(2)
RCW 28A.315.210 is recodified as a new
section in chapter 28A.315 RCW, to be codified after section 707 of this act.

(3)
RCW 28A.315.690, 28A.315.700, 28A.315.710, and 28A.315.720, are recodified as
new sections in chapter 28A.315 RCW, to be codified after section 206 of this
act.

(4)
RCW 28A.315.040, 28A.315.050, 28A.315.060, 28A.315.070, 28A.315.080,
28A.315.090, and 28A.315.100 are recodified as new sections in chapter 28A.315
RCW, to be codified in Part 3 of this act after section 301 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 803. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.350

RCW
28A.315.360

RCW
28A.315.370

RCW
28A.315.380

RCW
28A.315.390

RCW
28A.315.400

RCW
28A.315.410

RCW
28A.315.420

RCW
28A.315.430

RCW
28A.315.440

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 804. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.450

RCW
28A.315.650

RCW
28A.315.470

RCW
28A.315.480

RCW
28A.315.490

RCW
28A.315.500

RCW
28A.315.530

RCW
28A.315.510

RCW
28A.315.520

RCW
28A.315.540

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 805. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.570

RCW
28A.315.460

RCW
28A.315.600

RCW
28A.315.610

RCW
28A.315.620

RCW
28A.315.630

RCW
28A.315.670

RCW
28A.315.680

RCW
28A.315.550

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 806. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.560

RCW
28A.315.580

RCW
28A.315.590

RCW
28A.315.593

RCW
28A.315.660

RCW
28A.315.597

RCW
28A.315.640

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 807.
MORATORIUM ON PETITIONS. The state board may, at its discretion, declare a
moratorium on new petitions until such time as the rules have been adopted to
implement chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act). The state board
shall adopt emergency rules necessary to begin consideration of changes
initiated after the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 808. PART
HEADINGS AND SECTION CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Part headings and section captions used
in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 809.
Sections 1, 101, 201, 203 through 206, 301 through 303, 401 through 403, 501,
601, 701 through 707, 807, and 808 of this act are each added to chapter
28A.315 RCW.

---
END ---