BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to attract and retain technology-based businesses
in distressed counties. This act provides a tax incentive to those businesses
that are engaged in the business of providing technical support services from
distressed counties. Encouragement of these types of business will stimulate
the information technology industry and be of benefit to the state economy in
general. To further the impact and benefit of this program, this incentive is
limited to those counties of the state that are characterized by unemployment
or low income. The legislature finds that providing this targeted incentive
will both increase its effectiveness and create a high technology work force in
distressed counties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized
against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for persons engaged in a
distressed county in the business of providing information technology help desk
services to third parties.

(2)
To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be conducted from a
distressed county.

(3)(a)
For the first eighty-four months in which the person is engaged in the activity
of providing information technology help desk services in the distressed
county, the amount of the credit shall be equal to one hundred percent of the
amount of tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing the
services from the distressed county. In order to qualify for the credit under
this subsection (3)(a), the county must meet the definition of "distressed
county" at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in
the county. If the county subsequently does not qualify for distressed county
status, the person may continue to take the credit for the remaining time in
the eighty-four months if all other conditions are met. A person who locates
in a county during a period of time for which the county does not meet the
distressed county status is not eligible to receive the credit under this
subsection (3)(a).

(b)
A person who is not eligible for the credit under (a) of this subsection is
potentially eligible for credit under this subsection (3)(b). If the person is
engaged in the activity of providing information technology help desk services
in a distressed county, the amount of the credit shall equal sixty-eight
percent of the amount of tax due under this chapter that is attributable to
providing the service from the distressed county. In order to qualify for the
credit under this subsection, the county must meet the definition of
"distressed county" during the period of time for which the credit is
being claimed. A person is not eligible for a credit under this subsection
(3)(b) for activity conducted during any period of time the county does not
have a distressed county status.

(c)
A person who that has engaged in providing information technology help desk
services in the distressed county before the effective date of this section
qualifies for the credit under (a) of this subsection for any remaining time in
the eighty-four months, after which time the person is potentially eligible for
the credit under (b) of this subsection. A person who has engaged in providing
information technology help desk services in the distressed county before the
effective date of this section for more than eighty-four months is potentially
eligible for the credit under (b) of this subsection.

(4)
No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. These
records include information relating to description of activity engaged in a
distressed county by the person.

(5)
If at any time the department finds that a person is not eligible for tax
credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used
is immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties,
on the credited taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest shall
be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter
82.32 RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was
taken, and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.

(6)
The credit under this section may be used against any tax due under this
chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried
over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(7)
County eligibility under this section shall be based on the same list as
published by the department under chapter 82.60 RCW. The eligibility period is
from July 1st of each year to June 30th of the next year.

(8)
A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an annual report to
the department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: Type of activity in which the person is engaged in the
county, number of employees in the distressed county, and how long the person has
been located in the county. The report must be filed by January 30th of each
year for which credit was claimed during the previous year.

(9)
Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility; however, the credit
is available to the successor only if the eligibility conditions of this
section are met.

(10)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Distressed county" means either (i) a county in which the average
level of unemployment for the previous three years exceeds the average state
unemployment for those years by twenty percent or (ii) a county that has a
median household income that is less than seventy-five percent of the state
median household income for the previous three years.

(b)
"First eighty-four months" means the eighty-four months of operation
in a county following commencement of business activity. Business activity is
deemed to commence upon the act of engaging in the business of providing the
help desk services from the county.

(c)
"Information technology help desk services" means the following
services performed using electronic and telephonic communication:

(i)
Software maintenance;

(ii)
Software diagnostics and troubleshooting;

(iii)
Software installation;

(iv)
Software repair;

(v)
Software information and training; and

(vi)
Software upgrade.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.62 RCW to read as follows:

A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this chapter if the person is
receiving credit under RCW 82.04.44525 or is receiving a credit under section 2
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---