BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to attract and retain technology-based businesses
in distressed counties. This act provides a tax incentive to those businesses
that develop or manufacture software in distressed counties. Encouragement of
these types of business will stimulate the information technology industry and
be of benefit to the state economy in general. To further the impact and
benefit of this program, this incentive is limited to those counties of the
state that are characterized by unemployment or low income. The legislature
finds that providing this targeted incentive will both increase its
effectiveness and create a high technology work force in distressed counties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized
against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for persons engaged in a
distressed county in the business of manufacturing or programming of software,
as those terms are defined in this section.

(2)
A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one distressed
county to another distressed county is eligible for any qualifying new jobs created
as a result of the relocation but is not eligible to receive credit for the
jobs moved from one county to the other.

(3)(a)
To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the person must be
conducted in a distressed county and the qualified employment position must be
located in the distressed county.

(b)
If an activity is conducted both from a distressed county and outside of a
distressed county, the credit is available if at least ninety percent of the
qualifying activity takes place within a distressed county. If the qualifying
activity is a service taxable activity, the place where the work is performed
is the place at which the activity is conducted.

(4)(a)
The credit under this section shall equal one thousand dollars for each
qualified employment position created after July 1, 1999, in an eligible area.
A credit is earned for the calendar year the person is hired to fill the
position. Additionally a credit is earned for each year the position is
maintained over the subsequent consecutive years, up to six years. The county
must meet the definition of a distressed county at the time the position is
filled. If the county does not have a distressed county status the following
year or years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.

(b)
Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions that exist before
July 1, 1999. Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new positions
created on or after July 1, 1999. New positions filled by existing employees
are eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated by
the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is a sole
proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one employee position and
this type of business is eligible to receive credit for one position.

(c)
If a position is filled before July 1st, this position is eligible for the full
yearly credit. If it is filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for
half of the credit.

(d)
A person that has engaged in qualifying activities in the distressed county
before the effective date of this section qualifies for the credit under this
section for positions created and filled after the effective date of this
section.

(5)
No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. This
information includes information relating to description of qualifying activity
engaged in the distressed county and outside the distressed county by the
person as well as detailed records on positions and employees. The department
shall, in consultation with a representative group of affected taxpayers,
develop a method of segregating activity and related income so that those
persons who engage in multiple activities can determine eligibility for credit
under this section.

(6)
If at any time the department finds that a person is not eligible for tax
credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been
claimed shall be immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but
not penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit
was taken, and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used
are repaid.

(7)
The credit under this section may be used against any tax due under this
chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried
over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this section if the person is
receiving credit for the same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW
82.04.44525. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(8)
County eligibility under this section shall be based on the same list as
published by the department under chapter 82.60 RCW. The eligibility period is
from July 1st of each year to June 30th of the next year.

(9)
A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an annual report to
the department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: Number of positions for which credit is being claimed,
type of position for which credit is being claimed, type of activity in which
the person is engaged in the county, and how long the person has been located
in the county. The report must be filed by January 30th of each year for which
credit was claimed during the previous year.

(10)
Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility; however, the credit
is available to the successor for remaining periods in the seven years only if
the eligibility conditions of this section are met.

(11)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Distressed county" means either (i) a county in which the average
level of unemployment for the previous three years exceeds the average state
unemployment for those years by twenty percent or (ii) a county that has a
median household income that is less than seventy-five percent of the state
median household income for the previous three years.

(b)
"Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under
RCW 82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers and
processors for hire.

(c)
"Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of software, as that term is defined in this chapter, and that are
taxable as "service and other" under RCW 82.04.290(2) or retail under
RCW 82.04.050.

(d)
"Qualifying activity" means manufacturing or programming of software.

(e)
"Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time position
doing programming of software or manufacturing of software. This excludes
administrative, professional, service, executive, and other similar positions.
If an employee is either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from
employment, the employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis
if the employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a week.

(f)
"Software" has the same meaning as defined in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.62 RCW to read as follows:

A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this chapter if the person is
receiving credit for the same position under section 2 of this act or RCW
82.04.44525.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---