BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1998
c 322 s 30 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall establish for each medicaid nursing facility a return on
investment component rate allocation composed of two parts: A financing
allowance and a variable return allowance. The financing allowance part of a
facility's return on investment component rate shall be rebased annually,
effective July 1st, in accordance with the provisions of this section and this
chapter.

(a)
The financing allowance shall be determined by multiplying the net invested
funds of each facility by .10, and dividing by the greater of a nursing
facility's total resident days from the most recent cost report period or
resident days calculated on eighty-five percent facility occupancy. However,
assets acquired on or after the effective date of this section, shall be
grouped in a separate net invested funds calculation that shall be multiplied
by .085. The financing allowance factor of .085 shall not be applied to the
net invested funds pertaining to new construction or major renovations
receiving certificate of need approval or an exemption from certificate of need
requirements under chapter 70.38 RCW, or to working drawings that have been
submitted to the department of health for construction review approval prior to
the effective date of this section. If a capitalized addition or
retirement of an asset will result in a different licensed bed capacity during
the ensuing period, the prior period total resident days used in computing the
financing and variable return allowances shall be adjusted to the anticipated
resident day level.

(b)
In computing the portion of net invested funds representing the net book value
of tangible fixed assets, the same assets, depreciation bases, lives, and
methods referred to in RCW 74.46.330, 74.46.350, 74.46.360, 74.46.370, and
74.46.380, including owned and leased assets, shall be utilized, except that
the capitalized cost of land upon which the facility is located and such other
contiguous land which is reasonable and necessary for use in the regular course
of providing resident care shall also be included. Subject to provisions and
limitations contained in this chapter, for land purchased by owners or lessors
before July 18, 1984, capitalized cost of land shall be the buyer's capitalized
cost. For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, if the land
is purchased after July 17, 1984, capitalized cost shall be that of the owner
of record on July 17, 1984, or buyer's capitalized cost, whichever is lower.
In the case of leased facilities where the net invested funds are unknown or
the contractor is unable to provide necessary information to determine net
invested funds, the secretary shall have the authority to determine an amount
for net invested funds based on an appraisal conducted according to RCW
74.46.360(1).

(c)
In determining the variable return allowance:

(i)
The variable return array and percentage assigned at the October 1, 1998,
rate setting shall remain in effect until June 30, 2001.

(ii)
For the ((October 1, 1998,)) July 1, 2001, rate setting, the
department, without utilizing peer groups, shall first rank all facilities in
numerical order from highest to lowest according to their per resident day
adjusted or audited, or both, allowable costs for ((nursing services, food,
administration, and operational costs)) direct care, therapy care,
support services, and operations combined for the ((1996)) 1999
calendar year cost report period.

(((ii)))
(iii) The department shall then compute the variable return allowance by
multiplying the appropriate percentage amounts, which shall not be less than
one percent and not greater than four percent, by the sum of the facility's ((nursing
services, food, administrative, and operational)) direct care, therapy
care, support services, and operations rate components. The percentage
amounts will be based on groupings of facilities according to the rankings
prescribed in (c)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, as applicable.
Those groups of facilities with lower per diem costs shall receive higher
percentage amounts than those with higher per diem costs.

(d)
The sum of the financing allowance and the variable return allowance shall be
the return on investment rate for each facility, and shall be added to the
prospective rates of each contractor ((as determined in sections 19 through
29 of this act)).

(e)
In the case of a facility that was leased by the contractor as of January 1,
1980, in an arm's-length agreement, which continues to be leased under the same
lease agreement, and for which the annualized lease payment, plus any interest
and depreciation expenses associated with contractor-owned assets, for the
period covered by the prospective rates, divided by the contractor's total
resident days, minus the property component rate allocation ((determined
according to section 29 of this act)), is more than the return on
investment rate determined according to (d) of this subsection, the following
shall apply:

(i)
The financing allowance shall be recomputed substituting the fair market value
of the assets as of January 1, 1982, as determined by the department of general
administration through an appraisal procedure, less accumulated depreciation on
the lessor's assets since January 1, 1982, for the net book value of the assets
in determining net invested funds for the facility. A determination by the
department of general administration of fair market value shall be final unless
the procedure used to make such a determination is shown to be arbitrary and
capricious.

(ii)
The sum of the financing allowance computed under (e)(i) of this subsection and
the variable allowance shall be compared to the annualized lease payment, plus
any interest and depreciation associated with contractor-owned assets, for the
period covered by the prospective rates, divided by the contractor's total
resident days, minus the property component rate ((determined according to
section 29 of this act)). The lesser of the two amounts shall be called
the alternate return on investment rate.

(iii)
The return on investment rate determined according to (d) of this subsection or
the alternate return on investment rate, whichever is greater, shall be the
return on investment rate for the facility and shall be added to the
prospective rates of the contractor ((as determined in sections 19 through
29 of this act)).

(f)
In the case of a facility that was leased by the contractor as of January 1,
1980, in an arm's-length agreement, if the lease is renewed or extended under a
provision of the lease, the treatment provided in (e) of this subsection shall
be applied, except that in the case of renewals or extensions made subsequent
to April 1, 1985, reimbursement for the annualized lease payment shall be no
greater than the reimbursement for the annualized lease payment for the last
year prior to the renewal or extension of the lease.

(2)
For the purpose of calculating a nursing facility's return on investment
component rate, if a contractor elects to bank beds or to convert banked beds
to active service, under chapter 70.38 RCW, the department shall use the
facility's anticipated resident occupancy level subsequent to the decrease or
increase in licensed bed capacity. However, in no case shall the department
use less than eighty-five percent occupancy of the facility's licensed bed
capacity after banking or conversion.

(3)
Each biennium the secretary shall review the adequacy of return on investment
rates in relation to anticipated requirements for maintaining, reducing, or
expanding nursing care capacity. The secretary shall report the results of a
such review to the legislature and make recommendations for adjustments in the
return on investment rates utilized in this section, if appropriate.

(4)
The return or investment component rate allocations calculated in accordance
with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with ((section
18 of this act)) RCW 74.46.421. If the department determines that
the weighted average rate allocations for all rate components for all
facilities is likely to exceed the weighted average total rate specified in the
state biennial appropriations act, the department shall adjust the rate
allocations calculated in this section proportional to the amount by which the total
weighted average rate allocations would otherwise exceed the budgeted level.
Such adjustments shall only be made prospectively, not retrospectively.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.46.330 and 1980 c 177 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Tangible
assets of the following types in which a contractor has an interest through
ownership or leasing are subject to depreciation:

(1)
Building - the basic structure or shell and additions thereto;

(2)
Building fixed equipment - attachments to buildings, including, but not limited
to, wiring, electrical fixtures, plumbing, elevators, heating system, and air
conditioning system. The general characteristics of this equipment are:

(a)
Affixed to the building and not subject to transfer; and

(b)
A fairly long life, but shorter than the life of the building to which affixed;

(3)
For new or replacement building construction or for major renovations,
receiving certificate of need approval or certificate of need exemption under
chapter 70.38 RCW on or after the effective date of this section, the number of
years used to depreciate fixed equipment shall be the same number of years as
the life of the building to which it is affixed;

(4)
Major movable equipment including, but not limited to, beds, wheelchairs,
desks, and x-ray machines. The general characteristics of this equipment are:

(a)
A relatively fixed location in the building;

(b)
Capable of being moved as distinguished from building equipment;

(c)
A unit cost sufficient to justify ledger control;

(d)
Sufficient size and identity to make control feasible by means of
identification tags; and

(e)
A minimum life greater than one year;

(((4)))
(5) Minor equipment including, but not limited to, waste baskets, bed
pans, syringes, catheters, silverware, mops, and buckets which are properly
capitalized. No depreciation shall be taken on items which are not properly
capitalized as directed in RCW 74.46.310. The general characteristics of minor
equipment are:

(a)
In general, no fixed location and subject to use by various departments;

(b)
Small in size and unit cost;

(c)
Subject to inventory control;

(d)
Large number in use; and

(e)
Generally, a useful life of one to three years;

(((5)))
(6) Land improvements including, but not limited to, paving, tunnels,
underpasses, on-site sewer and water lines, parking lots, shrubbery, fences,
and walls where replacement is the responsibility of the contractor; and

(((6)))
(7) Leasehold improvements - betterments and additions made by the
lessee to the leased property, which become the property of the lessor after
the expiration of the lease.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.46.350 and 1980 c 177 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Buildings, land improvements, and fixed equipment shall be depreciated using
the straight-line method of depreciation. For new or replacement building
construction or for major renovations, receiving certificate of need approval
or certificate of need exemption under chapter 70.38 RCW on or after the
effective date of this section, the number of years used to depreciate fixed
equipment shall be the same number of years as the life of the building to
which it is affixed. Major-minor equipment shall be depreciated using either
the straight-line method, the sum-of-the-years' digits method, or declining
balance method not to exceed one hundred fifty percent of the straight line
rate. Contractors who have elected to take either the sum-of-the-years' digits
method or the declining balance method of depreciation on major-minor equipment
may change to the straight-line method without permission of the department.

(2)
The annual provision for depreciation shall be reduced by the portion allocable
to use of the asset for purposes which are neither necessary nor related to
patient care.

(3)
No further depreciation shall be claimed after an asset has been fully
depreciated unless a new depreciation base is established pursuant to RCW
74.46.360.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.46.370 and 1997 c 277 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for new buildings, major remodels, and major repair projects, as defined
in subsection (2) of this section, the contractor shall use lives which reflect
the estimated actual useful life of the asset and which shall be no shorter
than guideline lives as established by the department. Lives shall be measured
from the date on which the assets were first used in the medical care program
or from the date of the most recent arm's-length acquisition of the asset,
whichever is more recent. In cases where RCW 74.46.360(6)(a) does apply, the
shortest life that may be used for buildings is the remaining useful life under
the prior contract. In all cases, lives shall be extended to reflect periods,
if any, when assets were not used in or as a facility.

(2)
Effective July 1, 1997, for asset acquisitions and new facilities, major
remodels, and major repair projects that begin operations on or after July 1,
1997, the department shall use the most current edition of Estimated Useful
Lives of Depreciable Hospital Assets, or as it may be renamed, published by the
American Hospital Publishing, Inc., an American hospital association company,
for determining the useful life of new buildings, major remodels, and major
repair projects, however, the shortest life that may be used for new buildings
is thirty years. New buildings, major remodels, and major repair projects
include those projects that meet or exceed the expenditure minimum established
by the department of health pursuant to chapter 70.38 RCW.

(3)
Building improvements, other than major remodels and major repairs, shall be
depreciated over the remaining useful life of the building, as modified by the
improvement.

(4)
Improvements to leased property which are the responsibility of the contractor
under the terms of the lease shall be depreciated over the useful life of the
improvement.

(5)
A contractor may change the estimate of an asset's useful life to a longer life
for purposes of depreciation.

(6)
For new or replacement building construction or for major renovations,
receiving certificate of need approval or certificate of need exemption under
chapter 70.38 RCW on or after the effective date of this section, the number of
years used to depreciate fixed equipment shall be the same number of years as
the life of the building to which it is affixed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Beginning July 1, 1999, if a contractor experiences an increase in property
taxes relating to construction qualifying under RCW 74.46.360(2), the
department shall adjust rates to cover state and county increases in real
estate taxes, effective the first day on which the increased tax payment is
due, related to construction qualifying for payment under RCW 74.46.360(2).
Rate adjustments made under this section shall be consistent with applicable
cost limitations contained in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
In determining the need for nursing home beds on a state-wide basis and a
planning area specific basis, the department shall calculate the need for
nursing home beds based on the bed-to-population ratio of forty beds per one
thousand persons age sixty-five and older. The department shall find no need for
additional nursing home beds if the state is at or above the state-wide
estimated bed need, unless the department finds that additional beds are needed
in order to be located reasonably close to the people they serve, and the
department explains such approval in writing.

(2)
The department may put under review and subsequently approve or deny an
application that proposes to redistribute nursing home bed capacity to a
planning area that has a bed-to-population ratio that is under the established
ratio.

(3)
The department may put under review and subsequently approve or deny an
application that proposes to add beds in a planning area that has a
bed-to-population ratio that is under the established ratio using beds banked
under the provisions of RCW 70.38.115(13).

(4)
The department may not consider applications that would redistribute existing
nursing home capacity within a planning area that is above the established
bed-to-population ratio.

(5)
This section expires June 30, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The need for projects identified in section 6 of this act shall be determined
using the individual planning area's estimated nursing home bed need ratio and
includes but is not limited to the following criteria:

(a)
The current capacity of nursing homes and other long-term care services;

(b)
The occupancy rates of nursing homes and other long-term care services over the
previous two-year period; and

(c)
The ability of the other long-term care services to serve all people regardless
of payor source.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, nursing home beds include long-term care
units or distinct part long-term care units located in a hospital that is
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Section 5 of this act is added to chapter 74.46 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 6 and 7 of this act are each added to chapter 70.38 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Section 1 of this act shall be codified as a section in chapter 74.46 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. 1998
c 322 s 54 (uncodified) is repealed, effective June 29, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---