BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.34.020 and 1995 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term "secretary" wherever used in this chapter ((shall)) means
the secretary of health of the state of Washington. The term
"apprentice" wherever used in this chapter ((shall)) means
a person who ((shall be)) is designated an apprentice in the
records of the secretary at the request of a physician, registered optometrist,
or licensee hereunder, who shall thereafter be the primary supervisor of the
apprentice. The apprentice may thereafter receive from a physician, registered
optometrist, or licensee hereunder training and direct supervision in the work
of a dispensing optician. The term "refracting" whenever used in
this chapter means the measurement of the powers or range of a person's vision
by the use of a series of lenses and their rotation to determine the degree of
correction needed to compensate for hyperopia, myopia, presbyopia, astigmatism,
prism, or any combination of these. "Prescription modification"
whenever used in this chapter, means the ability of a licensed refracting optician
to alter a prescription within a cumulative plus or minus 2.00 diopter of
change provided that there is no more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter of change
at any one time during a six-month period. A licensed refracting optician must
provide a patient with a copy of the changes to take with him or her to a
provider of choice. The original prescriber will be notified in writing within
fourteen days of any modifications made to the original prescription and will
also be provided with a copy of the patient's questionnaire and the signed
informed consent document.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.34.060 and 1957 c 43 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
dispensing optician is a person who prepares duplications of, or prepares and
dispenses lenses, spectacles, eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the
intended wearers thereof on written prescriptions from physicians or
optometrists, and in accordance with ((such)) the prescriptions,
measures, adapts, adjusts and fabricates ((such)) the lenses,
spectacles, eyeglasses and/or appurtenances thereto to the human face for the
aid or correction of visual or ocular anomalies of the human eye((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)). However, contact lenses may be fitted
only upon a written prescription of a physician or optometrist. A
refracting optician is a licensed dispensing optician who has received an
endorsement from the secretary to practice refractometry and to modify
prescriptions.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.34.050 and 1984 c 287 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
dispensing optician examining committee shall meet at such times as deemed
necessary by the secretary to prepare and administer the state's licensing
examinations and to provide technical expertise, advice, and make
recommendations to the secretary on the administration of the dispensing
optician statute and disciplinary matters of licensees. The examining
committee ((shall)) consists of ((three)) five
persons. Four persons must be primarily engaged in the business of
dispensing opticians and ((who currently)) hold a ((valid)) current
license under this chapter. One of the licensed dispensing optician members
shall be a licensed refracting optician. One member must be a member of the
general public. Members of the committee shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 18.34 RCW to read as follows:

An
applicant for endorsement as a refracting optician must first be licensed as a
dispensing optician under this chapter and meet the following additional
requirements:

(1)
Completion of eighty hours of coursework from an accredited or approved
institution or association including, but not limited to, the following
topics: Theory of refraction, anatomy, pathology, and knowledge of equipment
operation;

(2)
Completion of two hundred refractive examinations. The two hundred refractive
examinations are under the direct supervision of a licensed optometrist or a
licensed ophthalmologist who shall certify the completion of the examinations
and send notification directly to the department;

(3)
Continuing education or competency requirements as determined by the secretary.

The
secretary shall adopt by rule the examination requirements to endorse
refracting opticians. An applicant for endorsement as a refracting optician
may take the examination if he or she pays an examination fee, determined by
the secretary, as provided in RCW 43.70.250.

A
refracting optician who has successfully completed the requirements of this
section will have the endorsement of "CRO" placed on his or her
dispensing optician license by the secretary.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.34.080 and 1995 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The examination to license a dispensing optician shall determine whether
the applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles governing the practice
of a dispensing optician which is hereby declared necessary for the protection
of the public health. The examining committee may ((approve an examination
prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association of
licensing authorities)) prepare and administer, or approve the
preparation and administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure.
The secretary shall license successful examinees and the license shall be
conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee.

(2)
The written and practical examination to certify a refracting optician shall
determine whether the applicant has a thorough knowledge of the principles
governing the practice of refraction. After the initial exam, the examining
committee may prepare and administer, or approve the preparation and
administration of, examinations for applicants for licensure. The secretary
shall issue an endorsement to successful examinees and the endorsement shall be
conspicuously displayed in the place of business of the licensee.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.34.120 and 1996 c 191 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
licensee ((hereunder)) or holder of an endorsement under this chapter
shall pay a renewal registration fee determined by the secretary as provided in
RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary may adopt rules establishing
mandatory continuing education requirements to be met by persons applying for
license or endorsement renewal.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.34.136 and 1987 c 150 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs
unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of
licensees under this chapter. No person may practice or represent himself
or herself as a refracting optician without first having obtained an
endorsement from the secretary.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.34.010 and 1957 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter shall:

(1)
Be construed to limit or restrict a duly licensed physician or optometrist or
employees working under the personal supervision of a duly licensed physician
or optometrist from the practices enumerated in this chapter, and each such
licensed physician and optometrist shall have all the rights and privileges which
may accrue under this chapter to dispensing opticians licensed hereunder;

(2)
Be construed to prohibit an unlicensed person from performing mechanical work
upon inert matter in an optical office, laboratory, or shop;

(3)
Be construed to prohibit an unlicensed person from engaging in the sale of
spectacles, eyeglasses, magnifying glasses, goggles, sunglasses, telescopes,
binoculars, or any such articles which are completely preassembled and sold
only as merchandise;

(4)
Be construed to authorize or permit a licensee ((hereunder)) under
this chapter to hold himself or herself out as being able to, or to
offer to, or to undertake to attempt, by any manner of means, to ((examine
or)) exercise eyes, diagnose, treat, ((correct,)) relieve, operate,
or prescribe for any human ailment, ((deficiency,)) deformity, disease,
or injury.

If
a licensed refracting optician is unable to select lenses that provide at a
minimum 20/40 vision in either eye to the consumer, he or she shall refer the
consumer to a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist. If a licensed
refracting optician is observing change of more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter
of power in either eye, he or she shall refer the consumer to a licensed
optometrist or ophthalmologist. A licensed refracting optician shall not
modify an original prescription beyond plus or minus 2 diopters of change
provided that there is no more than plus or minus 1.00 diopter of change at any
one time during a six-month period. A licensed refracting optician may only
modify a prescription for a consumer that has had an eye health exam within two
years for contact lenses and within two years for glasses. A licensed
refracting optician will not modify a prescription of a child ten years old or
younger or an adult sixty-four years or older. A licensed refracting optician
will notify in writing the original prescriber within fourteen days of any
modifications made to the original prescription, and will also provide a copy
of the patient's questionnaire and the signed informed consent document.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. RCW
18.34.110 and 1991 c 3 s 78 & 1957 c 43 s 11 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. RCW
18.34.010, to be codified between RCW 18.34.141 and 18.34.900, and RCW
18.34.060, to be codified between RCW 18.34.020 and 18.34.030, are each
recodified.

---
END ---