BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that landing salmon into the ports of Washington state,
regardless of where such salmon have been harvested, is economically beneficial
to those ports as well as to the citizens of the state of Washington. It is
therefore the intent of the legislature to encourage this practice.

(2)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 75.28.010(1)(b) and 75.28.113, a
Washington citizen who holds a valid Oregon or California salmon troll license
may land salmon taken during lawful seasons in Oregon and California into
Washington ports without obtaining a salmon delivery license. This exception
is valid only when the salmon were taken in offshore waters south of Cape
Falcon.

(3) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this
section, including rules identifying the appropriate methods for verifying that
salmon were in fact taken south of Cape Falcon.

---
END ---