BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.0101 and 1997 c 3 s 204 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority of a taxing
district other than the state may provide for the use of a limit factor under
this chapter of one hundred six percent or less. An ordinance or resolution
declaring a substantial need under this section must specify the nature of the
substantial need and the intended purpose or purposes. The additional revenue
may be used only for the specified purpose or purposes. A limit factor may be
adopted for a period not to exceed nine consecutive years. After the
expiration of a period for which a limit factor is adopted, another limit
factor may not be adopted for an equal number of years.

(2)
In districts with legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds
of the members must approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. In
districts with more than four members, a majority plus one vote must approve an
ordinance or resolution under this section. The new limit factor shall be
effective for taxes collected in the following year only.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than the state may be
set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise under this chapter if the
regular property tax levy for the district for taxes due in prior years
beginning with 1986 had been set at the full amount allowed under this chapter,
other than under RCW 84.55.0101, including any levy authorized under RCW
52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the limitation in RCW 52.18.065,
applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge under chapter 52.18 RCW.

The
purpose of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing district to
maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under this chapter, and to
protect the future levy capacity of a taxing district that reduces its tax levy
below the level that it otherwise could impose under this chapter, by removing
the adverse consequences to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.

This
section applies to taxes levied for collection before year 2000. This section
expires January 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
amendment of RCW 84.55.092 by section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999
(section 2 of this act) applies retrospectively to taxes levied for collection
in 1998 and 1999.

---
END ---