BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that homelessness for children and their families is a
serious, widespread problem that has a devastating effect on children,
including significant adverse effects upon their growth and development.
Planning for and serving the shelter and housing needs of the homeless children
and their families has been and continues to be a responsibility of the
department of community, trade, and economic development. The legislature
further finds that the department of social and health services also plays an
important role in addressing the service needs of homeless children and their
families. In order to adequately and effectively address the complex issues
confronting homeless children and their families, planning for, implementing,
and evaluating such services must be a collaborative effort between the
department of community, trade, and economic development and the department of
social and health services, other local, state, and federal agencies, and
community organizations. It is the intent of the legislature that the
department of community, trade, and economic development and the department of
social and health services jointly present the plan to the appropriate
committees of the legislature as required in section 3 of this act. It is the
intent of the legislature that children should not be placed or retained in the
foster care system if homelessness is the primary reason for placement or the
continuation of their placement. It is the further intent of the legislature
that services to homeless children and their families shall be provided within
funds appropriated for that specific purpose by the legislature in the
operating and capital budgets. Nothing in this act is intended to prevent the
court's review of the plan developed by the department of social and health
services and the department of community, trade, and economic development under
Washington State Coalition for the Homeless v. Department of Social and
Health Services, King County Superior Court No. 91-2-15889-4. However, it
is the intent of the legislature that the court's review in that proceeding be
confined solely to review of the plan submitted under the order of February 4,
1998. Nothing in this act is intended to grant the court continuing review
over the department of social and health services after the effective date of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall collaborate with the department of community, trade, and
economic development in the development of the coordinated and comprehensive
plan for homeless children and their families required under RCW 43.63A.650,
which designates the department of community, trade, and economic development
as the state agency with primary responsibility for providing shelter and
housing services to homeless children and their families. In fulfilling its
responsibilities to collaborate with the department of community, trade, and
economic development pursuant to RCW 43.63A.650, the department shall develop,
administer, supervise, and monitor its portion of the plan. The department's
portion of the plan shall contain at least the following elements:

(a)
Coordination or linkage of services with shelter and housing;

(b)
Accommodation and addressing the needs of homeless families in the design and
administration of department programs;

(c)
Participation of the department's local offices in the identification,
assistance, and referral of homeless families; and

(d)
Ongoing monitoring of the efficiency and effectiveness of the plan's design and
implementation.

(2)
The department shall include community organizations involved in the delivery
of services to homeless children and their families, and experts in the development
and ongoing evaluation of the plan.

(3)
The duties under this section shall be implemented within amounts appropriated
for that specific purpose by the legislature in the operating and capital
budgets.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.63A.650 and 1993 c 478 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall be the principal state department responsible for
coordinating federal and state resources and activities in housing, except for
programs administered by the Washington state housing finance commission under
chapter 43.180 RCW, and for evaluating the operations and accomplishments of
other state departments and agencies as they affect housing.

(2)
The department shall work with local governments, tribal organizations, local
housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations,
and regional or state-wide nonprofit housing assistance organizations, for the
purpose of coordinating federal and state resources with local resources for
housing.

(3)
The department shall be the principal state department responsible for
providing shelter and housing services to homeless children and their
families. The department shall have the principal responsibility to
coordinate, plan, and oversee the state's activities for developing a
coordinated and comprehensive plan to serve homeless children and their
families. The plan shall be developed collaboratively with the department of
social and health services. The department shall include community organizations
involved in the delivery of services to homeless children and their families,
and experts in the development and ongoing evaluation of the plan. The
department shall follow professionally recognized standards and procedures.
The plan shall be implemented within amounts appropriated by the legislature
for that specific purpose in the operating and capital budgets. The department
shall submit the plan to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives no later than September 1, 1999, and shall update the plan and
submit it to the appropriate committees of the legislature by January 1st of
every odd-numbered year through 2007. The plan shall address at least the
following: (a) The need for prevention assistance; (b) the need for emergency
shelter; (c) the need for transitional assistance to aid families into
permanent housing; (d) the need for linking services with shelter or housing;
and (e) the need for ongoing monitoring of the efficiency and effectiveness of
the plan's design and implementation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In order to improve services for the homeless, the department, within amounts
appropriated by the legislature for this specific purpose, shall implement a
system for the ongoing collection and analysis of data about the extent and
nature of homelessness in Washington state, giving emphasis to information
about extent and nature of homelessness in Washington state children and their
families. The system may be merged with other data gathering and reporting
systems and shall:

(a)
Protect the right of privacy of individuals;

(b)
Provide for consultation and collaboration with state agencies including the
department of social and health services, experts, and community organizations
involved in the delivery of services to homeless persons; and

(c)
Include related information held or gathered by other state agencies.

(2)
Within amounts appropriated by the legislature, for this specific purpose, the
department shall evaluate the information gathered and disseminate the analysis
and the evaluation broadly, using appropriate computer networks as well as
written reports.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall, by rule, establish program standards, eligibility standards,
eligibility criteria, and administrative rules for emergency housing programs
and specify other benefits that may arise in consultation with providers.

Sec.
6. RCW
13.34.030 and 1998 c 130 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Child" and "juvenile" means any individual under the age
of eighteen years.

(2)
"Current placement episode" means the period of time that begins with
the most recent date that the child was removed from the home of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care and
continues until the child returns home, an adoption decree, a permanent custody
order, or guardianship order is entered, or the dependency is dismissed,
whichever occurs soonest. If the most recent date of removal occurred prior to
the filing of a dependency petition under this chapter or after filing but
prior to entry of a disposition order, such time periods shall be included when
calculating the length of a child's current placement episode.

(3)
"Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation, or Indian
tribe appointed by the court pursuant to RCW 13.34.232 for the limited purpose
of assisting the court in the supervision of the dependency.

(4)
"Dependent child" means any child:

(a)
Who has been abandoned; that is, where the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian has expressed either by statement or conduct, an intent to forego,
for an extended period, parental rights or parental responsibilities despite an
ability to do so. If the court finds that the petitioner has exercised due
diligence in attempting to locate the parent, no contact between the child and
the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian for a period of three months
creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment, even if there is no expressed
intent to abandon;

(b)
Who is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by a person legally
responsible for the care of the child; or

(c)
Who has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately caring for the
child, such that the child is in circumstances which constitute a danger of
substantial damage to the child's psychological or physical development.

(5)
"Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been appointed
as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than a proceeding under
this chapter; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to
such appointment. The term "guardian" shall not include a
"dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under this
chapter.

(6)
"Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court to
represent the best interest of a child in a proceeding under this chapter, or
in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding under this chapter.
A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by the court to be the
guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform substantially the same duties
and functions as a guardian ad litem, shall be deemed to be guardian ad litem
for all purposes and uses of this chapter.

(7)
"Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized volunteer
program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the county in
which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of volunteer guardian ad
litem representation for children alleged or found to be dependent. Such
management shall include but is not limited to: Recruitment, screening,
training, supervision, assignment, and discharge of volunteers.

(8)
"Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or group
care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home, other
than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not required to
be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(9)
"Preventive services" means preservation services, as defined in
chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services, including
housing services, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home placement
while protecting the child. Housing services may include, but are not
limited to, referrals to federal, state, local, or private agencies or
organizations, assistance with forms and applications, or financial subsidies
for housing.

Sec.
7. RCW
74.13.020 and 1979 c 155 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in Title 74 RCW, child welfare services shall be defined as public social
services including adoption services which strengthen, supplement, or
substitute for, parental care and supervision for the purpose of:

(1)
Preventing or remedying, or assisting in the solution of problems which may
result in families in conflict, or the neglect, abuse, exploitation, or
criminal behavior of children;

(2)
Protecting and caring for ((homeless,)) dependent((,)) or
neglected children;

(3)
Assisting children who are in conflict with their parents, and assisting
parents who are in conflict with their children with services designed to
resolve such conflicts;

(4)
Protecting and promoting the welfare of children, including the strengthening
of their own homes where possible, or, where needed;

(5)
Providing adequate care of children away from their homes in foster family
homes or day care or other child care agencies or facilities.

As
used in this chapter, child means a person less than eighteen years of age.

The
department's duty to provide services to homeless children and their families
is set forth in section 2 of this act and in appropriations provided by the
legislature for implementation of the plan.

Sec.
8. RCW
74.13.031 and 1998 c 314 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall have the duty to provide child welfare services and shall:

(1)
Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and comprehensive
plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for the protection and
care of ((homeless,)) runaway, dependent, or neglected children.

(2)
Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of prospective adoptive
and foster homes, both regular and specialized, i.e. homes for children of
ethnic minority, including Indian homes for Indian children, sibling groups,
handicapped and emotionally disturbed, teens, pregnant and parenting teens, and
annually report to the governor and the legislature concerning the department's
success in: (a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home placements; (b)
reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home studies for
legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the passport program
required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include a section entitled
"Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations."

(3)
Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on the part of a
parent or caretaker that results in death, serious physical or emotional harm,
or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that presents an imminent risk of serious
harm, and on the basis of the findings of such investigation, offer child
welfare services in relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians,
or persons serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the
attention of an appropriate court, or another community agency: PROVIDED, That
an investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly
not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation reveals
that a crime against a child may have been committed, the department shall
notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(4)
Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to families who are
in conflict.

(5)
Monitor out-of-home placements, on a timely and routine basis, to assure the
safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is within the scope of
the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and
annually submit a report measuring the extent to which the department achieved
the specified goals to the governor and the legislature.

(6)
Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and to accept custody
of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to do so under law, to
provide child welfare services including placement for adoption, and to provide
for the physical care of such children and make payment of maintenance costs if
needed. Except where required by Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no
private adoption agency which receives children for adoption from the
department shall discriminate on the basis of race, creed, or color when
considering applications in their placement for adoption.

(7)
Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who have run away from
home and who are admitted to crisis residential centers.

(8)
Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow in general the
policy of using properly approved private agency services for the actual care
and supervision of such children insofar as they are available, paying for care
of such children as are accepted by the department as eligible for support at
reasonable rates established by the department.

(9)
Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall assist the
secretary in the development of a partnership plan for utilizing resources of
the public and private sectors, and advise on all matters pertaining to child
welfare, licensing of child care agencies, adoption, and services related
thereto. At least one member shall represent the adoption community.

(10)
Have authority to provide continued foster care or group care for individuals
from eighteen through twenty years of age to enable them to complete their high
school or vocational school program.

(11)
Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase
care for Indian children who are in the custody of a federally recognized
Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing agency pursuant to parental
consent, tribal court order, or state juvenile court order; and the purchase of
such care shall be subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of
support applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.

Notwithstanding
any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through 13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through
74.13.036, or of this section all services to be provided by the department of
social and health services under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section,
subject to the limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the federal
juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.

(12)
Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide preventive
services to children and their families that prevent or shorten the duration of
an out-of-home placement.

Sec.
9. RCW
13.34.130 and 1998 c 314 s 2 and 1998 c 130 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

If,
after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has been proven by a
preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of
RCW 13.34.030; after consideration of the predisposition report prepared
pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a disposition hearing has been held
pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court shall enter an order of disposition
pursuant to this section.

(1)
The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the case:

(a)
Order a disposition other than removal of the child from his or her home, which
shall provide a program designed to alleviate the immediate danger to the
child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child has already suffered, and to aid
the parents so that the child will not be endangered in the future. In
selecting a program, the court should choose those services, including
housing assistance, that least interfere with family autonomy, provided
that the services are adequate to protect the child.

(b)
Order that the child be removed from his or her home and ordered into the
custody, control, and care of a relative or the department of social and health
services or a licensed child placing agency for placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or in a home
not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW. Unless there is
reasonable cause to believe that the safety or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered,
such child shall be placed with a person who is related to the child as defined
in RCW 74.15.020(((4)(a))) (2)(a) and with whom the child has a
relationship and is comfortable, and who is willing and available to care for
the child. Placement of the child with a relative under this subsection shall
be given preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be
made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent
or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home and to
make it possible for the child to return home, specifying the services that
have been provided to the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, and that preventive services have been offered or provided and have
failed to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health,
safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home,
and that:

(i)
There is no parent or guardian available to care for such child;

(ii)
The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take custody of the
child;

(iii)
The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a manifest danger
exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or neglect if the child is not
removed from the home and an order under RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the
child from danger; or

(iv)
The extent of the child's disability is such that the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian is unable to provide the necessary care for the child and the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian has determined that the child would
benefit from placement outside of the home.

(2)
If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that a petition seeking
termination of the parent and child relationship be filed if the court finds:
(a) Termination is recommended by the supervising agency; (b) termination is in
the best interests of the child; and (c) that because of the existence of
aggravated circumstances, reasonable efforts to unify the family are not
required. Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated circumstances,
reasonable efforts may be required if the court or department determines it is
in the best interest of the child. In determining whether aggravated
circumstances exist, the court shall consider one or more of the following:

(i)
Conviction of the parent of rape of the child in the first, second, or third
degree as defined in RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079;

(ii)
Conviction of the parent of criminal mistreatment of the child in the first or
second degree as defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and 9A.42.030;

(iii)
Conviction of the parent of one of the following assault crimes, when the child
is the victim: Assault in the first or second degree as defined in RCW
9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021 or assault of a child in the first or second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.36.120 or 9A.36.130;

(iv)
Conviction of the parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide by abuse of the
child's other parent, sibling, or another child;

(v)
Conviction of the parent of attempting, soliciting, or conspiracy to commit a
crime listed in (c)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection;

(vi)
A finding by a court that a parent is a sexually violent predator as defined in
RCW 71.09.020;

(vii)
Failure of the parent to complete available treatment ordered under this
chapter or the equivalent laws of another state, where such failure has
resulted in a prior termination of parental rights to another child and the
parent has failed to effect significant change in the interim. In the case of
a parent of an Indian child, as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, P.L.
95-608 (25 U.S.C. (([Sec.])) Sec. 1903), the court shall also
consider tribal efforts to assist the parent in completing treatment and make
it possible for the child to return home;

(viii)
An infant under three years of age has been abandoned as defined in RCW
13.34.030(4)(a);

(ix)
The mother has given birth to three or more drug-affected infants, resulting in
the department filing a petition under section 23 of this act.

(3)
If reasonable efforts are not ordered under subsection (2) of this section a
permanency ((plan [planning])) planning hearing shall be held
within thirty days. Reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a
timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

(4)
Whenever a child is ordered removed from the child's home, the agency charged
with his or her care shall provide the court with:

(a)
A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the following outcomes as
a primary goal and may identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; or long-term
relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written
agreement between the parties and the care provider; and independent living, if
appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older. Whenever a permanency
plan identifies independent living as a goal, the plan shall also specifically
identify the services that will be provided to assist the child to make a
successful transition from foster care to independent living. Before the court
approves independent living as a permanency plan of care, the court shall make
a finding that the provision of services to assist the child in making a
transition from foster care to independent living will allow the child to
manage his or her financial affairs and to manage his or her personal, social,
educational, and nonfinancial affairs. The department shall not discharge a
child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of
age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.

(b)
Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that
a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to return the child home, and what actions the
agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.

(i)
The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be offered in
order to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents must meet
in order to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and parental
requirement.

(ii)
The agency shall be required to encourage the maximum parent-child contact
possible, including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the
care of the child while the child is in placement. Visitation may be limited
or denied only if the court determines that such limitation or denial is
necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare.

(iii)
A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as possible, preferably in
the child's own neighborhood, unless the court finds that placement at a greater
distance is necessary to promote the child's or parents' well-being.

(iv)
The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the agency, or within the
community, or those services which the department of social and health services
has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services.

(c)
If the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the child, services
to be offered or provided to the child, and, if visitation would be in the best
interests of the child, a recommendation to the court regarding visitation
between parent and child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination
petition. The agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for
the parents or provide services to the parents.

(5)
If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable efforts to prevent
or eliminate the need to remove the child from his or her home or to safely
return the child home should not be part of the permanency plan of care for the
child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner
and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent
placement of the child.

(6)
If there is insufficient information at the time of the disposition hearing
upon which to base a determination regarding the suitability of a proposed
placement with a relative, the child shall remain in foster care and the court
shall direct the supervising agency to conduct necessary background
investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report the results of such
investigation to the court within thirty days. However, if such relative
appears otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment, the
criminal history background check need not be completed before placement, but
as soon as possible after placement. Any placements with relatives, pursuant
to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation by the relative with the
agency case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders regarding
parent-child contacts and any other conditions imposed by the court.
Noncompliance with the case plan or court order shall be grounds for removal of
the child from the relative's home, subject to review by the court.

(7)
Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen review board under
chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found to be dependent shall be
reviewed by the court at least every six months from the beginning date of the
placement episode or the date dependency is established, whichever is first, at
a hearing in which it shall be determined whether court supervision should
continue. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and parental
completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary, revised
permanency time limits. The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and their right to an
opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only
if that person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to any
person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.

(a)
A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless the court finds
that a reason for removal as set forth in this section no longer exists. The
parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall report to the court the efforts
they have made to correct the conditions which led to removal. If a child is
returned, casework supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at
which time there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.

(b)
If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in writing:

(i)
Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to the parties to
facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or offered;

(ii)
Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate
to the child's needs, including whether consideration and preference has been
given to placement with the child's relatives;

(iii)
Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether the placement is
appropriate;

(iv)
Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the child, the child's
parents, and the agency supervising the placement;

(v)
Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems that necessitated
the child's placement in out-of-home care;

(vi)
Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why visitation has
not occurred or has been infrequent;

(vii)
Whether additional services, including housing assistance, are needed to
facilitate the return of the child to the child's parents; if so, the court
shall order that reasonable services be offered specifying such services; and

(viii)
The projected date by which the child will be returned home or other permanent
plan of care will be implemented.

(c)
The court at the review hearing may order that a petition seeking termination
of the parent and child relationship be filed.

(8) The court's ability to order housing assistance under this
section is: (a) Limited to cases in which homelessness or the lack of adequate
and safe housing is the primary reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b)
subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.

---
END ---