BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Although Washington offers comprehensive health coverage to low-income
children, as many as ninety thousand eligible children are not enrolled.
Children's access to timely and appropriate health care is essential to their
ability to receive a good education, become productive workers, and be
empowered to help fellow citizens in need. For that reason, it is paramount
that as many eligible children as possible be enrolled in available state
health care programs.

(2)
No later than September 1, 1999, the secretary of social and health services,
the administrator of the state health care authority, and the superintendent of
public instruction shall implement a children's health care outreach program to
inform children and their parents of the availability of the medical assistance
program and the basic health plan. Outreach information shall explain, in an
easy to understand presentation, at least: Eligibility standards; program benefits;
and the importance and advantages of a child's enrollment. Outreach
information must be available in the English and Spanish languages and may be
available in other languages if deemed appropriate by the agencies. Prior to
implementation, the agencies shall analyze available research on reasons why
eligible children are not enrolled and review existing outreach programs deemed
successful.

(3)
The agencies shall seek and are authorized to receive private and public gifts
or grants that would assist in the funding of the outreach program.

(4) The agencies shall submit to the appropriate committees of the
legislature an outline of the program's design by August 1, 1999, and a brief
status report of the program's implementation by August 1, 2000.

---
END ---