BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
27.12.222 and 1984 c 186 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

A rural county library district, intercounty rural library
district, or island library district may contract indebtedness and issue
general obligation bonds not to exceed an amount, together with any outstanding
nonvoter approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to one-tenth of one
percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term
"value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36 015. The
maximum term of nonvoter approved general obligation bonds shall not exceed ((six))
twenty years. A rural county library district, island library district,
or intercounty rural library district may additionally contract indebtedness
and issue general obligation bonds for capital purposes only, together with any
outstanding general indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to one-half of
one percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the
term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015
whenever a proposition authorizing the issuance of such bonds has been approved
by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 39.36.050, by three-fifths of the
persons voting on the proposition at which election the number of persons
voting on the proposition shall constitute not less than forty percent of the
total number of votes cast in such taxing district at the last preceding
general election. If the voters shall so authorize at an election held pursuant
to RCW 39.36.050, the district may levy annual taxes in excess of normal legal
limitations to pay the principal and interest upon such bonds as they shall
become due. The excess levies mentioned in this section or in RCW 84.52.052 or
84.52.056 may be made notwithstanding anything contained in RCW 27.12.050 or
27.12.150 or any other statute pertaining to such library districts.

---
END ---