BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.190 RCW to read as follows:

The department of social and health services shall indemnify and
hold harmless school districts for all excess costs incurred in the good faith
performance, or as an incident to the good faith performance, of duties
associated with Green Hill School under this chapter. Excess costs means
direct and indirect costs that exceed the state, federal, and private moneys
otherwise made available to a district for the performance of duties associated
with Green Hill School under this chapter. Disputes arising under this section
shall be resolved in accordance with the alternative dispute resolution method
or methods specified in the contract required under RCW 28A.190.050.

---
END ---