BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.345 and 1979 ex.s. c 216 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The establishment of reservations of water for agriculture, hydroelectric
energy, municipal, industrial, and other beneficial uses under RCW 90.54.050(1)
or minimum flows or levels under RCW 90.22.010 or 90.54.040 shall constitute
appropriations within the meaning of this chapter with priority dates as of the
effective dates of their establishment. Whenever an application for a permit
to make beneficial use of public waters embodied in a reservation, established
after September 1, 1979, is filed with the department of ecology after the
effective date of such reservation, the priority date for a permit issued
pursuant to an approval by the department of ecology of the application shall
be the effective date of the reservation.

(2)
A water right for instream use may be held by the state through the
establishment of a reservation or minimum flow or level as described in
subsection (1) of this section or may be held by the state as a trust water
right under chapter 90.38 or 90.42 RCW. A water right for instream use may
also be established, changed, transferred, or amended under this chapter or
chapter 90.44 RCW in the manner prescribed for a water right for any other use
and may be held as an appropriative right by any person or entity whatsoever.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.14.140 and 1998 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, "sufficient
cause" shall be defined as the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by
the owner of a water right for a period of five or more consecutive years where
such nonuse occurs as a result of:

(a)
Drought, or other unavailability of water;

(b)
Active service in the armed forces of the United States during military crisis;

(c)
Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;

(d)
The operation of legal proceedings;

(e)
Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands or water rights
which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the owner of the water right;

(f)
Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either directly or through
the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal program implementing those
laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas.

(2)
Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there
shall be no relinquishment of any water right:

(a)
If such right is claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW
and annual license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b)
If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time
of drought or other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion
facilities are maintained in good operating condition for the use of such
reserve or standby water supply;

(c)
If such right is claimed for a determined future development to take place
either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use
of the water right, whichever date is later;

(d)
If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter
90.03 RCW;

(e)
If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions
of RCW 90.40.030; ((or))

(f)
If such right or portion of the right is leased to another person for use on
land other than the land to which the right is appurtenant as long as the
lessee makes beneficial use of the right in accordance with this chapter and a
transfer or change of the right has been approved by the department in
accordance with RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.383, 90.03.390, or 90.44.100; or

(g) If such right is held for instream use.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.38.020 and 1989 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may acquire water rights, including but not limited to storage
rights, by purchase, gift, or other appropriate means other than by
condemnation, from any person or entity or combination of persons or entities.
Once acquired, such rights are trust water rights. A water right acquired
by the state that is expressly conditioned to limit its use to instream
purposes shall be administered as a trust water right in compliance with that
condition.

(2)
The department may make such other arrangements, including entry into contracts
with other persons or entities as appropriate to ensure that trust water rights
acquired in accordance with this chapter can be exercised to the fullest
possible extent.

(3)
The trust water rights may be acquired on a temporary or permanent basis.

Sec.
4. RCW
90.42.080 and 1993 c 98 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state may acquire all or portions of existing water rights, by purchase,
gift, or other appropriate means other than by condemnation, from any person or
entity or combination of persons or entities. Once acquired, such rights are
trust water rights. A water right acquired by the state that is expressly
conditioned to limit its use to instream purposes shall be administered as a
trust water right in compliance with that condition.

(2)
The department may enter into leases, contracts, or such other arrangements
with other persons or entities as appropriate, to ensure that trust water
rights acquired in accordance with this chapter may be exercised to the fullest
possible extent.

(3)
Trust water rights may be acquired by the state on a temporary or permanent
basis.

(4)
The provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.03.390 apply to transfers of water
rights under this section.

(5) No funds may be expended for the purchase of water rights by
the state pursuant to this section unless specifically appropriated for this
purpose by the legislature.

---
END ---