BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the
county voters, and if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons
voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter for the purposes designated in subsection (3) of this section.

(2)
The tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by
the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the county. The rate of tax shall equal one-tenth of one percent
of the selling price in the case of sales tax, or value of the article used, in
the case of a use tax.

(3)
Moneys received from any tax imposed under this section shall be used solely
for the purpose of providing funds for costs associated with financing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling,
repairing, reequipping, and improvement of emergency communication systems and
facilities.

(4) Counties are authorized to develop joint ventures to collocate
emergency communication systems and facilities.

---
END ---