BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.36.060 and 1991 c 81 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
opening and subsequent processing of return identification envelopes for
any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day prior to such primary
or election. The opening of the security envelopes and tabulation of absentee
ballots shall not commence until after 8:00 ((o'clock)) p.m. on the day
of the primary or election.

After
opening the return identification envelopes, the county canvassing board
or its representative shall place all of the ((ballot)) inner
security envelopes in containers that can be secured with numbered seals.
These sealed containers shall be stored in a secure location until after 8:00
((o'clock)) p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be
taken from the inner security envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation before sealing
the containers.

The
canvassing board shall examine the postmark, statement, and signature on each
return identification envelope containing the security envelope and
absentee ballot. An absentee ballot may be counted only if the return
identification envelope was signed by the date of the primary or election for
which it was issued and was either returned before the close of the polls on
the day of the primary or election for which it was issued or has a date of
mailing by the date of the primary or election for which it was issued.
They shall verify that the voter's signature is the same as that in the
registration files for that voter. The date of mailing is the postmark
date. However, for absentee voters other than ((out-of-state voters,))
overseas voters((,)) and service voters, if the postmark is illegible, and
for overseas voters and service voters, the date on the return identification
envelope to which the voter attests shall determine the validity, as to the ((time
of voting)) date of mailing, of that absentee ballot under this
chapter. For any absentee voter, a variation between the signature of the
voter on the return envelope and that in the registration files due to the
substitution of initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as
the surname and handwriting are clearly the same.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.36.139 and 1993 c 417 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A mail ballot shall be counted only if it is returned in the return identification
envelope, if the envelope is signed by the registered voter to whom the ballot
is issued and was returned or has a date of mailing as provided for an
absentee ballot under RCW 29.36.060, and if the signature is verified as
provided in this subsection. The county auditor shall verify the signature of
each voter on the return identification envelope with the signature on the
voter's registration record. A person who votes or attempts to vote more than
once in a mail ballot election is subject to the penalties provided in chapter
29.85 RCW.

(2) Any mail ballot may be challenged in the same manner as an
absentee ballot.

---
END ---