BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.25.020 and 1967 ex.s. c 137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((There shall be paid by)) Whenever the state is the
condemnor, it shall pay in respect of each parcel of real property
acquired by eminent domain or by consent under threat thereof, in addition to
the fair market value of the property, a sum equal to the various expenditures
actually and reasonably incurred by those with an interest or interests in said
parcel in the process of evaluating the condemnor's offer to buy the same, but
not to exceed a total of seven hundred fifty dollars. Whenever an entity
other than the state is the condemnor, it shall also pay for these identified
expenditures, but the amount may not exceed a total of two hundred
dollars. In the case of multiple interests in a parcel, the division of such
sum shall be determined by the court or by agreement of the parties.

---
END ---