BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.02.150 and 1986 c 234 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After the filing of any petition for incorporation with the county auditor, and
pending its final disposition as provided for in this chapter, no other
petition for incorporation which embraces any of the territory included therein
shall be acted upon by the county auditor, the county legislative authority, or
the boundary review board, or by any other public official or body that might
otherwise be empowered to receive or act upon such a petition: PROVIDED, That
any petition for incorporation may be withdrawn by a majority of the signers
thereof at any time before such petition has been certified by the county
auditor to the county legislative authority: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a new
petition may be substituted therefor that embraces other or different
boundaries, incorporation as a city or town operating under a different title
of law, or for incorporation as a city or town operating under a different plan
or form of government, by a majority of the signers of the original
incorporation petition, at any time before the original petition has been
certified by the county auditor to the county legislative authority, in which
case the same proceedings shall be taken as in the case of an original
petition.

(2)
A boundary review board, county auditor, county legislative authority, or any
other public official or body may not act upon a petition for annexation
before considering or acting upon a petition for incorporation which embraces some
or all of the same territory, without regard to priority of filing.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
35.02.155 and 1994 c 216 s 5 are each repealed.

---
END ---