BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.19 RCW to read as follows:

A county auditor may conduct the voting in the presidential
preference primary entirely by mail ballot using the procedures set forth in
RCW 29.36.121 through 29.36.139.

---
END ---