BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.28.065 and 1988 c 81 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of ((ten)) eleven
members to be appointed by the governor with the advice of the director of
labor and industries as herein provided. It shall be the purpose and function
of the board to advise the director on all matters pertaining to the
enforcement of this chapter including, but not limited to standards of
electrical installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the adoption of
rules and regulations pertaining to the electrical inspection division:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no rules or regulations shall be amended or repealed
until the electrical board has first had an opportunity to consider any
proposed amendments or repeals and had an opportunity to make recommendations
to the director relative thereto.

(2)
The members of the electrical board shall be selected and appointed as follows:

(a)
One member shall be an employee or officer of a corporation or public agency
generating or distributing electric power;

(b)
Three members shall be licensed electrical contractors((: PROVIDED,
That)). However, one of these members may be a representative of a
trade association in the electrical industry;

(c)
One member shall be an employee, or officer, or representative of a
corporation or firm engaged in the business of manufacturing or distributing
electrical materials, equipment, or devices;

(d)
One member shall be a person with knowledge of the electrical industry, not
related to the electrical industry, to represent the public;

(e)
Three members shall be certified electricians; ((and))

(f)
One member shall be a licensed professional electrical engineer qualified
to do business in the state of Washington; and

(g)
One member shall be an outside line worker.

(3)
The regular term of each member shall be four years((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,)).
The original board shall be appointed on June 9, 1988((, for the following
terms:)). The first term of the member representing a corporation
or public agency generating or distributing electric power shall serve four
years; two members representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve
three years; the member representing a manufacturer or distributor of
electrical equipment or devices shall serve three years; the member
representing the public and one member representing licensed electrical
contractors shall serve two years; the three members selected as certified
electricians shall serve for terms of one, two, and three years, respectively;
the member selected as the licensed professional electrical engineer shall
serve for one year. The first term for the member representing outside line
workers is for four years. In appointing the original board, the governor
shall give due consideration to the value of continuity in membership from
predecessor boards. ((Thereafter,))

(4)
The governor shall appoint or reappoint board members for terms of four
years and to fill vacancies created by the completion of the terms of the
original members. The governor shall also fill vacancies caused by death,
resignation, or otherwise for the unexpired term of such members by appointing
their successors from the same business classification. The same procedure
shall be followed in making such subsequent appointments as is provided for the
original appointments.

(5)
The board, at ((this)) its first meeting after the effective
date of this act shall elect one of its members to serve as ((chairman))
chair. Any person acting as the chief electrical inspector shall serve
as secretary of the board during his or her tenure as chief state
inspector. Meetings of the board shall be held at least quarterly in
accordance with a schedule established by the board. Each member of the board
shall receive compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060
which shall be paid out of the electrical license fund, upon vouchers approved
by the director ((of labor and industries)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
governor shall appoint the member representing outside line workers within
ninety days after the effective date of this act.

---
END ---