BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the original intent for RCW 28A.315.250 was to reduce
the number of school districts in the state from approximately two thousand
seven hundred and that this objective has been achieved by reduction to two
hundred ninety-six school districts. The current functioning of this statute
can result in the elimination of a separate school district through annexation
by a municipality without any action by either the small school district or the
city-wide school district. The legislature intends to protect the current identity
of small school districts vulnerable to such consolidation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
28A.315.250 and 1997 c 47 s 1, 1985 c 385 s 19, 1975 1st ex.s. c
275 s 90, 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 126, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.150 are each
repealed.

---
END ---