BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
80.04.130 and 1998 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever any public service company shall file with the commission any
schedule, classification, rule or regulation, the effect of which is to change
any rate, charge, rental or toll theretofore charged, the commission shall have
power, either upon its own motion ((or)), upon complaint, or
as provided in RCW 80.28.060(2), upon notice, to enter upon a hearing
concerning such proposed change and the reasonableness and justness thereof,
and pending such hearing and the decision thereon the commission may suspend
the operation of such rate, charge, rental or toll for a period not exceeding
ten months from the time the same would otherwise go into effect, and after a
full hearing the commission may make such order in reference thereto as would
be provided in a hearing initiated after the same had become effective. The
commission shall not suspend a tariff that makes a decrease in a rate, charge,
rental, or toll filed by a telecommunications company pending investigation of
the fairness, justness, and reasonableness of the decrease when the filing does
not contain any offsetting increase to another rate, charge, rental, or toll
and the filing company agrees to not file for an increase to any rate, charge,
rental, or toll to recover the revenue deficit that results from the decrease
for a period of one year. The filing company shall file with any decrease
sufficient information as the commission by rule may require to demonstrate the
decreased rate, charge, rental, or toll is above the long run incremental cost
of the service. A tariff decrease that results in a rate that is below long
run incremental cost, or is contrary to commission rule or order, or the
requirements of this chapter, shall be rejected for filing and returned to the
company. The commission may prescribe a different rate to be effective on the
prospective date stated in its final order after its investigation, if it
concludes based on the record that the originally filed and effective rate is
unjust, unfair, or unreasonable.

For
the purposes of this section, tariffs for the following telecommunications
services, that temporarily waive or reduce charges for existing or new
subscribers for a period not to exceed sixty days in order to promote the use
of the services shall be considered tariffs that decrease rates, charges,
rentals, or tolls:

(a)
Custom calling service;

(b)
Second access lines; or

(c)
Other services the commission specifies by rule.

The
commission may suspend any promotional tariff other than those listed in (a)
through (c) of this subsection.

The
commission may suspend the initial tariff filing of any water company removed
from and later subject to commission jurisdiction because of the number of
customers or the average annual gross revenue per customer provisions of RCW
80.04.010. The commission may allow temporary rates during the suspension period.
These rates shall not exceed the rates charged when the company was last
regulated. Upon a showing of good cause by the company, the commission may
establish a different level of temporary rates.

(2)
At any hearing involving any change in any schedule, classification, rule or
regulation the effect of which is to increase any rate, charge, rental or toll
theretofore charged, the burden of proof to show that such increase is just and
reasonable shall be upon the public service company.

(3)
The implementation of mandatory local measured telecommunications service is a
major policy change in available telecommunications service. The commission
shall not accept for filing a price list, nor shall it accept for filing or
approve, prior to June 1, 2001, a tariff filed by a telecommunications company
which imposes mandatory local measured service on any customer or class of
customers, except that, upon finding that it is in the public interest, the
commission may accept for filing a price list or it may accept for filing and
approve a tariff that imposes mandatory measured service for a
telecommunications company's extended area service or foreign exchange
service. This subsection does not apply to land, air, or marine mobile
service, or to pay telephone service, or to any service which has been
traditionally offered on a measured service basis.

(4)
The implementation of Washington telephone assistance program service is a
major policy change in available telecommunications service. The
implementation of Washington telephone assistance program service will aid in
achieving the stated goal of universal telephone service.

(5)
If a utility claims a sales or use tax exemption on the pollution control
equipment for an electrical generation facility and abandons the generation
facility before the pollution control equipment is fully depreciated, any
tariff filing for a rate increase to recover abandonment costs for the
pollution control equipment shall be considered unjust and unreasonable for the
purposes of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
80.28.060 and 1989 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the commission otherwise orders, no change shall be made in any rate or
charge or in any form of contract or agreement or in any rule or regulation
relating to any rate, charge or service, or in any general privilege or
facility which shall have been filed and published by a gas company, electrical
company or water company in compliance with the requirements of RCW 80.28.050 except
after thirty days' notice to the commission and publication for thirty days,
which notice shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the
schedule then in force and the time when the change will go into effect and all
proposed changes shall be shown by printing, filing and publishing new
schedules, or shall be plainly indicated upon the schedules in force at the
time and kept open to public inspection. Proposed changes may be suspended by
the commission within thirty days or before the stated effective date of the
proposed change, whichever is later. The commission, for good cause shown, may
allow changes without requiring the thirty days' notice by duly filing, in such
manner as it may direct, an order specifying the changes so to be made and the
time when it shall take effect. All such changes shall be immediately
indicated upon its schedules by the company affected. When any change is made
in any rate or charge, form of contract or agreement, or any rule or regulation
relating to any rate or charge or service, or in any general privilege or
facility, the effect of which is to increase any rate or charge, then in
existence, attention shall be directed on the copy filed with the commission to
such increase by some character immediately preceding or following the item in
such schedule, such character to be in form as designated by the commission.

(2) If, within the thirty days following a water company's
filing for a proposed change in rates or charges, ten percent or more of the
water company's customers request a formal hearing on the proposed changes, the
commission shall set the matter for hearing as provided for in RCW 80.04.130.
The commission may, in its discretion, suspend the proposed changes pending the
hearing or may issue an order approving an interim change.

---
END ---