BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.015 and 1987 c 109 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(2)
"Director" means the director of ecology; ((and))

(3)
"Person" means any firm, association, water users' association,
corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation, as well as an
individual;

(4)
"Municipal water supply purposes" means use of water to satisfy the
needs of a city, town, or county. It also includes the use of water provided
by a public utility district organized under chapter 54.04 RCW, a water-sewer
district organized under Title 57 RCW, a port district organized under Title 53
RCW, an irrigation district organized under Title 87 RCW providing water for
purposes in addition to irrigation, or a group A public water system as defined
in chapter 70.119 RCW or by department of health or board of health rule. A
group A public water system only qualifies under this definition if it is
required to serve potential customers under chapter 70.116 or 43.20 RCW, and
also provides water for domestic use and two or more of the following
associated uses: Commercial, industrial, or public facilities water use; and

(5)
"Public facilities" means public buildings occupied by full-time
public employees, including but not limited to public schools, staffed fire
stations, police stations, and county buildings, but does not include fire
protection systems of mains and hydrants, irrigation systems, unstaffed
structures, or other unoccupied public facilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.14.031 and 1969 ex.s. c 284 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and
phrases as used in ((RCW 90.14.031 through 90.14.121)) this chapter
shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Person" shall mean an individual, partnership, association, public
or private corporation, city or other municipality, county, or a state agency,
and the United States of America when claiming water rights established under
the laws of the state of Washington.

(2)
"Beneficial use" shall include, but not be limited to, use for
domestic water, irrigation, fish, shellfish, game and other aquatic life,
municipal, recreation, industrial water, generation of electric power, and
navigation.

(3)
"Municipal water supply purposes" means use of water to satisfy the
needs of a city, town, or county. It also includes the use of water provided
by a public utility district organized under chapter 54.04 RCW, a water-sewer
district organized under Title 57 RCW, a port district organized under Title 53
RCW, an irrigation district organized under Title 87 RCW providing water for
purposes in addition to irrigation, or a group A public water system as defined
in chapter 70.119 RCW or by department of health or board of health rule. A
group A public water system only qualifies under this definition if it is
required to serve potential customers under chapter 70.116 or 43.20 RCW, and also
provides water for domestic use and two or more of the following associated
uses: Commercial, industrial, or public facilities water use.

(4) "Public facilities" means public buildings
occupied by full-time public employees, including but not limited to public
schools, staffed fire stations, police stations, and county buildings, but does
not include fire protection systems of mains and hydrants, irrigation systems,
unstaffed structures, or other unoccupied public facilities.

---
END ---