BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the department investigates a therapeutic or treatment foster home for an
allegation of an improper action and the child is removed from the home, the
foster home shall continue to receive payment for the care of the child until
the department determines if the allegation is founded or criminal charges are
filed.

(2) For the purpose of this section a "therapeutic or
treatment foster home" is a licensed foster family which has been
identified to care for extremely behaviorally/emotionally disturbed children
who cannot function in a family home without specialized treatment and
expertise.

---
END ---