BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.78.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the demands of the workplace and of families need to be
balanced to promote family stability and economic security. Changes in
workplace leave policies are desirable to accommodate changes in the work force
such as rising numbers of dual-career couples and working single parents. In
addition, given the mobility of American society, many people no longer have
available community or family support networks and therefore need additional
flexibility in the workplace to meet their family responsibilities. The
legislature declares it to be in the public interest to provide reasonable
family leave for caring for a child upon the birth or adoption of ((a))
the child ((and to care)), for caring for a child under
eighteen years old with a terminal health condition, and for meeting other
family responsibilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.78.005 and 1997 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
cease to administer and enforce this chapter beginning on July 27, 1997, and
until the earlier of the following dates:

(a)
The effective date of the repeal of the federal family and medical leave act of
1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6); or

(b)
July 1st of the year following the year in which amendments to the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat.
6) take effect that provide less family leave than is provided under RCW
49.78.030. In determining whether the federal law provides the same or more
leave, the department shall only consider whether (i) the total period of leave
allowed under the amended federal law is twelve or more workweeks in a
twenty-four month period, and (ii) the types of leave authorized under the
amended federal law are similar to the types authorized ((in this chapter))
under RCW 49.78.030.

(2)(a)
The following provisions of this chapter shall be in effect:

(i)
An employee's right under RCW 49.78.070(1)(b) to be returned to a workplace
within twenty miles of the employee's workplace when leave commenced ((shall
remain in effect)).

(ii)
The leave required under section 4 of this act.

(iii)
An employee's entitlement to leave for sickness or temporary disability because
of pregnancy or childbirth, which shall be in addition to the family leave
required by 29 U.S.C. ((29.2612)) Sec. 2612(a)(1)(A) and
(B) of the federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L.
103-3, 107 Stat. 6) ((shall be in addition to any leave for sickness or
temporary disability because of pregnancy or childbirth)).

(b)
The department shall enforce this subsection under RCW 49.78.140 through
49.78.190, except that an initial notice of infraction shall state that the
employer has thirty days in which to take corrective action. No infraction or
penalty may be assessed if the employer complies with the requirements of the
initial notice of infraction.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.78.020 and 1996 c 178 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Child" means a biological or adopted child, or a stepchild, living
with the employee.

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Employee" means a person other than an independent contractor
employed by an employer on a continuous basis for the previous fifty-two weeks
for at least thirty-five hours per week.

(4)
Except as provided in section 4 of this act, "employer"
means: (a) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership, business trust, legal
representative, or other business entity which engages in any business, industry,
profession, or activity in this state and includes any unit of local government
including, but not limited to, a county, city, town, municipal corporation,
quasi-municipal corporation, or political subdivision, which (i) employed a
daily average of one hundred or more employees during the last calendar quarter
at the place where the employee requesting leave reports for work, or (ii)
employed a daily average of one hundred or more employees during the last
calendar quarter within a twenty mile radius of the place where the employee
requesting leave reports for work, where the employer maintains a central
hiring location and customarily transfers employees among workplaces; and (b)
the state, state institutions, and state agencies.

(5)
"Family leave" means leave from employment ((to care for a newborn
or newly adopted child under the age of six or a child under eighteen years old
with a terminal health condition,)) as provided in RCW 49.78.030 and
section 4 of this act.

(6)
"Health care provider" means a person licensed as a physician under
chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57
RCW.

(7)
"Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent, or a stepparent.

(8)
"Reduced leave schedule" means leave scheduled for fewer than an
employee's usual number of hours or days per workweek.

(9)
"Terminal health condition" means a condition caused by injury,
disease, or illness, that, within reasonable medical judgment, is incurable and
will produce death within the period of leave to which the employee is
entitled.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to other family leave to which the employee is entitled under this
chapter or federal law, an employee is entitled to ten work days of family
leave during any twelve-month period to:

(a)
Participate in educational activities involving the employee's child in a
primary or secondary public school program including, but not limited to,
school conferences and other school meetings, classroom and school-sponsored
sports activities, and educational enrichment programs;

(b)
Provide assistance to the employee's child, spouse, or parent, or spouse's
parent when there is an urgent need to resolve a critical or time-sensitive
personal issue, including, by way of illustration and not as a limitation,
arranging emergency day care or residential care in a facility or arranging for
and accompanying the family member to nonroutine diagnostic testing;

(c)
Participate with the employee's child, spouse, or parent, or spouse's parent in
group activities sponsored for children or families, or both, by a community
organization;

(d)
Obtain services related to issues arising from domestic violence and
participate in a course of treatment for physical and psychological injuries,
or both, resulting from domestic violence.

(2)
An employer may require that the leave provided under this section:

(a)
Be unpaid. If an employer provides paid leave for the purposes covered in
subsection (1) of this section for fewer than ten work days in a twelve-month
period, the additional hours of leave added to attain the ten-day total may be
unpaid; and

(b)
Be taken after an employee first uses the employee's total accumulated leave,
not including leave under this chapter, to which the employee is otherwise
entitled. However, the employer is not required to allow an employee to use
the employee's other leave in place of the leave provided under this section.

(3)
An employer may require that a request for leave under this section be
supported by reasonable information or a certification for verification
purposes.

(4)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an employee planning to take
leave under this section must provide the employer with written notice at least
five days in advance of the anticipated date or dates of leave, stating the
dates during which the employee intends to take the leave. If the employee
fails to give the required notice, the employer may deny that request for
leave.

(b)
If, because of an emergency, leave under this section is not foreseeable five
or more days before the leave is to take place, the employee is not required to
give notice but must make a reasonable effort to schedule the leave so as not
to unduly disrupt the operations of the employer.

(5)
As used in this section, "employer" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other
business entity that engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity
in this state and employs eight or more employees, the state, state
institutions, state agencies, and any unit of local government, including but
not limited to, a county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or political subdivision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. With
respect to employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement in effect on
the effective date of this section or an employee benefit plan with a stated
year ending on or after the effective date of this section, this act does not
apply until the later of: (1) The first day following expiration of the
collective bargaining agreement; or (2) the first day of the next plan year, as
applicable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW
49.78.005 is recodified as a section in chapter 49.78 RCW, to be codified
between RCW 49.78.010 and 49.78.020.

---
END ---