BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that the labeling language applied to specialty
fertilizer products sold in Washington state not be so restrictive as to
inhibit the sales of such products either intrastate or interstate. The
wording of the label should be acceptable to the American plant food control officials
which is an organization composed of agricultural regulators from all states.

Sec.
2. RCW
15.54.340 and 1998 c 36 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except under (f), (g), and (h) of this subsection, any commercial
fertilizer distributed in this state shall have placed on or affixed to the
package a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous form the
following information:

(a)
The net weight;

(b)
The product name, brand, and grade. The grade is not required if no primary
nutrients are claimed;

(c)
The guaranteed analysis;

(d)
The name and address of the registrant or licensee. The name and address of
the manufacturer, if different from the registrant or licensee, may also be
stated;

(e)
Any information required under WAC 296-62-054;

(f)
((At a minimum)) Except for specialty fertilizers, the following
labeling statement: "This product has been registered with the Washington
State Department of Agriculture. When applied as directed, this fertilizer
meets the Washington standards for arsenic, cadmium, cobalt, mercury,
molybdenum, lead, nickel, selenium, and zinc. You have the right to receive
specific information about Washington standards from the distributor of this
product.";

(g)
Except for specialty fertilizers, after July 1, 1999, the label must
also state: "Information received by the Washington State Department of
Agriculture regarding the components in this product is available on the
internet at http://www.wa.gov/agr/."; ((and))

(h)
For specialty fertilizers, the following labeling statement: "When
applied as directed, this product meets the guidelines for metals adopted by
the association of American plant food control officials"; and

(i)
Other information as required by the department by rule.

(2)
If a commercial fertilizer is distributed in bulk, a written or printed
statement of the information required by subsection (1) of this section shall
accompany delivery and be supplied to the purchaser at the time of delivery.

(3)
Each delivery of a customer-formula fertilizer shall be subject to containing
those ingredients specified by the purchaser, which ingredients shall be shown
on the statement or invoice with the amount contained therein, and a record of
all invoices of customer-formula grade mixes shall be kept by the registrant or
licensee for a period of twelve months and shall be available to the department
upon request: PROVIDED, That each such delivery shall be accompanied by either
a statement, invoice, a delivery slip, or a label if bagged, containing the
following information: The net weight; the brand; the guaranteed analysis
which may be stated to the nearest tenth of a percent or to the next lower
whole number; the name and address of the registrant or licensee, or
manufacturer, or both; and the name and address of the purchaser.

(4) Any person who distributes a commercial fertilizer in this
state shall make available to the purchaser on request, a copy of standards for
metals established in RCW 15.54.800.

---
END ---