BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Having considered the effect of current state law that authorizes the filing of
separate charges for failure to appear for a court hearing and the difficulty
courts have in obtaining court-imposed financial obligations from probationers,
the legislature finds:

(1)
A significant number of persons booked into jail have failed to pay
court-imposed financial obligations;

(2)
Persons arrested on warrant for failure to pay financial obligations are often
ordered to serve jail time in lieu of paying those obligations, but that result
serves less as a deterrent than it does as a convenient way for violators to
satisfy financial obligations at the expense of the system, which not only goes
unpaid for the moneys owed, but also must pay additionally to house those who
are ordered to serve out financial obligations;

(3)
Under RCW 7.84.060, failure to respond to a notice of infraction as promised to
appear and failure to appear at a requested hearing on an infraction may be
charged as a misdemeanor, but that scheme often results in persons' accruing a
series of failure to appear charges without any resolution that benefits the
court;

(4)
Failure to appear charges tend to tax the limited resources of courts of
limited jurisdiction, prosecutors, police, and corrections departments;

(5)
Under RCW 3.02.045, courts of limited jurisdiction may use collection agencies
to collect unpaid court-imposed financial obligations on infractions and
criminal cases;

(6)
Significant savings of resources may be achieved when persons fail to appear
for hearings on infractions, or when probationers fail to pay fines in cases
not involving violence or driving under the influence, if courts merely impose
maximum fines and forward the obligations to collection agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 3.02 RCW to read as follows:

The
power of courts of limited jurisdiction, under RCW 2.28.010(4), to compel
obedience to judgments, decrees, orders, and process, are limited as follows:

(1)
A court of limited jurisdiction shall not allow a probationer to serve jail
time in lieu of a financial obligation.

(2)
A court of limited jurisdiction dealing with a probationer who has failed to
pay financial obligations, in a case not involving violence or driving under
the influence, shall impose the maximum fine and turn the matter over to a
collection agency as provided under RCW 3.02.045.

Sec.
3. RCW
7.80.070 and 1987 c 456 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A notice of civil infraction represents a determination that a civil infraction
has been committed. The determination is final unless contested as provided in
this chapter.

(2)
The form for the notice of civil infraction shall be prescribed by rule of the
supreme court and shall include the following:

(a)
A statement that the notice represents a determination that a civil infraction
has been committed by the person named in the notice and that the determination
is final unless contested as provided in this chapter;

(b)
A statement that a civil infraction is a noncriminal offense for which
imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction;

(c)
A statement of the specific civil infraction for which the notice was issued;

(d)
A statement of the monetary penalty established for the civil infraction;

(e)
A statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the
notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these options;

(f)
A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination the state has the
burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the civil
infraction was committed and that the person may subpoena witnesses including
the enforcement officer who issued the notice of civil infraction;

(g)
A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of explaining
mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the civil infraction,
the person will be deemed to have committed the civil infraction and may not
subpoena witnesses;

(h)
A statement that the person must respond to the notice as provided in this
chapter within fifteen days;

(i)
A statement that failure to respond to the notice or a failure to appear at a
hearing requested for the purpose of contesting the determination or for the
purpose of explaining mitigating circumstances will result in a default
judgment against the person in the amount of the penalty and that this failure
may be referred to the prosecuting attorney for criminal prosecution for
failure to respond or appear;

(j)
A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person promises to respond
to the notice of civil infraction in one of the ways provided in this chapter((;

(k)
A statement that failure to respond to a notice of civil infraction as promised
or to appear at a requested hearing is a misdemeanor and may be punished by a
fine or imprisonment in jail)).

Sec.
4. RCW
7.80.080 and 1987 c 456 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who receives a notice of civil infraction shall respond to such
notice as provided in this section within fifteen days of the date of the
notice.

(2)
If the person determined to have committed the civil infraction does not
contest the determination, the person shall respond by completing the
appropriate portion of the notice of civil infraction and submitting it, either
by mail or in person, to the court specified on the notice. A check or money
order in the amount of the penalty prescribed for the civil infraction must be
submitted with the response. The clerk of a court may accept cash in payment
for an infraction. When a response which does not contest the determination is
received, an appropriate order shall be entered in the court's records.

(3)
If the person determined to have committed the civil infraction wishes to
contest the determination, the person shall respond by completing the portion
of the notice of civil infraction requesting a hearing and submitting it,
either by mail or in person, to the court specified on the notice. The court
shall notify the person in writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing,
and that date shall not be earlier than seven days nor more than ninety days
from the date of the notice of hearing, except by agreement.

(4)
If the person determined to have committed the civil infraction does not
contest the determination but wishes to explain mitigating circumstances
surrounding the infraction, the person shall respond by completing the portion
of the notice of civil infraction requesting a hearing for that purpose and
submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the court specified on the
notice. The court shall notify the person in writing of the time, place, and
date of the hearing, and that date shall not be earlier than seven days nor
more than ninety days from the date of the notice of hearing, except by
agreement.

(5)
The court shall enter a default judgment assessing the monetary penalty
prescribed for the civil infraction ((and may notify the prosecuting
attorney of the failure to respond to the notice of civil infraction or to
appear at a requested hearing if any person issued a notice of civil
infraction:

(a)
Fails to respond to the notice of civil infraction as provided in subsection
(2) of this section; or

(b)
Fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of
this section)).

Sec.
5. RCW
7.84.060 and 1987 c 380 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who receives a notice of infraction shall respond to such notice as
provided in this section within fifteen days of the date of the notice.

(2)
If the person determined to have committed the infraction does not contest the
determination, the person shall respond by completing the appropriate portion
of the notice of infraction and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to
the court specified on the notice. A check or money order in the amount of the
penalty prescribed for the infraction shall be submitted with the response.
When a response which does not contest the determination is received, an
appropriate order shall be entered in the court's records.

(3)
If the person determined to have committed the infraction wishes to contest the
determination, the person shall respond by completing the portion of the notice
of infraction requesting a hearing and submitting it, either by mail or in
person, to the court specified on the notice. The court shall notify the
person in writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing, and that date
shall not be sooner than seven days from the date of the notice, except by
agreement.

(4)
If the person determined to have committed the infraction does not contest the
determination but wishes to explain mitigating circumstances surrounding the
infraction, the person shall respond by completing the portion of the notice of
infraction requesting a hearing for that purpose and submitting it, either by
mail or in person, to the court specified on the notice. The court shall
notify the person in writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing.

(5) If any person issued a notice of infraction: (a) Fails to
respond to the notice of infraction as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, or (b) fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection
(3) or (4) of this section, the court shall enter an appropriate order
assessing the monetary penalty prescribed for the infraction and any other
penalty authorized by this chapter. ((In addition, failure to respond to a
notice of infraction, as required by this chapter, and failure to appear at a
hearing requested pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section are each
punishable as a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.))

---
END ---