BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
11.88.090 and 1996 c 249 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Nothing contained in RCW 11.88.080 through 11.88.120, 11.92.010 through
11.92.040, 11.92.060 through 11.92.120, 11.92.170, and 11.92.180 shall affect
or impair the power of any court to appoint a guardian ad litem to defend the
interests of any incapacitated person interested in any suit or matter pending
therein, or to commence and prosecute any suit in his or her behalf.

(2)
Prior to the appointment of a guardian or a limited guardian, whenever it
appears that the incapacitated person or incapacitated person's estate could
benefit from mediation and such mediation would likely result in overall
reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion of the alleged incapacitated
person or the guardian ad litem, or subsequent to such appointment, whenever it
appears that the incapacitated person or incapacitated person's estate could
benefit from mediation and such mediation would likely result in overall
reduced costs to the estate, upon the motion of any interested person, the
court may:

(a)
Require any party or other person subject to the jurisdiction of the court to
participate in mediation;

(b)
Establish the terms of the mediation; and

(c)
Allocate the cost of the mediation pursuant to RCW 11.96.140.

(3)
Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of guardian or limited guardian,
except as provided herein, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the alleged incapacitated person, who shall be
a person found or known by the court to:

(a)
Be free of influence from anyone interested in the result of the proceeding;
and

(b)
Have the requisite knowledge, training, or expertise to perform the duties
required by this section.

The
guardian ad litem shall within five days of receipt of notice of appointment
file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with
return receipt, each party with a statement including: His or her training
relating to the duties as a guardian ad litem; his or her criminal history as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the
appointment; his or her hourly rate, if compensated; whether the guardian ad
litem has had any contact with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her appointment;
and whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest. Within three days
of the later of the actual service or filing of the guardian ad litem's
statement, any party may set a hearing and file and serve a motion for an order
to show cause why the guardian ad litem should not be removed for one of the
following three reasons: (i) Lack of expertise necessary for the proceeding;
(ii) an hourly rate higher than what is reasonable for the particular
proceeding; or (iii) a conflict of interest. Notice of the hearing shall be
provided to the guardian ad litem and all parties. If, after a hearing, the
court enters an order replacing the guardian ad litem, findings shall be
included, expressly stating the reasons for the removal. If the guardian ad
litem is not removed, the court has the authority to assess to the moving
party, attorneys' fees and costs related to the motion. The court shall assess
attorneys' fees and costs for frivolous motions.

No
guardian ad litem need be appointed when a parent is petitioning for a guardian
or a limited guardian to be appointed for his or her minor child and the
minority of the child, as defined by RCW 11.92.010, is the sole basis of the
petition. The order appointing the guardian ad litem shall recite the duties
set forth in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section. The
appointment of a guardian ad litem shall have no effect on the legal competency
of the alleged incapacitated person and shall not overcome the presumption of
competency or full legal and civil rights of the alleged incapacitated person.

(((3)))
(4)(a) The superior court of each county shall develop and maintain a
registry of persons who are willing and qualified to serve as guardians ad
litem in guardianship matters. The court shall choose as guardian ad litem a
person whose name appears on the registry in a system of consistent rotation,
except in extraordinary circumstances such as the need for particular
expertise. The court shall develop procedures for periodic review of the
persons on the registry and for probation, suspension, or removal of persons on
the registry for failure to perform properly their duties as guardian ad
litem. In the event the court does not select the person next on the list, it
shall include in the order of appointment a written reason for its decision.

(b)
To be eligible for the registry a person shall:

(i)
Present a written statement outlining his or her background and
qualifications. The background statement shall include, but is not limited to,
the following information:

(A)
Level of formal education;

(B)
Training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;

(C)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(D)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or counties of
appointment;

(E)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and

(F)
Evidence of the person's knowledge, training, and experience in each of the
following: Needs of impaired elderly people, physical disabilities, mental
illness, developmental disabilities, and other areas relevant to the needs of
incapacitated persons, legal procedure, and the requirements of chapters 11.88
and 11.92 RCW.

The
written statement of qualifications shall include a statement of the number of
times the guardian ad litem has been removed for failure to perform his or her
duties as guardian ad litem; and

(ii)
Complete the model training program as described in (d) of this subsection.

(c)
The background and qualification information shall be updated annually.

(d)
The department of social and health services shall convene an advisory group to
develop a model guardian ad litem training program and shall update the program
biennially. The advisory group shall consist of representatives from consumer,
advocacy, and professional groups knowledgeable in developmental disabilities,
neurological impairment, physical disabilities, mental illness, aging, legal,
court administration, the Washington state bar association, and other
interested parties.

(e)
The superior court shall require utilization of the model program developed by
the advisory group as described in (d) of this subsection, to assure that
candidates applying for registration as a qualified guardian ad litem shall
have satisfactorily completed training to attain these essential minimum
qualifications to act as guardian ad litem.

(((4)))
(5) The guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this section shall have
the following duties:

(a)
To meet and consult with the alleged incapacitated person as soon as practicable
following appointment and explain, in language which such person can reasonably
be expected to understand, the substance of the petition, the nature of the
resultant proceedings, the person's right to contest the petition, the
identification of the proposed guardian or limited guardian, the right to a
jury trial on the issue of his or her alleged incapacity, the right to
independent legal counsel as provided by RCW 11.88.045, and the right to be
present in court at the hearing on the petition;

(b)
To obtain a written report according to RCW 11.88.045; and such other written
or oral reports from other qualified professionals as are necessary to permit
the guardian ad litem to complete the report required by this section;

(c)
To meet with the person whose appointment is sought as guardian or limited
guardian and ascertain:

(i)
The proposed guardian's knowledge of the duties, requirements, and limitations
of a guardian; and

(ii)
The steps the proposed guardian intends to take or has taken to identify and
meet the needs of the alleged incapacitated person;

(d)
To consult as necessary to complete the investigation and report required by
this section with those known relatives, friends, or other persons the guardian
ad litem determines have had a significant, continuing interest in the welfare
of the alleged incapacitated person;

(e)
To investigate alternate arrangements made, or which might be created, by or on
behalf of the alleged incapacitated person, such as revocable or irrevocable
trusts, or durable powers of attorney; whether good cause exists for any such
arrangements to be discontinued; and why such arrangements should not be
continued or created in lieu of a guardianship;

(f)
To provide the court with a written report which shall include the following:

(i)
A description of the nature, cause, and degree of incapacity, and the basis
upon which this judgment was made;

(ii)
A description of the needs of the incapacitated person for care and treatment,
the probable residential requirements of the alleged incapacitated person and
the basis upon which these findings were made;

(iii)
An evaluation of the appropriateness of the guardian or limited guardian whose
appointment is sought and a description of the steps the proposed guardian has
taken or intends to take to identify and meet current and emerging needs of the
incapacitated person;

(iv)
A description of any alternative arrangements previously made by the alleged
incapacitated person or which could be made, and whether and to what extent
such alternatives should be used in lieu of a guardianship, and if the guardian
ad litem is recommending discontinuation of any such arrangements, specific
findings as to why such arrangements are contrary to the best interest of the
alleged incapacitated person;

(v)
A description of the abilities of the alleged incapacitated person and a
recommendation as to whether a guardian or limited guardian should be
appointed. If appointment of a limited guardian is recommended, the guardian
ad litem shall recommend the specific areas of authority the limited guardian
should have and the limitations and disabilities to be placed on the
incapacitated person;

(vi)
An evaluation of the person's mental ability to rationally exercise the right
to vote and the basis upon which the evaluation is made;

(vii)
Any expression of approval or disapproval made by the alleged incapacitated
person concerning the proposed guardian or limited guardian or guardianship or
limited guardianship;

(viii)
Identification of persons with significant interest in the welfare of the
alleged incapacitated person who should be advised of their right to request
special notice of proceedings pursuant to RCW 11.92.150; and

(ix)
Unless independent counsel has appeared for the alleged incapacitated person,
an explanation of how the alleged incapacitated person responded to the advice
of the right to jury trial, to independent counsel and to be present at the
hearing on the petition.

Within
forty-five days after notice of commencement of the guardianship proceeding has
been served upon the guardian ad litem, and at least fifteen days before the
hearing on the petition, unless an extension or reduction of time has been
granted by the court for good cause, the guardian ad litem shall file its
report and send a copy to the alleged incapacitated person and his or her
counsel, spouse, all children not residing with a notified person, those
persons described in (f)(viii) of this subsection, and persons who have filed a
request for special notice pursuant to RCW 11.92.150. If the guardian ad litem
needs additional time to finalize his or her report, then the guardian ad litem
shall petition the court for a postponement of the hearing or, with the consent
of all other parties, an extension or reduction of time for filing the report.
If the hearing does not occur within sixty days of filing the petition, then
upon the two-month anniversary of filing the petition and on or before the same
day of each following month until the hearing, the guardian ad litem shall file
interim reports summarizing his or her activities on the proceeding during that
time period as well as fees and costs incurred;

(g)
To advise the court of the need for appointment of counsel for the alleged
incapacitated person within five court days after the meeting described in (a)
of this subsection unless (i) counsel has appeared, (ii) the alleged
incapacitated person affirmatively communicated a wish not to be represented by
counsel after being advised of the right to representation and of the conditions
under which court-provided counsel may be available, or (iii) the alleged
incapacitated person was unable to communicate at all on the subject, and the
guardian ad litem is satisfied that the alleged incapacitated person does not
affirmatively desire to be represented by counsel.

(((5)))
(6) If the petition is brought by an interested person or entity
requesting the appointment of some other qualified person or entity and a
prospective guardian or limited guardian cannot be found, the court shall order
the guardian ad litem to investigate the availability of a possible guardian or
limited guardian and to include the findings in a report to the court pursuant
to subsection (((4))) (5)(f) of this section.

(((6)))
(7) The parties to the proceeding may file responses to the guardian ad
litem report with the court and deliver such responses to the other parties and
the guardian ad litem at any time up to the second day prior to the hearing.
If a guardian ad litem fails to file his or her report in a timely manner, the
hearing shall be continued to give the court and the parties at least fifteen
days before the hearing to review the report. At any time during the
proceeding upon motion of any party or on the court's own motion, the court may
remove the guardian ad litem for failure to perform his or her duties as
specified in this chapter, provided that the guardian ad litem shall have five
days' notice of any motion to remove before the court enters such order. In
addition, the court in its discretion may reduce a guardian ad litem's fee for
failure to carry out his or her duties.

(((7)))
(8) The court appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority, in
the event that the alleged incapacitated person is in need of emergency
life-saving medical services, and is unable to consent to such medical services
due to incapacity pending the hearing on the petition to give consent for such
emergency life-saving medical services on behalf of the alleged incapacitated
person.

(((8)))
(9) The court-appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority to
move for temporary relief under chapter 7.40 RCW to protect the alleged
incapacitated person from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation, as
those terms are defined in RCW 74.34.020, or to address any other emergency
needs of the alleged incapacitated person. Any alternative arrangement executed
before filing the petition for guardianship shall remain effective unless the
court grants the relief requested under chapter 7.40 RCW, or unless, following
notice and a hearing at which all parties directly affected by the arrangement
are present, the court finds that the alternative arrangement should not remain
effective.

(((9)))
(10) The guardian ad litem shall receive a fee determined by the court.
The fee shall be charged to the alleged incapacitated person unless the court
finds that such payment would result in substantial hardship upon such person,
in which case the county shall be responsible for such costs: PROVIDED, That
if no guardian or limited guardian is appointed the court may charge such fee
to the petitioner or the alleged incapacitated person, or divide the fee, as it
deems just; and if the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good
faith, the guardian ad litem fee shall be charged to the petitioner. The court
shall not be required to provide for the payment of a fee to any salaried
employee of a public agency.

(((10)))
(11) Upon the presentation of the guardian ad litem report and the entry
of an order either dismissing the petition for appointment of guardian or
limited guardian or appointing a guardian or limited guardian, the guardian ad
litem shall be dismissed and shall have no further duties or obligations unless
otherwise ordered by the court. If the court orders the guardian ad litem to
perform further duties or obligations, they shall not be performed at county expense.

(((11)))
(12) The guardian ad litem shall appear in person at all hearings on the
petition unless all parties provide a written waiver of the requirement to
appear.

(((12))) (13) At any hearing the court may consider
whether any person who makes decisions regarding the alleged incapacitated
person or estate has breached a statutory or fiduciary duty.

---
END ---