BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares as a matter of public policy that the purpose of
this chapter is to regulate the use of nonoriginal crash parts by requiring
disclosure when any use is proposed of nonoriginal equipment manufacturer's
crash part, and by requiring that the manufacturers of such nonoriginal crash
parts be identified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Nonoriginal crash part" means a replacement for any of the
nonmechanical sheet metal or plastic parts that generally constitute the
exterior of a motor vehicle, including inner and outer panels.

(2)
"Nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash part" means nonoriginal
crash parts not made for or by the manufacturer of the motor vehicle.

(3)
"CAPA approved nonoriginal equipment manufacturer nonoriginal crash
part" means nonoriginal crash parts not made for or by the manufacturer of
the motor vehicle that have been approved by the certified automotive parts
association.

(4)
"Motor vehicle body shop" means a person or business establishment
that removes, replaces, reconditions, or repairs nonoriginal crash parts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Any
nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash part used in the repair of a motor
vehicle in this state after the effective date of this act shall have affixed
thereto or inscribed thereon the logo or name of its manufacturer. Such
manufacturer's logo or name shall be visible after installation whenever
practicable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. No
insurer shall specify directly or indirectly the use of nonoriginal equipment
manufacturer crash parts in the repair of an insured's motor vehicle without
disclosing the intended use of such parts to the insured. In all instances
where nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash parts are intended for use by an
insurer:

(1)
The written estimate shall clearly identify each nonoriginal equipment
manufacturer crash part to be used;

(2)
The written estimate shall also clearly identify whether each part is a CAPA
approved nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash part; and

(3)
A disclosure document containing the following information in no smaller than
ten-point type shall appear on or be attached to the insurer's copy of the
estimate:

THIS ESTIMATE HAS BEEN PREPARED BASED ON THE USE OF ONE
OR MORE CRASH PARTS SUPPLIED BY A SOURCE OTHER THAN THE MANUFACTURER OF YOUR
MOTOR VEHICLE. WARRANTIES APPLICABLE TO THESE REPLACEMENT PARTS ARE PROVIDED
BY THE MANUFACTURER OR DISTRIBUTOR OF THESE PARTS RATHER THAN THE MANUFACTURER
OF YOUR VEHICLE.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
motor vehicle body shop may not use nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash
parts unless the motor vehicle body shop discloses in writing to the motor
vehicle owner at the time of the repair that the motor vehicle body shop will
be using nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash parts. Such disclosure must
include a description of each nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash part
that the motor vehicle body shop intends to use including whether each such
part is a CAPA approved nonoriginal equipment manufacturer crash part.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 3, 5, and 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19
RCW, and section 4 of this act constitutes a new section in chapter 48.30 RCW.

---
END ---