BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"City" means a city or town organized and operating under the
provisions of Title 35 or 35A RCW.

(2)
"District" means a water-sewer district organized and operating under
the provisions of Title 57 RCW.

(3)
"Property of a district" includes all property of every kind and
nature belonging to a district, including real and personal property,
franchises, contractual and other rights, taxes levied but not collected for
the district for other than indebtedness, assets, water and water rights, water
and sewer lines, capital facilities, and other facilities and equipment.

(4)
"Management and operation of a district" includes: (a) Managing,
controlling, maintaining, and operating a district, its property, and a
waterworks or system of sewerage and drainage; (b) fixing, levying, and
collecting district taxes, assessments, and other service charges and rates
from owners and occupants of properties served by a district; (c) ensuring
performance of a district's contractual and statutory obligations; and (d)
performing acts otherwise necessary to furnish the inhabitants of a district
with a supply of water and a system of sewers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Proceedings under this chapter may be initiated in the following circumstances:

(a)
If all the territory of a district is located within the corporate boundaries
of a city, the legislative body of the city may adopt an ordinance declaring
its intent to assume and acquire jurisdiction over the entirety of the
district, including the property of the district and the management and
operation of the district, and its intent to dissolve the district.

(b)
If a portion of the territory of a district is located within the corporate
boundaries of a city, the legislative body of the city may adopt an ordinance
declaring its intent to assume and acquire jurisdiction over that portion of
the property of the district and that portion of the management and operation
of the district located within the city.

(c)
If sixty percent or more of the territory of a district is located within the
corporate boundaries of a city, and the city has obtained, through interlocal
agreements, consent to assume from all other cities and counties located in
whole or in part within the territory of the district, the legislative body of
the city may adopt an ordinance declaring its intent to assume and acquire
jurisdiction over the entirety of the district, including the property of the
district and the management and operation of the district, and its intent to
dissolve the district.

(d)
If a city has previously assumed and acquired jurisdiction over a portion of
the property and the management and operation of a district, the district may
initiate proceedings to cause the city to assume the remainder of the property
and the management and operation of the district. The legislative body of the
district may initiate these assumption proceedings by adopting a resolution
declaring its intent to cause the city to assume and acquire jurisdiction over
the entirety of the district, including the property of the district and the
management and operation of the district, and its intent to dissolve the
district.

(2)
If there is a service agreement in effect under chapter 36.115 RCW covering
district territory, a city may not initiate an assumption under this chapter
unless the governing bodies of all local governments, other than the district,
that are parties to the service agreement consent to the assumption.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Actions taken under this chapter are subject to potential review by a boundary
review board under chapter 36.93 RCW or an annexation review board under RCW
35A.14.200.

(2)
In a county with a boundary review board, the city or district shall submit its
notice of intention to the boundary review board within one hundred eighty days
after adoption of the assumption ordinance or resolution. In addition to the
information required by RCW 36.93.130, the notice of intention shall include a
copy of all required interlocal and consent agreements.

(3)
When evaluating a proposed assumption and the objectives set forth in RCW
36.93.180, and in particular the objective set forth in RCW 36.93.180(3), the
boundary review board shall consider: (a) Whether the district is a regional
service provider; (b) whether the proposed assumption benefits the city and the
territory assumed; and (c) whether the proposed assumption is conducive to the
general welfare of the balance of the district, if any. Review shall otherwise
be conducted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 36.93 RCW.

(4)
In a county without a boundary review board, the city or district shall submit
its assumption ordinance or resolution to the county's annexation review board
pursuant to RCW 35A.14.200 within one hundred eighty days after adoption of the
assumption ordinance or resolution. A copy of all required interlocal and
consent agreements shall also be filed with the annexation review board.

(5)
When evaluating a proposed assumption, the annexation review board, in addition
to the factors set forth in RCW 35A.14.200, shall consider: (a) Whether the
objectives set forth in RCW 36.93.180, and in particular the objective set
forth in RCW 36.93.180(3), are met; (b) whether the district is a regional
service provider; (c) whether the proposed assumption benefits the city and the
territory assumed; and (d) whether the proposed assumption is conducive to the general
welfare of the balance of the district, if any. Review shall otherwise be
conducted in accordance with the provisions of RCW 35A.14.200 and 35A.14.210.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
If the proposed assumption has received approval from the boundary review board
or county annexation review board, the legislative body of the city or district
initiating the assumption shall adopt a resolution calling for a ballot
proposition to be submitted to the qualified voters of the district with regard
to the proposed assumption. This ballot proposition shall not be submitted to
the appropriate election officer for a period of one hundred twenty days to
permit public comment and discussion.

(2)
The ballot proposition for the assumption shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the entire district at the next general or special election occurring
after submittal of the ballot proposition to the appropriate election officer.
The ballot proposition and the notice of the assumption election shall describe
with particularity the boundaries of the area proposed to be assumed by the
city and require the voters to cast ballots which shall contain the words
"for assumption" and "against assumption." If the proposed
assumption is over the entirety of the district, including the property of the
district and the management and operation of the district, the ballot
proposition and the notice of the assumption election shall also call for the
dissolution of the district. The notice shall be posted for at least two weeks
prior to the date of the election in ten public places within the area proposed
to be assumed by the city and published at least once a week for two weeks
prior to the date of the election in a newspaper of general circulation within
the limits of the territory proposed to be assumed. Such notice shall be in
addition to notice required by general election law. The election shall
otherwise be conducted in accordance with general election law. The cost of
the election shall be borne by the initiator of the assumption.

(3)
The proposition for or against assumption shall be deemed approved if a
majority of the votes cast on that proposition are cast in favor of
assumption. If a majority of the votes cast on that proposition are cast
against assumption, all proceedings to assume shall cease, and no new
assumption may be initiated for a period of four years from the date of the
election.

(4)
If the city initiates an assumption, and the city does not own a waterworks or
system of sewers, or has not received approval for such in its charter or by
election at the time it adopts its original ordinance to assume and acquire
jurisdiction over all or a portion of the district, it shall include in its
resolution calling for the ballot proposition on the proposed assumption a call
for a second ballot proposition to be submitted to the qualified voters of the
entire city in accordance with RCW 35.92.070. The second ballot proposition
shall call for a vote to ratify or reject the city's original ordinance
authorizing the acquisition of a waterworks or system of sewers by the proposed
assumption. The second ballot proposition shall be submitted to the voters of
the city at the same election that the first ballot proposition on the proposed
assumption is submitted to the voters of the district. The cost of the
election shall be borne by the city. The election shall otherwise be conducted
in accordance with general election law.

(5)
The proposition for or against the original ordinance authorizing the
acquisition of a waterworks or system of sewers by the proposed assumption
shall be approved if a majority of the votes cast on that proposition are cast
in favor of ratifying the original ordinance. If a majority of the votes cast
on that proposition are cast against the original ordinance, all proceedings to
assume shall cease, and no new assumption may be initiated by the city for a
period of four years from the date of the election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
voter approval has been received under this chapter to proceed with an
assumption and acquisition of jurisdiction over all or a portion of the
property of the district and the management and operation of the district, such
assumption shall be effective, and title to the district's property shall pass
to the city, on the later of December 31st or six months after the date final
approval is obtained, and all appeals have been exhausted, including appeals
under chapter 36.93 RCW or RCW 35A.14.200 and 35A.14.210. If a city assumes
and acquires jurisdiction over all the property of the district and the
management and operation of the district, the district shall be dissolved as of
the effective date of the assumption.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) A
city and a district may enter into an agreement upon such terms as their
respective legislative authorities deem appropriate whereby the city agrees to
assume and acquire jurisdiction over all or a portion of the property of the
district and the management and operation of the district. No voter approval
of such an assumption and acquisition is required.

(2)
If the city agreeing to an assumption does not own a waterworks or system of
sewers at the time, or has not received approval for such in its charter or by
election, it shall adopt an ordinance to assume and acquire jurisdiction over
all or a portion of the district and shall in its ordinance call for a ballot
proposition to be submitted to the qualified voters of the entire city in
accordance with RCW 35.92.070. The agreement of a city and a district under
this section shall not take effect unless this ballot proposition is approved
by a majority of the votes cast on that proposition.

(3)
The agreement of a city and a district under this section are subject to
referendum for forty-five days after the agreement's effective date. Upon the
filing of a timely and sufficient referendum petition with the board of
commissioners of the district, signed by registered voters in number equal to
not less than ten percent of the registered voters in the area to be assumed by
the city who voted in the last general election, the question of assumption
shall be submitted to the voters of such area for confirmation or rejection in
the next general election if one is to be held within one hundred eighty days
from the date of filing of the referendum petition, or at a special election to
be called for that purpose in accordance with RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020. The
election shall otherwise be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
section 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If a
city has assumed and acquired jurisdiction over a portion of the property and
the management and operation of a district, and the territory of the district
included within the city contains facilities serving or designed to serve any
portion of the district outside the corporate limits of the city, or if the territory
lying within the district and outside the city contains facilities serving or
designed to serve territory included within the city, the city or district
shall for the economically useful life of the facilities make available
sufficient capacity to serve the sewage or water requirements of such
territory, to the extent that the facilities were designed to serve such
territory at a rate charged to the municipality being served which is
reasonable to all parties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
If a city has assumed and acquired jurisdiction over all the property and the
management and operation of a district, the city shall assume and perform all
outstanding contractual obligations of the district in accordance with the
terms, conditions, and covenants incident to the outstanding contracts. No
assumption shall impair the obligation of any indebtedness or other contractual
obligation of the district.

(2)
If a city has assumed and acquired jurisdiction over all the property and the
management and operation of a district, such property is acquired subject to
any financial, statutory, or contractual obligations, the security or
performance of which such property may have been pledged. The city, in
addition to its other powers, shall have the power to manage, control,
maintain, and operate the district's property. The city shall have the power
to fix and collect service charges and other charges from owners and occupants
of properties served by the district, subject to any outstanding contractual
obligations of the district and indebtedness of the district payable from
taxes, assessments, or other revenues.

(3)
If a city has assumed and acquired jurisdiction over all the property and the
management and operation of a district, the city shall assume the obligation of
paying any district indebtedness. The city shall levy and collect, or cause to
be collected, such district taxes, assessments, and utility rates and charges
necessary to pay and secure the payment of the district's indebtedness in
accordance with the terms, conditions, and covenants incident to the
indebtedness. Until the outstanding indebtedness of the district has been
discharged, the territory of the district and the owners and occupants of
property within the district shall continue to be liable for their
proportionate shares of the indebtedness, including any outstanding assessments
levied within any local improvement district or utility local improvement
district.

(4)
The legislative body of the city shall act as the officers of the district for
the purpose of certifying the amount of any taxes, assessments, and utility
rates and charges to be levied and collected from property or owners and
occupants of property within the district. The legislative body of the city
shall enforce collection of taxes, assessments, and utility rates and charges
levied and shall perform all other acts necessary to ensure performance of the
district's contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same means as
if the territory and property of the district had not been assumed by the city.

(5)
Any funds received by the city, collected for the purpose of paying any bond or
other indebtedness of the district, shall be used for the purpose for which
they were collected and for no other purpose. Any outstanding indebtedness of
the district shall be paid as provided in the bond covenants. All funds of the
district on deposit with the county treasurer at the time of title transfer
shall be used by the city solely for the benefit of the utility and shall not
be transferred to or used for the benefit of the city's general fund.

(6)
If a city has assumed and acquired jurisdiction over a portion of the property
and the management and operation of a district, such property shall be acquired
subject to all financial, statutory, or contractual obligations of the district
for the security or performance of which the property may have been pledged.
In those circumstances, the property included within the city and the owners
and occupants thereof shall continue to be liable for payment of their
proportionate shares of any outstanding district indebtedness. The district
and its officers shall continue to levy taxes and assessments on and to collect
service and other charges from such property, or owners or occupants thereof,
to enforce such collections and to perform all other acts necessary to ensure
performance of the district's contractual obligations in the same manner and by
the same means as if the territory and property of the district had not been
assumed by the city. No such partial assumption shall impair the obligation of
any indebtedness or other contractual obligation of the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act applies to any assumption of all or part of a district by a city that has
not received approval by a boundary review board or the superior court under
chapter 36.93 RCW or the superior court under RCW 35.13A.080, as of July 1,
1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1)
RCW 35.13A.010 and 1998 c 326 s 1 &
1971 ex.s. c 95 s 1;

(2)
RCW 35.13A.020 and 1998 c 326 s 2 &
1971 ex.s. c 95 s 2;

(3)
RCW 35.13A.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 3;

(4)
RCW 35.13A.0301 and 1998 c 326 s 3;

(5)
RCW 35.13A.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 4;

(6)
RCW 35.13A.050 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 5;

(7)
RCW 35.13A.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 6;

(8)
RCW 35.13A.070 and 1997 c 426 s 2 &
1971 ex.s. c 95 s 7;

(9)
RCW 35.13A.080 and 1997 c 426 s 3 &
1971 ex.s. c 95 s 8;

(10)
RCW 35.13A.100 and 1994 c 292 s 5;

(11)
RCW 35.13A.110 and 1997 c 426 s 1; and

(12)
RCW 35.13A.900 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 12.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act are added to chapter 35.13A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---