BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to establish a permanent tuition policy for the
state's public higher education system. This policy should maintain affordable
tuition levels and predictable tuition rates so students and their families can
plan and pay for access to public higher education. To accomplish
predictability and affordability in tuition rates, the legislature intends that
changes in tuition rates be based on changes in Washington's per capita
income. The legislature further intends to extend limited tuition setting
authority to institutions of higher education and the state board for community
and technical colleges so they can price their services to increase
productivity and market responsiveness.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.031 and 1996 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the fees,
other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's
colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short courses,
self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work,
experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual
instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines,
which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory,
gymnasium, health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges,
rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands,
buildings and facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or
hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to
income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing
or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the
appurtenances thereon, or such other special fees as may be established by any
college or university board of trustees or regents from time to time. All
moneys received as operating fees at any institution of higher education shall
be deposited in a local account containing only operating fees revenue and
related interest: PROVIDED, That a minimum of three and one-half percent of
operating fees shall be retained by the institutions((, except the technical
colleges,)) for the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. Local operating fee
accounts shall not be subject to appropriation by the legislature or allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.15.067 and 1997 c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions
of higher education for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term,
shall be as provided in this subsection.

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred
eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs,
nine thousand eight hundred seventy dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight
dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve
dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four
dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six
dollars; and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3)))
Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education beginning with the 1998-99 academic year, other than the
summer term, shall be as provided in this subsection unless different rates are
adopted in the omnibus appropriations act.

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight
dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
eleven thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten
thousand two hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two
dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, eight thousand four hundred
thirty-six dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred
sixty-four dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six
dollars; and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(((4)))
(3) For the ((1997-98 and)) 1998-99 academic year((s)),
the University of Washington shall use at least ten percent of the revenue
received from the difference between a four percent increase in tuition fees
and the actual increase charged to law students to assist needy low and
middle-income resident law students. For the ((1997-98 and)) 1998-99
academic year((s)), the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in
graduate, law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition
to the deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(((5)))
(4) Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions
of higher education for the 1999-2000 academic year, other than the summer
term, shall be as provided in this subsection unless different rates are
adopted in the omnibus appropriations act.

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, three thousand two hundred
thirty-four dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
eleven thousand five hundred seventy-four dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten
thousand six hundred seventy-four dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, five thousand two hundred fifty dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, thirteen thousand six hundred fourteen
dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand five hundred ninety-two dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, fourteen thousand three hundred thirty-four
dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, eight thousand seven hundred
seventy-two dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-two thousand seven hundred
forty dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand three hundred ninety-one dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, nine thousand three hundred fifty-one dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, four thousand thirty-two dollars; and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifty-four
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand four hundred sixteen dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, six thousand thirty-nine dollars.

(5)
Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education for the 2000-01 academic year, other than the summer term,
shall be as provided in this subsection unless different rates are adopted in
the omnibus appropriations act.

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, three thousand three hundred thirty-six
dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
eleven thousand nine hundred forty-six dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs,
eleven thousand sixteen dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, five thousand four hundred eighteen dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, fourteen thousand fifty-two dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand seven hundred seventy-two dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, fourteen thousand seven hundred ninety dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, nine thousand fifty-four dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-three thousand four hundred
sixty-six dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand four hundred sixty-nine dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, nine thousand six hundred fifty-one dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, four thousand one hundred sixty-one dollars;
and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, thirteen thousand three hundred sixty-eight
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand four hundred sixty-four dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, six thousand two hundred thirty-four dollars.

(6)
For the 2001-02 academic year and each academic year thereafter, unless
different rates are adopted in the omnibus appropriations act, the tuition fees
rates specified in subsection (5) of this section shall be adjusted to reflect
the three-year average change in Washington state per capita personal income.
By December 15th of each even-numbered year, the higher education coordinating
board shall calculate tuition fees rates for each of the two years of the
succeeding biennium based on the respective three-year averages. The
three-year average shall include the two previous years and the subject year,
as estimated by the economic and revenue forecast council under chapter 82.33
RCW.

(7)(a)
For the 1999-2000 academic year and each academic year thereafter, the
governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical
colleges may increase the full-time tuition fees rates established under this
section by an amount not to exceed a total percentage increase of six and three
quarters percent per year.

(b)
For the 1999-2000 academic year and each academic year thereafter, the
governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical
colleges may decrease the full-time tuition fees rates established under this
section by up to two percent per year.

(c)
In making the tuition rate adjustments allowed under this subsection (7), the
governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, and The
Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical
colleges may vary tuition fees rates by student category, program, time, or
location.

(d)
The higher education coordinating board, with the assistance of the
institutions of higher education, shall evaluate the impact and the
effectiveness of the new tuition policies implemented in the 1999-01 academic
year. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to: (i) Information on
how the institutions used their authority to adjust the tuition rates
established in this section, including what rates were put into effect, the
amount of revenue generated by increased rates, and how the revenue was used;
(ii) an analysis of the impact of tuition adjustments on student enrollment
patterns including changes in the proportion of resident students, changes in
the proportion of undergraduate students, and changes in the proportion of
day-on-campus students; and (iii) an analysis of the impact of tuition increases
on student debt burden. By November 1, 2000, the board shall report its
findings to the governor and the legislature.

(8)
The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school
students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW
28A.600.300 through 28A.600.395.

Sec.
4. RCW
28B.15.070 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with the house of
representatives and senate committees responsible for higher education, the
respective fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate, the
office of financial management, and the state institutions of higher education,
shall develop by December of every fourth year beginning in 1989, definitions,
criteria, and procedures for determining the undergraduate and graduate
educational costs for the state universities, regional universities, and
community colleges.

(2)
Every four years, the state institutions of higher education in cooperation
with the higher education coordinating board shall perform an educational cost
study pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. The study shall be conducted
based on every fourth academic year beginning with 1989‑90. Institutions
shall complete the studies within one year of the end of the study year and
report the results to the higher education coordinating board for
consolidation, review, and distribution.

(3)
In order to conduct the study required by subsection (2) of this section, the
higher education coordinating board, in cooperation with the institutions of
higher education, shall develop a methodology that requires the collection of
comparable educational cost data, which utilizes a faculty activity analysis or
similar instrument and which includes methods to estimate the cost of
instruction for students receiving instruction supported in part or in full by
technology, provided at a distance, or both supported in part or full by
technology and provided at a distance.

Sec.
5. RCW
28B.15.100 and 1998 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall charge to and collect
from each of the students registering at the particular institution for any
quarter or semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and
other fees as such board shall in its discretion determine. The total of all
fees shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount((: PROVIDED, That
such tuition fees for other than the summer term shall be in the amounts for
the respective institutions as otherwise set forth in RCW 28B.15.067)).

(2)
Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees
proportionate to full-time student rates established for residents and
nonresidents: PROVIDED, That students registered at baccalaureate
institutions for fewer than two credit hours shall be charged tuition and
services and activities fees at the rate established for two credit hours:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents
of Idaho or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty
for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted from
payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential upon a
declaration by the higher education coordinating board that it finds Washington
residents from the community college district are afforded substantially
equivalent treatment by such other states.

(3) Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit
hours shall be charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour in
excess of eighteen hours at the applicable established per credit hour tuition
fee rate for part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of
RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the
community colleges may exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for
students who are registered exclusively in first professional programs in
medicine, dental medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or
who are registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory
programs.

---
END ---