BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.210.260 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 720 are each amended to read as follows:

Public
school districts and private schools which conduct any of grades kindergarten
through the twelfth grade may provide for the administration of oral medication
of any nature to students who are in the custody of the school district or
school at the time of administration, but are not required to do so by this
section, subject to the following conditions:

(1)
The board of directors of the public school district or the governing board of
the private school or, if none, the chief administrator of the private school
shall adopt policies which address the designation and written agreement
of employees who may administer oral medications to students, the acquisition
of parent requests and instructions, and the acquisition of dentist and
physician requests and instructions regarding students who require medication
for more than fifteen consecutive school days, the identification of the
medication to be administered, the means of safekeeping medications with
special attention given to the safeguarding of legend drugs as defined in
chapter 69.41 RCW, and the means of maintaining a record of the administration
of such medication and written agreement of employees;

(2)
The board of directors shall seek advice from one or more licensed physicians
or nurses in the course of developing the foregoing policies;

(3)
The public school district or private school is in receipt of a written,
current and unexpired request from a parent, or a legal guardian, or other
person having legal control over the student to administer the medication to
the student;

(4)
The public school district or the private school is in receipt of (a) a
written, current and unexpired request from a licensed physician or dentist for
administration of the medication, as there exists a valid health reason which
makes administration of such medication advisable during the hours when school
is in session or the hours in which the student is under the supervision of
school officials, and (b) written, current and unexpired instructions from such
physician or dentist regarding the administration of prescribed medication to
students who require medication for more than fifteen consecutive work days;

(5)
The medication is administered by an employee designated by or pursuant to the
policies adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and in substantial
compliance with the prescription of a physician or dentist or the written
instructions provided pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;

(6)
The medication is first examined by the employee administering the same to
determine in his or her judgment that it appears to be in the original
container and to be properly labeled; ((and))

(7)
The board of directors shall designate a professional person licensed pursuant
to chapter 18.71 RCW or chapter 18.79 RCW as it applies to registered nurses
and advanced registered nurse practitioners, to train and supervise the
designated school district personnel in proper medication procedures; and

(8)
School district employees, not licensed under chapter 18.79 or 18.88A RCW, if
student safety is involved, may file a written letter of refusal to administer
oral medications to students with the school district. This written letter of
refusal may not serve as grounds for employee dismissal or termination of
employment, however, the letter of refusal may result in a reduction of the
employees' work hours if the refusal results in a need to hire additional
personnel to administer oral medications.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.210.280 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 721 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public school districts and private schools that offer classes for any of
grades kindergarten through twelve may provide for clean, intermittent bladder
catheterization of students, or assisted self-catheterization of students
pursuant to RCW 18.79.290, if the catheterization is provided for in
substantial compliance with:

(a)
Rules adopted by the state nursing care quality assurance commission and the
instructions of a registered nurse or advanced registered nurse practitioner
issued under such rules; and

(b)
Written policies of the school district or private school which shall be
adopted in order to implement this section and shall be developed in accordance
with such requirements of chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW as may be applicable.

(2)
School district employees, not licensed under chapter 18.79 or 18.88A RCW,
if student safety is involved, may file a written letter of refusal to perform
clean, intermittent bladder catheterization of students. This written letter
of refusal may not serve as grounds for employee dismissal or termination of
employment, however, the letter of refusal may result in a reduction of the
employees' work hours if the refusal results in a need to hire additional
personnel to administer clean intermittent bladder catheterizations.

(3) This section does not require school districts to
provide intermittent bladder catheterization of students.

---
END ---