BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.71 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each set of candidates for president and vice-president must be allocated a
number of electors corresponding to their proportional share of the total
state-wide popular vote for president and vice-president.

(2) The allocation of electors must be in whole numbers only, with
fractions of one-half or greater rounded up to the next higher whole number and
fractions of less than one-half rounded down to the next lower whole number.
If the rounding process results in an allocation of electors exceeding the
number of electors allotted to the state, then the rounding up of the fractions
of any proportion among the sets of candidates with sufficient votes who were
so allocated electors will be adjusted to reduce the number of allocated
electors to equal the number of electors allotted to the state, as follows:
(a) The proportion of the set of these candidates with the smallest fractional
proportion above one-half will be reduced to the next lower whole number and
the allocation among these sets of candidates redone; (b) if this reduction
does not reduce the allocated electors to equal the number of electors allotted
to the state, then the proportion of the set of these candidates with the
smallest remaining fractional proportion above one-half will be reduced to the
next lower whole number and the allocation among these sets of candidates
redone; and (c) successive adjustments of the lowest remaining fractional
proportion above one-half will be made, and allocations among those sets of
candidates redone, until the number of electors so allocated equals the number
of electors allotted to the state.

---
END ---