BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

Except
to the extent that a health maintenance organization contracts with a group
medical practice which only treats that organization's patients, a health
maintenance organization may not discriminate in the terms and conditions,
including reimbursement, for the provision of foot care services between
physicians and surgeons licensed under chapters 18.22, 18.57, and 18.71 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is intended to be procedural and not to impair the obligation of any
existing contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---