BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with this section. This tax is in addition to other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by
the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.1 percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the
collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for criminal justice
purposes as defined in RCW 82.14.310 and shall not be used to replace or
supplant existing funding.

(4) No tax may be collected under this section before January 1,
2000, and no tax may be collected under this section unless the taxes under RCW
82.14.350 are being collected.

---
END ---