BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each legislator may
introduce as primary sponsor no more than five bills in each regular session of
the legislature.

(2) In addition to the five bills per regular session permitted in
subsection (1) of this section, a legislator without limitation may also
introduce as primary sponsor legislation requested by departments or agencies
of state government, joint resolutions, joint memorials, concurrent
resolutions, and floor resolutions.

---
END ---