BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each county auditor shall develop written election procedures for the county.
The written procedures must be organized clearly and written using text that is
easily understood. The written procedures shall be in electronic format and
available to the public on the Internet. A physical copy of the written
procedures may be provided to members of the public at cost.

The
secretary of state shall assist in the preparation of these written procedures
by providing model written procedures describing general election procedures.

(2)
The written procedures will describe general election procedures as well as
election procedures unique to the county, including:

(a)
A discussion of different types of ballots, including absentee ballots, special
absentee ballots, mail ballots, ballots cast at polling places, challenged
ballots, and how these ballots are processed and tabulated;

(b)
A discussion of any electronic vote tallying systems that may be used by the
county and how the systems are tested;

(c)
How the registration of a voter may be challenged;

(d)
A discussion of the county canvassing board and how election results are
canvassed and certified;

(e)
A discussion of write-in voting and the tallying of write-in votes;

(f)
The circumstances and procedures when a true duplicate copy of a ballot will be
made;

(g)
A discussion of observers appointed by major political parties;

(h)
A discussion of the circumstances and procedures for making appeals to the
canvassing board;

(i)
A discussion of the recount of votes; and

(j) Other matters specified by the secretary of state.

---
END ---