BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
58.09.050 and 1973 c 50 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
records of survey to be filed under authority of this chapter shall be
processed as follows:

(1)
((Surveys which qualify under RCW 58.09.040(1) shall be a map, legibly
drawn, printed or reproduced by a process guaranteeing a permanent record in
black on tracing cloth, or equivalent, eighteen by twenty-four inches, or of a
size as required by the county auditor. If ink is used on polyester base film,
the ink shall be coated with a suitable substance to assure permanent
legibility.)) (a) The record of survey filed under RCW 58.09.040(1)
shall be an original map, eighteen by twenty-four inches, that is legibly drawn
in black ink on mylar and is suitable for producing legible prints through
scanning, microfilming, or other standard copying procedures.

(b)
The following are allowable formats for the original that may be used in lieu
of the format set forth under (a) of this subsection:

(i)
Photo mylar with original signatures;

(ii)
Any standard material as long as the format is compatible with the auditor's
recording process and records storage system. This format is only allowed in
those counties that are excepted from permanently storing the original document
as required in RCW 58.09.110(5);

(iii)
An electronic version of the original if the county has the capability to
accept a digital signature issued by a licensed certification authority under
chapter 19.34 RCW or a certification authority under the rules adopted by the
Washington state board of registration for professional engineers and land surveyors,
and can import electronic files into an imaging system. The electronic version
shall be a standard raster file format acceptable to the county.

A
two inch margin ((shall be provided)) on the left edge and a one-half
inch margin ((shall be provided at the)) on other edges of the
map shall be provided. The auditor shall reject for recording any maps not
suitable for producing legible prints through scanning, microfilming, or other
standard copying procedures.

(2)
Information required by RCW 58.09.040(2) shall be ((recorded)) filed
on a standard form eight and one-half inches by fourteen inches ((which
shall be)) as designed and prescribed by the ((bureau of surveys
and maps)) department of natural resources. The auditor shall reject
for recording any records of corner information not suitable for producing
legible prints through scanning, microfilming, or other standard copying
procedures. An electronic version of the standard form may be filed if the
county has the capability to accept a digital signature issued by a licensed
certification authority under chapter 19.34 RCW or a certification authority
under the rules adopted by the Washington state board of registration for
professional engineers and land surveyors, and can import electronic files into
an imaging system. The electronic version shall be a standard raster file
format acceptable to the county.

(3)
Two legible prints of each record of survey ((and records of monuments and
accessories)) as required under the provisions of this chapter shall be
furnished to the county auditor in the county in which the survey is to be
recorded. ((The auditor shall keep one copy for his records and shall send
the second to the bureau of surveys and maps at Olympia, Washington, with the
auditor's record number thereon.)) The auditor, in those counties using
imaging systems, may require only the original, and fewer prints, as needed, to
meet the requirements of their duties. If any of the prints submitted are not
suitable for scanning or microfilming the auditor shall not record the
original.

(4)
Legibility requirements are set forth in the recorder's checklist under RCW
58.09.110.

Sec.
2. RCW
58.09.110 and 1973 c 50 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
record of survey and/or record of corner information filed with the county
auditor of any county shall be securely fastened by him into suitable books
provided for that purpose.

He)) The
auditor shall accept for recording those records of survey and records of
corner information that are in compliance with the recorder's checklist as
jointly developed by a committee consisting of the survey advisory board and
two representatives from the Washington state association of county auditors.
This checklist shall be adopted in rules by the department of natural
resources.

(1)
The auditor shall keep proper indexes of such record of survey by the name
of owner and by quarter-quarter section, township, and range, with
reference to other legal subdivisions.

((He))
(2) The auditor shall keep proper indexes of the record of corner
information by section, township, and range.

((The
original survey map shall be stored for safekeeping in a reproducible
condition. It shall be proper for the auditor to maintain for public reference
a set of counter maps that are prints of the original maps. The original maps
shall be produced for comparison upon demand.))

(3)
After entering the recording data on the record of survey and all prints
received from the surveyor, the auditor shall send one of the surveyor's prints
to the department of natural resources in Olympia, Washington, for
incorporation into the state-wide survey records repository. However, the
county and the department of natural resources may mutually agree to process
the original or an electronic version of the original in lieu of the surveyor's
print.

(4)
After entering the recording data on the record of corner information the
auditor shall send a legible copy, suitable for scanning, to the department of
natural resources in Olympia, Washington. However, the county and the
department of natural resources may mutually agree to process the original or
an electronic version of the original in lieu of the copy.

(5)
The auditor shall permanently keep the original document filed using storage
and handling processes that do not cause excessive deterioration of the
document. A county may be excepted from the requirement to permanently store
the original document if it has a document scanning, filming, or other process
that creates a permanent, archival record that meets or surpasses the standards
as adopted in rule by the division of archives and records management in
chapter 434-663 or 434-677 WAC. The auditor must be able to provide full-size
copies upon request. The auditor shall maintain a copy or image of the
original for public reference.

(6)
If the county has the capability to accept a digital signature issued by a
licensed certification authority under chapter 19.34 RCW or a certification
authority under the rules adopted by the Washington state board of registration
for professional engineers and land surveyors, and can import electronic files
into an imaging system, the auditor may accept for recording electronic
versions of the documents required by this chapter. The electronic version
shall be a standard raster file format acceptable to the county.

(7) This section does not supercede other existing recording
statutes.

---
END ---