BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.320 and 1997 c 445 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Actual construction work shall be commenced on any project for
which permit has been granted within such reasonable time as shall be
prescribed by the department, and shall thereafter be prosecuted with diligence
and completed within the time prescribed by the department. The department, in
fixing the time for the commencement of the work, or for the completion thereof
and the application of the water to the beneficial use prescribed in the
permit, shall take into consideration the cost and magnitude of the project and
the engineering and physical features to be encountered, and shall allow such
time as shall be reasonable and just under the conditions then existing, having
due regard for the public welfare and public interests affected((: and, for
good cause shown, it)). For good cause shown, the department shall
extend the time or times fixed as aforesaid, and shall grant such further
period or periods as may be reasonably necessary, having due regard to the good
faith of the applicant and the public interests affected. If federal or
state laws prevent or restrict water use otherwise authorized under a permit
issued for a federal reclamation project, the department shall extend the time
or times fixed for commencing work, completing work, and applying water to
beneficial use and the extension shall be for a period that is not less than the
period of nonuse or restricted use caused by the federal or state laws. In
fixing construction schedules and the time, or extension of time, for
application of water to beneficial use for municipal water supply purposes, the
department shall also take into consideration the term and amount of financing
required to complete the project, delays that may result from planned and
existing conservation and water use efficiency measures implemented by the
public water system, and the supply needs of the public water system's service
area, consistent with an approved comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A RCW,
or in the absence of such a plan, a county-approved comprehensive plan under
chapter 36.70 RCW or a plan approved under chapter 35.63 RCW, and related water
demand projections prepared by public water systems in accordance with state
law. An existing comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A or 36.70 RCW, plan
under chapter 35.63 RCW, or demand projection may be used. If the terms of the
permit or extension thereof, are not complied with the department shall give
notice by registered mail that such permit will be canceled unless the holders
thereof shall show cause within sixty days why the same should not be so
canceled. If cause is not shown, the permit shall be canceled.

---
END ---