BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
22.09.050 and 1997 c 303 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any application for a license to operate a warehouse shall be accompanied by a
license fee of one thousand three hundred fifty dollars for a terminal
warehouse, one thousand fifty dollars for a subterminal warehouse, and five
hundred dollars for a country warehouse. Except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section, if a licensee operates more than one warehouse under
one state license as provided for in RCW 22.09.030, the license fee shall be
computed by multiplying the number of physically separated warehouses within
the station by the applicable terminal, subterminal, or country warehouse
license fee.

(2)
The licensing fee for two or more warehouses constituting a station and
licensed under one state license as provided for in RCW 22.09.030 shall be five
hundred dollars if: (a) Less than five hundred thousand bushels of
agricultural commodities are stored or received annually at the warehouses
governed by the license, and (b) all of the warehouses governed by the license
are on one parcel of land or on contiguous parcels of land separated by not
more than a highway and highway right of way or separated by any other
transportation or public right of way.

(3)
If an application for renewal of a warehouse license or licenses is not
received by the department prior to the renewal date or dates established by
the director by rule, a penalty of fifty dollars for the first week and one
hundred dollars for each week thereafter shall be assessed and added to the
original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license may
be issued. This penalty does not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit
certifying that he has not acted as a warehouseman subsequent to the expiration
of his or her prior license.

Sec.
2. RCW
22.09.055 and 1997 c 303 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

An
application for a license to operate as a grain dealer shall be accompanied by
a license fee ((of seven hundred fifty dollars)). The license fee shall
be: Three hundred dollars for exempt grain dealers ((shall be));
three hundred dollars for a grain dealer dealing in less than five hundred
thousand bushels of agricultural commodities annually if the grain dealer also
holds one or more valid warehouse licenses issued under this chapter and the
activities for which the dealer is licensed as a grain dealer are with regard
to the operation of that warehouse or those warehouses; and seven hundred fifty
dollars for any other grain dealer.

If an application for renewal of a grain dealer or exempt grain
dealer license is not received by the department before the renewal date or
dates established by the director by rule, a penalty of fifty dollars for the
first week and one hundred dollars for each week thereafter shall be assessed
and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the
renewal license may be issued. This penalty does not apply if the applicant
furnishes an affidavit certifying that he has not acted as a grain dealer or
exempt grain dealer after the expiration of his or her prior license.

---
END ---