BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.165 and 1998 c 245 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or ramp, for the
exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles or private
motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of passengers when
such limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway or will
aid in the conservation of energy resources. ((There is hereby appropriated
from the transportation fund‑-state to the department of transportation,
program C for the period ending June 30, 1993, an additional $15 million for
the sole purpose of expediting completion of the HOV core lane system.))
Regulations authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway
facility may be declared to be effective at all times or at specified times of
day or on specified days. Violation of a restriction of highway usage
prescribed by the appropriate authority under this section is a traffic
infraction.

---
END ---