BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.37.420 and 1990 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of this state
unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires except vehicles
equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet federal standards that are
installed and used in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions.

(2)
No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its periphery any block,
flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance of any material other than
rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire,
except that it is permissible to use farm machinery equipped with pneumatic
tires or solid rubber tracks having protuberances that will not injure
the highway, and except also that it is permissible to use tire chains or metal
studs imbedded within the tire of reasonable proportions and of a type
conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol, upon any vehicle when required
for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause a vehicle
to skid. It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the tire between
April 1st and November 1st. The state department of transportation may, from
time to time, determine additional periods in which the use of tires with metal
studs imbedded therein is lawful.

(3)
The state department of transportation and local authorities in their
respective jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing the operation
upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having movable tracks with
transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the movable tracks or farm
tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would
otherwise be prohibited under this section.

(4) Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used between
November 1st and April 1st upon school buses and fire department vehicles, any
law or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding.

---
END ---