BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that Washington's agricultural industry needs to enhance
public confidence in its food production system to preserve and expand its
markets both domestically and globally. A targeted applied agricultural
research initiative will boost Washington's economy, strengthen its
agricultural industry, protect food crops from devastating pests, and enhance
consumer confidence in its food supplies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.30 RCW to read as follows:

The
safe foods initiative at Washington State University is hereby established for
the following purposes:

(1)
To promote safe food products for domestic and global markets, Washington State
University shall establish faculty and related support positions in the
following areas: Food microbiology; postharvest vegetable quality science;
food safety information; cereal chemistry; and animal disease and food safety
science;

(2)
To protect food crops from devastating pests:

(a)
The commission on pesticide registration shall fund projects regarding
research, implementation, and demonstration of any aspect of integrated pest
management and pesticide resistance management programs; and

(b)
Washington State University shall establish faculty and related support
positions in: Tree fruit entomology; drylands cropping systems; weed science;
vegetable pathology; tree fruit pathology; insect biological control and
integrated pest management; and soil fertility and microbiology; and

(3)
To create high-quality, economically viable, safe food production systems,
Washington State University shall establish faculty and related support
positions in: Rangeland management; livestock extension education; range and
livestock management; urban/rural agricultural issues; agricultural animal
waste management and environmental quality; animal waste management; wheat
breeding technicians; and reproductive biology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to Washington State University solely for
purposes of section 2 of this act. Of the amount provided in this subsection,
five hundred thousand dollars is provided solely for expenditures by the
commission on pesticide registration for the purposes of section 2(2)(a) of
this act.

(2) The sum of three million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars,
or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to Washington State University solely
for purposes of section 2 of this act. Of the amount provided in this
subsection, five hundred thousand dollars is provided solely for expenditures
by the commission on pesticide registration for the purposes of section 2(2)(a)
of this act.

---
END ---