BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director of the department may enter into contracts with members of the
Pacific Northwest economic region, port districts, or commodity commissions for
the purpose of:

(a)
Establishing foreign trade offices designed to promote the export of Washington
agricultural products; or

(b)
Contracting with overseas contractors to promote the export of Washington's
agricultural products.

(2)
The department shall report to the legislature the results of the export
promotion under this section and recommendations for improvements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of agriculture for the purposes of section 1 of
this act. The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions:

(1)
The funds must be matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis with funds from other
members of the Pacific Northwest economic region; and

(2)
No more than five percent of this appropriation may be used for administrative
costs of the department of agriculture.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the department of agriculture for the purposes of section 1 of
this act. The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions:

(1)
The funds must be matched on a dollar-for-dollar basis with funds from other
members of the Pacific Northwest economic region; and

(2) No funds from this appropriation may be used for administrative
costs of the department of agriculture.

---
END ---