BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person subject to taxation under this chapter shall be allowed a credit
against tax due under this chapter, as provided in this section, for
contributions to an employer-assisted housing program designed to expand
affordable housing opportunities for qualified employees.

(2)
Subject to the limitations in this section, the credit shall be equal to the
amount of money provided by the business to be used for the purpose stipulated
in subsection (1) of this section. Amounts received for that purpose shall be
used exclusively for the program implemented under section 2 of this act. The
housing finance commission shall process the amounts and send the notices in
the order donations are received. The housing finance commission shall send a
notice of each amount to the business and to the department of revenue.

(3)
Tax credits under this section are available on a first-come basis, with
priority based on the date and time the notice is received by the department of
revenue from the housing finance commission. The department of revenue shall
keep a running total of all credits approved and shall immediately notify the
housing finance commission when the two million dollar fiscal year cap under
subsection (4) of this section is reached. The housing finance commission
shall notify all subsequent businesses for the year that no credits are
available for the remainder of the fiscal year and that no more applications
are being accepted.

(4)
The total of credits granted under this section shall be no more than two
million dollars of credits each fiscal year. If the amount submitted for a
credit in a notice will cause the cap to be exceeded, the department shall give
a partial approval of the donation, equal to the amount of remaining credit
available for the fiscal year.

(5)
No applicant is eligible for tax credits under this section in excess of the
amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Approved credit
may not be carried over to subsequent calendar years. The credit must be
claimed by the due date of the last tax return for the calendar year in which
the payment is made. Any unused credit expires. Refunds shall not be given in
place of credits.

(6)
Tax credits shall not be granted for amounts that occurred before the effective
date of this section.

(7)
For the purpose of this section and section 2 of this act:

(a)
"Employer-assisted housing" means assistance that is part of the
businesses' personnel benefit to nonmanagement workers. These benefits
include, but are not limited to group, mortgage origination, closing cost
assistance, mortgage guarantees, group mortgage insurance, down payment
assistance, mortgage interest rate buy down, and direct cash contribution to
qualified employees.

(b)
"First-time home buyer" means a person or household who has not
previously owned its own personal residence in the last three years.

(c)
"Qualified employee" means a first-time home buyer with an income
less than one hundred fifteen percent of the median income of the county in
which the home is located or the state median income, whichever is higher.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The housing finance commission shall implement a program to provide business
and occupation tax credits to businesses that administer employer-assisted
housing programs for first-time home buyers that are qualified employees. The
housing finance commission, in consultation with the department of revenue,
shall adopt rules as necessary to implement and administer this section and
section 1 of this act.

(2) The housing finance commission shall report annually to the
governor and the legislature on the number of businesses participating in the
program, number of persons using assistance, and the amount and form of
assistance provided.

---
END ---