BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
In one year an estimated 3.2 billion offers for consumer credit will be mailed
by financial institutions to potential consumers;

(b)
Many of these offers have introductory rates that are as low as three percent;

(c)
Many consumers are not aware that these introductory rates rise to as high as
twenty-one percent within six months of issuance of the credit card;

(d)
Between 1996 and 1997, the amount of credit card debt was estimated at three
hundred ninety-four billion dollars;

(e)
Many consumers are not aware that interest on credit card purchases can start
at the date of purchase, even before the credit card company has paid the
seller on behalf of the buyer;

(f)
Many credit card companies charge annual fees exceeding fifty dollars; and

(g)
Many consumers are enticed by credit card offers that state they merely need to
pay two to three percent of their monthly balance, unaware that charges to the
unpaid balance accumulate and are added to the unpaid balance.

(2)
It is the intent of this act to attempt to educate consumers regarding the
dangers of excessive credit card debt and to increase consumer awareness regarding
credit card financing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
All issuers of credit cards to residents within the state of Washington shall
provide a sticker that informs the consumer of the dangers of excessive credit
card debt. The issuer shall ensure that the notice appears on a removable
sticker that is affixed to the rear of the card, over the signature strip, and
that the sticker states the following:

WARNING: Failure to research
interest rates and credit cards may result in personal financial loss or
possible bankruptcy.

(2)
In addition to the required notice under subsection (1) of this section, the
issuer shall provide information to the consumer regarding the personal
financial impacts of excessive credit card use.

(3)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Credit card" means a card or device under a credit card agreement
pursuant to which the issuer gives to a cardholder residing in this state the
privilege of obtaining credit from the issuer or other persons in purchasing or
leasing property or services, obtaining loans, or otherwise; and

(b)
"Credit card agreement" means an agreement entered into or performed
in this state prescribing the terms of retail installment transactions pursuant
to which the issuer may, with the buyer's consent, purchase or acquire one or
more retail sellers' indebtedness of the buyer under a sales slip or memorandum
evidencing the purchase, lease, loan, or otherwise to be paid in accordance
with the agreement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added to chapter 63.14 RCW.

---
END ---