BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.10.100 and 1987 c 460 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

The
court shall determine custody in accordance with the best interests of the
child, except that custody shall not be granted to any individual who is not
a relative of the child and has been convicted of a felony within five years of
the filing date of the petition for custody or convicted of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030(33).

Sec.
2. RCW
74.15.130 and 1998 c 314 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 may be suspended, revoked, modified, or not renewed
by the secretary upon proof (a) that the agency has failed or refused to comply
with the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 or the requirements
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031;
((or)) (b) that the conditions required for the issuance of a license
under chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to
such licenses; or (c) that the agency, or any person associated with the
agency, who is directly responsible for the care and treatment of children,
expectant mothers, or developmentally disabled persons, has been convicted,
within five years of the date of application for licensure or relicensure, of a
felony that is reasonably related to the competency of the person to care and
treat children, expectant mothers, or developmentally disabled persons, or to
operate an agency, or has been convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030(33). RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial,
revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right to an
adjudicative proceeding.

(2)
In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial, modification, suspension,
or revocation of a foster family home license, the department's decision shall
be upheld if there is reasonable cause to believe that:

(a)
The applicant or licensee lacks the character, suitability, or competence to
care for children placed in out-of-home care, however, no unfounded report of
child abuse or neglect may be used to deny employment or a license;

(b)
The applicant or licensee has failed or refused to comply with any provision of
chapter 74.15 RCW, RCW 74.13.031, or the requirements adopted pursuant to such
provisions; ((or))

(c)
The conditions required for issuance of a license under chapter 74.15 RCW and
RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such licenses; or

(d)
The applicant or licensee has been convicted, within five years of the date of
application for licensure or relicensure, of a felony that is reasonably
related to the competency of the person to care and treat children, expectant
mothers, or developmentally disabled persons, or to operate an agency, or has
been convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030(33).

(3)
In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial, modification, suspension,
or revocation of any license under this chapter, other than a foster family
home license, the department's decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a
preponderance of the evidence.

(4) The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof
that an agency has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted under the
provisions of this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 or that an agency subject to
licensing under this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 is operating without a license
except that civil monetary penalties shall not be levied against a licensed
foster home. Monetary penalties levied against unlicensed agencies that submit
an application for licensure within thirty days of notification and
subsequently become licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed
in addition to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary
penalties, if imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each
day an agency is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall not
exceed seventy-five dollars per violation for a family day-care home and two
hundred fifty dollars per violation for group homes, child day-care centers,
and child-placing agencies. Each day upon which the same or substantially
similar action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment of a
separate penalty. The department shall provide a notification period before a
monetary penalty is effective and may forgive the penalty levied if the agency
comes into compliance during this period. The department may suspend, revoke,
or not renew a license for failure to pay a civil monetary penalty it has
assessed pursuant to this chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes
final. Chapter 43.20A RCW governs notice of a civil monetary penalty and
provides the right of an adjudicative proceeding. The preponderance of
evidence standard shall apply in adjudicative proceedings related to assessment
of civil monetary penalties.

---
END ---