BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature has identified several findings that indicate that mathematics
instruction in the elementary and middle grades needs improvement. The
legislature finds that only thirty-one percent of students who took the 1998
fourth grade Washington assessment of student learning met the standard for
proficiency in mathematics. The legislature also finds that only twenty
percent of students who took the seventh grade trial assessment met the
standard for proficiency in mathematics. Findings from the third international
mathematics and science study show that, although United States fourth grade
students scored above the international average in mathematics, United States
eighth grade students scored below average. The study also found that the
middle school curriculum may be a weak link in the United States educational
curriculum, and that many eighth grade and ninth grade students may lack the
skills needed to be successful in college. The legislature also finds that
females have traditionally not participated at the equivalent level as males in
challenging mathematics courses. The legislature intends to identify best
practices in mathematics instruction for current and prospective mathematics
teachers in the elementary and middle grades, and to provide opportunities for
students to improve their mathematics proficiency against state, national, and
international standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, "assessment" means Washington
assessment of student learning developed by the commission on student learning
under RCW 28A.630.885, and "sending schools" means elementary schools
providing students to a middle school or junior high school which is either
applying for a grant through the program described in subsection (2) of this
section, or in which students from the sending school scored poorly on the
seventh grade assessment.

(2)
The excellence in mathematics grant program is established to improve the
mathematics performance of elementary, middle, and junior high school
students. The purpose of the grant program is to improve students' proficiency
in mathematics by enhancing teachers' skills in using teaching methods that
have proven results gathered through empirical research. The program shall be
administered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3)
Schools, and school districts on behalf of schools in which a significant
portion of the students performed below standard on one or more mathematics
assessments, may apply for excellence in mathematics grants. To qualify for a
grant, the applicant's grant proposal must include the following components:

(a)
Documentation that the instructional model the applicant intends to implement
has proven results gathered through empirical research;

(b)
Agreement to assist the independent contractor identified under subsection (7)
of this section in evaluating the effectiveness of the selected instructional
models;

(c)
Evidence of a significant number of students who are not achieving mathematics
proficiency at grade level, as measured by the fourth grade or seventh grade
assessment or both. If fourth grade assessment results are not available, the
applicant may use the results of the fourth grade comprehensive test of basic
skills;

(d)
Documentation that grant funds will be used to benefit instruction solely in
one or more of the following grade levels: Fifth, sixth, and seventh; and

(e)
Documentation that grant funds will be used to benefit instruction in schools
or sending schools in which students performed below the mathematics standard
on the fourth grade or seventh grade assessment, or both.

(4)
To the extent funds are appropriated, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall make initial grants available by September 1, 1999,
for schools and school districts. Subject to available funding, schools and
school districts may submit additional applications to the superintendent of
public instruction by September 1, 2000, and by September 1st in subsequent
years. Grants will be awarded for three years, subject to available funding.

(5)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall appoint an
excellence in mathematics grant committee to develop an application and review
process for awarding the grants established in this section and to oversee the
design and implementation of the evaluation in subsection (7) of this section.
The committee shall consist of up to three representatives of parents or
students, one professor of mathematics, one professional currently working in a
math-related career, two mathematics curriculum coordinators from within two
different educational service districts, two representatives of the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, including one assessment specialist,
three mathematics teachers representing different school districts, and one
principal. Committee members shall serve without additional compensation but
are eligible for per diem and mileage allowances under RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(6)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an
independent contractor to conduct and disseminate a literature review of best
practices in mathematics instruction and staff development in elementary and
middle school state-wide and nationally.

(7)
To the extent funds are specifically appropriated for these purposes, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall contract with an
independent contractor who has experience in program evaluation. The
contractor shall:

(a)
Conduct a multiyear evaluation of the effectiveness of the instructional models
as measured by student achievement on the fourth grade assessment and later
achievement on the seventh grade assessment; and

(b)
Report changes in fourth grade and seventh grade assessment results, effects of
the instructional models on student achievement, other variables that may have
affected student achievement, and recommendations for best practices in
mathematics instruction in elementary and middle school.

(8)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit biennially
to the governor and the house of representatives and senate education
committees a report on the excellence in mathematics grant program. The first
report must be submitted not later than December 1, 2001, and each succeeding
report must be submitted not later than December 1st of each odd-numbered
year. Reports must include information on how the schools and school districts
used the grant money, the instructional models used, how they were implemented,
and the findings of the independent contractor.

(9)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall disseminate
information periodically to school districts that participate in the excellence
in mathematics grant program during the evaluation conducted under subsection
(7) of this section and shall report to the districts regarding the final
evaluation of the instructional models and implementation strategies.

(10)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall disseminate
information to the school districts five years after the beginning of the grant
program regarding the evaluation of the instructional models and implementation
strategies.

(11)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction may use up to five
percent of the appropriated funds for administration of the excellence in
mathematics grant program established in this section.

(12)
The excellence in mathematics program shall not become part of the state's
basic program of education obligation as set forth under Article IX of the
state Constitution.

(13)
Funding under this section shall be used solely to supplement and not supplant
federal funds for mathematics instruction or state basic education funds for
mathematics instruction under chapters 28A.150, 28A.155, 28A.165, 28A.180, and
28A.190 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---