BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for the purpose of
the rental security deposit guarantee program under chapter 59.24 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes
of the rental security deposit guarantee program under chapter 59.24 RCW.

---
END ---