BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Committee" means the Washington interpreters for the deaf and hard
of hearing policy committee.

(2)
"Consumer" means a person who is deaf or hard of hearing or who
requires special communication techniques in order to communicate.

(3)
"Interpreter" means a person who engages in the act of or practice of
interpreting for gain in the state of Washington, but does not include a relay
interpreter unless by rule adopted by the secretary of the department of social
and health services, at the request of the committee, a system of certifying
relay interpreters is instituted.

(4)
"Interpreting" means the act of translating or transliterating
English concepts to any or all necessary specialized language used by a
consumer or the act of translating a consumer's specialized vocabulary to
English concepts.

(5)
"Nationally recognized certification" means certification by the
registry of interpreters for the deaf or the national association of the deaf.

(6)
"Relay interpreter" means an intermediary interpreter with the
necessary specialized vocabulary to relay sign language concepts from an
interpreter to deaf consumers who have minimal English language and sign
language skills.

(7)
"Specialized vocabulary" means manual signs and gestures operating as
visual or tactile ways of communicating thoughts, ideas, and feelings,
including but not limited to, American sign language, English-based sign
language, cued speech, oral interpreting, manually coded English, and contact
sign language.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Effective December 1, 2001, no person may represent himself or herself as an
interpreter or engage in the practice of interpreting unless certified in
accordance with this chapter, and no person or public or private entity may
knowingly employ an uncertified interpreter to engage in the act of
interpreting. A certified interpreter must have adequate professional
liability insurance coverage, have passed a criminal background check, and be
registered with the office of deaf and hard of hearing services, or its
successor authority. The office of deaf and hard of hearing services, or its successor
authority, shall determine the adequacy of professional liability insurance
coverage and shall certify any person as an interpreter who submits evidence of
nationally recognized certification, proof of adequate professional liability
insurance coverage, and payment of a reasonable fee, which may be used only for
the necessary costs of administering this chapter.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to:

(a)
Interpreters working at religious activities;

(b)
Interpreters working as volunteers without compensation, except for volunteers
interpreting for state agency offices and programs;

(c)
Interpreters working in an emergency. For purposes of this section,
"emergency" means a situation in which an adult who receives the
interpretation services decides that the delay necessary to obtain a certified
interpreter is likely to cause him or her injury or loss to the consumer and
signs a waiver holding all persons harmless. The waiver shall clearly state
that the adult who receives the interpretation services knows he or she has a
right to interpretation by a certified interpreter and willingly waives this
right;

(d)
Family members who do not interpret for compensation;

(e)
Interpreters employed in public schools, covered under section 7 of this act;
or

(f)
The activities and services of an interpreter intern or a student in training
who is:

(i)
Enrolled in a program of study in interpreting at a recognized program of
interpreter training or who has graduated from a recognized program of
interpreter training within the previous two years;

(ii)
Interpreting under the supervision of a certified interpreter as part of a
supervised program of study; or

(iii)
Identified as an interpreter intern or student in training.

(3)
A person who resides out of Washington state, who has a nationally recognized
certification, may interpret for up to twenty days without being certified as
an interpreter under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The Washington interpreters for the deaf and hard of hearing policy committee
is created, consisting of ten members as follows:

(a)
The president of the Washington state association of the deaf or the
president's designee;

(b)
The director of the office of deaf and hard of hearing services or the
director's designee;

(c)
A representative from the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
appointed by the superintendent of public instruction;

(d)
A consumer of interpreting services appointed by the secretary of the
department of social and health services; and

(e)
One representative appointed by each of the following groups:

(i)
The Washington state association of the deaf, interpreters chapter;

(ii)
The Washington state registry of interpreters for the deaf;

(iii)
The American sign language teachers association;

(iv)
The Washington school for the deaf;

(v)
The Washington deaf and blind citizens; and

(vi)
Self-help for the hard of hearing.

(2)
If one of these groups fails to appoint a person, the committee shall select a
person from that group to represent the group. Terms shall be established by
rule adopted by the secretary of the department of social and health services.

(3)
The members of the committee shall not receive compensation for their services
on the committee. All members, other than the director or designee of the
office of deaf and hard of hearing services, shall be reimbursed for actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
committee shall:

(1)
Set a reasonable fee to be charged for the issuance of interpreter
certification;

(2)
Provide a biennial report to the legislature on the effectiveness of this
chapter; and

(3)
Provide to the office of deaf and hard of hearing services, or its successor
authority, beginning on October 1st of each year, an ongoing review of
professional development and support systems for interpreters, including a
review of:

(a)
Existing public and private education programs and training resources within
the state;

(b)
The current number of certified interpreters; and

(c)
Areas of interpreter shortage based upon geographic areas and types of
interpreting, such as mental health, educational, and ethnic diversity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
office of deaf and hard of hearing services, or its successor authority, and
each regional deaf service center shall retain in their files a copy of the
code of professional ethics and the grievance procedures for both the national
association of the deaf and the registry of interpreters for the deaf.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. An
interpreter who has had her or his certification suspended or revoked as a
result of a grievance action through either the national association of the
deaf or the registry of interpreters for the deaf may not work as an
interpreter until that certification has been reinstated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Educational interpreters who are employed in the public school system must
successfully complete a thirty-hour training course offered through the office
of the superintendent of public instruction. Commencing in the year 2002, any
person newly employed by the public school system as an educational interpreter
must be certified as an interpreter and have completed the educational training
offered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. If an
educational interpreter for a public school system has been employed in that
capacity for four or more years, with satisfactory evaluations and without a
period of more than six months between employment in the public school system,
the employee may be retained by the school district as an educational
interpreter without meeting these standards. If a school district is unable to
find a certified interpreter, the school district may request a nonrenewable
one-year waiver from the office of the superintendent of public instruction and
must demonstrate that efforts have been made to seek an appropriately qualified
person. The office of deaf and hard of hearing services, or its successor
authority, shall annually provide to the superintendent of public instruction a
list of certified interpreters and shall make that list available upon
request. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall send a
list of all certified interpreters who have successfully completed the training
to each school district every year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
office of deaf and hard of hearing services, or its successor authority, shall
administer this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Violation of or aiding in violation of any part of section 2 of this act
constitutes a class 1 civil infraction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act takes effect December 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 72 RCW.

---
END ---