BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
71.24.310 and 1989 c 205 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and this chapter can
be most efficiently and effectively implemented as part of the regional support
network defined in RCW 71.24.025. For this reason, the legislature intends
that any enhanced program funding for implementation of chapter 71.05 RCW or
this chapter, except for funds allocated for implementation of mandatory
state-wide programs as required by federal statute, and except for funds
appropriated for the purposes under section 2 of this act, be made
available primarily to those counties participating in regional support
networks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that specific appropriations for atypical antipsychotic
medications used in community settings are more effectively administered
centrally by the mental health division of the department of social and health
services. It is the intent of the legislature that the mental health division
shall establish a mechanism separate from the regional support network funding
formula for distributing specific appropriations for atypical antipsychotic
medications to the regional support networks. It is the further intent of the
legislature that this mechanism will maximize federal funding opportunities,
and that specific appropriations for these medications shall be targeted toward
underserved groups.

(2)
The department in consultation with the regional support networks shall
establish a methodology to assure that specific appropriations for atypical
antipsychotic medications used in community settings shall be targeted to the
following groups of persons: (a) Persons in crisis who are not medicaid
eligible; (b) working poor who are not medicaid eligible and who need continued
access to antipsychotic medications in order to retain their employment; (c)
persons transitioning from jail and from department of corrections facilities
to medicaid eligibility; and (d) persons in jail. The department shall
establish data mechanisms to track the efforts to assist all persons who are
medicaid qualified achieve medicaid eligibility. Lack of medicaid eligibility
shall not be a criteria for exclusion from benefiting from specific
appropriations for atypical antipsychotic medications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall establish a program to evaluate the treatment outcomes and
costs benefits of providing funding for atypical antipsychotic medications used
in community settings for persons who are not currently eligible for benefits
under the medicaid program, Title XIX of the federal social security act.

(2)
Atypical antipsychotic medications provided through the program shall be
purchased by the department through competitive procurement. The procurement
shall include at a minimum: (a) A requirement that rates paid for the
medications not exceed rates paid by the department under its medicaid program;
(b) a requirement that there be an adequate distribution mechanism to make the
medications available in communities served by the program; and (c) other
performance standards deemed appropriate by the department.

(3)
The program shall include an evaluation component. The evaluation shall assess
whether the availability of atypical antipsychotic medications through the
program results in cost savings to the state and positive treatment outcomes
for persons served through the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act is not provided by June 30, 1999,
in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---