BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
For purposes of submitting a report to the legislature, the department of
corrections shall conduct a study of:

(a)
The use of all categories of inmate labor within department institutions and
facilities in the past ten years;

(b)
Inmate labor hours on jobs providing goods and services to communities in the
private sector;

(c)
The degree to which labor currently performed by inmates was previously
performed in the private sector;

(d)
Measures to prevent the use of inmate labor from displacing laborers in the
private sector;

(e)
The degree to which inmate labor leads to placement of released inmates in jobs
similar to those they performed while inmates; and

(f)
The use of inmate labor in geographic areas, and in career areas, where there
is a high level of unemployment.

(2) The department shall compile the results of this study in a
report and shall submit that report to the legislature on or before December
31, 1999.

---
END ---