BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.600.200 and 1990 c 33 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
school district board of directors is hereby granted and shall exercise the
authority to control, supervise and regulate the conduct of interschool
athletic activities and other interschool extracurricular activities of an
athletic, cultural, social or recreational nature for students of the
district. A board of directors may delegate control, supervision and
regulation of any such activity to the Washington Interscholastic Activities
Association or any other voluntary nonprofit entity and compensate such entity
for services provided, subject to the following conditions:

(1)
The voluntary nonprofit entity shall submit an annual report to the state board
of education of student appeal determinations, assets, and financial receipts
and disbursements at such time and in such detail as the state board shall
establish by rule;

(2)
The voluntary nonprofit entity shall not discriminate in connection with
employment or membership upon its governing board, or otherwise in connection
with any function it performs, on the basis of race, creed, national origin,
sex or marital status;

(3)
Any rules and policies applied by the voluntary nonprofit entity which govern
student participation in any interschool activity shall be written and subject
to the annual review and approval of the state board of education at such time
as it shall establish;

(4)
All amendments and repeals of such rules and policies shall be subject to the
review and approval of the state board; ((and))

(5)
Such rules and policies shall provide for notice of the reasons and a fair
opportunity to contest such reasons prior to a final determination to reject a
student's request to participate in or to continue in an interschool activity.
Any such decision shall be considered a decision of the school district
conducting the activity in which the student seeks to participate or was
participating and may be appealed pursuant to RCW 28A.645.010 ((through
28A.645.030)) and 28A.645.020; and

(6) Review under subsection (5) of this section shall be heard
expeditiously by the court without a jury, confined to the record, and limited
to whether the voluntary nonprofit entity governing student participation in
the interschool activity acted arbitrarily, capriciously, or contrary to law.

---
END ---