BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any agency or local government may establish uniform standards and procedures
to prequalify competent and responsible contractors from which to award
contracts for public works, repair, or maintenance. A prequalification system
may be used either to limit the contractors that are afforded an opportunity to
bid on a project or to eliminate consideration of bids that are submitted from
contractors that are not prequalified. A prequalification system may be used
in any procedure to award contracts, including, but not limited to, contracts
let without bids, contracts let through a formal competitive bidding procedure
with published bid solicitations and sealed bids, contracts awarded using a
design-build system of letting contracts, contracts awarded through a
contractor/construction manager contracting system, or contracts let through a
modified competitive bidding system, such as a small works roster system.

(2)
A prequalification system may involve periodically soliciting contractors to be
prequalified and placed on a list or lists of prequalified contractors for
different types of work or prequalifying contractors for a specific project.
Each contractor desiring to be prequalified must complete a standard
questionnaire form and financial statement that includes questions about
financial ability and work experience, and is sworn to before a notary public
or other person authorized to take acknowledgment of deeds. To be
prequalified, a contractor must have all of the following requirements:

(a)
Adequate financial resources or the ability to secure such resources;

(b)
The necessary experience, organization, and technical qualifications to perform
the proposed contract;

(c)
The ability to comply with the required performance schedule taking into
consideration all of its existing business commitments;

(d)
A satisfactory record of performance, integrity, judgment, and skills; and

(e)
Be otherwise qualified and eligible to receive an award under applicable laws
and regulations.

The
refusal of an agency or local government to prequalify a contractor is
conclusive unless the agency or local government is ordered to give
prequalification status to a contractor by the superior court of Thurston
county for agencies, or the superior court of the county in which the local
government is located for a local government, where the appeal to the superior
court is made within five days of the decision not to prequalify the
contractor, which appeal shall be heard summarily within ten days after it is
taken and on five days' notice thereof to the agency or local government.

(3) For purposes of this section, the term "municipality"
means as it is defined under RCW 39.04.010, and the term "agency"
means as it is defined under RCW 39.04.150(1).

---
END ---