BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.80.040 and 1981 c 61 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the procurement of architectural and engineering services, the agency shall
encourage firms engaged in the lawful practice of their profession to submit
annually a statement of qualifications and performance data. The agency shall
evaluate current statements of qualifications and performance data on file with
the agency, together with those that may be submitted by other firms regarding
the proposed project, and shall conduct discussions with one or more firms
regarding anticipated concepts and the relative utility of alternative methods
of approach for furnishing the required services and then shall select
therefrom, based upon criteria established by the agency((, the firm deemed
to be the most highly qualified to provide the services required for the
proposed project)). Criteria established by the agency shall include,
but not be limited to: Professional competence for the type of services to be
performed; technical merits of the offered services; financial capability of
the applicant to perform the specified work; and the cost, price, and
compensation or consideration to be paid by the agency for such services.
Such agency procedures and guidelines shall include a plan to insure that
minority and women-owned firms are afforded the maximum practicable opportunity
to compete for and obtain public contracts for services. The level of
participation by minority and women-owned firms shall be consistent with their
general availability within the professional communities involved.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
39.80.050 and 1981 c 61 s 5 are each repealed.

---
END ---