BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.58.570 and 1996 c 230 s 1602 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A metropolitan municipal corporation that is engaged in the transmission,
treatment, and disposal of sewage may impose a capacity charge on users of the
metropolitan municipal corporation's sewage facilities when the user connects,
reconnects, or establishes a new service. The capacity charge shall be
approved by the council of the metropolitan municipal corporation and reviewed
((and reapproved)) annually.

(2)
The capacity charge shall be based upon the cost of the sewage facilities'
excess capacity that is necessary to provide sewerage treatment for new users
to the system. The capacity charge, which may be collected over a period of
fifteen years, shall not exceed:

(a)
Seven dollars per month per residential customer equivalent for connections and
reconnections occurring prior to January 1, 1996; ((and))

(b)
Ten dollars and fifty cents per month per residential customer equivalent for
connections and reconnections occurring after January 1, 1996, and prior to
January 1, 2001((.)); and

(c)
Seventeen dollars and fifty cents for connections and reconnections
occurring after January 1, 2001, ((the capacity charge shall not exceed
fifty percent of the basic sewer rate per residential customer equivalent
established by the metropolitan municipal corporation at the time of the
connection or reconnection)) with the maximum allowed amount adjusted
annually after January 1, 2002, to reflect increases in the consumer price
index for Seattle, as calculated by the United States bureau of labor
statistics.

(3)
The capacity charge for a building other than a single-family residence shall
be based on the projected number of residential customer equivalents to be
represented by the building, considering its intended use.

(4)
The council of the metropolitan municipal corporation shall enforce the
collection of the capacity charge in the same manner provided for the
collection, enforcement, and payment of rates and charges for water-sewer districts
provided in RCW 57.08.081. At least thirty days before commencement of an
action to foreclose a lien for a capacity charge, the metropolitan municipal
corporation shall send written notice of delinquency in payment of the capacity
charge to any first mortgage or deed of trust holder of record at the address
of record.

(5) As used in this section, "sewage facilities" means
capital projects identified since January 1, 1982, ((to July 23, 1989,))
in the metropolitan municipal corporation's comprehensive water pollution
abatement plan. "Residential customer equivalent" shall have the
same meaning used by the metropolitan municipal corporation in determining
rates and charges at the time the capacity charge is imposed.

---
END ---