BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.97 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the commission has by rule or interpretation applied the federal Columbia
River Gorge national scenic area act to an existing lot or parcel of property
or parcel in such a way that prohibits development of that property or parcel,
in whole or in part, and the property or parcel is within an incorporated
city's limits or was purchased or acquired by the present owner before January
1, 1987, then the commission shall, upon application by the owner:

(a)
Approve a single building permit for that property or parcel; or

(b)
Fully compensate the owner for the value of the property or parcel at its
current fair market value as if the permit was granted.

(2)
The assessor of the county in which the property in question lies shall
determine the amount of compensation under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of two hundred seventy-six thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the Columbia River Gorge commission for the purposes of this
act.

---
END ---