BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that approximately thirty-five percent of the recipients of
the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 choose
to enroll in an out-of-state college and therefore do not use the grants that
would have been available to them under RCW 28B.80.245 had they chosen to
attend a college or university in the state of Washington. It is the intent of
the legislature to identify the amount of money associated with the unused
grants and to make that amount available for graduate and professional school
grants to assist former recipients of Washington scholars awards who choose to
enroll in a graduate or professional school in the state of Washington. The
grants should be awarded annually and students who have received a Washington
scholars award in one of the previous six years would be eligible to compete
for the graduate school grants.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.600.110 and 1994 c 234 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is established by the legislature of the state of Washington the Washington
state scholars program. The purposes of this program annually are to:

(1)
Provide for the selection of three seniors residing in each legislative
district in the state graduating from high schools who have distinguished
themselves academically among their peers((.));

(2)
Maximize public awareness of the academic achievement, leadership ability, and
community contribution of Washington state public and private high school
seniors through appropriate recognition ceremonies and events at both the local
and state level((.));

(3)
Provide a listing of the Washington scholars to all Washington state public and
private colleges and universities to facilitate communication regarding
academic programs and scholarship availability((.));

(4)
Make available a state level mechanism for utilization of private funds for
scholarship awards to outstanding high school seniors((.));

(5)
Provide, on written request and with student permission, a listing of the
Washington scholars to private scholarship selection committees for
notification of scholarship availability((.));

(6)
Permit a waiver of tuition and services and activities fees as provided for in
RCW 28B.15.543 and grants under RCW 28B.80.245((.)); and

(7) Provide for competitively awarded grants for graduate and
professional studies to the extent that the grants for undergraduate studies
provided under RCW 28B.80.245 are not used and if moneys are available.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.80.245 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Recipients of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through
28A.600.150 who choose to attend an independent college or university in this
state, as defined in subsection (((4))) (6) of this section, and
recipients of the award named after June 30, 1994, who choose to attend a
public college or university in the state may receive grants under this section
if moneys are available. The higher education coordinating board shall
distribute grants to eligible students under this section from moneys
appropriated to the Washington scholars awards account created in section 4
of this act for this purpose. The individual grants shall not exceed, on a
yearly basis, the yearly, full-time, resident, undergraduate tuition and
service and activities fees in effect at the state-funded research
universities. Grants to recipients attending an independent institution shall
be contingent upon the institution matching on at least a dollar-for-dollar
basis, either with actual money or by a waiver of fees, the amount of the grant
received by the student from the state. The higher education coordinating
board shall establish procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct
grants to the students.

(2)
To qualify for the grant, recipients shall enter the in-state college or
university within three years of high school graduation and maintain a minimum
grade point average at the college or university equivalent to 3.30. Students
shall be eligible to receive a maximum of twelve quarters or eight semesters of
grants for undergraduate study and may transfer among in-state public and
independent colleges and universities during that period and continue to
receive the grant as provided under RCW 28B.80.246. If the student's
cumulative grade point average falls below 3.30 during the first three quarters
or two semesters, that student may petition the higher education coordinating
board which shall have the authority to establish a probationary period until
such time as the student's grade point average meets required standards.

(3)
No grant shall be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree in theology.

(4)
The higher education coordinating board shall establish policies and
procedures to award grants annually for graduate and professional studies to
former Washington scholars awards recipients who enroll in graduate or
professional schools in the state of Washington. The grants shall be awarded
on a competitive basis. Students who have received a Washington scholars award
in one of the previous six years are eligible to compete for the graduate and
professional studies grants.

(5)
The higher education coordinating board shall distribute grants annually to
eligible students under this section to the extent funds are available in the
Washington scholars awards account. The individual grants shall not exceed, on
a yearly basis, the yearly, full-time resident, graduate student tuition and
services and activities fees in effect at the state-funded research
universities. Grants to recipients attending an independent institution of
higher education shall be contingent upon the institution matching on at least
a dollar-for-dollar basis, either with actual money or by a waiver of fees, the
amount of the grant received by the student from the state. The higher education
coordinating board shall establish procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards
as direct grants to the students.

(6)
As used in this section, "independent college or university" means a
private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of which is
permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the state, providing
programs of education beyond the high school level leading at least to the
baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the northwest association of schools
and colleges as of June 9, 1988, and other institutions as may be developed
that are approved by the higher education coordinating board as meeting
equivalent standards as those institutions accredited under this section.

(((5)))
(7) As used in this section, "public college or university"
means an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any funds appropriated by the legislature for the Washington state scholars
program established under RCW 28A.600.110 shall be placed in the account
created by this section.

(2) The Washington scholars awards account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Only the higher education coordinating board,
or its designee, may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for expenditures.

---
END ---