BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after
the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program
for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department. For jurisdictions
that are required to or choose to plan pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040, the master
program shall be reviewed for compliance with the guidelines and adopted or
amended as necessary by September 1, 2002, and at least once every five years
thereafter. For all other jurisdictions, except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, the master program shall be adopted or amended within
twenty-four months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW
90.58.060.

(2) The department may adopt a schedule for development or
amending of master programs by jurisdictions not planning pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040 that allows for a development or amendment period of more than
twenty-four months, but not more than sixty months. The schedule shall be
adopted as a part of the guidelines. The schedule may identify groups or
classes of local government and establish different schedules for such groups
or classes. Prior to adoption of a schedule, each local government shall be
notified in writing of the time requirements applicable to it. The department
shall give full consideration to comments made by local government on the
proposed schedule based on the criteria.

---
END ---