BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.16.300 and 1986 c 305 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW 4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or causes
of action of any kind against any person, arising from such person having
constructed, altered, or repaired any improvement upon real property, or
having performed or furnished any design, planning, surveying, architectural ((or)),
construction, or engineering services, or supervision or observation of
construction, or administration of construction contracts for any construction,
alteration, or repair of any improvement upon real property. This
section is intended to benefit only those persons referenced ((herein)) in
this section, specifically including persons having performed work for which
the persons must be registered or licensed under RCW 18.08.310, 18.27.020,
18.43.040, 18.96.020, or 19.28.120, and shall not apply to claims or causes
of action against ((manufacturers)) persons not referenced in this
section.

---
END ---