BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.60.040 and 1993 c 457 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of ((criminal impersonation)) identity theft
in the first degree if the person:

(a)
Assumes a false identity and does an act in his or her assumed character with
intent to ((defraud another or for any other unlawful purpose)) commit
a felony or theft in the third degree; or

(b)
Pretends to be a representative of some person or organization or a public
servant and does an act in his or her pretended capacity with intent to defraud
another or for any other unlawful purpose.

(2)
((Criminal impersonation)) Identity theft in the first degree is
a ((gross misdemeanor)) class B felony.

(3)
A person is guilty of ((criminal impersonation)) identity theft
in the second degree if the person:

(a)
Claims to be a law enforcement officer or creates an impression that he or she
is a law enforcement officer; and

(b)
Under circumstances not amounting to ((criminal impersonation)) identity
theft in the first degree, does an act with intent to convey the impression
that he or she is acting in an official capacity and a reasonable person would
believe the person is a law enforcement officer.

(4)
((Criminal impersonation)) Identity theft in the second degree is
a ((misdemeanor)) class C felony.

(5)
A person is guilty of identity theft in the third degree if the person
knowingly procures or possesses, without lawful authority, an identification
card of another person or a false identification card with the intent to
commit, or to aid or abet, any unlawful activity. In a prosecution for
identity theft in the third degree, a person who possesses without lawful
authority, two or more identification cards of another person, or two or more
false identification cards, is presumed to have acted with the intent to
commit, or to aid or abet, unlawful activity. The presumption in this
subsection is rebuttable by evidence raising a reasonable inference that
possession of the identification cards was not for the purpose of committing,
or aiding or abetting, unlawful activity.

(6)
Identity theft in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.60.010 and 1987 c 140 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following definitions and the definitions of RCW 9A.56.010 are applicable in
this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Written instrument" means: (a) Any paper, document, or other
instrument containing written or printed matter or its equivalent; or (b) any
access device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.010(3), token, stamp, seal, badge,
trademark, or other evidence or symbol of value, right, privilege, or
identification;

(2)
"Complete written instrument" means one which is fully drawn with
respect to every essential feature thereof;

(3)
"Incomplete written instrument" means one which contains some matter
by way of content or authentication but which requires additional matter in
order to render it a complete written instrument;

(4)
To "falsely make" a written instrument means to make or draw a
complete or incomplete written instrument which purports to be authentic, but
which is not authentic either because the ostensible maker is fictitious or
because, if real, he did not authorize the making or drawing thereof;

(5)
To "falsely complete" a written instrument means to transform an
incomplete written instrument into a complete one by adding or inserting
matter, without the authority of anyone entitled to grant it;

(6)
To "falsely alter" a written instrument means to change, without
authorization by anyone entitled to grant it, a written instrument, whether
complete or incomplete, by means of erasure, obliteration, deletion, insertion
of new matter, transposition of matter, or in any other manner;

(7)
"Forged instrument" means a written instrument which has been falsely
made, completed or altered;

(8)
"Identification card" means those forms of identification listed in
RCW 66.16.040 and also includes a Social Security card and birth certificate.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1998 c 290 s 4, 1998 c 219 s 4, 1998 c 82 s 1, and 1998 c 78 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XIVMurder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

XIIIMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

XIRape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

XKidnapping 1 (RCW
9A.40.020)

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, a narcotic from Schedule
I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam, from Schedule I-V to someone under
18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 88.12.029)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Promoting Prostitution 1
(RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 88.12.029)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Vehicular Homicide, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft,
by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 88.12.029)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

VIBribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VPersistent prison
misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Abandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

IVResidential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW
9A.56.080)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9A.60.040(1))

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
88.12.155(3))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 88.12.032)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Use of Proceeds of
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

IIICriminal Gang
Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2
(RCW 9A.42.030)

Abandonment of dependent
person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Extortion 2 (RCW
9A.56.130)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9A.60.040(3))

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Theft of livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

IIUnlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Class B Felony Theft of Rental, Leased, or
Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

ITheft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Class C Felony Theft of
Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Possession of Stolen
Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Possess Controlled
Substance that is a Narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from
Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

---
END ---