BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that counties have historically assumed the burden of funding
the counsel and guardians ad litem required to represent indigent parents,
guardians, legal custodians, and children in child dependency and termination
proceedings. However, the volume of such cases is driven by legislative
mandate and state agency action. Because the legislature finds that the shared
goals of counties and the state will be advanced, the state agrees to accept
fiscal responsibility for twenty-five percent of the cost of representation by
counsel and guardians ad litem and related expenses required to represent
indigent parents, guardians, legal custodians, and children in child dependency
and termination proceedings after July 1, 2000, and to accept fiscal
responsibility for fifty percent of these costs after July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The office of public defense shall develop a proposal to address the costs of
legal representation and expenses reasonably related to such representation for
indigent criminal defendants and indigent parents, guardians, legal custodians,
and children in dependency and termination hearings under chapter 13.34 RCW.
The proposal shall address the increased dependency and termination filings by
the state under chapter 13.34 RCW and the effect of this increase on indigent
defense costs. The proposal shall recommend strategies to ensure than an
equitable method of paying for indigent defense costs in criminal trial
proceedings and in dependency and termination proceedings is established.

(2) The office of public defense shall present the proposal
required under subsection (1) of this section to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature by December 6, 1999.

---
END ---