BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

The
extraordinary criminal justice assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Appropriations may be made from the general fund or the public
safety and education account into this account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation and as authorized by the legislature.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to reimburse the extraordinary
costs associated with the prosecution, indigent defense, jury impanelment,
expert witnesses, interpreters, incarceration, and other adjudication costs of
aggravated murder cases. Only the director of community, trade, and economic
development or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

Eligible
counties may submit claims to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for reimbursement from the extraordinary criminal justice
assistance account. Counties are eligible to submit claims if their total
costs for investigating and adjudicating an aggravated murder case or cases are
equal to twelve percent of the most recent county law and justice budget
adopted by the county's legislative authority. For purposes of this section, a
county's law and justice budget is equal to the combined total of the county's yearly
appropriations for the sheriff's office, prosecutor's office, indigent defense
providers, jail, and superior court.

(1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall develop
procedures for processing the claims, for auditing the veracity of the claims,
and for prioritizing the claims. Prioritization of the claims shall be based
on, but not limited to, such factors as disproportionate fiscal impact relative
to the county budget, efficient use of resources, and whether the costs are
extraordinary and could not be reasonably accommodated and anticipated in the
normal budget process.

(2)
Before January 1st of each year, the department shall develop and submit to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a
prioritized list of submitted claims that are recommended for funding by the
legislature from the extraordinary criminal justice assistance account. The
list shall include a summary of each claim and the nature of the costs
incurred.

(3) The department shall not financially obligate funds from the
extraordinary criminal justice assistance account before the legislature has
appropriated funds for a specific list of claims. The legislature may remove
projects from the list recommended by the department. The legislature shall
not change the order of the priorities recommended for funding by the
department.

---
END ---