BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95B.080 and 1987 c 357 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Certificates
shall be issued without examination under the following conditions:

(((1)
Certificates, in appropriate classifications, shall be issued without
application fee to operators who, on July 1, 1973, hold certificates of
competency attained by examination under the voluntary certification program
sponsored jointly by the state department of social and health services, health
services division, and the Pacific Northwest pollution control association.

(2)
Certificates, in appropriate classifications, shall be issued to persons
certified by a governing body or owner to have been the operator in responsible
charge of a waste treatment plant on July 1, 1973. A certificate so issued
will be valid only for the existing plant.

(3))) A
nonrenewable certificate, temporary in nature, may be issued for a period not
to exceed twelve months, to an operator who fills a vacated position required
to be filled by a certified operator. Only one such certificate may be issued
subsequent to each instance of vacation of any such position. An operator
issued a temporary certificate must meet the conditions as established by rule.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.95B.090 and 1987 c 357 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
issuance and renewal of a certificate shall be subject to the following
conditions:

(1)
A certificate shall be issued if the operator has satisfactorily passed a
written examination, or has met the requirements of RCW ((70.95B.080)) 70.95B.130,
and has met the requirements specified in the rules and regulations as
authorized by this chapter, and has paid the department ((an application
fee. Such application fee shall not exceed fifty dollars)) the
appropriate certification fees.

(2)
The term for all certificates shall be from the first of January of the year of
issuance until the thirty-first of December of the renewal year. The renewal
period, not to exceed three years, shall be set by agency rule. Every certificate
shall be renewed upon the payment of a renewal fee and satisfactory evidence
presented to the director that the operator demonstrates continued professional
growth in the field. ((Such renewal fee shall not exceed thirty dollars.

(3)
Individuals who fail to renew their certificates before December 31 of the
renewal year, upon notice by the director shall have their certificates
suspended for sixty days. If, during the suspension period, the renewal is not
completed, the director shall give notice of revocation to the employer and to
the operator and the certificate will be revoked ten days after such notice is
given. An operator whose certificate has been revoked must reapply for
certification and will be requested to meet the requirements of a new
applicant.))

(3)
The director shall notify individuals who fail to renew their certificates by
December 31st that their certificates are temporarily valid for two months.
Certificates not renewed during the two-month period, which ends the last day
of February, are invalid, and the director shall notify the holder of those
certificates and the owners of the wastewater treatment plants last known to
employ those individuals. An operator whose certificate is invalid and who
wishes to become certified must reapply for certification and must meet the
requirements of a new applicant.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.95B.095 and 1987 c 357 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

((Effective
January 1, 1988)) To support the wastewater operator certification
program, the department shall establish rules for the collection of fees ((for
the issuance and renewal of certificates as provided for in RCW 70.95B.090.
Beginning January 1, 1992, these fees shall be sufficient to recover the costs
of the certification program.)) through a schedule of fees for
wastewater treatment plant operators and a separate schedule of certification
program fees for wastewater treatment plants. Fees shall be established in
amounts to recover expenses incurred by the department in administering the
wastewater operator certification program. The annual certification fee paid
by a wastewater treatment plant shall be determined by the number of residences
or residential equivalents contributing to the wastewater treatment system.
For the purposes of this section, "residential equivalent" means a
single-family residence or a unit of sewer service that yields an amount of
gross revenue equal to the average annual user charge for a single-family
residence. If the treatment plant owner agency does not maintain data on any
combination of gross revenue, user charges, or the number of single-family
residences being served, "residential equivalent" means an average
influent flow rate of two hundred fifty gallons per day. If residences or
residential equivalents cannot be determined or reasonably estimated, fees
shall be based upon other appropriate criteria. The wastewater treatment plant
certification fee shall be calculated as six and sixty-five one-thousandths of
a cent per year per residential equivalent, except that no wastewater treatment
plant annual certification program fee shall be less than the annual renewal
fee for certified operators. Before the adoption of rules under chapter . . .,
Laws of 1999 (this act), the department shall continue to collect fees for the
issuance and renewal of certificates under the fee schedule existing at the
time of enactment of chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act).

Sec.
4. RCW
70.95B.100 and 1995 c 269 s 2903 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director may, after conducting a hearing, revoke a certificate found to have
been obtained by fraud or deceit, or for gross negligence in the operation of a
waste treatment plant, or for violating the requirements of this chapter or any
lawful rule, order or regulation of the department. No person whose
certificate is revoked under provisions of this section shall be
eligible to apply for a certificate for a minimum of one year from the
effective date of this final order or revocation.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.95B.130 and 1973 c 139 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

((On
or after July 1, 1973,)) Current and valid certification of wastewater
treatment plant operators by any state which, as determined by the
director, accepts certifications made or certification requirements deemed
satisfied pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be accorded
reciprocal treatment and shall be recognized as valid and sufficient evidence
of wastewater treatment plant operating competence within the purview of
this chapter, if in the judgment of the director the certification requirements
of such state are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter
or any rules or regulations promulgated hereunder. Such operators may be
granted wastewater treatment plant operator certificates in an appropriate
grade upon receipt of a completed application accompanied by payment of
appropriate fees.

In
making determinations pursuant to this section, the director ((shall consult
with the board and)) may consider any generally applicable criteria and
guidelines developed by the nationally recognized association of certification
authorities.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.95B.150 and 1973 c 139 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The wastewater operator certification account is created in the
general fund of the state treasury. All ((receipts realized in the
administration of this chapter)) fees paid in accordance with this
chapter, and any other receipts, shall be ((paid)) deposited
into the ((general fund)) account. Moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. The department shall use moneys from the
account to carry out the purposes of the wastewater operator certification
program.

---
END ---