BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW, to be codified immediately after RCW
42.17.312, to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to records and information available for public inspection,
copying, or use under federal or state laws, including but not limited to RCW
42.17.250 through 42.17.348 and 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2721 (the "Driver's Privacy
Protection Act of 1994"), vital statistics must be made available for
inspection, copying, and use by a health research organization in connection
with a medical or health research project that an institutional review board,
as defined in RCW 70.02.010, has determined:

(a)
Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the privacy of a
person that would result from access to the vital statistics in question;

(b)
Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the vital statistics in
individually identifiable form;

(c)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information from redisclosure;

(d)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying, directly or
indirectly, a person whose vital statistics are accessed, in a report of the
research project; and

(e)
Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest opportunity,
consistent with the purposes of the project, information that would enable
identification of the person whose vital statistics are accessed, unless an
institutional review board authorizes retention of identifying information for
purposes of another research project.

(2)
Inspection, copying, and use of vital statistics as provided in this section
are necessary to the maintenance of public health and safety.

(3)
In this section:

(a)
"Health research organization" means a nonprofit corporation that is
exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and authorized
under federal or state law to conduct health or medical research;

(b) "Vital statistics" means records held by state
government and by local governments descriptive of a readily identifiable
person including name, address, gender, voter registration number, birth,
death, marriage, divorce, annulment, and dates pertinent to them.

---
END ---