BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that limiting competition for housing types, manufacturing
methods, and housing designs stifles housing choices, arbitrarily reduces
competition, and increases costs which in turn reduces housing affordability.
These restrictions on the siting of manufactured housing go beyond regulations
needed to adequately protect the life and safety of the citizens of the state.
The legislature further finds that manufactured housing built to federal standards
should not be prohibited or restrained beyond restraints or prohibitions placed
on site-built single-family residences, either through personal or public
restrictions, and that any such restrictions are contrary to the public policy
of the state that encourages housing affordability and consumer choice absent
restraint of trade by private or public entities.

The
legislature recognizes that federal standards for manufactured housing
supersedes state and local building and energy codes and that compliance with
state or local building or energy codes as a requirement for issuing a permit
for siting a manufactured housing unit may not be required as a condition for
allowing manufactured homes in the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.63.110 and 1965 c 7 s 35.63.110 are each amended to read as follows:

For
any or all of such purposes the council or board, on recommendation of its
commission, may divide the municipality or any portion thereof into districts
of such size, shape and area, or may establish such official maps, or
development plans for the whole or any portion of the municipality as may be
deemed best suited to carry out the purposes of this chapter and within such
districts it may regulate and restrict the erection, construction,
reconstruction, alteration, repair or use of buildings, structures, or
land.

However,
in any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to
land use regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on
individual lots in such districts. This section does not prevent the adoption
of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such
regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and
designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35.63.160.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.63.160 and 1988 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Each comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of
manufactured homes on individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city
of the need and demand for such homes. The review shall be completed by
December 31, 1990.

(2)
For the purpose of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to
allow manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A
"designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home constructed
after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal requirements for
manufactured homes, which:

(a)
Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less
than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b)
Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or
shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal
3:12 pitch; and

(c)
Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on
conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(((3)))
(2) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any
manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local standards
which differ from the designated manufactured home as described in this
section, except that the term "designated manufactured home" shall
not be used except as defined in subsection (((2))) (1) of this
section.

Sec.
4. RCW
35A.63.100 and 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

After
approval of the comprehensive plan, as set forth above, the legislative body,
in developing the municipality and in regulating the use of land, may implement
or give effect to the comprehensive plan or parts thereof by ordinance or other
action to such extent as the legislative body deems necessary or appropriate.
Such ordinances or other action may provide for:

(1)
Adoption of an official map and regulations relating thereto designating
locations and requirements for one or more of the following: Streets, parks,
public buildings, and other public facilities, and protecting such sites
against encroachment by buildings and other physical structures.

(2)
Dividing the municipality, or portions thereof, into appropriate zones within
which specific standards, requirements, and conditions may be provided for
regulating the use of public and private land, buildings, and structures, and
the location, height, bulk, number of stories, and size of buildings and
structures, size of yards, courts, open spaces, density of population, ratio of
land area to the area of buildings and structures, setbacks, area required for
off-street parking, protection of access to direct sunlight for solar energy
systems, and such other standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures as
are appropriately related thereto. The ordinance encompassing the matters of
this subsection is hereinafter called the "zoning ordinance". No
zoning ordinance, or amendment thereto, shall be enacted by the legislative
body without at least one public hearing, notice of which shall be given as set
forth in RCW 35A.63.070. Such hearing may be held before the planning agency
or the board of adjustment or such other body as the legislative body shall
designate.

However,
in any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35A.63.145, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to
land use regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on
individual lots in such districts. This section does not prevent the adoption
of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such
regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and
designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35A.63.145.

(3)
Adoption of design standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures for the
subdivision of land into two or more parcels, including, but not limited to,
the approval of plats, dedications, acquisitions, improvements, and reservation
of sites for public use.

(4)
Scheduling public improvements on the basis of recommended priorities over a
period of years, subject to periodic review.

(5)
Such other matters as may be otherwise authorized by law or as the legislative
body deems necessary or appropriate to effectuate the goals and objectives of
the comprehensive plan or parts thereof and the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
35A.63.145 and 1988 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Each comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of manufactured
homes on individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city of the need
and demand for such homes. The review shall be completed by December 31, 1990.

(2)
For the purpose of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to
allow manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A
"designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home constructed
after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal requirements for
manufactured homes, which:

(a)
Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less
than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b)
Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or
shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal
3:12 pitch; and

(c)
Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on
conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(((3)))
(2) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any
manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local standards
which differ from the designated manufactured home as described in this
section, except that the term "designated manufactured home" shall
not be used except as defined in subsection (((2))) (1) of this
section.

Sec.
6. RCW
36.70.750 and 1963 c 4 s 36.70.750 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
board, by ordinance, may establish classifications, within each of which,
specific controls are identified, and which will:

(1)
Regulate the use of buildings, structures, and land as between agriculture,
industry, business, residence, and other purposes.

However,
in any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to
land use regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on
individual lots in such districts. This subsection does not prevent the
adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility
provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state
building code and designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35.63.160;

(2)
Regulate location, height, bulk, number of stories and size of buildings and
structures; the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces; the density of
population; the percentage of a lot which may be occupied by buildings and
structures; and the area required to provide off-street facilities for the
parking of motor vehicles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Any city or county that plans or elects to plan under this chapter
must allow in any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family
designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or
35A.63.145 that are thermally equivalent to the state energy code, to be sited
on individual lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all other
single-family residences on individual lots in such districts. This section
does not prevent the adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood
compatibility provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under
the state building code and designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW
43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145.

---
END ---