BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.15.044 and 1986 c 91 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature that students ((will propose budgetary
recommendations for consideration by)) and the college or university
administration and governing board ((to the extent that such budget
recommendations are intended to be funded by services and activities fees))
work collaboratively to budget services and activities fees. It is also
the intent of the legislature that services and activities fee expenditures for
programs devoted to political or economic philosophies shall result in the
presentation of a spectrum of ideas.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.045 and 1994 c 41 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that institutional governing boards have a
responsibility to manage and protect institutions of higher education. This
responsibility includes ensuring certain lawful agreements for which revenues
from services and activities fees have been pledged. Such lawful agreements
include, but are not limited to, bond covenant agreements and other contractual
obligations. Institutional governing boards are also expected to protect the
stability of programs that benefit students.

The
legislature also recognizes that services and activities fees are paid by
students for the express purpose of funding student services and programs,
and that students are the most appropriate judges of which expenditures best
serve their needs. It is the intent of the legislature that governing
boards ((ensure that)) and students have ((a strong)) an
equal voice in ((recommending)) determining budgets for
services and activities fees. The boards of trustees and the boards of regents
of the respective institutions of higher education shall adopt guidelines
governing the establishment and funding of programs supported by services and
activities fees upon the written agreement of their respective student
government association or its equivalent. Such guidelines shall stipulate
procedures for budgeting and expending services and activities fee revenue.
Any such guidelines shall be consistent with the following provisions:

(1)
Student representatives from the services and activities fee committee and
representatives of the college or university administration shall have an
opportunity to address the board before board decisions on services and
activities fee budgets and dispute resolution actions are made;

(2)
((Members of the governing boards shall adhere to the principle that
services and activities fee committee desires be given priority consideration
on funding items that do not fall into the categories of preexisting
contractual obligations, bond covenant agreements, or stability for programs
affecting students)) Revenue from this fee shall be used exclusively to
support student services and programs;

(3)
Responsibility for proposing ((to the administration and the governing board
program priorities and budget levels for that portion of program budgets that
derive from)) an annual expenditure plan for services and activities
fees revenues shall reside with a services and activities fee committee,
on which students shall hold at least a majority of the voting memberships,
such student members shall represent diverse student interests, and shall be
recommended by the student government association or its equivalent. The
chairperson of the services and activities fee committee shall be selected by
the members of that committee. The governing board shall insure that the
services and activities fee committee provides an opportunity for all viewpoints
to be heard at a public meeting during its consideration of the funding of
student programs and activities.

(4)
The services and activities fee committee shall evaluate existing and proposed
programs and submit a budget ((recommendations)) for the
expenditure of ((those)) services and activities fees with supporting
documents simultaneously to the college or university governing board and
administration.

(5)
The college or university administration shall review the services and
activities fee committee budget ((recommendations)) and publish a
written response to the services and activities fee committee. This response
shall ((outline potential areas of difference between the committee
recommendations and the administration's proposed budget recommendations)) detail
any concerns with the committee's budget, particularly any perceived failure by
the committee to observe preexisting contractual obligations or bond covenant
agreements. This response, with supporting documentation, shall be
submitted to the services and activities fee committee in a timely manner to
allow adequate consideration.

(6)(a)
In the event of a dispute or disputes involving the services and activities fee
committee ((recommendations)) budget, the college or university
administration shall meet with the services and activities fee committee in a
good faith effort to resolve such dispute or disputes ((prior to submittal
of final recommendations to)) before review of the services and
activities fee committee budget by the governing board.

(b)
If said dispute is not resolved within fourteen days, a dispute resolution
committee shall be convened by the chair of the services and activities fee
committee within fourteen days.

(7)
The dispute resolution committee shall be selected as follows: The college or
university administration shall appoint two nonvoting advisory members; the
governing board shall appoint three voting members; and the services and
activities fee committee chair shall appoint three student members of the
services and activities fee committee who will have a vote, and one student
representing the services and activities fee committee who will chair the
dispute resolution committee and be nonvoting. The committee shall meet in
good faith, and settle by vote any and all disputes. In the event of a tie
vote, the chair of the dispute resolution committee shall vote to settle the
dispute.

(8)
The governing board may take action on those portions of the services and
activities fee committee budget not in dispute in accordance with the
customary budget approval timeline established by the board. When
considering the services and activities fee committee budget, the governing
board shall be limited to approving or disapproving expenditures, however the
board may approve expenditures not contained in the services and activities fee
committee budget to remedy any failure by the committee to observe preexisting
contractual obligations or bond covenant agreements. The governing board
shall consider the results, if any, of the dispute resolution committee and ((shall
take action)) may approve expenditures recommended by the dispute
resolution committee.

(9)
Services and activities fees and revenues generated by programs and activities
funded by such fees shall be deposited and expended through the office of the
chief fiscal officer of the institution.

(10)
Services and activities fees and revenues generated by programs and activities
funded by such fees shall be subject to the applicable policies, regulations,
and procedures of the institution and the budget and accounting act, chapter
43.88 RCW.

(11)
All information pertaining to services and activities fees budgets shall be
made available to interested parties.

(12)
With the exception of any funds needed for bond covenant obligations, once the
budget for expending service and activities fees is approved by the governing
board, funds shall not be shifted from funds budgeted for associated students
or departmentally related categories or the reserve fund until the administration
provides written justification to the services and activities fee committee and
the governing board, and the governing board and the services and activities
fee committee give their express approval. In the event of a fund transfer
dispute among the services and activities fee committee, the administration, or
the governing board, said dispute shall be resolved pursuant to subsections
(6)(b), (7), and (8) of this section.

(13)
Any service and activities fees collected which exceed initially budgeted amounts
are subject to subsections (1) through (10) and (12) of this section.

(14)
Only changes in the amount of services and activities fees agreed upon by the
services and activities fee committee and the governing board may be used to
adjust the amount charged to students.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---