BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall conduct a scratch lottery game with a theme pertaining to
outdoor recreation. This game is intended to generate moneys sufficient to
cover the distributions under RCW 67.70.240(6).

Sec.
2. RCW
67.70.240 and 1997 c 220 s 206 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The
moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:

(1)
For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;

(2)
For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW
67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260;

(3)
For purposes of making deposits into the state's general fund;

(4)
For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs. Three million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during calendar year 1996. During subsequent years, such
distributions shall equal the prior year's distributions increased by four
percent. Distributions under this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued
for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than
twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;

(5)
For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account, created in RCW
43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW 43.99N.070, six million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during the calendar year 1998.
During subsequent years, such distribution shall equal the prior year's
distributions increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under
this subsection after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of
the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this subsection
shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than December 31, 2020;

(6)
For distribution to the recreation resource account, created in RCW
43.99.170, those moneys derived from lottery games authorized in section 1 of
this act;

(7)
For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and

(((7)))
(8) For the payment of agent compensation.

The
office of financial management shall require the allotment of all expenses paid
from the account and shall report to the ways and means committees of the
senate and house of representatives any changes in the allotments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---