BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that:

(1)
Healthy elk populations are a tremendous resource to the rural economy of
Washington, bringing thousands of observers, photographers, and hunters to
interact with elk. Elk are also important to maintaining healthy ecosystems;

(2)
Certain Washington elk populations are at risk due to habitat changes and
increased hunting pressures;

(3)
Different cultural perspectives toward hunting, different tribal and nontribal
regulations and enforcement procedures, and different views regarding treaty
hunting privileges have contributed to tensions between tribal and nontribal
elk hunters;

(4)
Tribal and nontribal elk hunters share a common interest in maintaining and
rebuilding elk populations in order to ensure that there will continue to be
elk hunting and viewing opportunities; and

(5)
Combining new policies with discussions to cultivate this common interest could
yield ways to reduce tensions while also maintaining and rebuilding elk
populations for the continued benefit of all Washington citizens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall:

(a)
Establish accurate annual population estimates for Washington's elk herds,
particularly those herds in areas where conservation restrictions have been
imposed in recent history;

(b)
Determine as accurately as possible annual elk mortality from all sources,
including the number of elk taken by all hunters and by poachers;

(c)
Delineate changes in historic elk ranges along with anticipated habitat changes
in the future and projected impacts to elk populations and herd health;

(d)
Design hunting rules and enforcement strategies that simultaneously honor
tribal hunting privileges and recognize the mutual benefit to both tribal and
nontribal hunters of preserving and enhancing elk populations;

(e)
Identify avenues whereby interested citizens can volunteer in programs to
collect needed biological data, assist in preventing poaching and apprehending
poachers, and identify ways for those who live near hunting areas to express
their concerns and report the taking of elk;

(f)
Identify existing elk research and enhancement efforts underway in Washington
state by federal, state, and local governments, tribes, and private
foundations, and opportunities for possible cooperative efforts to maintain and
rebuild elk populations in the future;

(g)
Identify additional resources, including possible funding sources, needed to
implement these various measures; and

(h)
Initiate other necessary efforts in order for the department to gain a better
understanding of elk hunting and of Washington's elk populations.

In
accomplishing (a) through (h) of this subsection, the department shall place
primary emphasis on the Packwood, Olympic Peninsula, Nooksack, North Rainier,
and Blue Mountains elk herds. The Colockum, Yakima, and Willapa Hills elk
herds shall also receive increased attention to prevent foreseeable declines.

(2)
The department shall invite federally recognized Indian tribes with hunting
privileges to participate in a series of discussions on Washington's elk populations
and elk management issues. Through these discussions, the department shall
work with tribal representatives to identify strategies that honor tribal
hunting privileges while maintaining and rebuilding elk populations. In
establishing a format for these discussions, the department shall provide
opportunities for nontribal elk hunters, residents near areas where elk hunting
takes place, and other interested parties to express their concerns and
contribute their constructive suggestions.

(3)
By December 1, 2000, the department shall report to the legislature on the
status of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this
act.

(2)
The sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from
the general fund to the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of
this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---