BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall contract with the Crime Stoppers of Washington Association to
provide grants to law enforcement agencies or local jurisdictions with
qualified Crime Stoppers programs. Grant funds shall be allocated according to
guidelines established by the Crime Stoppers of Washington Association.

(1)
The Crime Stoppers of Washington Association shall accept applications for
grants from law enforcement agencies or local jurisdictions with Crime Stoppers
programs identical or similar to the model programs or from law enforcement
agencies or local jurisdictions wishing to start the programs.

(2)
Except when establishing a new program, the Crime Stoppers of Washington
Association shall determine what matching resources, if any, should be required
from those Crime Stoppers programs seeking grants.

(3)
At least twenty-five percent of the grants given in a biennium must be for
training, public awareness efforts, and establishing new programs.

(4)
Grants awarded to local jurisdictions may be used for operating costs of Crime
Stoppers programs.

(5)
Except for newly established programs, grants may not be used for rewards.

(6)
Law enforcement agencies or local jurisdictions may not receive more than one
grant per biennium under this chapter. The grant may be awarded either to
start a Crime Stoppers program or to expand an existing Crime Stoppers program,
but not both.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

The
Crime Stoppers of Washington Association shall review the Crime Stoppers
program under section 1 of this act and report to the legislature, not later
than January 1st of each year, on the program's administration and its progress
in achieving its objectives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

To
expand community involvement and to stimulate youth awareness, the Crime
Stoppers of Washington Association may foster the development of student Crime
Stoppers programs around the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---