BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.320.017 and 1997 c 431 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As provided in RCW 28A.150.425, 28A.165.095, 28A.175.015, 28A.185.045,
28A.220.065, 28A.230.065, 28A.235.035, 28A.300.075, 28A.305.148, 28A.320.045,
28A.330.005, 28A.400.115, 28A.405.469, and 28A.600.005, the board of directors
of each school district may grant waivers, or partial waivers, of state laws
and rules to schools within the district. The school board shall grant waivers
in accordance with this section.

(2)
To apply for waivers, a school principal must prepare an application to the
board of directors that identifies which laws and rules are being requested for
waiver and the rationale for the request. The rationale must identify how
granting the waivers will improve student learning or the delivery of education
services in the school. The application must include evidence that the
school's teachers, classified employees, site council, parents, and students,
as appropriate, are committed to working cooperatively in implementing the
waiver.

(3)
The school board shall provide for public review and comment regarding the
waiver request.

(4)
The duration, renewal, and rescission of the waivers shall be determined by the
school district board of directors. The renewal of a waiver shall be subject
to the review process by the superintendent of public instruction and the state
board of education as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(5)
The following may not be waived:

(a)
Laws and rules pertaining to health, safety, and civil rights;

(b)
Provisions of the basic education act relating to certificated instructional
staff ratios, RCW 28A.150.100, except for waivers provided in accordance with
RCW 28A.630.945; goals, RCW 28A.150.210; funding allocations, formulas, and
definitions, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, except for waivers provided in
accordance with RCW 28A.150.250; and salary and compensation minimum amounts
and limitations, RCW 28A.400.200;

(c)
The essential academic learning requirements being developed by the commission
on student learning in RCW 28A.630.885;

(d)
The assessment, accountability, and reporting requirements in RCW 28A.230.190,
the ((fourth)) third grade standardized test; RCW 28A.230.230,
the eighth grade standardized test; RCW 28A.230.240, the eleventh grade standardized
test; RCW 28A.630.885, assessment requirements as developed by the commission
on student learning; and RCW 28A.320.205, the annual performance report;

(e)
Requirements in RCW 28A.150.220 pertaining to the total number of program hours
that must be offered, except for waivers provided in accordance with RCW
28A.305.140;

(f)
State and federal financial reporting and auditing requirements;

(g)
State constitutional requirements; and

(h)
Certification and other requirements in chapter 28A.410 RCW.

(6)
A school district may not include provisions in a collective bargaining
agreement that limit the district's authority to grant waivers under this
section.

(7)
School district boards of directors granting waivers to state laws and rules
shall certify to the superintendent of public instruction that they have a
waiver review process in effect and shall transmit to the superintendent of
public instruction and the state board of education a list of laws and rules
that have been waived in accordance with this section and a description of the
process used in considering the waivers. The superintendent of public
instruction and the state board of education shall review the waivers of state
laws and rules within their respective jurisdictions. The waivers shall be
approved by the superintendent of public instruction or the state board of
education, as appropriate, if the school district board of directors complied
with the requirements of this section. The superintendent of public
instruction or state board of education, as appropriate, shall approve or deny
the waiver request, in whole or in part, within forty calendar days of
receiving the list of waivers. If the district receives no response from
either the superintendent of public instruction or the state board of education
after forty days, the waiver shall be deemed uncontested. If a waiver is
contested by the superintendent of public instruction or the state board of
education, either as appropriate, may make recommendations to the district that
will assist the district in accomplishing the goal sought through the waiver.
The state board of education may delegate the responsibility for reviewing and
approving or denying the waivers to its staff if an appeal procedure to the
board is provided.

(8)
School district boards of directors granting waivers shall report annually to
the superintendent of public instruction the impact on student learning or
delivery of education services resulting from the waivers granted.

(9)
The superintendent of public instruction and state board of education shall
report to the legislature by November 1, 2000, the laws and rules that have
been waived in accordance with this section.

(((10)
This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.150.425 and 1997 c 431 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.165.095 and 1997 c 431 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.175.015 and 1997 c 431 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.185.045 and 1997 c 431 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.220.065 and 1997 c 431 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.230.065 and 1997 c 431 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.235.035 and 1997 c 431 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
9. RCW
28A.300.075 and 1997 c 431 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
10. RCW
28A.305.148 and 1997 c 431 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
11. RCW
28A.320.045 and 1997 c 431 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements. ((No waivers may be obtained from RCW 28A.320.017.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
12. RCW
28A.330.005 and 1997 c 431 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
13. RCW
28A.400.115 and 1997 c 431 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
14. RCW
28A.405.469 and 1997 c 431 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
15. RCW
28A.600.005 and 1997 c 431 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools may obtain, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, waivers from the
statutory requirements in this chapter that pertain to the instructional
program, operation, and management of schools. Waivers also may be obtained,
in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017, from any rules of the state board of
education and superintendent of public instruction adopted to implement the
statutory requirements.

(((2) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
16. RCW
41.59.935 and 1997 c 431 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to grant employers or employees the
right to reach agreements regarding:

(((a)))
(1) Salary or compensation increases in excess of those authorized in
accordance with RCW 28A.150.410 and 28A.400.200; or

(((b)))
(2) Limiting the employer's authority to grant waivers under RCW
28A.320.017.

(((2)
This section expires June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
17. RCW
28A.630.945 and 1997 c 431 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state board of education, where appropriate, or the superintendent of
public instruction, where appropriate, may grant waivers to districts from the
provisions of statutes or rules relating to: The length of the school year;
student-to-teacher ratios; and other administrative rules that in the opinion
of the state board of education or the opinion of the superintendent of public
instruction may need to be waived in order for a district to implement a plan
for restructuring its educational program or the educational program of
individual schools within the district.

(2)
School districts may use the application process in RCW 28A.305.140 or
28A.300.138 to apply for the waivers under subsection (1) of this section.

(((3) This section expires June 30, 1999.))

---
END ---