BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
75.28.750 and 1993 c 340 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every diver engaged in the commercial harvest of geoduck clams shall obtain a
((nontransferable)) geoduck diver license.

(2)
After July 1, 1999, the director shall issue no new geoduck diver licenses
unless fewer than fifty persons are eligible for renewal. A person may renew
an existing license only if the person held a geoduck diver license for five of
the eight years 1991 through 1998 or acquired the license by transfer from
someone who held it during the previous year, and if the person has not
subsequently transferred the license to another person.

(3)
If fewer than fifty persons are eligible to renew a geoduck diver license, the
director may accept applications for new licenses. The department shall adopt
rules and procedures to determine whether additional diver licenses will be
issued and the application procedure. The director shall determine by random
selection, from all otherwise qualified applicants, the successful applicants
for any additional licenses.

(4)
When the person failed to obtain the license during the previous year because
of a license suspension, the person may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the license
was not suspended.

(5)
Geoduck diver licenses are transferable only to a natural person. The license
holder must perform the actual harvesting.

(6) Licensed geoduck harvesters will bear the responsibility for
providing the labor to plant onto state commercial beds geoduck seed provided
by the state hatchery.

---
END ---