BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The purpose of this act is to clarify the property tax exemption statutes by:
(a) Repealing unnecessary and duplicative statutes in chapter 84.36 RCW; (b)
consolidating the exemption statutes for business inventories; and (c)
simplifying administrative statutes pertaining to nonprofit organizations.

(2)
Section 2, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 2 of this act)
consolidates all exemptions for business inventories and their related
definitions into one statute.

(3)
Section 3, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 3 of this act)
clarifies and simplifies RCW 84.36.805 by substituting a general reference to
chapter 84.36 RCW for specific references to exemption statutes for nonprofit
organizations. RCW 84.36.805 applies to all new property tax exemptions for
nonprofit organizations unless the new exemption is specifically exempted.

(4)
Section 4, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 4 of this act)
substitutes a general reference for specific statutory references in RCW
84.36.810 to clarify that back taxes are not due on the loss of exemption on
leased property if the lease is canceled and deletes an erroneous reference
caused by section 20, chapter 311, Laws of 1998.

(5)
Section 5, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 5 of this act)
deletes references to previously repealed statutes and to RCW 84.36.473 which
is repealed by section 7, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 7 of
this act).

(6)
Section 7 of this act repeals the statutes that have been incorporated into the
definition of business inventories in RCW 84.36.477. It also repeals unused
statutes authorizing an exemption for the construction of the King county
stadium on private property.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.477 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 62 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Business inventories ((as defined in RCW 84.36.473)) are exempt from
property taxation.

(2)
As used in this section:

(a)(i)
"Business inventories" means all livestock, inventories of finished
goods and work in process, and personal property not under lease or rental,
acquired or produced solely for the purpose of sale or lease or for the purpose
of consuming the property in producing for sale or lease a new article of
tangible personal property of which the property becomes an ingredient or
component.

(ii)
"Business inventories" also includes:

(A)
All grains and flour, fruit and fruit products, unprocessed timber, vegetables
and vegetable products, and fish and fish products, while being transported to
or held in storage in a public or private warehouse or storage area if actually
shipped to points outside the state on or before April 30th of the first year
for which they would otherwise be taxable;

(B)
All finished plywood, hardboard, and particle board panels shipped from outside
this state to any processing plant within this state, if the panels are moving
under a through freight rate to final destination outside this state and the
carrier grants the shipper the privilege of stopping the shipment in transit
for the purpose of storing, milling, manufacturing, or other processing, while
the panels are in the process of being treated or shaped into flat component
parts to be incorporated into finished products outside this state and for
thirty days after completion of the processing or treatment;

(C)
All ore or metal shipped from outside this state to any smelter or refining
works within this state, while in process of reduction or refinement and for
thirty days after completion of the reduction or refinement; and

(D)
All metals refined by electrolytic process into cathode or bar form while in
this form and held under negotiable warehouse receipt in a public or private
warehouse recognized by an established incorporated commodity exchange and for
sale through the exchange.

(iii)
"Business inventories" does not include personal property acquired or
produced for the purpose of lease or rental if the property was leased or
rented at any time during the calendar year immediately preceding the year of
assessment and was not thereafter remanufactured, nor does it include property
held within the normal course of business for lease or rental for periods of
less than thirty days.

(iv)
"Business inventories" does not include agricultural or horticultural
property fully or partially exempt under RCW 84.36.470.

(v)
"Business inventories" does not include timber that is standing on
public land and that is sold under a contract entered into after August 1,
1982;

(b)
"Fish and fish products" means all fish and fish products suitable
and designed for human consumption, excluding all others;

(c)
"Fruit and fruit products" means all raw edible fruits, berries, and
hops and all processed products of fruits, berries, or hops, suitable and
designed for human consumption, while in the hands of the first processor;

(d)
"Processed" means canning, barreling, bottling, preserving, refining,
freezing, packing, milling, or any other method employed to keep any grain,
fruit, vegetable, or fish in an edible condition or to put it into more
suitable or convenient form for consuming, storing, shipping, or marketing;

(e)
"Remanufactured" means the restoration of property to essentially its
original condition, but does not mean normal maintenance or repairs; and

(f)
"Vegetables and vegetable products" means all raw edible vegetables
such as peas, beans, beets, sugar beets, and other vegetables, and all
processed products of vegetables, suitable and designed for human consumption,
while in the hands of the first processor.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.36.805 and 1998 c 311 s 25, 1998 c 202 s 3, and 1998 c 184 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to ((be exempt pursuant to RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.035, 84.36.037,
84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.043, 84.36.045, 84.36.046, 84.36.047, 84.36.050,
84.36.060, 84.36.350, 84.36.480, 84.36.550, and 84.36.042)) qualify for
an exemption under this chapter, the nonprofit organizations, associations
or corporations ((shall)) must satisfy the ((following))
conditions((:)) in this section.

(((1)))
(2) The property ((is)) must be used exclusively for the
actual operation of the activity for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise
provided, and does not exceed an amount reasonably necessary for that purpose,
except:

(a)
The loan or rental of the property does not subject the property to tax if:

(i)
The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of the property are
reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses
attributable to the portion of the property loaned or rented; and

(ii)
Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4) and 84.36.037, the property
would be exempt from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or
rented;

(b)
The use of the property for fund-raising activities does not subject the
property to tax if the fund-raising activities are consistent with the purposes
for which the exemption is granted((;)).

(((2)))
(3) The property ((is)) must be irrevocably dedicated to
the purpose for which exemption has been granted, and on the liquidation,
dissolution, or abandonment by said organization, association, or corporation,
said property will not inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any
shareholder or individual, except a nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation which too would be entitled to property tax exemption. This
property need not be irrevocably dedicated if it is leased or rented to those
qualified for exemption ((pursuant to RCW 84.36.035, 84.36.040, 84.36.041,
84.36.043, 84.36.045, 84.36.046, or 84.36.042 or those qualified for exemption
as an association engaged in the production or performance of musical, dance,
artistic, dramatic, or literary works pursuant to RCW 84.36.060)) under
this chapter for leased property, but only if under the terms of the lease
or rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
receives the benefit of the exemption((;)).

(((3)))
(4) The facilities and services ((are)) must be available
to all regardless of race, color, national origin or ancestry((;)).

(((4)))
(5) The organization, association, or corporation ((is)) must
be duly licensed or certified where such licensing or certification is
required by law or regulation((;)).

(((5)))
(6) Property sold to organizations, associations, or corporations with
an option to be repurchased by the seller shall not qualify for exempt status((;)).

(((6)))
(7) The ((director of the)) department ((of revenue))
shall have access to its books in order to determine whether ((such)) the
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation is exempt from ((taxes
within the intent of RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.035, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041,
84.36.043, 84.36.045, 84.36.046, 84.36.047, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.350,
84.36.480, and 84.36.042)) taxes under this chapter.

(8)
This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.020,
84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

Sec.
4. RCW
84.36.810 and 1998 c 311 s 26 and 1998 c 202 s 4 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been granted pursuant to
RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.042, 84.36.043,
84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, and 84.36.550((, and 84.36.042)),
the county treasurer shall collect all taxes which would have been paid had the
property not been exempt during the three years preceding, or the life of such
exemption, if such be less, together with the interest at the same rate and
computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes. ((Where))
When the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten consecutive
years, taxes and interest shall not be assessed under this section.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of the property is
transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the area of the property ((has
lost)) loses its exempt status. The additional tax under subsection
(1) of this section shall not be imposed if the cessation of use resulted
solely from:

(a)
Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation for a use
which also qualifies and is granted exemption under ((the provisions of))
this chapter ((84.36 RCW));

(b)
A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or
transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the
exercise of such power;

(c)
Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or
city within which the property is located which disallows the present use of
such property;

(d)
A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such
calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the organization, association, or
corporation changing the use of such property;

(e)
Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site except for
undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW 84.36.030;

(f)
Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt under ((RCW
84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.060, or 84.36.042)) this
chapter; or

(g)
A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under RCW 84.36.041(3),
as long as some portion of the home remains exempt((;

(h)
The conversion of a full exemption of a home for the aging to a partial
exemption or taxable status or the conversion of a partial exemption to taxable
status under RCW 84.36.041(8))).

Sec.
5. RCW
84.40.405 and 1985 c 7 s 156 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of revenue shall promulgate such rules and regulations, and
prescribe such procedures as it deems necessary to carry out RCW ((82.04.444,
82.04.445,)) 84.36.470((, 84.36.473, 84.36.475,)) and
84.36.477((, 84.09.080, and 84.52.015, and this section)).

Sec.
6. RCW
28C.10.084 and 1993 c 445 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The agency shall establish, maintain, and administer a tuition recovery trust
fund. All funds collected for the tuition recovery trust fund are payable to
the state for the benefit and protection of any student or enrollee of a
private vocational school licensed under this chapter, or, in the case of a
minor, his or her parents or guardian, for purposes including but not limited
to the settlement of claims related to school closures under subsection (10) of
this section and the settlement of claims under RCW 28C.10.120. The fund shall
be liable for settlement of claims and costs of administration but shall not be
liable to pay out or recover penalties assessed under RCW 28C.10.130 or
28C.10.140. No liability accrues to the state of Washington from claims made
against the fund.

(2)
By June 30, 1998, a minimum operating balance of one million dollars shall be
achieved in the fund and maintained thereafter. If disbursements reduce the
operating balance below two hundred thousand dollars at any time before June
30, 1998, or below one million dollars thereafter, each participating entity
shall be assessed a pro rata share of the deficiency created, based upon the
incremental scale created under subsection (6) of this section. The agency
shall adopt schedules of times and amounts for effecting payments of
assessment.

(3)
To be and remain licensed under this chapter each entity shall, in addition to
other requirements under this chapter, make cash deposits into a tuition
recovery trust fund as a means to assure payment of claims brought under this
chapter.

(4)
The amount of liability that can be satisfied by this fund on behalf of each
individual entity licensed under this chapter shall be established by the
agency, based on an incremental scale that recognizes the average amount of
unearned prepaid tuition in possession of the entity. However, the minimum
amount of liability for any entity shall not be less than five thousand
dollars. The upper limit of liability is reestablished after any disbursements
are made to settle an individual claim or class of claims.

(5)
The fund's liability with respect to each participating entity commences on the
date of its initial deposit into the fund and ceases one year from the date it
is no longer licensed under this chapter.

(6)
The agency shall adopt by rule a matrix for calculating the deposits into the
fund required of each entity. Proration shall be determined by factoring the
entity's share of liability in proportion to the aggregated liability of all
participants under the fund by grouping such prorations under the incremental
scale created by subsection (4) of this section. Expressed as a percentage of
the total liability, that figure determines the amount to be contributed when
factored into a fund containing one million dollars. The total amount of its
prorated share, minus the amount paid for initial capitalization, shall be
payable in up to twenty increments over a ten-year period, commencing with the
sixth month after the entity makes its initial capitalization deposit.
Additionally, the agency shall require deposits for initial capitalization,
under which the amount each entity deposits is proportionate to its share of
two hundred thousand dollars, employing the matrix developed under this
subsection. The amount thus established shall be deposited by each applicant
for initial licensing before the issuance of such license.

(7)
No vested right or interests in deposited funds is created or implied for the
depositor, either at any time during the operation of the fund or at any such
future time that the fund may be dissolved. All funds deposited are payable to
the state for the purposes described under this section. The agency shall
maintain the fund, serve appropriate notices to affected entities when
scheduled deposits are due, collect deposits, and make disbursements to settle
claims against the fund. When the aggregated deposits total five million
dollars and the history of disbursements justifies such modifications, the
agency may at its own option reduce the schedule of deposits whether as to
time, amount, or both and the agency may also entertain proposals from among
the licensees with regard to disbursing surplus funds for such purposes as
vocational scholarships.

(8)
Based on annual financial data supplied by the entity the agency shall
determine whether the increment assigned to that entity on the incremental
scale established under subsection (6) of this section has changed. If an
increase or decrease in gross annual tuition income has occurred, a
corresponding change in its incremental position and contribution schedule
shall be made before the date of its next scheduled deposit into the fund.
Such adjustments shall only be calculated and applied annually.

(9)
No deposits made into the fund by an entity are transferable. If the majority
ownership interest in an entity is conveyed through sale or other means into
different ownership, all contributions made to the date of transfer accrue to
the fund. The new owner commences contributions under provisions applying to a
new applicant, except that if ownership of an entity is transferred to an
immediate family member, the entity is not required to make additional cash
deposits into a tuition recovery trust fund.

(10)
To settle claims adjudicated under RCW 28C.10.120 and claims resulting when a
private vocational school ceases to provide educational services, the agency
may make disbursements from the fund. Students enrolled under a training
contract executed between a school and a public or private agency or business
are not eligible to make a claim against the fund. In addition to the
processes described for making reimbursements related to claims under RCW
28C.10.120, the following procedures are established to deal with
reimbursements related to school closures:

(a)
The agency shall attempt to notify all potential claimants. The unavailability
of records and other circumstances surrounding a school closure may make it
impossible or unreasonable for the agency to ascertain the names and
whereabouts of each potential claimant but the agency shall make reasonable
inquiries to secure that information from all likely sources. The agency shall
then proceed to settle the claims on the basis of information in its
possession. The agency is not responsible or liable for claims or for handling
claims that may subsequently appear or be discovered.

(b)
Thirty days after identified potential claimants have been notified, if a
claimant refuses or neglects to file a claim verification as requested in such
notice, the agency shall be relieved of further duty or action on behalf of the
claimant under this chapter.

(c)
After verification and review, the agency may disburse funds from the tuition
recovery trust fund to settle or compromise the claims. However, the liability
of the fund for claims against the closed entity shall not exceed the maximum
amount of liability assigned to that entity under subsection (6) of this
section.

(d)
In the instance of claims against a closed school, the agency shall seek to
recover such disbursed funds from the assets of the defaulted entity, including
but not limited to asserting claims as a creditor in bankruptcy proceedings.

(11)
When funds are disbursed to settle claims against a current licensee, the
agency shall make demand upon the licensee for recovery. The agency shall
adopt schedules of times and amounts for effecting recoveries. An entity's
failure to perform subjects its license to suspension or revocation under RCW
28C.10.050 in addition to any other available remedies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
84.36.140 and 1972 ex.s. c 30 s 2 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.140;

(2) RCW
84.36.150 and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 32 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.150;

(3) RCW
84.36.160 and 1972 ex.s. c 30 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 137 s 1, &
1961 c 15 s 84.36.160;

(4) RCW
84.36.161 and 1998 c 311 s 21 & 1961 c 15 s 84.36.161;

(5) RCW
84.36.162 and 1961 c 15 s 84.36.162;

(6) RCW
84.36.176 and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 34;

(7) RCW
84.36.181 and 1961 c 168 s 2;

(8) RCW 84.36.190 and
1961 c 15 s 84.36.190;

(9) RCW
84.36.191 and 1961 c 15 s 84.36.191;

(10) RCW
84.36.270 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 95 & 1967 ex.s. c 117 s
1;

(11) RCW
84.36.280 and 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 2;

(12) RCW
84.36.290 and 1967 ex.s. c 117 s 3; and

(13) RCW
84.36.473 and 1998 c 311 s 23, 1983 1st ex.s. c 62 s 2, 1982 c
174 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 8, & 1974 ex.s. c 169 s 4.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The
repeals in section 7 of this act do not affect any existing right acquired or
liability or obligation incurred under the sections repealed or under any rule
or order adopted under those sections, nor do they affect any proceeding
instituted under those sections.

---
END ---