BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the provisions of the charter of a first class city to the
contrary, a board or other body established in the city to manage or operate
one or more utilities shall consist of seven members who are appointed by the
mayor, and confirmed by the council, to staggered five-year terms of office.
Five members of the board or other body shall be city residents and two
additional members of the board shall be residents of the greater utility
service area of the city that is located outside of the city boundaries. The
two additional members residing in the greater utility service area of the city
located outside of the city shall be appointed within two months of the
effective date of this act. Each of the five appointees from the city must
have resided in the district from which he or she is appointed for at least one
year prior to being appointed. The two members who reside in the portion of
the greater utility service area of the city that is located outside of the
city boundaries must have resided in that area for at least one year prior to
being appointed. Each district within the city shall have approximately the
same population and shall be the city council districts if five city council
districts exist in the city.

Staggering
of terms shall be accomplished by appointing one of the additional two members
who resides in the greater utility service area outside of the city to a
three-year term of office and the other new member who resides in the greater
utility service area outside of the city to a five-year term of office.
Existing members of the board or other body shall retain their current terms of
office and be replaced by appointees residing in different districts in the
city.

(2)
Each member of the board or other body, including the members who held those
positions on the effective date of this act, shall receive the same
compensation provided under RCW 54.12.080 that a public utility district
commissioner receives, with the gross revenues of the utility or utilities
managed and operated by the board or other body being considered the gross
revenues of the district.

(3)
The greater utility service area of the city shall include the entire city and
an area or areas contiguous to the city that includes every residence outside
of the city that is served by any of the utility services managed or operated
by the board or other body.

(4)
The board or other body shall select a director of each utility under its
jurisdiction, or a single director for two or more utilities under its
jurisdiction, and shall recommend utility rates to the city council which shall
set the utility rates.

(5) Any efforts of the city to provide cable service shall be
managed and operated by the board or other body.

---
END ---