BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that predatory individuals, such as drug dealers, sexual
marauders, and panderers, provide shelter to at-risk youth as a means of
preying upon them. The legislature further finds that at-risk youth are
vulnerable to the influence of these individuals. Thus, the legislature finds
that it is important to the safety of Washington's youth that they be prevented
from coming in contact with these predatory individuals. The legislature
further finds that locating runaway children is the first step to preventing
individuals from preying on these youth. The legislature intends to create a
clear disincentive for predatory individuals who take advantage of at-risk
youth. The legislature further intends that all persons be required to report
the location of a runaway minor, and that individuals who fail to make such a
report with the objective of preying upon them, be punished for their failure
to report the child's location.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.32A.080 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A person commits the crime of unlawful harboring of a minor if the person
provides shelter to a minor without the consent of a parent of the minor and
after the person knows that the minor is away from the home of the parent,
without the parent's permission, and if the person intentionally:

(i)
Fails to release the minor to a law enforcement officer after being requested
to do so by the officer; or

(ii)
Fails to disclose the location of the minor to a law enforcement officer after
being requested to do so by the officer, if the person knows the location of
the minor and had either taken the minor to that location or had assisted the
minor in reaching that location; or

(iii)
Obstructs a law enforcement officer from taking the minor into custody; or

(iv)
Assists the minor in avoiding or attempting to avoid the custody of the law
enforcement officer; or

(v)
Engages the child in a crime; or

(vi)
Involves a minor in a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

(b)
It is a defense to a prosecution under this section that the defendant had
custody of the minor pursuant to a court order.

(2)
Harboring a minor is punishable as a gross misdemeanor.

(3)
Any person who provides shelter to a child, absent from home, may notify the
department's local community service office of the child's presence.

(4)
An adult responsible for involving a child in the commission of an offense may
be prosecuted under existing criminal statutes including, but not limited to:

(a)
Distribution of a controlled substance to a minor, as defined in RCW 69.50.406;

(b)
Promoting prostitution as defined in chapter 9A.88 RCW; and

(c)
Complicity of the adult in the crime of a minor, under RCW 9A.08.020.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.32A.082 and 1996 c 133 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who, without legal authorization, provides shelter to a minor and
who knows at the time of providing the shelter that the minor is away from the
parent's home, or other lawfully prescribed residence, without the permission
of the parent, shall promptly report the location of the child to the parent,
the law enforcement agency of the jurisdiction in which the person lives, or
the department. The report may be made by telephone or any other reasonable
means.

(2)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Shelter" means the person's home or any structure over which the
person has any control.

(b)
"Promptly report" means to report within eight hours after the person
has knowledge that the minor is away from home without parental permission.

(3)
When the department receives a report under subsection (1) of this section, it
shall make a good faith attempt to notify the parent that a report has been
received and offer services designed to resolve the conflict and accomplish a
reunification of the family.

(4) A person who violates subsection (1) of this section with
the intent to contribute to the delinquency of a minor or to involve a minor in
a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

---
END ---