BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds and declares that:

(a)
Criminal gang activity is a prevalent problem throughout this state and gang
violence has had a tremendous impact on our communities and families;

(b)
Gang members often view their gang as their "family." Gangs provide
their members with negative guidance and undesirable values. This gang
subculture perpetuates itself and leads to increased violence and crime;

(c)
Current law does not sufficiently deter criminal street gang activity.

(2)
By increasing penalties when an offense is committed for the benefit of, at the
direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, with the intent
to promote, further, or assist in criminal conduct by gang members, the
legislature intends to convey that involvement in criminal street gangs is
unacceptable. The legislature intends to deter criminal street gang activity
by providing a sentencing enhancement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A person convicted of a felony offense that is committed for the benefit of, at
the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, with the
intent to promote, further, or assist in criminal conduct by gang members, shall,
in addition and consecutive to the punishment prescribed for the felony or
attempted felony of which he or she has been convicted, be punished by an
additional term of two years, except as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b)
If the court finds that there are aggravating factors, the court may order the
imposition of a sentence enhancement in excess of two years, but not to exceed
three years. If the court finds that there are mitigating circumstances, the
court may order the imposition of a sentence enhancement that is less than two
years, but not less than one year. The court shall state the reasons for its
choice of sentence enhancements on the record at the time of the sentencing.

(c)
The sentence enhancement imposed by the court under this section is mandatory
and shall not run concurrently with any other sentence.

(2)
As used in this section, "criminal street gang" means any ongoing
organization, association, or group of three or more persons, whether formal
or informal, having a common name or common identifying sign or symbol, and
having as one of its primary activities the commission of one or more of the
criminal acts enumerated in subsection (3) of this section, and whose members
individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a pattern of criminal
gang activity.

(3)
As used in this section, "pattern of criminal gang activity" means
the conviction or juvenile adjudication of two or more of the following
offenses, provided at least one of these offenses occurred on or after the
effective date of this act, and the last of those offenses occurred within
three years after a prior offense, and the offenses were committed on separate
occasions, or by two or more persons:

(a)
Murder, as defined in RCW 9A.32.030 or 9A.32.050;

(b)
Robbery, as defined in RCW 9A.56.200 or 9A.56.210;

(c)
Kidnapping, as defined in RCW 9A.40.020 or 9A.40.030;

(d)
Theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, or 9A.56.050;

(e)
Assault, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021;

(f)
Delivery or manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to
deliver or manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(g)
Drive-by shooting, as defined in RCW 9A.36.045;

(h)
Reckless endangerment, as defined in RCW 9A.36.050;

(i)
Arson, as defined in RCW 9A.48.020 or 9A.48.030;

(j)
Intimidating a witness, as defined in RCW 9A.72.110;

(k)
Taking a motor vehicle without permission, as defined in RCW 9A.56.070;

(l)
Burglary, as defined in RCW 9A.52.020, 9A.52.025, or 9A.52.030;

(m)
Rape, as defined in RCW 9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, or 9A.44.060;

(n)
Money laundering, as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;

(o)
Extortion, as defined in RCW 9A.56.120 or 9A.56.130;

(p)
Malicious mischief, as defined in RCW 9A.48.070, 9A.48.080, or 9A.48.090;

(q)
Unlawful possession of a firearm, as defined in RCW 9.41.040(1) (a) or (b).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A juvenile adjudicated of a felony offense that is committed for the benefit
of, at the direction of, or in association with a criminal street gang, as
defined in section 2 of this act, with the intent to promote, further, or
assist in criminal conduct by gang members, must receive a sentence enhancement
of ninety to one hundred twenty days confinement, at the discretion of the
court, as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a)
The court must determine the standard range disposition for the offense for
which the respondent was adjudicated under RCW 13.40.160. One hundred five
days must be added to the entire standard range disposition of confinement,
except as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b)
If the court finds that there are aggravating circumstances, the court may
order the imposition of a disposition enhancement that is in excess of one
hundred five days, but not to exceed one hundred twenty days. If the court
finds that there are mitigating circumstances, the court may impose a
disposition enhancement of less than one hundred five days, but not less than
ninety days. The court must state the reasons for its choice of sentence
enhancements on the record at the time of the disposition.

(3)
Any term of confinement ordered under this section must run consecutively to
any term of confinement imposed in the same disposition for other offenses.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.310 and 1998 c 235 s 1 and 1998 c 211 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1) TABLE 1

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

SCORE OFFENDER SCORE

9 or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

XV Life
Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XIV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320
333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIII 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m
29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136
147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102
114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14
20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3
8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6
9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

NOTE:
Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category represent
sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and
third rows represent presumptive sentencing ranges in months, or in days if so
designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.

(2)
For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the presumptive sentence
is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the
appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime,
and multiplying the range by 75 percent.

(3)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime.
If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement
for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a
firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm
as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following
additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence determined under
subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as
classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or
with a maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of
this subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b),
and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced
for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or
(c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section,
or both, any and all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice
the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all firearm enhancements
under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and
shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other
firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this
chapter.

(f)
The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so
that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the
sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a deadly weapon as defined in this chapter other than a firearm
as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the
crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is
being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or
enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses,
regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon
enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon
other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the presumptive
sentence determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony
crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously
been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under
(a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c)
of this section, or both, any and all deadly weapon enhancements under this subsection
shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions,
including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.

(f)
The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the
sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the
portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence if
the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or
state correctional facility as that term is defined in this chapter and the
offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection.
If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this subsection
while in a county jail or state correctional facility as that term is defined
in this chapter, and the offender is being sentenced for an anticipatory
offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed in this
subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the presumptive
sentence determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a)
Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or
69.50.410;

(b)
Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv),
and (v);

(c)
Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For
the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state
correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that
facility or county jail.

(6)
An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense
was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435.

(7)
An additional two years shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in
RCW 46.61.5055.

(8)
An additional one to three years shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
any felony offense committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in
association with a criminal street gang, with the intent to promote, further,
or assist in criminal conduct by gang members, as provided in section 2 of this
act.

Sec.
5. RCW
13.40.160 and 1997 c 338 s 25 and 1997 c 265 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is determined
according to RCW 13.40.0357.

(a)
When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within
the standard ranges, except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of
this section. The disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.

(b)
When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days,
commitment shall be to the department for the standard range of confinement,
except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this section.

(2)
If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition
within the standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall
impose a disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of
RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported
by clear and convincing evidence.

A
disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and shall be
comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a combination thereof.
When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement
exceeding thirty days, the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term,
and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A
disposition outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(3)
Where a respondent is found to have committed an offense for which the
respondent declined to enter into a diversion agreement, the court shall impose
a term of community supervision limited to the conditions allowed in a
diversion agreement as provided in RCW 13.40.080(2).

(4)
When a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a
sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030,
and has no history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the
motion of the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine
whether the respondent is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
respondent's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the respondent's social, educational, and employment
situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the
sources of the evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i)
Frequency and type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(iii)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or
others;

(iv)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(v)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After
receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this special sex
offender disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the
offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the
court determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is
appropriate, then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the
standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons
for its conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice,
the court shall impose a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend
the execution of the disposition and place the offender on community
supervision for at least two years. As a condition of the suspended
disposition, the court may impose the conditions of community supervision and
other conditions, including up to thirty days of confinement and requirements
that the offender do any one or more of the following:

(b)(i)
Devote time to a specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or
inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement
for that offense. A community mental health center may not be used for such
treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex offender
treatment. The respondent shall not change sex offender treatment providers or
treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the probation
counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers without court approval
after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object to the change;

(iii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
probation counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational
program, or employment;

(iv)
Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a
sex offender treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the
court;

(v)
Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community service,
or any combination thereof;

(vii)
Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably
related to the offense;

(viii)
Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation bond; or

(ix)
The court shall order that the offender may not attend the public or approved
private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the victim or the
victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians of the offender are
responsible for transportation or other costs associated with the offender's
change of school that would otherwise be paid by the school district. The
court shall send notice of the disposition and restriction on attending the
same school as the victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved
private school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the
approved private schools and the public school district board of directors of
the district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice
must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than ten calendar days
after entry of the disposition.

The
sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the
respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following:
Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment
activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other
material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At
the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the
court considers appropriate.

Except
as provided in this subsection (4), after July 1, 1991, examinations and
treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health pursuant to
chapter 18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile
sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that:
(A) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another
state for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B)
no certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this subsection (4) and the rules adopted by the
department of health.

If
the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that
the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court
may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court
may impose a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions
of the disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and
up to thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously
served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is
being revoked.

For
purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property
as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a
known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A
disposition entered under this subsection (4) is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

(5)
If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.165.

(6)
RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of
possessing a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in
which a special finding is entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.

(7)
Section 3 of this act governs the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of
a felony offense committed for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in
association with a criminal street gang, with the intent of promoting,
furthering, or assisting in criminal conduct by gang members.

(8)
Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention
prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically
state the number of days of credit for time served.

(((8)))
(9) Except as provided under subsection (4) or (5) of this section or
RCW 13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the
execution of the disposition.

(((9))) (10) In no case shall the term of
confinement imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult
could be subjected for the same offense.

---
END ---