BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.050 and 1998 c 332 s 2, 1998 c 315 s 1, 1998 c 308 s 1, and 1998 c 275 s
1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and
including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who
install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal
property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who presents a
resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:

(a)
Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the
regular course of business without intervening use by such person; or

(b)
Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates
real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal
property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property
without intervening use by such person; or

(c)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for
sale a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in processing,
when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction
directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for
sale; or

(d)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e)
Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of
competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065. The term shall
include every sale of tangible personal property which is used or consumed or
to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity classified as a
"sale at retail" or "retail sale" even though such property
is resold or utilized as provided in (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of this
subsection following such use. The term also means every sale of tangible
personal property to persons engaged in any business which is taxable under RCW
82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for
labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a)
The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of
tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the
mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the
use of coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects;

(b)
The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for
consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible
personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property
becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include
the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of
earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or
agriculture;

(c)
The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to constructing,
repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or under any real property
owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other
means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for
the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the
property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;

(d)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures, but
shall not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of
this section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning
and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service
businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor
cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to
automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in
respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f)
The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other
services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the
granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or
enjoy the same;

(g)
The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services
to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection
when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used
or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale"
even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or
consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify
subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this
section shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other
service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the
following business activities:

(a)
Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool,
billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing
purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;

(b)
Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(c)
Credit bureau services;

(d)
Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(e)
Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i)
horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming,
repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission
or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an
electric utility;

(f)
Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g)
The following personal services: ((Physical fitness services,)) Tanning
salon services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath
services, escort services, and dating services.

(4)
The term shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible personal
property to consumers and the rental of equipment with an operator.

(5)
The term shall also include the providing of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, to consumers.

(6)
The term shall also include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a
person who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the
method of delivery to the end user, but shall not include custom software or
the customization of canned software.

(7)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street,
place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation
terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a
municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United
States and which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic
including mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(8)
The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons
for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald,
fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings,
fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and
spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation
reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b)
farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c)
farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with
an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)
or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve
wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(9)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of
new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county
or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein
or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty
by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or
charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing
authority. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for
cleaning up for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste
and other byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and
development.

(10)
Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec.
2. RCW
82.04.290 and 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

EFFECTIVE
UNTIL JULY 1, 2001. (1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the
business of providing international investment management services, as to such
persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the
gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of
0.275 percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing
physical fitness services not otherwise classified as a sale of retail; as to
such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471
percent.

(3)
Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other
than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250,
82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2635, and
82.04.2907, and subsections (1) and (2) of this section; as to
such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

This
section includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether
or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to
another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons
engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale."
The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be considered a
part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.04.290 and 1998 c 343 s 4, 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2001, UNTIL JULY 1, 2003. (1) Upon every person engaging within this
state in the business of providing international investment management
services, as to such persons, the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the gross income or gross proceeds of sales of the business
multiplied by a rate of 0.275 percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing
physical fitness services not otherwise classified as a sale of retail; as to
such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471 percent.

(3)
Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other
than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250,
82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2635, 82.04.2907,
and 82.04.272, and subsections (1) and (2) of this section; as to
such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

This
section includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether
or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to
another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons
engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale."
The value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be considered a
part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
82.04.290 and 1998 c 343 s 4, 1998 c 331 s 2, 1998 c 312 s 8, and 1998 c 308 s
5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2003. (1) Upon every person engaging within this state in the business
of providing international investment management services, as to such persons,
the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross
income or gross proceeds of sales of the business multiplied by a rate of 0.275
percent.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of providing
physical fitness services not otherwise classified as a sale of retail; as to
such persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross income of the business, multiplied by the rate of 0.471
percent.

(3)
Upon every person engaging within this state in any business activity other
than or in addition to those enumerated in RCW 82.04.230, 82.04.240, 82.04.250,
82.04.255, 82.04.260, 82.04.270, 82.04.2905, 82.04.280, 82.04.2907, and
82.04.272, and subsections (1) and (2) of this section; as to
such persons the amount of tax on account of such activities shall be equal to
the gross income of the business multiplied by the rate of 1.5 percent.

This
section includes, among others, and without limiting the scope hereof (whether
or not title to materials used in the performance of such business passes to
another by accession, confusion or other than by outright sale), persons
engaged in the business of rendering any type of service which does not
constitute a "sale at retail" or a "sale at wholesale." The
value of advertising, demonstration, and promotional supplies and materials
furnished to an agent by his or her principal or supplier to be used for
informational, educational and promotional purposes shall not be considered a
part of the agent's remuneration or commission and shall not be subject to
taxation under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act applies to physical fitness services rendered on and after July 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999, except section 4 of this act takes
effect July 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2001.

(2) Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2003.

---
END ---