BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that Washington state is experiencing a significant
shortage of quality foster homes and that the majority of children entering the
system are difficult to place due to their complex needs. The legislature
intends to provide additional assistance to those families willing to serve as
foster parents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services shall reimburse foster parents for
property damaged or destroyed by foster children placed in their care. The
department shall establish by rule a maximum amount that may be reimbursed for
each occurrence. The department shall reimburse the foster parent for the
replacement value of any property covered by this section. If the damaged or
destroyed property is covered and reimbursed under an insurance policy, the
department shall reimburse foster parents for the amount of the deductible
associated with the insurance claim.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---