BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that the taxation of "services rendered in respect
to constructing buildings or other structures" has generally included the
entire transaction for construction, including certain services provided
directly to the consumer or owner rather than the person engaged in the performance
of the constructing activity. Changes in business practices and recent
administrative and court decisions have confused the issue. It is the intent
of the legislature to clarify which services, if standing alone and not part of
the transaction, are considered to be retail or wholesale services, and which
services will continue to be treated as taxable under RCW 82.04.290(2).

(2)
It is further the intent of the legislature to confirm that the entire price
for the constructing of the building or other structure for a consumer or owner
continues to be a retail sale, even though some of the individual services
reflected in the price if provided alone are taxed as services and not as
separate retail or wholesale transactions. (3) Therefore, this act is intended
to maintain the application of the law and not to extend retail treatment to
activities not previously treated as retail activities. Services that are
otherwise subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2), including but not limited to
architectural, engineering, surveying, flagging, accounting, and legal
services, remain subject to RCW 82.04.290(2), if the person responsible for the
performance of those services is not also responsible for the performance of
constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities.
Additionally, unless otherwise provided by law, a person entering into an
agreement to be responsible for the performance of services otherwise subject
to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2), and subsequently entering into a separate agreement
to be responsible for the performance of constructing, building, repairing,
improving, or decorating activities, is subject to tax under RCW 82.04.290(2)
with respect to the first agreement, and is subject to tax under the
appropriate section of chapter 82.04 RCW with respect to the second agreement,
if at the time of the first agreement there was no contemplation that the
agreements would be awarded to the same person.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The term "services rendered in respect to" as used in RCW 82.04.050
(2)(b) and (c), (7), and (9) means those services that are directly related to
the constructing, building, repairing, improving, and decorating of buildings
or other structures, by a person who is responsible for the performance of the
constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activity.

(2)
The term does not include services such as engineering, architectural, survey,
flagging, accounting, legal, consulting, management, or administrative provided
to the consumer of or person responsible for performing the constructing,
building, repairing, improving, or decorating services. However, a contract or
agreement that requires a person to be responsible for services that would
otherwise be subject to the tax classification provided by RCW 82.04.290(2),
and also constructing, building, repairing, improving, or decorating activities
that would otherwise be subject to a tax classification provided by any other
one section of chapter 82.04 RCW, is subject to the tax rate that applies to
the predominant activity.

(3)
Unless otherwise provided by law, a contract or agreement that requires a
person to be responsible for activities that are subject to the tax rate
provided by RCW 82.04.290(2), and a subsequent contract or agreement that
requires the same person to be responsible for constructing, building,
repairing, improving, or decorating activities subject to a tax rate provided
in another section of chapter 82.04 RCW, shall not be combined and subject to a
single tax rate if at the time of the first contract or agreement it was not
contemplated that the same person would be awarded both contracts.

(4) As used in this section "responsible for the
performance" means that the person is obligated to perform, either
personally or through a third party, the activities. A person who reviews work
for the consumer or for the retailer or wholesaler but does not supervise or
direct the work is not responsible for the performance of the work nor is a
person who is financially obligated for the work, such as a bank, but who does
not have control over the work itself.

---
END ---