BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.071 and 1994 c 218 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that some individuals in this state are problem or
compulsive gamblers. Because the state promotes and regulates gambling through
the activities of the state lottery commission, the Washington horse racing
commission, and the Washington state gambling commission, the state has the
responsibility to continue to provide resources for the support of services for
problem and compulsive gamblers. Therefore, the Washington state gambling
commission, the Washington horse racing commission, and the state lottery
commission shall jointly develop informational signs concerning problem and
compulsive gambling which include a toll-free hot line number for problem and
compulsive gamblers. The signs shall be placed in the establishments of
gambling licensees, horse racing licensees, and lottery retailers.

The
Washington state gambling commission shall adopt rules to implement a program
for the purpose of compulsive gambling education and awareness.

Sec.
2. RCW
67.70.240 and 1997 c 220 s 206 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The
moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:

(1)
For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;

(2)
For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW
67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260;

(3)
For purposes of making deposits into the state's general fund;

(4)
For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs. Three million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during calendar year 1996. During subsequent years, such distributions
shall equal the prior year's distributions increased by four percent.
Distributions under this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than twenty
years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;

(5)
For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account, created in RCW
43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW 43.99N.070, six million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during the calendar year 1998.
During subsequent years, such distribution shall equal the prior year's
distributions increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under
this subsection after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of
the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this subsection
shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than December 31, 2020;

(6)
For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services and,
from the state lottery's advertising budget, for the purposes of RCW 9.46.071;
and

(7)
For the payment of agent compensation.

The
office of financial management shall require the allotment of all expenses paid
from the account and shall report to the ways and means committees of the senate
and house of representatives any changes in the allotments.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the state lottery
account under RCW 67.70.240(6) to the Washington state gambling commission for
the purposes of section 1 of this act.

---
END ---