BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.79.090 and 1982 c 116 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the legislature at its next
regular session, shall be substantially in the following form:

"WARNING

Every
person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name,
knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this petition when he
or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false statement on this petition may
be punished by fine or imprisonment or both.

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR

SUBMISSION TO THE LEGISLATURE

To the Honorable . . . . . .,
Secretary of State of the State of Washington:

We,
the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of Washington,
respectfully direct that this petition and the proposed measure known as
Initiative Measure No. . . . . and entitled (here set forth the
established ballot title of the measure), a full, true, and correct copy of
which is printed on the reverse side of this petition, be transmitted to the
legislature of the State of Washington at its next ensuing regular session, and
we respectfully petition the legislature to enact said proposed measure into
law; and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington in the city (or town)
and county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated, and
I have knowingly signed this petition only once.

Petitioner's │ Print name │ Residence
address, │ City │

signature │ for positive │ street and
number, │ or │ County

│ identification │ if any │ Town │

│ │ │ │

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

1B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

2B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

3B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

etc."

(2)
Space must be provided on each petition where, after the signatures have been
obtained, the person or persons who procured the signatures shall both sign and
print his or her name and address certifying that, to his or her knowledge, the
signatures on the petition are valid.

(3)
In addition, the following must be included on each petition in at least
twenty-point type, and completed before the petition is offered to voters for
signing so that potential signers know whether the circulator is paid or volunteer:

"SIGNATURE GATHERERS [ARE] [ARE NOT] (check or
preprint one) BEING PAID TO CIRCULATE THIS PETITION SHEET. (If signature
gatherers are being paid then include the following:)

SIGNATURE GATHERERS ARE BEING PAID BY
. . . . . . (insert the name of the political
committee by or on whose behalf of which payment is made) TO CIRCULATE THIS
PETITION SHEET."

Sec.
2. RCW
29.79.100 and 1982 c 116 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Petitions for proposing measures for submission to the people for their
approval or rejection at the next ensuing general election, shall be
substantially in the following form:

"WARNING

Every
person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name,
knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this petition when he
or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false statement on this petition may
be punished by fine or imprisonment or both.

INITIATIVE PETITION FOR

SUBMISSION TO THE PEOPLE

To the Honorable . . . . . .,
Secretary of State of the State of Washington:

We,
the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of Washington,
respectfully direct that the proposed measure known as Initiative Measure No.
. . . ., entitled (here insert the established ballot title of
the measure), a full, true and correct copy of which is printed on the reverse
side of this petition, be submitted to the legal voters of the State of
Washington for their approval or rejection at the general election to be held
on the . . . . . day of November, ((19. . .)) (year);
and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this
petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the city (or town)
and county written after my name, my residence address is correctly stated, and
I have knowingly signed this petition only once.

Petitioner's │ Print name │ Residence address, │ City │

signature │ for positive │ street and number, │ or │ County

│ identification │ if any │ Town │

│ │ │ │

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

1B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

2B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

3B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

etc."

(2)
Space must be provided on each petition where, after the signatures have been
obtained, the person or persons who procured the signatures shall both sign and
print his or her name and address certifying that, to his or her knowledge, the
signatures on the petition are valid.

(3)
In addition, the following must be included on each petition in at least
twenty-point type, and completed before the petition is offered to voters for
signing so that potential signers know whether the circulator is paid or
volunteer:

"SIGNATURE GATHERERS [ARE] [ARE NOT] (check or
preprint one) BEING PAID TO CIRCULATE THIS PETITION SHEET. (If signature
gatherers are being paid then include the following:)

SIGNATURE GATHERERS ARE BEING PAID BY
. . . . . . (insert the name of the political
committee by or on whose behalf of which payment is made) TO CIRCULATE THIS PETITION
SHEET."

Sec.
3. RCW
29.79.110 and 1993 c 256 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Petitions ordering that acts or parts of acts passed by the legislature be
referred to the people at the next ensuing general election, or special
election ordered by the legislature, shall be substantially in the following
form:

"WARNING

Every
person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name,
knowingly signs more than one of these petitions, signs this petition when he
or she is not a legal voter, or makes any false statement on this petition may
be punished by fine or imprisonment or both.

PETITION FOR REFERENDUM

To the
Honorable . . . . . ., Secretary of State of the State
of Washington:

We,
the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of Washington,
respectfully order and direct that Referendum Measure No.
. . . . ., filed to revoke a (or part or parts of a) bill
that (concise statement required by RCW 29.79.055) and that was passed by the
. . . . . . legislature of the State of Washington at
the last regular (special) session of said legislature, shall be referred to
the people of the state for their approval or rejection at the regular
(special) election to be held on the . . . . day of November, ((19. . .))
(year); and each of us for himself or herself says: I have personally
signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Washington, in the
city (or town) and county written after my name, my residence address is correctly
stated, and I have knowingly signed this petition only once.

Petitioner's │ Print name │ Residence address, │ City │

signature │ for positive │ street and number, │ or │ County

│ identification │ if any │ Town │

│ │ │ │

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

1B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

2B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

│ │
│ │

3B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

etc."

(2)
Space must be provided on each petition where, after the signatures have been
obtained, the person or persons who procured the signatures shall both sign and
print his or her name and address certifying that, to his or her knowledge, the
signatures on the petition are valid.

(3)
In addition, the following must be included on each petition in at least
twenty-point type, and completed before the petition is offered to voters for
signing so that potential signers know whether the circulator is paid or
volunteer:

"SIGNATURE GATHERERS [ARE] [ARE NOT] (check or
preprint one) BEING PAID TO CIRCULATE THIS PETITION SHEET. (If signature
gatherers are being paid then include the following:)

SIGNATURE GATHERERS ARE BEING PAID BY
. . . . . . (insert the name of the political
committee by or on whose behalf of which payment is made) TO CIRCULATE THIS
PETITION SHEET."

Sec.
4. RCW
29.79.490 and 1993 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person ((shall be)) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor who:

(1)
For any consideration or gratuity or promise thereof, signs or declines to sign
any initiative or referendum petition; or

(2)
((Provides or receives consideration for soliciting or procuring signatures
on an initiative or referendum petition if any part of the consideration is
based upon the number of signatures solicited or procured, or offers to provide
or agrees to receive such consideration any of which is based on the number of
signatures solicited or procured; or

(3)))
Gives or offers any consideration or gratuity to any person to induce him or
her to sign or not to sign or to vote for or against any initiative or
referendum measure; or

(((4)))
(3) Interferes with or attempts to interfere with the right of any voter
to sign or not to sign an initiative or referendum petition or with the right
to vote for or against an initiative or referendum measure by threats,
intimidation, or any other corrupt means or practice; or

(((5)))
(4) Receives, handles, distributes, pays out, or gives away, directly or
indirectly, money or any other thing of value contributed by or received from
any person, firm, association, or corporation whose residence or principal office
is, or the majority of whose members or stockholders have their residence
outside, the state of Washington, for any service rendered for the purpose of
aiding in procuring signatures upon any initiative or referendum petition or
for the purpose of aiding in the adoption or rejection of any initiative or
referendum measure: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall not apply to or
prohibit any activity which is properly reported in accordance with the
applicable provisions of chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(5)
Circulates, solicits, or procures, or attempts to procure, signatures upon an
initiative or referendum petition, or submits the petition to the secretary of
state, knowing that the petition fails to truthfully provide information
required by RCW 29.79.090 (2) or (3), 29.79.100 (2) or (3), or 29.79.110 (2) or
(3).

A
gross misdemeanor under this section is punishable to the same extent as a
gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

Sec.
5. RCW
42.17.090 and 1993 c 256 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each report required under RCW 42.17.080 (1) and (2) shall disclose the
following:

(a)
The funds on hand at the beginning of the period;

(b)
The name and address of each person who has made one or more contributions
during the period, together with the money value and date of such contributions
and the aggregate value of all contributions received from each such person
during the campaign or in the case of a continuing political committee, the
current calendar year: PROVIDED, That pledges in the aggregate of less than
one hundred dollars from any one person need not be reported: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the income which results from a fund-raising activity conducted
in accordance with RCW 42.17.067 may be reported as one lump sum, with the
exception of that portion of such income which was received from persons whose
names and addresses are required to be included in the report required by RCW
42.17.067: PROVIDED FURTHER, That contributions of no more than twenty-five
dollars in the aggregate from any one person during the election campaign may
be reported as one lump sum so long as the campaign treasurer maintains a
separate and private list of the name, address, and amount of each such
contributor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the money value of contributions of
postage shall be the face value of such postage;

(c)
Each loan, promissory note, or security instrument to be used by or for the
benefit of the candidate or political committee made by any person, together
with the names and addresses of the lender and each person liable directly,
indirectly or contingently and the date and amount of each such loan,
promissory note, or security instrument;

(d)
All other contributions not otherwise listed or exempted;

(e)
The name and address of each candidate or political committee to which any
transfer of funds was made, together with the amounts and dates of such
transfers;

(f)
The name and address of each person to whom an expenditure was made in the
aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars during the period covered by this
report, and the amount, date, and purpose of each such expenditure. A
candidate for state executive or state legislative office or the political
committee of such a candidate shall report this information for an expenditure
under one of the following categories, whichever is appropriate: (i)
Expenditures for the election of the candidate; (ii) expenditures for
nonreimbursed public office-related expenses; (iii) expenditures required to be
reported under (e) of this subsection; or (iv) expenditures of surplus funds
and other expenditures. The report of such a candidate or committee shall
contain a separate total of expenditures for each category and a total sum of
all expenditures. Other candidates and political committees need not report
information regarding expenditures under the categories listed in (i) through
(iv) of this subsection or under similar such categories unless required to do
so by the commission by rule. The report of such an other candidate or
committee shall also contain the total sum of all expenditures;

(g)
((The name and address of each person to whom any expenditure was made
directly or indirectly to compensate the person for soliciting or procuring
signatures on an initiative or referendum petition, the amount of such
compensation to each such person, and the total of the expenditures made for
this purpose. Such expenditures shall be reported under this subsection (1)(g)
whether the expenditures are or are not also required to be reported under (f)
of this subsection;

(h))) The
name and address of any person and the amount owed for any debt, obligation,
note, unpaid loan, or other liability in the amount of more than two hundred
fifty dollars or in the amount of more than fifty dollars that has been
outstanding for over thirty days;

(((i)))
(h) The surplus or deficit of contributions over expenditures;

(((j)))
(i) The disposition made in accordance with RCW 42.17.095 of any surplus
funds;

(((k)))
(j) Such other information as shall be required by the commission by
rule in conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter; and

(((l)))
(k) Funds received from a political committee not otherwise required to
report under this chapter (a "nonreporting committee"). Such funds
shall be forfeited to the state of Washington unless the nonreporting committee
has filed or within ten days following such receipt files with the commission a
statement disclosing: (i) Its name and address; (ii) the purposes of the
nonreporting committee; (iii) the names, addresses, and titles of its officers
or if it has no officers, the names, addresses, and titles of its responsible
leaders; (iv) the name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate
in the state of Washington whom the nonreporting committee is supporting, and,
if such committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the
party; (v) the ballot proposition supported or opposed in the state of
Washington, if any, and whether such committee is in favor of or opposed to
such proposition; (vi) the name and address of each person residing in the
state of Washington or corporation which has a place of business in the state
of Washington who has made one or more contributions in the aggregate of more
than twenty-five dollars to the nonreporting committee during the current
calendar year, together with the money value and date of such contributions;
(vii) the name and address of each person in the state of Washington to whom an
expenditure was made by the nonreporting committee on behalf of a candidate or
political committee in the aggregate amount of more than fifty dollars, the
amount, date, and purpose of such expenditure, and the total sum of such
expenditures; (viii) such other information as the commission may prescribe by
rule, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter. A
nonreporting committee incurring an obligation to file additional reports in a
calendar year may satisfy the obligation by filing with the commission a letter
providing updating or amending information.

(2)
The treasurer and the candidate shall certify the correctness of each report.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW
29.79.500 (Paid petition solicitors--Finding) and 1993 c 256 s 1
are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---