BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Washington state is the most trade-dependent state in the United States;

(b)
The state's economy and economic well-being depend heavily on foreign trade and
international relations;

(c)
It is important to the economic future of the state to promote international
awareness and understanding; and

(d)
Enhanced international trade, cultural, and educational opportunities are
developed when governments reach out.

(2)
The legislature declares that the purpose of this act is to enhance Washington
state's ability to develop relationships and contacts throughout the world
enabling us to expand international education and trade opportunities for all
citizens of the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A humanitarian relief council is created comprised of the governor, the
lieutenant governor, and the secretary of state.

(b)
The council shall determine which disasters and hardships qualify for state
support and how much the state will contribute from the world-wide humanitarian
relief treasury account created in subsection (2) of this section. The council
shall coordinate its assistance with recognized relief agencies so as to not
duplicate efforts or waste state money.

(c)
The council shall consult with the emergency management board and establish
necessary criteria for receiving assistance from the state.

(d)
The council shall adopt rules to implement this subsection.

(e)
Staff support for the council shall be provided by the department of community,
trade, and economic development, the department of agriculture, and the
military department.

(2)
The world-wide humanitarian relief treasury account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from revenues as determined under section 3 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for humanitarian
relief.

(3)(a)
The council may accept gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, of
real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, and sell, lease,
exchange, invest, or expend these donations or the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income from the donations except as limited by the donor's terms. The
council shall adopt rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of
the proceeds.

(b)
The humanitarian relief account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises
under this subsection must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for humanitarian relief. Only the humanitarian
relief council or the council's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(4)
This section shall be known as the good samaritan act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW to read as follows:

On June 30th of every year, the treasurer shall deposit 0.1 percent
of all revenues received in the general fund for that fiscal year derived from
state tax sources into the world-wide humanitarian relief treasury account
created in section 2 of this act.

---
END ---