BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each state agency shall develop and implement a quality management program to
improve the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of the public services it
provides through business process redesign, employee involvement, and other
quality management techniques. Each agency shall ensure that front line agency
employees are engaged in the program and shall provide employees with the
training necessary to successful implementation of efforts toward quality
improvement. Each agency shall, where applicable, include collective
bargaining representatives in the development and operation of the quality
management program.

(2)
Each agency shall ensure that its quality management program:

(a)
Designates a person responsible for improving the quality of systems and work
processes within the agency. State agencies under the supervision of the
governor shall ensure that the designated person reports to the agency head and
serves as the agency's quality improvement contact with any subcabinet group
established by the governor to assess management improvement results;

(b)
Identifies immediate-term and near-term opportunities to improve services and
reduce costs;

(c)
Identifies goals and utilizes strategic business planning and performance
measures to establish priorities and measure progress toward meeting them.
Each state agency shall develop performance measures to assess customer
satisfaction, agency progress toward accomplishing outcomes specified in the
agency budget under RCW 43.88.090, and the impact of initiatives instituted
under the quality management program as a whole;

(d)
Reports the results of its quality management program on a quarterly basis.
Each agency shall ensure that its report specifies improved outcomes for public
service and efficiency. Any agency in its report may describe methods of
measuring customer and stakeholder satisfaction, of engaging agency employees
in the program, and of assessing the extent to which business practices have
been changed to improve quality, efficiency, and effectiveness;

(e)
Evaluates the results of its quality, service, and management improvement
programs and assesses program effects upon leadership, information and
analysis, strategic planning, human resource development and management,
process improvement, business results, and customer focus and satisfaction;

(f)
Develops a plan for quality improvement, documenting efforts made up to the
date of the report and addressing all matters enumerated in this subsection.

(3)
State agencies under the supervision of the governor shall report program
results to the governor and shall, on a quarterly basis, document and report
program results to any subcabinet group created by the governor to monitor
management improvement results. State agencies under elected executive
officials other than the governor shall report program results to the elected
executive official on a quarterly basis.

(4)
Each state agency shall integrate efforts made under this section with quality
management programs undertaken under executive order or other authority. State
agencies under the supervision of the governor, other than institutions of
higher education, shall develop and implement a complete quality management
program by June 30, 2001. All other state agencies shall develop and implement
a complete quality management program by June 30, 2003.

(5)
State agencies shall submit successful and high quality management programs to
the governor's quality achievement award program or equivalent program, for
potential recognition.

(6)
For purposes of this section, "state agency" includes every elected
state executive official and every department, division, board, commission, and
institution of the executive branch of state government, including institutions
of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

Both
houses of the legislature shall develop and implement quality improvement
programs as described under section 1 of this act by June 30, 2001, but shall
report the results of these efforts to the leadership of each major political
party caucus within its house.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Local governments are encouraged to develop and implement quality management
programs as set forth in section 1 of this act. On or before June 30, 2002,
each local government with an annual budget of three million dollars or more in
the preceding year shall submit to the office of financial management a brief
report, not to exceed two pages, summarizing any efforts it has taken to
develop and implement a quality management program. The office of financial
management shall submit a summary of these reports to the legislature annually.

(2) For purposes of this section, "local government"
includes every county, city, town, special district, municipal corporation, and
quasi-municipal corporation in the state.

---
END ---