BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that biotechnology businesses often lack the start-up capital
to build their own laboratories. The building industry has indicated a
willingness to build, on a speculative basis, facilities for the biotechnology
industry. The various exemption and deferral programs currently in law are
specifically directed to the operators of the facilities or to lessors who in
advance of construction or acquisition agree to pass the benefit of the
incentive to the tenant. Speculative building does not qualify for any of the
exemption or deferral programs. It is the intent of the legislature to allow
speculative builders to be exempt from sales and use tax on the construction of
laboratory space for this uniquely situated industry segment.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.63.010 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Advanced computing" means technologies used in the designing and
developing of computing hardware and software, including innovations in
designing the full spectrum of hardware from hand-held calculators to super
computers, and peripheral equipment.

(2)
"Advanced materials" means materials with engineered properties
created through the development of specialized processing and synthesis
technology, including ceramics, high value-added metals, electronic materials,
composites, polymers, and biomaterials.

(3)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(4)
"Biotechnology" means the application of technologies, such as
recombinant DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular biology,
genetics and genetic engineering, cell fusion techniques, and new bioprocesses,
using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to produce or modify products,
to improve plants or animals, to develop microorganisms for specific uses, to
identify targets for small molecule pharmaceutical development, or to transform
biological systems into useful processes and products or to develop
microorganisms for specific uses.

(5)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(6)
"Electronic device technology" means technologies involving
microelectronics; semiconductors; electronic equipment and instrumentation;
radio frequency, microwave, and millimeter electronics; optical and
optic-electrical devices; and data and digital communications and imaging
devices.

(7)
"Eligible investment project" means an investment project which either
initiates a new operation, or expands or diversifies a current operation by
expanding, renovating, or equipping an existing facility. Except as
provided in section 3 of this act for builders of qualified buildings used for
biotechnology research and development, the lessor or owner of the
qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless the underlying
ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests exclusively in the
same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees to pass the
economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of reduced rent
payments.

(8)
"Environmental technology" means assessment and prevention of threats
or damage to human health or the environment, environmental cleanup, and the
development of alternative energy sources.

(9)
"Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or
qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction or improvement of the project.

(10)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(11)
"Pilot scale manufacturing" means design, construction, and testing
of preproduction prototypes and models in the fields of biotechnology, advanced
computing, electronic device technology, advanced materials, and environmental
technology other than for commercial sale. As used in this subsection,
"commercial sale" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market
testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or
process do not exceed one million dollars.

(12)
"Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing
floor space or production capacity used for pilot scale manufacturing or
qualified research and development, including plant offices and other
facilities that are an essential or an integral part of a structure used for
pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and development. If a building
is used partly for pilot scale manufacturing or qualified research and
development, and partly for other purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall
be determined by apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted
by the department.

(13)
"Qualified machinery and equipment" means fixtures, equipment, and
support facilities that are an integral and necessary part of a pilot scale
manufacturing or qualified research and development operation. "Qualified
machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software; data processing
equipment; laboratory equipment, instrumentation, and other devices used in a
process of experimentation to develop a new or improved pilot model, plant
process, product, formula, invention, or similar property; manufacturing
components such as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and
dies; vats, tanks, and fermenters; operating structures; and all other
equipment used to control, monitor, or operate the machinery. For purposes of
this chapter, qualified machinery and equipment must be either new to the
taxing jurisdiction of the state or new to the certificate holder, except that
used machinery and equipment may be treated as qualified machinery and
equipment if the certificate holder either brings the machinery and equipment
into Washington or makes a retail purchase of the machinery and equipment in
Washington or elsewhere.

(14)
"Qualified research and development" means research and development
performed within this state in the fields of advanced computing, advanced
materials, biotechnology, electronic device technology, and environmental
technology.

(15)
"Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(16)
"Research and development" means activities performed to discover
technological information, and technical and nonroutine activities concerned
with translating technological information into new or improved products,
processes, techniques, formulas, inventions, or software. The term includes
exploration of a new use for an existing drug, device, or biological product if
the new use requires separate licensing by the federal food and drug
administration under chapter 21, C.F.R., as amended. The term does not include
adaptation or duplication of existing products where the products are not
substantially improved by application of the technology, nor does the term
include surveys and studies, social science and humanities research, market
research or testing, quality control, sale promotion and service, computer
software developed for internal use, and research in areas such as improved
style, taste, and seasonal design.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person who proposes to construct a new qualified building or renovate an
existing qualified building, for biotechnology research and development, may
submit an application for an investment project to the department of revenue.
The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state
and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on
the eligible investment project provided that the building meets the following
criteria:

(a)
The building has an airflow capacity of twelve to fifteen air changes per hour
and the air must be one hundred percent outside air;

(b)
The following fire protection systems and standards must be in place:

(i)
All areas of the building are covered by automatic fire detection and fire
suppression systems;

(ii)
The fire suppression system is designed to an "ordinary hazard group
II" classification level;

(iii)
The hazardous materials storage rooms have a sprinkler system designed for
"extra hazard group II";

(iv)
Laboratory areas are defined by at least one hour firewall separations;

(c)
The minimum total electrical capacity for the building must be twenty-five
watts per square foot;

(d)
The chemical storage and handling rooms and waste storage and recycling
activities must be designed to meet "H occupancy" of the uniform
building code;

(e)
A separate hot and cold water supply should be provided to serve the laboratory
areas with code-approved backflow prevention at the connection to the building
or municipal water system;

(f)
Floor to floor height for new construction should be at least fifteen feet and
for renovations should be at least thirteen feet; and

(g)
The building is intended for use as a biotechnology research and development
facility.

(2)
A person to whom a certificate is issued under this section is subject to all
requirements of this chapter except the recipient is not required to have a
signed agreement with a tenant before initiation of construction nor is the
recipient required to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee
in the form of reduced rent payments. If the certificate holder transfers
ownership of the building before the end of the eight-year period in RCW
82.63.045, taxes are immediately due unless the purchaser agrees to accept the conditions
of the deferral. This agreement shall be in writing and a copy of it shall be
transmitted to the department.

Sec.
4. RCW
82.63.045 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, taxes deferred under this
chapter need not be repaid.

(2)
If, on the basis of a report under RCW 82.63.020 or other information, the
department finds that an investment project eligible under section 3 of this
act is not used for biotechnology research and development or that ((an))
any other investment project is used for purposes other than qualified
research and development or pilot scale manufacturing at any time during the
calendar year in which the investment project is certified by the department as
having been operationally completed, or at any time during any of the seven
succeeding calendar years, a portion of deferred taxes shall be immediately due
according to the following schedule:

Year
in which use occurs % of deferred taxes due

1 100%

2
87.5%

3
75%

4
62.5%

5
50%

6
37.5%

7
25%

8
12.5%

The
department shall assess interest at the rate provided for delinquent taxes, but
not penalties, retroactively to the date of deferral.

(3)
Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, deferred taxes on the following
need not be repaid:

(a)
Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor and services,
which at the time of purchase would have qualified for exemption under RCW
82.08.02565; and

(b)
Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---