BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.280 and 1996 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The growth management hearings boards shall cease to exist on July 1, 2002.
Prior to July 1, 2002, a growth management hearings board shall hear and
determine only those petitions submitted before the effective date of this
section and alleging either:

(a)
That a state agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it
relates to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments thereto, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to plans, development regulations, or
amendments, adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or

(b)
That the twenty-year growth management planning population projections adopted
by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 should be
adjusted.

(2)
On and after the effective date of this section, land use petitions making
allegations under either subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section may be filed
as provided in chapter 36.70C RCW.

(3)
A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or city that plans
under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated orally or in writing
before the county or city regarding the matter on which a review is being
requested; (c) a person who is certified by the governor within sixty days of
filing the request with the board or court; or (d) a person qualified
pursuant to RCW 34.05.530.

(((3)))
(4) For purposes of this section "person" means any
individual, partnership, corporation, association, state agency, governmental
subdivision or unit thereof, or public or private organization or entity of any
character.

(((4)))
(5) When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management
planning population projection prepared by the office of financial management,
a board or court shall consider the implications of any such adjustment
to the population forecast for the entire state.

The
rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board or court must be
documented and filed with the office of financial management within ten working
days after adoption.

If
adjusted by a board or court, a county growth management planning
population projection shall only be used for the planning purposes set forth in
this chapter and shall be known as a "board or court adjusted
population projection". None of these changes shall affect the official
state and county population forecasts prepared by the office of financial
management, which shall continue to be used for state budget and planning
purposes.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.290 and 1997 c 429 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Until the effective date of this section, all requests for review to a
growth management hearings board shall be initiated by filing a petition that
includes a detailed statement of issues presented for resolution by the board.
The board shall render written decisions articulating the basis for its
holdings. The board shall not issue advisory opinions on issues not presented
to the board in the statement of issues, as modified by any prehearing order. On
and after the effective date of this section, land use petitions filed pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.280 shall be initiated as provided in chapter 36.70C RCW.

(2)
All petitions relating to whether or not an adopted comprehensive plan,
development regulation, or permanent amendment thereto, is in compliance with
the goals and requirements of this chapter or chapter 90.58 or 43.21C RCW must
be filed within sixty days after publication by the legislative bodies of the
county or city.

(a)
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, the date of publication for a
city shall be the date the city publishes the ordinance, or summary of the
ordinance, adopting the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or
amendment thereto, as is required to be published.

(b)
Promptly after adoption, a county shall publish a notice that it has adopted
the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment thereto.

Except
as provided in (c) of this subsection, for purposes of this section the date of
publication for a county shall be the date the county publishes the notice that
it has adopted the comprehensive plan or development regulations, or amendment
thereto.

(c)
For local governments planning under RCW 36.70A.040, promptly after approval or
disapproval of a local government’s shoreline master program or amendment
thereto by the department of ecology as provided in RCW 90.58.090, the local
government shall publish a notice that the shoreline master program or
amendment thereto has been approved or disapproved by the department of
ecology. For purposes of this section, the date of publication for the
adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program is the date the local
government publishes notice that the shoreline master program or amendment
thereto has been approved or disapproved by the department of ecology.

(3)
Unless the board dismisses the petition as frivolous or finds that the person
filing the petition lacks standing, or the parties have filed an agreement to
have the case heard in superior court as provided in RCW 36.70A.295, the board
shall, within ten days of receipt of the petition, set a time for hearing the
matter.

(4)
The board shall base its decision on the record developed by the city, county,
or the state and supplemented with additional evidence if the board determines
that such additional evidence would be necessary or of substantial assistance
to the board in reaching its decision.

(5)
The board, shall consolidate, when appropriate, all petitions involving the
review of the same comprehensive plan or the same development regulation or
regulations.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For petitions filed prior to the effective date of this section the
board, and for petitions filed on or after the effective date of this act
the court, shall issue a final order that shall be based exclusively on
whether or not a state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to adoption or
amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to
adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW
36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the final order shall be issued
within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the petition for review, or, if
multiple petitions are filed, within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the
last petition that is consolidated.

(b)
The board or court may extend the period of time for issuing a decision
to enable the parties to settle the dispute if additional time is necessary to
achieve a settlement, and (i) an extension is requested by all parties, or (ii)
an extension is requested by the petitioner and respondent and the board or
court determines that a negotiated settlement between the remaining parties
could resolve significant issues in dispute. The request must be filed with
the board or court not later than seven days before the date scheduled
for the hearing on the merits of the petition. The board or court may
authorize one or more extensions for up to ninety days each, subject to the
requirements of this section.

(3)
In the final order, the board or court shall either:

(a)
Find that the state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption
or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates
to adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under
RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or

(b)
Find that the state agency, county, or city is not in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption
or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates
to adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under
RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW, in which case the board or court
shall remand the matter to the affected state agency, county, or city. The
board or court shall specify a reasonable time not in excess of one
hundred eighty days, or such longer period as determined by the board or
court in cases of unusual scope or complexity, within which the state
agency, county, or city shall comply with the requirements of this chapter.
The board or court may require periodic reports ((to the board))
on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards compliance.

(4)
((Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity as provided in RCW
36.70A.302,)) A finding of noncompliance and an order of remand
shall not affect the validity of comprehensive plans and development
regulations during the period of remand.

(5)
Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board may appeal the
decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514 or 36.01.050 within
thirty days of the final order of the board.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.70A.310 and 1994 c 249 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

A
request for review by the state to a growth management hearings board prior
to the effective date of this section, and to a court under chapter 36.70C RCW
on or after the effective date of this section, may be made only by the
governor, or with the governor's consent the head of an agency, or by the
commissioner of public lands as relating to state trust lands, for the review
of whether: (1) A county or city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 has failed to adopt a comprehensive plan or development regulations,
or county-wide planning policies within the time limits established by this
chapter; or (2) a county or city that is required or chooses to plan under this
chapter has adopted a comprehensive plan, development regulations, or
county-wide planning policies, that are not in compliance with the requirements
of this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.70A.320 and 1997 c 429 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (((5))) (4) of this section,
comprehensive plans and development regulations, and amendments thereto,
adopted under this chapter are presumed valid upon adoption.

(2)
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section,)) The
burden is on the petitioner to demonstrate that any action taken by a state
agency, county, or city under this chapter is not in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.

(3)
In any petition under this chapter, the board or court, after full
consideration of the petition, shall determine whether there is compliance with
the requirements of this chapter. In making its determination, the board or
court shall consider the criteria adopted by the department under RCW
36.70A.190(4). The board or court shall find compliance unless it
determines that the action by the state agency, county, or city is clearly
erroneous in view of the entire record before the board or court and in
light of the goals and requirements of this chapter.

(4)
((A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity made under RCW
36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that the ordinance or
resolution it has enacted in response to the determination of invalidity will
no longer substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this
chapter under the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).

(5))) The
shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the applicable development
regulations adopted by a county or city shall take effect as provided in
chapter 90.58 RCW.

Sec.
6. RCW
36.70A.330 and 1997 c 429 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After the time set for complying with the requirements of this chapter under
RCW 36.70A.300(3)(b) has expired, ((or at an earlier time upon the motion of
a county or city subject to a determination of invalidity under RCW 36.70A.300,))
the board or court shall set a hearing for the purpose of determining
whether the state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The board or court shall conduct a hearing and issue a finding of
compliance or noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter and with any
compliance schedule established by the board or court in its final
order. A person with standing to challenge the legislation enacted in response
to the board's or court's final order may participate in the hearing
along with the petitioner and the state agency, county, or city. A hearing
under this subsection shall be given the highest priority of business to be
conducted by the board or court, and a finding shall be issued within
forty-five days of the filing of the motion under subsection (1) of this
section with the board or court. The board or court shall issue
any order necessary to make adjustments to the compliance schedule and set
additional hearings as provided in subsection (((5))) (4) of this
section.

(3)
If the board or court after a compliance hearing finds that the state
agency, county, or city is not in compliance, the board or court shall
transmit its finding to the governor. The board or court may recommend
to the governor that the sanctions authorized by this chapter be imposed. The
board or court shall take into consideration the county's or city's
efforts to meet its compliance schedule in making the decision to recommend
sanctions to the governor.

(4)
((In a compliance hearing upon petition of a party, the board shall also
reconsider its final order and decide, if no determination of invalidity has
been made, whether one now should be made under RCW 36.70A.302.

(5))) The
board or court shall schedule additional hearings as appropriate
pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Sec.
7. RCW
36.70A.340 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
receipt from the board or court of a finding that a state agency,
county, or city is in noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.330, or as a result of
failure to meet the requirements of RCW 36.70A.210, the governor may either:

(1)
Notify and direct the director of the office of financial management to revise
allotments in appropriation levels;

(2)
Notify and direct the state treasurer to withhold the portion of revenues to
which the county or city is entitled under one or more of the following: The
motor vehicle fuel tax, as provided in chapter 82.36 RCW; the transportation
improvement account, as provided in RCW 47.26.084; the urban arterial trust
account, as provided in RCW 47.26.080; the rural arterial trust account, as
provided in RCW 36.79.150; the sales and use tax, as provided in chapter 82.14
RCW; the liquor profit tax, as provided in RCW 66.08.190; and the liquor excise
tax, as provided in RCW 82.08.170; or

(3)
File a notice of noncompliance with the secretary of state and the county or
city, which shall temporarily rescind the county or city's authority to collect
the real estate excise tax under RCW 82.46.030 until the governor files a
notice rescinding the notice of noncompliance.

Sec.
8. RCW
36.70A.345 and 1994 c 249 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governor may impose a sanction or sanctions specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on:
(1) A county or city that fails to designate critical areas, agricultural
lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands under RCW 36.70A.170 by the date
such action was required to have been taken; (2) a county or city that fails to
adopt development regulations under RCW 36.70A.060 protecting critical areas or
conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands by the
date such action was required to have been taken; (3) a county that fails to
designate urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 by the date such action was
required to have been taken; and (4) a county or city that fails to adopt its
comprehensive plan or development regulations when such actions are required to
be taken.

Imposition
of a sanction or sanctions under this section shall be preceded by written
findings by the governor, that either the county or city is not proceeding in
good faith to meet the requirements of the act; or that the county or city has
unreasonably delayed taking the required action. ((The governor shall
consult with and communicate his or her findings to the appropriate growth
management hearings board prior to imposing the sanction or sanctions.))
For those counties or cities that are not required to plan or have not opted
in, the governor in imposing sanctions shall consider the size of the
jurisdiction relative to the requirements of this chapter and the degree of
technical and financial assistance provided.

Sec.
9. RCW
36.70A.110 and 1997 c 429 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
designate an urban growth area or areas within which urban growth shall be
encouraged and outside of which growth can occur only if it is not urban in
nature. Each city that is located in such a county shall be included within an
urban growth area. An urban growth area may include more than a single city.
An urban growth area may include territory that is located outside of a city
only if such territory already is characterized by urban growth whether or not
the urban growth area includes a city, or is adjacent to territory already
characterized by urban growth, or is a designated new fully contained community
as defined by RCW 36.70A.350.

(2)
Based upon the growth management population projection made for the county by
the office of financial management, the county and each city within the county
shall include areas and densities sufficient to permit the urban growth that is
projected to occur in the county or city for the succeeding twenty-year
period. Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall include
greenbelt and open space areas. An urban growth area determination may include
a reasonable land market supply factor and shall permit a range of urban
densities and uses. In determining this market factor, cities and counties may
consider local circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion in their
comprehensive plans to make many choices about accommodating growth.

Within
one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin consulting with each city
located within its boundaries and each city shall propose the location of an
urban growth area. Within sixty days of the date the county legislative
authority of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of certification by
the office of financial management, all other counties that are required or
choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each
city located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach agreement
with each city on the location of an urban growth area within which the city is
located. If such an agreement is not reached with each city located within the
urban growth area, the county shall justify in writing why it so designated the
area an urban growth area. A city may object formally with the department over
the designation of the urban growth area within which it is located. Where
appropriate, the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including
the use of mediation services.

(3)
Urban growth should be located first in areas already characterized by urban
growth that have adequate existing public facility and service capacities to
serve such development, second in areas already characterized by urban growth
that will be served adequately by a combination of both existing public
facilities and services and any additional needed public facilities and
services that are provided by either public or private sources, and third in
the remaining portions of the urban growth areas. Urban growth may also be
located in designated new fully contained communities as defined by RCW
36.70A.350.

(4)
In general, cities are the units of local government most appropriate to
provide urban governmental services. In general, it is not appropriate that
urban governmental services be extended to or expanded in rural areas except in
those limited circumstances shown to be necessary to protect basic public
health and safety and the environment and when such services are financially
supportable at rural densities and do not permit urban development.

(5)
On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially required to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development regulations designating interim
urban growth areas under this chapter. Within three years and three months of
the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its resolution of
intention or of certification by the office of financial management, all other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this
chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only occur after
public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and RCW 36.70A.110. Such action may be
appealed to the appropriate growth management hearings board or court
under RCW 36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be adopted at the time of
comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.

(6)
Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in its
comprehensive plan.

Sec.
10. RCW
36.70A.172 and 1995 c 347 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In designating and protecting critical areas under this chapter, counties and
cities shall include the best available science in developing policies and
development regulations to protect the functions and values of critical areas.
In addition, counties and cities shall give special consideration to conservation
or protection measures necessary to preserve or enhance anadromous fisheries.

(2)
If it determines that advice from scientific or other experts is necessary or
will be of substantial assistance in reaching its decision, a growth management
hearings board or court may retain scientific or other expert advice to
assist in reviewing a petition under RCW 36.70A.290 that involves critical
areas.

Sec.
11. RCW
36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that counties are regional governments within their
boundaries, and cities are primary providers of urban governmental services
within urban growth areas. For the purposes of this section, a
"county-wide planning policy" is a written policy statement or
statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which
county and city comprehensive plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this
chapter. This framework shall ensure that city and county comprehensive plans
are consistent as required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to alter the land-use powers of cities.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in
whole or in part within the county as follows:

(a)
No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority
of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with representatives of each city located
within the county for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that
will provide a framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In
other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county
adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial
management.

(b)
The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide planning policy
specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner in which the
county and the cities agree to all procedures and provisions including but not
limited to desired planning policies, deadlines, ratification of final
agreements and demonstration thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities
associated therewith.

(c)
If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of
cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately
impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d)
If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no
agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management
in any other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or
reasons for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it
appropriate, the governor may immediately request the assistance of the
department of community, trade, and economic development to mediate any
disputes that preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving
all disputes that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate
sanctions from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or cities
for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section. The governor
shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of any sanction.

(e)
No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later
than fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management the county
legislative authority of any other county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to
the process provided under this section and that is consistent with the
agreement pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public
hearing or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.

(3)
A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a)
Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of
urban services to such development;

(c)
Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide or state-wide
nature, including transportation facilities of state-wide significance as
defined in RCW 47.06.140;

(d)
Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e)
Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all
economic segments of the population and parameters for its distribution;

(f)
Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g)
Policies for county-wide economic development and employment; and

(h)
An analysis of the fiscal impact.

(4)
Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the
county-wide planning policy adoption process. Adopted county-wide planning
policies shall be adhered to by state agencies.

(5)
Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the requirements of
this section may result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a
county or city within the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing
a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to
adopt a county-wide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or
sanctions are fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a
county-wide planning policy.

(6)
Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide planning policy to
the growth management hearings board prior to the effective date of this
section or to a court under chapter 36.70C RCW on or after the effective date
of this section within sixty days of the adoption of the county-wide
planning policy.

(7)
Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each
with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban
areas and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process
established under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties
and cities within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec.
12. RCW
36.70C.030 and 1995 c 347 s 704 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter replaces the writ of certiorari for appeal of land use decisions
and shall be the exclusive means of judicial review of land use decisions,
except that this chapter does not apply to:

(a)
Judicial review of:

(i)
Land use decisions made by bodies that are not part of a local jurisdiction;

(ii)
Land use decisions of a local jurisdiction that are subject to review by a
quasi‑judicial body created by state law, such as the shorelines hearings
board or, for petitions filed prior to the effective date of this section,
the growth management hearings board;

(b)
Judicial review of applications for a writ of mandamus or prohibition; or

(c)
Claims provided by any law for monetary damages or compensation. If one or
more claims for damages or compensation are set forth in the same complaint
with a land use petition brought under this chapter, the claims are not subject
to the procedures and standards, including deadlines, provided in this chapter
for review of the petition. The judge who hears the land use petition may, if
appropriate, preside at a trial for damages or compensation.

(2)
The superior court civil rules govern procedural matters under this chapter to
the extent that the rules are consistent with this chapter.

Sec.
13. RCW
90.58.190 and 1995 c 347 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The appeal of the department’s decision to adopt a master program or amendment
pursuant to RCW 90.58.070(2) or 90.58.090(4) is governed by RCW 34.05.510
through 34.05.598.

(2)(a)
Prior to the effective date of this section, the department's decision
to approve, reject, or modify a proposed master program or amendment adopted by
a local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the
growth management hearings board with jurisdiction over the local government.
The appeal shall be initiated by filing a petition as provided in RCW
36.70A.250 through 36.70A.320. On and after the effective date of this
section the department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed
master program or amendment adopted by a local government planning under RCW
36.70A.040 shall be appealed to a court by filing a land use petition as
provided in chapter 36.70C RCW.

(b)
If the appeal to the growth management hearings board or a court
concerns shorelines, the growth management hearings board or court shall
review the proposed master program or amendment for compliance with the
requirements of this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW, the policy of RCW
90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines, and chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates
to the adoption of master programs and amendments under chapter 90.58 RCW.

(c)
If the appeal to the growth management hearings board or court concerns
a shoreline of state-wide significance, the board or court shall uphold
the decision by the department unless the board or court, by clear and
convincing evidence, determines that the decision of the department is
inconsistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable guidelines.

(d)
The appellant has the burden of proof in all appeals to the growth management
hearings board or court under this subsection.

(e)
Any party aggrieved by a final decision of a growth management hearings board or
court under this subsection may appeal the decision to superior court as
provided in RCW 36.70A.300.

(3)(a)
The department's decision to approve, reject, or modify a proposed master
program or master program amendment by a local government not planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall be appealed to the shorelines hearings board by filing a
petition within thirty days of the date of the department’s written notice to
the local government of the department’s decision to approve, reject, or modify
a proposed master program or master program amendment as provided in RCW 90.58.090(2).

(b)
In an appeal relating to shorelines, the shorelines hearings board shall review
the proposed master program or master program amendment and, after full
consideration of the presentations of the local government and the department,
shall determine the validity of the local government's master program or
amendment in light of the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.

(c)
In an appeal relating to shorelines of state-wide significance, the shorelines
hearings board shall uphold the decision by the department unless the board
determines, by clear and convincing evidence that the decision of the
department is inconsistent with the policy of RCW 90.58.020 and the applicable
guidelines.

(d)
Review by the shorelines hearings board shall be considered an adjudicative
proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act. The
aggrieved local government shall have the burden of proof in all such reviews.

(e)
Whenever possible, the review by the shorelines hearings board shall be heard
within the county where the land subject to the proposed master program or
master program amendment is primarily located. The department and any local
government aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board may appeal the
decision to superior court as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4)
A master program amendment shall become effective after the approval of the
department or after the decision of the shorelines hearings board to uphold the
master program or master program amendment, provided that the board may remand
the master program or master program adjustment to the local government or the
department for modification prior to the final adoption of the master program
or master program amendment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Effective
July 1, 2002, the following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
36.70A.250 and 1994 c 249 s 29 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 5;

(2) RCW
36.70A.260 and 1994 c 249 s 30 & 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 6;

(3) RCW
36.70A.270 and 1997 c 429 s 11, 1996 c 325 s 1, 1994 c 257 s 1,
& 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 7;

(4) RCW
36.70A.295 and 1997 c 429 s 13;

(5) RCW
36.70A.302 and 1997 c 429 s 16;

(6) RCW
36.70A.305 and 1996 c 325 s 4; and

(7) RCW
36.70A.335 and 1997 c 429 s 22.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---