BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in subsection (((7))) (11) of this
section, a county shall adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide
planning policies to establish a review and evaluation program. This program
shall be in addition to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and
36.70A.210. In developing and implementing the review and evaluation program
required by this section, the county and its cities shall consider information
from other appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review
and evaluation program shall be to:

(a)
Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban densities within
urban growth areas by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets,
and objectives contained in the county-wide planning policies and the county
and city comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has
occurred in the county and its cities; and

(b)
Identify reasonable measures((, other than adjusting urban growth areas,))
that will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The review and evaluation program shall:

(a)
Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of urban growth
areas and provide for annual collection of data on urban and rural land uses,
development including the issuance of building permits and certificates of
occupancy, critical areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary
to determine the quantity and type of land suitable for development, both for
residential and employment-based activities;

(b)
Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every
((five)) two years as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The first evaluation shall be completed not later than September 1,
2002. The county and its cities may establish in the county-wide planning
policies indicators, benchmarks, and other similar criteria to use in
conducting the evaluation;

(c)
Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the
county-wide planning policies required by this section and procedures to
resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of data; and

(d)
Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and county and city
comprehensive plans as needed to remedy an inconsistency identified through the
evaluation required by this section, or to bring these policies into compliance
with the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required by subsection
(1) of this section shall:

(a)
Determine whether there is sufficient land suitable ((land)) for
development to accommodate the county-wide population projection
established for the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent
population allocations within the county and between the county and its cities
and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Determine the actual density of housing that has been constructed and the
actual amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the
urban growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter
or since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this
section; and

(c)
Based on the actual density of development as determined under (b) of this
subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and
density range to determine the amount of land needed for commercial,
industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning
period used in the most recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4)
If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates ((an
inconsistency between what has occurred since the adoption of the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to)) the urban growth area does not contain sufficient land
suitable for development to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial
needs for twenty years based on the evaluation factors specified in
subsection (3) of this section, the county ((and its cities shall adopt and
implement measures that are reasonably likely to increase consistency during
the subsequent five-year period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with
its cities as required by RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to county-wide
planning policies to increase consistency. The county and its cities shall
annually monitor the measures adopted under this subsection to determine their
effect and may revise or rescind them as appropriate)) shall take one or
more of the following actions:

(a)
Amend its comprehensive plan or development regulations to include new,
incentive-based measures that demonstrably increase the likelihood that
development will occur at densities sufficient to accommodate residential,
commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years without expansion of the
urban growth area;

(b)
Amend its urban growth area to include sufficient land suitable for development
to achieve consistency with county-wide planning policies under RCW
36.70A.210(3)(a) and to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial
needs for twenty years at the actual developed density during the period since
the last periodic review or within the last five years, whichever is greater.
As part of this process, the amendment must include sufficient land reasonably
necessary to accommodate the siting of public facilities or other urban
infrastructure that is or will be needed by new development within the expanded
urban growth area; or

(c)
Any combination of actions in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(5)
A county that amends its comprehensive plan or development regulations to
include new, incentive-based measures shall annually monitor and record the
level of development activity and development density following the date of the
adoption of the new measures and may revise or rescind the measures as
appropriate. If, after five years of initial implementation of incentive-based
measures and annual monitoring, development is not occurring at densities
sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for
twenty years, the county shall amend its urban growth area as provided in
subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(6)
If the evaluation required in subsection (3) of this section demonstrates the
urban growth area does not contain sufficient land suitable for development to
accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years
based on the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the city or cities within the urban growth area shall amend their comprehensive
plans or development regulations to include new, incentive-based measures that
demonstrably increase the likelihood that development will occur at densities
sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for
twenty years without expansion of the urban growth area. A city that takes
this action shall annually monitor and record the level of development activity
and development density following the date of the adoption of the new measures
and may revise or rescind the measures as appropriate.

(7)
Amendments by the county and its cities to comprehensive plans or development
regulations must comply with this chapter.

(8)
In establishing that actions and measures adopted under subsections (4) and (5)
of this section demonstrably increase the likelihood of higher density
residential, commercial, and industrial development, the county, city, or town
shall at a minimum ensure that land zoned for needed housing and commercial and
industrial structures is in locations appropriate for such development and is
zoned at density ranges that are likely to be achieved by the market using the
analysis in subsection (3) of this section. Actions or incentive-based
measures, or both, are adopted as part of development regulations and are
available to all applicable properties within the zone, are not negotiated on a
case-by-case basis, and may include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Financial incentives for higher density housing, including, but not limited to
removal of fees associated with development;

(b)
Removal or easing of approval standards or procedures;

(c)
Redevelopment and infill strategies; and

(d)
Authorization of housing types not previously allowed by the comprehensive plan
or development regulations.

(((5)))
(9)(a) Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list
of methods used by counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities
required by this section. The department shall provide this information and
appropriate technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing
to comply with the provisions of this section.

(b)
By December 31, ((2007)) 2002, the department shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness
of the activities described and measures taken by the counties and cities
in this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the county-wide planning
policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of the
counties and cities.

(((6)))
(10) From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the
department shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning
organizations required under subsection (((7))) (11) of this
section to conduct the review and perform the evaluation required by this
section.

(((7)))
(11) The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the
cities within those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand
in population in 1995 as determined by office of financial management
population estimates and that are located west of the crest of the Cascade
mountain range. Any other county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out
the review, evaluation, and amendment programs and procedures as provided in
this section.

(12)
For the purposes of this section, "land suitable for development"
means the land:

(a)
Is not within any critical area or governed by any development regulation
designed to protect critical areas adopted under RCW 36.70A.060 that makes the
land unbuildable to existing zoning;

(b)
Is not otherwise constrained by governmental regulations or physical geography
to the extent that it is unbuildable to existing zoning;

(c)
Is serviced by all public facilities necessary for development or will be
serviced by needed facilities within twenty years as provided in the capital
facilities element of the county or city's comprehensive plan adopted under RCW
36.70A.070;

(d)
May be developed without causing the level of service on a transportation
facility to decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element
of the comprehensive plan; and

(e) Is available for development, including both vacant,
partially used, and redevelopable land. Redevelopable land is land on which
development has already occurred but on which, due to present or expected
market forces, there exists the strong likelihood that existing development
will be converted to more intensive uses during the planning period. However,
land that is developed with a building currently occupied and determined
habitable by the local jurisdiction with an assessed value greater than the
assessed value of the land on which the building is located may not be
considered redevelopable land.

---
END ---