BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.13.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Nominating
primaries for general elections to be held in November shall be held at the
regular polling places in each precinct on the ((third)) second
Tuesday of the preceding ((September or on the seventh Tuesday immediately
preceding such general election, whichever occurs first)) August.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.24.020 and 1989 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by other than a major
political party shall only be made either: (1) In a convention held not
earlier than the ((last)) third Saturday in ((June)) May
and not later than the ((first)) fourth Saturday in ((July))
May or during any of the seven days immediately preceding the first day
for filing declarations of candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29.68.080;
or (2) as provided by RCW ((29.51.170)) 29.62.180. A minor
political party may hold more than one convention but in no case shall any such
party nominate more than one candidate for any one partisan public office or
position. For the purpose of nominating candidates for the offices of
president and vice-president, United States senator, or a state-wide office, a
minor party or independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add
together the number of signatures of different individuals from each convention
obtained in support of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain the
number required by RCW 29.24.030. For all other offices for which nominations
are made, signatures of the requisite number of registered voters must be
obtained at a single convention.

Sec.
3. RCW
29.24.035 and 1989 c 215 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A
nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly identify the
name of the minor party or independent candidate convention as it appears on
the certificate of nomination as required by RCW ((29.24.030(3))) 29.24.040(3).
The petition shall also contain a statement that the person signing the
petition is a registered voter of the state of Washington and shall have a
space for the voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her name and
address. No person may sign more than one nominating petition under this
chapter for an office for a primary or election.

Sec.
4. RCW
29.15.020 and 1990 c 59 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of candidacy for
the following offices shall be filed with the filing officer during the
regular filing period, which is during regular business hours ((with the
filing officer no earlier than)) for five days beginning on the ((fourth))
second Monday in ((July and no later than)) June and ending on
the following Friday in the year in which the office is scheduled to be voted
upon:

(((1)))
(a) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or both
full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state general
election; and

(((2)))
(b) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that has
not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the vacancy is
required in conjunction with the next state general election.

(2)
If an eligible person has not filed a declaration of candidacy for a
nonpartisan office during the regular filing period, the filing officer shall
open a special filing period for declarations of candidacy for that office.
This special filing period must be held during regular business hours for three
consecutive days beginning on the first Monday after the close of the regular
filing period and ending on the following Wednesday. If an eligible person has
not filed for the nonpartisan office during this special filing period, the
election is lapsed under RCW 29.15.200.

(3)
If an eligible person has not filed a declaration of candidacy as a member of a
major political party for a partisan office during the regular filing period,
the filing officer shall open a special filing period for declarations of
candidacy as a member of that major political party for that office. This
special filing period must be held during regular business hours for three
consecutive days beginning on the first Monday after the close of the regular
filing period and ending on the following Wednesday. If an eligible person has
not filed as a candidate of that major political party for that partisan office
during this special filing period, the major political party may select and
certify a nominee under RCW 29.18.150.

(4)
Notice of a special filing period must be given by notifying press, radio, and
television in the county and by such other means as provided by law.

(5)
This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a different filing
period for these offices.

Sec.
5. RCW
29.15.120 and 1994 c 223 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
candidate who filed for office during the regular filing period may
withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy at any time before the close of regular
business hours on ((the Thursday following)) the last day ((for
candidates to file)) of the special filing period under RCW
29.15.020 by filing, with the officer with whom the declaration of candidacy
was filed, a signed request that his or her name not be printed on the ballot.
((There shall be no withdrawal period for declarations of candidacy filed
during special filing periods held under this title.)) The filing officer
may permit the withdrawal of a filing for the office of precinct committee
officer at the request of the candidate at any time if no absentee ballots have
been issued for that office and the general election ballots for that precinct
have not been printed. The filing officer may permit the withdrawal of a
filing for any elected office of a city, town, or special district at the
request of the candidate at any time before a primary if the primary ballots
for that city, town, or special district have not been ordered. No filing fee
may be refunded to any candidate who withdraws under this section. Notice of
the deadline for withdrawal of candidacy and that the filing fee is not refundable
shall be given to each candidate at the time he or she files.

Sec.
6. RCW
29.18.150 and 1990 c 59 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

((Should))
If a place on the ticket of a major political party ((be)) is
vacant because no person has filed for nomination as the candidate of that
major political party, after the last day allowed for candidates to withdraw as
provided by RCW 29.15.120, ((and if the vacancy is for a state or county
office to be voted on solely by the electors of a single county,)) the
county central committee of the major political party may select and certify a
candidate to fill the vacancy((;)) if the vacancy is for ((any other))
a state or county office to be voted on solely by the voters of a
single county, or the state central committee of the major political party
may select and certify a candidate to fill the vacancy((;)) if the
vacancy is for any other office.

The
certificate must set forth the cause of the vacancy, the name of the person
nominated, the office for which he or she is nominated, and other
pertinent information required in an ordinary certificate of nomination and be
filed in the proper office no later than the first Friday after the ((last
day allowed for candidates to withdraw)) close of the regular filing
period, together with the candidate's fee applicable to that office and a
declaration of candidacy.

Sec.
7. RCW
29.15.170 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 10 are each amended to read as
follows:

Filings
for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened after the special filing period
for a period of three normal business days, such three-day period to be
fixed by the election officer with whom such declarations of candidacy are
filed and notice thereof given by notifying press, radio, and television in the
county and by such other means as may now or hereafter be provided by law,
whenever before the fourth Tuesday prior to a primary:

(1)
A void in candidacy occurs for an office where one or more eligible persons
had filed for the office during the regular or special filing period;

(2)
A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired term to be
filled by an election for which filings have not been held; or

(3)
A nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election
pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies
or is disqualified.

Candidacies
validly filed within ((said)) this three-day period shall appear
on the ballot as if made during the earlier regular or special filing
period.

Sec.
8. RCW
29.15.190 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 12 are each amended to read as
follows:

A
scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken from the ballot,
no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate certified as elected,
when:

(1)
In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent of public
instruction, a void in candidacy ((occurs)) exists on or after
the fourth Tuesday ((prior to)) before a primary, public filings
and the primary being an indispensable phase of the election process for such
offices;

(2)
Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29.15.180, ((as now or hereafter
amended,)) a nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a
certificate of election pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the
state Constitution dies or is disqualified on or after the fourth Tuesday ((prior
to)) before a primary;

(3)
In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy ((occurs))
exists or a vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on
or after the fourth Tuesday ((prior to)) before an election.

Sec.
9. RCW
29.15.200 and 1994 c 223 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

If
after ((both the normal)) the regular filing period ((and)),
special filing period, and an additional three-day filing period
((as)) provided by RCW 29.15.170 and 29.15.180 have passed, no candidate
has filed for any single city, town, or district position to be filled, the
election for ((such)) that position shall be deemed lapsed, the
office deemed stricken from the ballot and no write-in votes counted. In such
instance, the incumbent occupying such position shall remain in office and
continue to serve until a successor is elected at the next election when such
positions are voted upon.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---