BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.45.060 and 1987 c 472 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
There is imposed an excise tax upon each sale of real property at the rate of
one and twenty-eight one-hundredths percent of the ((selling price)) net
value. An amount equal to seven and seven-tenths percent of the proceeds
of this tax to the state treasurer shall be deposited in the public works
assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

(((2)
There is imposed an additional excise tax through June 30, 1989, upon each sale
of real property at the rate of six one-hundredths of one percent of the
selling price. The tax imposed under this subsection shall be deposited in the
conservation area account under RCW 79.71.110.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, "net value" means the selling
price less the basis in the property conveyed. The "net value" will
never be less than zero when determining the excise tax under RCW 82.45.060.
The basis equals the selling price, as defined in RCW 82.45.030, that the
seller offered as consideration to acquire the property. A real estate
developer may include service and material costs directly related to the
development of the property conveyed as part of the basis.

---
END ---