BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All new residential construction is exempt from property taxation.

(2) "New residential construction" means a single-family
dwelling unit, whether such unit is separate or part of a multiunit dwelling,
that is in the process of construction or is completed standing inventory and
is one acre or less in size. "New residential construction" does not
include the land on which such dwelling stands.

---
END ---