BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.31.010 and 1998 c 340 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
July 1, 1998, and on January 1, 2000, and on each January 1st ((of
even-numbered years)) thereafter, the annual increase amount as defined in
RCW 41.32.010 and 41.40.010 shall be increased by the gain-sharing increase
amount, if any. The monthly retirement allowance of a person in receipt of the
benefit provided in RCW 41.32.489 or 41.40.197 shall immediately be adjusted to
reflect any increase.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.31A.020 and 1998 c 341 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((On)) Beginning January 1, 2002, and on each January 1st
((of even-numbered years)) thereafter, the member account of a person
meeting the requirements of this section shall be credited by the extraordinary
investment gain amount.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
Any member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 or the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit during the
twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the
distribution and had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member
account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution; or

(b)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875 or 41.35.680; or

(c)
Any person who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who:

(i)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service months after
attaining age fifty-four; or

(d)
Any teacher who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed
five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or

(e)
Any classified employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who
has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510; or

(f)
Any person who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member
account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and
who:

(i)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service months after
attaining age fifty-four; or

(g)
Any teacher who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member
account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and
who has completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and
who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or

(h)
Any classified employee who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in
their member account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the
distribution and who has completed five service credit years by September 1,
2000, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510.

(3)
The extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as follows:

(a)
One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in trust for pension
benefits in the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund and the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund at
the close of the previous state fiscal year not including the amount
attributable to member accounts;

(b)
Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of investment returns on
those assets over the previous four state fiscal years exceeds ten percent;

(c)
Multiplied by the proportion of:

(i)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of all
persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section; to

(ii)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of:

(A)
All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section;

(B)
Any person who earned service credit in the teachers' retirement system plan 2
or the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 during the
twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the
distribution;

(C)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765 or 41.35.420; and

(D)
Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers' retirement
system plan 2 or the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2;

(d)
Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit provided in
subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their service credit total on
August 31st of the previous year.

(4)
The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the
future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.31A.030 and 1998 c 341 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
On March 1, 2001, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the 1998 retroactive extraordinary investment
gain amount and the years 2000 and 2001 retroactive extraordinary
investment gain amount.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefits provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
Any classified employee who earned service credit during the twelve-month
period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the distribution
and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510; or

(b)
Any classified employee in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.35.680 and
who has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510; or

(c)
Any classified employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who
has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510; or

(d)
Any classified employee who has a balance of at least one thousand dollars in
his or her member account and who has completed five service credit years by
September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510.

(3)
The 1998 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated
as follows:

(a)
An amount equal to the average benefit per year of service paid to members of
the teachers' retirement system plan 3 pursuant to section 309, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998 in 1998;

(b)
Distributed to persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of
this section on the basis of their service credit total on August 31, 1997.

(4)
The 2000 and 2001 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amounts
shall be calculated as follows:

(a)
An amount equal to the average benefit per year of service paid to members of
the teachers' retirement system plan 3 pursuant to section 309, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998 in 2000;

(b)
An amount equal to the average benefit per year of service paid to members
of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 pursuant to section 4 of this act;

(c)
Distributed to persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of
this section on the basis of their service credit total on August 31, 1999,
for the year 2000 gain sharing amount and August 31, 2000, for the year 2001
gain sharing amount.

(5)
The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the
future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
On January 1, 2001, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the extraordinary investment gain amount.

(2)
The following persons are eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1)
of this section:

(a)
Any member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit
during the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately
preceding the distribution and had a balance of at least one thousand dollars
in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the
distribution; or

(b)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875; or

(c)
Any person who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who:

(i)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service months after
attaining age fifty-four; or

(iii)
Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or

(d)
Any person who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member
account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and
who:

(i)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service months after
attaining age fifty-four; or

(iii)
Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817.

(3)
The extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as follows:

(a)
One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in trust for pension
benefits in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 fund and the
teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund at the close of the
previous state fiscal year not including the amount attributable to member
accounts;

(b)
Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of investment returns on
those assets over the previous four state fiscal years exceeds ten percent;

(c)
Multiplied by the proportion of:

(i)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of all
persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section; to

(ii)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of:

(A)
All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section;

(B)
Any person who earned service credit in the teachers' retirement system plan 2
or the public employees' retirement system plan 2 during the twelve-month
period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the
distribution;

(C)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765 or 41.40.630; and

(D)
Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers' retirement
system plan 2 or the public employees' retirement system plan 2;

(d)
Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit provided in
subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their service credit total on
August 31st of the previous year.

(4)
The distribution provided for in this section shall be made solely from assets
included in the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 4 of this act is added to chapter 41.34 RCW, but because of its
temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 2 through 4 of this act take effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---