BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.4289 and 1998 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to amounts derived as compensation for services rendered
to patients or from sales of prescription drugs as defined in RCW 82.08.0281
furnished as an integral part of services rendered to patients by a
community and migrant health center, a kidney dialysis facility operated as
a nonprofit corporation, a nonprofit hospice agency licensed under chapter
70.127 RCW, and nursing homes and homes for unwed mothers operated as religious
or charitable organizations, but only if no part of the net earnings received
by such an institution inures directly or indirectly, to any person other than
the institution entitled to deduction hereunder.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of materials, labor,
and services used in the construction of health care facilities of a community
health clinic as defined in WAC 182-20-010(1).

(2)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of medical equipment to
a community health clinic, or to sales of or charges made for labor and
services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the medical equipment, or to sales of tangible personal property that
becomes an ingredient or component of the medical equipment during the course
of repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of
materials and labor in the construction of health care facilities of a
community health clinic.

(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the
use of medical equipment by a community health clinic, or to the use of
tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of the
medical equipment during the course of repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving the equipment.

---
END ---