BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may approve under RCW 90.03.380 a change of the point of diversion
for an undeveloped portion of an existing water right permit from an existing
authorized point of diversion downstream to an existing intake structure with
the available capacity to transport the additional diversion, if there is no
change in ownership of the permit and the original purpose and place of use of
the water under the permit are not changed.

This
section may not be construed as limiting in any manner whatsoever other
authorities of the department under RCW 90.03.380 or other changes that may be
approved under RCW 90.03.380 under authorities existing before the effective
date of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.03.030 and 1987 c 109 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person may convey any water which he or she may have a
right to use along any of the natural streams or lakes of this state, but not
so as to raise the water thereof above ordinary highwater mark, without making
just compensation to persons injured thereby; but due allowance shall be made
for evaporation and seepage, if any, the amount of such seepage to be
determined by the department, upon the application of any person interested. The
same authority is granted both for conveyance of water in, and for subsequent
conveyance of water from, a watercourse located in a neighboring state, if the
neighboring state's approval of the conveyance is documented to the
satisfaction of the department and the right to use the water conveyed is by
authority of an existing permit or certificate of water right.

---
END ---