BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
52.16.050 and 1998 c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
the county treasurer shall pay out money received for the account of the
district on warrants issued by the county auditor against the proper funds of
the district. The warrants shall be issued on vouchers approved and signed by
a majority of the district board and by the district secretary.

(2)
The board of fire commissioners of a district that had an annual operating budget
of five million or more dollars in each of the preceding three years may by
resolution adopt a policy to issue its own warrants for payment of claims or
other obligations of the fire district. The board of fire commissioners, after
auditing all payrolls and bills, may authorize the issuing of one general
certificate to the county treasurer, to be signed by the chair of the board of
fire commissioners, authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the warrants
specified by date, number, name, and amount, and the accounting funds on which
the warrants shall be drawn; thereupon the district secretary may issue the
warrants specified in the general certificate.

(3)
The board of fire commissioners of a district that had an annual operating
budget of under five million dollars in each of the preceding three years may
upon agreement between the county auditor and the fire district commission,
with approval of the fire district commission by resolution, adopt a policy to
issue its own warrants for payment of claims or other obligations of the fire
district. The board of fire commissioners, after auditing all payrolls and
bills, may authorize the issuing of one general certificate to the county
treasurer, to be signed by the chair of the board of fire commissioners,
authorizing the county treasurer to pay all the warrants specified by date,
number, name, and amount, and the accounting funds on which the warrants shall
be drawn. The district secretary may then issue the warrants specified in the
general certificate.

(4) The county treasurer may also pay general obligation
bonds and the accrued interest thereon in accordance with their terms from the
general obligation bond fund when interest or principal payments become due.
The county treasurer shall report in writing monthly to the secretary of the
district the amount of money held by the county in each fund and the amounts of
receipts and disbursements for each fund during the preceding month.

---
END ---