BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Counties have the authority to recognize employees for accomplishments
including outstanding achievements, safety performance, and longevity.
Recognition awards may not exceed one hundred dollars in value per award.
These awards may include, but are not limited to, such items as pen and desk
sets, plaques, pins, framed certificates, clocks, and calculators. Local
government recognition awards exclude cash tributes. Recognition events for
employees are limited to a nominal cost per employee. Awards costs shall be
paid by either the office, department, or county government giving the award.

(2) Recognition awards may only be given to county employees who
were employed by the county during the time period recognized by the award.

---
END ---