BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
chapter may be known and cited as the insurance liability bad faith act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Insurer" means any insurer as defined in RCW 48.01.050 and any
self-insurer, including a self-insured entity as defined by chapter 51.14 RCW.

(2)
"Insured" means any individual, company, insurer, association,
organization, reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, partnership, business
trust, corporation, or other entity that has purchased insurance or is defined
as an insured under a policy of insurance, including any direct or third-party
beneficiary to a policy of insurance issued to any "insured."

(3)
"Insurance claim" means any request by an insured for coverage or
benefits pursuant to a policy of insurance that arises after binder, execution,
or issuance of a contract of insurance to an insured.

Sec.
3. RCW
48.30.010 and 1997 c 409 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person engaged in the business of insurance shall engage in unfair methods
of competition or in unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of
such business as such methods, acts, or practices are defined pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
In addition to such unfair methods and unfair or deceptive acts or practices as
are expressly defined and prohibited by this code, the commissioner may from
time to time by regulation promulgated pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, define
other methods of competition and other acts and practices in the conduct of
such business reasonably found by the commissioner to be unfair or deceptive
after a review of all comments received during the notice and comment
rule-making period.

(3)(a)
In defining other methods of competition and other acts and practices in the
conduct of such business to be unfair or deceptive, and after reviewing all
comments and documents received during the notice and comment rule-making
period, the commissioner shall identify his or her reasons for defining the
method of competition or other act or practice in the conduct of insurance to
be unfair or deceptive and shall include a statement outlining these reasons as
part of the adopted rule.

(b)
The commissioner shall include a detailed description of facts upon which he or
she relied and of facts upon which he or she failed to rely, in defining the
method of competition or other act or practice in the conduct of insurance to
be unfair or deceptive, in the concise explanatory statement prepared under RCW
34.05.325(6).

(c)
Upon appeal the superior court shall review the findings of fact upon which the
regulation is based de novo on the record.

(4)
No such regulation shall be made effective prior to the expiration of thirty
days after the date of the order by which it is promulgated.

(5)
If the commissioner has cause to believe that any person is violating any such
regulation, the commissioner may order such person to cease and desist
therefrom. The commissioner shall deliver such order to such person direct or
mail it to the person by registered mail with return receipt requested. If the
person violates the order after expiration of ten days after the cease and
desist order has been received by him or her, he or she may be fined by the
commissioner a sum not to exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each
violation committed thereafter.

(6)
If any such regulation is violated, the commissioner may take such other or
additional action as is permitted under the insurance code for violation of a
regulation.

(7)
An insurer engaged in the business of insurance shall not unreasonably deny a
claim for coverage and payment of benefits to any insured.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
following methods, acts, and practices in the settlement and payment of
insurance claims are deemed unreasonable:

(1)
Misrepresenting a pertinent fact or insurance policy provision to an insured
who inquires about or makes a claim for policy benefits;

(2)
Failing to acknowledge and act reasonably promptly upon communications with
respect to claims arising under insurance policies, when made by an insured or
beneficiary to a policy of insurance;

(3)
Failing to promptly investigate claims arising under policies when made by an
insured or beneficiary to a policy of insurance;

(4)
Failing to pay claims to an insured or beneficiary of a policy of insurance
without conducting a reasonable investigation;

(5)
Failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims to an insured within a reasonable
time after a proof of loss has been completed or after a written request for
coverage and claim benefits has been made;

(6)
Failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims against an insured within a
reasonable time after an examination under oath has been requested and the
insured has participated and has submitted to an exam under oath;

(7)
Unreasonably failing to settle claims promptly when coverage for the loss or
claim has become reasonably clear and in situations where liability on the part
of the insurer to pay the claim has become reasonably clear;

(8)
Compelling an insured to institute litigation in order to obtain a defense to
or recover amounts due under a policy of insurance when coverage for the claim
is available and it is reasonably clear that the insured is entitled to
benefits under the insurance policy;

(9)
Making a claim payment to an insured or beneficiary to an insurance policy
without a statement setting forth the coverages under which the payments are
being made;

(10)
Failing to promptly provide to an insured or beneficiary of a policy of
insurance a reasonable explanation of the basis in the insurance policy in
relation to the specific facts of the claim or the applicable law involving
such claim for the denial of coverage or policy benefits pursuant to the claim;

(11)
Unreasonably failing to pay and process a claim promptly once coverage and
responsibility for payment of the claim have been established; and

(12)
Unreasonably failing to promptly settle a claim of an insured or beneficiary to
a policy of insurance where liability is reasonably clear under one portion of
the policy of insurance coverage in order to influence a settlement under other
portions of the applicable insurance policy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Any insured or beneficiary of a policy of insurance who is unreasonably denied a
claim for coverage or payment of benefits by an insurer may bring an action in
a superior court of this state to recover the resulting damages sustained and
the costs of the action, including attorneys' fees.

(2)
If the trier of fact finds that an insurer has acted unreasonably in denying a
claim for coverage or payment of benefits, the superior court shall increase
the total award of damages to an amount not to exceed three times the actual
damages, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees.

(3)
If the trier of fact finds that an insurer has acted unreasonably in denying a
claim for coverage or payment of benefits, the superior court shall award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs as set forth in RCW 4.84.010 to the
insured or any beneficiary of an insurance contract who is a prevailing party
in any such action.

(4)
In actions brought under RCW 48.30.010(7), section 4 of this act, and this
section, the remedies set forth in this section, shall supersede and replace
the remedies prescribed by RCW 19.86.090.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this act are each added to chapter 48.30 RCW.

---
END ---