BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that disabled persons contracting independently or
as owners of small businesses may initially: Lack capital to start a business;
have increased costs for personal care attendants and assistive technology; and
have difficulty competing economically because of a disability. The
legislature further recognizes that these disadvantages diminish as the
business grows in size and as employees become available for support.
Therefore, it is the intent of this chapter to limit participation in the program
established for disabled persons' business enterprises under this chapter to
newly established businesses of small size.

(2)
The legislature finds that businesses owned and controlled by disabled persons
are significantly underrepresented and have been denied equitable competitive
opportunities in contracting. It is the intent of this chapter to mitigate
societal discrimination and other factors in participating in public works and
in providing goods and services and to delineate a policy that an increased
level of participation by businesses owned and controlled by disabled persons
is desirable at all levels of state government. The purpose and intent of this
chapter is to provide the maximum practicable opportunity for increased
participation by businesses owned and controlled by disabled persons in
participating in public works and the process by which goods and services are
procured by state agencies and educational institutions from the private
sector. The legislature further finds that no court has held that a program
which promotes contracting opportunities for businesses owned and controlled by
disabled persons must be subjected to the strict-scrutiny standard or must be
justified by a disparity study. If a court of proper jurisdiction determines
that the program for disabled persons is subject to the strict-scrutiny
standard or must be justified by a disparity study, the program may be
suspended until the legislature determines a proper course of action.

(3)
This section expires June 30, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of RCW 39.19.030 through 39.19.060, 39.19.080 through 39.19.160,
and 39.19.200 through 39.19.921 shall apply to businesses that are owned and
controlled by disabled persons. The certification of businesses that are owned
and controlled by disabled persons, is subject to the following restrictions:
(a) The business may not have more than seven employees; and (b) no more than
eighty applicants for certification may be accepted per year.

(2)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter. The term "disabled person" means a
person with a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits a major
life activity. The impairment must be material and medically cognizable or
diagnosable. The impairment must also be permanent in that it is seldom
significantly corrected by medical replacement, therapy, or surgical means.
Impairment does not include drug or alcohol addiction or any negative effects
brought on by the use of drugs or alcohol.

(3)
This section expires June 30, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---