BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Building" includes, but is not limited to, any structure or any
separate part or portion thereof, whether permanent or not, or the ground
itself.

(2)
"Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more persons;
(b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign, or symbol; and
(c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for
criminal purposes.

(3)
"Street gang activity" means any activity that occurs within a gang
or advances a gang purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Every
building or unit within a building used for the purpose of aiding, promoting,
or conducting criminal street gang activity, and every building or unit within
a building wherein or upon which such acts take place, is a nuisance which
shall be enjoined, abated, and prevented, whether it is a public or private
nuisance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Any
person with legal standing and who resides, works in, or owns property in the
same multifamily building, apartment complex, or within a one-block radius may
bring an action as provided for in section 2 of this act by filing a complaint
with a law enforcement agency in the county in which the property is located.
Such action shall be commenced by the filing of a complaint alleging the facts
constituting the nuisance.

Any
complaint filed under this chapter shall be verified or accompanied by
affidavit. For purposes of showing that the owner or his or her agent has had
an opportunity to abate the nuisance, the affidavit shall contain a description
of all attempts by the applicant to notify and locate the owner of the property
or the owner's agent.

In
addition, the affidavit shall describe in detail the adverse impact associated
with the property on the surrounding neighborhood. "Adverse impact"
includes, but is not limited to, the following: Any search warrants served on
the property where evidence of criminal activity was seized; arrests of persons
who frequent the property for violation of criminal laws; increased volume of
traffic associated with the property; and the number of complaints made to law
enforcement of illegal activity associated with the property.

Upon
receipt of the complaint, the law enforcement agency shall conduct an
investigation into the allegations and, if probable cause is found that a
violation of this chapter is occurring, the complaint and results of the
investigation shall be filed in the county superior court. After receiving the
complaint, the court shall grant a hearing within three business days.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Upon
application for a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, the
court may, upon a showing of good cause, issue an ex parte restraining order or
preliminary injunction, preventing the defendant and all other persons from
removing or in any manner interfering with the personal property and contents
of the place where the nuisance is alleged to exist and may grant such
preliminary equitable relief as is necessary to prevent the continuance or recurrence
of the nuisance pending final resolution of the matter on the merits. However,
pending the decision, the stock in trade may not be so restrained, but an
inventory and full accounting of all business transactions may be required.

The
restraining order or preliminary injunction may be served by handing to and
leaving a copy with any person in charge of the place or residing in the place,
or by posting a copy in a conspicuous place at or upon one or more of the
principal doors or entrances to the place, or by both delivery and posting.
The officer serving the order or injunction shall forthwith make and return
into court an inventory of the personal property and contents situated in and
used in conducting or maintaining the nuisance.

Any
violation of the order or injunction is a contempt of court, and where such
order or injunction is posted, mutilation or removal thereof while the same
remains in force is a contempt of court if such posted order or injunction
contains a notice to that effect.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction shall not issue under
this chapter except upon the giving of a bond or security by the applicant, in
the sum that the court deems proper, but not less than one thousand dollars,
for the payment of such costs and damages as may be incurred or suffered by any
party who is found to have been wrongfully restrained or enjoined. A bond or
security shall not be required of the state of Washington, municipal corporations,
or political subdivisions of the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. An
action under this chapter shall have precedence over all other actions, except
prior matters of the same character, actions under chapter 7.43 RCW, criminal
proceedings, election contests, hearings on temporary restraining orders and
injunctions, and actions to forfeit vehicles used in violation of the uniform
controlled substances act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
If the complaint under this chapter is filed by a citizen, the complaint shall
not be dismissed by the citizen for want of prosecution except upon a sworn
statement made by the citizen and the citizen's attorney, if the citizen has
one. The statement shall set forth the reasons why the action should be
dismissed. The case shall only be dismissed if so ordered by the court.

(2)
In case of failure to prosecute the action with reasonable diligence, or at the
request of the plaintiff, the court, in its discretion, may substitute any
other citizen consenting to be substituted for the plaintiff.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
copy of the complaint, together with a notice of the time and place of the
hearing of the action shall be served upon the defendant at least one business
day before the hearing. Service may also be made by posting the papers in the
same manner as is provided for in section 4 of this act. If the hearing is
then continued at the request of any defendant, all temporary orders and
injunctions shall be extended as a matter of course.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if the existence of the
nuisance is established in the action, an order of abatement shall be entered
as part of the final judgment in the case. Plaintiff's costs in the action,
including those of abatement, are a lien upon the building or unit within a
building. The lien is enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order
of the court.

(2)
If the court finds and concludes that the owner of the building or unit within
a building:

(a)
Had no knowledge of the existence of the nuisance or has been making reasonable
efforts to abate the nuisance;

(b)
Has not been guilty of any contempt of court in the proceedings; and

(c)
Will immediately abate any such nuisance that may exist at the building or unit
within a building and prevent it from being a nuisance within a period of one
year thereafter,

the
court shall, if satisfied of the owner's good faith, order the building or unit
within a building to be delivered to the owner, and no order of abatement shall
be entered. If an order of abatement has been entered and the owner
subsequently meets the requirements of this subsection, the order of abatement
shall be canceled.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. Any
final order of abatement issued under this chapter shall:

(1)
Direct the removal of all personal property subject to seizure and forfeiture
under RCW 69.50.505 or other law from the building or unit within a building,
and direct their disposition under the forfeiture provisions of RCW 69.50.505
or other law;

(2)
Provide for the immediate closure of the building or unit within a building
against its use for any purpose, and for keeping it closed for a period of one
year unless released sooner as provided in this chapter; and

(3)
State that while the order of abatement remains in effect the building or unit
within a building shall remain in the custody of the court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. In
all actions brought under this chapter, the proceeds and all moneys forfeited
under the forfeiture provisions of RCW 69.50.505 or other law shall be applied
as follows:

(1)
First, to the fees and costs of the removal and sale;

(2)
Second, to the allowances and costs of closing and keeping closed the building
or unit within a building;

(3)
Third, to the payment of the plaintiff's costs in the action; and

(4)
Fourth, the balance, if any, to the owner of the property.

If
the proceeds of the sale of items subject to seizure and forfeiture do not
fully discharge all of the costs, fees, and allowances, the building or unit
within a building shall then also be sold under execution issued upon the order
of the court, and the proceeds of the sale shall be applied in a like manner.

A
building or unit within a building shall not be sold under this section unless
the court finds and concludes by clear and convincing evidence that the owner
of the building or unit within a building had actual or constructive knowledge
or notice of the existence of the nuisance. However, this shall not be
construed as limiting or prohibiting the entry of any final order of abatement
as provided in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. An
intentional violation of a restraining order, preliminary injunction, or order
of abatement under this chapter is a contempt of court as provided in chapter
7.21 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Whenever the owner of a building or unit within a building upon which the act
or acts constituting the contempt have been committed, or the owner of any
interest in the building or unit has been found in contempt of court, and fined
in any proceedings under this chapter, the fine is a lien upon the building or
unit within a building to the extent of the owner's interest. The lien is
enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order of the court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. The
abatement of a nuisance under this chapter does not prejudice the right of any
person to recover damages for its past existence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 1 through 15 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---