BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

GENERAL DEFINITIONS AND BUSINESS AND
OCCUPATION TAX

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW, to be codified before RCW 82.04.220,
to read as follows:

"Electrical
service" means the provision of electricity, including but not limited to
generation, production, transmission, aggregation, distribution, and delivery.

Sec.
102. RCW
82.04.050 and 1998 c 332 s 2, 1998 c 315 s 1, 1998 c 308 s 1, and 1998 c 275 s
1 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Sale at retail" or "retail sale" means every sale of
tangible personal property (including articles produced, fabricated, or
imprinted) to all persons irrespective of the nature of their business and
including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who
install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal
property of or for consumers other than a sale to a person who presents a
resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470 and who:

(a)
Purchases for the purpose of resale as tangible personal property in the
regular course of business without intervening use by such person; or

(b)
Installs, repairs, cleans, alters, imprints, improves, constructs, or decorates
real or personal property of or for consumers, if such tangible personal
property becomes an ingredient or component of such real or personal property
without intervening use by such person; or

(c)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing for
sale a new article of tangible personal property or substance, of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component or is a chemical used in
processing, when the primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical
reaction directly through contact with an ingredient of a new article being
produced for sale; or

(d)
Purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon; or

(e)
Purchases for the purpose of providing the property to consumers as part of
competitive telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065.

The
term shall include every sale of tangible personal property which is used or
consumed or to be used or consumed in the performance of any activity
classified as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale" even
though such property is resold or utilized as provided in (a), (b), (c), (d),
or (e) of this subsection following such use. The term also means every sale
of tangible personal property to persons engaged in any business which is
taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) and (7) and 82.04.290.

(2)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed and/or for
labor and services rendered in respect to the following:

(a)
The installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, or improving of
tangible personal property of or for consumers, including charges made for the
mere use of facilities in respect thereto, but excluding charges made for the
use of coin-operated laundry facilities when such facilities are situated in an
apartment house, rooming house, or mobile home park for the exclusive use of
the tenants thereof, and also excluding sales of laundry service to nonprofit
health care facilities, and excluding services rendered in respect to live
animals, birds and insects;

(b)
The constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of new or existing
buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real property of or for
consumers, including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible
personal property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property
becomes a part of the realty by virtue of installation, and shall also include
the sale of services or charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of
earth excepting the mere leveling of land used in commercial farming or
agriculture;

(c)
The charge for labor and services rendered in respect to constructing,
repairing, or improving any structure upon, above, or under any real property
owned by an owner who conveys the property by title, possession, or any other
means to the person performing such construction, repair, or improvement for
the purpose of performing such construction, repair, or improvement and the
property is then reconveyed by title, possession, or any other means to the
original owner;

(d)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to the
cleaning, fumigating, razing or moving of existing buildings or structures, but
shall not include the charge made for janitorial services; and for purposes of
this section the term "janitorial services" shall mean those cleaning
and caretaking services ordinarily performed by commercial janitor service
businesses including, but not limited to, wall and window washing, floor
cleaning and waxing, and the cleaning in place of rugs, drapes and upholstery.
The term "janitorial services" does not include painting, papering,
repairing, furnace or septic tank cleaning, snow removal or sandblasting;

(e)
The sale of or charge made for labor and services rendered in respect to
automobile towing and similar automotive transportation services, but not in
respect to those required to report and pay taxes under chapter 82.16 RCW;

(f)
The sale of and charge made for the furnishing of lodging and all other
services by a hotel, rooming house, tourist court, motel, trailer camp, and the
granting of any similar license to use real property, as distinguished from the
renting or leasing of real property, and it shall be presumed that the
occupancy of real property for a continuous period of one month or more
constitutes a rental or lease of real property and not a mere license to use or
enjoy the same;

(g)
The sale of or charge made for tangible personal property, labor and services
to persons taxable under (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this subsection
when such sales or charges are for property, labor and services which are used
or consumed in whole or in part by such persons in the performance of any
activity defined as a "sale at retail" or "retail sale"
even though such property, labor and services may be resold after such use or
consumption. Nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to modify
subsection (1) of this section and nothing contained in subsection (1) of this
section shall be construed to modify this subsection.

(3)
The term "sale at retail" or "retail sale" shall include
the sale of or charge made for personal, business, or professional services
including amounts designated as interest, rents, fees, admission, and other
service emoluments however designated, received by persons engaging in the
following business activities:

(a)
Amusement and recreation services including but not limited to golf, pool,
billiards, skating, bowling, ski lifts and tows, day trips for sightseeing
purposes, and others, when provided to consumers;

(b)
Abstract, title insurance, and escrow services;

(c)
Credit bureau services;

(d)
Automobile parking and storage garage services;

(e)
Landscape maintenance and horticultural services but excluding (i)
horticultural services provided to farmers and (ii) pruning, trimming,
repairing, removing, and clearing of trees and brush near electric transmission
or distribution lines or equipment, if performed by or at the direction of an
electric utility;

(f)
Service charges associated with tickets to professional sporting events; and

(g)
The following personal services: Physical fitness services, tanning salon
services, tattoo parlor services, steam bath services, turkish bath services,
escort services, and dating services.

(4)
The term shall also include the renting or leasing of tangible personal
property to consumers and the rental of equipment with an operator.

(5)
The term shall also include the providing of telephone service, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, or electrical service to consumers.

(6)
The term shall also include the sale of canned software other than a sale to a
person who presents a resale certificate under RCW 82.04.470, regardless of the
method of delivery to the end user, but shall not include custom software or
the customization of canned software.

(7)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the building, repairing, or improving of any street,
place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public transportation terminal
or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle which is owned by a municipal
corporation or political subdivision of the state or by the United States and
which is used or to be used primarily for foot or vehicular traffic including
mass transportation vehicles of any kind.

(8)
The term shall also not include sales of chemical sprays or washes to persons
for the purpose of postharvest treatment of fruit for the prevention of scald,
fungus, mold, or decay, nor shall it include sales of feed, seed, seedlings,
fertilizer, agents for enhanced pollination including insects such as bees, and
spray materials to: (a) Persons who participate in the federal conservation
reserve program, the environmental quality incentives program, the wetlands
reserve program, and the wildlife habitat incentives program, or their
successors administered by the United States department of agriculture; (b)
farmers for the purpose of producing for sale any agricultural product; and (c)
farmers acting under cooperative habitat development or access contracts with
an organization exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)
or the Washington state department of fish and wildlife to produce or improve
wildlife habitat on land that the farmer owns or leases.

(9)
The term shall not include the sale of or charge made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of
new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above real
property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county
or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the
installing, or attaching of any article of tangible personal property therein
or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a part of the realty
by virtue of installation. Nor shall the term include the sale of services or
charges made for the clearing of land and the moving of earth of or for the
United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority.
Nor shall the term include the sale of services or charges made for cleaning up
for the United States, or its instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other
byproducts of weapons production and nuclear research and development.

(10)
Until July 1, 2003, the term shall not include the sale of or charge made for
labor and services rendered for environmental remedial action as defined in RCW
82.04.2635(2).

Sec.
103. RCW
82.04.060 and 1998 c 332 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

"Sale
at wholesale" or "wholesale sale" means any of the following
when not a sale at retail: (1) Any sale of tangible personal property; (2)
any sale of amusement or recreation services as defined in RCW 82.04.050(3)(a);
(3) any sale of canned software; ((or)) (4) any sale of telephone
service as defined in RCW 82.04.065((, which is not a sale at retail and));
or (5) any sale of electrical service. "Sale at wholesale" or
"wholesale sale" also means any charge made for labor and
services rendered for persons who are not consumers, in respect to real or
personal property, if such charge is expressly defined as a retail sale by RCW
82.04.050 when rendered to or for consumers: PROVIDED, That the term
"real or personal property" as used in this section shall not include
any natural products named in RCW 82.04.100.

Sec.
104. RCW
82.04.120 and 1998 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"To
manufacture" embraces all activities of a commercial or industrial nature
wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to materials so that
as a result thereof a new, different or useful substance or article of tangible
personal property is produced for sale or commercial or industrial use, and
shall include: (1) The production or fabrication of special made or custom
made articles; ((and)) (2) the production or fabrication of dental
appliances, devices, restorations, substitutes, or other dental laboratory
products by a dental laboratory or dental technician; and (3) the generation
or production of electrical energy.

"To
manufacture" shall not include: Conditioning of seed for use in planting;
cubing hay or alfalfa; or activities which consist of cutting, grading, or ice
glazing seafood which has been cooked, frozen, or canned outside this state.

Sec.
105. RCW
82.04.190 and 1998 c 332 s 6 and 1998 c 308 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

"Consumer"
means the following:

(1)
Any person who purchases, acquires, owns, holds, or uses any article of
tangible personal property irrespective of the nature of the person's business
and including, among others, without limiting the scope hereof, persons who
install, repair, clean, alter, improve, construct, or decorate real or personal
property of or for consumers other than for the purpose (a) of resale as
tangible personal property in the regular course of business or (b) of
incorporating such property as an ingredient or component of real or personal
property when installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, imprinting, improving,
constructing, or decorating such real or personal property of or for consumers
or (c) of consuming such property in producing for sale a new article of
tangible personal property or a new substance, of which such property becomes
an ingredient or component or as a chemical used in processing, when the
primary purpose of such chemical is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of a new article being produced for sale or
(d) purchases for the purpose of consuming the property purchased in producing
ferrosilicon which is subsequently used in producing magnesium for sale, if the
primary purpose of such property is to create a chemical reaction directly
through contact with an ingredient of ferrosilicon;

(2)(a)
Any person engaged in any business activity taxable under RCW 82.04.290; (b)
any person who purchases, acquires, or uses any telephone service ((as
defined in RCW 82.04.065)) or electrical service, other than for
resale in the regular course of business; (c) any person who purchases,
acquires, or uses any amusement and recreation service defined in RCW
82.04.050(3)(a), other than for resale in the regular course of business; and
(d) any person who is an end user of software;

(3)
Any person engaged in the business of contracting for the building, repairing
or improving of any street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass
public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
which is owned by a municipal corporation or political subdivision of the state
of Washington or by the United States and which is used or to be used primarily
for foot or vehicular traffic including mass transportation vehicles of any
kind as defined in RCW 82.04.280, in respect to tangible personal property when
such person incorporates such property as an ingredient or component of such publicly
owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right of way, mass public
transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle by
installing, placing or spreading the property in or upon the right of way of
such street, place, road, highway, easement, bridge, tunnel, or trestle or in
or upon the site of such mass public transportation terminal or parking
facility;

(4)
Any person who is an owner, lessee or has the right of possession to or an
easement in real property which is being constructed, repaired, decorated,
improved, or otherwise altered by a person engaged in business, excluding only
(a) municipal corporations or political subdivisions of the state in respect to
labor and services rendered to their real property which is used or held for
public road purposes, and (b) the United States, instrumentalities thereof, and
county and city housing authorities created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW in
respect to labor and services rendered to their real property. Nothing
contained in this or any other subsection of this definition shall be construed
to modify any other definition of "consumer";

(5)
Any person who is an owner, lessee, or has the right of possession to personal
property which is being constructed, repaired, improved, cleaned, imprinted, or
otherwise altered by a person engaged in business;

(6)
Any person engaged in the business of constructing, repairing, decorating, or
improving new or existing buildings or other structures under, upon, or above
real property of or for the United States, any instrumentality thereof, or a
county or city housing authority created pursuant to chapter 35.82 RCW,
including the installing or attaching of any article of tangible personal
property therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation; also, any person engaged in the
business of clearing land and moving earth of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW. Any such person shall be a consumer within the meaning
of this subsection in respect to tangible personal property incorporated into,
installed in, or attached to such building or other structure by such person;

(7)
Any person who is a lessor of machinery and equipment, the rental of which is
exempt from the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 under RCW 82.08.02565, with
respect to the sale of or charge made for tangible personal property consumed
in respect to repairing the machinery and equipment, if the tangible personal
property has a useful life of less than one year. Nothing contained in this or
any other subsection of this section shall be construed to modify any other
definition of "consumer";

(8)
Any person engaged in the business of cleaning up for the United States, or its
instrumentalities, radioactive waste and other byproducts of weapons production
and nuclear research and development; and

(9)
Until July 1, 2003, any person engaged in the business of conducting
environmental remedial action as defined in RCW 82.04.2635(2).

Sec.
106. RCW
82.04.425 and 1980 c 37 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter ((shall)) does not apply to the following activities:

(1)
Sales for resale by persons regularly engaged in the business of making
sales of the type of property so sold to other persons similarly engaged in the
business of selling such property where (((1))): (a) The amount
paid by the buyer does not exceed the amount paid by the seller to his vendor
in the acquisition of the article; and (((2))) (b) the
sale is made as an accommodation to the buyer to enable him to fill a bona fide
existing order of a customer or is made within fourteen days to reimburse in
kind a previous accommodation sale by the buyer to the seller; ((nor to))

(2)
Sales by a wholly owned subsidiary of a person making sales at retail which
are exempt under RCW 82.08.0262 when the parent corporation shall have paid the
tax imposed under this chapter; and

(3)
Exchanges, deliveries, or transfers of electricity or the rights thereto by one
party to another in which the second party agrees, subject to the terms and
conditions of the agreement, to deliver electricity at the same or another
time, including, but not limited to:

(a)
The exchange of electricity for electricity between businesses providing
electrical service;

(b)
The transmission or transfer of electricity by one business providing
electrical service to another business providing electrical service under an
agreement for coordination of operations among power systems of the Pacific
Northwest;

(c)
The Bonneville power administration's acquisition of electric power for resale
to businesses providing electrical service;

(d)
The residential exchange of electric power entered into between a business
providing electrical service and the administrator of the Bonneville power
administration.

Sec.
107. RCW
82.04.460 and 1985 c 7 s 154 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person rendering services taxable under RCW 82.04.290 and maintaining
places of business both within and without this state which contribute to the
rendition of such services shall, for the purpose of computing tax liability
under RCW 82.04.290, apportion to this state that portion of his gross income
which is derived from services rendered within this state. Where such
apportionment cannot be accurately made by separate accounting methods, the
taxpayer shall apportion to this state that proportion of his total income
which the cost of doing business within the state bears to the total cost of
doing business both within and without the state.

(2)
Notwithstanding the provision of subsection (1) of this section, persons doing
business both within and without the state who receive gross income from
service charges, as defined in RCW 63.14.010 (relating to amounts charged for
granting the right or privilege to make deferred or installment payments) or
who receive gross income from engaging in business as financial institutions
within the scope of chapter 82.14A RCW (relating to city taxes on financial
institutions) shall apportion or allocate gross income taxable under RCW
82.04.290 to this state pursuant to rules promulgated by the department
consistent with uniform rules for apportionment or allocation developed by the
states.

(3)
The department shall by rule provide a method or methods of apportioning or
allocating gross income derived from sales of telephone or electrical
services taxed under this chapter, if the gross proceeds of sales subject to
tax under this chapter do not fairly represent the extent of the taxpayer's
income attributable to this state. The rules shall be, so far as feasible,
consistent with the methods of apportionment contained in this section and
shall require the consideration of those facts, circumstances, and
apportionment factors as will result in an equitable and constitutionally
permissible division of the services.

PART
II

STATE
SALES AND USE TAXES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter, "telecommunication service" is defined as
provided in chapter 82.04 RCW.

Sec.
202. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state. The tax is equal to three percent of the selling price for sales of
electrical service. The tax is equal to six and five-tenths percent of the
selling price for other sales.

(2)
There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal
to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected
under this subsection shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as
motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1).

(3)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(4)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

Sec.
203. RCW
82.08.02565 and 1998 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales to a manufacturer or
processor for hire of machinery and equipment used directly in a manufacturing
operation or research and development operation, or to sales of or charges made
for labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the machinery and equipment, but only when the purchaser
provides the seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed
by the department by rule. The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate
for the seller's files.

(2)
For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.02565:

(a)
"Machinery and equipment" means industrial fixtures, devices, and
support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement parts.
"Machinery and equipment" includes pollution control equipment
installed and used in a manufacturing operation or research and development
operation to prevent air pollution, water pollution, or contamination that
might otherwise result from the manufacturing operation or research and development
operation.

(b)
"Machinery and equipment" does not include:

(i)
Hand tools;

(ii)
Property with a useful life of less than one year;

(iii)
Buildings, other than machinery and equipment that is permanently affixed to or
becomes a physical part of a building; and

(iv)
Building fixtures that are not integral to the manufacturing operation or
research and development operation that are permanently affixed to and become a
physical part of a building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation,
air conditioning, communications, plumbing, or electrical.

(c)
Machinery and equipment is "used directly" in a manufacturing
operation or research and development operation if the machinery and equipment:

(i)
Acts upon or interacts with an item of tangible personal property;

(ii)
Conveys, transports, handles, or temporarily stores an item of tangible
personal property at the manufacturing site;

(iii)
Controls, guides, measures, verifies, aligns, regulates, or tests tangible
personal property;

(iv)
Provides physical support for or access to tangible personal property;

(v)
Produces power for, or lubricates machinery and equipment;

(vi)
Produces another item of tangible personal property for use in the
manufacturing operation or research and development operation;

(vii)
Places tangible personal property in the container, package, or wrapping in
which the tangible personal property is normally sold or transported; or

(viii)
Is integral to research and development as defined in RCW 82.63.010.

(d)
"Manufacturing operation" means the manufacturing of articles,
substances, or commodities for sale as tangible personal property. The
manufacturing operation begins at the point where the raw materials enter the
manufacturing site and ends at the point where the finished product leaves the
manufacturing site. The term ((also includes)) does not include the
production of electricity, other than that portion of a cogeneration
project that is used to generate power for consumption within the manufacturing
site of which the cogeneration project is an integral part. The term does not
include ((the production of electricity by a light and power business as
defined in RCW 82.16.010 or)) the preparation of food products on the
premises of a person selling food products at retail.

(e)
"Cogeneration" means the simultaneous generation of electrical energy
and low-grade heat from the same fuel.

(f)
"Research and development operation" means engaging in research and
development as defined in RCW 82.63.010 by a manufacturer or processor for
hire.

Sec.
204. RCW
82.12.010 and 1994 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)(a)
"Value of the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether
money, credit, rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind,
expressed in terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by
the purchaser to the seller for the article of tangible personal property or
service, the use of which is taxable under this chapter. The term
includes, in addition to the consideration paid or given or contracted to be
paid or given, the amount of any tariff or duty paid with respect to the
importation of the article used. In case the article used is acquired by lease
or by gift or is extracted, produced, or manufactured by the person using the
same or is sold under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent
the true value thereof, the value of the article used shall be determined as
nearly as possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of
similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the
department of revenue may prescribe.

(b)
In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the
articles so used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the
use of the articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality
and character under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In
case any such articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are
to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such
articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such
articles so used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of
such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price
measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under
such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c)
In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state
which are brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in any
period of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are temporarily
used for business purposes by the person in this state, the value of the
article used shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the use of
the articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or chapter
82.08 RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of this
subsection.

(d)
In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the
manufacture or production of products sold or to be sold to the department of
defense of the United States, the value of the articles used shall be
determined according to the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e)
In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a
prototype for the development of a new or improved product, the value of the
article used shall be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new
or improved product when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials
incorporated into the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product
is not offered for sale;

(2)
"Use," "used," "using," or "put to use"
shall have their ordinary meaning, and shall mean:

(a)
With respect to tangible personal property, the first act within this state
by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the article of
tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation, storage,
withdrawal from storage, or any other act preparatory to subsequent actual use
or consumption within this state; and

(b)
With respect to a service, the receipt by the taxpayer of any part of the
benefit afforded by the service;

(3)
"Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(4)
"Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail
and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this
chapter;

(5)
The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW,
insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect to taxes
imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer," in
addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW insofar
as applicable, shall also mean any person who distributes or displays, or
causes to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal
property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the
sale of products or services.

Sec.
205. RCW
82.12.020 and 1998 c 332 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every person in this
state a tax or excise for the privilege of using within this state as a
consumer: (a) Any article of tangible personal property purchased at retail,
or acquired by lease, gift, repossession, or bailment, or extracted or produced
or manufactured by the person so using the same, or otherwise furnished to a
person engaged in any business taxable under RCW 82.04.280 (2) or (7); (b) any
canned software, regardless of the method of delivery, but excluding canned
software that is either provided free of charge or is provided for temporary
use in viewing information, or both; or (c) any ((amusement or recreation))
service defined as a retail sale in RCW 82.04.050 (3)(a) or (5).

(2)
This tax shall apply to the use of every service defined as a retail sale in
RCW 82.04.050 (3)(a) or (5) and the use of every article of tangible
personal property, including property acquired at a casual or isolated sale,
and including byproducts used by the manufacturer thereof, except as
hereinafter provided, irrespective of whether the article or similar articles
are manufactured or are available for purchase within this state.

(3)
Except as provided in RCW 82.12.0252, payment by one purchaser or user of
tangible personal property or service of the tax imposed by chapter 82.08 or
82.12 RCW shall not have the effect of exempting any other purchaser or user of
the same property or service from the taxes imposed by such chapters.

(4)
The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the retail
sales tax under RCW 82.08.020.

Sec.
206. RCW
82.12.035 and 1996 c 148 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
credit shall be allowed against the taxes imposed by this chapter upon the use
of tangible personal property, or services taxable under RCW 82.04.050 (3)(a) or
(5), in the state of Washington in the amount that the present user thereof
or his or her bailor or donor has paid a retail sales or use tax with respect
to such property to any other state of the United States, any political
subdivision thereof, the District of Columbia, and any foreign country or
political subdivision thereof, prior to the use of such property in Washington.

PART
III

LOCAL
SALES AND USE TAXES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of any city or county may impose a sales and use tax
upon the sale or use of electrical services. In cities and counties with
legislative authorities of four or fewer members, two-thirds of the members
must approve an ordinance or resolution under this section. In cities and
counties with legislative authorities of more than four members, a majority
plus one vote must approve an ordinance or resolution under this section.

(2)
A tax imposed under this section shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the city or county as the case may be.
The rate of tax shall not exceed five and eight-tenths percent of the selling
price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the service used (in the case of
a use tax).

(3)
Any county ordinance adopted under this section shall contain, in addition to
all other provisions required to conform to this chapter, a provision allowing
a credit against the county tax imposed under this section for the full amount
of any city sales or use tax imposed under this section upon the same taxable
event.

Sec.
302. RCW
82.14.020 and 1997 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter:

(1)
A retail sale consisting solely of the sale of tangible personal property shall
be deemed to have occurred at the retail outlet at or from which delivery is
made to the consumer;

(2)
A retail sale consisting essentially of the performance of personal business or
professional services shall be deemed to have occurred at the place at which
such services were primarily performed, except that for the performance of a
tow truck service, as defined in RCW 46.55.010, the retail sale shall be deemed
to have occurred at the place of business of the operator of the tow truck
service;

(3)
A retail sale consisting of the rental of tangible personal property shall be
deemed to have occurred (a) in the case of a rental involving periodic rental
payments, at the primary place of use by the lessee during the period covered
by each payment, or (b) in all other cases, at the place of first use by the
lessee;

(4)
A retail sale within the scope of the second paragraph of RCW 82.04.050, and a
retail sale of taxable personal property to be installed by the seller shall be
deemed to have occurred at the place where the labor and services involved were
primarily performed;

(5)
A retail sale consisting of the providing to a consumer of telephone service,
as defined in RCW 82.04.065, other than a sale of tangible personal property
under subsection (1) of this section or a rental of tangible personal property
under subsection (3) of this section, shall be deemed to have occurred at the
situs of the telephone or other instrument through which the telephone service
is rendered;

(6)
A retail sale of electrical service shall be deemed to have occurred at the
situs of the meter measuring the electricity delivered to the consumer;

(7)
"City" means a city or town;

(((7)))
(8) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04, 82.08
and 82.12 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, insofar as applicable, shall have
full force and effect with respect to taxes imposed under authority of this
chapter;

(((8)))
(9) "Taxable event" shall mean any retail sale, or any use of
an article of tangible personal property or service, upon which a state
tax is imposed pursuant to chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW, as they now exist or may
hereafter be amended: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the term shall not include a
retail sale taxable pursuant to RCW 82.08.150, as now or hereafter amended;

(((9)))
(10) "Treasurer or other legal depository" shall mean the
treasurer or legal depository of a county or city.

Sec.
303. RCW
82.14.030 and 1989 c 384 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of any county or city while not required by legislative
mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the purposes authorized
by this chapter, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. Such tax shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county or city as the case may be:
PROVIDED, That except as provided in RCW 82.14.230, this sales and use tax
shall not apply to natural or manufactured gas or electrical services.
The rate of such tax imposed by a county shall be five-tenths of one percent of
the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in
the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax imposed by a city shall not
exceed five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales
tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That in the event a county shall impose a sales and use tax under this
subsection, the rate of such tax imposed under this subsection by any city
therein shall not exceed four hundred and twenty-five one-thousandths of one
percent.

(2)
Subject to the enactment into law of the 1982 amendment to RCW 82.02.020 by
section 5, chapter 49, Laws of 1982 1st ex. sess., in addition to the tax
authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the governing body of any county
or city may by resolution or ordinance impose an additional sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such additional tax shall be
collected upon the same taxable events upon which the tax imposed under
subsection (1) of this section is levied. The rate of such additional tax
imposed by a county shall be up to five-tenths of one percent of the selling
price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of
a use tax). The rate of such additional tax imposed by a city shall be up to
five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or
value of the article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED HOWEVER, That
in the event a county shall impose a sales and use tax under this subsection at
a rate equal to or greater than the rate imposed under this subsection by a
city within the county, the county shall receive fifteen percent of the city
tax: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event that the county shall impose a sales
and use tax under this subsection at a rate which is less than the rate imposed
under this subsection by a city within the county, the county shall receive
that amount of revenues from the city tax equal to fifteen percent of the rate
of tax imposed by the county under this subsection. The authority to impose a
tax under this subsection is intended in part to compensate local government
for any losses from the phase-out of the property tax on business inventories.

Sec.
304. RCW
82.14.045 and 1998 c 321 s 7 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of any city pursuant to RCW 35.92.060, of any county which
has created an unincorporated transportation benefit area pursuant to RCW
36.57.100 and 36.57.110, of any public transportation benefit area pursuant to
RCW 36.57A.080 and 36.57A.090, of any county transportation authority
established pursuant to chapter 36.57 RCW, and of any metropolitan municipal
corporation within a county with a population of one million or more pursuant
to chapter 35.58 RCW, may, by resolution or ordinance for the sole purpose of
providing funds for the operation, maintenance, or capital needs of public
transportation systems and in lieu of the excise taxes authorized by RCW
35.95.040, submit an authorizing proposition to the voters or include such authorization
in a proposition to perform the function of public transportation and if
approved by a majority of persons voting thereon, fix and impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter: PROVIDED, That no such
legislative body shall impose such a sales and use tax without submitting such
an authorizing proposition to the voters and obtaining the approval of a
majority of persons voting thereon: PROVIDED FURTHER, That where such a
proposition is submitted by a county on behalf of an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, it shall be voted upon by the voters residing
within the boundaries of such unincorporated transportation benefit area and,
if approved, the sales and use tax shall be imposed only within such area.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to the contrary, any county in
which a county public transportation plan has been adopted pursuant to RCW
36.57.070 and the voters of such county have authorized the imposition of a
sales and use tax pursuant to the provisions of section 10, chapter 167, Laws
of 1974 ex. sess., prior to July 1, 1975, shall be authorized to fix and impose
a sales and use tax as provided in this section at not to exceed the rate so
authorized without additional approval of the voters of such county as
otherwise required by this section.

The
tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to ((the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030)) any other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
such city, public transportation benefit area, county, or metropolitan
municipal corporation as the case may be. The rate of such tax shall be
one-tenth, two-tenths, three-tenths, four-tenths, five-tenths, or six-tenths of
one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the
article used (in the case of a use tax). The rate of such tax shall not exceed
the rate authorized by the voters unless such increase shall be similarly
approved.

(2)(a)
In the event a metropolitan municipal corporation shall impose a sales and use
tax pursuant to this chapter no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area
authority, or county transportation authority wholly within such metropolitan
municipal corporation shall be empowered to levy and/or collect taxes pursuant
to RCW 35.58.273, 35.95.040, and/or 82.14.045, but nothing herein shall prevent
such city or county from imposing sales and use taxes pursuant to any other
authorization.

(b)
In the event a county transportation authority shall impose a sales and use tax
pursuant to this section, no city, county which has created an unincorporated
transportation benefit area, public transportation benefit area, or
metropolitan municipal corporation, located within the territory of the
authority, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW 35.58.273,
35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(c)
In the event a public transportation benefit area shall impose a sales and use
tax pursuant to this section, no city, county which has created an
unincorporated transportation benefit area, or metropolitan municipal corporation,
located wholly or partly within the territory of the public transportation
benefit area, shall be empowered to levy or collect taxes pursuant to RCW
35.58.273, 35.95.040, or 82.14.045.

(3)
Any local sales and use tax revenue collected pursuant to this section by any
city or by any county for transportation purposes pursuant to RCW 36.57.100 and
36.57.110 shall not be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the
purposes of apportionment and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter
82.44 RCW, of the proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized pursuant
to RCW 35.58.273, except that the local sales and use tax revenue collected
under this section by a city with a population greater than sixty thousand that
as of January 1, 1998, owns and operates a municipal public transportation
system shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for the purposes of
apportionment and distribution, in the manner prescribed by chapter 82.44 RCW,
of the proceeds of the motor vehicle excise tax authorized under RCW 35.58.273
as follows:

(a)
For fiscal year 2000, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 25 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273;

(b)
For fiscal year 2001, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 50 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273;

(c)
For fiscal year 2002, revenues collected under this section shall be counted as
locally generated tax revenues for up to 75 percent of the tax collected under
RCW 35.58.273; and

(d)
For fiscal year 2003 and thereafter, revenues collected under this section
shall be counted as locally generated tax revenues for up to 100 percent of the
tax collected under RCW 35.58.273.

Sec.
305. RCW
82.14.0485 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county with a population of one million or more
may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter.
The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected
from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12
RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county: PROVIDED,
That this sales and use tax does not apply to electrical service. The rate
of tax shall not exceed 0.017 percent of the selling price in the case of a
sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by a county to
construct a baseball stadium.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before January 1, 1996, and no tax
may be collected under this section unless the taxes under RCW 82.14.360 are
being collected. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds
issued for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more
than twenty years after the tax is first collected.

(5)
As used in this section, "baseball stadium" means a baseball stadium
with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy, together with associated
parking facilities, constructed in the largest city in a county with a
population of one million or more.

Sec.
306. RCW
82.14.0494 and 1997 c 220 s 204 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county that has created a public stadium
authority to develop a stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county: PROVIDED, That this
sales and use tax does not apply to electrical service. The rate of tax
shall be 0.016 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value
of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Before the issuance of bonds in RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues collected on
behalf of the county under this section shall be transferred to the public
stadium authority. After bonds are issued under RCW 43.99N.020, all revenues
collected on behalf of the county under this section shall be deposited in the
stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060.

(4)
The definitions in RCW 36.102.010 apply to this section.

(5)
This section expires on the earliest of the following dates:

(a)
December 31, 1999, if the conditions for issuance of bonds under RCW 43.99N.020
have not been met before that date;

(b)
The date on which all bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 have been retired; or

(c)
Twenty-three years after the date the tax under this section is first imposed.

Sec.
307. RCW
82.14.370 and 1998 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a distressed county may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the county: PROVIDED, That this sales and use tax
shall not apply to electrical service. The rate of tax shall not exceed
0.04 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the
article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing public facilities in rural counties.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5)
For purposes of this section, "distressed county" means a county in
which the average level of unemployment for the three years before the year in
which a tax is first imposed under this section exceeds the average state
unemployment for those years by twenty percent.

Sec.
308. RCW
81.104.170 and 1997 c 450 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities
that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities, metropolitan
municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, and regional
transit authorities may submit an authorizing proposition to the voters and if
approved by a majority of persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter, solely for the purpose of providing
high capacity transportation service.

The
tax authorized pursuant to this section shall be in addition to ((the tax
authorized by RCW 82.14.030)) any other taxes authorized by law and
shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state pursuant to
chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within
the taxing district. The maximum rate of such tax shall be approved by the
voters and shall not exceed one percent of the selling price (in the case of a
sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax). The
maximum rate of such tax that may be imposed shall not exceed nine‑tenths
of one percent in any county that imposes a tax under RCW 82.14.340, or within
a regional transit authority if any county within the authority imposes a tax
under RCW 82.14.340. The exemptions in RCW 82.08.820 and 82.12.820 are for the
state portion of the sales and use tax and do not extend to the tax authorized
in this section.

PART
IV

STATE
PUBLIC UTILITY TAX

Sec.
401. RCW
82.16.010 and 1996 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:

(1)
"Railroad business" means the business of operating any railroad, by
whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire. It shall not, however, include any business herein defined
as an urban transportation business.

(2)
"Express business" means the business of carrying property for public
hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state, when such common
carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.

(3)
"Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock cars,
furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank cars,
sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any other kinds of
cars used for transportation of property or persons upon the line of any
railroad operated in this state when such railroad is not owned or leased by
the person engaging in such business.

(4)
"Water distribution business" means the business of operating a plant
or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.

(5)
(("Light and power business" means the business of operating a
plant or system for the generation, production or distribution of electrical
energy for hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of electricity for others.

(6)))
"Telegraph business" means the business of affording telegraphic
communication for hire.

(((7)))
(6) "Gas distribution business" means the business of
operating a plant or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale
of gas, whether manufactured or natural.

(((8)))
(7) "Motor transportation business" means the business (except
urban transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle by
which persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and includes, but is
not limited to, the operation of any motor propelled vehicle as an auto
transportation company (except urban transportation business), common carrier
or contract carrier as defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010: PROVIDED, That
"motor transportation business" shall not mean or include the
transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon private roads
or private highways.

(((9)))
(8) "Urban transportation business" means the business of
operating any vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property
for hire, insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of any
city or town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof, or (b)
operating entirely within and between cities and towns whose corporate limits
are not more than five miles apart or within five miles of the corporate limits
of either thereof. Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is
the business of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the
business of operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such
services the collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined
to a point within or without the state, whether or not such collection or
distribution be made by the person performing a local or interstate line-haul
of such property.

(((10)))
(9) "Public service business" means any of the businesses
defined in ((subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9)))
this section or any business subject to control by the state, or having
the powers of eminent domain and the duties incident thereto, or any business
hereafter declared by the legislature to be of a public service nature, except
telephone business as defined in RCW 82.04.065, electrical service, and
low-level radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined in RCW
81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope hereof:
Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge, toll
logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.

(((11)))
(10) "Tugboat business" means the business of operating
tugboats, towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of
vessels, barges or rafts for hire.

(((12)))
(11) "Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing
from the performance of the particular public service or transportation
business involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any
deduction on account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold, the cost
of materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or
any other expense whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on
account of losses.

(((13)))
(12) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term "tax
year," "person," "value proceeding or accruing,"
"business," "engaging in business," "in this
state," "within this state," "cash discount," "electrical
service," and "successor" shall apply equally in the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
402. RCW
82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected from every person a tax for the
act or privilege of engaging within this state in any one or more of the
businesses herein mentioned. The tax shall be equal to the gross income of the
business, multiplied by the rate set out after the business, as follows:

(a)
Express, sewerage collection, and telegraph businesses: Three and six-tenths
percent;

(b)
((Light and power business: Three and sixty-two one-hundredths percent;

(c))) Gas
distribution business: Three and six-tenths percent;

(((d)))
(c) Urban transportation business: Six-tenths of one percent;

(((e)))
(d) Vessels under sixty-five feet in length, except tugboats, operating
upon the waters within the state: Six-tenths of one percent;

(((f)))
(e) Motor transportation, railroad, railroad car, and tugboat
businesses, and all public service businesses other than ones mentioned above:
One and eight-tenths of one percent;

(((g)))
(f) Water distribution business: Four and seven-tenths percent.

(2)
An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030
multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Twenty percent of the moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section on
water distribution businesses and sixty percent of the moneys collected under
subsection (1) of this section on sewerage collection businesses shall be
deposited in the public works assistance account created in RCW 43.155.050.

Sec.
403. RCW
82.16.050 and 1994 c 124 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

In
computing tax there may be deducted from the gross income the following items:

(1)
Amounts derived by municipally owned or operated public service businesses,
directly from taxes levied for the support or maintenance thereof: PROVIDED,
That this section shall not be construed to exempt service charges which are
spread on the property tax rolls and collected as taxes;

(2)
Amounts derived from the sale of commodities to persons in the same public
service business as the seller, for resale as such within this state. This
deduction is allowed only with respect to water distribution, ((light and
power,)) gas distribution, or other public service businesses which
furnish water, ((electrical energy,)) gas, or any other commodity
in the performance of public service businesses;

(3)
Amounts actually paid by a taxpayer to another person taxable under this
chapter as the latter's portion of the consideration due for services furnished
jointly by both, if the total amount has been credited to and appears in the
gross income reported for tax by the former;

(4)
The amount of cash discount actually taken by the purchaser or customer;

(5)
The amount of credit losses actually sustained by taxpayers whose regular books
of accounts are kept upon an accrual basis;

(6)
Amounts derived from business which the state is prohibited from taxing under
the Constitution of this state or the Constitution or laws of the United
States;

(7)
Amounts derived from the distribution of water through an irrigation system,
for irrigation purposes;

(8)
Amounts derived from the transportation of commodities from points of origin in
this state to final destination outside this state, or from points of origin
outside this state to final destination in this state, with respect to which
the carrier grants to the shipper the privilege of stopping the shipment in
transit at some point in this state for the purpose of storing, manufacturing,
milling, or other processing, and thereafter forwards the same commodity, or
its equivalent, in the same or converted form, under a through freight rate
from point of origin to final destination; and amounts derived from the
transportation of commodities from points of origin in the state to an export
elevator, wharf, dock or ship side on tidewater or navigable tributaries
thereto from which such commodities are forwarded, without intervening
transportation, by vessel, in their original form, to interstate or foreign
destinations: PROVIDED, That no deduction will be allowed when the point of
origin and the point of delivery to such an export elevator, wharf, dock, or
ship side are located within the corporate limits of the same city or town;

(9)
((Amounts derived from the production, sale, or transfer of electrical
energy for resale or consumption outside the state;

(10)))
Amounts derived from the distribution of water by a nonprofit water association
and used for capital improvements by that nonprofit water association;

(((11)))
(10) Amounts paid by a sewerage collection business taxable under RCW
82.16.020(1)(a) to a person taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW for the treatment
or disposal of sewage.

Sec.
404. RCW
82.16.090 and 1988 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
customer billing issued by a ((light or power business or)) gas
distribution business that serves a total of more than twenty thousand
customers and operates within the state shall include the following
information:

(1)
The rates and amounts of taxes paid directly by the customer upon products or
services rendered by the ((light and power business or)) gas
distribution business; and

(2)
The rate, origin and approximate amount of each tax levied upon the revenue of
the ((light and power business or)) gas distribution business and added
as a component of the amount charged to the customer. Taxes based upon revenue
of the ((light and power business or)) gas distribution business to be
listed on the customer billing need not include taxes levied by the federal
government or taxes levied under chapters 54.28, 80.24, or 82.04 RCW.

PART
V

CITY LICENSE
FEES AND BUSINESS TAXES

Sec.
501. RCW
35.21.710 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Any city which imposes a license fee or tax upon business activities consisting
of the making of retail sales of tangible personal property or electrical
service which are measured by gross receipts or gross income from such
sales, shall impose such tax at a single uniform rate upon all such business
activities. The taxing authority granted to cities for taxes upon business
activities measured by gross receipts or gross income from sales shall not
exceed a rate of .0020; except ((that)) as provided in this section
or RCW 35.21.711. Any city with an adopted ordinance at a higher rate, as
of January 1, 1982 shall be limited to a maximum increase of ten percent of the
January 1982 rate, not to exceed an annual incremental increase of two percent
of current rate: PROVIDED, That any adopted ordinance which classifies
according to different types of business or services shall be subject to both
the ten percent and the two percent annual incremental increase limitation on
each tax rate: PROVIDED FURTHER, That all surtaxes on business and occupation
classifications in effect as of January 1, 1982, shall expire no later than
December 31, 1982, or by expiration date established by local ordinance.

(b)(i)
Any city that imposed, as of July 1, 1997, a license fee or tax upon business
activities consisting of making retail sales of electrical service with a rate
exceeding the rate allowed under (a) of this subsection, may continue to impose
a license fee or tax upon those businesses at a rate not exceeding the rate
imposed on July 1, 1997.

(ii)
A city imposing a license fee or tax under this subsection (1)(b) shall allow a
credit against such license fee or tax for the full amount of any sales or use
tax imposed by the city or any other city or county under section 301 of this
act upon the same taxable event. A credit under this subsection shall never
reduce the license fee or tax to less than zero.

(iii)
A license fee or tax imposed under this subsection (1)(b) shall expire six
years after it is first imposed, unless extended for up to six years by
referendum submitted to the voters of the city imposing the tax. A license fee
or tax extended by referendum may be extended for additional periods, not
exceeding six years each, by additional referenda.

(2)
Cities which impose a license fee or tax upon business activities consisting of
the making of retail sales of tangible personal property or electrical
service which are measured by gross receipts or gross income from such
sales, shall be required to submit an annual report to the state auditor
identifying the rate established and the revenues received from each fee or
tax. This section shall not apply to any business activities subject to the
tax imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW.

(3)
For purposes of this section, the providing to consumers of competitive
telephone service, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, shall be deemed to be the
retail sale of tangible personal property.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "electrical service" is defined as
provided in chapter 82.04 RCW.

Sec.
502. RCW
35.21.711 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
qualified voters of any city or town may by majority vote approve rates in
excess of the provisions of RCW 35.21.710(1)(a).

Sec.
503. RCW
35.21.860 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or charge of
whatever nature or description upon the ((light and power, or)) gas
distribution businesses, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, ((or)) the
telephone business, as defined in RCW 82.04.065, or the business of
providing electrical service as defined in section 101 of this act, except
that (a) a tax ((authorized)) as limited by RCW 35.21.865 and
35.21.870 may be imposed ((and)) on gas distribution and
telephone businesses, (b) a tax as limited by RCW 35.21.710 may be
imposed on electrical service business, and (c) a fee may be charged to
such businesses that recovers actual administrative expenses incurred by a city
or town that are directly related to receiving and approving a permit, license,
and franchise, to inspecting plans and construction, or to the preparation of a
detailed statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees imposed on ((an
electrical energy,)) a natural gas((,)) or telephone
business, by contract existing on April 20, 1982, with a city or town, for the
duration of the contract, but the franchise fees shall be considered taxes for the
purposes of the limitations established in RCW 35.21.865 and 35.21.870 to the
extent the fees exceed the costs allowable under subsection (1) of this
section.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees imposed on
businesses providing electrical services by contract existing on April 20,
1982, with a city or town, for the duration of the contract, but to the extent
the fees exceed the costs allowable under subsection (1) of this section, the
combined rate of a franchise fee, a tax under section 301 of this act, and a
tax under RCW 35.21.710 imposed by the city shall not exceed the greater of:
(a) The total rate of franchise fee and license fee or tax imposed by the city
upon businesses providing electrical services on July 1, 1997; or (b) five and
five-tenths percent plus the rate in effect under RCW 35.21.710(1)(a) or
35.21.711.

Sec.
504. RCW
35.21.865 and 1983 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

No
city or town may change the rate of tax it imposes on the privilege of
conducting ((an electrical energy,)) a natural gas((,)) or
telephone business which change applies to business activities occurring before
the effective date of the change, and no rate change may take effect before the
expiration of sixty days following the enactment of the ordinance establishing
the change except as provided in RCW 35.21.870.

Sec.
505. RCW
35.21.870 and 1984 c 225 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No city or town may impose a tax on the privilege of conducting ((an
electrical energy,)) a natural gas, steam energy, or telephone
business at a rate which exceeds six percent unless the rate is first approved
by a majority of the voters of the city or town voting on such a proposition.

(2)
If a city or town is imposing a rate of tax under subsection (1) of this
section in excess of six percent on April 20, 1982, the city or town shall decrease
the rate to a rate of six percent or less by reducing the rate each year on or
before November 1st by ordinances to be effective on January 1st of the
succeeding year, by an amount equal to one-tenth the difference between the tax
rate on April 20, 1982, and six percent.

Nothing
in this subsection prohibits a city or town from reducing its rates by amounts
greater than the amounts required in this subsection.

Voter
approved rate increases under subsection (1) of this section shall not be
included in the computations under this subsection.

Sec.
506. RCW
35A.82.050 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
code city which imposes a license fee or tax upon business activities
consisting of the making of retail sales of tangible personal property or
electrical service, which are measured by gross receipts or gross income
from such sales, ((shall impose such tax at a single uniform rate upon all
such business activities. This section shall not apply to any business
activities subject to the tax imposed by chapter 82.16 RCW. For purposes of
this section, the providing to consumers of competitive telephone service, as
defined in RCW 82.04.065, shall be deemed to be the retail sale of tangible
personal property)) is subject to RCW 35.21.710 through 35.21.715.

PART
VI

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.16.053 (Deductions in computing tax--Light and power
businesses) and 1996 c 145 s 1 & 1994 c 236 s 1; and

(2) RCW
82.16.055 (Deductions relating to energy conservation or
production from renewable resources) and 1980 c 149 s 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---