BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may, upon receipt of approval from the federal health care financing
administration, implement a waiver under section 1115 of the federal social
security act to provide family planning services to persons with family incomes
at or below two hundred percent of the federal poverty level. For purposes of
this section, family planning services includes all federal food and drug
administration-approved contraceptives, sterilization services, and medical
services associated with use of contraceptive and sterilization services,
educational services, social services, and interpretive services necessary to
aid individuals to avoid unintended pregnancy.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.09.510 and 1997 c 59 s 14 and 1997 c 58 s 201 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Medical
assistance may be provided in accordance with eligibility

requirements established by the department, as defined in the social
security Title XIX state plan for mandatory categorically needy persons and:
(1) Individuals who would be eligible for cash assistance except for their
institutional status; (2) individuals who are under twenty-one years of age,
who would be eligible for temporary assistance for needy families or
medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent children and who are in (a) foster
care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing facility or an intermediate care
facility for the mentally retarded, or (d) inpatient psychiatric facilities;
(3) the aged, blind, and disabled who: (a) Receive only a state supplement, or
(b) would not be eligible for cash assistance if they were not
institutionalized; (4) categorically eligible individuals who meet the income
and resource requirements of the cash assistance programs; (5) individuals who
are enrolled in managed health care systems, who have otherwise lost
eligibility for medical assistance, but who have not completed a current
six-month enrollment in a managed health care system, and who are eligible for
federal financial participation under Title XIX of the social security act; (6)
children and pregnant women allowed by federal statute for whom funding is
appropriated; (7) other individuals eligible for medical services under RCW
74.09.035 ((and)), 74.09.700, and section 1 of this act
for whom federal financial participation is available under Title XIX of the
social security act; and (8) persons allowed by section 1931 of the social
security act for whom funding is appropriated.

---
END ---