BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the increasing incidence of concurrent involvement of
family members in multiple areas of the justice system. Analysis shows
significant case overlap in the case types of juvenile offender, juvenile
dependency, at-risk youth, child in need of services, truancy, domestic
violence, and domestic relations. Also recognized is the increased complexity
of the problems facing family members and the increased complexity of the laws
affecting families. It is believed that in such situations, an efficient and
effective response is through the creation of a unified court system centered
around the family that: Provides a dedicated, trained, and informed judiciary;
incorporates case management practices based on a family's judicial system
needs; enables multiple case type resolution by one judicial officer or
judicial team; provides coordinated legal and social services; and
considers and evaluates the needs of the family as a whole.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
administrator for the courts shall conduct a unified family court pilot
program.

(1)
Pilot program sites shall be selected through a request for proposal process,
and shall be established in a superior court judicial district with a
statutorily authorized judicial complement of at least five judges.

(2)
The administrator for the courts shall develop criteria for the unified family
court pilot program. The pilot program shall include: (a) All case types
under Title 13 RCW, chapters 26.09, 26.10, 26.12, 26.18, 26.19, 26.20, 26.26,
26.50, 26.27, and 28A.225 RCW;

(b)
Unified family court judicial officers, who volunteer for the program, and meet
training requirements established by local court rule;

(c)
Case management practices that provide a flexible response to the diverse
court-related needs of families involved in multiple areas of the justice
system. Case management practices should result in a reduction in process
redundancies and an efficient use of time and resources, and create a system
enabling multiple case type resolution by one judicial officer or judicial
team;

(d)
A court facilitator to provide assistance to parties with matters before the
unified family court; and

(e)
An emphasis on providing nonadversarial methods of dispute resolution such as a
settlement conference, evaluative mediation by attorney mediators, and
facilitative mediation by nonattorney mediators.

(3)
The office of the administrator for the courts shall publish and disseminate a
state-approved listing of definitions of nonadversarial methods of dispute
resolution so that court officials, practitioners, and users can choose the
most appropriate process for the matter at hand.

(4)
The office of the administrator for the courts shall provide to the judicial
district selected for the pilot program the computer resources needed to
implement the unified family court pilot program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
judges of the superior court judicial district with the unified family court
pilot program shall adopt local court rules directing the program. The local
court rules shall comply with the criteria established by the administrator for
the courts and shall include:

(1)
A requirement that all judicial officers hearing cases in unified family court:

(a)
Complete an initial training program including the topic areas of childhood
development, domestic violence, cultural awareness, child abuse and neglect,
chemical dependency, and mental illness; and

(b)
Subsequent to the training in (a) of this subsection, annually attend a minimum
of eight hours of continuing education of pertinence to the unified family
court;

(2)
Case management that is based on the practice of one judge or judicial team
handling all matters relating to a family;

(3)
An emphasis on coordinating or consolidating, to the extent possible, all cases
before the unified family court relating to a family;

(4)
Programs that collect and report to the Washington state institute for public
policy all information specified by the administrator for the courts or the
institute for public policy; and

(5)
Programs that provide for record confidentiality to protect the confidentiality
of court records in accordance with the law. However law enforcement agencies
shall have access to the records to the extent permissible under the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The legislature finds that it is critical to evaluate the effectiveness of the
pilot project for purposes of measuring improvements in the judicial system's
response to family involvement in the judicial system. To accomplish this
evaluation, the Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a
study of the pilot program in accordance with guidelines and criteria
established by the office of the administrator for the courts.

(2)
The Washington institute for public policy shall report preliminary findings
and final results of the study to the governor, the chief justice of the
supreme court, and the legislature on a biennial basis. The initial report is
due by July 1, 2000, and the final report is due by December 1, 2004.

Sec.
5. RCW
10.14.200 and 1995 c 246 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

Any order available under this chapter may be issued in actions
under chapter 13.32A, 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26 RCW. An order available
under this chapter that is issued under those chapters shall be fully
enforceable and shall be enforced pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
6. RCW
13.04.021 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 538 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The juvenile court shall be a division of the superior court. In judicial
districts having more than one judge of the superior court, the judges of such
court shall annually assign one or more of their number to the juvenile court
division. In any judicial district having a court commissioner, the court
commissioner shall have the power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with
a juvenile court judge, to hear all cases under this chapter and to enter
judgment and make orders with the same power, force, and effect as any judge of
the juvenile court, subject to motion or demand by any party within ten days
from the entry of the order or judgment by the court commissioner as provided
in RCW 2.24.050. In any judicial district having a family law commissioner
appointed pursuant to chapter 26.12 RCW, the family law commissioner shall have
the power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with a juvenile court judge,
to hear cases ((under chapter 13.34 RCW or any other case)) under Title
13 RCW and chapter 28A.225 RCW as provided in RCW 26.12.010, and to
enter judgment and make orders with the same power, force, and effect as any
judge of the juvenile court, subject to motion or demand by any party within
ten days from the entry of the order or judgment by the court commissioner as
provided in RCW 2.24.050.

(2)
Cases in the juvenile court shall be tried without a jury.

Sec.
7. RCW
26.12.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 537 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Each superior court shall exercise the jurisdiction conferred by this chapter
and while sitting in the exercise of such jurisdiction shall be known and
referred to as the "family court." A family ((law)) court
proceeding under this chapter is: (1) Any proceeding under this title
or any proceeding in which the family court is requested to adjudicate or
enforce the rights of the parties or their children regarding the determination
or modification of parenting plans, child custody, visitation, or support, or
the distribution of property or obligations, or (2) concurrent with the
juvenile court, any proceeding under Title 13 or chapter 28A.225 RCW.

(((2)
Superior court judges of a county may by majority vote, grant to the family
court the power, authority, and jurisdiction, concurrent with the juvenile
court, to hear and decide cases under Title 13 RCW.))

Sec.
8. RCW
26.12.060 and 1993 c 289 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
court commissioners shall: (1) Make appropriate referrals to county family
court services program if the county has a family court services program or
appoint a guardian ad litem pursuant to RCW 26.12.175; (2) order investigation
and reporting of the facts upon which to base warrants, subpoenas, orders or
directions in actions or proceedings under this chapter; (3) exercise all the
powers and perform all the duties of court commissioners; (4) make written
reports of all proceedings had which shall become a part of the record of the
family court; (5) provide supervision over the exercise of its jurisdiction as
the judge of the family court may order; (6) cause the orders and findings of
the family court to be entered in the same manner as orders and findings are
entered in cases in the superior court; (7) cause other reports to be made and
records kept as will indicate the value and extent of reconciliation,
mediation, investigation, and treatment services; and (8) conduct hearings
under ((chapter 13.34 RCW)) Title 13 and chapter 28A.225 RCW, as
provided in RCW 13.04.021.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---