BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, tobacco products may not
be sold or distributed in those portions of buildings or vessels that are
publicly owned or leased.

(2)
A violation of this section is grounds for the termination or nonrenewal of a
contract for occupancy or rental of any area of any publicly owned or leased
building or vessel.

(3)
This section does not apply to correctional institutions. However, the secretary
of corrections or a local correctional institution authority may prohibit sales
and distributions of tobacco products if the prohibition applies equally to
employees and inmates.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.160 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not preempt local regulation of indoor smoking that is as
restrictive or more restrictive than this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---