BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that Washington state is experiencing a significant
shortage of quality foster homes and that the majority of children entering the
system are difficult to place due to their complex needs. The legislature
intends to provide additional assistance to those families willing to serve as
foster parents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
United States department of agriculture issued a report that shows the current
foster parent reimbursement rate of four hundred nine dollars per month per
child represents forty-three percent of the actual cost of providing such
care. The department of social and health services shall increase the basic
reimbursement rate for foster children by three dollars per child per day. The
department shall also annually review how the basic foster care rates meet the
need for providing such care.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of fifteen million three hundred thirty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the
department of social and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2000, to carry out the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---