BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that Washington state is experiencing a significant
shortage of quality foster homes and that the majority of children entering the
system are difficult to place due to their complex needs. The legislature
intends to provide additional assistance to those families willing to serve as
foster parents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services, in concert with community-based
organizations, shall develop a plan for a comprehensive respite care system for
children and families. In developing the plan, the department shall assess the
current system, review available research, evaluate program needs, and evaluate
program models. The comprehensive plan shall identify necessary and
appropriate respite services for families with children who are in foster care,
for adoptive families, for kinship placement families, and for families that
have children with alcohol or drug problems. The department shall submit the
plan to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives
by December 31, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of seventy thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the department of social and health
services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to carry out the purposes of
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---