BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that Washington state is experiencing a significant
shortage of quality foster homes and that the majority of children entering the
system are difficult to place due to their complex needs. The legislature
intends to provide additional assistance to those families willing to serve as
foster parents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Foster parents are required to complete first aid/CPR and HIV/AIDS training to
become licensed. The department of social and health services may waive the
first aid/CPR training if the foster parent has current certification or has
professional background in this area. The department may waive the HIV/AIDS
training if the foster parent has completed HIV/AIDS training in the last five
years or has professional or educational background in this area. The cost of
this mandatory training is a financial barrier for some people who consider
becoming a foster parent. The department of social and health services shall
provide all new and current foster parents with first aid/CPR and HIV/AIDS
training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---