BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that:

(1)
Article I, section 16 of the state Constitution promises protection of the
people's rights in their private property by providing that "No private
property shall be taken or damaged for public or private use without just
compensation having been first made." This act is intended to avoid the
damaging of private property by regulation and provide a practical remedy when
private property is damaged by government regulation;

(2)
The Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution's guarantee that private
property shall not be taken for public use without just compensation was
designed to bar government from forcing some people alone to bear public
burdens which in all fairness and justice should be borne by the public as a
whole;

(3)
The private right to own, possess, and use private property is a fundamental
civil right and an essential feature of living in a free society;

(4)
The public has an interest in protecting natural, environmental, and aesthetic
resources. The public desire to provide such public amenities should be
supported by public funds;

(5)
The cumulative reduction in the value of private property rendered practically
unusable by government regulation limits the tax base and drives up the
property tax rates of others;

(6)
The economy of Washington state is harmed by uncompensated or unmitigated
restrictions on real property by reducing the net worth of privately held real
estate which could be used productively in creating businesses and jobs for
Washington citizens;

(7)
The crucial goal of making housing affordable has been hampered by restrictions
on the use of land which reduce the supply of viable building sites by driving
up the price of such sites;

(8)
Many restrictions on land use exist to protect environmental considerations
which, due to the lack of protection over the decades, has resulted in negative
cumulative impacts of land use on the environment. Fairness and justice
require that the public, which cumulatively over time has contributed to
negative environmental impacts, pay the costs of providing remedies, rather
than forcing a few members of society to pay for the necessary remedies; and

(9)
This act is necessary to ensure that when the public desires natural,
environmental, scenic, or aesthetic values on private property which leave the
owner of the private property owner with no practical use of any portion of
private property, the public will either mitigate the damage to the private
property owner caused by restrictions on land use or provide compensation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Compensation" means remuneration which equals the reduction in the
fair market value of private real property that is attributable to a
restriction on the use of the property or any part thereof.

(2)
"Government entity" means Washington state, state agencies, agencies
and commissions funded, in whole or in part, by the state, counties, cities,
towns, special districts, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal
corporations.

(3)
"Impose" means for an official or employee of a government entity to
apply a restriction on land use to a particular piece of real property in
response to the property owner's use or project permit application under
chapter 36.70B RCW.

(4)
"Real property" means any interest in real property recognized under
Washington law, including water, crops, forest products, minerals, or other
natural resources.

(5)
"Reasonable economically beneficial or productive uses" are uses of
property which are more than nominal or passive and which are proportionate to
the owner's reasonable economic expectations in light of the historically
permitted uses of the property and property within the same general area as the
subject property in addition to any other factors relating to reasonable expectations.

(6)
"Restriction" or "restricting" means a limitation,
requirement, regulation, or restriction by a government entity that limits the
use of real property, including those imposed by the application of ordinances,
resolutions, rules, regulations, policies, statutes, and conditions of land use
approval.

(7)
"Unreasonable use of real property" means use of real property that a
reasonable person in the community where the real property is located would
consider unreasonable in light of the historically permitted uses of the
subject real property and of similar real property within the same general area
as the subject real property. This definition is intended to include all
actions that constitute nuisances under common law.

(8)
"Land use legislation" means any plan, ordinance, resolution, policy,
or rule which has general application and which is adopted by a local
government entity that restricts, or authorizes restrictions on the use of all
or a portion of the private real property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Except in cases of emergency that require the imposition of moratoria or
prohibitions on development that are effective for a period not to exceed sixty
days to protect life or prevent physical damage to property, land use
legislation may be enacted after the effective date of this section only after
the procedural requirements of this section have been followed.

(2)
A government entity may not enact land use legislation without holding a public
hearing on the proposed land use legislation. The required public hearing may
be held by the governing body, a planning commission, or both. Notice of the
public hearing shall be published at least thirty and not more than forty days
in advance of the public hearing in the most widely circulated newspaper in the
jurisdiction of the government entity, with the advertisement intentionally
designed to attract public attention. The advertisement shall be of a size no
smaller than four inches by four inches and shall be placed consistently in the
same section or location in the paper other than with classified
advertisements. The published notice must notify readers of the following:

(a)
A general description of the proposed land use legislation;

(b)
The time, date, and location of the public hearing for consideration of the
proposed land use legislation;

(c)
Where members of the public may inspect the text of the proposed land use
legislation;

(d)
All of the purposes of the proposed land use legislation;

(e)
The right of persons to propose alternatives to the proposed land use
legislation which must be submitted in writing prior to the public hearing; and

(f)
The obligation of the government entity to respond to each alternative in
writing.

(3)
Any person affected by the proposed legislation may offer alternatives to the
proposed legislation to fulfill the stated purposes. Alternatives must be
submitted in writing prior to the public hearing required by subsection (2) of
this section. Prior to the adoption of the land use legislation, the
government entity must consider all proposed alternatives and must respond in
writing stating the reason or reasons each alternative was rejected or accepted
in whole or in part. These written responses must be made available to the
public.

(4)
The county treasurer must include with each property tax statement required
under RCW 84.56.050 a statement identifying the dates during the following year
at which notices required by subsection (2) of this section will be published
on behalf of all government entities within the county. The statement must
also identify the paper in which the notice will be published. The county
treasurer may adopt a reasonable timeline and fee applicable to government
entities to cover the cost of submitting the information required for inclusion
in this statement.

(5)
Any resident or real property owner subject to the land use legislation may
enforce the requirements under this section in the superior court in the county
where the government entity is located by filing a petition for a writ of
prohibition pursuant to chapter 7.16 RCW, prohibiting the adoption,
implementation, or enforcement of the land use legislation without complying
with the procedural requirements of this section. In enforcing this section,
the superior court may only consider whether the government entity complied
with the procedural requirements of this section, but may not substitute its
judgment for the judgment of the government entity in deciding to enact the
proposed land use legislation or in deciding to reject or accept alternatives.

(6)
This section does not preclude any action at law or equity that a real property
owner would have had if this chapter had not been enacted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
If a government entity imposes a restriction on the use of any portion of real
property and that restriction damages the property by decreasing the fair market
value of the real property by either precluding an existing or previously
existing use, which is not an unreasonable use of property, or precluding
substantially all reasonable economically beneficial or productive uses of any
portion of private real property, then the government entity shall:

(a)
Pay compensation to the owner of a parcel of real property; or

(b)
With the property owner's consent, mitigate the damage to the real property
caused by the restriction by using methods of mitigation which include, but are
not limited to, those recognized in RCW 36.70A.070(5) and 36.70A.090, such as:

(i)
Adjusting landing development or permit standards, such as clustering;

(ii)
Increasing or modifying the density, intensity, or use of areas of development;

(iii)
Allowing transfer development rights; or

(iv)
Exchanging surplus property owned by the government entity.

(2)
The mitigation or compensation requirement in subsection (1) of this section
does not apply when:

(a)
The restriction only prevents, mitigates, or abates injuries to another person
or property that the government entity is able to demonstrate are likely to be
directly caused by an unreasonable use of the real property; or

(b)
The restriction:

(i)
Is part of a zoning ordinance common to the area surrounding the real property;

(ii)
Creates limitations that burden every parcel of real property with the same
zoning designation equally, including property line set back restrictions and
building height limitations, but not including set back restrictions which vary
based on the particular natural environmental conditions of the real property,
such as buffers for wetlands or wildlife habitat; and

(iii)
In effect compensates all property owners subject to the restrictions by the
reciprocal nature of the restrictions; or

(c)
Federal law mandates the imposition of the restriction.

(3)
The state is responsible for compensation and costs awarded when other
government entities impose a restriction on the use of real property that is
mandated by state law or a state agency. When a state-mandated restriction
falls within the jurisdiction of a state agency, payment of compensation must
be from the operating funds appropriated to the agency. Agencies paying
compensation and costs under this section shall report all payments to the
office of financial management within five days of payment.

(4)
An award or payment of compensation under this section shall operate to grant
to and vest in any government entity that pays compensation the right, title,
and interest in the property for which the compensation has been paid and, upon
receipt of the compensation, the property owner shall deliver to the government
entity a deed to the property interest taken by the restriction. If the real
property owner and government entity cannot agree, the superior court shall
determine the interest that accurately represents the real property interest
which has been purchased by the government entity, such as a conservation
easement or fee title, and determine the form of the deed to be delivered.
Filing of the deed is at the government entity's expense and the government
entity shall refund any property taxes the owner pays for the property
transferred after the date the restriction was imposed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A
real property owner seeking to enforce the requirements under section 4 of this
act must request compensation from the government entity imposing the
restriction by filing a written request for compensation that identifies the
restriction at issue and specifies the level of compensation or type of
mitigation requested. A real property owner is not required to pursue any
other administrative remedies relating to use or a pending request for a permit
to use the real property in any particular manner to establish a justiciable
claim under this chapter.

(2)
The government entity has thirty days to reject or accept a real property
owner's request for compensation under subsection (1) of this section. The
government entity may choose not to impose the restriction, to grant a variance
from the restriction, to pay compensation, to offer to mitigate the burden
caused by the imposition of the restriction, or any combination of these
options.

(3)
The requirements under section 4 of this act may be enforced in superior court against
a government entity by the owner of real property subject to the restriction
within the time period established in RCW 4.16.100. Property owners may also
raise any state or federal statutory or constitutional claims arising from the
government entity's imposition of the restriction or the decision to reject in
whole or in part the property owner's request for compensation. It is not
necessary for the restriction to be challenged under any other basis or for a
property owner to seek relief through any other process before a claim for
compensation can be made.

(4)
The superior court shall rule on all issues de novo and give no deference to
findings, if any, issued by the government entity relating to its compliance
with this chapter. Property owners are entitled to a jury trial on the amount
of compensation required under this chapter as in cases under eminent domain.
In calculating the amount of compensation to be paid, the court may consider
the value of mitigation offered by the government entity under section 4(1)(b)
of this act.

(5)
In defending against a claim for compensation, a government entity that intends
to rely on the exceptions set forth in section 4(2) of this act has the burden
to demonstrate by clear and convincing evidence that the restriction qualifies
as an exception and is exempt from the compensation requirement of this
chapter.

(6)
In defending against a claim for compensation filed in the superior court, a
government entity that intends to rely on section 4(4) of this act for
liability by the state, must join the state as a defendant within thirty days
of the service of the original complaint seeking compensation under this
chapter.

(7)
A prevailing plaintiff or petitioner is entitled to recover the costs incurred
in enforcing this chapter as provided in section 8 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act does not apply to actions by government entities in their exercise of the
power of eminent domain.

Sec.
7. RCW
4.16.100 and Code 1881 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
two years:

(1)
An action for libel, slander, assault, assault and battery, or false
imprisonment.

(2)
An action upon a statute for a forfeiture or penalty to the state.

(3)
An action under the private property protection act, chapter 64.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 6 and 9 through 11 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 4.84 RCW to read as follows:

A
prevailing plaintiff or petitioner is entitled to recover the costs incurred in
enforcing chapter 64.-- RCW (sections 1 through 6 and 9 through 11 of this
act), including reasonable attorneys' fees. A real property owner prevails
under section 4 of this act if he or she receives more compensation than
offered by the government entity under section 5(2) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
chapter may be known and cited as the private property protection act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
Section 3(4) of this act takes effect January 1, 2000.

(2)
The remainder of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect June 15, 1999, and applies prospectively
to restrictions imposed after that date.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 6 and 9 through 11 of this act shall constitute a new chapter
in Title 64 RCW.

---
END ---