BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Hepatitis C is the most prevalent infectious disease in prison, infecting
approximately forty percent of United States prison inmates;

(2)
Hepatitis C is a silent killer, being largely asymptomatic until irreversible
liver damage may have occurred;

(3)
Hepatitis C often leads to expensive medical treatment for chronic liver
disease, cirrhosis, liver cancer, liver transplants, or liver failure;

(4)
Hepatitis C currently infects approximately four million five hundred thousand
Americans and there are approximately thirty thousand new infections each year
in the United States;

(5)
Rates of hepatitis C infection in prisons are significantly higher than the
estimated 1.8 percent infection rate in the general population;

(6)
Inmates infected with hepatitis C present a risk of transmission through
blood-to-blood contact with fellow inmates, corrections officers, and the
broader community upon release;

(7)
With longer prison sentences, increasing portions of the prison population with
untreated hepatitis C infections may generate significant medical expenditures
for correctional systems for treatment of end stage liver disease; and

(8)
Screening, counseling, and early treatment of hepatitis C can be a
cost-effective alternative to the expensive treatment of chronic liver disease
and liver failure.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A new
section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall:

(1)
Provide appropriate hepatitis C testing, counseling, and treatment for inmates
and personnel, including:

(a)
Hepatitis C testing of all blood samples collected from incoming inmates upon
incarceration;

(b)
Hepatitis C testing upon request to current inmates and prison personnel, and
provision of notice of its availability along with information on the disease
to all prison inmates;

(c)
Testing using an initial screening test, and in cases where the initial test is
positive, one or more confirmatory tests;

(d)
Development of criteria for eligibility of inmates for hepatitis C treatment;

(e)
Development of protocols for hepatitis C treatment based on guidelines developed
by prison health care organizations and the community standard of care,
including provision of federal food and drug administration approved
combination therapy;

(f)
Notification of any inmate confirmed positive with hepatitis C virus of their
infection and provision to the inmate of information on criteria for treatment
and on availability of treatment;

(g)
Provision of treatment where appropriate based on the department's protocols;
and

(h)
Provision of ongoing follow-up testing to determine the impact of treatment on
the hepatitis C infection and to determine, after no less than three months of
treatment, whether to continue a full course of treatment or suspend treatment.

(2)
Provide professional training programs for corrections officers and other
prison personnel on currently understood risk factors, means of transmission,
detection, and treatment of hepatitis C.

(3)
Report detected hepatitis C cases to the department of health.

(4)
Report periodically to the department of health on the status of hepatitis C
infection for inmates likely to be released within two years to the community.

(5)
Provide to the legislature an annual statistical report on the prevalence of
hepatitis C infection by correctional facility and trends in incidence and prevalence
of hepatitis C infection in the correctional system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of corrections shall submit to the house of representatives criminal
justice and corrections committee and the senate human services and corrections
committee, by December 15, 1999, a report on how the department manages
hepatitis C in the inmate population. Included in the report will be how
inmates are educated about the disease, how and when they are offered testing,
how the disease is managed if an inmate is determined to have hepatitis C, and
an estimate of the number of inmates in the Washington prison system with
hepatitis C. The report must also include recommendations to the legislature
on ways to improve hepatitis C disease management and what level of funding
would be necessary to appropriately test for and treat the disease.

---
END ---