BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

It
is a violation of this chapter for a person knowingly to sponsor with actual
malice political advertising relating to a candidate that falsely represents
that a candidate is the incumbent for the office sought when in fact the
candidate is not the incumbent.

A
violation of this section thirty or fewer days before a primary or general
election is subject to double the maximum civil penalty provided for a
violation of this chapter under RCW 42.17.390.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

It
is a violation of this chapter for a person knowingly to sponsor with actual
malice political advertising relating to a candidate that falsely represents
that a candidate has the support or endorsement of any person or organization
when in fact the candidate does not have such support or endorsement.

A
violation of this section thirty or fewer days before a primary or general
election is subject to double the maximum civil penalty provided for a
violation of this chapter under RCW 42.17.390.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

It
is a violation of this chapter for a person knowingly to sponsor with actual
malice political advertising relating to a candidate that contains a false
statement of material fact calculated to benefit or harm a candidate's
campaign. Any violation of this section shall be proven by clear and
convincing evidence.

A
violation of this section thirty or fewer days before a primary or general
election is subject to double the maximum civil penalty provided for a
violation of this chapter under RCW 42.17.390.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
42.17.530 (False political advertising) and 1988 c 199 s 2 &
1984 c 216 s 3 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---