BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.630.885 and 1998 c 225 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington commission on student learning is hereby established. The
primary purposes of the commission are to identify the knowledge and skills all
public school students need to know and be able to do based on the student
learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, to develop student assessment and school
accountability systems, to review current school district data reporting
requirements and make recommendations on what data is necessary for the
purposes of accountability and meeting state information needs, and to take
other steps necessary to develop a performance-based education system. The
commission shall include three members of the state board of education, three
members appointed by the governor before July 1, 1992, and five members
appointed no later than June 1, 1993, by the governor elected in the November
1992 election. The governor shall appoint a chair from the commission members,
and fill any vacancies in gubernatorial appointments that may occur. The state
board of education shall fill any vacancies of state board of education
appointments that may occur. In making the appointments, educators, business
leaders, and parents shall be represented, and nominations from state-wide
education, business, and parent organizations shall be requested. Efforts
shall be made to ensure that the commission reflects the racial and ethnic
diversity of the state's K-12 student population and that the major geographic
regions in the state are represented. Appointees shall be qualified
individuals who are supportive of educational restructuring, who have a
positive record of service, and who will devote sufficient time to the
responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the objectives of the
commission are achieved.

(2)
The commission shall establish advisory committees. Membership of the advisory
committees shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, professionals from
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of
education, and other state and local educational practitioners and student
assessment specialists.

(3)
The commission, with the assistance of the advisory committees, shall:

(a)
Develop essential academic learning requirements based on the student learning
goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Essential academic learning requirements shall be
developed, to the extent possible, for each of the student learning goals in
RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. Essential
academic learning requirements for RCW 28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the
mathematics component of RCW 28A.150.210(2), goal two, shall be completed no
later than March 1, 1995. Essential academic learning requirements that
incorporate the remainder of RCW 28A.150.210 (2), (3), and (4), goals two,
three, and four, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1996. To the
maximum extent possible, the commission shall integrate goal four and the
knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the development of the
essential academic learning requirements;

(b)(i)
The commission shall present to the state board of education and superintendent
of public instruction a state-wide academic assessment system for use in the
elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each student
has mastered the essential academic learning requirements identified in (a) of
this subsection. The academic assessment system shall include a variety of
assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based
measures. Performance standards for determining if a student has successfully
completed an assessment shall be initially determined by the commission in
consultation with the advisory committees required in subsection (2) of this
section.

(ii)
The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the
assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional
practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who
have not mastered the essential academic learning requirements at the
appropriate periods in the student's educational development.

(iii)
Assessments measuring the essential academic learning requirements developed
for RCW 28A.150.210(1) and the mathematics component of RCW 28A.150.210(2)
referred to in this section as reading, writing, communications, and
mathematics shall be developed and initially implemented by the commission
before transferring the assessment system to the superintendent of public
instruction on June 30, 1999. The elementary assessments for reading, writing,
communications, and mathematics shall be available for use by school districts
no later than the 1996-97 school year, the middle school assessment no later than
the 1997-98 school year, and the high school assessment no later than the
1998-99 school year, unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment system and essential academic learning
requirements. Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements developed for the science component of RCW 28A.150.210(2) at the
middle school and high school levels shall be available for use by districts no
later than the 1998-99 school year unless the legislature takes action to delay
or prevent implementation of the assessment system and essential academic
learning requirements.

The
completed assessments and assessments still in development shall be transferred
to the superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 1999, unless the
legislature takes action to delay implementation of the assessment system and
essential academic learning requirements. The superintendent shall continue
the development of assessments on the following schedule: The history, civics,
and geography assessments at the middle and high school levels shall be
available for use by districts no later than the 2000-01 school year; the arts
assessment for middle and high school levels shall be available for use by
districts no later than the 2000-01 school year; and the health and fitness
assessments for middle and high school levels shall be available no later than
the 2001-02 school year. The elementary science assessment shall be available
for use by districts not later than the 2001-02 school year. The commission or
the superintendent, as applicable, shall upon request, provide opportunities
for the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to
review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential academic
learning requirements before the modifications are adopted. By December 15,
1998, the commission on student learning shall recommend to the appropriate
committees of the legislature a revised timeline for implementing these
assessments and when the school districts should be required to participate.
All school districts shall be required to participate in the history, civics,
geography, arts, health, fitness, and elementary science assessments in the
third year after the assessments are available to school districts.

To
the maximum extent possible, the commission shall integrate knowledge and skill
areas in development of the assessments.

(iv)
Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in
the essential academic learning requirements and assessments for goals one and
two. Before the 1997-98 school year, the elementary assessment system in
reading, writing, communications, and mathematics shall be optional. School
districts that desire to participate before the 1997-98 school year shall
notify the commission on student learning in a manner determined by the
commission. Beginning in the 1997-98 school year, school districts shall be
required to participate in the elementary assessment system for reading,
writing, communications, and mathematics. Before the 2000-01 school year,
participation by school districts in the middle school and high school
assessment system for reading, writing, communications, mathematics, and
science shall be optional. School districts that desire to participate before
the 1998-99 school year shall notify the commission on student learning in a
manner determined by the commission on student learning. Schools that desire
to participate after the 1998-99 school year, shall notify the superintendent
of public instruction in a manner determined by the superintendent. Beginning
in the 2000-01 school year, all school districts shall be required to
participate in the assessment system for reading, writing, communications,
mathematics, and science.

(v)
The commission on student learning may modify the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessments for reading, writing, communications,
mathematics, and science, as needed, before June 30, 1999. The commission
shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed
modifications to the essential academic learning requirements before the
modifications are adopted.

(vi)
The commission shall develop assessments that are directly related to the
essential academic learning requirements, and are not biased toward persons
with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis
of gender;

(c)
((After a determination is made by)) (i) No later than the date by
which each subject matter assessment is required state-wide, the state
board of education ((that)) shall determine whether the high
school assessment ((system)) has been implemented and ((that)) if
it is sufficiently reliable and valid((,)). From the time the board
makes the determination until (c)(ii) of this subsection becomes mandatory,
school districts may offer a certificate of academic proficiency to any student
who successfully completes the required high school assessments.

(ii)
Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, successful completion of the high
school assessments ((shall lead to a certificate of mastery)) in
reading, writing, communications, mathematics, and science shall meet the requirements
for a certificate of academic proficiency. Successful completion of the high
school assessments in arts and health and fitness shall lead to an endorsement
on a student's diploma and transcript. Successful completion of the high
school social studies assessment may be required to achieve the certificate or
may lead to an endorsement on the high school diploma and transcript, as
determined by law. The certificate of ((mastery)) academic
proficiency shall be obtained by most students at about the age of sixteen,
and is evidence that the student has successfully ((mastered)) demonstrated
proficiency in the essential academic learning requirements during his or
her educational career. Beginning with the graduating class of 2008, the
achievement of a certificate of ((mastery)) academic
proficiency shall be required for graduation but shall not be the only
requirement for graduation. ((The commission shall make recommendations to
the state board of education regarding the relationship between the certificate
of mastery and high school graduation requirements.))

(iii)
Upon achieving the certificate of ((mastery, schools shall provide)) academic
proficiency, students shall be provided by schools with the
opportunity to pursue career and educational objectives through educational
pathways that emphasize integration of academic and vocational education.
Educational pathways may include, but are not limited to, programs such as
work-based learning, school-to-work transition, tech prep, vocational-technical
education, running start, and preparation for technical college, community
college, or university education. Any middle school, junior high school, or
high school using educational pathways shall ensure that all participating
students will continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary
to meet admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students shall
be allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice. Before accepting
a student into an educational pathway, the school shall inform the student's
parent of the pathway chosen, the opportunities available to the student
through the pathway, and the career objectives the student will have exposure
to while pursuing the pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the
opportunities available through the selected educational pathway shall be
provided with the opportunity to transfer the student to any other pathway
provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational pathways that
retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible to graduate,
and may not require students who transfer between pathways to complete pathway
requirements beyond the date the student is eligible to graduate.

(iv)
If a student fails to meet the high school assessment standard in a content
area required for the certificate of academic proficiency, the student may
retake the assessment at no cost to the student. A student who meets the
assessment standard in any content area may retake the assessment once at
student expense for the purpose of improving the student's proficiency level.
Any student who has met the standard but is retaking the assessment to improve
the student's proficiency level may not be charged more than the cost of
administering the assessment. Opportunities for students to retake the
assessments shall be provided at least once each year.

(v)
School districts shall designate on each student's official transcript whether
the student met the requirements for the certificate of academic proficiency
and the highest proficiency level attained by content area.

(vi)
As a local option, school districts may establish requirements in addition to
achievement of the certificate of academic proficiency for high school
graduation. The requirements may include, but need not be limited to,
community service, senior projects, Carnegie units, student portfolios, and
classroom-based assessments. However, this subsection shall not be construed
as modifying the requirements of (c)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(vii)
The state board of education shall not require students receiving private
education under chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter
28A.200 RCW to meet the requirements for the certificate of academic
proficiency or the essential academic learning requirements;

(d)
Consider methods to address the unique needs of special education students when
developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(e)
Consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when
developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(f)
Develop recommendations on the time, support, and resources, including
technical assistance, needed by schools and school districts to help students
achieve the essential academic learning requirements. These recommendations
shall include an estimate for the legislature, superintendent of public
instruction, and governor on the expected cost of implementing the academic
assessment system;

(g)
Develop recommendations for consideration by the higher education coordinating
board for adopting college and university entrance requirements for public
school students that are consistent with the essential academic learning
requirements and the certificate of ((mastery)) academic proficiency;

(h)
Review current school district data reporting requirements for the purposes of
accountability and meeting state information needs. The commission on student
learning shall report recommendations to the joint select committee on
education restructuring by September 15, 1996, on:

(i)
What data is necessary to compare how school districts are performing before
the essential academic learning requirements and the assessment system are
implemented with how school districts are performing after the essential
academic learning requirements and the assessment system are implemented; and

(ii)
What data is necessary pertaining to school district reports under the
accountability systems developed by the commission on student learning under
this section;

(i)
Recommend to the legislature, governor, state board of education, and
superintendent of public instruction:

(i)
A state-wide accountability system to monitor and evaluate accurately and
fairly at elementary, middle, and high schools the level of learning occurring
in individual schools and school districts with regard to the goals included in
RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The accountability system must assess each
school individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and schools state-wide. The system shall include school-site,
school district, and state-level accountability reports;

(ii)
A school assistance program to help schools and school districts that are
having difficulty helping students meet the essential academic learning
requirements as measured by performance on the elementary, middle school, and
high school assessments;

(iii)
A system to intervene in schools and school districts in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to learn the essential academic learning
requirements or meet the standards established for the elementary, middle
school, and high school assessments; and

(iv)
An awards program to provide incentives to school staff to help their students
learn the essential academic learning requirements, with each school being
assessed individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and the state-wide average. Incentives shall be based on the
rate of percentage change of students achieving the essential academic learning
requirements and progress on meeting the state-wide average. School staff
shall determine how the awards will be spent.

The
commission shall make recommendations regarding a state-wide accountability
system for reading in grades kindergarten through four by November 1, 1997.
Recommendations for an accountability system in the other subject areas and
grade levels shall be made no later than June 30, 1999;

(j)
Report annually by December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education on the
progress, findings, and recommendations of the commission; and

(k)
Make recommendations to the legislature and take other actions necessary or
desirable to help students meet the student learning goals.

(4)
The commission shall coordinate its activities with the state board of
education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5)
The commission shall seek advice broadly from the public and all interested
educational organizations in the conduct of its work, including holding
periodic regional public hearings.

(6)
The commission shall select an entity to provide staff support and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide administrative
oversight and be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter into
subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school districts,
teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and
other individuals and organizations to assist the commission in its
deliberations.

(7)
Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8)(((a)
By September 30, 1997, the commission on student learning, the state board of
education, and the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly present
recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate regarding the high school assessments, the certificate of mastery,
and high school graduation requirements.

In
preparing recommendations, the commission on student learning shall convene an
ad hoc working group to address questions, including:

(i)
What type of document shall be used to identify student performance and
achievement and how will the document be described?

(ii)
Should the students be required to pass the high school assessments in all
skill and content areas, or only in select skill and content areas, to
graduate?

(iii)
How will the criteria for establishing the standards for passing scores on the
assessments be determined?

(iv)
What timeline should be used in phasing-in the assessments as a graduation
requirement?

(v)
What options may be used in demonstrating how the results of the assessments
will be displayed in a way that is meaningful to students, parents,
institutions of higher education, and potential employers?

(vi)
Are there other or additional methods by which the assessments could be used to
identify achievement such as endorsements, standards of proficiency, merit
badges, or levels of achievement?

(vii)
Should the assessments and certificate of mastery be used to satisfy college or
university entrance criteria for public school students? If yes, how should
these methods be phased-in?

(b)
The ad hoc working group shall report its recommendations to the commission on
student learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction by June 15, 1997. The commission shall report the ad hoc
working group's recommendations to the education committees of the house of
representatives and senate by July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the
commission on student learning, the state board of education, and the
superintendent of public instruction shall be presented to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30,
1997.

(9))) The
Washington commission on student learning shall expire on June 30, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By September 1, 1999, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall convene a certificate of academic proficiency advisory committee.

(2)
The advisory committee shall include, but need not be limited to
representatives of students, parents, educators, school directors, school
administrators, principals, community members, employers, employee
organizations, the state board of education, the higher education coordinating
board, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the work force
training and education coordinating board. Advisory committee members shall
serve without additional compensation but are eligible for per diem and mileage
allowances under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)
The advisory committee shall examine and make recommendations on the following
issues and such other issues as the committee may identify:

(a)
By December 31, 1999, incentives to encourage students to obtain a certificate
of academic proficiency before the certificate becomes a state-wide graduation
requirement. The incentives may not apply to home school students who enroll
in public schools in order to participate in running start opportunities
available through the school;

(b)
Assessment and meaningful educational program options for students who are able
to obtain a certificate of academic proficiency early in their high school
careers;

(c)
Assistance and meaningful educational program options for students who, through
additional time and effort, will likely obtain a certificate before the end of
their high school careers;

(d)
Processes through which students, parents, and instructional staff can develop
individual student improvement plans for students who attempt to achieve, but
do not meet, the requirements for the certificate of academic proficiency;

(e)
Processes to objectively identify students who, despite additional time and effort,
are not likely to meet the requirements for a certificate before the end of the
students' high school careers;

(f)
By December 31, 2002, meaningful educational program options for students who
will not meet the requirements for the certificate before the end of the
students' high school careers; and

(g)
By December 31, 2004, a review and analysis of the requirement that students
obtain a certificate as a condition for high school graduation.

(4)
By January 5, 2000, and no later than January 5th of each year thereafter, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide to the house
of representatives and senate committees on education, a progress report on the
deliberations of the advisory committee. The report shall include the advisory
committee's findings and recommendations. Before any new policy recommended by
the advisory committee is implemented, the policy shall be submitted to the
education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.195.010 and 1993 c 336 s 1101 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby recognizes that private schools should be subject only to
those minimum state controls necessary to insure the health and safety of all
the students in the state and to insure a sufficient basic education to meet
usual graduation requirements. However, the state board shall not require
private school students to meet the student learning goals, to obtain a
certificate of academic proficiency to graduate from high school, to master the
essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed pursuant to RCW
28A.630.885. However, private schools may choose, on a voluntary basis, to
have their students master these essential academic learning requirements, take
these assessments, and obtain certificates of academic proficiency. The
state, any agency or official thereof, shall not restrict or dictate any
specific educational or other programs for private schools except as
hereinafter in this section provided.

Principals
of private schools or superintendents of private school districts shall file
each year with the state superintendent of public instruction a statement
certifying that the minimum requirements hereinafter set forth are being met,
noting any deviations. After review of the statement, the state superintendent
will notify schools or school districts of those deviations which must be
corrected. In case of major deviations, the school or school district may
request and the state board of education may grant provisional status for one
year in order that the school or school district may take action to meet the
requirements. Minimum requirements shall be as follows:

(1)
The minimum school year for instructional purposes shall consist of no less
than one hundred eighty school days or the equivalent in annual minimum program
hour offerings as prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220.

(2)
The school day shall be the same as that required in RCW 28A.150.030 and
28A.150.220, except that the percentages of total program hour offerings as
prescribed in RCW 28A.150.220 for basic skills, work skills, and optional
subjects and activities shall not apply to private schools or private sectarian
schools.

(3)
All classroom teachers shall hold appropriate Washington state certification
except as follows:

(a)
Teachers for religious courses or courses for which no counterpart exists in
public schools shall not be required to obtain a state certificate to teach
those courses.

(b)
In exceptional cases, people of unusual competence but without certification
may teach students so long as a certified person exercises general
supervision. Annual written statements shall be submitted to the office of the
superintendent of public instruction reporting and explaining such
circumstances.

(4)
An approved private school may operate an extension program for parents,
guardians, or persons having legal custody of a child to teach children in
their custody. The extension program shall require at a minimum that:

(a)
The parent, guardian, or custodian be under the supervision of an employee of
the approved private school who is certified under chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(b)
The planning by the certified person and the parent, guardian, or person having
legal custody include objectives consistent with this subsection and
subsections (1), (2), (5), (6), and (7) of this section;

(c)
The certified person spend a minimum average each month of one contact hour per
week with each student under his or her supervision who is enrolled in the
approved private school extension program;

(d)
Each student's progress be evaluated by the certified person; and

(e)
The certified employee shall not supervise more than thirty students enrolled
in the approved private school's extension program.

(5)
Appropriate measures shall be taken to safeguard all permanent records against
loss or damage.

(6)
The physical facilities of the school or district shall be adequate to meet the
program offered by the school or district: PROVIDED, That each school building
shall meet reasonable health and fire safety requirements. ((However, the
state board shall not require private school students to meet the student
learning goals, obtain a certificate of mastery to graduate from high school,
to master the essential academic learning requirements, or to be assessed
pursuant to RCW 28A.630.885. However, private schools may choose, on a
voluntary basis, to have their students master these essential academic
learning requirements, take these assessments, and obtain certificates of
mastery.)) A residential dwelling of the parent, guardian, or custodian
shall be deemed to be an adequate physical facility when a parent, guardian, or
person having legal custody is instructing his or her child under subsection
(4) of this section.

(7)
Private school curriculum shall include instruction of the basic skills of
occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social studies,
history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of
appreciation of art and music, all in sufficient units for meeting state board
of education graduation requirements.

(8)
Each school or school district shall be required to maintain up-to-date policy
statements related to the administration and operation of the school or school
district.

All
decisions of policy, philosophy, selection of books, teaching material,
curriculum, except as in subsection (7) above provided, school rules and
administration, or other matters not specifically referred to in this section,
shall be the responsibility of the administration and administrators of the
particular private school involved.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.200.010 and 1995 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
parent whose child is receiving home-based instruction under RCW 28A.225.010(4)
shall have the duty to:

(1)
File annually a signed declaration of intent that he or she is planning to
cause his or her child to receive home-based instruction. The statement shall
include the name and age of the child, shall specify whether a certificated
person will be supervising the instruction, and shall be written in a format
prescribed by the superintendent of public instruction. Each parent shall file
the statement by September 15 of the school year or within two weeks of the
beginning of any public school quarter, trimester, or semester with the
superintendent of the public school district within which the parent resides or
the district that accepts the transfer, and the student shall be deemed a
transfer student of the nonresident district. Parents may apply for transfer
under RCW 28A.225.220;

(2)
Ensure that test scores or annual academic progress assessments and
immunization records, together with any other records that are kept relating to
the instructional and educational activities provided, are forwarded to any
other public or private school to which the child transfers. At the time of a
transfer to a public school, the superintendent of the local school district in
which the child enrolls may require a standardized achievement test to be
administered and shall have the authority to determine the appropriate grade
and course level placement of the child after consultation with parents and
review of the child's records; and

(3)
Ensure that a standardized achievement test approved by the state board of
education is administered annually to the child by a qualified individual or
that an annual assessment of the student's academic progress is written by a
certificated person who is currently working in the field of education. The
state board of education shall not require these children to meet the student learning
goals, master the essential academic learning requirements, to take the
assessments, or to obtain a certificate of ((mastery)) academic
proficiency pursuant to RCW 28A.630.885. The standardized test
administered or the annual academic progress assessment written shall be made a
part of the child's permanent records. If, as a result of the annual test or
assessment, it is determined that the child is not making reasonable progress
consistent with his or her age or stage of development, the parent shall make a
good faith effort to remedy any deficiency.

Failure
of a parent to comply with the duties in this section shall be deemed a failure
of such parent's child to attend school without valid justification under RCW
28A.225.020. Parents who do comply with the duties set forth in this section
shall be presumed to be providing home-based instruction as set forth in RCW
28A.225.010(4).

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.230.090 and 1997 c 222 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state board of education shall establish minimum high school
graduation requirements or equivalencies for students. Before the board
adopts any requirements in rule, it shall present the proposed requirements to
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the
committees' review and comment. Any course in Washington state history and
government used to fulfill high school graduation requirements is encouraged to
include information on the culture, history, and government of the American
Indian peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(2)
In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of education to
establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements, the state
board shall periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall
report such findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the
state board.

(3)
Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English
established by the state board of education or a local school district, or
both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction
in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be
considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation
requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

(4)
If requested by the student and his or her family, a student who has completed
high school courses before attending high school shall be given high school
credit which shall be applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements
if:

(a)
The course was taken with high school students, if the academic level of the
course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the
student has successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and
examinations as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(b)
The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and
eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high school credit,
because the course is similar or equivalent to a course offered at a high
school in the district as determined by the school district board of directors.

(5)
Students who have taken and successfully completed high school courses under
the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall not be required to
take an additional competency examination or perform any other additional
assignment to receive credit. Subsection (4) of this section shall also apply
to students enrolled in high school on April 11, 1990, who took the courses
before attending high school.

(6)
At the college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals
one high school credit.

Sec.
6. RCW
28B.80.350 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall coordinate educational activities among all segments of higher
education taking into account the educational programs, facilities, and other
resources of both public and independent two and four-year colleges and
universities. The four-year institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall coordinate information and activities with the board.
The board shall have the following additional responsibilities:

(1)
Promote interinstitutional cooperation;

(2)
Establish minimum admission standards for four-year institutions, including a
requirement that coursework in American sign language or an American Indian
language shall satisfy any requirement for instruction in a language other than
English that the board or the institutions may establish as a general
undergraduate admissions requirement. The board may not require students
receiving a private education under chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the essential academic learning
requirements or the requirements for a certificate of academic proficiency;

(3)
Establish transfer policies;

(4)
Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;

(5)
Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering states and the
province of British Columbia;

(6)
Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for administrative
employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty using comparative data
from peer institutions;

(7)
Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all relevant state
policies for higher education;

(8)
Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or between and
among four-year institutions and community colleges at the request of one or
more of the institutions involved, or at the request of the governor, or from a
resolution adopted by the legislature. The decision of the board shall be
binding on the participants in the dispute;

(9)
Establish and implement a state system for collecting, analyzing, and
distributing information;

(10)
Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove any economic
incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus activities; and

(11)
Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and monitor and report
on the progress of minority participation in higher education.

Sec.
7. RCW
28B.20.130 and 1998 c 245 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

General
powers and duties of the board of regents are as follows:

(1)
To have full control of the university and its property of various kinds,
except as otherwise provided by law.

(2)
To employ the president of the university, his or her assistants, members of
the faculty, and employees of the institution, who except as otherwise provided
by law, shall hold their positions during the pleasure of said board of
regents.

(3)
Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission to the
university which meet or exceed the standards specified under RCW
28B.80.350(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the university may
be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant at the university's
discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools and other
educational institutions whose courses of study meet the approval of the
university may be acceptable for entrance. The board may not require
students receiving a private education under chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the essential academic learning
requirements or the requirements for a certificate of academic proficiency.

(4)
Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the
purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5)
With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe the course of
study in the various colleges, schools, and departments of the institution and
publish the necessary catalogues thereof.

(6)
Grant to students such certificates or degrees as recommended for such students
by the faculty. The board, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also confer
honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of this university in
recognition of their learning or devotion to literature, art, or science:
PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in consideration of the
payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever kind.

(7)
Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, whether real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of
the university, its colleges, schools, departments, or agencies; and sell,
lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income thereof except as limited by the terms of said gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises. The board shall adopt proper rules to
govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and
the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances,
bequests, and devises ((above-mentioned)) in this subsection.

(8)
Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the
regents deem essential to university purposes.

(9)
To submit upon request such reports as will be helpful to the governor and to
the legislature in providing for the institution.

(10)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs,
participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational
programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus facilities.

Sec.
8. RCW
28B.30.150 and 1998 c 245 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
regents of Washington State University, in addition to other duties prescribed
by law, shall:

(1)
Have full control of the university and its property of various kinds, except
as otherwise provided by law.

(2)
Employ the president of the university, his or her assistants, members of the
faculty, and employees of the university, who, except as otherwise provided by
law, shall hold their positions during the pleasure of said board of regents.

(3)
Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission to the
university which meet or exceed the standards specified under RCW
28B.80.350(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the university may
be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant, at the university's
discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools and other
educational institutions whose courses of study meet the approval of the
university may be acceptable for entrance. The board may not require
students receiving a private education under chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based
instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the essential academic learning
requirements or the requirements for a certificate of academic proficiency.

(4)
Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the
purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs,
participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational
programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus facilities.

(6)
With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe the courses of
instruction in the various colleges, schools, and departments of the
institution and publish the necessary catalogues thereof.

(7)
Collect such information as the board deems desirable as to the schemes of
technical instruction adopted in other parts of the United States and foreign
countries.

(8)
Provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm marketing forums.

(9)
Provide that instruction given in the university, as far as practicable, be
conveyed by means of laboratory work and provide in connection with the
university one or more physical, chemical, and biological laboratories, and
suitably furnish and equip the same.

(10)
Provide training in military tactics for those students electing to participate
therein.

(11)
Establish a department of elementary science and in connection therewith
provide instruction in elementary mathematics, including elementary
trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and mechanical drawing, and land
surveying.

(12)
Establish a department of agriculture and in connection therewith provide
instruction in physics with special application of its principles to
agriculture, chemistry with special application of its principles to
agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with special reference to
common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology and physiology of the lower
forms of animal life, with special reference to insect pests, morphology and
physiology of the higher forms of animal life and in particular of the horse,
cow, sheep, and swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and
feeding of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these subjects to
superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give practical instruction
therein.

(13)
Establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the department of
agriculture, including at least one in the western portion of the state, and appoint
the officers and prescribe regulations for their management.

(14)
Grant to students such certificates or degrees, as recommended for such
students by the faculty.

(15)
Confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of the university in
recognition of their learning or devotion to literature, art, or science when
recommended thereto by the faculty: PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be
conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the giving of property of
whatsoever kind.

(16)
Adopt plans and specifications for university buildings and facilities or
improvements thereto and employ skilled architects and engineers to prepare
such plans and specifications and supervise the construction of buildings or
facilities which the board is authorized to erect, and fix the compensation for
such services. The board shall enter into contracts with one or more
contractors for such suitable buildings, facilities, or improvements as the
available funds will warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a
public competitive letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established
by the board. The board shall require of all persons with whom they contract
for construction and improvements a good and sufficient bond for the faithful
performance of the work and full protection against all liens.

(17)
Except as otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of all money
appropriated to or belonging to the state university.

(18)
Receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of congress approved
May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for cooperative agricultural
extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several States
receiving the benefits of the Act of Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts
supplemental thereto and the United States Department of Agriculture" and
organize and conduct agricultural extension work in connection with the state
university in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the acts of
congress.

(19)
Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the
regents deem essential to university purposes.

(20)
Acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to further the work of
the university or for experimental or demonstrational purposes.

(21)
Establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment station in an
irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon the principles and
practices of irrigational agriculture including the utilization of water and
its relation to soil types, crops, climatic conditions, ditch and drain
construction, fertility investigations, plant disease, insect pests, marketing,
farm management, utilization of fruit byproducts, and general development of
agriculture under irrigation conditions.

(22)
Supervise and control the agricultural experiment station at Puyallup.

(23)
Establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment substation for
the purpose of conducting investigational work upon the principles and
practices of orchard culture, spraying, fertilization, pollenization, new fruit
varieties, fruit diseases and pests, byproducts, marketing, management, and
general horticultural problems.

(24)
Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests, whether real or
personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the
university, its colleges, schools, or departments; and sell, lease or exchange,
invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof
except as limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests,
and devises; and adopt proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and
income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.

(25)
Construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a mining, physical,
technological building, and fabrication shop at the university, or add to the
present foundry and other buildings, in order that both instruction and
research be expanded to include permanent molding and die casting with a
section for new fabricating techniques, especially for light metals, including
magnesium and aluminum; purchase equipment for the shops and laboratories in
mechanical, electrical, and civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the
extraction of alumina from native clays and other possible light metal
research; purchase equipment for a research laboratory for technological
research generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics of
materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.

(26)
Make and transmit to the governor and members of the legislature upon request
such reports as will be helpful in providing for the institution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:

The
board of trustees may not require students receiving a private education under
chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet
the essential academic learning requirements or the requirements for a
certificate of academic proficiency as a condition of meeting minimum college
admission standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW to read as follows:

The
board of trustees may not require students receiving a private education under
chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet
the essential academic learning requirements or the requirements for a
certificate of academic proficiency as a condition of meeting minimum college
admission standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
specific funding for the purposes of section 2 of this act, referencing section
2 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 2 of this act is null and
void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) 1995 c
209 s 2 & 1992 c 141 s 203 (uncodified);

(2) 1995 c
209 s 3 (uncodified); and

(3) 1998 c
225 s 3 (uncodified).

---
END ---