BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.04.010 and 1997 c 321 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

In
this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of
ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the fermentation or
distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or other substances
including all dilutions and mixtures of this substance. The term
"alcohol" does not include alcohol in the possession of a manufacturer
or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described in RCW 66.12.130, which is intended
to be denatured and used as a fuel for use in motor vehicles, farm implements,
and machines or implements of husbandry.

(2)
"Beer" means any malt beverage or malt liquor as these terms are
defined in this chapter.

(3)
"Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a brewer or
brewery located either within or beyond the boundaries of the state, beer
importers, or foreign produced beer from a source outside the state of
Washington, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title, or who
represents such brewer or brewery as agent.

(4)
"Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington who
purchases beer from a United States brewery holding a certificate of approval
(B5) or foreign produced beer from a source outside the state of Washington for
the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

(5)
"Brewer" means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing
beer and malt liquor.

(6)
"Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this title.

(7)
"Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.

(8)
"Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether by
drinking or otherwise.

(9)
"Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state
pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.

(10)
"Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of distilling
spirits.

(11)
"Domestic winery" means a place where wines are manufactured or
produced within the state of Washington.

(12)
"Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate and is a
registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in carrying on the
business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.

(13)
"Drug store" means a place whose principal business is, the sale of
drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains a regular
prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist during all hours
the drug store is open.

(14)
"Employee" means any person employed by the board((, including a
vendor,)) as hereinafter in this section defined.

(15)
"Fund" means 'liquor revolving fund.'

(16)
"Hotel" means every building or other structure kept, used,
maintained, advertised or held out to the public to be a place where food is
served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to transient guests, in
which twenty or more rooms are used for the sleeping accommodation of such
transient guests and having one or more dining rooms where meals are served to
such transient guests, such sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being
conducted in the same building and buildings, in connection therewith, and such
structure or structures being provided, in the judgment of the board, with
adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for preparing,
cooking and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in
cities and towns of less than five thousand population, the board shall have
authority to waive the provisions requiring twenty or more rooms.

(17)
"Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from a
distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous liquor
into the state for sale to ((the board)) a retail licensee or for
export.

(18)
"Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.

(19)
"Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein defined
(alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented, spirituous, vinous, or
malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a part of which is
fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or otherwise intoxicating; and
every liquid or solid or semisolid or other substance, patented or not,
containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable liquids
and all preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any liquid,
semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one percent of
alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating. Liquor does
not include confections or food products that contain one percent or less of
alcohol by weight.

(20)
"Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation of liquor
for sale, in any form whatsoever.

(21)
"Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any beverage such as
beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the alcoholic fermentation
of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure extract of hops and pure
barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure water containing not
more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and not less than one-half of one
percent of alcohol by volume. For the purposes of this title, any such
beverage containing more than eight percent of alcohol by weight shall be
referred to as "strong beer."

(22)
"Package" means any container or receptacle used for holding liquor.

(23)
"Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under this title.

(24)
"Person" means an individual, copartnership, association, or
corporation.

(25)
"Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and regularly licensed
and engaged in the practice of his profession within the state pursuant to
chapter 18.71 RCW.

(26)
"Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician and given by
him to a patient for the obtaining of liquor pursuant to this title for
medicinal purposes.

(27)
"Public place" includes streets and alleys of incorporated cities and
towns; state or county or township highways or roads; buildings and grounds
used for school purposes; public dance halls and grounds adjacent thereto;
those parts of establishments where beer may be sold under this title, soft
drink establishments, public buildings, public meeting halls, lobbies, halls
and dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theaters, stores, garages and filling
stations which are open to and are generally used by the public and to which
the public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad trains, stages,
and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and the depots and
waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to unrestricted use
and access by the public; publicly owned bathing beaches, parks, and/or
playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar nature to which the
general public has unrestricted right of access, and which are generally used
by the public.

(28)
"Regulations" means regulations made by the board under the powers
conferred by this title.

(29)
"Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special space and
accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is
habitually furnished to the public, not including drug stores and soda
fountains.

(30)
"Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic;
and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means
whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or by any
name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or of wine, by
any person to any person; and also include a sale or selling within the state
to a foreign consignee or his agent in the state. "Sale" and
"sell" shall not include the giving, at no charge, of a reasonable
amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the board to a person not licensed
by the board, for personal use only. "Sale" and "sell"
also does not include a raffle authorized under RCW 9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That
the nonprofit organization conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate
permit from the board.

(31)
"Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with apparatus for
the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or otherwise.

(32)
"Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained by
distillation, including wines exceeding twenty-four percent of alcohol by
volume.

(33)
(("Store" means a state liquor store established under this title.

(34)))
"Tavern" means any establishment with special space and accommodation
for sale by the glass and for consumption on the premises, of beer, as herein
defined.

(((35)
"Vendor" means a person employed by the board as a store manager
under this title.

(36))) (34)
"Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the manufacture
of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

(((37)))
(35) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by fermentation
of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other agricultural product
containing sugar, to which any saccharine substances may have been added
before, during or after fermentation, and containing not more than twenty-four
percent of alcohol by volume, including sweet wines fortified with wine
spirits, such as port, sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding twenty-four
percent of alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one percent of
alcohol by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage containing no more
than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or packaged by the
manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine," and any beverage
containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by volume when bottled
or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "fortified
wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not include: (a) Wines
that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two years or more; and
(b) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol by volume solely as a
result of the natural fermentation process and that have not been produced with
the addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any wine be labeled with
the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."

(((38)))
(36) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a
vintner or winery located either within or beyond the boundaries of the state
for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of this title, or who
represents such vintner or winery as agent.

(((39)))
(37) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a United States winery holding a certificate
of approval (W7) or foreign produced wine from a source outside the state of
Washington for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

Sec.
2. RCW
66.08.020 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
administration of this title((, including the general control, management
and supervision of all liquor stores,)) shall be vested in the liquor
control board, constituted under this title.

Sec.
3. RCW
66.08.026 and 1998 c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All
administrative expenses of the board incurred on and after April 1, 1963 shall
be appropriated and paid from the liquor revolving fund. These administrative
expenses shall include, but not be limited to: The salaries and expenses of
the board and its employees, ((the cost of establishing, leasing,
maintaining, and operating state liquor stores and warehouses,)) legal
services, pilot projects, annual or other audits, and other general costs of
conducting the business of the board((, and the costs of supplying,
installing, and maintaining equipment used in state liquor stores and agency
liquor vendor stores for the purchase of liquor by nonlicensees using debit or
credit cards)). The administrative expenses shall not, however, be deemed
to include ((costs of liquor and lottery tickets purchased, the cost of
transportation and delivery to the point of distribution, other costs
pertaining to the acquisition and receipt of liquor and lottery tickets,
packaging and repackaging of liquor, transaction fees associated with credit or
debit card purchases for liquor in state liquor stores and in the stores of
agency liquor vendors pursuant to RCW 66.16.040 and 66.16.041,)) sales tax,
and those amounts distributed pursuant to RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200,
66.08.210 and 66.08.220.

Sec.
4. RCW
66.08.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this title according
to their true intent or of supplying any deficiency therein, the board may make
such regulations not inconsistent with the spirit of this title as are deemed
necessary or advisable. All regulations so made shall be a public record and
shall be filed in the office of the code reviser, and thereupon shall have the
same force and effect as if incorporated in this title. Such regulations,
together with a copy of this title, shall be published in pamphlets and shall
be distributed as directed by the board.

(2)
Without thereby limiting the generality of the provisions contained in
subsection (1), it is declared that the power of the board to make regulations
in the manner set out in that subsection shall extend to:

(a)
((regulating the equipment and management of stores and warehouses in which state
liquor is sold or kept, and prescribing the books and records to be kept
therein and the reports to be made thereon to the board;

(b))) Prescribing
the duties of the employees of the board, and regulating their conduct in the
discharge of their duties;

(((c)
governing the purchase of liquor by the state and the furnishing of liquor to
stores established under this title;

(d)
determining the classes, varieties, and brands of liquor to be kept for sale at
any store;

(e))) (b)
Prescribing((, subject to RCW 66.16.080,)) the hours during which ((the
state liquor stores shall be kept open for the sale of)) retail
licensees may sell liquor;

(((f)
providing for the issuing and distributing of price lists showing the price to
be paid by purchasers for each variety of liquor kept for sale under this
title;

(g)
prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and determining the
manner in which they shall be attached to every package of liquor sold or
sealed under this title, including the prescribing of different official seals
or different official labels for different classes of liquor;

(h)
providing for the payment by the board in whole or in part of the carrying
charges on liquor shipped by freight or express;

(i))) (c)
Prescribing forms to be used for purposes of this title or the regulations,
and the terms and conditions to be contained in permits and licenses issued
under this title;

(((j)))
(d) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses
issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title, and
prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done under the
regulations;

(((k)))
(e) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be kept on
hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named in the permit,
regulating the manner in which the same shall be kept and disposed of, and
providing for the inspection of the same at any time at the instance of the
board;

(((l)))
(f) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses which
entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;

(((m)))
(g) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by the
holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and
providing for inspection of the records so kept;

(((n)))
(h) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a
prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be given
to the same patient within a stated period;

(((o)))
(i) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required by
this title or the regulations, where not otherwise provided for in this title;

(((p)))
(j) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from the
state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and records to
be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the board, and providing
for the inspection of the premises and the books, records and the liquor so
kept;

(((q)))
(k) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for the
obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and the returns
to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing clubs in any
municipality or other locality, and providing for the inspection of clubs;

(((r)))
(l) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations and qualifications
requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer ((and)),
wines, and spirits, and regulating the sale of beer ((and)),
wines ((thereunder)), and spirits;

(((s)))
(m) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner,
methods and means by which manufacturers shall deliver liquor within the state;
and the time and periods when, and the manner, methods and means by which
liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried within the state;

(((t)))
(n) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales of
beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross amount of
such sales and providing for the inspection of brewers' books and records, and
for the checking of the accuracy of any such returns;

(((u)))
(o) Providing for the making of returns by the ((wholesalers)) distributors
of beer whose breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;

(((v)))
(p) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor
manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or purchased, the
amount sold within and exported from the state, and to whom so sold or
exported, and providing for the inspection of the premises of any such liquor
manufacturers, their books and records, and for the checking of any such
return;

(((w)))
(q) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the
employees of the board: PROVIDED, That the premiums therefor shall be paid by
the board;

(((x)))
(r) Providing for the shipment by mail or common carrier of liquor to
any person holding a permit and residing in any unit which has, by election
pursuant to this title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;

(((y)))
(s) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation,
standards of ingredients, quality and identity of alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees ((and the board));
and conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public health and
general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to alcoholic
beverages and the use and effect thereof;

(((z)))
(t) Seizing, confiscating and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold or offered for sale within this state which do not conform
in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or the regulations of
the board: PROVIDED, Nothing herein contained shall be construed as
authorizing the liquor board to prescribe, alter, limit or in any way change
the present law as to the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the
manufacturing of wine or other alcoholic beverages.

Sec.
5. RCW
66.08.050 and 1997 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules, shall:

(1)
((Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall be
established throughout the state, and the number and situation of the stores
within each locality;

(2)
Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no state liquor
store is located, liquor vendors. In addition, the board may appoint, in its
discretion, a manufacturer that also manufactures liquor products other than
wine under a license under this title, as a vendor for the purpose of sale of
liquor products of its own manufacture on the licensed premises only. Such
liquor vendors shall be agents of the board and be authorized to sell liquor to
such persons, firms or corporations as provided for the sale of liquor from a
state liquor store, and such vendors shall be subject to such additional rules
and regulations consistent with this title as the board may require;

(3)
Establish all necessary warehouses for the storing and bottling, diluting and
rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes of this title;

(4)
Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of all premises
required for the conduct of the business; and for remodeling the same, and the
procuring of their furnishings, fixtures, and supplies; and for obtaining
options of renewal of such leases by the lessee. The terms of such leases in
all other respects shall be subject to the direction of the board;

(5)
Determine the nature, form and capacity of all packages to be used for
containing liquor kept for sale under this title;

(6)))
Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and documents in the
name of the board, under such regulations as the board may fix;

(((7)))
(2) Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges and obligations whatsoever
relating to the business of the board;

(((8)))
(3) Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the board, and
to determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such employee;

(((9)
Perform services for the state lottery commission to such extent, and for such
compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon between the board and the
commission;

(10))) (4)
Accept and deposit into the general fund-local account and disburse, subject to
appropriation, federal grants or other funds or donations from any source for
the purpose of improving public awareness of the health risks associated with
alcohol consumption by youth and the abuse of alcohol by adults in Washington
state. The board's alcohol awareness program shall cooperate with federal and
state agencies, interested organizations, and individuals to effect an active
public beverage alcohol awareness program;

(((11)))
(5) Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the
foregoing or not, to carry out the provisions of this title, and shall have
full power to do each and every act necessary to the conduct of its business,
including all buying, selling, preparation and approval of forms, and every
other function of the business whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state
auditor: PROVIDED, That the board shall have no authority to regulate the
content of spoken language on licensed premises where wine and other liquors
are served and where there is not a clear and present danger of disorderly
conduct being provoked by such language.

Sec.
6. RCW
66.08.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

No
employee shall sell liquor in any ((other)) place, nor at any other
time, nor otherwise than as authorized by the board under this title and the
regulations.

Sec.
7. RCW
66.08.095 and 1993 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
liquor control board may provide ((liquor)) at no charge((, including))
liquor forfeited under chapter 66.32 RCW((,)) to recognized law
enforcement agencies within the state when the law enforcement agency will be
using the liquor for bona fide law enforcement training or investigation
purposes.

Sec.
8. RCW
66.12.110 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person twenty-one years of age or over may bring into the state from without
the United States, free of tax ((and markup)), for his or her
personal or household use such alcoholic beverages as have been declared and
permitted to enter the United States duty free under federal law.

Such
entry of alcoholic beverages in excess of that herein provided may be
authorized by the board upon payment of an equivalent ((markup and)) tax
as would be applicable to the purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail
from a ((Washington state)) retail liquor ((store)) licensee.
The board shall adopt appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for
the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section. The board may
issue a ((class H)) spirits, beer, and wine restaurant license to
a charitable or nonprofit corporation of the state of Washington, the majority
of the officers and directors of which are United States citizens and the
minority of the officers and directors of which are citizens of the Dominion of
Canada, and where the location of the premises for such ((class H))
license is not more than ten miles south of the border between the United
States and the province of British Columbia.

Sec.
9. RCW
66.12.120 and 1995 c 100 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provision of Title 66 RCW, a person twenty-one years of age or over
may, free of tax ((and markup)), for personal or household use, bring
into the state of Washington from another state no more than once per calendar
month up to two liters of spirits or wine or two hundred eighty-eight ounces of
beer. Additionally, such person may be authorized by the board to bring into
the state of Washington from another state a reasonable amount of alcoholic
beverages in excess of that provided in this section for personal or household
use only upon payment of an equivalent ((markup and)) tax as would be
applicable to the purchase of the same or similar liquor at retail from a ((state))
retail liquor ((store)) licensee. The board shall adopt
appropriate regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for the purpose of
carrying into effect the provisions of this section.

Sec.
10. RCW
66.12.140 and 1982 c 85 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Nothing in this title shall prevent the use of beer, wine, and/or spirituous
liquor, for cooking purposes only, in conjunction with a culinary or restaurant
course offered by a college, university, community college, area vocational
technical institute, or private vocational school. Further, nothing in this
title shall prohibit the making of beer or wine in food fermentation courses
offered by a college, university, community college, area vocational technical
institute, or private vocational school.

(2)
"Culinary or restaurant course" as used in this section means a
course of instruction which includes practical experience in food preparation
under the supervision of an instructor who is twenty-one years of age or older.

(3)
Persons under twenty-one years of age participating in culinary or restaurant
courses may handle beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for purposes of
participating in the courses, but nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize consumption of liquor by persons under twenty-one years of age or to
authorize possession of liquor by persons under twenty-one years of age at any
time or place other than while preparing food under the supervision of the
course instructor.

(4)
Beer, wine, and/or spirituous liquor to be used in culinary or restaurant
courses shall be purchased at retail from ((the board or)) a retailer
licensed under this title. All such liquor shall be securely stored in the
food preparation area and shall not be displayed in an area open to the general
public.

(5)
Colleges, universities, community colleges, area vocational technical
institutes, and private vocational schools shall obtain the prior written
approval of the board for use of beer, wine, and/or spirituous liquor for
cooking purposes in their culinary or restaurant courses.

Sec.
11. RCW
66.16.040 and 1996 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided by law, an employee ((in)) of a ((state))
retail liquor ((store or agency)) licensee may sell liquor
to any person of legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages and may also sell to
holders of permits such liquor as may be purchased under such permits.

Where
there may be a question of a person's right to purchase liquor by reason of
age, such person shall be required to present any one of the following
officially issued cards of identification which shows his/her correct age and
bears his/her signature and photograph:

(1)
Liquor control authority card of identification of any state or province of
Canada.

(2)
Driver's license, instruction permit or identification card of any state or
province of Canada, or "identicard" issued by the Washington state
department of licensing pursuant to RCW 46.20.117.

(3)
United States armed forces identification card issued to active duty, reserve,
and retired personnel and the personnel's dependents.

(4)
Passport.

(5)
Merchant Marine identification card issued by the United States Coast Guard.

The
board may adopt such regulations as it deems proper covering the acceptance of
such cards of identification.

((No
liquor sold under this section shall be delivered until the purchaser has paid
for the liquor in cash, except as allowed under RCW 66.16.041. The use of a
personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of the state as prohibited
by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.))

Sec.
12. RCW
66.16.100 and 1997 c 321 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

No ((state)) retail liquor ((store)) licensee
in a county with a population over three hundred thousand may sell fortified
wine if the board finds that the sale would be against the public interest
based on the factors in RCW 66.24.360. The burden of establishing that the
sale would be against the public interest is on those persons objecting.

Sec.
13. RCW
66.16.110 and 1993 c 422 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall cause to be posted in conspicuous places, in a number determined by
the board, within each ((state)) licensed retail liquor ((store))
establishment, notices in print not less than one inch high warning
persons that consumption of alcohol shortly before conception or during
pregnancy may cause birth defects, including fetal alcohol syndrome and fetal
alcohol effects.

Sec.
14. RCW
66.20.170 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A
card of identification may for the purpose of this title and for the purpose of
procuring liquor, be accepted as an identification card by any licensee ((or
store employee)) and as evidence of legal age of the person presenting such
card, provided the licensee ((or store employee)) complies with the
conditions and procedures prescribed herein and such regulations as may be made
by the board.

Sec.
15. RCW
66.20.180 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
card of identification shall be presented by the holder thereof upon request of
any licensee, ((store employee,)) peace officer, or enforcement officer
of the board for the purpose of aiding the licensee, ((store employee,))
peace officer, or enforcement officer of the board to determine whether or not
such person is of legal age to purchase liquor when such person desires to
procure liquor from a licensed establishment ((or state liquor store or
agency)).

Sec.
16. RCW
66.20.190 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the presentation by the holder and verification by the licensee ((or
store employee)) of such card of identification, the licensee ((or store
employee)) who is still in doubt about the true age of the holder shall
require the person whose age may be in question to sign a certification card
and record an accurate description and serial number of his or her card
of identification thereon. Such statement shall be upon a five-inch by
eight-inch file card, which card shall be filed alphabetically by the licensee
((or store employee)) at or before the close of business on the day on
which the statement is executed, in the file box containing a suitable
alphabetical index and the card shall be subject to examination by any peace
officer or agent or employee of the board at all times. The certification card
shall also contain in bold-face type a statement stating that the signer
understands that conviction for unlawful purchase of alcoholic beverages or
misuse of the certification card may result in criminal penalties including
imprisonment or fine or both.

Sec.
17. RCW
66.20.200 and 1994 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for the owner of a card of identification to transfer the
card to any other person for the purpose of aiding such person to procure alcoholic
beverages from any licensee ((or store employee)). Any person who shall
permit his or her card of identification to be used by another or transfer such
card to another for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic
beverages from a licensee ((or store employee)) or gain admission to a
premises or portion of a premises classified by the board as off-limits to
persons under twenty-one years of age, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two
hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community
service shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of such service. Any
person not entitled thereto who unlawfully procures or has issued or transferred
to him or her a card of identification, and any person who possesses a card of
identification not issued to him or her, and any person who makes any false
statement on any certification card required by RCW 66.20.190, as now or
hereafter amended, to be signed by him or her, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two
hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community
service shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of such service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

There
shall be a license for spirits distributors to sell spirituous liquor,
purchased from licensed Washington manufacturers, spirituous liquor certificate
of approval holders, licensed liquor importers, or suppliers of foreign liquor
located outside the state of Washington, to retailers licensed for off-premises
consumption and other spirits distributors and to export spirits from the state
of Washington; fee fifteen thousand dollars per year for each distributing
unit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

A
manufacturer of spirits located outside the state of Washington must hold a
certificate of approval to allow sales and shipment of the certificate of
approval holder's spirituous liquor to licensed Washington spirits distributors
or liquor importers. The certificate of approval shall not be granted unless
the manufacturer of spirituous liquor has made a written agreement with the
board to furnish to the board, on or before the twentieth day of each month, a
report under oath, on a form to be prescribed by the board, showing the
quantity of spirits sold or delivered to each licensed spirits distributor or
liquor importer during the preceding month, and has further agreed with the
board that the manufacturers, all general sales corporations or agencies
maintained by them, and all of their trade representatives, will faithfully
comply with all laws of the state of Washington pertaining to the sale of
intoxicating liquors and with all rules and regulations of the Washington state
liquor control board. A violation of the terms of this agreement will
authorize the board to take action to suspend or revoke such certificate.

The
fee for the certificate of approval, issued under the provisions of this title
shall be one hundred dollars per year, which sum must accompany the application
for the certificate.

Sec.
20. RCW
66.24.160 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

A
liquor importer's license may be issued to any qualified person, firm or
corporation, entitling the holder thereof to import into the state any liquor
other than beer or wine; to store the same within the state, and to sell and
export the same from the state; fee six hundred dollars per annum. Such liquor
importer's license shall be subject to all conditions and restrictions imposed
by this title or by the rules and regulations of the board, and shall be issued
only upon such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the board. ((No
liquor importer's license shall be required in sales to the Washington state
liquor control board.))

Sec.
21. RCW
66.24.210 and 1997 c 321 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby imposed upon all wines except cider sold to wine distributors
((and the Washington state liquor control board,)) within the state a
tax at the rate of twenty and one-fourth cents per liter. There is hereby
imposed on all cider sold to wine distributors ((and the Washington state
liquor control board)) within the state a tax at the rate of three and
fifty-nine one-hundredths cents per liter: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That wine sold
or shipped in bulk from one winery to another winery shall not be subject to
such tax. The tax provided for in this section shall be collected by direct
payments based on wine purchased by wine distributors. Every person purchasing
wine under the provisions of this section shall on or before the twentieth day
of each month report to the board all purchases during the preceding calendar
month in such manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and
with such report shall pay the tax due from the purchases covered by such
report unless the same has previously been paid. Any such purchaser of wine
whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following
the month of purchase will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent a
month or fraction thereof. The board may require that every such person shall
execute to and file with the board a bond to be approved by the board, in such
amount as the board may fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any such
person fails to pay the tax when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel
the license until all taxes are paid.

(2)
An additional tax is imposed equal to the rate specified in RCW 82.02.030
multiplied by the tax payable under subsection (1) of this section. All
revenues collected during any month from this additional tax shall be
transferred to the state general fund by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.

(3)
An additional tax is imposed on wines subject to tax under subsection (1) of
this section, at the rate of one-fourth of one cent per liter for wine sold
after June 30, 1987. After June 30, 1996, such additional tax does not apply
to cider. An additional tax of five one-hundredths of one cent per liter is
imposed on cider sold after June 30, 1996. The additional taxes imposed by
this subsection (3) shall cease to be imposed on July 1, 2001. All revenues
collected under this subsection (3) shall be disbursed quarterly to the
Washington wine commission for use in carrying out the purposes of chapter
15.88 RCW.

(4)
An additional tax is imposed on all wine subject to tax under subsection (1) of
this section. The additional tax is equal to twenty-three and forty-four
one-hundredths cents per liter on fortified wine as defined in RCW 66.04.010(((37)))
(36) when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer, one cent per liter on
all other wine except cider, and eighteen one-hundredths of one cent per liter
on cider. All revenues collected during any month from this additional tax
shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under
RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(5)(a)
An additional tax is imposed on all cider subject to tax under subsection (1)
of this section. The additional tax is equal to two and four one-hundredths
cents per liter of cider sold after June 30, 1996, and before July 1, 1997, and
is equal to four and seven one-hundredths cents per liter of cider sold after
June 30, 1997.

(b)
All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection
(5) shall be deposited in the health services account under RCW 43.72.900.

(6)
For the purposes of this section, "cider" means table wine that
contains not less than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume and not
more than seven percent of alcohol by volume and is made from the normal
alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe apples or pears.
"Cider" includes, but is not limited to, flavored, sparkling, or carbonated
cider and cider made from condensed apple or pear must.

Sec.
22. RCW
66.24.290 and 1997 c 451 s 1 and 1997 c 321 s 16 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor licensed under this
title may sell and deliver beer to holders of authorized licenses direct, but
to no other person, ((other than the board;)) and every such brewery or
beer distributor shall report all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the
regulations, and shall pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of
manufacturing and selling the beer within the state a tax of one dollar and
thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees within the
state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled and canned beer
shall pay a tax computed in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents
per barrel of thirty-one gallons. Any brewery or beer distributor whose
applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the
month of sale will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month
or fraction thereof. Beer shall be sold by breweries and distributors in
sealed barrels or packages. The moneys collected under this subsection shall
be distributed as follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (b) of the remaining moneys: (i)
Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties in the same manner as under RCW
66.08.200; and (ii) eighty percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities
and towns in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.

(2)
An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of
this section. The additional tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.

(3)(a)
An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of
this section. The additional tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per
barrel of thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30,
1997, and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
thereafter.

(b)
The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply to the sale of
the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by breweries that are
entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on
July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.

(c)
All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection
(3) shall be deposited in the health services account under RCW 43.72.900.

(4)
An additional tax is imposed on all beer that is subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section that is in the first sixty thousand barrels of
beer by breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption
under subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent of the revenues
collected from this additional tax shall be distributed to border areas under
RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be transferred to the state
general fund.

(5)
The tax imposed under this section shall not apply to "strong beer"
as defined in this title.

Sec.
23. RCW
66.24.310 and 1997 c 321 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall canvass for, solicit, receive, or take orders for the purchase
or sale of liquor, nor contact any licensees of the board in goodwill
activities, unless such person shall be the accredited representative of a
person, firm, or corporation holding a certificate of approval issued pursuant
to RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a beer distributor's license, a microbrewer's
license, a domestic brewer's license, a beer importer's license, a domestic
winery license, a wine importer's license, ((or)) a wine distributor's license,
or a spirits distributor's license within the state of Washington, or the
accredited representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or
distributor of spirituous liquor, or foreign produced beer or wine, and shall
have applied for and received a representative's license: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That the provisions of this section shall not apply to drivers who deliver beer
or wine;

(2)
Every representative's license issued under this title shall be subject to all
conditions and restrictions imposed by this title or by the rules and
regulations of the board; the board, for the purpose of maintaining an orderly
market, may limit the number of representative's licenses issued for
representation of specific classes of eligible employers;

(3)
Every application for a representative's license must be approved by a holder
of a certificate of approval issued pursuant to RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a
licensed beer distributor, a licensed domestic brewer, a licensed beer
importer, a licensed microbrewer, a licensed domestic winery, a licensed wine
importer, a licensed wine distributor, or by a distiller, manufacturer,
importer, or distributor of spirituous liquor, or foreign produced beer or
wine, as the rules and regulations of the board shall require;

(4)
The fee for a representative's license shall be twenty-five dollars per year;

(5)
An accredited representative of a distiller, manufacturer, importer, or
distributor of spirituous liquor may, after he or she has applied for and
received a representative's license, contact retail licensees of the board only
in goodwill activities pertaining to spirituous liquor products.

Sec.
24. RCW
66.24.360 and 1997 c 321 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a spirits, beer, and/or wine retailer's license to be
designated as a grocery store license to sell spirits, beer,
and/or wine at retail in bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be
consumed upon the premises where sold, at any store ((other than the state
liquor stores)).

(1)
Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may also sell malt
liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding less than five and
one-half gallons of liquid.

(2)(a)
The annual fee for the grocery store license is one hundred fifty dollars for
each store selling beer or wine but not spirits.

(b)
The annual fee for the grocery store license is three thousand dollars for each
store selling spirits.

(3)
The board shall issue a restricted grocery store license authorizing the
licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board finds upon issuance or
renewal of the license that the sale of fortified wine would be against the
public interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider
at least the following factors:

(a)
The likelihood that the applicant will sell fortified wine to persons who are
intoxicated;

(b)
Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's establishment that
may arise from persons purchasing fortified wine at the establishment; and

(c)
Whether the sale of fortified wine would be detrimental to or inconsistent with
a government-operated or funded alcohol treatment or detoxification program in
the area.

If
the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of fortified wine
would be against the public interest, it shall issue or renew the license
without restriction, as applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale
of fortified wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on
those persons objecting.

(4)
Licensees holding a grocery store license must maintain a minimum three
thousand dollar inventory of food products for human consumption, not including
pop, spirits, beer, or wine.

(5)
Only grocery store licensees whose contiguous business premises measure five
thousand or more square feet of floor space and who meet the requirements of
subsection (4) of this section may sell at retail, spirituous liquor in its
original container. The board shall determine, by rule, criteria for
establishing qualifying floor space.

(6)
Until July 1, 2003, the board may issue a retailer's license under this section
to agency liquor vendors appointed by the board on or before January 1, 2000.
Subsections (4) and (5) of this section do not apply to liquor vendors who
qualify under this subsection (6), but such vendors are subject to the
remainder of this section.

(7)
Upon approval by the board, the grocery store licensee may also receive an
endorsement to permit the international export of beer and wine.

(a)
Any beer or wine sold under this endorsement must have been purchased from a
licensed beer or wine distributor licensed to do business within the state of
Washington.

(b)
Any beer and wine sold under this endorsement must be intended for consumption
outside the state of Washington and the United States and appropriate records
must be maintained by the licensee.

(c)
A holder of this special endorsement to the grocery store license shall be
considered not in violation of RCW 66.28.010.

(d)
Any beer or wine sold under this license must be sold at a price no less than
the acquisition price paid by the holder of the license.

(e)
The annual cost of this endorsement is five hundred dollars and is in addition
to the license fees paid by the licensee for a grocery store license.

Sec.
25. RCW
66.24.371 and 1997 c 321 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be a beer and/or wine retailer's license to be designated as a beer
and/or wine specialty shop license to sell beer and/or wine at retail in
bottles, cans, and original containers, not to be consumed upon the premises
where sold, at any store ((other than the state liquor stores)).
Licensees obtaining a written endorsement from the board may also sell malt
liquor in kegs or other containers capable of holding less than five and
one-half gallons of liquid. The annual fee for the beer and/or wine specialty
shop license is one hundred dollars for each store.

(2)
Licensees under this section may provide, free or for a charge, single-serving
samples of two ounces or less to customers for the purpose of sales promotion.
Sampling activities of licensees under this section are subject to RCW
66.28.010 and 66.28.040 and the cost of sampling under this section may not be
borne, directly or indirectly, by any manufacturer, importer, or distributor of
liquor.

(3)
The board shall issue a restricted beer and/or wine specialty shop license,
authorizing the licensee to sell beer and only table wine, if the board finds
upon issuance or renewal of the license that the sale of fortified wine would
be against the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board
shall consider at least the following factors:

(a)
The likelihood that the applicant will sell fortified wine to persons who are
intoxicated;

(b)
Law enforcement problems in the vicinity of the applicant's establishment that
may arise from persons purchasing fortified wine at the establishment; and

(c)
Whether the sale of fortified wine would be detrimental to or inconsistent with
a government-operated or funded alcohol treatment or detoxification program in
the area.

If
the board receives no evidence or objection that the sale of fortified wine
would be against the public interest, it shall issue or renew the license
without restriction, as applicable. The burden of establishing that the sale
of fortified wine by the licensee would be against the public interest is on
those persons objecting.

(4) Licensees holding a beer and/or wine specialty shop license
must maintain a minimum three thousand dollar wholesale inventory of beer
and/or wine.

Sec.
26. RCW
66.24.380 and 1997 c 321 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a retailer's license to be designated as a special occasion license to
be issued to a not-for-profit society or organization to sell spirits, beer,
and wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified
event, such as at picnics or other special occasions, at a specified date and
place; fee sixty dollars per day.

(1)
The not-for-profit society or organization is limited to sales of no more than
twelve calendar days per year.

(2)
The licensee may sell beer and/or wine in original, unopened containers for
off-premises consumption if permission is obtained from the board prior to the
event.

(3)
Sale, service, and consumption of spirits, beer, and wine is to be confined to
specified premises or designated areas only.

(4)
Spirituous liquor sold under this special occasion license must be purchased ((at
a state liquor store or agency without discount at retail prices, including all
taxes)) from a licensed spirits distributor.

(5) Any violation of this section is a class 1 civil infraction
having a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars as provided for in
chapter 7.80 RCW.

Sec.
27. RCW
66.24.540 and 1997 c 321 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a retailer's license to be designated as a motel license. The motel
license may be issued to a motel that holds no other class of license under
this title. No license may be issued to a motel offering rooms to its guests
on an hourly basis. The license authorizes the licensee to sell, at retail, in
locked honor bars, spirits in individual bottles not to exceed fifty
milliliters, beer in individual cans or bottles not to exceed twelve ounces,
and wine in individual bottles not to exceed one hundred eighty-seven
milliliters, to registered guests of the motel for consumption in guest rooms.
Each honor bar must also contain snack foods. No more than one-half of the
guest rooms may have honor bars. The board shall charge a reasonable fee for
this license. All spirits to be sold under the license must be purchased from
((the board)) a licensed spirits distributor. The licensee shall
require proof of age from the guest renting a guest room and requesting the use
of an honor bar. The guest shall also execute an affidavit verifying that no
one under twenty-one years of age shall have access to the spirits, beer, and
wine in the honor bar. "Motel" as used in this section means a
facility or place offering three or more self-contained units designated by
number, letter, or some other method of identification to travelers and
transient guests. As used in this section, "spirits,"
"beer," and "wine" have the meanings defined in RCW
66.04.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28. A
new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

A retail spirits licensee may sell spirits only during the hours of
twelve o'clock noon and eight o'clock p.m. each day, except Sundays.

Sec.
29. RCW
66.28.030 and 1997 c 321 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
licensed brewer, domestic brewer and microbrewer, domestic winery, manufacturer
holding a certificate of approval, licensed wine importer, and licensed beer
importer shall be responsible for the conduct of any licensed spirits,
beer, or wine distributor in selling, or contracting to sell, to retail
licensees, spirits, beer, or wine manufactured by such brewer,
domestic brewer and microbrewer, domestic winery, manufacturer holding a
certificate of approval, or imported by such liquor, beer, or
wine importer. Where the board finds that any licensed spirits, beer,
or wine distributor has violated any of the provisions of this title or of the
regulations of the board in selling or contracting to sell spirits, beer,
or wine to retail licensees, the board may, in addition to any punishment
inflicted or imposed upon such distributor, prohibit the sale of the brand or
brands of spirits, beer, or wine involved in such violation to
any or all retail licensees within the trade territory usually served by such
distributor for such period of time as the board may fix, irrespective of
whether the brewer manufacturing such beer or the beer importer importing such
beer or the domestic winery manufacturing such wine or the wine importer
importing such wine or the certificate of approval holder manufacturing such spirits,
beer, or wine actually participated in such violation.

Sec.
30. RCW
66.28.040 and 1998 c 256 s 1 and 1998 c 126 s 12 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Except
as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no brewery, distributor,
distiller, winery, importer, rectifier, or other manufacturer of liquor shall,
within the state, give to any person any liquor; but nothing in this section
nor in RCW 66.28.010 shall prevent a brewery, distributor, winery, distiller,
or importer from furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous liquor to
authorized licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that the samples are
subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210, and in the case of
spirituous liquor, any product used for samples must be purchased at retail
from ((the board; nothing in this section shall prevent the furnishing of
samples of liquor to the board for the purpose of negotiating the sale of
liquor to the state liquor control board)) a retail liquor licensee;
nothing in this section shall prevent a brewery, winery, distillery, or
distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or spirituous liquor for instructional
purposes under RCW 66.28.150 and 66.28.155; nothing in this section shall
prevent a winery or distributor from furnishing wine without charge, subject to
the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a not-for-profit group organized and
operated solely for the purpose of enology or the study of viticulture which
has been in existence for at least six months and that uses wine so furnished
solely for such educational purposes or a domestic winery from furnishing wine
without charge or a domestic brewery from furnishing beer without charge,
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, to a nonprofit charitable
corporation or association exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) for use consistent
with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption; nothing in this
section shall prevent a brewer from serving beer without charge, on the brewery
premises; nothing in this section shall prevent donations of wine for the
purposes of RCW 66.12.180; and nothing in this section shall prevent a domestic
winery from serving wine without charge, on the winery premises.

Sec.
31. RCW
66.28.060 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
distillery licensed under this title shall make monthly reports to the board
pursuant to the regulations. No such distillery shall make any sale of spirits
within the state of Washington except to ((the board)) a licensed
spirits distributor.

Sec.
32. RCW
66.28.070 and 1994 c 201 s 5 and 1994 c 63 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, it shall be unlawful for
any retail spirits, beer, or wine licensee to purchase spirits,
beer, or wine, except from a duly licensed ((wholesaler or the board))
distributor, and it shall be unlawful for any brewer, winery, or spirits,
beer, or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor to purchase spirits,
beer, or wine, except from a duly licensed spirits, beer,
or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor or importer.

(2)
A spirits, beer, or wine retailer licensee may purchase spirits,
beer, or wine from a government agency which has lawfully seized spirits,
beer, or wine from a licensed spirits, beer, or wine
retailer, or from a board-authorized retailer, or from a licensed retailer
which has discontinued business if the ((wholesaler)) distributor
has refused to accept spirits, beer, or wine from that retailer
for return and refund. Spirits, beer, and wine purchased under
this subsection shall meet the quality standards set by its manufacturer.

(3)
Special occasion licensees holding ((either a class G or J)) a
special occasion license may only purchase beer or wine from a beer or wine
retailer duly licensed to sell beer or wine for off-premises consumption((,
the board,)) or from a duly licensed beer or wine ((wholesaler)) distributor.

Sec.
33. RCW
66.28.180 and 1997 c 321 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is unlawful for a person, firm, or corporation holding a certificate of
approval issued under RCW 66.24.270 or 66.24.206, a spirits distributor's
license, a beer distributor's license, a domestic brewer's license, a
microbrewer's license, a beer importer's license, a beer distributor's license,
a domestic winery license, a wine importer's license, or a wine distributor's
license within the state of Washington to modify any prices without prior
notification to and approval of the board.

(1)
Intent. This section is enacted, pursuant to the authority of this state under
the twenty-first amendment to the United States Constitution, to promote the
public's interest in fostering the orderly and responsible distribution of ((malt))
alcoholic beverages ((and wine)) towards effective control of
consumption; to promote the fair and efficient three-tier system of
distribution of such beverages; and to confirm existing board rules as the
clear expression of state policy to regulate the manner of selling and pricing of
((wine and malt)) alcoholic beverages by licensed suppliers and
distributors.

(2)
Spirits, beer, and wine distributor price posting.

(a)
Every spirits, beer, or wine distributor shall file with the
board at its office in Olympia a price posting showing the wholesale prices at
which any and all brands of spirits, beer, and wine sold by such
((beer and/or wine)) distributor shall be sold to retailers within the
state.

(b)
Each price posting shall be made on a form prepared and furnished by the board,
or a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth:

(i)
All brands, types, packages, and containers of beer offered for sale by such
beer and/or wine distributor;

(ii)
The wholesale prices thereof to retail licensees, including allowances, if any,
for returned empty containers.

(c)
No spirits, beer, and/or wine distributor may sell or offer to
sell any package or container of spirits, beer, or wine to any
retail licensee at a price differing from the price for such package or
container as shown in the price posting filed by the ((beer and/or wine))
distributor and then in effect, according to rules adopted by the board.

(d)
Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price may be posted that is below
acquisition cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost. However, the board is
empowered to review periodically, as it may deem appropriate, the amount of the
percentage of acquisition cost as a minimum mark-up over cost and to modify
such percentage by rule of the board, except such percentage shall be not less than
ten percent.

(e)
Distributor prices on a "close-out" item shall be accepted by the
board if the item to be discontinued has been listed on the state market for a
period of at least six months, and upon the further condition that the
distributor who posts such a close-out price shall not restock the item for a
period of one year following the first effective date of such close-out price.

(f)
The board may reject any price posting that it deems to be in violation of this
section or any rule, or portion thereof, or that would tend to disrupt the
orderly sale and distribution of beer, spirits, and wine. Whenever the
board rejects any posting, the licensee submitting the posting may be heard by
the board and shall have the burden of showing that the posting is not in
violation of this section or a rule or does not tend to disrupt the orderly
sale and distribution of spirits, beer, and wine. If the posting
is accepted, it shall become effective at the time fixed by the board. If the
posting is rejected, the last effective posting shall remain in effect until
such time as an amended posting is filed and approved, in accordance with the
provisions of this section.

(g)
All price postings filed as required by this section shall at all times be open
to inspection to all trade buyers within the state of Washington and shall not
in any sense be considered confidential.

(h)
Any spirits, beer, and/or wine distributor or employee authorized
by the distributor-employer may sell spirits, beer, and/or wine
at the distributor's posted prices to any annual or special occasion retail
licensee upon presentation to the distributor or employee at the time of
purchase of a special permit issued by the board to such licensee.

(i)
Every annual or special occasion retail licensee, upon purchasing any beer
and/or wine from a distributor, shall immediately cause such beer or wine to be
delivered to the licensed premises, and the licensee shall not thereafter
permit such beer to be disposed of in any manner except as authorized by the
license.

(ii)
Spirits, beer, and wine sold as provided in this section shall be
delivered by the distributor or an authorized employee either to the retailer's
licensed premises or directly to the retailer at the distributor's licensed
premises. A distributor's prices to retail licensees shall be the same at both
such places of delivery.

(3)
Beer and wine suppliers' price filings, contracts, and memoranda.

(a)
Every brewery and winery offering beer and/or wine for sale within the state
shall file with the board at its office in Olympia a copy of every written
contract and a memorandum of every oral agreement which such brewery or winery
may have with any beer or wine distributor, which contracts or memoranda shall
contain a schedule of prices charged to distributors for all items and all
terms of sale, including all regular and special discounts; all advertising,
sales and trade allowances, and incentive programs; and all commissions,
bonuses or gifts, and any and all other discounts or allowances. Whenever
changed or modified, such revised contracts or memoranda shall forthwith be
filed with the board as provided for by rule. The provisions of this section
also apply to certificate of approval holders, beer and/or wine importers, and
beer and/or wine distributors who sell to other beer and/or wine distributors.

Each
price schedule shall be made on a form prepared and furnished by the board, or
a reasonable facsimile thereof, and shall set forth all brands, types,
packages, and containers of beer or wine offered for sale by such licensed
brewery or winery; all additional information required may be filed as a
supplement to the price schedule forms.

(b)
Prices filed by a brewery or winery shall be uniform prices to all distributors
on a state-wide basis less bona fide allowances for freight differentials.
Quantity discounts are prohibited. No price shall be filed that is below
acquisition/production cost plus ten percent of that cost, except that acquisition
cost plus ten percent of acquisition cost does not apply to sales of beer or
wine between a beer or wine importer who sells beer or wine to another beer or
wine importer or to a beer or wine distributor, or to a beer or wine
distributor who sells beer or wine to another beer or wine distributor.
However, the board is empowered to review periodically, as it may deem
appropriate, the amount of the percentage of acquisition/production cost as a
minimum mark-up over cost and to modify such percentage by rule of the board,
except such percentage shall be not less than ten percent.

(c)
No brewery, winery, certificate of approval holder, beer or wine importer, or
beer or wine distributor may sell or offer to sell any beer or wine to any
persons whatsoever in this state until copies of such written contracts or
memoranda of such oral agreements are on file with the board.

(d)
No brewery or winery may sell or offer to sell any package or container of beer
or wine to any distributor at a price differing from the price for such package
or container as shown in the schedule of prices filed by the brewery or winery
and then in effect, according to rules adopted by the board.

(e)
The board may reject any supplier's price filing, contract, or memorandum of
oral agreement, or portion thereof that it deems to be in violation of this
section or any rule or that would tend to disrupt the orderly sale and
distribution of beer or wine. Whenever the board rejects any such price
filing, contract, or memorandum, the licensee submitting the price filing,
contract, or memorandum may be heard by the board and shall have the burden of
showing that the price filing, contract, or memorandum is not in violation of
this section or a rule or does not tend to disrupt the orderly sale and
distribution of beer or wine. If the price filing, contract, or memorandum is
accepted, it shall become effective at a time fixed by the board. If the price
filing, contract, or memorandum, or portion thereof, is rejected, the last
effective price filing, contract, or memorandum shall remain in effect until
such time as an amended price filing, contract, or memorandum is filed and
approved, in accordance with the provisions of this section.

(f) All prices, contracts, and memoranda filed as required by this
section shall at all times be open to inspection to all trade buyers within the
state of Washington and shall not in any sense be considered confidential.

Sec.
34. RCW
66.28.190 and 1997 c 321 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
66.28.010 notwithstanding, persons licensed under RCW 66.24.200 as wine
distributors ((and)), persons licensed under RCW 66.24.250 as
beer distributors, and persons licensed under section 18 of this act may
sell at wholesale nonliquor food products on thirty-day credit terms to persons
licensed as retailers under this title, but complete and separate accounting
records shall be maintained on all sales of nonliquor food products to ensure
that such persons are in compliance with RCW 66.28.010.

For
the purpose of this section, "nonliquor food products" includes all
food products for human consumption as defined in RCW 82.08.0293 as it exists
on July 1, 1987, except that for the purposes of this section bottled water and
carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen, shall be considered food
products.

Sec.
35. RCW
66.40.140 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a majority of qualified voters voting upon said question in any such unit shall
have voted "Against sale of liquor", the county auditor shall file
with the liquor control board a certificate showing the result of the canvass
at such election; and thereafter, except as hereinafter provided, it shall not
be lawful for ((a liquor store to be operated therein nor for))
licensees to maintain and operate licensed premises therein except as
hereinafter provided:

(1)
((As to any stores maintained by the board within any such unit at the time
of such licensing, the board shall have a period of thirty days from and after
the date of the canvass of the vote upon such election to continue operation of
its store or stores therein.

(2))) As
to any premises licensed hereunder within any such unit at the time of such
election, such licensee shall have a period of sixty days from and after the
date of the canvass of the vote upon such election in which to discontinue
operation of its store or stores therein.

(((3)))
(2) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any distillery, brewery,
rectifying plant or winery or the licensed operators thereof from selling its
manufactured product, manufactured within such unit, outside the boundaries
thereof.

(((4)))
(3) Nothing herein contained shall prevent any person residing in any
unit in which the sale of liquor shall have been forbidden by popular vote as
herein provided, who is otherwise qualified to receive and hold a permit under
this title, from lawfully purchasing without the unit and transporting into or
receiving within the unit, liquor lawfully purchased by him outside the
boundaries of such unit.

Sec.
36. RCW
66.44.150 and 1955 c 289 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((If))
Any person in this state who buys alcoholic beverages from any
person other than ((the board,)) a ((state liquor store,)) licensee
or some person authorized by the board to sell ((them, he shall be)) it
is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec.
37. RCW
66.44.160 and 1955 c 289 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in this title, any person who has or keeps or transports
alcoholic beverages other than those purchased from ((the board,)) a ((state
liquor store,)) licensee or some person authorized by the board to
sell ((them, shall be)) it is guilty of a violation of this
title.

Sec.
38. RCW
66.44.318 and 1995 c 100 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Licensees
holding nonretail class liquor licenses are permitted to allow their employees
between (([the])) the ages of eighteen and twenty-one to stock,
merchandise, and handle spirits, beer, or wine on or about the
nonretail premises if there is an adult twenty-one years of age or older on
duty supervising such activities on the premises.

Sec.
39. RCW
66.44.340 and 1986 c 5 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Employers
holding ((class E and/or F)) retail liquor licenses exclusively for
off-premises consumption are permitted to allow their employees, between
the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years, to sell, stock, and handle spirits,
beer, or wine in, on or about any establishment holding ((a class E
and/or class F)) such license exclusively: PROVIDED, That there is an
adult twenty-one years of age or older on duty supervising the sale of liquor
at the licensed premises: PROVIDED, That minor employees may make deliveries
of spirits, beer, and/or wine purchased from licensees holding ((class
E and/or class F)) retail liquor licenses exclusively for
off-premises consumption, when delivery is made to cars of customers
adjacent to such licensed premises but only, however, when the minor employee
is accompanied by the purchaser.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 40. A
new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

There
is hereby imposed upon all spirits sold by spirits distributors licensed under
this title, a tax at the rate of one dollar and sixty-two cents per liter. The
tax provided for in this section shall be collected by direct payments based on
spirits sold by spirits distributors. Every person selling spirits under the
provisions of this section shall on or before the twentieth day of each month
report to the board all sales during the preceding calendar month in such
manner and upon such forms as may be prescribed by the board, and with such
report shall pay the tax due from the sales covered by such report unless the
same has previously been paid. Any such seller of spirits whose applicable tax
payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of purchase
will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent a month or fraction
thereof. The board may require that every such person execute and file with
the board a bond to be approved by the board, in such amount as the board may
fix, securing the payment of the tax. If any such person fails to pay the tax
when due, the board may forthwith suspend or cancel the license until all taxes
are paid. All revenues collected under this section shall be deposited in the
liquor revolving fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 41. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A consumption surcharge is established to be paid by spirits distributors on
the sale or transfer of spirits from the distributor to the retailer.

(2)
The board shall establish the annual base consumption rate determined by the
total liter volume per capita of spirits sold through state liquor stores and
vendor agencies and to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees during
calendar year 1998.

(3)
Beginning on January 1, 2002, and each year thereafter, the board shall monitor
sales and transfers of spirits by spirits distributors. If during calendar
year 2002 the total liter volume per capita of spirits sold or transferred
reaches the 1998 annual liter volume per capita, the board shall collect from
each spirits distributor, beginning April 1, 2003, a surcharge of two dollars
per liter of spirits sold or transferred between April 1, 2003, and March 31,
2004.

(4)
If the total liter volume per capita of spirits sold or transferred during
calendar year 2003 falls below the base consumption rate established in 1998,
imposition of the consumption surcharge shall be terminated beginning April 1,
2004.

(5)
Beginning with calendar year 2005, and each year thereafter, if the total liter
volume per capita of spirits exceeds the total liter volume per capita of
spirits sold or transferred in the base consumption year of 1998, the board
shall impose a surcharge, beginning on April 1st of the following year, on the
sale or transfer of spirits by spirit distributors to spirit retailers for a
period of three hundred fifty-two days.

(6)
Revenue generated by the consumption surcharge shall be deposited in the liquor
revolving fund and the surcharge, when imposed, shall be collected by the board
annually from distributors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 42. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
liquor control board must determined annually per capita consumption levels and
total volume by liter of spirits sold or transferred during the calendar year
by a spirits distributor to a retail licensee authorized to sell spirits. The
board may recommend consumption surcharge adjustments to respond to any
increase in consumption above the base level established for 1998. It is the
intent of the legislature that as consumption increases over the level
established by the board for calendar year 1998, a surcharge be imposed that
increases the cost of the product as a means of controlling consumption.

Sec.
43. RCW
66.08.170 and 1961 ex.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund", which shall
consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures, consumption
surcharge revenues, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by
the board. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys
received by the board or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an
amount of petty cash as fixed by the board within the authority of law shall be
deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and
transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the liquor revolving fund.
Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the board
or a duly authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 44. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any licensee that employs a former state liquor store employee during calendar
year 2002 may deduct from his or her annual license fee for the subsequent year
one dollar for each hour the employee is employed by the licensee up to the
license fee amount.

(2)
For purposes of this section, "former state liquor store employee"
means an individual employed full time by the liquor control board at a state
liquor store for at least six months prior to the effective date of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 45. (1)
The liquor control board shall begin the process of terminating its operations
involving the retail sale and wholesale distribution of liquor. The board and
the office of financial management shall determine those actions necessary to
terminate the board's direct involvement in the retail sale and wholesale
distribution of liquor by July 1, 2002, and make recommendations to the
legislature by December 1, 1999, on the following:

(a)
Disposition of equipment and inventory under the control of the liquor control
board used in the operation of state liquor stores and agency vendor stores;

(b)
Disposition of all warehousing facilities and other equipment and vehicles used
in the wholesale distribution of liquor;

(c)
The status of contracts and other obligations;

(d)
Determine the impact on sales and availability of spirits to the public during
the period of decreasing state liquor store operation and the implementation of
private retail and wholesaling of spirits;

(e)
Identification of issues and a plan for treatment of personnel; and

(f)
Any other actions determined necessary by the reporting agencies.

(2)
The board is authorized to take actions necessary to implement the spirits
distributor's license and the spirits retail license for grocery stores by July
1, 2002.

(3)
The board shall exercise due diligence to reduce any liabilities associated
with discontinuing board retailing and wholesaling operations including
contract commitments for the acquisition of alcoholic beverages or interests in
real estate used for the retailing and wholesaling of alcoholic beverages past
July 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 46. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
66.08.070 and 1985 c 226 s 2, 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 1, &
1933 ex.s. c 62 s 67;

(2) RCW
66.08.160 and 1947 c 134 s 1;

(3) RCW
66.08.235 and 1997 c 75 s 1;

(4) RCW
66.12.020 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 48;

(5) RCW
66.16.010 and 1939 c 172 s 10, 1937 c 62 s 1, & 1933 ex.s. c
62 s 4;

(6) RCW
66.16.030 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 6;

(7) RCW
66.16.041 and 1998 c 265 s 3, 1997 c 148 s 2, & 1996 c 291 s
2;

(8) RCW
66.16.050 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 8;

(9) RCW
66.16.060 and 1943 c 216 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 9;

(10) RCW
66.16.070 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 10;

(11) RCW
66.16.080 and 1988 c 101 s 1 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 11;

(12) RCW
66.16.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 89;

(13) RCW
66.20.160 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 15 s 2, 1959
c 111 s 4, & 1949 c 67 s 1;

(14) RCW
66.24.440 and 1998 c 126 s 8, 1997 c 321 s 29, & 1949 c 5 s
5;

(15) RCW
66.32.010 and 1955 c 39 s 3; and

(16) RCW
66.44.120 and 1992 c 7 s 42 & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 47.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 47. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 48.
Sections 1 through 44 and 46 of this act take effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---