BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to establish procedures for the orderly formation of new
counties and to provide for an equitable apportionment of the debts,
liabilities, and assets of the parent county or counties between the new county
and the remaining portions or portions of each parent county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Assets" means all: (a) Real estate and leasehold interests in real
estate owned by the parent county; (b) tangible personal property owned or
leased by the parent county; and (c) intangible personal property owned by the
parent county including cash, securities, commercial paper, notes, accounts
receivable, and contract rights. Assets are determined as of the first day of
the interim period.

(2)
"Interim period" means the period during which a new county
government is established, the apportionment of debts, liabilities, and assets
is implemented, and the transfer of all records from the parent county or
counties to the new county is completed. The period begins on January 1st
after the end of the regular session at which the new county is created by
special legislation or the year in which an election for the formation of a new
county is approved, and the period ends on December 31st of the same year.

(3)
"New county" means the county that is created by striking territory
from a parent county or counties under Article XI, section 3 of the state
Constitution.

(4)
"Parent county or counties" means the existing county or counties out
of which territory is stricken to create a new county under Article XI, section
3 of the state Constitution.

(5)
"Proponents" means up to five individuals who are registered voters
in the proposed new county who initiate the petition process to create a new
county under section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
proponent or proponents of a proposed new county shall, before the circulation
of a petition in support of the formation of that new county, file with the
secretary of state a statement designating the name of the proposed county and
containing the legal description of the proposed county, together with an
affidavit from each proponent that he or she is a registered voter within the
territory of the proposed county. If there are two or more proponents, one of
them must be designated as the principal proponent for the purpose of receiving
notices and communications required by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Upon receipt of the legal description and affidavit of sponsorship for a
proposed new county, the secretary of state shall forward a copy of the legal
description to the office of financial management.

(2)
Within thirty days of receipt of this request from the secretary of state, the
director of the office of financial management shall determine if the legal
description is consistent and the territory described is a single, contiguous
area. If the legal description is defective, the director shall notify the
secretary of state and the principal proponent of the nature and extent of the
defect.

(3)
If the legal description is not defective, the director shall also determine
the population of the proposed new county and the population of the remaining
portion or portions of each parent county, using the most current data
available. The director shall certify these populations to the secretary of
state and the principal proponent of the new county within thirty days of
receipt of the request from the secretary of state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Petitions for the formation of a new county must be substantially in the
following form:

WARNING

Every
person who signs this petition with any other than his or her true name,
knowingly signs more than one petition for the same new county, signs this
petition when he or she is not a registered voter, or makes any false statement
on this petition may be punished by fine or imprisonment or both.

PETITION
FOR THE FORMATION OF ........ COUNTY

To the
Honorable ........, Secretary of State of the State of Washington:

We
the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the state of Washington,
respectfully direct that this petition for the formation of
. . . . . county, a full, true, and correct copy of the
legal description of which is printed on the reverse side of this petition, be
transmitted to the legislature of the state of Washington, at its next ensuing
regular session. We respectfully petition the legislature to create this new
county as provided by law. Each of us for himself or herself declares that: I
have personally signed this petition, I am a legal voter of the state of
Washington, my residence address is correctly stated, and I have not knowingly
signed any other petition for the formation of this county.

Petitioner's │ Print name │ Residence
address, │ City │

signature │ for positive │ street, and
number, │ or │ County

│ identification │ if any │ Town │

│ │ │ │

(Here follow 20 numbered lines divided into columns as below.)

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

1B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

2B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

│ │
│ │

│ │ │ │

│ │ │ │

3B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B B

etc.

A
complete legal description of the proposed county must be printed on the
reverse side of the petition sheet. A map of the proposed new county may be
printed on the front or back of the petition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Petitions for the formation of a new county, signed by the requisite number of
registered voters in the proposed county, may be submitted to the secretary of
state at any time up to two years after the certification of the legal
description and populations under section 4 of this act. The standards for
acceptance or rejection of signature petitions for the formation of a new
county are the same as for initiatives under RCW 29.79.150, and any appeal of a
refusal by the secretary of state to file signature petitions will proceed in
the same manner as provided for initiatives under RCW 29.79.160 and 29.79.170.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
petition for the creation of a new county circulated before the effective date
of this act, filed under section 6 of this act with the secretary of state
within two years of the effective date of this act, and differing in form from
the information required by section 5 of this act is acceptable as to the
requirements for form.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
petition proposing the creation of a new county must be signed by at least
fifty percent of the registered voters residing in the combined portions of
each parent county from which territory is proposed to be stricken and included
in the new county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
Every person who signs a petition requesting the creation of a new county with
any other than his or her true name is guilty of a class C felony punishable
under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)
Every person who: (a) Knowingly signs more than one petition for the same
effort to create a new county; (b) signs a petition requesting the creation of
a new county knowing that he or she is not a legal voter; or (c) makes a false
statement as to his or her residence on any petition requesting the creation of
a new county, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Within sixty days of receipt of the petition under section 6 of this act, the
secretary of state shall examine the signatures on the petition and determine
if the number of valid signatures of registered voters on the petition exceeds
the number required by section 8 of this act. The secretary of state may
contract with the appropriate county auditor or county auditors to conduct the
examination of the signatures in that county or perform any other functions
necessary to making the determination of the number of valid signatures on the
petition. A variation between the signature on the petition and that on the
registration record due to the substitution of initials or the use of common
nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and handwriting are clearly the
same.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
The secretary of state shall certify to the proponents and to the legislature
whether the proposed new county and the remaining parent county or counties
will have the minimum populations required by the state Constitution and
whether the petition has been signed by at least fifty percent of the
registered voters in the combined portions of each parent county that is to be
stricken to form the new county.

(2)
The secretary of state shall also notify the presiding judge of the division of
the state court of appeals that contains the greatest portion of the population
of the new county that a petition for the formation of a new county has been
transmitted to the legislature and shall transmit with the notice a copy of the
legal description of the proposed county.

(3)
Any proponent or opponent of the new county, dissatisfied with the
determination of the secretary of state under this section, may appeal that
determination to the superior court of Thurston county. The review by the
superior court will proceed in the same manner as for initiatives under RCW
29.79.210.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. When
a division of the court of appeals is notified under section 11 of this act,
the presiding judge shall appoint a special master to gather facts, conduct
hearings, review evidence, and make recommendations to the court regarding the
division of assets and liabilities between the new county and the parent county
or counties in accordance with sections 13 through 18 of this act. The
principal proponent of the new county and the legislative authority of any
parent county or counties from which territory is to be stricken are proper
parties to this proceeding and may recommend individuals to serve as the
special master.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. (1)
The special master may employ appraisers, accountants, actuaries, engineers,
attorneys, or other experts, and consult with state and local agencies, to
assemble and evaluate evidence and exercise all other powers otherwise granted
to the court that are necessary for the efficient and just resolution of
issues.

(2)
The court of appeals may award payment of fees and costs to any special master
and any experts that the special master is authorized to retain and may assess
such fees and costs against the parent county and the new county in such
proportions as it deems just.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Whenever a new county is created out of territory that was stricken from
another county or counties, the new county is liable for an equitable
proportion of the debts and liabilities of the parent county or counties and
must receive an equitable proportion of the assets of the parent county or
counties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
In apportioning the debts and liabilities under section 14 of this act, the
court shall not charge either county with any share of debts or liabilities
then existing incurred in the purchase of county property, or in the purchase
or construction of public buildings then in use or under construction, or roads
or bridges then in use or under construction, that are located within the other
county except where the repayment of the debt or liability is being made or is
to be made from bonds originally authorized by a vote of the qualified electors
in the other county.

(2)
The remaining debts and liabilities of the parent county must be apportioned so
that the new county is assigned an amount of these debts and liabilities that
is in the same proportion as the assessed valuation of the new county, that was
part of that parent county, is to the total assessed valuation in the parent
county before the creation of the new county. The assessed valuations must be
those used for taxes imposed in the year before the election was held
authorizing the creation of the new county.

(3)
This section may not be construed to affect the rights of creditors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. (1)
In apportioning the assets of the parent county or counties, each parent county
retains ownership of real property it owns that remains in its boundaries after
the creation of the new county. At the effective date of the creation of the
new county, the new county acquires ownership of real property that was owned by
the parent county or counties that is located in the new county. No valuation
of or compensation for real property is required.

(2)
All equipment owned by each parent county that is used in the construction or
maintenance of roads or bridges must be apportioned based on total appraised
value of the equipment between the new county and the parent county so that the
new county receives a portion of this equipment that is in the same proportion
as the number of miles of county roads in the new county, that were part of
that parent county, is to the total number of miles of county roads in the
parent county before the creation of the new county.

(3)
All other assets of each parent county, the apportionment of which is not
otherwise provided for, must be apportioned between the parent county and the
new county based on total appraised value of the assets so that the new county
receives a portion of these assets that is in the same proportion as the
assessed valuation of the new county, that was part of the parent county, is to
the total assessed valuation of the parent county before the creation of the
new county. The assessed valuations must be those used for taxes imposed in
the year of the election authorizing creation of the new county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1)
Within six months after receiving notice under section 11(2) of this act, the
court of appeals shall enter an order apportioning all debts, liabilities, and
assets of the parent county or counties between the parent counties and new
county and providing for the method of transfer or payment, subject to the
creation of the new county under section 18 of this act. The order of the
court of appeals is final.

(2)
RCW 2.06.040 applies to a proceeding under this section, except that a decision
rendered under this section does not have precedential value and need not be
published as an opinion of the court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. (1)
If all the requirements of Article XI, section 3 of the state Constitution for
the creation of a new county have been met, the legislature may, during the
first regular session after certification under section 11(1) of this act,
enact special legislation creating that county. The legislation may provide
that the creation of the new county is subject to approval by a majority of the
voters in the proposed new county.

(2) If the
legislature does not enact special legislation creating the county under
subsection (1) of this section, the question of the creation of that county
must be referred to a vote of the registered voters residing in the proposed
new county at the next general election more than one hundred twenty days after
the adjournment of the session at which the special legislation could have been
enacted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. (1)
If the legislature provides for the creation of a new county under section 18
of this act by special legislation, that special legislation must include:

(a)
A legal description of the proposed new county;

(b)
The initial annual salaries of the elected officers of the new county;

(c)
An initial county seat for the new county;

(d)
Provision for the initial election of officers of the new county if those are
different from sections 20 through 22 of this act;

(e)
Provision for a superior court and district court for the new county;

(f)
Boundaries for three commissioner districts in the proposed new county subject
to the criteria in RCW 29.70.100(4);

(g)
Provision for any necessary financial resources for the new county during the
interim period and until the receipt of regular taxes and other revenues; and

(h)
Any other measures the legislature finds appropriate to the efficient
organization and operation of the new county government.

(3)
All counties must consist of a single contiguous area of land and water. If
the legislature decides to modify the boundaries of the proposed new county, it
shall consider the economic stability, the efficiency of administration,
natural geographic barriers, transportation corridors, and the boundaries of
existing communities and governmental units, as such factors affect the
proposed new county and the remaining parent county or counties. The
legislature may not make changes in the boundaries that would result in the
creation of a new county that does not satisfy the requirements of Article XI,
section 3 of the state Constitution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. If
special legislation enacted under section 18(1) of this act does not provide
otherwise or if the question of the formation of a new county is referred under
section 18(2) of this act, that question must be submitted to the voters of the
new county in substantially the following form:

"Shall
the new county of (insert
name of new county) be created and the assets and liabilities of
(insert the name of the parent county or counties) be divided with this new
county as provided in (cite the order of the court of appeals)? - yes or
no?"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. (1)
If special legislation enacted under section 18(1) of this act does not provide
otherwise or if the question of the formation of a new county is referred under
section 18(2) of this act, a primary must be held under RCW 29.13.070 for the nomination
of candidates for the various county elected offices, and elections for those
offices must be held in conjunction with the state general election in that
year. Except as provided in this section, nominations and elections must be
held as provided by the general election laws for partisan county offices.

(2)
Declarations of candidacy for the initial terms of office for the elected
county offices in the new county must be filed with the county auditor of the
parent county if the new county is to be created out of territory from only one
county and with the secretary of state if the new county is to be formed out of
territory from more than one parent county.

(3)
Candidates for the office of county commissioner shall file for one of three
separate county commissioner positions. If county commissioner districts were
created by the special legislation, the filing officer shall designate one
position for each district, and the voters in each district shall nominate the
candidates for county commissioner for that district.

(4)
If any parent county does not provide a local voters' pamphlet for the primary
or the general election under chapter 29.81A RCW, the secretary of state shall
provide a pamphlet for the jurisdiction of the proposed new county only.

(5)
The county auditor or auditors shall conduct and canvass the election and
certify the results to the secretary of state, who shall canvass and certify
the results of the primary and the election.

(6)
The newly elected county officials shall assume office immediately upon the
certification of the election with limited powers during the interim period as
provided in this chapter and full powers after the expiration of the interim
period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. If
the legislature creates a new county under section 18(1) of this act or if a
majority of the registered voters who reside within the boundaries of the
proposed new county voting on the question vote in favor of creation of a new
county under section 18 (1) or (2), the new county is established, with an
interim organization period commencing on January 1st of the year after the
session at which the special legislation was enacted or the election at which
the voters approved the formation of the new county. The interim period
expires on December 31st of the year in which it started.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the terms of office for
all of the initial county officials are from the date of the certification of
their election until their successors are elected and qualified at the next
general election that is two years before the year in which the governor is
elected.

(2)
The commissioner or commissioners who receive the greatest number of votes for
their respective positions at the general election provided for under section
21 of this act will receive the longer unexpired term or terms.

(3)
No regular or unexpired term elections may be held during the interim period.
Vacancies in elected county offices will be filled by appointment.

(4)
After the expiration of the first set of unexpired terms, the terms of all
officers will be four years and until their successors are elected and
qualified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. If
the new county is created, the new county shall reimburse the parent county or
counties for its share of the primary and election costs under RCW 29.13.045.
If the new county is not created, the parent county or counties shall pay the
cost of conducting the primary and the election to create a new county and
elect county officers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25.
Except as provided in this section, the creation of a new county may not affect
the boundaries of a city, town, or special district of any kind.

(1)
Unless the initial board of county commissioners provides otherwise, a single
road district must exist in the new county composed of all the unincorporated
area within the new county. Territory that is stricken from a parent county to
create a new county must also be stricken from the road district or districts
of the parent county effective as of the final day of the interim period.

(2)
An area in a new county that was included in a county rural library district
must remain part of that county rural library district. The trustees of such a
library district must be appointed by joint action of the members of the county
legislative authorities of the parent county or counties and the new county,
with the vote on each appointment distributed among the members of the county
legislative authorities so that the combined total vote of all the members of a
single county legislative authority is in direct proportion to the percentage
of population within the library district residing in that county and each
member of that county legislative authority receiving an equal portion of that
vote.

(3)
Effective on the first day after the interim period for the creation of a new
county, a public transportation benefit area that includes territory located in
both the remaining parent county and new county will have its boundaries
reduced to eliminate any territory located in the new county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. The
superior court and district court for the new county shall obtain jurisdiction
over all new matters filed on or after the interim period expires, over which
those courts otherwise have jurisdiction under the state Constitution and state
law. The superior court and district court of the parent county or counties
shall retain jurisdiction of any matters pending before them or on appeal from
them on December 31st at the close of the interim period unless all parties to
the matter stipulate to a change of venue to the superior or district court of
the new county.

All
pleadings, process, documents, and files in the office of the county clerk and
in the offices of officers of the superior or district court of a parent county
pertaining to actions and proceedings transferred to the superior or district
court of the new county must be certified and transferred to the county clerk
or to officers of the superior or district court of the new county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27.
Within ten months of the beginning of the interim period for a new county, all
records, documents, and papers in the offices of county auditor, county
assessor, county treasurer, and other county officers of a parent county,
affecting the title or possession of real property in the new county, assessed
valuation of property located in the new county, registration of voters
residing in the new county, or other appropriate matters, must be certified by
the appropriate parent county official and must be transferred to the
appropriate county officials and officers of the new county. If original
records, documents, or papers are not transferred, certified copies must be
provided. The appropriate county officials of the parent county and the new
county may agree to these transfers through electronic, mechanical, or other
methods that adequately ensure the accuracy of the transferred information.
The new county shall pay all costs incurred with regard to the transfer of
records, documents, and papers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28.
During the interim period for a new county, the initial county officials have
the following powers:

(1)
The initial board of county commissioners may adopt ordinances and adopt
resolutions necessary to implement the general powers provided by this
section. The initial board of county commissioners may also adopt ordinances
on any matter within the authority of a noncharter county. The ordinances
become effective on the expiration of the interim period.

(2)
The initial county officials, subject to state law governing counties in
general, may purchase or lease land, buildings, equipment, and supplies; contract
for services; and employ staff as necessary to implement the powers provided by
this section and to assure the establishment of the necessary infrastructure
and staffing for the full operation of county government on the expiration of
the interim period.

(3)
The initial county officials may enter interlocal agreements with the parent
county or counties to facilitate the establishment of the new county government
and for services to be rendered following the interim period.

(4)
The initial board of county commissioners may:

(a)
Cause tax anticipation or revenue anticipation notes or warrants or other
short-term obligations to be issued as provided in chapter 39.50 RCW;

(b)
Authorize the borrowing of money from state or federal agencies to the same extent
as is authorized for a nonhome-rule county;

(c)
Submit ballot propositions to the voters of the new county authorizing a
single-year excess levy to be imposed, as provided by RCW 84.52.052;

(d)
Submit ballot propositions to the voters of the new county authorizing both
voter-approved general indebtedness and bond retirement excess levies, as
provided by RCW 84.52.056 and 39.36.050;

(e)
Impose property taxes as authorized for counties, to be collected after the
interim period; and

(f)
Impose excise taxes as authorized for counties effective on January 1st after
the interim period, including, but not limited to, sales and use taxes
authorized in chapter 82.14 RCW and real estate excise taxes authorized in
chapter 82.46 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29. The
initial county officers of a new county during the interim period are subject
to all state laws limiting the authority of or imposing obligations on such
offices as if the new county were fully established.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30. All
ordinances, rules, and regulations of a parent county that are in effect at the
beginning of the interim period for a new county and that are adopted by the
parent county during the interim period of a new county have their full force
and effect within the portion of the parent county that is stricken to form the
new county until the end of the interim period, unless repealed by the parent
county before that date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31.
During the interim period for a new county, the parent county or counties
remains responsible for providing all county services previously provided by
that parent county in the portion of the parent county that is stricken to form
a new county at the current level of service, unless otherwise agreed to
between the parent county and the initial officers of the new county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 32. (1)
The budget for the interim period for a new county must be adopted as provided
in this section. The budget for the first budget cycle of the new county after
the interim period must be adopted as provided in chapter 36.40 RCW.

(2)
The initial board of county commissioners shall adopt a budget for the interim
period and make any subsequent amendments in consultation with the state
auditor and the department of community, trade, and economic development. The
department of community, trade, and economic development shall provide to the
initial officers of the new county, at the earliest date feasible after the
election authorizing formation of the new county, a report detailing the
potential revenues and expenses of the new county. The interim period budget
may initially authorize expenditure of moneys by general category without
specific detail. The budget may be amended periodically during the interim
period to reflect actual revenues or expenditure requirements as they become
known.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 33.
During the interim period for a new county, the initial board of county
commissioners may borrow money from the state treasurer in amounts and on terms
deemed prudent and reasonable by the state treasurer.

Any
loan obtained under this section must be repaid within three years of the initial
disbursement. The state treasurer may withhold moneys from the funds otherwise
payable to the new county to assure repayment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 34. Each
parent county shall continue imposing sales and use taxes throughout its entire
boundaries until the end of the interim period. Before the end of the interim
period, each parent county will continue receiving federal and state moneys
allocated to it as if the new county did not exist. State moneys must be
allocated to the new county on whatever basis these moneys are distributed
commencing on the first day after the interim period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 35. The
rule of strict construction does not apply to this chapter. The authority
granted to the initial county commissioners of a new county must be liberally
interpreted to provide for a transition to a new county during the interim
period so that, to the greatest extent possible, a new county will be able to
fully function as a complete county government at the date the new county is
officially created.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 36. A
new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
on January 1st following the interim period for a new county, the department of
transportation shall adjust the allocations of transportation moneys made to
counties to include the new county on the same bases as apply to previously
existing counties.

Sec.
37. RCW
36.32.020 and 1982 c 226 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of county commissioners of each county shall divide their county into
three commissioner districts so that each district shall comprise as nearly as
possible one-third of the population of the county((: PROVIDED, That)).
The territory comprised in any voting precincts of such districts shall
remain compact, and shall not be divided by the lines of said districts.

However,
the commissioners of any county composed entirely of islands and with a
population of less than thirty-five thousand may divide their county into three
commissioner districts without regard to population, except that if any single
island is included in more than one district, the districts on such island
shall comprise, as nearly as possible, equal populations.

The lines of the districts shall not be changed ((oftener)) more
often than once in four years except for the initial districts in a new
county created under section 18 of this act and only when a full board of
commissioners is present. The districts shall be designated as districts
numbered one, two, and three.

Sec.
38. RCW
84.09.030 and 1996 c 230 s 1613 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as follows, the boundaries of counties, cities and all other taxing districts,
for purposes of property taxation and the levy of property taxes, shall be the
established official boundaries of such districts existing on the first day of
March of the year in which the property tax levy is made.

The
official boundaries of a newly incorporated taxing district shall be
established at a different date in the year in which the incorporation occurred
as follows:

(1)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated city shall be established on the last day
of March of the year in which the initial property tax levy is made, and the
boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire protection district or
districts, that include any portion of the area that was incorporated within
its boundaries shall be altered as of this date to exclude this area, if the
budget for the newly incorporated city is filed pursuant to RCW 84.52.020 and
the levy request of the newly incorporated city is made pursuant to RCW
84.52.070. Whenever a proposed city incorporation is on the March special
election ballot, the county auditor shall submit the legal description of the
proposed city to the department of revenue on or before the first day of March;

(2)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated port district shall be established on the
first day of October if the boundaries of the newly incorporated port district
are coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district, as they existed
on the first day of March of that year;

(3)
Boundaries of any other newly incorporated taxing district shall be established
on the first day of June of the year in which the property tax levy is made if
the taxing district has boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of another
taxing district, as they existed on the first day of March of that year;

(4)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated water-sewer district shall be established
on the fifteenth of June of the year in which the proposition under RCW
57.04.050 authorizing a water district excess levy is approved; and

(5)
Boundaries of a new county, the counties from which territory is stricken to
create the new county, any road districts in the counties from which the
territory is stricken, and road districts in the newly created county will be
established on the first day of January of the interim period after the
formation of that new county.

The
boundaries of a taxing district shall be established on the first day of June if
territory has been added to, or removed from, the taxing district after the
first day of March of that year with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries
of another taxing district as they existed on the first day of March of that
year. However, the boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire
protection district or districts, that include any portion of the area that was
annexed to a city or town within its boundaries shall be altered as of this
date to exclude this area. In any case where any instrument setting forth the
official boundaries of any newly established taxing district, or setting forth
any change in such boundaries, is required by law to be filed in the office of
the county auditor or other county official, said instrument shall be filed in
triplicate. The officer with whom such instrument is filed shall transmit two
copies to the county assessor.

No
property tax levy shall be made for any taxing district whose boundaries are
not established as of the dates provided in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 39. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
4.12.070 and 1891 c 33 s 2, Code 1881 s 53, 1877 p 12 s 54, 1869
p 14 s 54, & 1854 p 377 s 2;

(2) RCW
36.09.010 and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.010;

(3) RCW
36.09.020 and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.020;

(4) RCW
36.09.035 and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.035;

(5) RCW 36.09.040 and
1963 c 4 s 36.09.040; and

(6) RCW
36.09.050 and 1963 c 4 s 36.09.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 40.
Sections 2 through 35 of this act are added to chapter 36.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 41. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---