BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any irrigation district organized under this chapter may, for compensation,
reimbursement, or otherwise, within limits established by the state
Constitution, assist the owners of land receiving water distributed by the
irrigation district or discharging, with the district's approval, water from
the land into irrigation district-maintained facilities to finance, acquire,
install, lease, and use equipment, fixtures, programs, and systems to conserve,
improve, preserve, and efficiently use the land, water delivered by the
irrigation district, or water discharged from the land into irrigation
district-maintained facilities. Assistance may include, but is not limited to,
grants, loans, and financing to purchase, lease, install, and use approved
conservation, improvement, and preservation equipment, fixtures, programs, and
systems. The equipment, fixtures, programs, and systems may be leased,
purchased, or installed by a private business, the owner of the land, or the
irrigation district. "Conserve," "improve," and
"preserve" as used in this section, include enhancing the quality of
water delivered by the irrigation district or discharged from the land into
irrigation district-maintained facilities.

(2)
The district may charge the owner and the land if district money or credit is
used or extended to provide the assistance in subsection (1) of this section.
The district's board of directors may also levy and fix assessments, rates,
tolls, and charges and collect them from all persons for whom, and all land on
which, district money or credit is provided, or the board may require landowner
repayment for landowner assistance by assessments, charges, rates, or tolls in the
same manner as provided by RCW 87.03.445.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 87.03 RCW to read as follows:

All
contracts entered into by irrigation districts for the purchase of materials,
equipment, supplies, or services may be awarded to vendors pursuant to
telephone or written quotations or both in accordance with the uniform process
established in RCW 39.04.190.

Sec.
3. RCW
87.84.010 and 1988 c 127 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

Any irrigation district having ((the)) a major
portion of an inland navigable body of water within or along its
exterior boundaries and ((which)) that (1) has filed with the
department of ecology and been granted a water right certificate or (2)
holds a legally recognized water right through the United States bureau of
reclamation, for return river flows or otherwise, for fifty thousand acre
feet of water or more, and regardless of whether the water right is
withdrawn from the body of water itself or one of its tributaries, shall be
eligible to become an irrigation and rehabilitation district as provided in
this chapter.

---
END ---