BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.32.160 and 1995 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
If aggravation, diminution, or termination of disability takes place, the
director may at any time, upon the application of the beneficiary((,
made within seven years from the date the first closing order becomes final, or
at any time)) or upon ((his or her)) the director's
own motion, readjust the rate of compensation in accordance with the rules in
this section provided for the same, or in a proper case terminate the payment((:
PROVIDED, That the director may, upon application of the worker made at any
time,)) or provide proper and necessary medical and surgical
services as authorized under RCW 51.36.010. The department shall promptly mail
a copy of the application to the employer at the employer's last known address
as shown by the records of the department.

(b)
(("Closing order" as used in this section means an order based on
factors which include medical recommendation, advice, or examination.

(c)
Applications for benefits where the claim has been closed without medical
recommendation, advice, or examination are not subject to the seven year
limitation of this section. The preceding sentence shall not apply to any
closing order issued prior to July 1, 1981. First closing orders issued
between July 1, 1981, and July 1, 1985, shall, for the purposes of this section
only, be deemed issued on July 1, 1985. The time limitation of this section
shall be ten years in claims involving loss of vision or function of the eyes.

(d))) If
an order denying an application to reopen filed on or after July 1, 1988, is
not issued within ninety days of receipt of such application by the
self-insured employer or the department, such application shall be deemed
granted. However, for good cause, the department may extend the time for
making the final determination on the application for an additional sixty days.

(2)
If a worker receiving a pension for total disability returns to gainful
employment for wages, the director may suspend or terminate the rate of
compensation established for the disability without producing medical evidence
that shows that a diminution of the disability has occurred.

(3)
No act done or ordered to be done by the director, or the department prior to
the signing and filing in the matter of a written order for such readjustment
shall be grounds for such readjustment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to all claims filed under Title 51 RCW on or after the effective
date of this act and to all claims that are open, or remain subject to appeal,
as of the effective date of this act, regardless of the date of injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---