BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The chief administrative officer of a school, or his or her designee, shall
make the notification required by section 2 of this act:

(a)
Whenever a person violates RCW 9.41.280 by carrying or possessing a firearm; or

(b)
Whenever there is reasonable cause to believe that a person suffers from a
mental disorder and presents an imminent likelihood of serious harm; and

(i)
The person violates RCW 9.41.280 other than by carrying or possessing a
firearm; or

(ii)
While on school premises or school-provided transportation, or at a
school-sponsored activity, the person makes an apparently serious attempt or
express threat to inflict death or great bodily harm upon another.

(2)
For purposes of this section and section 2 of this act, "mental
disorder" and "likelihood of serious harm" have the same
meanings assigned them in RCW 71.05.020 and 71.34.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a person's actions under section 1 of this act require notification
under this section, the chief administrative officer of a school, or his or her
designee, shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency of
the activities and whereabouts, if known, of the person.

(2)
If the person is arrested because his or her actions under section 1 of this
act constitute a criminal violation, he or she shall be confined, and the court
shall order a psychological examination and evaluation of the person to be
performed within seventy-two hours of his or her confinement. The court shall
consider the results of the examination and evaluation when making any decision
about pretrial release of the person.

(3)
If the person is not arrested for a criminal violation, but there is reasonable
cause to believe that he or she suffers from a mental disorder and presents an
imminent likelihood of serious harm, the law enforcement agency shall take the
person into custody and deliver the person to an evaluation and treatment
facility under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW, as appropriate, for determination of
whether the person should be involuntarily committed for treatment of his or
her mental disorder.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This act is supplemental to all other remedies and procedures otherwise
available in law. Nothing in this act removes any obligation for compliance
with other law.

(2) No school district or local government shall bear the expense
of any examination or evaluation done pursuant to section 2 of this act.

---
END ---