BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the
amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year
following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance
with the following:

(1)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied
by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of
the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person who sells, transfers, or is
displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to
a replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an exemption on more
than one residence in any year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the
person to a hospital or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of
exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital
costs;

(2)
The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in
fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the
property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such person
must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in
which he or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each
spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3)
The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of age or older on
December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason
of physical disability: PROVIDED, That any surviving spouse of a person who
was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death shall qualify if
the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets
the requirements of this section;

(4)
The amount that the person shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be
calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW
84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or
more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of such person
shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable
income of such person during the months such person was retired by twelve. If
the income of the person claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months
of the assessment year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, or when
other substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable income of
such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable income of such person after such occurrences by twelve. If it is
necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor may
require confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31 of the year
following application;

(5)(a)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
excess property taxes; and

(b)(i)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less but greater than
eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
the greater of forty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation
of his or her residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand dollars of the
valuation of his or her residence; or

(ii)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or sixty
percent of the valuation of his or her residence; and

(6)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined disposable
income of thirty thousand dollars or less, the valuation of the residence shall
be the assessed value of the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or
January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under this
section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this ((section))
subsection only for one year because of high income, this same valuation
shall be used upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more
than one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any
other reason, the valuation upon requalification under this subsection
shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the
person requalifies.

(7)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of fifty thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty
thousand dollars, the valuation of the residence shall be the assessed value of
the residence for the previous year, plus two percent. For counties that do
not revalue property annually, the valuation of the residence shall be the
previous assessed value plus two percent for each year since the previous
revaluation of the residence. If the person subsequently fails to qualify
under this subsection only for one year because of high income, the valuation
of the residence upon requalification shall be calculated as if the person had
been qualified the previous year. If the person fails to qualify for more than
one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other
reason, the valuation upon requalification shall be the assessed value on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies.

(8)
If the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different
residence, the valuation of the different residence, for the purposes of
subsection (6) or (7) of this section, shall be the assessed value of the
different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person
transfers the exemption.

(9)(a)
In no event may the valuation under ((this)) subsection (6) or (7) of
this section be greater than the true and fair value of the residence on
January 1st of the assessment year.

((This
subsection does)) (b) Subsections (6) and (7) of this section do not
apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the year in which the
improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the property shall be added
to the value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair
value in the year in which they are made.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
valuation of a residence determined under RCW 84.36.381(7) shall apply for the
levies of all taxing districts, unless the legislative authority of a county
adopts an ordinance or resolution providing that valuations under RCW
84.36.381(7) do not apply within the county. If such an ordinance or resolution
is adopted, valuations under RCW 84.36.381(7) shall not apply to the levy of
any taxing district upon property within the county, except the levy by the
state. If the ordinance or resolution is repealed, valuation of a residence
determined under RCW 84.36.381(7) shall apply for the levies of all taxing
districts upon property within the county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as necessary to prevent
exemptions under RCW 84.36.381(7) from resulting in a higher tax rate than
would have occurred in the absence of the exemptions under RCW 84.36.381(7).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This act
applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---