BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.015 and 1979 ex.s. c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If a taxing district has not levied ((in the three most recent
years)) since 1985 and elects to restore a regular property tax levy
subject to applicable statutory limitations then such first restored levy shall
be set so that the regular property tax payable shall not exceed the amount
which ((could have been lawfully levied in 1973)) was last levied,
plus an additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the increase in
assessed value in the district since ((1973)) the last levy
resulting from new construction and improvements to property by the property
tax rate which is proposed to be restored, or the maximum amount which could be
lawfully levied in the year such a restored levy is proposed.

---
END ---