BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.17.250 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a state agency is considering awarding grants or loans for a county,
city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to finance public
facilities, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town ((that is))
requesting the grant or loan ((is a party to a county-wide planning policy
under RCW 36.70A.210 relating to the type of public facility for which the
grant or loan is sought, and shall accord additional preference to the county,
city, or town if such county-wide planning policy exists)) has adopted a
comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040.

(2)
When reviewing competing requests from counties, cities, or towns planning
under RCW 36.70A.040, a state agency considering awarding grants or loans for
public facilities shall accord additional preference to those counties, cities,
or towns that have adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as
required by RCW 36.70A.040. For the purposes of the preference accorded in
this section, a county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is deemed
to have satisfied the requirements for adopting a comprehensive plan and
development regulations specified in RCW 36.70A.040 if the county, city, or
town:

(a)
Adopts or has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within
the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040;

(b)
Adopts or has adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations before
submitting a request for a grant or loan if the county, city, or town failed to
adopt a comprehensive plan and/or development regulations within the time
periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040; or

(c)
Demonstrates substantial progress toward adopting a comprehensive plan or
development regulations within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A
county, city, or town that is more than six months out of compliance with the
time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 shall not be deemed to demonstrate
substantial progress for purposes of this section.

(3)
The preference specified in subsection (2) of this section applies only to
competing requests for grants or loans from counties, cities, or towns planning
under RCW 36.70A.040. A request from a county, city, or town planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 shall be accorded no additional preference based on subsection
(2) of this section over a request from a county, city, or town not planning
under RCW 36.70A.040.

(4)
Whenever a state agency is considering awarding grants or loans ((to a
special district)) for public facilities to a special district
requesting funding for a proposed facility located in a county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040, it shall consider whether the county, city,
or town in whose planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located ((is
a party to a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210 relating to the
type of public facility for which the grant or loan is sought)) has
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040 and shall apply the preference specified in subsection (2) of this
section and restricted in subsection (3) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act does not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the section amended in this act or under any rule or order
adopted under that section, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under
that section.

---
END ---