BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that it is necessary to employ multiple approaches to
revitalize the economy of Washington state's rural areas. The legislature also
finds that where possible, Washington state should develop programs which can
compliment other private, state, and federal programs. It is the intent of
this act to compliment such rural economic development efforts by creating a
public utility tax offset program to help establish locally based electric
utility revolving fund programs to be used for economic development and job
creation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The following definitions apply to this section:

(a)
"Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job creation
or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical infrastructure, to add
or upgrade health and safety facilities, including low-income housing, or to
add or upgrade emergency services in any designated qualifying rural area.

(b)
"Qualifying rural area" means any geographic area of the state,
including counties and parts thereof, where the local electric utility serves
twenty-five or fewer meters per mile of distribution line, or where a municipal
utility serves in a county that is classified by the United States census
bureau as rural, or any county that is considered by the state or federal
government to be economically disadvantaged based on low per capita income or
high unemployment.

(c)
"Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund" means a
fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in qualifying rural
areas.

(d)
"Local board" is a board of directors with at least, but not limited
to, three members who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric utility to
oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund.

(2)
Any light and power business subject to the provisions of this chapter shall be
granted a fifty percent credit against the taxes imposed under this chapter,
for contributions made directly to an electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund, not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars per
electric utility in any calendar year.

(3)
The right to claim tax credits under this section expires December 31, 2005.
However any credits claimed prior to that date remain available for use
indefinitely, subject to restrictions set forth in subsection (6) of this
section.

(4)
To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section, the light and
power business shall establish an electric utility rural economic development
revolving fund which is governed by a local board whose members shall reside in
the qualifying rural area served by the light and power business. The local
board shall have authority to determine all criteria and conditions for the
expenditure of funds from the electric utility rural economic development fund,
and for the terms and conditions of repayment.

(5)
Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic development fund by
recipients shall be made available for additional qualifying projects.

(6)
If at any time the electric utility rural economic development fund is
dissolved, any moneys claimed as a tax credit under this section shall either
be granted to a qualifying project or refunded to the state within two years of
termination.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of revenue shall adopt any rules necessary to implement the
provisions of this act.

---
END ---