BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.14.370 and 1998 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the conditions of subsection (4) of this section, the
legislative authority of a distressed county may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed ((0.04))
0.08 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of
the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing qualifying public facilities in rural counties. The public
facility must be listed as an item in the economic development section of the
comprehensive plan of those counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040, or for
those counties who do not plan under the growth management act, the public facility
must be listed in the county's capital facilities plan.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5)
For purposes of this section((,)):

(a)
"Distressed county" means a county in which the average level
of unemployment for the three years before the year in which a tax is first
imposed under this section exceeds the average state unemployment for those
years by twenty percent.

(b) "Public facilities" means a project of a local
government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, flood control, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm
sewer, railroad, electricity, natural gas, telecommunications, buildings or
structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation, job
retention, or job expansion.

---
END ---