BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE RECOGNITION AND INTENT. The legislature recognizes
the economic hardship that rural distressed areas throughout the state have undergone
in recent years. Numerous rural distressed areas across the state have
encountered serious economic downturns resulting in significant job loss and
business failure. In 1991 the legislature enacted two major pieces of
legislation to promote economic development and job creation, with particular
emphasis on worker training, income, and emergency services support, along with
community revitalization through planning services and infrastructure
assistance. However even though these programs have been of assistance, rural
distressed areas still face serious economic problems including: Above-average
unemployment rates from job losses and below-average employment growth; low
rate of business start-ups; and persistent erosion of vitally important resource-dependent
industries.

The
legislature also recognizes that rural distressed areas in Washington have an
abiding ability and consistent will to overcome these economic obstacles by
building upon their historic foundations of business enterprise, local leadership,
and outstanding work ethic.

The
legislature intends to assist rural distressed areas in their ongoing efforts
to address these difficult economic problems by providing a comprehensive and
significant array of economic tools, necessary to harness the persistent and
undaunted spirit of enterprise that resides in the citizens of rural distressed
areas throughout the state.

The
further intent of this act is to provide:

(1)
A strategically designed plan of assistance, emphasizing state, local, and private
sector leadership and partnership;

(2)
A comprehensive and significant array of business assistance, services, and tax
incentives that are accountable and performance-based;

(3)
An array of community assistance including infrastructure development and
business retention, attraction, and expansion programs that will provide a
competitive advantage to rural distressed areas throughout Washington; and

(4)
Regulatory relief to reduce and streamline zoning, permitting, and regulatory
requirements in order to enhance the capability of businesses to grow and
prosper in rural distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
GOALS. The primary goals of this act, are to:

(1)
Promote and retain the operation of businesses in rural distressed areas;

(2)
Promote the expansion of existing businesses in rural distressed areas;

(3)
Attract new businesses to rural distressed areas;

(4)
Assist in the development of new businesses from within rural distressed areas;

(5)
Provide family wage jobs to the citizens of rural distressed areas; and

(6)
Promote the development of communities of excellence in rural distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

STATE
OFFICE OF BUSINESS ASSISTANCE AND RECRUITMENT FOR RURAL DISTRESSED AREAS.
There is established within the department of community, trade, and economic
development the office of business assistance and recruitment for rural
distressed areas. The primary responsibilities of the office are to coordinate
and administer a comprehensive and effective set of business assistance
programs and services including:

(1)
Business recruitment. The office shall: Provide a comprehensive and
aggressive program to attract viable businesses to rural distressed areas; work
with local communities to identify select industry sectors that have a
competitive advantage in specific rural distressed areas; collaborate with
state and local officials to modify their infrastructure plans and priorities
to facilitate business growth; and assist rural distressed areas in developing
strategic business recruitment plans.

(2)
Business permitting and zoning one-stop shop. The office shall: Provide a
streamlined and customer driven siting service to businesses in order to
promote their attraction and expansion in rural distressed areas; provide
preliminary permit application and zoning information and services for
businesses in order to attract firms and facilitate business growth in rural
distressed areas.

(3)
Business regulatory assistance and ombudsman services. The office shall:
Provide comprehensive business regulatory services to assist businesses in
addressing and responding to local, state, and federal regulations; and provide
recommendations on streamlining and modifying government regulations.

(a)
The office is authorized to review state zoning, permitting, or regulatory
requirements that pose difficulty for businesses wishing or likely to site in a
rural enterprise area. In situations where the office considers the zoning,
permitting, or regulatory requirements placed on a business in a rural
enterprise area to be burdensome the director may petition the regulatory
agency or agencies for regulatory relief. In addition the director may
petition the agency or agencies for relief under the regulatory fairness act,
chapter 19.85 RCW.

(b)
In situations where a business or entity in a rural enterprise zone is
encountering regulatory oversight from more than one state agency and is
experiencing conflicting direction or an unintended consequence as a result of
a confusing process, the business or entity may petition the director to
intercede. The director upon review of the circumstances involved is
authorized to designate a lead agency to collaborate with other state agencies
in order to streamline and reduce the regulatory difficulties.

(c)
Businesses or entities in a rural enterprise zone may petition the director for
an accelerated zoning, permitting, or regulatory process. The director upon
reviewing the petition and the circumstances involved may make a finding of
regulatory burden and may direct the state agency or agencies to process the
business or entities' application in an expeditious manner.

(4)
"Brown Fields" Program. The office shall develop with the department
of ecology and recommend to the legislature a streamlined and cost-effective
process to redevelop hazardous sites that are suitable for industrial and
commercial growth in order to promote industrial and commercial growth in rural
distressed areas.

(5)
Rural enterprise zone development and foreign trade zone. The office is
authorized to provide technical assistance to local governments in rural
distressed areas to establish rural enterprise zones and foreign trade zones.
The office shall target rural enterprise zones and foreign trade zones in the
delivery of its services in order to maximize the impact of its economic
development assistance as outlined in RCW 43.63A.715 to businesses and rural
distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

OFFICE
ADMINISTRATION. The office shall be administered by an appointee of the
director of community, trade, and economic development, in consultation with
the rural distressed areas economic recovery coordination board. The office
appointee shall coordinate activities with the rural distressed areas resource
coordinator and report on the activities and performance of the office on a
quarterly basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A new
section is added to chapter 28C.04 RCW to read as follows:

JOB
SKILLS/RURAL DISTRESSED AREA EMPLOYEE TRAINING. At least seventy-five percent
of all discretionary expenditures in the job skills program shall be made to
assist businesses in rural distressed areas. For the purposes of this section,
"rural distressed area" means the same as "rural natural
resources impact area" under RCW 43.31.601.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.168.140 and 1995 c 226 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

RURAL
DISTRESSED AREAS. Any funds appropriated by the legislature to the development
loan fund for purposes of the timber recovery act shall be used for development
loans in rural ((natural resources impact areas as defined in RCW 43.31.601))
distressed areas. At least seventy-five percent of all discretionary
expenditures shall be to assist businesses in rural distressed areas. For the
purposes of this section, "rural distressed area" means the same as
"rural natural resources impact area" under RCW 43.31.601.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.163.210 and 1998 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of facilitating economic development in the state of Washington and
encouraging the employment of Washington workers at meaningful wages:

(1)
The authority may develop and conduct a program or programs to provide
nonrecourse revenue bond financing for the project costs for economic
development activities.

(2)
The authority may develop and conduct a program that will stimulate and
encourage the development of new products within Washington state by the
infusion of financial aid for invention and innovation in situations in which
the financial aid would not otherwise be reasonably available from commercial
sources. The authority is authorized to provide nonrecourse revenue bond
financing for this program.

(a)
For the purposes of this program, the authority shall have the following powers
and duties:

(i)
To enter into financing agreements with eligible persons doing business in
Washington state, upon terms and on conditions consistent with the purposes of
this chapter, for the advancement of financial and other assistance to the
persons for the development of specific products, procedures, and techniques,
to be developed and produced in this state, and to condition the agreements
upon contractual assurances that the benefits of increasing or maintaining
employment and tax revenues shall remain in this state and accrue to it;

(ii)
Own, possess, and take license in patents, copyrights, and proprietary
processes and negotiate and enter into contracts and establish charges for the
use of the patents, copyrights, and proprietary processes when the patents and licenses
for products result from assistance provided by the authority;

(iii)
Negotiate royalty payments to the authority on patents and licenses for
products arising as a result of assistance provided by the authority;

(iv)
Negotiate and enter into other types of contracts with eligible persons that
assure that public benefits will result from the provision of services by the
authority; provided that the contracts are consistent with the state
Constitution;

(v)
Encourage and provide technical assistance to eligible persons in the process
of developing new products;

(vi)
Refer eligible persons to researchers or laboratories for the purpose of
testing and evaluating new products, processes, or innovations; and

(vii)
To the extent permitted under its contract with eligible persons, to consent to
a termination, modification, forgiveness, or other change of a term of a
contractual right, payment, royalty, contract, or agreement of any kind to
which the authority is a party.

(b)
Eligible persons seeking financial and other assistance under this program
shall forward an application, together with an application fee prescribed by
rule, to the authority. An investigation and report concerning the
advisability of approving an application for assistance shall be completed by
the staff of the authority. The investigation and report may include, but is
not limited to, facts about the company under consideration as its history,
wage standards, job opportunities, stability of employment, past and present
financial condition and structure, pro forma income statements, present and
future markets and prospects, integrity of management as well as the
feasibility of the proposed product and invention to be granted financial aid, including
the state of development of the product as well as the likelihood of its
commercial feasibility. After receipt and consideration of the report set out
in this subsection and after other action as is deemed appropriate, the
application shall be approved or denied by the authority. The applicant shall
be promptly notified of action by the authority. In making the decision as to
approval or denial of an application, priority shall be given to those persons
operating or planning to operate businesses of special importance to
Washington's economy, including, but not limited to: (i) Existing
resource-based industries of agriculture, forestry, and fisheries; (ii)
existing advanced technology industries of electronics, computer and instrument
manufacturing, computer software, and information and design; and (iii)
emerging industries such as environmental technology, biotechnology, biomedical
sciences, materials sciences, and optics.

(3)
The authority may also develop and implement, if authorized by the legislature,
such other economic development financing programs adopted in future general
plans of economic development finance objectives developed under RCW
43.163.090.

(4)
The authority shall develop a program and target their resources in
assisting rural distressed areas in their business and job creation and
assistance efforts under chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act). For
the purposes of this section, "rural distressed area" means the same
as "rural natural resources impact area" under RCW 43.31.601.

(5)
The authority may not issue any bonds for the programs authorized under this
section after June 30, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
REVIEW AND EVALUATION. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall
design an evaluation mechanism for economically distressed counties under this
act and complete an evaluation of this act's effectiveness by November 1,
2003. The agencies implementing the programs under this act shall assist the
joint legislative audit and review committee evaluation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. 1997
c 366 s 10 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---