BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.280 and 1997 c 58 s 315 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that moving those eligible for assistance to
self-sustaining employment is a goal of the WorkFirst program. It is the intent
of WorkFirst to aid a participant's progress to self-sufficiency by allowing
flexibility within the state-wide program to reflect community resources, the
local characteristics of the labor market, and the composition of the
caseload. Program success will be enhanced through effective coordination at
regional and local levels, involving employers, labor representatives,
educators, community leaders, local governments, and social service providers.

(2)
The department, through its regional offices, shall collaborate with employers,
recipients, frontline workers, educational institutions, labor, private
industry councils, the work force training and education coordinating board,
community rehabilitation employment programs, employment and training agencies,
local governments, the employment security department, and community action
agencies to develop work programs that are effective and work in their
communities. For planning purposes, the department shall collect and make
accessible to regional offices successful work program models from around the
United States, including the employment partnership program, apprenticeship
programs, microcredit, microenterprise, self‑employment, and W‑2
Wisconsin works. Work programs shall incorporate local volunteer citizens in
their planning and implementation phases to ensure community relevance and
success.

(3)
To reduce administrative costs and to ensure equal state-wide access to
services, the department may develop contracts for state-wide welfare-to-work
services. These state-wide contracts shall support regional flexibility and
ensure that resources follow local labor market opportunities and recipients'
needs.

(4)
The secretary shall establish WorkFirst service areas for purposes of planning
WorkFirst programs and for distributing WorkFirst resources. Service areas
shall reflect department regions.

(5)
By July 31st of each odd-numbered year, a plan for the WorkFirst program shall
be developed for each region. The plan shall be prepared in consultation with
local and regional sources, adapting the state-wide WorkFirst program to
achieve maximum effect for the participants and the communities within which
they reside. Local consultation shall include to the greatest extent possible
input from local and regional planning bodies for social services and work
force development. The regional and local administrator shall consult with
employers of various sizes, labor representatives, training and education
providers, program participants, economic development organizations, community
organizations, tribes, and local governments in the preparation of the service
area plan. The plan shall incorporate provisions relating to job retention
services and wage progression services available to current participants of temporary
assistance for needy families and those who have left the program through
employment. The plan shall include measurable performance goals and specific
mechanisms for tracking former participants.

(6)
The secretary has final authority in plan approval or modification. Regional
program implementation may deviate from the state-wide program if specified in
a service area plan, as approved by the secretary.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.08A.410 and 1997 c 58 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The WorkFirst program shall develop outcome measures for use in evaluating the
WorkFirst program authorized in chapter 58, Laws of 1997, which may include but
are not limited to:

(a)
Caseload reduction;

(b)
Recidivism to caseload after two years;

(c)
Job retention;

(d)
Earnings;

(e)
Reduction in average grant through increased recipient earnings; ((and))

(f)
Placement of recipients into private sector, unsubsidized jobs; and

(g)
Wage progression history following former temporary assistance for needy
families participants for at least two years.

(2)
The department shall establish measurable wage goals for participants
transitioning from WorkFirst to unsubsidized employment.

(3) The department shall require that contractors for
WorkFirst services collect outcome measure information and report outcome
measures to the department regularly. The department shall develop benchmarks
that compare outcome measure information from all contractors to provide a
clear indication of the most effective contractors. Benchmark information
shall be published quarterly and provided to the legislature, the governor, and
all contractors for WorkFirst services.

---
END ---