BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
state of Washington affirms the importance of ensuring that crimes involving
child sexual abuse are investigated thoroughly and objectively. Children who
have been victims of crime deserve to have those who committed the crimes
against them brought to justice. Those who may have been accused should expect
that investigative agencies will make every effort to conduct thorough and
impartial investigations.

The
best approach to investigations of child sexual abuse crimes involves a
coordinated effort by investigative agencies that minimizes repetitive
investigative interviews and improves the quality of the investigations.
Specialized training for child interviewers investigating child sexual abuse
should be available throughout the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

Specialized
training shall be provided for persons responsible for investigating child
sexual abuse. Such training shall include information about developmental
considerations in language and communication abilities, the nature and
consequences of victimization that may affect willingness and ability to report
crime, memory and suggestibility, methods and techniques for eliciting accurate
and complete information, and methods and techniques for preserving
interviews. Training participants shall have the opportunity to practice
interview skills and receive feedback from instructors. The commission, the
department of social and health services, the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs, and the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys shall design and implement state-wide training that contains
consistent elements for persons engaged in the interviewing of children for
child sexual abuse cases, including law enforcement, prosecution, and child
protective services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington institute for public policy shall convene a group including
representatives of the department, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, the Washington coalition for sexual assault programs, and
prosecuting attorneys to develop model written protocols for establishing
multidisciplinary investigations. The protocols shall include interviewing
techniques and procedures for recording interviews for sexual abuse cases and
shall be adhered to by the department and law enforcement agencies.

(2)
Each agency involved in investigating child sexual abuse shall document its
role in handling cases and how it will coordinate with other local agencies or
systems and shall adopt a local protocol based on the state standard. The
department and local law enforcement agencies may include other agencies and
systems that are involved with child sexual abuse victims in the
multidisciplinary coordination.

(3)
Each county shall develop a written protocol for handling criminal child sexual
abuse investigations. The protocol shall address the coordination of child
sexual abuse investigations between the prosecutor's office, law enforcement,
the department, local advocacy groups, and any other local agency involved in
the criminal investigation of child sexual abuse. The protocol shall be
developed by the prosecuting attorney with the assistance of the agencies
referenced in this subsection.

(4)
Local protocols under this section shall be adopted and in place by July 1,
2000.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.14B.010 and 1987 c 503 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Caseworkers employed in children services shall meet minimum standards
established by the department of social and health services. Comprehensive
training for caseworkers shall be completed before such caseworkers are
assigned to case-carrying responsibilities without direct supervision.
Intermittent, part-time, and standby workers shall be subject to the same
minimum standards and training.

(2)
Specialized training shall be provided for persons responsible for
investigating child sexual abuse. Such training shall include information
about developmental considerations in language and communication abilities, the
nature and consequences of victimization that may affect willingness and
ability to report crime, memory and suggestibility, methods and techniques for
eliciting accurate and complete information, and methods and techniques for
preserving interviews. Training participants shall have the opportunity to practice
interview skills and receive feedback from instructors. The department, the
criminal justice training commission, the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs, and the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys
shall design and implement state-wide training that contains consistent
elements for persons engaged in the interviewing of children, including law
enforcement, prosecution, and child protective services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall establish up to three pilot projects involving child sexual
abuse investigations. The projects shall follow written protocols and use
different methods and techniques to conduct and preserve interviews with
alleged child victims of sexual abuse. The department shall provide the
appropriate committees of the senate and house of representatives an interim
report by December 15, 1999, and a final report by December 15, 2000.

Sec.
6. RCW
26.44.035 and 1997 c 386 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the department or a law enforcement agency responds to a complaint of alleged
child abuse or neglect and discovers that another agency has also responded to
the complaint, the agency shall notify the other agency of their presence, and
the agencies shall coordinate the investigation and keep each other apprised of
progress.

The
department, each law enforcement agency, each county prosecuting attorney, each
city attorney, and each court shall make as soon as practicable a written
record and shall maintain records of all incidents of suspected child abuse
reported to that person or agency. Written records involving child sexual
abuse shall, at a minimum, be a near verbatim record for the disclosure
interview. The near verbatim record shall be produced within fifteen calendar
days of the disclosure interview, unless waived by management on a case-by-case
basis. Records kept under this section shall be identifiable by means of
an agency code for child abuse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---