BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to strengthen the link between postsecondary education and
K-12 education by creating the Washington's promise scholarship program for
academically successful high school graduates from low and middle-income
families. The legislature finds that, increasingly, an individual's economic
viability is contingent on postsecondary educational opportunities, yet the
state's full financial obligation is eliminated after the twelfth grade.
Students who work hard in kindergarten through twelfth grade and successfully
complete high school with high academic marks may not have the financial
ability to attend college because they cannot obtain financial aid or the
financial aid is insufficient.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
higher education coordinating board shall design the Washington's promise
scholarship program based on the following parameters:

(1)
Scholarships shall be awarded to students who graduate from high school or its
equivalent and who meet both academic and financial eligibility criteria.

(a)
Before the K-12 certificate of mastery is required, academic eligibility
criteria shall be as follows:

(i)
Students graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW in 2001 and 2002 must be in the top fifteen percent of their
graduating class;

(ii)
Beginning with the graduating class of 2003, students graduating from public
and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW must pass all
components of the Washington assessment of student learning on their first
attempt when they take it in the tenth grade or be in the top fifteen percent
of their graduating class;

(iii)
Students participating in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200
RCW must pass all components of the Washington assessment of student learning
on their first attempt when they take it in the tenth grade and the cost of
taking the Washington assessment of student learning shall be ancillary
services borne by the school districts in which the students reside; and

(iv)
For students attending private schools approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW, the
cost of the Washington assessment of student learning shall be ancillary
services borne by the school districts in which the students reside. If a
significant number of students who attend the same school wish to take the
Washington assessment of student learning, a contractor may provide the
assessments at the private school and may have the private school administer
the assessments. If the assessments are provided at the private school, the
superintendent of public instruction shall pay the assessment contractor the
cost of the test itself, including processing the test to determine the
results, for each student taking the assessment under this subsection
(1)(a)(iv). The superintendent shall not pay for any costs the private school
may incur in administering the assessments at the private school, such as staff
or administrative costs.

(b)
After the K-12 certificate of mastery is required, students graduating from
public and approved private high schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, and
participants in home-based instruction as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW are
academically eligible if they pass all parts of the certificate of mastery on
their first attempt.

(c)
To meet the financial eligibility criteria, a student's family income shall not
exceed one hundred thirty-five percent of the state median family income
adjusted for family size, except as otherwise determined in subsection (2) of
this section.

(2)
Promise scholarships are not intended to supplant any scholarship or tax
program related to postsecondary education. If the board finds that promise
scholarships supplant or reduce any grant, scholarship, or tax program for
categories of students, then the board shall adjust the financial eligibility
criteria or the amount of scholarship to the level necessary to avoid
supplanting.

(3)
The amount of promise scholarships shall not exceed the equivalent of two
years' worth of tuition at the resident, full-time, community college tuition
rate. Awards for the second year of the scholarship shall be made only to
students who successfully complete their first year of postsecondary education.
In determining the amount of scholarships, the board shall give the highest
priority to awarding scholarships to the maximum number of potential eligible
recipients.

(4)
By October 15th of each year, beginning in 2001, the board shall determine the
amount of the scholarships, after taking into consideration the availability of
funds.

(5)
The scholarships may only be used for undergraduate degrees at accredited
institutions of higher education in the state of Washington.

(6)
The scholarships must be used within ten years of being awarded.

(7)
The scholarships may be used for college-related expenses, including but not
limited to, tuition, room and board, books, and materials.

(8)
The scholarships may not be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree in
theology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The higher education coordinating board, with the assistance of the
institutions of higher education and the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, shall evaluate the impact and the effectiveness of the
Washington's promise scholarship program. The evaluation shall include, but
not be limited to: (a) An analysis of what other financial assistance promise
scholarship recipients are receiving through other federal, state, and
institutional programs, including grants, work study, tuition waivers, tax
credits, and loan programs; (b) an analysis of whether the implementation of
the promise scholarship has had an impact on student indebtedness; (c) an
evaluation of what types of students are successfully completing high school
but do not have the financial ability to attend college because they cannot
obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient; and (d) an analysis
of the costs of administering the Washington assessment of student learning to
students receiving home-based instruction or attending private high schools
approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW. By November 1, 2001, the board shall report
its findings and make recommendations to the governor and the legislature.

(2)
This section expires December 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
higher education coordinating board, with the assistance of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, shall implement and administer the
Washington's promise scholarship program described in section 2 of this act as
follows:

(1)
The first scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students enrolling in
postsecondary education in academic year 2001-02.

(2)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide the
information to the higher education coordinating board that is necessary for
implementation of the program.

(a)
For students graduating from high school in the top fifteen percent of their
class, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide the
higher education coordinating board with student names, addresses, birth dates,
and unique numeric identifiers as determined by each respective high school at
the completion of the first term of the senior year.

(b)
Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, the office of the superintendent of
public instruction shall provide the names, addresses, birth dates, and unique
numeric identifiers of tenth grade students who pass all components of the
Washington assessment of student learning on their first attempt to the higher
education coordinating board to assist the higher education coordinating board
in awarding scholarships. This shall be done by October 1st of each year
following the receipt of assessment scores.

(c)
All student data should be considered confidential and used solely for the
purposes of providing scholarships to eligible students.

(3)
The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules to implement this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
Washington's promise scholarship program shall not be funded at the expense of
the state need grant program as defined in RCW 28B.10.800 through 28B.10.824.
In administering the state need grant and promise scholarship programs, the
higher education coordinating board shall first ensure that eligibility for
state need grant recipients is at least sixty-five percent of state median
family income.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The Washington's promise scholarship account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall be a nontreasury account retaining its
interest earnings in accordance with RCW 43.79A.040.

(2)
The higher education coordinating board shall deposit in the account all money
received for the program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of
funds appropriated by the legislature for the Washington's promise scholarship
program, private contributions to the program, and receipts from refunds of
tuition and fees.

(3)
Expenditures from the account shall be used for scholarships to eligible
students.

(4)
With the exception of the operating costs associated with the management of the
account by the treasurer's office as authorized in chapter 43.79A RCW, the
account shall be credited with all investment income earned by the account.

(5)
Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment
provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW.

(6)
Disbursements from the account shall be made only on the authorization of the
higher education coordinating board.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1999 c 384 s 8 and 1999 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington's promise scholarship account, the Washington
advanced college tuition payment program account, the agricultural local fund,
the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the Washington international
exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental disabilities endowment
trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative
account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability
incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition
center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust
fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1, 2, and 4 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title
28B RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---