BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.26.110 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

Where tobacco products upon which the tax imposed by this chapter
has been reported and paid, are shipped or transported by the distributor to
retailers ((without)) outside the state or to the ultimate consumer
outside of the state, to be sold by those retailers, or are returned to the
manufacturer by the distributor or destroyed by the distributor or to be
used by the ultimate consumer, credit of such tax may be made to the
distributor in accordance with regulations prescribed by the department of
revenue.

---
END ---