BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.19A.020 and 1996 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The USEPA product standards, as now or hereafter amended, are adopted as the
minimum standards for the state of Washington. These standards shall be
implemented for at least the products listed in (((a) and (b) of)) this
subsection (1) by ((the dates indicated)) July 1, 1997,
unless the ((director)) state procurement officer finds that a
different standard would significantly increase recycled product availability
or competition. The products include:

(a)
((By July 1, 1997:

(i)))
Paper and paper products;

(((ii)))
(b) Organic recovered materials; ((and

(iii))) (c)
Latex paint products;

(((b)
By July 1, 1997:

(i))) (d)
Products for lower value uses containing recycled plastics;

(((ii)))
(e) Retread and remanufactured tires;

(((iii)))
(f) Lubricating oils;

(((iv)))
(g) Automotive batteries;

(((v)))
(h) Building insulation;

(((vi)))
(i) Panelboard; and

(((vii)))
(j) Compost products.

(2)
The standards required by this section shall be applied to recycled product
purchasing by the department and other state agencies. The standards may be
adopted or applied by any other local government in product procurement. The
standards shall provide for exceptions under appropriate circumstances to allow
purchases of recycled products that do not meet the minimum content
requirements of the standards.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.19A.030 and 1998 c 245 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By January 1, ((1993)) 2001, each local government shall review
its existing procurement policies and specifications to determine whether
recycled products are intentionally or unintentionally excluded. The policies
and specifications shall be revised to include such products unless a recycled
content product does not meet an established performance standard of the
agency.

(2)
By fiscal year ((1994)) 2002, each local government shall adopt a
minimum purchasing goal for recycled content as a percentage of the total
dollar value of supplies purchased. To assist in achieving this goal each
local government shall adopt a strategy by January 1, ((1993)) 2001,
and shall submit a description of the strategy to the ((department)) state
procurement officer. All public agencies shall respond to requests for
information from the ((department)) state procurement officer for
the purpose of its reporting requirements under this section.

(3)
Each local government shall designate a procurement officer who shall serve as
the primary contact with the department for compliance with the requirements of
this chapter.

(4)
This section shall apply only to local governments with expenditures for
supplies exceeding five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 1989.
Expenditures for capital goods and for electricity, water, or gas for resale
shall not be considered a supply expenditure.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.19A.050 and 1996 c 198 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((department)) state procurement officer shall prepare a strategy
to increase purchases of recycled-content products by the department and all
state agencies, including higher education institutions. The strategy shall
include purchases from public works contracts. The strategy shall address the
purchase of plastic products, retread and remanufactured tires, motor vehicle
lubricants, latex paint, and lead acid batteries having recycled content. In
addition, the strategy shall incorporate actions to achieve the following
purchase level goals of recycled content paper and compost products:

(1)
Paper products as a percentage of the total dollar amount purchased on an
annual basis:

(a)
At least sixty percent by 1996;

(b)
At least seventy percent by 1997;

(c)
At least eighty percent by 1998.

(2)
Compost products as a percentage of the total dollar amount on an annual basis:

(a)
At least forty percent by 1996;

(b)
At least sixty percent by 1997;

(c)
At least eighty percent by 1998.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.19A.070 and 1991 c 297 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall implement an education program to encourage maximum
procurement of recycled products by state and local government entities. The
program shall include at least the following:

(a)
Technical assistance to all state and local governments and their designated
procurement officers on the requirements of this chapter, including preparation
of model purchase contracts, the preparation of procurement plans, and the
availability of recycled products;

(b)
Two or more workshops annually in which all state and local government entities
are invited;

(c)
Information on intergovernmental agreements to facilitate procurement of
recycled products.

(2)
The ((director)) state procurement officer shall, in consultation
with the department of ecology, make available to the public, local
jurisdictions, and the private sector, a comprehensive list of substitutes for
extremely hazardous, hazardous, toxic, and nonrecyclable products, and
disposable products intended for a single use. The department and all state
agencies exercising the purchasing authorities of the department shall include
the substitute products on bid notifications, except where the department
allows an exception based upon product availability, price, suitability for
intended use, or similar reasons.

(3)
The department shall prepare model procurement guidelines for use by local
governments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.19A RCW to read as follows:

The
director shall designate a state procurement officer who shall monitor recycled
product procurement by the department and state agencies, as defined in RCW
43.19A.010. The responsibilities of this officer include:

(1)
Preparing a biennial report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature on the progress by local governments in implementing this chapter,
and the progress by state agencies in recycled product purchasing. The first
biennial report shall be made on January 1, 2001. The requirement to make
biennial reports under this subsection expires July 1, 2011;

(2)
Researching recycled products and recycled product performance. This
information shall be used to update the data base created in RCW 43.19A.060 on
an annual basis; and

(3) Contacting local procurement officers and working with these
officers to review and revise local recycled product purchasing standards and
goals to meet or exceed those provided by law.

---
END ---