BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.32.002 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the health and well-being of the people of this state
are of paramount importance.

The
legislature further finds that the conduct of members of the dental profession
licensed to practice dentistry in this state plays a vital role in preserving
the health and well-being of the people of the state.

The
legislature further finds that requiring continuing dental education for all
licensed dentists in the state is an important component of providing high
quality dentistry for the people of this state.

The
legislature further finds that there is no effective means of handling
disciplinary proceedings against members of the dental profession licensed in
this state when such proceedings are necessary for the protection of the public
health.

Therefore,
the legislature declares its intention to exercise the police power of the
state to protect the public health, to promote the welfare of the state, and to
provide a commission to act as a disciplinary and regulatory body for the
members of the dental profession licensed to practice dentistry in this state.

It
is the purpose of the commission established in RCW 18.32.0351 to regulate the
competency and quality of professional health care providers under its
jurisdiction by establishing, monitoring, and enforcing qualifications for
licensure, continuing education, consistent standards of practice,
continuing competency mechanisms, and discipline. Rules, policies, and
procedures developed by the commission must promote the delivery of quality
health care to the residents of the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.32.0357 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall elect officers each year. Meetings of the commission are open
to the public, except the commission may hold executive sessions to the extent
permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. The secretary of health shall furnish such
secretarial, clerical, and other assistance as the commission may require.

A
majority of the commission members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of commission business. The affirmative vote of a majority
of a quorum of the commission is required to carry a motion or resolution, to
adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

The
commission may appoint members of panels consisting of not less than three
members. A quorum for transaction of any business shall be a minimum of three
members. A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact
business delegated to it by the commission.

The
members of the commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal,
based upon its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in
good faith as members of the commission.

The
commission may, whenever the workload of the commission requires, request that
the secretary appoint pro tempore members. While serving as members pro
tempore persons have all the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled
to the emoluments, including travel expenses, of the commission.

The
commission shall prepare or determine the nature of the examinations for
applicants to practice dentistry.

The
commission shall establish continuing dental education requirements.

The
attorney general shall advise the commission and represent it in all legal
proceedings.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.32.180 and 1996 c 191 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person licensed to practice dentistry in this state shall
renew his or her license and comply with administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and fees
as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission, in its sole
discretion, may permit the applicant to be licensed without examination, and
with or without conditions, if it is satisfied that the applicant meets all the
requirements for licensure in this state and is competent to engage in the
practice of dentistry.

---
END ---