BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall provide coordination and technical assistance to
facilitate the application by prospective groups to be regional fisheries
enhancement groups. The department shall provide a format and guidelines that
any prospective group may use to make an initial application. Prospective
groups must submit the applications to the department. Applications are
reviewed by the regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board under RCW
75.50.115.

(2)
The department shall designate geographical areas for which regional fisheries
enhancement groups may be formed. In addition to the regions in existence as
of January 1, 1999, the department shall designate four more regions in eastern
Washington for the formation of a total of sixteen regional fisheries
enhancement groups.

Sec.
2. RCW
75.50.115 and 1998 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board shall:

(a)
Assess the training and technical assistance needs of the regional fisheries
enhancement groups;

(b)
Develop a training and technical assistance services plan in order to provide
timely, topical technical assistance and training services to regional
fisheries enhancement groups. The plan shall be provided to the director and
to the senate and house of representatives natural resources committees no
later than October 1, 1995, and shall be updated not less than every year. The
advisory board shall provide ample opportunity for the public and interested
parties to participate in the development of the plan. The plan shall include
but is not limited to:

(i)
Establishment of an information clearinghouse service that is readily available
to regional fisheries enhancement groups. The information clearinghouse shall
collect, collate, and make available a broad range of information on subjects
that affect the development, implementation, and operation of diverse fisheries
and habitat enhancement projects. The information clearinghouse service may
include periodical news and informational bulletins;

(ii)
An ongoing program in order to provide direct, on-site technical assistance and
services to regional fisheries enhancement groups. The advisory board shall
assist regional fisheries enhancement groups in soliciting federal, state, and
local agencies, tribal governments, institutions of higher education, and
private business for the purpose of providing technical assistance and services
to regional fisheries enhancement group projects; and

(iii)
A cost estimate for implementing the plan;

(c)
Propose a budget to the director for operation of the advisory board and
implementation of the technical assistance plan;

(d)
Make recommendations to the director regarding regional enhancement group
project proposals and funding of those proposals; ((and))

(e)
Review applications by prospective groups applying for selection as regional
fisheries enhancement groups in regions designated by the department for the
establishment of regional fisheries enhancement groups. Only one group may be
selected as a regional fisheries enhancement group per region. The advisory
board shall recommend to the director which group shall be selected as the
regional fisheries enhancement group for a region; and

(f)
Establish criteria for the redistribution of unspent project funds for any
regional enhancement group that has a year ending balance exceeding one hundred
thousand dollars.

(2)
The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board may:

(a)
Facilitate resolution of disputes between regional fisheries enhancement groups
and the department;

(b)
Promote community and governmental partnerships that enhance the salmon
resource and habitat;

(c)
Promote environmental ethics and watershed stewardship;

(d)
Advocate for watershed management and restoration;

(e)
Coordinate regional fisheries enhancement group workshops and training;

(f)
Monitor and evaluate regional fisheries enhancement projects;

(g)
Provide guidance to regional fisheries enhancement groups; and

(h)
Develop recommendations to the director to address identified impediments to
the success of regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(3)(a)
The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board shall develop
recommendations for limitations on the amount of overhead that a regional
fisheries enhancement group may charge from each of the following categories of
funding provided to the group:

(i)
Federal funds;

(ii)
State funds;

(iii)
Local funds; and

(iv)
Private donations.

(b)
The advisory board shall develop recommendations for limitations on the number
and salary of paid employees that are employed by a regional fisheries
enhancement group. The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board shall
adhere to the founding principles for regional groups that emphasize the
volunteer nature of the groups, maximization of field-related fishery resource
benefits, and minimization of overhead.

(c)
The advisory board shall evaluate and make recommendations for the limitation
or elimination of commissions, finders fees, or other reimbursements to
regional fisheries enhancement group employees.

(((d) The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board
shall report to the appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 1999, on
the board recommendations for overhead limitations, paid employee limitations,
and commission limitations for regional fisheries enhancement groups.))

---
END ---