BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.99.080 and 1995 c 166 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Moneys
transferred to the recreation resource account from the marine fuel tax refund account
may be used when appropriated by the legislature, as well as any federal or
other funds now or hereafter available, to pay the necessary administrative and
coordinative costs of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation
established by RCW 43.99.110. All moneys so transferred, except those
appropriated as aforesaid, shall be divided into two equal shares and shall be
used to benefit watercraft recreation in this state as follows:

(1)
One share as grants to state agencies for (a) acquisition of title to, or any
interests or rights in, marine recreation land, (b) capital improvement and
renovation of marine recreation land, including periodic dredging in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section, if needed, to maintain or make
the facility more useful, or (c) matching funds in any case where federal
or other funds are made available on a matching basis for purposes described in
(a) or (b) of this subsection;

(2)
One share as grants to public bodies to help finance (a) acquisition of title to,
or any interests or rights in, marine recreation land, or (b) capital
improvement and renovation of marine recreation land, including
periodic dredging in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, if needed,
to maintain or make the facility more useful. A public body is authorized
to use a grant, together with its own contribution, as matching funds in any
case where federal or other funds are made available for purposes described in
(a) or (b) of this subsection. The committee may prescribe further terms and
conditions for the making of grants in order to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

(3) For the purposes of this section "periodic
dredging" is limited to dredging of materials that have been deposited in
a channel due to unforeseen events. This dredging should extend the expected
usefulness of the facility for at least five years.

---
END ---