BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 53.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A port district providing aircraft noise abatement under this chapter shall
create a noise abatement arbitration panel to arbitrate disputes between the
port and property owners over programs the port district offers as part of its
aircraft noise abatement efforts. The arbitration panel shall be composed of
seven members, appointed as follows: (a) Two members shall be appointed by the
joint action of the members of the house of representatives and senate whose
legislative districts include territory located within the noise impact area
served by one or more noise abatement programs; (b) three members shall be
appointed by the port commission from a list of citizens nominated by the
separate action of each council of a city or town, and the county legislative
authority of any county, with territory located within the noise impact area
served by one or more noise abatement programs; and (c) two members appointed
by the port commission on its own.

(2) Any property owner disputing the extent of the program, or
amount that a port district offers under a program, may request the panel to
arbitrate the dispute. The determination by the arbitration panel shall be
binding on the port district and shall constitute an offer from the port
district to the property owner. The panel shall meet at least once every three
months to arbitrate disputes. Each dispute that is arbitrated shall be
completed within sixty days of commencing the arbitration. The expenses of the
panel shall be paid by the port district, including paying each member one
hundred dollars per day and related expenses for such work.

---
END ---