BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. The legislature finds that
water pollution incidents result in fines and penalties that are presently used
for a variety of purposes unrelated to restoring the damage caused by the
pollution or otherwise benefiting the water and other natural resources enjoyed
by Washington citizens. The legislature further finds that often the
settlement of enforcement actions relating to environmental violations does not
adequately involve the communities in which the violations occurred and allow
for the recommendations of those communities on expending funds under
consideration in the settlement.

Therefore
the purpose of this act is to dedicate water pollution fines and penalties to
the restoration and improvement of Washington's environmental quality and to
ensure a greater voice in the expenditure of settlement funds by communities in
which the environmental violation occurred.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.48.400 and 1994 c 264 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Moneys in the coastal protection fund shall be disbursed for the following
purposes and no others:

(a)
Environmental restoration and enhancement projects intended to restore or
enhance environmental, recreational, archaeological, or aesthetic resources for
the benefit of Washington's citizens;

(b)
Investigations of the long-term effects of oil spills; and

(c)
Development and implementation of an aquatic land geographic information
system.

(2)
The director may allocate a portion of the fund to be devoted to research and
development in the causes, effects, and removal of pollution caused by the
discharge of oil or other hazardous substances.

(3)
A steering committee consisting of representatives of the departments of
ecology, fish and wildlife, and natural resources, and the parks and recreation
commission shall authorize the expenditure of the moneys collected under RCW 90.48.140,
90.48.144, and 90.48.366 through 90.48.368, after consulting impacted local
agencies and local and tribal governments.

(4)
For proposed expenditures from the fund not governed by subsection (3) of
this section to be made for the purpose of environmental restoration and
enhancement, the director shall consult with local governments in the vicinity
of the proposed expenditure, and give priority to protection and restoration of
environmental resources in areas impacted by the violations for which penalties
are collected.

(5)
Agencies may not be reimbursed from the coastal protection fund for the
salaries and benefits of permanent employees for routine operational support.
Agencies may only be reimbursed under this section if money for reconnaissance
and damage assessment activities is unavailable from other sources.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.21B.300 and 1993 c 387 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431, 70.105.080,
70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330 shall be
imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt
requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the penalty from the
department((, the administrator of the office of marine safety,)) or the
local air authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity.
Within fifteen days after the notice is received, the person incurring the
penalty may apply in writing to the department((, the administrator,))
or the authority for the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt
of the application, the department((, the administrator,)) or the
authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever terms the
department((, the administrator,)) or the authority in its discretion
deems proper. The department or the authority may ascertain the facts
regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules
as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a
demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of
information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.

(2)
Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the pollution control
hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the appeal is filed with the
hearings board and served on the department((, the administrator,)) or the
authority thirty days after receipt by the person penalized of the notice
imposing the penalty or thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition
of the application for relief from penalty.

(3)
A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:

(a)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;

(b)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on application for
relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or

(c)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the hearings board if
the penalty is appealed.

(4)
If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department ((or the
administrator)) within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the
attorney general, upon request of the department ((or the administrator)),
shall bring an action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior
court of Thurston county, or of any county in which the violator does business,
to recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the
authority within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the authority
may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior court of the county
of the authority's main office or of any county in which the violator does
business. In these actions, the procedures and rules of evidence shall be the
same as in an ordinary civil action.

(5)
All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to
the general fund except those penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155,
which shall be credited to the reclamation account as provided in RCW
18.104.155(7)((,)); RCW 70.94.431, the disposition of which shall
be ((governed by that provision, RCW 70.105.080, which shall be credited to
the hazardous waste control and elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180,))credited
to the state toxics control account created in RCW 70.105D.070; RCW 88.46.090,
which shall be credited to the oil spill administration account; and RCW 90.48.140,
90.48.144, and 90.56.330, which shall be credited to the coastal protection
fund created by RCW 90.48.390.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

SETTLEMENTS
OF ENVIRONMENTAL ACTIONS. (1) This section shall be applicable when the
department imposes a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars or more for a
violation of chapter 90.48 RCW or its implementing rules, and the attorney
general proposes to settle an appeal of such a civil penalty, in which the
proposed settlement requires commitments or actions by the person in lieu of
payment of the penalty. The attorney general or the department shall:

(a)
Consider proposals submitted by affected local governments in the vicinity of
the alleged violation; and

(b)
Attempt to dedicate settlement funds to the protection and restoration of the
environmental resources in the vicinity of the alleged violation.

(2)
This section shall not be construed to preclude an action for liability based
upon any other claim or statute not expressly precluded by the terms of the
settlement.

(3)
This section shall not be construed to limit, modify, or affect in any way the
authority of the attorney general to settle any action in an administrative or
judicial proceeding, except where the specific provisions of this section are
applicable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---