BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds and declares that:

(a)
The state has a compelling interest in preventing fatal motor vehicle accidents
on the roads of this state;

(b)
In order to prevent fatal motor vehicle accidents, it is necessary to analyze
and understand the causes of such accidents, including the role played by
alcohol;

(c)
The state's compelling interest in preventing fatal motor vehicle accidents
therefore creates a special need beyond normal law enforcement for the
collection of evidence of blood alcohol content from drivers involved in fatal
motor vehicle accidents; and

(d)
Because evidence of blood alcohol content diminishes over time, requiring a
warrant before that evidence can be collected would be impracticable and would
frustrate the state's interest in collecting the information.

(2)
In order to foster the prevention of fatal motor vehicle accidents, it is the
intent of the legislature to:

(a)
Allow law enforcement officers to collect evidence of blood alcohol content
from drivers who are at fault in fatal motor vehicle accidents; and

(b)
Require hospitals to disclose evidence of blood alcohol content that they have
collected from drivers involved in fatal motor vehicle accidents to law
enforcement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given
consent, subject to RCW 46.61.506, to a test of his or her breath for the
purpose of determining the alcohol concentration in his or her breath if:

(a)
The person is involved in a motor vehicle accident in which there has been a fatality;
and

(b)
An officer on the scene believes that the person violated chapter 46.61 RCW and
the violation caused the motor vehicle accident.

(2)
The test of breath must be administered at the direction of a law enforcement
officer on the scene of a fatal motor vehicle accident who believes that the
person violated chapter 46.61 RCW and the violation caused the motor vehicle
accident. The officer shall inform the person of his or her right to refuse
the breath test. The officer shall warn the driver that he or she will be
guilty of a class 3 civil infraction if he or she refuses to submit to the
test.

(3)
The law enforcement officer shall forward the results of the test to the chief
of the Washington state patrol.

(4)
If a person is dead, unconscious, or otherwise in a condition rendering him or
her incapable of submitting to a breath test, no test may be given.

(5)
If, after receiving the warnings under subsection (2) of this section, the
person arrested refuses the request of a law enforcement officer to submit to a
test of his or her breath, no test may be given.

(6)
A person refusing to submit to a test under subsection (5) of this section
commits a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every hospital shall on or before the tenth day of each month, report in
writing to the chief of the Washington state patrol any toxicology report taken
during the preceding calendar month from a person hospitalized as a result of
an accident in which there has been a fatality that shows that the person may
have been under the influence of intoxicating liquor at the time of the
accident.

(2)
As used in this section, "hospital" has the same meaning as in RCW
70.41.020.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.52.060 and 1998 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((It
shall be the duty of)) The chief of the Washington state patrol ((to))
shall file, tabulate, and analyze all accident reports, all breath
test results collected under section 2 of this act, and all toxicology reports
collected under section 3 of this act and ((to)) publish annually,
immediately following the close of each fiscal year, and monthly during the
course of the year, statistical information based thereon showing the number of
accidents, the location, the frequency and circumstances thereof and other
statistical information which may prove of assistance in determining the cause
of vehicular accidents.

Such
accident reports, breath test results, toxicology reports, and analysis
or reports thereof shall be available to the director of licensing, the
department of transportation, the utilities and transportation commission, the
traffic safety commission, and other public entities authorized by the chief of
the Washington state patrol, or their duly authorized representatives, for
further tabulation and analysis for pertinent data relating to the regulation
of highway traffic, highway construction, vehicle operators and all other
purposes, and to publish information so derived as may be deemed of publication
value.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---