BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.90.120 and 1987 c 222 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall adopt rules under the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW, governing safety, sanitation, and water quality for water recreation
facilities. The rules shall include but not be limited to requirements for
design; operation; injury and illness reporting; biological and chemical
contamination standards; water quality monitoring; inspection; permit
application and issuance; and enforcement procedures. However, a water
recreation facility intended for the exclusive use of residents of any
apartment house complex or of a group of rental housing units of less than
fifteen living units, or of a mobile home park, or of a condominium complex or
any group or association of less than fifteen home owners shall not be subject
to preconstruction design review, routine inspection, or permit or fee
requirements; and water treatment of hydroelectric reservoirs or natural
streams, creeks, lakes, or irrigation canals shall not be required.

(2)
In adopting rules under subsection (1) of this section regarding the operation
or design of a recreational water contact facility, the board shall review and
consider any recommendations made by the recreational water contact facility
advisory committee.

(3)
A health studio, as that term is defined in RCW 19.142.010, that operates a
water recreation facility is not required to have a lifeguard on duty unless
there are children using the water recreation facility.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.90.125 and 1987 c 222 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any local board of health
from establishing and enforcing any provisions governing safety, sanitation,
and water quality for any water recreation facility, regardless of ownership or
use, in addition to those rules established by the state board of health under
this chapter. However, no local board of health may establish a provision
that requires a health studio, as that term is defined in RCW 19.142.010, to
have a lifeguard on duty more often than is required under RCW 70.90.120.

---
END ---