BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.20.090 and 1998 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless otherwise agreed rental agreements shall be for a term of one year. Any
rental agreement of whatever duration shall be automatically renewed for the
term of the original rental agreement, unless a different specified term is
agreed upon.

(2)(a)
A landlord seeking to increase the rent upon expiration of the term of a rental
agreement of any duration shall notify the tenant in writing three months prior
to the effective date of any increase in rent.

(b)
Except for termination of tenancy under RCW 59.20.080, a landlord shall notify
the tenant in writing twenty-four months prior to the expiration of a rental
agreement of an intention not to renew.

(3)
A tenant shall notify the landlord in writing one month prior to the expiration
of a rental agreement of an intention not to renew.

(4)(a)
The tenant may terminate the rental agreement upon thirty days written notice
whenever a change in the location of the tenant's employment requires a change
in his residence, and shall not be liable for rental following such termination
unless after due diligence and reasonable effort the landlord is not able to
rent the mobile home lot at a fair rental. If the landlord is not able to rent
the lot, the tenant shall remain liable for the rental specified in the rental
agreement until the lot is rented or the original term ends;

(b) Any tenant who is a member of the armed forces may terminate a
rental agreement with less than thirty days notice if he receives reassignment
orders which do not allow greater notice.

---
END ---