BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF
WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. RCW 77.44.050 and 1996 c
222 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The warm water game
fish account is hereby created in the state wildlife fund. Moneys in the
account are subject to legislative appropriation and shall be used for the
purpose of funding the warm water game fish enhancement program, including the
development of warm water pond and lake habitat, culture of warm water game
fish, improvement of warm water fish habitat, management of warm water fish
populations, and other practical activities that will improve the fishing for
warm water fish. Funds ((from the)) for warm water game fish ((surcharge))
as provided in RCW 77.32.440 shall not serve as replacement funding for
department-operated warm water fish projects existing on December 31, 1994((.
Funds from the warm water game fish account shall not be used for the operation
or construction of the warm water fish culture project at Ringold unless
specifically authorized by legislation.

Funds from the sale
of the warm water game fish surcharges shall be deposited in the warm water
game fish account)), except
that an amount not to exceed ninety-one thousand dollars may be used for warm
water fish culture at the Rod Meseberg warm water fish production facility during
the biennium ending June 30, 2001.

Sec. 2. RCW 77.32.440 and 1998 c
191 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1) The commission
shall adopt rules to continue funding current enhancement programs at levels
equal to the participation of licensees in each of the individual enhancement
programs. All enhancement funding will continue to be deposited directly into
the individual accounts created for each enhancement.

(2) In implementing
subsection (1) of this section with regard to warm water game fish, the
department shall ((initially)) deposit in the warm water game fish
account ((6.512 percent of the funds received from the sale of each
freshwater license and each freshwater, saltwater, and shellfish combination
license. The percentage initially)) the sum of one million two hundred
fifty thousand dollars each fiscal year during the fiscal years 1999 and 2000,
based on two hundred fifty thousand warm water anglers. Beginning in fiscal
year 2001, and each year thereafter, the deposit to the warm water game fish
account established in this subsection shall be adjusted annually to
reflect the actual numbers of license holders fishing for warm water game fish
based on an annual survey of licensed anglers from the previous year
conducted by the department beginning with the April 1, ((2000)) 1999,
to March 31, ((2001)) 2000, license year survey. ((The
legislature expects that implementing this subsection will result in annual
deposits of at least one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars into the
warm water game fish account.))

NEW SECTION. Sec.
3. If specific funding for
the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is
not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is
null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---