BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.24.145 and 1987 c 496 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as required in subsection (2) of this section, when property is
forfeited under this chapter the department may:

(((1)))
(a) Retain the property or any part thereof for official use or upon
application by any law enforcement agency of this state, another state, or the
District of Columbia, or of the United States for the exclusive use of
enforcing the provisions of this chapter or the laws of any other state or the
District of Columbia or of the United States.

(((2)))
(b) Sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder after due
advertisement, but the department before delivering any of the goods so seized
shall require the person to whom the property is sold to affix the proper
amount of stamps. The proceeds of the sale and all moneys forfeited under this
chapter shall be first applied to the payment of all proper expenses of any
investigation leading to the seizure and of the proceedings for forfeiture and
sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, and
court costs. The balance of the proceeds and all moneys shall be deposited in
the general fund of the state. Proper expenses of investigation includes costs
incurred by any law enforcement agency or any federal, state, or local agency.

(2) When cigarettes or other tobacco products are forfeited
under this chapter, these products must be promptly destroyed in a manner
established by the department.

---
END ---