BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Upon
obtaining necessary waivers or other adequate legal assurances with respect to
the removal or modification of any applicable deed restrictions or reversionary
clauses, the state parks and recreation commission shall convey to the city of
Moses Lake all property located within the city of Moses Lake that is currently
developed for use as a state park, and additionally any land owned by the state
parks and recreation commission that is adjacent to the land currently
developed for use as a state park. The city of Moses Lake shall take all
measures necessary to accept these lands into ownership.

The
city of Moses Lake shall maintain as a city park all conveyed land for public
outdoor recreation purposes. The title, and any other documents necessary for
the transfer of these lands, will include covenants ensuring that the city of
Moses Lake will maintain all conveyed land as a city park. If the city of
Moses Lake breaches these covenants, ownership of all park lands conveyed under
this act will revert to the state parks and recreation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---