BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
state parks and recreation commission shall convey to Kittitas county for use
as a fairgrounds that property located within the city of Ellensburg, between
Euclid way and Pfenning road, that is currently dedicated to use as a
cross-state trail. Kittitas county shall take all measures necessary to accept
these lands into ownership.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---