BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

Utilities
are required to provide to the consumers of electricity an adequate disclosure
of costs attributable to salmon restoration and recovery and other
environmental costs. Utilities shall disclose these costs to the customer on a
monthly basis, and include the following information:

(1)
The amount, to the nearest whole dollar, of the customer's monthly utility bill
that is attributable to salmon restoration and recovery and other environmental
costs; and

(2)
An explanation in the customer's utility bill, on at least an annual basis, of
the method used to calculate the costs attributable to salmon restoration and
recovery and other environmental costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---