BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.005 and 1997 c 393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(2)
"Limit factor" means:

(a)
((For taxing districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the
calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred six percent;

(b))) For
taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW 84.55.0101,
the lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one hundred six
percent;

(((c)))
(b) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred six percent or
one hundred percent plus inflation; and

(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in
RCW 84.04.140.

---
END ---