BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.0101 and 1997 c 3 s 204 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority of a taxing
district other than the state may provide for the use of a limit factor under
this chapter of one hundred six percent or less. A limit factor may be
adopted for a period not to exceed nine consecutive years. After the
expiration of a period for which a limit factor is adopted, another limit
factor may not be adopted for an equal number of years.

(2) In districts with legislative authorities of four
members or less, two-thirds of the members must approve an ordinance or
resolution under this section. In districts with more than four members, a
majority plus one vote must approve an ordinance or resolution under this section.
The new limit factor shall be effective for taxes collected in the following
year only. Subsequent levies shall be computed as if the taxing district
had levied for that year at the maximum rate that would otherwise have been
allowed under this chapter without a finding of substantial need.

---
END ---