BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.005 and 1997 c 393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Adjusted inflation" means:

(a)
Ninety percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2000;

(b)
Eighty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2001;

(c)
Seventy percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2002;

(d)
Sixty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2003;

(e)
Fifty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2004;

(f)
Forty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2005;

(g)
Thirty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2006;

(h)
Twenty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2007;

(i)
Ten percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2008; and

(j)
Zero for taxes levied for collection in 2009 and thereafter;

(2)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(((2)))
(3) "Limit factor" means:

(a)
For the state one hundred percent plus adjusted inflation;

(b)
For taxing districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the
calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred six percent;

(((b)))
(c) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized under
RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or
one hundred six percent;

(((c)))
(d) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred six percent or
one hundred percent plus inflation; and

(((3))) (4) "Regular property taxes" has
the meaning given it in RCW 84.04.140.

---
END ---