BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.48.080 and 1997 c 3 s 112 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Annually during the months of September and October, the department of revenue
shall examine and compare the returns of the assessment of the property in the
several counties of the state, and the assessment of the property of railroad
and other companies assessed by the department, and proceed to equalize the
same, so that each county in the state shall pay its due and just proportion of
the taxes for state purposes for such assessment year, according to the ratio
the assessed valuation of the property in each county bears to the correct
total assessed valuation of all property in the state.

First.
The department shall classify all property, real and personal, and shall raise
and lower the assessed valuation of any class of property in any county to a
value that shall be equal, so far as possible, to the correct assessed value of
such class as of January 1st of the current year, after determining the correct
appraised value, and any adjustment applicable under RCW 84.40.0305 for the
property, for the purpose of ascertaining the just amount of tax due from each
county for state purposes. In equalizing personal property as of January 1st
of the current year, the department shall use the assessment level of the
preceding year. Such classification may be on the basis of types of property,
geographical areas, or both. For purposes of this section, for each county
that has not provided the department with an assessment return by December 1st,
the department shall proceed, using facts and information and in a manner it
deems appropriate, to estimate the value of each class of property in the
county.

Second.
The department shall keep a full record of its proceedings and the same shall
be published annually by the department.

(2)
The department shall levy the state taxes authorized by law. The amount levied
in any one year for general state purposes shall not exceed the lawful dollar
rate on the dollar of the assessed value of the property of the entire state as
equalized under this section. The department shall apportion the amount of tax
for state purposes levied by the department, among the several counties, in
proportion to the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county for
the year as equalized by the department: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this
apportionment, the department shall recompute the previous year's levy and the
apportionment thereof to correct for changes and errors in taxable values
reported to the department after October 1 of the preceding year and shall
adjust the apportioned amount of the current year's state levy for each county
by the difference between the apportioned amounts established by the original
and revised levy computations for the previous year. For purposes of this
section, changes in taxable values mean a final adjustment made by a county
board of equalization, the state board of tax appeals, or a court of competent
jurisdiction and shall include additions of omitted property, other additions
or deletions from the assessment or tax rolls, any assessment return provided
by a county to the department subsequent to December 1st, or a change in the
indicated ratio of a county. Errors in taxable values mean errors corrected by
a final reviewing body.

In
addition to computing a levy under this subsection ((that is reduced under
RCW 84.55.012)), the department shall compute a hypothetical levy at the
rate authorized in RCW 84.52.065 without regard to ((the)) any
reduction under RCW ((84.55.012)) 84.55.010 and 84.55.0121. This
hypothetical levy shall also be apportioned among the several counties in
proportion to the valuation of the taxable property of the county for the year,
as equalized by the department, in the same manner as the actual levy and shall
be used by the county assessors for the purpose of recomputing and establishing
a consolidated levy under RCW 84.52.010.

(3)
The department shall have authority to adopt rules and regulations to enforce
obedience to its orders in all matters in relation to the returns of county
assessments, the equalization of values, and the apportionment of the state
levy by the department.

(4)
After the completion of the duties prescribed in this section, the director of
the department shall certify the record of the proceedings of the department
under this section, the tax levies made for state purposes and the
apportionment thereof among the counties, and the certification shall be
available for public inspection.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts,
and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public
hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any
property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in that section, the assessor shall use the
hypothetical state levy, as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that
was computed under RCW 84.48.080 without regard to ((the)) any
reduction under RCW ((84.55.012)) 84.55.010 and 84.55.0121.

---
END ---