BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of revenue shall develop an assessment improvement plan with the
objective of improving the uniformity, accuracy, and accountability of property
assessments state-wide. The plan shall include the development of guidelines
and standards for assessment administration, including program management and
property classification and valuation. The plan shall provide recommendations
on processes and procedures that assure quality assessment administration in
the most efficient and cost‑effective manner. The plan shall also
recommend processes for reviewing and reporting on individual county
performance, and programs to assist counties to correct noncompliance. The
department shall estimate the cost and time required to implement the plan.
The department shall submit the plan to the committee on finance of the house
of representatives and the committee on ways and means of the senate before
January 1, 2000.

---
END ---