BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.092 and 1998 c 16 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than the state may be
set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise under this chapter if the
regular property tax levy for the district for taxes due in the prior ((years
beginning with 1986)) year had been set at the full amount allowed
under this chapter without reference to this section, and including any
levy authorized under RCW 52.16.160 that would have been imposed but for the
limitation in RCW 52.18.065, applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge
under chapter 52.18 RCW.

The purpose of this section is to ((remove the incentive for a
taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under
this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing district that
reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise could impose under this
chapter, by removing the adverse consequences to future levy capacities
resulting from such levy reductions)) allow a district that reduces its
tax levy below the maximum permitted under this chapter to retain its levy
capacity for one year.

---
END ---