BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that reliable data is needed to assist in forecasting future
instructional staff for kindergarten through twelfth grade. A dependable
forecast requires accurate and reliable information on the number of teachers
entering and leaving the teaching profession. Also, the number of students
entering and leaving the public kindergarten through twelfth grade system will
impact the need for qualified teachers.

Recent
studies show conflicting patterns regarding teacher supply and demand. The
data is inconclusive on whether Washington faces a shortage of teachers.
Empirical information seems to indicate that many of this country's most
promising and talented young people are not choosing teaching as a career. If
teacher shortages exist in the future, we must determine how we will achieve
the level of teachers necessary for the next decade. The state of Washington
must prepare to use creative and innovative means to attract and keep
individuals in the teaching profession.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to finance a study on teacher supply and demand,
which will be used to determine the future need for teachers and methods to
attract new teachers to the profession.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
office of financial management, in consultation with the office of the superintendent
of public instruction and teacher training programs at Washington institutions
of higher education shall conduct a study on the need for teachers in the
kindergarten through twelfth grade system in Washington state. The study shall
include an evaluation of teacher supply and demand in Washington over the next
ten years and make recommendations for addressing teacher supply needs that are
identified in the study. The results of the study shall be submitted to the
legislature by November 1, 2000.

---
END ---