BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to encourage and
enhance cooperation among business, industry, and community and technical
colleges. Economically stronger regional work forces are the anticipated
outcomes of such collaboration.

(2)
In order to secure for the citizens of Washington the advantages that would
accrue through collaborative programs that meet specific educational, business,
and societal needs, the college board may provide economic development grants
for the planning and design of programs offered by two or more community and
technical colleges using appropriated funds. Economic development grants shall
encourage collaboration among business, industry, and community and technical
colleges, and meet the work force training needs of this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The economic incentive grant program is established. The college board, using
funds appropriated therefor, may award economic incentive grants for
instructional programs that meet the demand of work force training for business
and industry. Economic incentive grants may be used to fund proposals that
emphasize collaboration between business, industry, and community and technical
colleges. The criteria for awarding the grants must be uniform and applicable
to all eligible colleges and the proposals shall meet the following conditions:

(a)
The program shall be offered by two or more eligible community colleges and
technical colleges;

(b)
The participating colleges shall obtain a matching grant from business and
industry that is equal to the amount of the state grant;

(c)
The partnership between business, industry, and community and technical
colleges shall be a cost-effective means to provide the training program;

(d)
The program shall provide training for the regional work force; and

(e)
The program shall meet the needs of the regional employers.

(2)
As used in this section, "instructional program" means a course of
study leading to certification, licensure, or a degree at the associate level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
college board shall have the following powers and duties in administering the
grant program established in section 2 of this act:

(1)
To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;

(2)
To establish one or more review committees to assist in the evaluation of
proposals for funding. The review committee shall include individuals with
significant experience in work force training in areas relevant to one or more
of the funding period priorities and shall include representatives from
business, industry, and the community and technical college system;

(3)
To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting grant proposals
consistent with overall goals of the program. During the 1999-2001 biennium,
the guidelines shall be consistent with the criteria outlined in section 2 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
college board may solicit and receive gifts, grants, and endowments from public
or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for
the use and benefit of the purposes of the program and may expend the same or
any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or
endowments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
economic incentive grant program account is hereby established in the custody
of the state treasurer. The state board shall deposit in the account all
moneys appropriated or received under section 4 of this act. Moneys in the
fund may be spent only for the purposes of section 4 of this act.
Disbursements from the account shall be on the authorization of the college
board. The account is subject to the allotment procedure provided under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
college board shall assure continuing evaluation of the effectiveness of the
economic incentive grants authorized by section 3 of this act, and before
December of each even-numbered year shall submit a report to the governor and
legislature. In administering the grants, the college board shall require the
use of appropriate fiscal procedures to ensure accountability of public funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 28B.50 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from
the general fund to the state board for community and technical colleges for
the purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from
the general fund to the state board for community and technical colleges for
the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---