BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no city or town
may enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that
prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for
residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's facility serving
twelve or fewer children.

(2)
A city or town may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building,
fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to
lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the
zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c)
is certified by the office of child care policy licensor as providing a safe
passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to
applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate neighborhood
compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for persons who use
family day-care who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3)
A city or town may also require that the family day-care provider, before state
licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the
immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to
locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and
the day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a
forum to resolve the dispute.

(4)
This section may not be construed to prohibit a city or town from imposing
zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care
provider's home serving twelve or fewer children in an area zoned for
residential or commercial use, if the conditions are no more restrictive than
conditions imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the
establishment of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family
day-care provider" is as defined in RCW 74.15.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no county may
enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice that
prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for
residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's facility serving
twelve or fewer children.

(2)
A county may require that the facility: (a) Comply with all building, fire,
safety, health code, and business licensing requirements; (b) conform to lot
size, building size, setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the
zoning district except if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (c)
is certified by the office of child care policy licensor as providing a safe
passenger loading area; (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to
applicable regulations; and (e) limit hours of operations to facilitate
neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate opportunity for
persons who use family day-care who work a nonstandard work shift.

(3)
A county may also require that the family day-care provider, before state
licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the
immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to
locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and
the day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a
forum to resolve the dispute.

(4)
This section may not be construed to prohibit a county from imposing zoning
conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care provider's
home serving twelve or fewer children in an area zoned for residential or
commercial use, if the conditions are no more restrictive than conditions
imposed on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment
of such facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family
day-care provider" is as defined in RCW 74.15.020.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.63.185 and 1995 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no city may
enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice ((which))
that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area
zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's home
facility.

(2)
A city may require that the facility: (((1))) (a) Comply with
all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements;
(((2))) (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot
coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is
a legal nonconforming structure; (((3))) (c) is certified by the
office of child care policy licensor as providing a safe passenger loading
area; (((4))) (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to
applicable regulations; and (((5))) (e) limit hours of operations
to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate
opportunity for persons who use family day-care and who work a nonstandard work
shift.

(3)
A city may also require that the family day-care provider, before state
licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the immediately
adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to locate and
maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and the family
day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may provide a forum
to resolve the dispute.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city from imposing
zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care
provider's home in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, so long as
such conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other
residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities
is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care
provider" is as defined in RCW 74.15.020.

Sec.
4. RCW
35A.63.215 and 1995 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no city may
enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning regulation,
or official control, policy, or administrative practice ((which)) that
prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area zoned for
residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's home facility.

(2)
A city may require that the facility: (((1))) (a) Comply with
all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing requirements;
(((2))) (b) conform to lot size, building size, setbacks, and lot
coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except if the structure is
a legal nonconforming structure; (((3))) (c) is certified by the
office of child care policy licensor as providing a safe passenger loading
area; (((4))) (d) include signage, if any, that conforms to
applicable regulations; and (((5))) (e) limit hours of operations
to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing appropriate
opportunity for persons who use family day-care and who work a nonstandard work
shift.

(3)
A city may also require that the family day-care provider, before state
licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider that the
immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent to
locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors and
the family day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may
provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a city from imposing
zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a family day-care
provider's home in an area zoned for residential or commercial use, so long as
such conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed on other
residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such facilities
is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care
provider" is as defined in RCW 74.15.020.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.70A.450 and 1995 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no county
or city ((that plans or elects to plan under this chapter)) may
enact, enforce, or maintain an ordinance, development regulation, zoning
regulation, or official control, policy, or administrative practice ((which))
that prohibits the use of a residential dwelling, located in an area
zoned for residential or commercial use, as a family day-care provider's home
facility.

(2)
A county or city may require that the facility: (((1))) (a)
Comply with all building, fire, safety, health code, and business licensing
requirements; (((2))) (b) conform to lot size, building size,
setbacks, and lot coverage standards applicable to the zoning district except
if the structure is a legal nonconforming structure; (((3))) (c)
is certified by the office of child care policy licensor as providing a safe
passenger loading area; (((4))) (d) include signage, if any, that
conforms to applicable regulations; and (((5))) (e) limit hours
of operations to facilitate neighborhood compatibility, while also providing
appropriate opportunity for persons who use family day-care and who work a nonstandard
work shift.

(3)
A county or city may also require that the family day-care provider,
before state licensing, require proof of written notification by the provider
that the immediately adjoining property owners have been informed of the intent
to locate and maintain such a facility. If a dispute arises between neighbors
and the family day-care provider over licensing requirements, the licensor may
provide a forum to resolve the dispute.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a
county or city ((that plans or elects to plan under this chapter))
from imposing zoning conditions on the establishment and maintenance of a
family day-care provider's home in an area zoned for residential or commercial
use, so long as such conditions are no more restrictive than conditions imposed
on other residential dwellings in the same zone and the establishment of such
facilities is not precluded. As used in this section, "family day-care
provider" is as defined in RCW 74.15.020.

---
END ---