BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.83.054 and 1987 c 150 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice,
the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this
chapter, except that the term "unlicensed practice" shall be defined
by RCW 18.83.180 rather than RCW 18.130.020.

(2) A person who holds a license under this chapter is subject
to the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, at all times the license
is maintained.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.83.135 and 1994 c 35 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the authority prescribed under RCW 18.130.050, the board shall have
the following authority:

(1)
To maintain records of all activities, and to publish and distribute to all
psychologists at least once each year abstracts of significant activities of
the committee; ((and))

(2)
To obtain the written consent of the complaining client or patient or their
legal representative, or of any person who may be affected by the complaint, in
order to obtain information which otherwise might be confidential or privileged;
and

(3) To apply the provisions of the uniform disciplinary act,
chapter 18.130 RCW, to all persons licensed as psychologists under this chapter.

---
END ---