BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person who drives a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug and as a result of that condition proximately causes
personal injury or wrongful death of a victim or victims may be liable for
punitive damages in addition to damages otherwise recoverable. The trier of
fact shall determine the amount of any punitive damages. No punitive damages
shall be payable under any liability insurance contract covering the driver.

(2) The court shall ensure that one-half of any punitive damages
collected is deposited in the public safety and education account under RCW
43.08.250, to be appropriated for crime victims' compensation. No fees or
costs may be paid out of the portion of punitive damages to be deposited in the
public safety and education account. No agreement for the payment of
attorneys' fees may calculate fees against a base that includes the portion of
punitive damages to be deposited in the public safety and education account,
and any agreement to the contrary is void as against public policy and
unenforceable.

---
END ---