BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.12.100 and 1927 c 123 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
plaintiff, the plaintiff's agent or attorney, or, at the plaintiff's
discretion, the sheriff, shall, upon receiving the writ of
restitution, forthwith serve a copy thereof upon the defendant, his agent or
attorney, or a person in possession of the premises, and shall not execute the
same for three days thereafter, nor until after the defendant has been served
with summons in the action as hereinabove provided, and the defendant, or
person in possession of the premises within three days after the service of the
writ of restitution may execute to the plaintiff a bond to be filed with and approved
by the clerk of the court in such sum as may be fixed by the judge, with
sufficient surety to be approved by the clerk of ((said)) the
court, conditioned that they will pay to the plaintiff such sum as the
plaintiff may recover for the use and occupation of the ((said))
premises, or any rent found due, together with all damages the plaintiff may
sustain by reason of the defendant occupying or keeping possession of ((said))
the premises, and also all the costs of the action. The plaintiff, his or
her agent or attorneys, shall have notice of the time and place where the
court or judge thereof shall fix the amount of the defendant's bond, and shall
have notice and a reasonable opportunity to examine into the qualification and
sufficiency of the sureties upon ((said)) the bond before ((said))
the bond shall be approved by the clerk. The writ may be served ((by
the sheriff)), in the event ((he shall be)) the person serving
the writ is unable to find the defendant, an agent or attorney, or a person
in possession of the premises, by affixing a copy of ((said)) the
writ in a conspicuous place upon the premises.

Sec.
2. RCW
59.18.030 and 1998 c 276 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure which is
used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or by two or more
persons maintaining a common household, including but not limited to single
family residences and units of multiplexes, apartment buildings, and mobile
homes.

(2)
"Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling unit
or the property of which it is a part, and in addition means any person
designated as representative of the landlord.

(3)
"Person" means an individual, group of individuals, corporation,
government, or governmental agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
or association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any
other legal or commercial entity.

(4)
"Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom is
vested:

(a)
All or any part of the legal title to property; or

(b)
All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present use and
enjoyment of the property.

(5)
"Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances thereto, grounds, and
facilities held out for the use of tenants generally and any other area or
facility which is held out for use by the tenant.

(6)
"Rental agreement" means all agreements which establish or modify the
terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any other provisions concerning the
use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.

(7)
A "single family residence" is a structure maintained and used as a
single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares one or more
walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be deemed a single family residence
if it has direct access to a street and shares neither heating facilities nor
hot water equipment, nor any other essential facility or service, with any
other dwelling unit.

(8)
A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling unit
primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental agreement.

(9)
"Reasonable attorney's fees", where authorized in this chapter, means
an amount to be determined including the following factors: The time and labor
required, the novelty and difficulty of the questions involved, the skill
requisite to perform the legal service properly, the fee customarily charged in
the locality for similar legal services, the amount involved and the results
obtained, and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers
performing the services.

(10)
"Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more persons;
(b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign, or symbol; and
(c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for
criminal purposes.

(11)
"Gang-related activity" means any activity that occurs within the
gang or advances a gang purpose.

(12)
"Squatter" means a person occupying a dwelling unit who is not a
tenant, and who is not authorized by an occupying tenant to occupy that
dwelling unit.

Sec.
3. RCW
59.18.040 and 1989 c 342 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following living arrangements are not intended to be governed by the provisions
of this chapter, unless established primarily to avoid its application, in
which event the provisions of this chapter shall control:

(1)
Residence at an institution, whether public or private, where residence is
merely incidental to detention or the provision of medical, religious,
educational, recreational, or similar services, including but not limited to
correctional facilities, licensed nursing homes, monasteries and convents, and
hospitals;

(2)
Occupancy under a bona fide earnest money agreement to purchase or contract of
sale of the dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, where the
tenant is, or stands in the place of, the purchaser;

(3)
Residence in a hotel, motel, or other transient lodging whose operation is
defined in RCW 19.48.010;

(4)
Rental agreements entered into pursuant to the provisions of chapter 47.12 RCW
where occupancy is by an owner-condemnee and where such agreement does not
violate the public policy of this state of ensuring decent, safe, and sanitary
housing and is so certified by the consumer protection division of the attorney
general's office;

(5)
Rental agreements for the use of any single family residence which are
incidental to leases or rentals entered into in connection with a lease of land
to be used primarily for agricultural purposes;

(6)
Rental agreements providing housing for seasonal agricultural employees while
provided in conjunction with such employment;

(7)
Rental agreements with the state of Washington, department of natural
resources, on public lands governed by Title 79 RCW;

(8)
Occupancy by an employee of a landlord whose right to occupy is conditioned
upon employment in or about the premises; or

(9)
Occupancy by a squatter.

Sec.
4. RCW
59.18.060 and 1991 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
landlord will at all times during the tenancy keep the premises fit for human
habitation, and shall in particular:

(1)
Maintain the premises to substantially comply with any applicable code,
statute, ordinance, or regulation governing their maintenance or operation,
which the legislative body enacting the applicable code, statute, ordinance or
regulation could enforce as to the premises rented if such condition
substantially endangers or impairs the health or safety of the tenant;

(2)
Maintain the roofs, floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces, foundations, and all
other structural components in reasonably good repair so as to be usable and
capable of resisting any and all normal forces and loads to which they may be
subjected;

(3)
Keep any shared or common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from
defects increasing the hazards of fire or accident;

(4)
Provide a reasonable program for the control of infestation by insects,
rodents, and other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and, except in the
case of a single family residence, control infestation during tenancy except
where such infestation is caused by the tenant;

(5)
Except where the condition is attributable to normal wear and tear, make
repairs and arrangements necessary to put and keep the premises in as good
condition as it by law or rental agreement should have been, at the
commencement of the tenancy;

(6)
Provide reasonably adequate locks and furnish keys to the tenant;

(7)
Maintain all electrical, plumbing, heating, and other facilities and appliances
supplied by him in reasonably good working order;

(8)
Maintain the dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight condition;

(9)
Except in the case of a single family residence, or on premises where
tenants are responsible for their own waste and garbage collection, provide
and maintain appropriate receptacles in common areas for the removal of ashes,
rubbish, and garbage, incidental to the occupancy and arrange for the
reasonable and regular removal of such waste;

(10)
Except where the building is not equipped for the purpose, provide facilities
adequate to supply heat and water and hot water as reasonably required by the
tenant;

(11)
Provide ((a)), in the rental agreement or by written notice to
the tenant, that the dwelling unit is equipped with a smoke detection
device as required in RCW 48.48.140. The rental agreement or notice
shall inform the tenant of the tenant's responsibility to maintain the smoke
detection device in proper operating condition and of penalties for failure to
comply with the provisions of RCW 48.48.140(3). The notice must be signed by
the landlord or the landlord's authorized agent and tenant with copies provided
to both parties.

(12)
Designate to the tenant the name and address of the person who is the landlord
by a statement on the rental agreement or by a notice conspicuously posted on
the premises. The tenant shall be notified immediately of any changes by
certified mail or by an updated posting. If the person designated in this
section does not reside in the state where the premises are located, there
shall also be designated a person who resides in the county who is authorized
to act as an agent for the purposes of service of notices and process, and if
no designation is made of a person to act as agent, then the person to whom
rental payments are to be made shall be considered such agent.

No
duty shall devolve upon the landlord to repair a defective condition under this
section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to the tenant under this
chapter, where the defective condition complained of was caused by the conduct
of such tenant, his family, invitee, or other person acting under his control,
or where a tenant unreasonably fails to allow the landlord access to the
property for purposes of repair. When the duty imposed by subsection (1) of
this section is incompatible with and greater than the duty imposed by any
other provisions of this section, the landlord's duty shall be determined
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
59.18.257 and 1991 c 194 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a landlord uses a tenant screening service, then the landlord may only
charge for the costs incurred for using the tenant screening service under this
section. If a landlord conducts his or her own screening of tenants, then the
landlord may charge his or her actual costs in obtaining the background
information, but the amount may not exceed the customary costs charged by a
screening service in the general area. The landlord's actual costs include
costs incurred for long distance phone calls and for time spent calling
landlords, employers, and financial institutions.

(2)
A landlord may not charge a prospective tenant for the cost of obtaining
background information under this section unless the landlord first notifies
the prospective tenant in writing of what a tenant screening entails, the
prospective tenant's rights to dispute the accuracy of information provided by
the tenant screening service or provided by the entities listed on the tenant
application who will be contacted for information concerning the tenant, and
the name and address of the tenant screening service used by the landlord.

(3)
Nothing in this section requires a landlord to disclose information to a
prospective tenant that was obtained from a tenant screening service or from
entities listed on the tenant application which is not required under the
federal fair credit reporting act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.

(4)
If a prospective tenant omits or falsifies material information on a rental
application that, if known, would have disqualified the prospective tenant from
consideration for tenancy, the landlord may recover from the prospective tenant
a fee not to exceed the actual cost to the landlord of obtaining the background
information.

(5) Any landlord or tenant who violates this section
may be liable to the ((prospective tenant)) other party for an
amount not to exceed one hundred dollars. The prevailing party may also
recover court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

Sec.
6. RCW
59.18.300 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 207 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for a landlord to intentionally cause termination of any of
his or her tenant's utility services, including water, heat,
electricity, or gas, except for an interruption of utility services for a
reasonable time in order to make necessary repairs. Any landlord who violates
this section may be liable to such tenant for ((his)) the actual
damages sustained by him or her, and up to one hundred dollars for each
day or part thereof the tenant is ((thereby)) deprived of any utility
service, and the prevailing party may recover ((his)) the costs
of suit or arbitration and a reasonable attorney's fee. It shall be unlawful
for a tenant to unreasonably use or waste utility services or cause
unnecessary or unauthorized utility charges, or to intentionally cause the
loss of utility services provided by the landlord, including water, heat,
electricity or gas, excepting as resulting from the normal occupancy of the
premises. Any tenant who violates this section shall be liable to the
landlord for all accrued unnecessary or unauthorized utility charges and
penalties, collection fees, court costs, and reasonable attorneys' fees.

Sec.
7. RCW
59.18.310 and 1991 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the tenant defaults in the payment of rent and reasonably indicates by words or
actions the intention not to resume tenancy, the tenant shall be liable for the
following for such abandonment: PROVIDED, That upon learning of such
abandonment of the premises the landlord shall make a reasonable effort to
mitigate the damages resulting from such abandonment:

(1)
When the tenancy is month-to-month, the tenant shall be liable for the rent for
the thirty days following either the date the landlord learns of the
abandonment, or the date the next regular rental payment would have become due,
whichever first occurs.

(2)
When the tenancy is for a term greater than month-to-month, the tenant shall be
liable for the lesser of the following:

(a)
The entire rent due for the remainder of the term; or

(b)
All rent accrued during the period reasonably necessary to rerent the premises
at a fair rental, plus the difference between such fair rental and the rent
agreed to in the prior agreement, plus actual costs incurred by the landlord in
rerenting the premises together with statutory court costs and reasonable
attorney's fees.

In
the event of such abandonment of tenancy and an accompanying default in the
payment of rent by the tenant, the landlord may immediately enter and take
possession of any property of the tenant found on the premises and may store
the same in any reasonably secure place. A landlord shall make reasonable
efforts to provide the tenant with a notice containing the name and address of
the landlord and the place where the property is stored and informing the
tenant that a sale or disposition of the property shall take place pursuant to
this section, and the date of the sale or disposal, and further informing the
tenant of the right under RCW 59.18.230 to have the property returned prior to
its sale or disposal. The landlord's efforts at notice under this subsection
shall be satisfied by the mailing by first class mail, postage prepaid, of such
notice to the tenant's last known address and to any other address provided in
writing by the tenant or actually known to the landlord where the tenant might
receive the notice. The landlord shall return the property to the tenant after
the tenant has paid the actual or reasonable drayage and storage costs
whichever is less if the tenant makes a written request for the return of the
property before the landlord has sold or disposed of the property. After
forty-five days from the date the notice of such sale or disposal is mailed or
personally delivered to the tenant, the landlord may sell or dispose of such
property, including personal papers, family pictures, and keepsakes. The
landlord may apply any income derived therefrom against moneys due the
landlord, including actual or reasonable costs whichever is less of drayage and
storage of the property. If the property has a cumulative value of two
hundred fifty dollars or less, the landlord may sell or dispose of the
property in the manner provided in this section, except for personal papers,
family pictures, and keepsakes, after seven days from the date the notice of
sale or disposal is mailed or personally delivered to the tenant: PROVIDED,
That the landlord shall make reasonable efforts, as defined in this section, to
notify the tenant. Any excess income derived from the sale of such property under
this section shall be held by the landlord for the benefit of the tenant for a
period of one year from the date of sale, and if no claim is made or action
commenced by the tenant for the recovery thereof prior to the expiration of
that period of time, the balance shall be the property of the landlord,
including any interest paid on the income.

Sec.
8. RCW
59.18.315 and 1983 c 264 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The landlord, at his or her discretion, may require by provision in the rental
agreement that all disputes regarding property damage, deposits, or tenant
requested repairs be submitted to mediation by an independent third party. If,
within sixty days after notice of a dispute covered under this subsection,
either party fails to participate in good faith mediation, the other party may
seek legal action.

(2)
The landlord and tenant may agree in writing to submit any other dispute
arising under the provisions of this chapter or under the terms, conditions, or
performance of the rental agreement, to mediation by an independent third
party. The parties may agree to submit any dispute to mediation before
exercising their right to arbitration under RCW 59.18.320.

Sec.
9. RCW
59.18.352 and 1992 c 38 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If
a tenant notifies the landlord that he or she, or another tenant who shares
that particular dwelling unit has been threatened by another tenant, and:

(1)
The threat was made with a firearm or other deadly weapon as defined in RCW
9A.04.110; and

(2)
The tenant who made the threat is arrested as a result of the threatening
behavior; and

(3)
The landlord fails to file an unlawful detainer action against the tenant who
threatened another tenant within seven calendar days after receiving notice of
the arrest from a law enforcement agency;

then
the tenant who was threatened may terminate the rental agreement and quit the
premises upon written notice to the landlord within thirty days after the
threat was made without further obligation under the rental agreement.

A
tenant who terminates a rental agreement under this section is discharged from
payment of rent for any period following the quitting date, and is entitled to
a pro rata refund of any prepaid rent, and shall receive a full and specific
statement of the basis for retaining any of the deposit together with any
refund due in accordance with RCW 59.18.280.

Nothing
in this section shall be construed to require a landlord to terminate a rental agreement
or file an unlawful detainer action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

A
landlord may, upon notification by a local law enforcement agency under RCW
4.24.550 that a tenant or prospective tenant is a high risk sex offender, evict
the tenant after serving the tenant with a three-day notice to vacate or, in
the case of a prospective tenant, refuse tenancy to the prospective tenant. A
landlord is immune from liability for damages caused by any such tenant.

Sec.
11. RCW
4.24.550 and 1998 c 220 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public agencies are authorized to release information to the public regarding
sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when the agency determines that
disclosure of the information is relevant and necessary to protect the public
and counteract the danger created by the particular offender. This
authorization applies to information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or
convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense
as defined by RCW 9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the
indeterminate sentence review board as the result of a sex offense or
kidnapping offense; (c) any person committed as a sexually violent predator
under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d)
any person found not guilty of a sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of
insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand
trial for a sex offense or kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under
chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(2)
The extent of the public disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall
be rationally related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the
community; (b) the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or
is regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for information
to enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3)
Local law enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in
determining the extent of a public disclosure made under this section: (a) For
offenders classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with
other appropriate law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon request,
relevant, necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the
offense and to any individual community member who lives near the residence
where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; (b) for
offenders classified as risk level II, the agency may also disclose relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to public and private schools, child day
care centers, family day care providers, businesses and organizations that
serve primarily children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and
community groups near the residence where the offender resides, expects to
reside, or is regularly found; and (c) for offenders classified as risk level
III, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information
to the public at large.

(4)
Local law enforcement agencies that disseminate information pursuant to this
section shall: (a) Review available risk level classifications made by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and
the indeterminate sentence review board; (b) assign risk level classifications
to all offenders about whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a
good faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days
before the offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves
from another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of the
offender's move, except that in no case may this notification provision be
construed to require an extension of an offender's release date. The juvenile
court shall provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant
information on offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely
manner. Each county sheriff shall maintain a current public posting of all
registered sex offenders residing in that county who are classified as risk
level III.

(5)
An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as
defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability for damages for any
discretionary risk level classification decisions or release of relevant and
necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or
agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this
section applies to risk level classification decisions and the release of
relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure
is authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or official to
classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health services, or the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and
necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by
itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided
under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information
to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.

(6)
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall
impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency
for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(7)
Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated
in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be
provided by law.

(8) When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an
offender differently than the offender is classified by the department of
corrections, the department of social and health services, or the indeterminate
sentence review board, the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the
appropriate department or the board and submit its reasons supporting the
change in classification.

---
END ---