BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of social and health services shall reallocate six existing social
worker positions to create permanency planning and adoption advocates. These
positions may not be case carrying. These positions shall seek to implement
children's permanency plans quickly, either through family reunification or
termination of parental rights and adoption. These positions shall be
classified as social worker III positions or above.

---
END ---