BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.88 RCW, to be codified between RCW 43.88.280
and 43.88.320, to read as follows:

No
state officer or employee may expend moneys received from fines, penalties,
forfeitures, settlements, court orders, or other enforcement actions except as
provided in a specific appropriation by law.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.88.280 and 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 43.88.290, section 1 of this act, and 43.88.300 the term
"state officer or employee" includes the members of the governing
body of any state agency, as state agency is defined in RCW 43.88.020(4) and
those generally known as executive management but excludes nonsupervisory state
employees covered by civil service under chapter((s)) 41.06 ((and
28B.16)) RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.88.300 and 1977 ex.s. c 320 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where there is reason to believe that a present or former state officer or
employee has violated or threatens to violate RCW 43.88.290 or section 1 of
this act, the attorney general may initiate an appropriate civil action for
the enforcement of RCW 43.88.280 through 43.88.320 or to prevent any such
violation. The action may be brought in the county where the alleged violator
resides, or the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred or is
threatened.

(2)
For each violation of RCW 43.88.290 or section 1 of this act the
attorney general shall seek to recover and the court may award the following
damages on behalf of the state of Washington:

(a)
From each person found in violation of RCW 43.88.290 or section 1 of this
act a civil penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars, or all costs,
including reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the state in said action,
whichever is greater;

(b)
Any damages sustained by the state as a result of the conduct constituting said
violation.

In
addition to the other penalties contained in this section, judgment against any
person, other than an elected official, for violating RCW 43.88.290 may include
a declaration of forfeiture of such person's office or employment, to take
effect immediately.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.88.310 and 1996 c 288 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative auditor of the office of the joint legislative audit and review
committee, with the concurrence of the joint legislative audit and review
committee, may file with the attorney general any audit exceptions or other
findings of any performance audit, management study, or special report prepared
for the joint legislative audit and review committee, any standing or special
committees of the house or senate, or the entire legislature which indicate a
violation of RCW 43.88.290 or section 1 of this act, or any other act of
malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance on the part of any state officer or
employee.

(2)
The attorney general shall promptly review each filing received from the
legislative auditor and may act thereon as provided in RCW 43.88.300, or any
other applicable statute authorizing enforcement proceedings by the attorney
general. The attorney general shall advise the joint legislative audit and
review committee of the status of exceptions or findings referred under this
section.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.79.270 and 1998 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever any money, from the federal government, or from other sources, which
was not anticipated in the budget approved by the legislature has actually been
received and is designated to be spent for a specific purpose, the head of any
department, agency, board, or commission through which such expenditure shall
be made is to submit to the governor a statement which may be in the form of a
request for an allotment amendment setting forth the facts constituting the
need for such expenditure and the estimated amount to be expended: PROVIDED,
That no expenditure shall be made in excess of the actual amount received, ((and))
no money shall be expended for any purpose except the specific purpose for
which it was received, and no money shall be expended under this section if
an appropriation is required under section 1 of this act. A copy of any
proposal submitted to the governor to expend money from an appropriated fund or
account in excess of appropriations provided by law which is based on the
receipt of unanticipated revenues shall be submitted to the joint legislative
audit and review committee and also to the standing committees on ways and means
of the house and senate if the legislature is in session at the same time as it
is transmitted to the governor.

(2)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, whenever money from any source
that was not anticipated in the transportation budget approved by the
legislature has actually been received and is designated to be spent for a
specific purpose, the head of a department, agency, board, or commission
through which the expenditure must be made shall submit to the governor a
statement, which may be in the form of a request for an allotment amendment,
setting forth the facts constituting the need for the expenditure and the
estimated amount to be expended. However, no expenditure may be made in excess
of the actual amount received, ((and)) no money may be expended for any
purpose except the specific purpose for which it was received, and no money
shall be expended under this section if an appropriation is required under
section 1 of this act. A copy of any proposal submitted to the governor to
expend money from an appropriated transportation fund or account in excess of
appropriations provided by law that is based on the receipt of unanticipated
revenues must be submitted, at a minimum, to the standing committees on
transportation of the house and senate, if the legislature is in session, at
the same time as it is transmitted to the governor. During the legislative
interim, any such proposal must be submitted to the legislative transportation
committee.

Sec.
6. RCW
15.13.470 and 1993 c 120 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

All
moneys collected under this chapter shall be paid to the director, deposited in
an account within the agricultural local fund, and used solely for carrying out
this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. Except as provided in
section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for the disbursement of
moneys from the account by the director. Any residual balance of funds
remaining in the nursery inspection fund on July 26, 1987, shall be transferred
to that account within the agricultural local fund: PROVIDED, That all fees
collected for fruit tree, fruit tree related ornamental tree, and fruit tree
rootstock assessments as set forth in this chapter shall be deposited in the
northwest nursery fund to be used only for the Washington fruit tree and fruit
tree related ornamental tree certification and nursery improvement programs as
set forth in this chapter and chapter 15.14 RCW.

Sec.
7. RCW
15.36.441 and 1995 c 374 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the results of an antibiotic, pesticide, or other drug residue test under
RCW 15.36.201 are above the actionable level established in the PMO and
determined using procedures set forth in the PMO, a person holding a milk
producer's license is subject to a civil penalty. The penalty shall be in an
amount equal to one-half the value of the sum of the volumes of milk equivalent
produced under the license on the day prior to and the day of the adulteration.
The value of the milk shall be computed by the weighted average price for the
federal market order under which the milk is delivered.

(2)
The penalty is imposed by the department giving a written notice which is
either personally served upon or transmitted by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to the person incurring the penalty. The notice of the civil
penalty shall be a final order of the department unless, within fifteen days
after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty appeals the
penalty by filing a notice of appeal with the department. If a notice of
appeal is filed in a timely manner, a hearing shall be conducted on behalf of
the department by the office of administrative hearings in accordance with
chapters 34.05 and 34.12 RCW. At the conclusion of the hearing, the department
shall determine whether the penalty should be affirmed, and, if so, shall issue
a final order setting forth the civil penalty assessed, if any. The order may
be appealed to superior court in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. Tests
performed for antibiotic, pesticide, or other drug residues by an official
laboratory or an officially designated laboratory of a milk sample drawn by a
department official or a licensed dairy technician shall be admitted as prima
facie evidence of the presence or absence of an antibiotic, pesticide, or other
drug residue.

(3)
Any penalty imposed under this section is due and payable upon the issuance of
the final order by the department. The penalty shall be deducted by the
violator's marketing organization from the violator's final payment for the
month following the issuance of the final order. The department shall promptly
notify the violator's marketing organization of any penalties contained in the
final order.

(4)
All penalties received or recovered from violations of this section shall be
remitted monthly by the violator's marketing organization to the Washington
state dairy products commission and deposited in a revolving fund to be used
solely for the purposes of education and research. Except as provided in
section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for disbursements from
this fund.

(5)
In case of a violation of the antibiotic, pesticide, or other drug residue test
requirements, an investigation shall be made to determine the cause of the
residue which shall be corrected. Follow-up sampling and testing must be done
in accordance with the requirements of the PMO.

Sec.
8. RCW
15.36.471 and 1994 c 143 s 511 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of agriculture shall adopt rules imposing a civil penalty for
violations of the standards for component parts of fluid dairy products which
are established under this chapter or adopted pursuant to RCW 69.04.398. The
penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars and shall be such as is necessary
to achieve proper enforcement of the standards. The rules shall be adopted
before January 1, 1987, and shall become effective on July 1, 1987.

(2)
The penalty is imposed by the department giving a written notice which is
either personally served upon or transmitted by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to the person incurring the penalty. The notice of the civil
penalty shall be a final order of the department unless, within fifteen days
after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty appeals the
penalty by filing a notice of appeal with the department. If a notice of
appeal is filed in a timely manner, a hearing shall be conducted on behalf of
the department by the office of administrative hearings in accordance with
chapters 34.05 and 34.12 RCW. At the conclusion of the hearing, the department
shall determine whether the penalty should be affirmed, reduced, or not imposed
and shall issue a final order setting forth the civil penalty assessed, if
any. The order may be appealed to superior court in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. Tests performed for the component parts of milk products by a state
laboratory of a milk sample collected by a department official shall be
admitted as prima facie evidence of the amounts of milk components in the
product.

(3)
Any penalty imposed under this section is due and payable upon the issuance of
the final order by the department.

(4)
All penalties received or recovered from violations of this section shall be
remitted by the violator to the department and deposited in the revolving fund
of the Washington state dairy products commission. One-half of the funds
received shall be used for purposes of education with the remainder one-half to
be used for dairy processing or marketing research, or both. Except as
provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for
disbursements from this fund.

(5) In case of a violation of the standards for the composition of
milk products, an investigation shall be made to determine the cause of the
violation which shall be corrected. Additional samples shall be taken as soon
as possible and tested by the department.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.160.050 and 1990 c 177 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
All certificate of competency holders that desire to continue in the fire
protection sprinkler business shall annually, prior to January 1, secure from
the state director of fire protection a renewal certificate of competency upon
payment of the fee as prescribed by the state director of fire protection.
Application for renewal shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director
of fire protection and the certificate holder shall furnish the information
required by the director.

(b)
Failure of any certificate of competency holder to secure his or her renewal
certificate of competency within sixty days after the due date shall constitute
sufficient cause for the state director of fire protection to suspend the
certificate of competency.

(c)
The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of payment of all
delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a certificate of competency
that has been suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.

(d)
A certificate of competency holder may voluntarily surrender his or her
certificate of competency to the state director of fire protection and be
relieved of the annual renewal fee. After surrendering the certificate of
competency, he or she shall not be known as a certificate of competency holder
and shall desist from the practice thereof. Within two years from the time of
surrender of the certificate of competency, he or she may again qualify for a
certificate of competency, without examination, by the payment of the required
fee. If two or more years have elapsed, he or she shall return to the status
of a new applicant.

(2)(a)
All licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractors desiring to continue
to be licensed shall annually, prior to January 1, secure from the state
director of fire protection a renewal license upon payment of the fee as
prescribed by the state director of fire protection. Application for renewal
shall be upon a form prescribed by the state director of fire protection and
the license holder shall furnish the information required by the director.

(b)
Failure of any license holder to secure his or her renewal license within sixty
days after the due date shall constitute sufficient cause for the state
director of fire protection to suspend the license.

(c)
The state director of fire protection may, upon the receipt of payment of all
delinquent fees including a late charge, restore a license that has been
suspended for failure to pay the renewal fee.

(3)
The initial certificate of competency or license fee shall be prorated based
upon the portion of the year such certificate of competency or license is in
effect, prior to renewal on January 1.

(4)
The fire protection contractor license fund is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from license and certificate fees and charges or
from the money generated by the rules and regulations promulgated under this
chapter shall be deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be
used only for purposes authorized under this chapter. Only the state director
of fire protection or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW((, but)). Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no
appropriation is required for expenditures from the fund.

Sec.
10. RCW
22.09.411 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby established a fund to be known as the grain indemnity fund.
The grain indemnity fund shall consist of assessments remitted by licensees
pursuant to the provisions of RCW 22.09.416 through 22.09.426.

(2)
All assessments shall be paid to the department and shall be deposited in the
grain indemnity fund. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the grain
indemnity fund. Disbursements shall be on authorization of the director. Except
as provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for
disbursements from this fund.

(3)
The grain indemnity fund shall be used exclusively for purposes of paying
claimants pursuant to this chapter, and paying necessary expenses of
administering the grain indemnity fund, provided however, that moneys
equivalent to one-half of the interest earned by the fund for deposit to the
general fund may be paid to the department to defray costs of administering the
warehouse audit program. The state of Washington shall not be liable for any
claims presented against the fund.

Sec.
11. RCW
22.09.830 and 1994 sp.s. c 6 s 901 and 1994 c 46 s 6 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
All moneys collected as fees for weighing, grading, and inspecting commodities
and all other fees collected under the provisions of this chapter, except as
provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, shall be deposited in the
grain inspection revolving fund, which is hereby established. The state
treasurer is the custodian of the revolving fund. Disbursements from the
revolving fund shall be on authorization of the director of the department of
agriculture. The revolving fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided
in chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in section 1 of
this act, no appropriation is required for disbursements from the fund.
The fund shall be used for all expenses directly incurred by the grain
inspection program in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and for
departmental administrative expenses during the 1993-95 biennium. The
department may use so much of such fund not exceeding five percent thereof as
the director of agriculture may determine necessary for research and
promotional work, including rate studies, relating to wheat and wheat products.

(2)
All fees collected for the inspection, grading, and testing of hops shall be
deposited into the hop inspection fund, which is hereby established, and shall
be retained by the department for the purpose of inspecting, grading, and
testing hops. Any moneys in any fund retained by the department on July 1,
1963, and derived from hop inspection and grading shall be deposited to this
hop inspection fund. For the purposes of research which would contribute to
the development of superior hop varieties and to improve hop production and
harvest practices, the department may expend up to twenty percent of the moneys
deposited in the hop inspection fund during the fiscal year ending June 30th
immediately preceding the year in which such expenditures are to be made. No
expenditures shall be made under the provisions of this subsection when the hop
inspection fund is, or the director may reasonably anticipate that it will be,
reduced below twenty thousand dollars as the result of such expenditure or
other necessary expenditures made to carry out the inspection, grading, and
testing of hops.

(3)
All moneys collected by the grain warehouse audit program, including grain
warehouse license fees pursuant to RCW 22.09.050 and 22.09.055, shall be
deposited by the director into the grain warehouse audit account, hereby
created within the agricultural local fund established in RCW 43.23.230.
Moneys collected shall be used to support the grain warehouse audit program.

Sec.
12. RCW
28C.10.082 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

The
tuition recovery trust fund is hereby established in the custody of the
state treasurer. The agency shall deposit in the fund all moneys received
under RCW 28C.10.084. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes
under RCW 28C.10.084. Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of
the agency. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under
chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in section 1 of this
act, no appropriation is required for disbursements from the fund.

Sec.
13. RCW
43.320.110 and 1995 c 238 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created a local fund known as the "banking examination fund" which
shall consist of all moneys received by the department of financial
institutions from banks, savings banks, foreign bank branches, savings and loan
associations, consumer loan companies, check cashers and sellers, trust
companies and departments, and escrow agents, and which shall be used for the purchase
of supplies and necessary equipment and the payment of salaries, wages,
utilities, and other incidental costs required for the proper regulation of
these companies. The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund.
Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director of
financial institutions or the director's designee. In order to maintain an
effective expenditure and revenue control, the fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in
section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required to permit expenditures
and payment of obligations from the fund.

Sec.
14. RCW
43.320.120 and 1993 c 472 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created a local fund known as the "credit unions examination fund"
which shall consist of all moneys received by the department of financial
institutions from credit unions and which shall be used for the purchase of
supplies and necessary equipment and the payment of salaries, wages, utilities,
and other incidental costs required for the regulation of these institutions.
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund. Disbursements from the
fund shall be on authorization of the director of financial institutions or the
director's designee. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue
control, the fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW((,
but)) and, except as provided in section 1 of this act, no
appropriation is required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations
from the fund.

Sec.
15. RCW
43.70.340 and 1998 c 37 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The temporary worker housing fund is established in the custody of the state
treasury. The department shall deposit all funds received under subsections
(2) and (3) of this section and from the legislature to administer a temporary
worker housing permitting, licensing, and inspection program conducted by the
department. Disbursement from the fund shall be on authorization of the
secretary of health or the secretary's designee. The fund is subject to the
allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)).
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required
for disbursements.

(2)
There is imposed a fee on each operating license issued by the department to
every operator of temporary worker housing that is regulated by the state board
of health. In establishing the fee to be paid under this subsection the
department shall consider the cost of administering a license as well as
enforcing applicable state board of health rules on temporary worker housing.

(3)
There is imposed a fee on each temporary worker housing building permit issued
by the department to every operator of temporary worker housing as required by
RCW 43.70.337. The fee shall include the cost of administering a permit as
well as enforcing the department's temporary worker building code as adopted
under RCW 70.114A.081.

(4)
The department shall conduct a fee study for:

(a)
A temporary worker housing operator's license;

(b)
On-site inspections; and

(c)
A plan review and building permit for new construction.

After
completion of the study, the department shall adopt these fees by rule by no
later than December 31, 1998.

(5)
The term of the operating license and the application procedures shall be
established, by rule, by the department.

Sec.
16. RCW
59.21.050 and 1998 c 124 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The existence of the mobile home park relocation fund in the custody of the
state treasurer is affirmed. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for
relocation assistance awarded under this chapter. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund. All relocation
payments to tenants shall be made from the fund. The fund is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as
provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for
expenditures from the fund.

(2)
A park tenant is eligible for assistance under this chapter only after an
application is submitted by that tenant or an organization acting on the
tenant's account under RCW 59.21.021(4) on a form approved by the director
which shall include:

(a)
For those persons who maintained ownership of and relocated their homes: (i) A
copy of the notice from the park-owner, or other adequate proof, that the
tenancy is terminated due to closure of the park or its conversion to another
use; (ii) a copy of the rental agreement then in force, or other proof that the
applicant was a tenant at the time of notice of closure; (iii) a copy of the
contract for relocating the home which includes the date of relocation, or
other proof of actual relocation expenses incurred on a date certain; and (iv)
a statement of any other available assistance;

(b)
For those persons who sold their homes and incurred no relocation expenses:
(i) A copy of the notice from the park-owner, or other adequate proof, that the
tenancy is terminated due to closure of the park or its conversion to another
use; (ii) a copy of the rental agreement then in force, or other proof that the
applicant was a tenant at the time of notice of closure; and (iii) a copy of
the record of title transfer issued by the department of licensing when the
tenant sold the home rather than relocate it due to park closure or conversion.

Sec.
17. RCW
70.47.030 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 913 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The basic health plan trust account is hereby established in the state
treasury. Any nongeneral fund-state funds collected for this program shall be
deposited in the basic health plan trust account and may be expended without
further appropriation. Moneys in the account shall be used exclusively for the
purposes of this chapter, including payments to participating managed health
care systems on behalf of enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of
administering the plan.

During
the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer funds from the basic
health plan trust account to the state general fund.

(2)
The basic health plan subscription account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from amounts due from or on behalf of
nonsubsidized enrollees shall be deposited into the account. Funds in the
account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of this chapter, including
payments to participating managed health care systems on behalf of
nonsubsidized enrollees in the plan and payment of costs of administering the
plan. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW((,
but)). Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no
appropriation is required for expenditures.

(3)
The administrator shall take every precaution to see that none of the funds in
the separate accounts created in this section or that any premiums paid either
by subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees are commingled in any way, except that
the administrator may combine funds designated for administration of the plan
into a single administrative account.

Sec.
18. RCW
76.04.630 and 1993 c 36 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created a landowner contingency forest fire suppression account in the state
treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only as provided in this
section. Disbursements from the account shall be on authorization of the
commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee. The account is
subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)).
Except as provided in section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required
for disbursements from the fund.

The
department may expend from this account the amounts as may be available and as
it considers appropriate for the payment of emergency fire costs resulting from
a participating landowner fire. The department may, when moneys are available
from the landowner contingency forest fire suppression account, expend moneys
for summarily abating, isolating, or reducing an extreme fire hazard under RCW
76.04.660. All moneys recovered as a result of the department's actions, from
the owner or person responsible, under RCW 76.04.660 shall be deposited in the
landowner contingency forest fire suppression account.

When
a determination is made that the fire was started by other than a landowner
operation, moneys expended from this account in the suppression of such fire
shall be recovered from the general fund appropriations as may be available for
emergency fire suppression costs. The department shall deposit in the
landowner contingency forest fire suppression account moneys paid out of the
account which are later recovered, less reasonable costs of recovery.

This
account shall be established and renewed by an annual special forest fire
suppression account assessment paid by participating landowners at a rate to be
established by the department. In establishing assessments, the department
shall seek to establish and thereafter reestablish a balance in the account of
three million dollars. The department may establish a flat fee assessment of
no more than seven dollars and fifty cents for participating landowners owning
parcels of fifty acres or less. For participating landowners owning parcels
larger than fifty acres, the department may charge the flat fee assessment plus
a per acre assessment for every acre over fifty acres. The per acre assessment
established by the department may not exceed fifteen cents per acre per year.
The assessments may differ to equitably distribute the assessment based on
emergency fire suppression cost experience necessitated by landowner
operations. Amounts assessed for this account shall be a lien upon the forest
lands with respect to which the assessment is made and may be collected as
directed by the department in the same manner as forest protection
assessments. Payment of emergency costs from this account shall in no way restrict
the right of the department to recover costs pursuant to RCW 76.04.495 or other
laws.

When
the department determines that a forest fire was started in the course of or as
a result of a landowner operation, it shall notify the forest fire advisory
board of the determination. The determination shall be final, unless, within
ninety days of the notification, the forest fire advisory board or an
interested party serves a request for a hearing before the department. The
hearing shall constitute an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW,
the administrative procedure act, and an appeal shall be in accordance with RCW
34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

Sec.
19. RCW
77.21.080 and 1989 c 11 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

The state wildlife conservation reward fund is established in the
custody of the state treasurer. The director shall deposit in the fund all
moneys designated to be placed in the fund by rule of the director. Moneys in
the fund shall be spent to provide rewards to persons informing the department
about violations of this title or rules adopted pursuant to this title.
Disbursements from the fund shall be on the authorization of the director or
the director's designee. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure
provided under chapter 43.88 RCW((, but)). Except as provided in
section 1 of this act, no appropriation is required for disbursements
from the fund.

---
END ---