BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.670 and 1991 c 199 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources in granting burning permits for fires for
the purposes set forth in RCW 70.94.660 shall condition the issuance and use of
such permits to comply with air quality standards established by the department
of ecology after full consultation with the department of natural resources.
Such burning shall not cause the state air quality standards to be exceeded in
the ambient air up to two thousand feet above ground level over critical areas
designated by the department of ecology, otherwise subject to air pollution
from other sources. Air quality standards shall be established and published
by the department of ecology which shall also establish a procedure for
advising the department of natural resources when and where air contaminant
levels exceed or threaten to exceed the ambient air standards over such
critical areas. The air quality shall be quantitatively measured by the
department of ecology or the appropriate local air pollution control authority
at established monitoring stations over such designated areas. Further, such
permitted burning shall not cause damage to public health or the environment.
All permits issued under this section shall be subject to all applicable fees,
permitting, penalty, and enforcement provisions of this chapter. The
department of natural resources shall set forth smoke dispersal objectives
designed consistent with this section to minimize any air pollution from such
burning and the procedures necessary to meet those objectives.

(2)
Upon receiving a request or application to conduct silvicultural burning, the
department of natural resources shall promptly transmit to the department of
ecology a copy or record of the request or application. The department of
ecology shall promptly transmit a copy of the request or application to each
local air pollution control authority within the jurisdictional boundaries of
which the burning would be conducted and to each local air pollution control
authority a jurisdictional boundary of which is within seventy-five miles of
the proposed burning.

(3)
The department of natural resources shall encourage more intense utilization in
logging and alternative silviculture practices to reduce the need for burning.
The department of natural resources shall, whenever practical, encourage
landowners to develop and use alternative acceptable disposal methods subject
to the following priorities: (((1))) (a) Slash production
minimization, (((2))) (b) slash utilization, (((3))) (c)
nonburning disposal, (((4))) (d) silvicultural burning. Such
alternative methods shall be evaluated as to the relative impact on air, water,
and land pollution, public health, and their financial feasibility.

(4)(a)
The department of natural resources shall not issue burning permits and shall
revoke previously issued permits at any time in any area where the department
of ecology or local board has declared a stage of impaired air quality as
defined in RCW 70.94.473. The department of natural resources shall not
issue burning permits for silvicultural burning conducted on publicly owned or
managed land during a calendar year if the department of ecology or an air
pollution control authority requires agricultural burning for cereal grain or
grass or turf seed production to be reduced or eliminated during that calendar
year when compared to the total of such agricultural burning during any other
calendar year.

(b) If the department of natural resources determines that the
circumstances identified in (a) of this subsection do not require that a
request or application for a permit for silvicultural burning be denied, but
the department of ecology or a local air pollution control authority
transmitted a copy of the request or application under subsection (2) of this
section determines to the contrary, the department of ecology or authority
shall immediately notify the department of natural resources of its
determination and the request or application for the permit shall be denied or,
if already issued, revoked.

---
END ---