BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.24.010 and 1985 c 398 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

Ten or more owners of real property abutting on a ((meandered))
lake may petition the superior court of the county in which the lake is
situated, for an order to provide for the regulation of the outflow of the lake
in order to maintain a certain water level therein. If there are fewer than
ten owners, a majority of the owners abutting on a lake may petition the
superior court for such an order. The court, after notice to the
department of fish and wildlife and a hearing, is authorized to make an
order fixing the water level thereof and directing the department of ecology to
regulate the outflow therefrom in accordance with the purposes described in the
petition. This section shall not apply to any ((meandered)) lake or
reservoir used for the storage of water for irrigation or other beneficial
purposes, or to lakes navigable from the sea.

---
END ---