BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.50.040 and 1984 c 258 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
thirty days after the effective date of the ordinance creating the municipal
court, the mayor of each city or town shall appoint a municipal judge or judges
of the municipal court for a term of four years. The terms of judges serving
on July 1, 1984, and municipal judges who are appointed to terms commencing
before January 1, 1986, shall expire January 1, 1986. The terms of their
successors shall commence on January 1, 1986, and on January 1 of each fourth
year thereafter, pursuant to appointment or election as provided in this
chapter. Appointments shall be made on or before December 1 of the year next
preceding the year in which the terms commence.

Municipal
judges or judges of the municipal court appointed after the effective date of
this act shall act as municipal judges until the next general election. Upon
election, a municipal judge shall serve a term of four years. An appointed
municipal judge may be removed only on conviction of malfeasance or misconduct
in office, or because of physical or mental disability rendering him incapable
of performing the duties of his office.

The
legislative authority of a city or town that has the general power of
confirmation over mayoral appointments shall have the power to confirm the
appointment of a municipal judge.

A
person appointed as a full-time or part-time municipal judge shall be a citizen
of the United States of America and of the state of Washington; and an attorney
admitted to practice law before the courts of record of the state of
Washington: PROVIDED, That in a municipality having a population less than
five thousand persons, a person other than an attorney may be the judge. Any
city or town shall have authority to appoint a district judge as its municipal
judge when the municipal judge is not required to serve full time. In the
event of the appointment of a district judge, the city or town shall pay a pro
rata share of the salary.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.18.060 and 1987 c 3 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
powers and duties of the city manager shall be:

(1)
To have general supervision over the administrative affairs of the
municipality;

(2)
To appoint and remove at any time all department heads, officers, and employees
of the city or town, except members of the council, and subject to the
provisions of any applicable law, rule, or regulation relating to civil
service: PROVIDED, That the council may provide for the appointment by the
mayor, subject to confirmation by the council, of the city planning commission,
and other advisory citizens' committees, commissions and boards advisory to the
city council: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the city manager shall appoint ((the))
a qualified person to act as municipal judge ((to a term of four
years)) until the next general election, subject to confirmation by
the council. ((The)) Upon election, a municipal judge shall serve a
term of four years. An appointed municipal judge may be removed only on
conviction of malfeasance or misconduct in office, or because of physical or
mental disability rendering him incapable of performing the duties of his
office. The council may cause an audit to be made of any department or office
of the city or town government and may select the persons to make it, without
the advice or consent of the city manager;

(3)
To attend all meetings of the council at which his attendance may be required
by that body;

(4)
To see that all laws and ordinances are faithfully executed, subject to the
authority which the council may grant the mayor to maintain law and order in
times of emergency;

(5)
To recommend for adoption by the council such measures as he may deem necessary
or expedient;

(6)
To prepare and submit to the council such reports as may be required by that
body or as he may deem it advisable to submit;

(7)
To keep the council fully advised of the financial condition of the city or
town and its future needs;

(8)
To prepare and submit to the council a tentative budget for the fiscal year;

(9) To perform such other duties as the council may determine by
ordinance or resolution.

Sec.
3. RCW
35A.13.080 and 1987 c 3 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The
powers and duties of the city manager shall be:

(1)
To have general supervision over the administrative affairs of the code city;

(2)
To appoint and remove at any time all department heads, officers, and employees
of the code city, except members of the council, and subject to the provisions
of any applicable law, rule, or regulation relating to civil service:
PROVIDED, That the council may provide for the appointment by the mayor,
subject to confirmation by the council, of a city planning commission, and
other advisory citizens' committees, commissions, and boards advisory to the
city council: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the municipal judge of the code city
is appointed, such appointment shall be made by the city manager subject to
confirmation by the council, ((for a four year term)) until the next
general election. Upon election, a municipal judge shall serve a term of four
years. An appointed municipal judge may be removed only on conviction of
malfeasance or misconduct in office, or because of physical or mental
disability rendering him incapable of performing the duties of his office.
The council may cause an audit to be made of any department or office of the
code city government and may select the persons to make it, without the advice
or consent of the city manager;

(3)
To attend all meetings of the council at which his attendance may be required
by that body;

(4)
To see that all laws and ordinances are faithfully executed, subject to the
authority which the council may grant the mayor to maintain law and order in
times of emergency;

(5)
To recommend for adoption by the council such measures as he may deem necessary
or expedient;

(6)
To prepare and submit to the council such reports as may be required by that
body or as he may deem it advisable to submit;

(7)
To keep the council fully advised of the financial condition of the code city
and its future needs;

(8)
To prepare and submit to the council a proposed budget for the fiscal year, as
required by chapter 35A.33 RCW, and to be responsible for its administration
upon adoption;

(9) To perform such other duties as the council may determine by
ordinance or resolution.

---
END ---