BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
89.08.080 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

To
form a conservation district, ((twenty-five or more persons)) twenty
percent of the registered voters occupying land within the area to be
affected may file a petition with the commission asking that the area be
organized into a district.

The
petition shall give the name of the proposed district, state that it is needed
in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare, give a general
description of the area proposed to be organized and request that the
commission determine that it be created, and that it define the boundaries thereof
and call an election on the question of creating the district.

If
more than one petition is filed covering parts of the same area, the commission
may consolidate all or any of them.

Sec.
2. RCW
89.08.180 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Territory
may be added to an existing district upon filing a petition as in the case of
formation with the commission by ((occupiers of)) twenty percent of
the registered voters occupying the lands to be included. The same
procedure shall be followed as for the creation of the district.

As
an alternate procedure, the commission may upon the petition of a majority of
the land occupiers in any one or more districts or in unorganized territory
adjoining a conservation district change the boundaries of a district, or
districts, if such action will promote the practical and feasible
administration of such district or districts.

Upon
petition of the boards of supervisors of two or more districts, the commission
may approve the combining of all or parts of such districts and name the
district, or districts, with the approval of the name by the secretary of
state. A public hearing and/or a referendum may be held if deemed necessary or
desirable by the commission in order to determine the wishes of land occupiers.

When
districts are combined, the joint boards of supervisors will first select a
chairman, secretary and other necessary officers and select a regular date for
meetings. All elected supervisors will continue to serve as members of the
board until the expiration of their current term of office, and/or until the
election date nearest their expiration date. All appointed supervisors will
continue to serve until the expiration of their current term of office, at
which time the commission will make the necessary appointments. In the event
that more than two districts are combined, a similar procedure will be set up
and administered by the commission.

When
districts are combined or territory is moved from one district to another, the
property, records and accounts of the districts involved shall be distributed
to the remaining district or districts as approved by the commission. A new
certificate of organization, naming and describing the new district or districts,
shall be issued by the secretary of state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
local governing body of any city or incorporated town within an existing
district may approve by majority vote a petition to withdraw from the
district. The petition shall be submitted to the district for its approval.
If approved by the district, the petition shall be sent to the commission. The
commission shall approve the petition and forward it to the secretary of state
and the boundary of the district shall be adjusted accordingly. If the
petition is not approved by the district, the district shall adopt a resolution
specifying the reasons why the petition is not approved. The petition and the
district's resolution shall be sent to the commission for its review. The
commission shall approve or reject the petition based upon criteria it has
adopted for the evaluation of petitions in dispute. If the commission approves
the petition, it shall forward the petition to the secretary of state and the
boundaries of the district shall be adjusted accordingly. The criteria used by
the commission to evaluate petitions which are in dispute shall be adopted as
rules by the commission under chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure
act.

Sec.
4. RCW
89.08.350 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

At
any time after five years from the organization of a district, ((one hundred
land occupiers)) twenty percent of the registered voters occupying land
in the district may file with the commission a petition, praying that the
district be dissolved. The commission may hold public hearings thereon, and
within sixty days from receipt of the petition, shall give due notice of an
election on the question of dissolution. It shall provide appropriate ballots,
conduct the election, canvass the returns, and declare the results in the same
manner as for elections to create a district.

All
district electors may vote at the election. No informality relating to the
election shall invalidate it if notice is substantially given and the election
is fairly conducted.

Sec.
5. RCW
89.08.360 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

If
a majority of the votes cast at the election are for dissolution, the district
shall be dissolved. ((If two-thirds of the votes are against dissolution,
the commission shall determine whether the continuance of the district is
practicable. In making the determination it shall consider all the factors
considered by it in determining that the district was practicable originally.
If it finds that further operation of the district is impracticable it shall
order it dissolved and certify its determination to the supervisors.))

Sec.
6. RCW
89.08.370 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the district is ordered dissolved, the supervisors shall forthwith terminate
the affairs of the district and dispose of all district property at public
auction, and pay the proceeds therefrom to pay any debts of the district and
any remaining balance to the state treasurer.

They
shall then file a verified application with the secretary of state for the
dissolution of the district, accompanied by a certificate of the commission
reciting the determination that further operation of the district is impracticable.
The application shall recite that the property of the district has been
disposed of, that the proceeds therefrom have been used to pay any debts of
the district and any remaining balance paid to the treasurer, and contain a
full accounting of the property and proceeds. Thereupon the secretary shall
issue to the supervisors a certificate of dissolution and file a copy thereof
in his records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. RCW
89.08.380 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 28 & 1955 c 304 s 28 are
each repealed.

---
END ---