BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.04.155 and 1997 c 266 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a minor enrolled in any common school is convicted in adult criminal
court, or adjudicated ((or entered into a diversion agreement)) with the
juvenile court on any of the following offenses, the court must notify the
principal of the student's school of the disposition of the case, after first
notifying the parent or legal guardian that such notification will be made:

(a)
A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(c)
Inhaling toxic fumes under chapter 9.47A RCW;

(d)
A controlled substances violation under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(e)
A liquor violation under RCW 66.44.270; and

(f)
Any crime under chapters 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, and 9A.48 RCW.

(2)
The principal must provide the information received under subsection (1) of
this section to every teacher of any student who qualifies under subsection (1)
of this section and any other personnel who, in the judgment of the principal,
supervises the student or for security purposes should be aware of the
student's record. The principal must provide the information to teachers and
other personnel based on any written records that the principal maintains or
receives from a juvenile court administrator or a law enforcement agency regarding
the student.

(3)
Any information received by a principal or school personnel under this section
is confidential and may not be further disseminated except as provided in RCW
28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and educational and
privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.50.050 and 1997 c 338 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section governs records relating to the commission of juvenile offenses,
including records relating to diversions.

(2)
The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile offender
shall be open to public inspection, unless sealed pursuant to subsection (11)
of this section.

(3)
All records other than the official juvenile court file are confidential and
may be released only as provided in this section, RCW 13.50.010, 13.40.215, and
4.24.550.

(4)
Except as otherwise provided in this section and RCW 13.50.010, records
retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be released to
other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when an
investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by
the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the responsibility
for supervising the juvenile.

(5)
Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, information not in an official juvenile
court file concerning a juvenile or a juvenile's family may be released to the
public only when that information could not reasonably be expected to identify
the juvenile or the juvenile's family.

(6)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the release, to the
juvenile or his or her attorney, of law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys'
records pertaining to investigation, diversion, and prosecution of juvenile
offenses shall be governed by the rules of discovery and other rules of law
applicable in adult criminal investigations and prosecutions.

(7)
The juvenile court and the prosecutor may set up and maintain a central record-keeping
system which may receive information on all alleged juvenile offenders against
whom a complaint has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070 whether or not their
cases are currently pending before the court. The central record-keeping
system may be computerized. If a complaint has been referred to a diversion
unit, the diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile court or the
prosecuting attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion. An offense
shall not be reported as criminal history in any central record-keeping system
without notification by the diversion unit of the date on which the offender
agreed to diversion.

(8)
Upon request of the victim of a crime or the victim's immediate family, the
identity of an alleged or proven juvenile offender alleged or found to have
committed a crime against the victim and the identity of the alleged or proven
juvenile offender's parent, guardian, or custodian and the circumstance of the
alleged or proven crime shall be released to the victim of the crime or the
victim's immediate family.

(9)
Subject to the rules of discovery applicable in adult criminal prosecutions,
the juvenile offense records of an adult criminal defendant or witness in an
adult criminal proceeding shall be released upon request to prosecution and
defense counsel after a charge has actually been filed. The juvenile offense
records of any adult convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of
the adult corrections system shall be released upon request to the adult corrections
system.

(10)
In any case in which an information has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or
a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and referred for diversion
pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person the subject of the information or
complaint may file a motion with the court to have the court vacate its order
and findings, if any, and, subject to subsection (((22))) (23) of
this section, order the sealing of the official juvenile court file, the social
file, and records of the court and of any other agency in the case.

(11)
The court shall grant the motion to seal records made pursuant to subsection
(10) of this section if it finds that:

(a)
For class B offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release
from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry
of disposition, the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction. For class C offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date
of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any,
or entry of disposition, the person has spent five consecutive years in the
community without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction;

(b)
No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a
juvenile offense or a criminal offense;

(c)
No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with
that person;

(d)
The person has not been convicted of a class A or sex offense; and

(e)
Full restitution has been paid.

(12)
The person making a motion pursuant to subsection (10) of this section shall
give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecution and to any person or
agency whose files are sought to be sealed.

(13)
If the court grants the motion to seal made pursuant to subsection (10) of this
section, it shall, subject to subsection (((22))) (23) of this
section, order sealed the official juvenile court file, the social file, and
other records relating to the case as are named in the order. Thereafter, the
proceedings in the case shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the
subject of the records may reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events,
records of which are sealed. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning
confidential or sealed records that records are confidential, and no
information can be given about the existence or nonexistence of records
concerning an individual.

(14)
Inspection of the files and records included in the order to seal may
thereafter be permitted only by order of the court upon motion made by the
person who is the subject of the information or complaint, except as otherwise
provided in RCW 13.50.010(8) and subsection (((22))) (23) of this
section.

(15)
Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent to sealing has the
effect of nullifying the sealing order. Any charging of an adult felony
subsequent to the sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order for
the purposes of chapter 9.94A RCW.

(16)
In any case in which a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and
referred for diversion pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person who is the subject
of the complaint may file a motion with the court to have the court vacate its
order and findings, if any, and subject to subsection (23) of this section,
order the destruction of the official juvenile court file, the social file, and
records of the court and of any other agency in the case. The court may grant
the motion to destroy records made pursuant to this subsection if it finds:

(a)
The person making the motion is at least twenty-three years of age;

(b)
The person has not subsequently been convicted of a felony;

(c)
No proceeding is pending against that person seeking the conviction of a
criminal offense; and

(d)
The person has never been found guilty of a serious offense.

(17)
A person eighteen years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only
one referral for diversion may request that the court order the records in that
case destroyed. The request shall be granted, subject to subsection (((22)))
(23) of this section, if the court finds that two years have elapsed
since completion of the diversion agreement.

(((17)))
(18) If the court grants the motion to destroy records made pursuant to
subsection (((16))) (17) of this section, it shall, subject to
subsection (((22))) (23) of this section, order the official
juvenile court file, the social file, and any other records named in the order
to be destroyed.

(((18)))
(19) The person making the motion pursuant to subsection (16) or (17)
of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecuting
attorney and to any agency whose records are sought to be destroyed.

(((19)))
(20) Any juvenile to whom the provisions of this section may apply shall
be given written notice of his or her rights under this section at the time of
his or her disposition hearing or during the diversion process.

(((20)))
(21) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a crime victim
or a member of the victim's family from divulging the identity of the alleged
or proven juvenile offender or his or her family when necessary in a civil
proceeding.

(((21)))
(22) Any juvenile justice or care agency may, subject to the limitations
in subsection (((22))) (23) of this section and (a) and (b) of
this subsection, develop procedures for the routine destruction of records
relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.

(a)
Records may be routinely destroyed only when the person the subject of the
information or complaint has attained twenty-three years of age or older, or is
eighteen years of age or older and his or her criminal history consists
entirely of one diversion agreement and two years have passed since completion
of the agreement.

(b)
The court may not routinely destroy the official juvenile court file or
recordings or transcripts of any proceedings.

(((22)))
(23) No identifying information held by the Washington state patrol in
accordance with chapter 43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or sealing under
this section. For the purposes of this subsection, identifying information
includes photographs, fingerprints, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints and any
other data that identifies a person by physical characteristics, name,
birthdate or address, but does not include information regarding criminal
activity, arrest, charging, diversion, conviction or other information about a
person's treatment by the criminal justice system or about the person's
behavior.

(((23))) (24) Information identifying child victims
under age eighteen who are victims of sexual assaults by juvenile offenders is
confidential and not subject to release to the press or public without the
permission of the child victim or the child's legal guardian. Identifying
information includes the child victim's name, addresses, location, photographs,
and in cases in which the child victim is a relative of the alleged
perpetrator, identification of the relationship between the child and the
alleged perpetrator. Information identifying a child victim of sexual assault
may be released to law enforcement, prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or
private or governmental agencies that provide services to the child victim of
sexual assault.

---
END ---