BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.40.127 and 1997 c 338 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A juvenile is eligible for deferred disposition unless he or she:

(a)
Is charged with a sex or violent offense;

(b)
Has a criminal history which includes any felony; or

(c)
Has a prior deferred disposition or deferred adjudication; or

(d)
Has two or more diversions; or

(e)
Has two or more gross misdemeanors or misdemeanors.

(2)
The juvenile court may, upon motion at least fourteen days before commencement
of trial and, after consulting the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or
guardian and with the consent of the juvenile, continue the case for
disposition for a period not to exceed one year from the date the juvenile is
found guilty. The court shall consider whether the offender and the community
will benefit from a deferred disposition before deferring the disposition.

(3)
Any juvenile who agrees to a deferral of disposition shall:

(a)
Stipulate to the admissibility of the facts contained in the written police
report;

(b)
Acknowledge that the report will be entered and used to support a finding of
guilt and to impose a disposition if the juvenile fails to comply with terms of
supervision; and

(c)
Waive the following rights to: (i) A speedy disposition; and (ii) call and
confront witnesses.

The
adjudicatory hearing shall be limited to a reading of the court's record.

(4)
Following the stipulation, acknowledgment, waiver, and entry of a finding or
plea of guilt, the court shall defer entry of an order of disposition of the
juvenile.

(5)
Any juvenile granted a deferral of disposition under this section shall be
placed under community supervision. The court may impose any conditions of
supervision that it deems appropriate including posting a probation bond.
Payment of restitution under RCW 13.40.190 shall be a condition of community
supervision under this section.

(6)
A parent who signed for a probation bond has the right to notify the counselor
if the juvenile fails to comply with the bond or conditions of supervision.
The counselor shall notify the court and surety of any failure to comply. A
surety shall notify the court of the juvenile's failure to comply with the
probation bond. The state shall bear the burden to prove, by a preponderance
of the evidence, that the juvenile has failed to comply with the terms of
community supervision.

(7)
A juvenile's lack of compliance shall be determined by the judge upon written
motion by the prosecutor or the juvenile's juvenile court community supervision
counselor. If a juvenile fails to comply with terms of supervision, the court
shall enter an order of disposition.

(8)
At any time following deferral of disposition the court may, following a
hearing, continue the case for an additional one-year period for good cause.

(9) At the conclusion of the period set forth in the order of
deferral and upon a finding by the court of full compliance with conditions of
supervision and payment of full restitution, the respondent's conviction shall
be vacated and the court shall dismiss the case with prejudice.

---
END ---