BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to provide the express authority for public utility
districts to provide telecommunications facilities and services for the benefit
of our citizens by: (1) Requiring a public utility district that provides
telecommunications facilities for public use to provide these facilities
without charge to public schools and institutions of higher education located
in the area that it serves and, if authorized by voters to provide
telecommunication services, to provide telecommunication services to these
public schools and institutions without charge; (2) increasing economic
development opportunities, particularly of rural areas, by providing a
cost-effective means of extending telecommunications facilities and, if
authorized, telecommunication services throughout the entire state; and (3)
stimulating the marketplace by increasing competition among the providers of
telecommunications facilities and, if authorized, telecommunication services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A public utility district may construct, purchase, acquire, provide, add to,
alter, improve, repair, and maintain telecommunications facilities within its
boundaries, with capacity sufficient for its own use as well as use by others,
and with full authority to regulate and control the use and price thereof. The
public utility district has full discretion to classify the uses of these
facilities on any reasonable ground and the rates charged shall be uniform for
the same class of customers.

(2)
A public utility district may provide telecommunication services within its
boundaries if voters of the public utility district approve a ballot
proposition authorizing the public utility district to provide
telecommunication services, with full authority to regulate and control the
price thereof.

(3)
A public utility district providing telecommunications facilities or services
may use its tax receipts to reduce the costs of these telecommunications
facilities or services. Telecommunications facilities, works, lines, wires,
and cables may be financed in whole or in part by the public utility creating
local utility districts and imposing special assessments on benefited property
within the local utility districts, other than the property of school districts
and institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, following
the procedures provided under this chapter and chapter 35.51 RCW.

(4) Any public utility district providing telecommunications
facilities or services for public use must provide these facilities and
services to public schools and institutions of higher education, as defined in
RCW 28B.10.016, located within the area served by the public utility district's
telecommunications facilities or services without charge and may provide
telecommunications equipment and accessories to these public schools and
institutions of higher education for no cost or at reduced cost. Any costs of
providing these facilities, services, equipment, and accessories to public
schools and institutions of higher education shall be part of the costs of providing
telecommunications facilities and services to the public that is borne by rates
and charges imposed on other persons using these facilities and services.

---
END ---