BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that a well-trained and educated work force is a key
factor in the economic development of the state of Washington. A community and
technical college system designed to be responsive to the needs of new or
expanding business is a strong incentive for new businesses to locate here.
The legislature also recognizes that out-of-state tuition is a disincentive for
firms that are required to locate key employees here because it represents a
high cost to their continued training and development. The legislature further
recognizes that students are better served when they are able to integrate work
and training. Short-term, modular training is more easily integrated in the
workplace, and is far more responsive to the changes in welfare, the cycle of
continued dislocation, and limited resources than full-time training. It is
the intent of the legislature to eliminate impediments to the ability of the
community and technical colleges to maximize their responsiveness to meet the
growing needs of economic development in this state.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.100 and 1998 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall charge to and collect
from each of the students registering at the particular institution for any
quarter or semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and
other fees as such board shall in its discretion determine. The total of all
fees shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such
tuition fees for other than the summer term shall be in the amounts for the
respective institutions as otherwise set forth in RCW 28B.15.067.

(2)
Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees
proportionate to full-time student rates established for residents and
nonresidents: PROVIDED, ((That students registered for fewer than two
credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees at the
rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED FURTHER,)) That, subject
to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho or Oregon who are
enrolled in community college district number twenty for six or fewer credits
during any quarter or semester may be exempted from payment of all or a portion
of the nonresident tuition fees differential upon a declaration by the higher
education coordinating board that it finds Washington residents from the community
college district are afforded substantially equivalent treatment by such other
states.

(3)
Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit hours shall be
charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour in excess of eighteen
hours at the applicable established per credit hour tuition fee rate for
part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the community
colleges may exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for students who
are registered exclusively in first professional programs in medicine, dental
medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are
registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
interaction of a changing economy, an evolving work force, and rapid
advancements in technology is having secondary impacts on business as usual.
The rules and assumptions governmental institutions, business, labor, and
citizens of the state of Washington have used for decades need to be
reevaluated and altered to address these changes. A more mobile work force and
the advancements of distance learning are two elements that are impacted by the
state's current residency rules as they pertain to tuition at public two-year
and four-year institutions of higher education.

(1)
A committee shall be appointed to examine residency requirements for
out-of-state tuition at public institutions of higher education. The committee
shall consist of: Representatives from the state board for community and
technical colleges, the office of financial management, the higher education
coordinating board, and the four-year institutions of higher education; and one
staff member each from the senate and house of representatives committees on
higher education.

(2)
The study shall include, but not be limited to:

(a)
The impact the state's rules for in-state and out-of-state tuition setting has
on economic development within the state; and

(b)
How the state's residency requirements should be applied to enrollment in
distance learning courses.

(3)
The study committee shall provide a final report to the senate and house of
representatives committees on higher education by December 1, 1999.

(4) This section expires December 31, 1999.

---
END ---