BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.41.280 and 1996 c 295 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on, public or private
elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, ((or))
areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools,
or the premises of public or private preschools or day-care facilities:

(a)
Any firearm;

(b)
Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c)
Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of two
or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with
wire, rope, or other means;

(d)
Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any aspect; or

(e)
Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB,
pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide,
or other gas.

(2)
Any such person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. If any person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any
revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is
prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three
years. The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of
licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.

Any
violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school
students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in
accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall
promptly notify law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding
any allegation or indication of such violation.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a)
Any student or employee of a private military academy when on the property of
the academy;

(b)
Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school district security
activities;

(c)
Any person who is involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or
firearms safety course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms
of collectors or instructors are handled or displayed;

(d)
Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or air gun
competition approved by the school or school district;

(e)
Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW
9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while
picking up or dropping off a student;

(f)
Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a
firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or
concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while conducting
legitimate business at the school;

(g)
Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an
unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at
the school; or

(h)
Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local government agency.

(4)
Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who
possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be
used in martial arts classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section,
firearms are not permitted in a public or private school building.

(6)
"GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school facilities giving
warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on school grounds.

(7) For the purposes of this section, "day-care
facility" means a child day-care center or a family day-care provider
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW.

---
END ---