BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that employers are becoming increasingly discouraged from
disclosing job reference information. The legislature further finds that full
disclosure of such information will increase productivity and enhance the
safety of the workplace.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

An employer who discloses information about a former or current
employee to a prospective employer is presumed to be acting in good faith and
is immune from civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences if the
disclosed information relates to: (1) The employee's ability to perform his or
her job; (2) the diligence, skill or reliability with which the employee
carried out the duties of his or her job; or (3) any illegal or wrongful act
committed by the employee. For purposes of this section, the presumption of
good faith may only be rebutted upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence
that the information disclosed by the employer was knowingly false or
deliberately misleading.

---
END ---