BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

A
revolving fund to be known as the fish and wildlife equipment fund is created
in the custody of the state treasurer, to be expended by the department without
appropriation for salaries, wages, and operations required for the purchase,
repair, replacement, and operation of equipment for the purposes authorized in
this section. The equipment may be used for the administration, maintenance, and
construction of fish and wildlife lands and facilities; administration,
maintenance, and construction of lands under department control;
administration, maintenance, and construction of projects that will enhance
fish and wildlife, including but not limited to volunteer cooperative projects,
regional fisheries enhancement group projects, and salmon recovery projects;
and administration, biological assessment, and enforcement necessary to carry
out the duties under this title and rules of the commission and director. The
department may purchase and sell equipment, materials, and supplies by use of
the fund, subject to any laws governing the purchase and sale of property.

All
existing and hereafter-acquired equipment of the department shall be deemed to
have been purchased from the fish and wildlife equipment fund. The department
may, from time to time, transfer equipment purchased with appropriations from
the general fund to the fish and wildlife equipment fund with or without
charging the fish and wildlife equipment fund.

Equipment
may be provided to any federal, state, county, or city political subdivision or
governmental agency, volunteer cooperatives, regional fisheries enhancement
groups, and entities engaged in salmon recovery. The department may collect a
reasonable charge for providing the equipment. The terms and charges for such
rentals shall be solely within the discretion of the department, and the
determination of the terms and charges shall be considered reasonable. Any
entity renting equipment shall make payment for such rental charges directly to
the fish and wildlife equipment fund and the office of the department in
Olympia. The fish and wildlife equipment fund shall be credited with the
proceeds received from the payment of the rental charges.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.50 RCW to read as follows:

Existing and hereafter acquired equipment and materials purchased
by regional fisheries enhancement groups with funding from the regional
fisheries enhancement account established under RCW 75.50.100 or the regional
fisheries enhancement salmonid recovery account established under RCW
75.50.125, shall be considered the property of the regional fisheries
enhancement group making the purchase when the cost of the equipment or
materials is less than five thousand dollars. No chargeback shall be made on
these equipment and materials to the fish and wildlife equipment fund
established in section 1 of this act. The regional fisheries enhancement group
advisory board and the department shall develop guidelines for implementing
this section.

---
END ---