BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.45 RCW to read as follows:

An
exchange of real estate is exempt from tax under this chapter if all of the
following conditions are met:

(1)
The exchange consists of a transfer of privately owned real estate for land
administered by the federal secretary of agriculture as part of a national
forest;

(2)
The exchange has been specifically authorized by an act of the congress of the
United States; and

(3)
The values of the exchanged parcels are equal, or if not equal, have been
equalized in a manner provided by the act of congress authorizing the exchange.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
exemption in section 1 of this act is for the state real estate excise tax and
does not extend to taxes imposed under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---