BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

THE DNA IDENTIFICATION SYSTEM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. The
legislature finds it necessary to expand the current pool of convicted
offenders who must have a blood sample drawn for purposes of DNA identification
analysis. The legislature further finds that there is a high rate of
recidivism among certain types of violent and sex offenders and that drawing
blood is minimally intrusive. Creating an expanded DNA data bank bears a
rational relationship to the public's interest in enabling law enforcement to
better identify convicted violent and sex offenders who are involved in
unsolved crimes, who escape to reoffend, and who reoffend after release.

Sec.
102. RCW
43.43.754 and 1994 c 271 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
adult or juvenile individual convicted of a felony or adjudicated guilty of an
equivalent juvenile offense defined as a sex offense under RCW 9.94A.030(((31)))
(33)(a) or a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 shall have a
blood sample drawn for purposes of DNA identification analysis. For persons
convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile
offense who are serving or who are to serve a term of confinement in a
county jail or detention facility, the county shall be responsible for
obtaining blood samples ((prior to release from)) either as part of
the intake process into the county jail or detention facility for those
persons convicted on or after the effective date of this act, or within a
reasonable time after the effective date of this act for those persons incarcerated
prior to the effective date of this act who have not yet had a blood sample
drawn, beginning with those persons who will be released the soonest. For
persons convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty of an equivalent
juvenile offense, who are serving or who are to serve a term of
confinement in a department of corrections facility or a division of juvenile
rehabilitation facility, the facility holding the person shall be responsible
for obtaining blood samples ((prior to release from)) either as part
of the intake process into such facility for those persons convicted on
or after the effective date of this act, or within a reasonable time after the
effective date of this act for those persons incarcerated prior to the
effective date of this act who have not yet had a blood sample drawn, beginning
with those persons who will be released the soonest. Any blood sample
taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758 shall be used solely for the
purpose of providing DNA or other blood grouping tests for identification
analysis and prosecution of a sex offense or a violent offense.

This
section applies to all adults who are convicted after July 1, 1990; and to
all adults who were convicted on or prior to July 1, 1990, and who are still
incarcerated on or after the effective date of this act. This section
applies to all juveniles who are adjudicated guilty after July 1, 1994; and
to all juveniles who were adjudicated guilty on or prior to July 1, 1994, and
who are still incarcerated on or after the effective date of this act.

PART
II

THE CHILD
IDENTIFICATION PROGRAM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. (1)
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "child identification
program" act of 1999.

(2)
The legislature finds that the technology of deoxyribonucleic acid, DNA,
testing is of great potential benefit to the citizens of this state. Having a
child's DNA sample available will enable parents to better assist law
enforcement in finding and identifying a child in the unfortunate event of a
child's disappearance or abduction, and in identifying children who may be
victims in accidents or natural disasters. Obtaining a DNA sample simply
requires the placement of a drop of blood on specially treated paper for
long-term storage by the parent. It is the intent of the legislature that all
health care providers, including hospitals, birthing centers, and physicians,
assist parents in obtaining blood samples for safekeeping by the parent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. (1)
Every licensed hospital and every licensed birthing center shall, notify
potential parents as part of the admission process for labor and delivery that
the hospital or birthing center is a participant in the child identification
program and will provide a DNA sample for identification purposes to the parent
upon request and upon payment of a fee to be determined by the hospital or
birthing center. The fee may not exceed the reasonable cost of obtaining the
sample and necessary materials. If the parent elects to participate and pays
the fee, the hospital or birthing center shall obtain the DNA sample and
provide the sample to the parent for safekeeping. Nothing in this section
shall be considered as a health service under the medicaid program, and the fee
paid is not subject to the copayment limitations set forth therein. No copy or
any record of any DNA samples provided to a parent may be created or maintained
by any entity participating in the child identification program.

(2)
The legislature encourages all physicians who provide primary care to children
born before implementation of the child identification program to participate
voluntarily and offer the child identification program to their patients. The
department of health is encouraged to assist licensed physicians in learning
about and participating in the child identification program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 205.
Sections 201 and 202 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---