BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
7.06.020 and 1987 c 212 s 101 and 1987 c 202 s 127 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
All civil actions, except for appeals from municipal or district courts, which
are at issue in the superior court in counties which have authorized
arbitration, where the sole relief sought is a money judgment, and where no
party asserts a claim in excess of ((fifteen)) twenty-five
thousand dollars, or if approved by the superior court of a county by
two-thirds or greater vote of the judges thereof, up to ((thirty-five)) fifty
thousand dollars, exclusive of interest and costs, are subject to mandatory
arbitration.

(2)
If approved by majority vote of the superior court judges of a county which has
authorized arbitration, all civil actions which are at issue in the superior
court in which the sole relief sought is the establishment, termination or
modification of maintenance or child support payments are subject to mandatory
arbitration. The arbitrability of any such action shall not be affected by the
amount or number of payments involved.

Sec.
2. RCW
7.06.050 and 1982 c 188 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Following a hearing as prescribed by court rule, the arbitrator shall file his
decision and award with the clerk of the superior court, together with proof of
service thereof on the parties. Within twenty days after such filing, any
aggrieved party may file with the clerk a written notice of appeal and request
for a trial de novo in the superior court on all issues of law and fact. Such
trial de novo shall thereupon be held, including a right to jury, if demanded.

(a)
Up to thirty days prior to the actual date of a trial de novo, a nonappealing
party may serve upon the appealing party a written offer of compromise.

(b)
In any case in which an offer of compromise is not accepted by the appealing
party within ten calendar days after service thereof, for purposes of MAR 7.3,
the amount of the offer of compromise shall replace the amount of the
arbitrator's award for determining whether the party appealing the arbitrator's
award has failed to improve that party's position on the trial de novo.

(c)
A postarbitration offer of compromise shall not be filed or communicated to the
court or the trier of fact until after judgment on the trial de novo, at which
time a copy of the offer of compromise shall be filed for purposes of
determining whether the party who appealed the arbitrator's award has failed to
improve that party's position on the trial de novo, pursuant to MAR 7.3.

(2)
If no appeal has been filed at the expiration of twenty days following filing
of the arbitrator's decision and award, a judgment shall be entered and may be
presented to the court by any party, on notice, which judgment when entered
shall have the same force and effect as judgments in civil actions.

Sec.
3. RCW
7.06.060 and 1979 c 103 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((supreme)) superior court ((may by rule provide for))
shall assess costs and reasonable attorney's fees ((that may be
assessed)) against a party ((appealing from)) who appeals the
award ((who)) and fails to improve his or her position on
the trial de novo. The court may assess costs and reasonable attorneys'
fees against a party who voluntarily withdraws a request for a trial de novo.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "costs" means
those costs provided for by statute or court rule, or both, as well as all
expenses related to expert witness testimony that the court finds were
reasonably necessary after the request for trial de novo has been filed.

---
END ---