BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.60.215 and 1997 c 271 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be an unfair practice for any person or the person's agent
or employee to commit an act which directly or indirectly results in any
distinction, restriction, or discrimination, or the requiring of any person to
pay a larger sum than the uniform rates charged other persons except as
allowed under the federal Americans with disabilities act for public conveyance
or transportation of eligible persons, or the refusing or withholding from
any person the admission, patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling,
staying, or lodging in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage,
or amusement, except for conditions and limitations established by law and
applicable to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin,
sex, the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of
a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person: PROVIDED, That
this section shall not be construed to require structural changes,
modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to a disabled person
except as otherwise required by law: PROVIDED, That behavior or actions
constituting a risk to property or other persons can be grounds for refusal and
shall not constitute an unfair practice.

---
END ---