BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
34.05.210 and 1988 c 288 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The code reviser shall cause the Washington Administrative Code to be compiled,
indexed by subject, and published. All current, permanently effective rules of
each agency shall be published in the Washington Administrative Code.
Compilations shall be supplemented or revised as often as necessary and at
least annually in a form compatible with the main compilation.

(2)
Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the code reviser shall prescribe a
uniform numbering system, form, and style for all proposed and adopted rules.

(3)
The code reviser shall publish a register setting forth the text of all rules
filed during the appropriate register publication period.

(4)
The code reviser may omit from the register or the compilation, rules that
would be unduly cumbersome, expensive, or otherwise inexpedient to publish, if
such rules are made available in printed or processed form on application to
the adopting agency, and if the register or compilation contains a notice
stating the general subject matter of the rules so omitted and stating how
copies thereof may be obtained.

(5)
The code reviser may edit and revise rules for publication, codification, and
compilation, without changing the meaning of any such rule.

(6)
When a rule, in whole or in part, is declared invalid and unconstitutional by a
court of final appeal, the adopting agency shall give notice to that effect in
the register. With the consent of the attorney general, the code reviser may
remove obsolete rules or parts of rules from the Washington Administrative Code
when:

(a)
The rules are declared unconstitutional by a court of final appeal; or

(b)
The adopting agency ceases to exist and the rules are not transferred by statute
to a successor agency.

(7)
Registers and compilations shall be made available, in written form to (a)
state elected officials whose offices are created by Article II or III of the
state Constitution or by RCW 48.02.010, upon request, (b) to the secretary of
the senate and the chief clerk of the house for committee use, as required, but
not to exceed the number of standing committees in each body, (c) to county
boards of law library trustees and to the Olympia representatives of the
Associated Press and the United Press International without request, free of
charge, and (d) to other persons at a price fixed by the code reviser.

(8)
The board of law library trustees of each county shall keep and maintain a
complete and current set of registers and compilations for use and inspection
as provided in chapter 27.24 RCW ((27.24.060)).

(9)
Judicial notice shall be taken of rules filed and published as provided in RCW
34.05.380 and this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
34.05.328 and 1997 c 430 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall:

(a)
Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific objectives of the
statute that the rule implements;

(b)
Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals and specific
objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and analyze alternatives to
rule making and the consequences of not adopting the rule;

(c)
Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable
costs, taking into account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and
costs and the specific directives of the statute being implemented;

(d)
Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis
required under (b) and (c) of this subsection, that the rule being adopted is
the least burdensome alternative for those required to comply with it that will
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this
subsection;

(e)
Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an
action that violates requirements of another federal or state law;

(f)
Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements
on private entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal
or state law;

(g)
Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or statute applicable
to the same activity or subject matter and, if so, determine that the
difference is justified by the following:

(i)
A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ from federal
standards; or

(ii)
Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to achieve the general
goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection; and

(h)
Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with other federal,
state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or subject matter.

(2)
In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b) through (g) of this
section, the agency shall place in the rule-making file documentation of
sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the
determinations are justified.

(3)
Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall place in the rule-making file a rule implementation plan for rules filed
under each adopting order. The plan shall describe how the agency intends to:

(a)
Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the resources the
agency intends to use;

(b)
Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;

(c)
Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and

(d)
Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was adopted,
including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of interim milestones to
assess progress and the use of objectively measurable outcomes.

(4)
After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this section regulating
the same activity or subject matter as another provision of federal or state
law, an agency shall do all of the following:

(a)
Provide to the ((business assistance center)) department of
community, trade, and economic development a list citing by reference the
other federal and state laws that regulate the same activity or subject matter;

(b)
Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the other federal
and state entities regulating the same activity or subject matter by making
every effort to do one or more of the following:

(i)
Deferring to the other entity;

(ii)
Designating a lead agency; or

(iii)
Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying how the agency
and entities will coordinate implementation and enforcement.

If
the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the agency shall
report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this subsection;

(c)
Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:

(i)
The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or state laws, any
differences from federal law, and any known overlap, duplication, or conflict
with local laws; and

(ii)
Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary to eliminate or
mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap, duplication, or difference.

(5)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section applies to:

(i)
Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology, labor and
industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and natural resources,
the employment security department, the forest practices board, the office of
the insurance commissioner, and to the legislative rules of the department of
fish and wildlife implementing chapter 75.20 RCW; and

(ii)
Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made applicable to the
rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule by a majority vote of the
joint administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving
the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

(b)
This section does not apply to:

(i)
Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(ii)
Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to
violation by a nongovernment party;

(iii)
Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material change federal
statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington
state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of state-wide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(iv)
Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or
clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(v)
Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(vi)
Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; or

(vii)
Rules of the department of social and health services relating only to client
medical or financial eligibility and rules concerning liability for care of
dependents.

(c)
For purposes of this subsection:

(i)
A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals (A) any
procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency hearings; (B) any
filing or related process requirement for making application to an agency for a
license or permit; or (C) any policy statement pertaining to the consistent
internal operations of an agency.

(ii)
An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does not
subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the agency’s
interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.

(iii)
A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a procedural or
interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to
delegated legislative authority, the violation of which subjects a violator of
such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B) establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualification or standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a
license or permit; or (C) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a
policy or regulatory program.

(d)
In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an agency shall
state whether this section applies to the proposed rule pursuant to (a)(i) of
this subsection, or if the agency will apply this section voluntarily.

(6)
By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered year thereafter,
the office of financial management, after consulting with state agencies,
counties, and cities, and business, labor, and environmental organizations,
shall report to the governor and the legislature regarding the effects of this
section on the regulatory system in this state. The report shall document:

(a)
The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the extent possible,
how compliance with this section affected the substance of the rule, if any,
that the agency ultimately adopted;

(b)
The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this section;

(c)
Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of any agency to
comply with this section, the costs to the state of such action, and the
result;

(d)
The extent to which this section has adversely affected the capacity of
agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;

(e)
The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability of state rules
to those regulated; and

(f)
Any other information considered by the office of financial management to be
useful in evaluating the effect of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
34.05.350 and 1994 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If an agency for good cause finds:

(a)
That immediate adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule is necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, and that
observing the time requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon
adoption of a permanent rule would be contrary to the public interest; or

(b)
That state or federal law or federal rule or a federal deadline for state
receipt of federal funds requires immediate adoption of a rule,

the
agency may dispense with those requirements and adopt, amend, or repeal the
rule on an emergency basis. The agency's finding and a concise statement of
the reasons for its finding shall be incorporated in the order for adoption of
the emergency rule or amendment filed with the office of the code reviser under
RCW 34.05.380 and with the rules review committee.

(2)
An emergency rule adopted under this section takes effect upon filing with the
code reviser, unless a later date is specified in the order of adoption, and
may not remain in effect for longer than one hundred twenty days after filing.
Identical or substantially similar emergency rules may not be adopted in
sequence unless conditions have changed or the agency has filed notice of its
intent to adopt the rule as a permanent rule, and is actively undertaking the
appropriate procedures to adopt the rule as a permanent rule. This section
does not relieve any agency from compliance with any law requiring that its
permanent rules be approved by designated persons or bodies before they become
effective.

(3)
Within seven days after the rule is adopted, any person may petition the
governor requesting the immediate repeal of a rule adopted on an emergency
basis by any department listed in RCW 43.17.010. Within seven days after
submission of the petition, the governor shall either deny the petition in
writing, stating his or her reasons for the denial, or order the immediate
repeal of the rule. In ruling on the petition, the governor shall consider
only whether the conditions in subsection (1) of this section were met such
that adoption of the rule on an emergency basis was necessary. If the governor
orders the repeal of the emergency rule, any sanction imposed based on that
rule is void. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit adoption of
any rule as a permanent rule.

(((4)
In adopting an emergency rule, the agency shall comply with section 4 of this
act or provide a written explanation for its failure to do so.))

Sec.
4. RCW
34.05.660 and 1988 c 288 s 606 are each amended to read as follows:

It is the express policy of the legislature that establishment of
procedures for review of administrative rules by the legislature and the notice
of objection required by RCW 34.05.630(((2))) (3) and
34.05.640(2) in no way serves to establish a presumption as to the legality or
constitutionality of a rule in any subsequent judicial proceedings interpreting
such rules.

---
END ---