BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.27.114 and 1997 c 314 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Until the effective date of this section, any contractor agreeing to
perform any contracting project: (a) For the repair, alteration, or
construction of four or fewer residential units or accessory structures on such
residential property when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars
or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial building
when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more but less
than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer with the following
disclosure statement prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is registered with the state of
Washington, registration no. . . . ., as a general/specialty
contractor and has posted with the state a bond or cash deposit of
$6,000/$4,000 for the purpose of satisfying claims against the contractor for
negligent or improper work or breach of contract in the conduct of the
contractor's business. The expiration date of this contractor's registration
is . . . . . . This bond or cash deposit may not be
sufficient to cover a claim which might arise from the work done under your
contract. If any supplier of materials used in your construction project or
any employee of the contractor or subcontractor is not paid by the contractor
or subcontractor on your job, your property may be liened to force payment. If
you wish additional protection, you may request the contractor to provide you
with original "lien release" documents from each supplier or
subcontractor on your project. The contractor is required to provide you with
further information about lien release documents if you request it. General
information is also available from the department of labor and
industries."

(2)
On or after the effective date of this section, any contractor agreeing to
perform any contracting project: (a) For the repair, alteration, or
construction of four or fewer residential units or accessory structures on such
residential property when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars
or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial
building when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more but
less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer with the following
disclosure statement prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE
TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is registered with the state of
Washington, registration no. . . . ., as a general/specialty
contractor and has posted with the state a bond or cash deposit of
$. . . . . ./$. . . . . for
the purpose of satisfying claims against the contractor for breach of contract
in the conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of this
contractor's registration is . . . . . .. This bond
or cash deposit may not be sufficient to cover a claim which might arise from
the work done under your contract. If any supplier of materials, to the
contractor or subcontractor, used in your construction project or any employee
of the contractor or subcontractor is not paid by the contractor or
subcontractor on your job, your property may be liened to force payment. If
you wish additional protection you should consider the following: (1)
Requesting that the contractor provide you with original "lien
release" documents from each supplier or subcontractor on your project;
(2) employing the services of a construction contract control company or
individual for complete or partial financial oversight of your construction
project; (3) requiring by contract that your contractor furnish you with a
payment and performance bond to guarantee payment of suppliers and
subcontractors and performance of your construction project; (4) employing the
services of an attorney or other construction professional to review and advise
you regarding your construction project; (5) entering into a joint check
arrangement with your contractor and his or her subcontractors and suppliers to
insure that payment is made to those parties; and (6) withholding a
contractually defined percentage of your construction contract as retainage for
a stated period of time to provide protection to you and help insure that your
project will be completed as required by your contract. General information
regarding these protections is also available from the contractor's section of
the department of labor and industries by contacting them at the following
telephone number:
. . . . . . . . . . . .
and/or internet address: . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ..
In addition, you may request that the contractor's section provide you with a
contractor "summary sheet" setting forth a contractor's name,
address, telephone number, registration number, claims, bonding and insurance
history, and past registrations, if any."

(3)
A contractor subject to this section shall notify any consumer to whom notice
is required under subsections (1) and (2) of this section if the
contractor's registration has expired or is revoked or suspended by the
department prior to completion or other termination of the contract with the
consumer.

(((3)))
(4) No contractor subject to this section may bring or maintain any lien
claim under chapter 60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section
applies or bring or maintain any action in any court of this state for the
collection of compensation for the performance of any work or for breach of any
contract for which registration is required under this chapter without
alleging and proving that the contractor has provided the customer with a copy
of the disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section.

(((4)))
(5) This section does not apply to contracts authorized under chapter
39.04 RCW or to contractors contracting with other contractors.

(((5)))
(6) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute an infraction
under the provisions of this chapter.

(((6)))
(7) The department shall produce model disclosure statements, and public
service announcements detailing the information needed to assist contractors
and contractors' customers to comply under this section. As necessary, the
department shall periodically update these education materials.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.27.080 and 1988 c 285 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No person engaged in the business of contracting or acting
in the capacity of a contractor may bring or maintain any action in any court
of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any
work or for breach of any contract for which registration is required under
this chapter without alleging and proving that he or she was a duly
registered contractor, in compliance with the notice to customer
requirements of RCW 18.27.114, if applicable, and held a current and valid
certificate of registration at the time he or she contracted for the
performance of such work or entered into such contract. For the purposes of
this section, the court shall not find a contractor in substantial compliance
with the registration requirements of this chapter unless: (1) The department
has on file the information required by RCW 18.27.030; (2) the contractor has a
current bond or other security as required by RCW 18.27.040; ((and)) (3)
the contractor has current insurance as required by RCW 18.27.050; and (4)
the contractor has complied with the notice to customer requirements of RCW
18.27.114, if applicable. In determining under this section whether a
contractor is in substantial compliance with the registration requirements of
this chapter, the court shall take into consideration the length of time during
which the contractor did not hold a valid certificate of registration.

---
END ---