BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.070 and 1989 c 342 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If
at any time during the tenancy the landlord fails to carry out the duties
required by RCW 59.18.060 or by the rental agreement, the tenant may, in
addition to pursuit of remedies otherwise provided him by law, deliver written
notice to the person designated in RCW 59.18.060(((11))) (12), or
to the person who collects the rent, which notice shall specify the premises
involved, the name of the owner, if known, and the nature of the defective
condition. The landlord shall commence remedial action after receipt of such
notice by the tenant as soon as possible but not later than the following time
periods, except where circumstances are beyond the landlord's control:

(1)
Not more than twenty-four hours, where the defective condition deprives the
tenant of hot or cold water, heat, ((or)) gas, electricity, ((or
is imminently hazardous to life)) septic or sewer service, defective or
inadequate doors, locks, or windows, is a substandard and dangerous condition
under RCW 59.18.115(2)(a) or substantially endangers or impairs safety, health,
or property of the tenant;

(2)
Not more than ((seventy-two)) forty-eight hours, where the
defective condition deprives the tenant of the use of a refrigerator, range ((and)),
oven, or a major plumbing fixture supplied by the landlord, including, but
not limited to, toilets, sinks, bathtubs, or showers, or where a smoke detector
is inoperative or missing; and

(3)
Not more than ((ten)) five days in all other cases.

In
each instance the burden shall be on the landlord to see that remedial work
under this section is completed promptly. If completion is delayed due to
circumstances beyond the landlord's control, ((including the unavailability
of financing,)) the landlord shall remedy the defective condition as soon
as possible.

Sec.
2. RCW
59.18.100 and 1989 c 342 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((If at any time during the tenancy, the landlord fails to carry out any of
the duties imposed by RCW 59.18.060, and notice of the defect is given to the
landlord pursuant to RCW 59.18.070, the tenant may submit to the landlord or
his designated agent by certified mail or in person a good faith estimate by
the tenant of the cost to perform the repairs necessary to correct the
defective condition if the repair is to be done by licensed or registered
persons, or if no licensing or registration requirement applies to the type of
work to be performed, the cost if the repair is to be done by responsible
persons capable of performing such repairs. Such estimate may be submitted to
the landlord at the same time as notice is given pursuant to RCW 59.18.070:
PROVIDED, That the remedy provided in this section shall not be available for a
landlord's failure to carry out the duties in RCW 59.18.060 (9), and (11):
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the tenant utilizes this section for repairs pursuant
to RCW 59.18.060(6), the tenant shall promptly provide the landlord with a key
to any new or replaced locks. The amount the tenant may deduct from the rent
may vary from the estimate, but cannot exceed the one-month limit as described
in subsection (2) of this section.

(2))) If
the landlord fails to commence remedial action of the defective condition within
the applicable time period after receipt of notice ((and the estimate from
the tenant)), the tenant may contract with a licensed or registered person,
or with a responsible person capable of performing the repair if no license or
registration is required, to make the repair, and upon the completion of the
repair ((and an opportunity for inspection by the landlord or his designated
agent)), the tenant may deduct the cost of repair from the rent in an
amount not to exceed the sum expressed in dollars representing one month's
rental of the tenant's unit or one thousand two hundred dollars, whichever
is greater, per repair((: PROVIDED, That)). When the
landlord must commence to remedy the defective condition within ((ten)) five
days as provided in RCW 59.18.070(3), the tenant cannot contract for repairs
for ((ten)) five days after notice ((or five days after the
landlord receives the estimate, whichever is later: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
The total costs of repairs deducted in any twelve-month period under this
subsection shall not exceed the sum expressed in dollars representing two
month's rental of the tenant's unit or two thousand four hundred dollars,
whichever is greater. However, if the repair is required to be commenced
within twenty-four hours under RCW 59.18.070(1), there is no limit on the
amount of rent the tenant may deduct.

(((3)))
(2) If the landlord fails to carry out the duties imposed by RCW
59.18.060 within the applicable time period, and if the cost of repair does not
exceed ((one-half)) one month's rent, or six hundred dollars,
whichever is greater, including the cost of materials and labor, which
shall be computed at the prevailing rate in the community for the performance
of such work, and if repair of the condition need not by law be performed only
by licensed or registered persons, and if the tenant has given notice under RCW
59.18.070, ((although no estimate shall be necessary under this subsection,))
the tenant may repair the defective condition in a workmanlike manner and upon
completion of the repair and an opportunity for inspection, the tenant may
deduct the cost of repair from the rent((: PROVIDED, That)). Repairs
under this subsection are limited to defects within the leased premises((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The cost per repair shall not exceed ((one-half))
one month's rent of the unit or six hundred dollars, whichever is
greater, and ((that)) the total costs of repairs deducted in any
twelve-month period under this subsection shall not exceed ((one)) two
month's rent of the unit, or one thousand two hundred dollars, whichever is
greater. However, if the repair is required to be commenced within twenty-four
hours under RCW 59.18.070(1), there is no limit on the amount of rent the
tenant may deduct.

(3)
If the tenant uses this section for repairs under RCW 59.18.060(6), the tenant
shall promptly provide the landlord with a key to any new or replaced locks.

(4)
The provisions of this section shall not:

(a)
Create a relationship of employer and employee between landlord and tenant; or

(b)
Create liability under the workers' compensation act; or

(c)
Constitute the tenant as an agent of the landlord for the purposes of RCW ((60.04.010
and 60.04.040)) 60.04.011, 60.04.021, or 60.04.031.

(5)
Any repair work performed under the provisions of this section shall comply
with the requirements imposed by any applicable code, statute, ordinance, or
regulation. A landlord whose property is damaged because of repairs performed
in a negligent manner may recover the actual damages in an action against the
tenant.

(6)
Nothing in this section shall prevent the tenant from agreeing with the
landlord to undertake the repairs himself in return for cash payment or a
reasonable reduction in rent, the agreement thereof to be agreed upon between
the parties, and such agreement does not alter the landlord's obligations under
this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
59.18.115 and 1989 c 342 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that some tenants live in residences that are substandard
and dangerous to their health and safety and that the repair and deduct
remedies of RCW 59.18.100 may not be adequate to remedy substandard and
dangerous conditions. Therefore, an extraordinary remedy is necessary if the
conditions substantially endanger or impair the health ((and)),
safety, or property of the tenant.

(2)(a)
If a landlord fails to fulfill any substantial obligation imposed by RCW
59.18.060 that substantially endangers or impairs the health ((or)),
safety, or property of a tenant, including (i) structural members that
are of insufficient size or strength to carry imposed loads with safety, (ii)
exposure of the occupants to the weather, (iii) plumbing and sanitation defects
that directly expose the occupants to the risk of illness or injury, (iv) lack
of water, including hot water, (v) heating or ventilation systems that are not
functional or are hazardous, (vi) defective, hazardous, or missing electrical
wiring or electrical service, (vii) defective or inadequate exits that increase
the risk of injury to occupants, ((and)) (viii) conditions that increase
the risk of fire, flooding, or water damage, including a defective existing
interior sprinkler system, and (ix) defective or inadequate doors, windows, or
locks, the tenant shall give notice in writing to the landlord, specifying
the conditions, acts, omissions, or violations. Such notice shall be sent to
the landlord or to the person or place where rent is normally paid.

(b)
If after receipt of the notice described in (a) of this subsection the landlord
fails to remedy the condition or conditions within a reasonable amount of time
under RCW 59.18.070, the tenant may request that the local government provide
for an inspection of the premises with regard to the specific condition or
conditions that exist as provided in (a) of this subsection. The local
government shall have the appropriate government official, or may designate a
public or disinterested private person or company capable of conducting the
inspection and making the certification, conduct an inspection of the specific
condition or conditions listed by the tenant((, and shall not inspect nor be
liable for any other condition or conditions of the premises. The purpose of
this inspection is to verify, to the best of the inspector's ability, whether
the tenant's listed condition or conditions exist and substantially endanger
the tenant's health or safety under (a) of this subsection; the inspection is
for the purposes of this private civil remedy, and therefore shall not be
related to any other governmental function such as enforcement of any code,
ordinance, or state law)).

(c)
The local government or its designee, after receiving the request from the
tenant to conduct an inspection under this section, shall conduct the
inspection and make any certification within a reasonable amount of time not
more than five days from the date of receipt of the request. The local
government or its designee may enter the premises at any reasonable time to do
the inspection, provided that he or she first shall display proper credentials
and request entry. The local government or its designee shall whenever
practicable, taking into consideration the imminence of any threat to the tenant's
health or safety, give the landlord at least twenty-four hours notice of the
date and time of inspection and provide the landlord with an opportunity to be
present at the time of the inspection. The landlord shall have no power or
authority to prohibit entry for the inspection.

(d)
The local government or its designee shall certify whether the condition or the
conditions specified by the tenant do exist and ((do make the premises
substantially unfit for human habitation or)) can be a substantial risk to
the health and safety of the tenant as described in (a) of this subsection.
The certification shall be provided to the tenant, and a copy shall be included
by the tenant with the notice sent to the landlord under subsection (3) of this
section. The certification may be appealed to the local board of appeals, but
the appeal shall not delay or preclude the tenant from proceeding with the
escrow under this section.

(e)
((The tenant shall not be entitled to deposit rent in escrow pursuant to
this section unless the tenant first makes a good faith determination that he
or she is unable to repair the conditions described in the certification issued
pursuant to subsection (2)(d) of this section through use of the repair
remedies authorized by RCW 59.18.100.

(f))) If
the local government or its designee certifies that the condition or conditions
specified by the tenant exist, the tenant shall then either pay the periodic
rent due to the landlord or deposit all periodic rent then called for in the
rental agreement and all rent thereafter called for in the rental agreement into
a separate bank or savings and loan account into an escrow account
maintained by a person authorized by law to set up and maintain escrow
accounts, including escrow companies under chapter 18.44 RCW, financial
institutions, or attorneys, or with the clerk of the court of the district or
superior court where the property is located. These depositories are
hereinafter referred to as "escrow." The tenant shall notify the
landlord in writing of the deposit by mailing the notice postage prepaid by
first class mail or by delivering the notice to the landlord promptly but not
more than twenty-four hours after the deposit.

(((g)))
(f) This section, when elected as a remedy by the tenant by sending the
notice under subsection (3) of this section, shall be the exclusive remedy
available to the tenant regarding defects described in the certification under
subsection (2)(d) of this section((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the tenant may ((simultaneously)) commence or pursue an action in an
appropriate court, or at arbitration if so agreed, to determine past, present,
or future diminution in rental value of the premises due to any defective
conditions.

(3)
The notice to the landlord of the rent escrow under this section shall be a
sworn statement by the tenant in substantially the following form:

NOTICE
TO LANDLORD OF RENT ESCROW

Name of tenant:

Name
of landlord:

Name
and address of escrow:

Date
of deposit of rent into escrow:

Amount
of rent deposited into escrow:

The following condition has been certified by a local
building official to substantially endanger, impair, or affect the health or
safety of a tenant:

That written notice of the conditions needing repair was
provided to the landlord on . . ., and . . . days have
elapsed and the repairs have not been made.

.......................

(Sworn
Signature)

(4)
The escrow shall place all rent deposited in a separate rent escrow account in
the name of the escrow in a bank or savings and loan association domiciled in
this state. The escrow shall keep in a separate docket an account of each
deposit, with the name and address of the tenant, and the name and address of
the landlord and of the agent, if any.

(5)(a)
A landlord who receives notice that the rent due has been deposited with an
escrow pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may:

(i)
Apply to the escrow for release of the funds after the local government
certifies that the repairs to the conditions listed in the notice under
subsection (3) of this section have been properly repaired. The escrow shall
release the funds to the landlord less any escrow costs for which the tenant is
entitled to reimbursement pursuant to this section, immediately upon written
receipt of the local government certification that the repairs to the
conditions listed in the notice under subsection (3) of this section have been
properly completed.

(ii)
File an action with the court and apply to the court for release of the rent on
the grounds that the tenant did not comply with the notice requirement of
subsection (2) or (3) of this section. Proceedings under this subsection shall
be governed by the time, service, and filing requirements of RCW 59.18.370
regarding show cause hearings.

(iii)
File an action with the court and apply to the court for release of the rent on
the grounds that there was no violation of any obligation imposed upon the
landlord or that the condition has been remedied.

(iv)
This action may be filed in any court having jurisdiction, including small
claims court. The tenant must be named as a party to any action filed by
the landlord under this section, and may file an answer and counterclaim.
If the tenant has vacated the premises or if the landlord has failed to
commence an action with the court for release of the funds within sixty days
after rent is deposited in escrow, the tenant may file an action to determine
how and when any rent deposited in escrow shall be released or disbursed. A
trial must be held within sixty days of the date of filing of the landlord's or
tenant's complaint. The landlord shall not commence an unlawful detainer
action for nonpayment of rent by serving or filing a summons and complaint if
the tenant initially pays the rent called for in the rental agreement that is
due into escrow as provided for under this section on or before the date rent
is due or on or before the expiration of a three-day notice to pay rent or
vacate and continues to pay the rent into escrow as the rent becomes due or
prior to the expiration of a three-day notice to pay rent or vacate; provided
that the landlord shall not be barred from commencing an unlawful detainer
action for nonpayment of rent if the amount of rent that is paid into escrow is
less than the amount of rent agreed upon in the rental agreement between the
parties.

(b)
((The tenant shall be named as a party to any action filed by the landlord
under this section, and shall have the right to file an answer and
counterclaim, although any counterclaim shall be dismissed without prejudice if
the court or arbitrator determines that the tenant failed to follow the notice
requirements contained in this section. Any counterclaim can only claim
diminished rental value related to conditions specified by the tenant in the
notice required under subsection (3) of this section. This limitation on the
tenant's right to counterclaim shall not affect the tenant's right to bring his
or her own separate action. A trial shall be held within sixty days of the
date of filing of the landlord's or tenant's complaint.

(c))) The
tenant shall be entitled to reimbursement for any escrow costs or fees incurred
for setting up or maintaining an escrow account pursuant to this section,
unless the tenant did not comply with the notice requirements of subsection (2)
or (3) of this section. Any escrow fees that are incurred for which the tenant
is entitled to reimbursement shall be deducted from the rent deposited in
escrow and remitted to the tenant at such time as any rent is released to the
landlord or tenant. The prevailing party in any court action or
arbitration brought under this section may also be awarded its costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees.

(((d)))
(c) If a court determines a diminished rental value of the premises, the
tenant may pay the rent due based on the diminished value of the premises into
escrow until the landlord makes the necessary repairs.

(6)(a)
If a landlord brings an action for the release of rent deposited, the court
may, upon application of the landlord, release part of the rent on deposit for
payment of the debt service on the premises, the insurance premiums for the
premises, utility services, and repairs to the rental unit.

(b)
In determining whether to release rent for the payments described in (a) of
this subsection, the court shall consider the amount of rent the landlord
receives from other rental units in the buildings of which the residential
premises are a part, the cost of operating those units, and the costs which may
be required to remedy the condition contained in the notice. The court shall
also consider whether the expenses are due or have already been paid, whether
the landlord has other financial resources, or whether the landlord or tenant
will suffer irreparable damage. The court may request the landlord to provide
additional security, such as a bond, prior to authorizing release of any of the
funds in escrow.

(7) If, by ninety days after the certification of the premises
as substantially endangering or impairing the health, safety, or property of a
tenant, the dwelling has not been certified as corrected and a copy of the
corrected certification has not been provided to the escrow and the tenant, any
moneys deposited in escrow are then payable to the tenant, and may be used for
remedying the defects specified in the certification or for the payment of utility
services for which the landlord is obligated.

---
END ---