BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
During 1997 and 1998, a committee of the state board of education reviewed all
board rules and related authorizing statutes. Based on the findings and
recommendations resulting from the review, the state board prepared a report to
the legislature requesting action be taken. It is the intent of this act to
implement recommendations of the state board of education.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.205.010 and 1993 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this chapter, unless the context thereof shall clearly indicate to
the contrary:

"Education
center" means any private school operated on a profit or nonprofit basis
which does the following:

(a)
Is devoted to the teaching of basic academic skills, including specific attention
to improvement of student motivation for achieving, and employment orientation.

(b)
Operates on a clinical, client centered basis. This shall include, but not be
limited to, performing diagnosis of individual educational abilities,
determination and setting of individual goals, prescribing and providing
individual courses of instruction therefor, and evaluation of each individual
client's progress in his or her educational program.

(c)
Conducts courses of instruction by professionally trained personnel
certificated by the state board of education according to rules ((and
regulations promulgated)) adopted for the purposes of this chapter
and providing, for certification purposes, that a year's teaching experience in
an education center shall be deemed equal to a year's teaching experience in a
common or private school.

(2)
For purposes of this chapter, basic academic skills shall include the study of
mathematics, speech, language, reading and composition, science, history,
literature and political science or civics, as any or all of these subjects
are identified under RCW 28A.150.210 and for which essential academic learning
requirements have been established under RCW 28A.630.885(3)(a); it shall
not include courses of a vocational training nature and shall not include
courses deemed nonessential to the accrediting of the common schools or the
approval of private schools under RCW 28A.305.130.

(3)
The state board of education shall certify an education center only upon
application and (a) determination that such school comes within the definition
thereof as set forth in subsection (1) ((above)) of this section
and (b) demonstration on the basis of actual educational performance of such
applicants' students which shows after consideration of their students'
backgrounds, educational gains that are a direct result of the applicants'
educational program. Such certification may be withdrawn if the board finds
that a center fails to provide adequate instruction in basic academic skills.
No education center certified by the state board of education pursuant to this
section shall be deemed a common school under RCW 28A.150.020 or a private
school for the purposes of RCW 28A.195.010 through 28A.195.050.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.205.020 and 1997 c 265 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Only
eligible common school dropouts shall be enrolled in a certified education
center for reimbursement by the superintendent of public instruction as
provided in RCW 28A.205.040. A person is not an eligible common school dropout
if: (1) The person has completed high school, (2) the person has not reached
his or her twelfth birthday or has passed his or her twentieth birthday, (3)
the person shows proficiency beyond the high school level in a test approved by
the ((superintendent of public instruction)) state board of education
to be given as part of the initial diagnostic procedure, or (4) less than one
month has passed after the person has dropped out of any common school and the
education center has not received written verification from a school official
of the common school last attended in this state that the person is no longer
in attendance at the school. A person is an eligible common school dropout
even if one month has not passed since the person dropped out if the board of
directors or its designee, of that common school, requests the center to admit
the person because the person has dropped out or because the person is unable
to attend a particular common school because of disciplinary reasons, including
suspension and/or expulsion. The fact that any person may be subject to RCW
28A.225.010 through ((28A.225.150)) 28A.225.140, 28A.200.010, and
28A.200.020 shall not affect his or her qualifications as an eligible common
school dropout under this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.205.040 and 1990 c 33 s 183 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
From funds appropriated for that purpose, the superintendent of public
instruction shall pay fees to a certified ((clinic)) center
on a monthly basis for each student enrolled in compliance with RCW
28A.205.020((, fees in accordance with the following conditions:

(1)(a)
The fee for the initial diagnostic procedure shall be not more than fifty
dollars per student, and hourly fees for each student shall be sixteen dollars
if the class size is no greater than one, ten dollars if the class size is at
least two and no greater than five, and five dollars if the class size is at
least six: PROVIDED, That)). The superintendent
shall set fees by rule.

(b)
Revisions in such fees proposed by an education ((clinic)) center
shall become effective after thirty days notice unless the superintendent finds
such a revision is unreasonable in which case the revision shall not take
effect((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). An education ((clinic))
center may, within fifteen days after such a finding by the
superintendent, file notification of appeal with the state board of education
which shall, no later than its second regularly scheduled meeting following
notification of such appeal, either grant or deny the proposed revision((:
AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). The administration of any general
education development test shall not be a part of such initial diagnostic
procedure.

(((b)))
(c) Reimbursements shall not be made for students who are absent.

(((c)))
(d) No ((clinic)) center shall make any charge to any
student, or the student's parent, guardian or custodian, for whom a fee is
being received under the provisions of this section.

(2)
Payments shall be made from available funds first to those ((clinic(s) which))
centers that have in the judgment of the superintendent demonstrated
superior performance based upon consideration of students' educational gains
taking into account such students' backgrounds, and upon consideration of cost
effectiveness. In considering the cost effectiveness of nonprofit ((clinics))
centers the superintendent shall take into account not only payments
made under this section but also factors such as tax exemptions, direct and
indirect subsidies or any other cost to taxpayers at any level of government
which result from such nonprofit status.

(3)
To be eligible for such payment, every such ((clinic)) center,
without prior notice, shall permit a review of its accounting records by
personnel of the state auditor during normal business hours.

(4)
If total funds for this purpose approach depletion, the superintendent shall
notify the ((clinics)) centers of the date after which further
funds for reimbursement of the ((clinics')) centers' services
will be exhausted.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.225.160 and 1986 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided by law, it is the general policy of the state that the
common schools shall be open to the admission of all persons who are five years
of age and less than twenty-one years residing in that school district. Except
as otherwise provided by law or rules adopted by the state board of
education, ((the state board of education is hereby authorized to adopt
rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW which)) districts may
establish uniform entry qualifications, including but not limited to birth date
requirements, for admission to kindergarten and first grade programs of the
common schools. Such rules may provide for exceptions based upon the ability,
or the need, or both, of an individual student. For the purpose of complying
with any rule adopted by the state board of education which authorizes a
preadmission screening process as a prerequisite to granting exceptions to the
uniform entry qualifications, a school district may collect fees ((not to
exceed seventy-five dollars per preadmission student)) to cover expenses
incurred in the administration of ((such a)) any preadmission
screening process: PROVIDED, That in so establishing such fee or fees, the
district shall adopt regulations for waiving and reducing such fees in the
cases of those persons whose families, by reason of their low income, would
have difficulty in paying the entire amount of such fees.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.300.040 and 1992 c 198 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the powers and
duties of the superintendent of public instruction shall be:

(1)
To have supervision over all matters pertaining to the public schools of the
state((.));

(2)
To report to the governor and the legislature such information and data as may
be required for the management and improvement of the schools((.));

(3)
To prepare and have printed such forms, registers, courses of study, rules ((and
regulations)) for the government of the common schools, ((questions
prepared for the examination of persons as provided for in RCW 28A.305.130(9),))
and such other material and books as may be necessary for the discharge of the
duties of teachers and officials charged with the administration of the laws
relating to the common schools, and to distribute the same to educational
service district superintendents((.));

(4)
To travel, without neglecting his or her other official duties as
superintendent of public instruction, for the purpose of attending educational
meetings or conventions, of visiting schools, of consulting educational service
district superintendents or other school officials((.));

(5)
To prepare and from time to time to revise a manual of the Washington state
common school code, copies of which shall be provided in such numbers as
determined by the superintendent of public instruction at no cost to those
public agencies within the common school system and which shall be sold at
approximate actual cost of publication and distribution per volume to all other
public and nonpublic agencies or individuals, said manual to contain Titles 28A
and 28C RCW, rules ((and regulations)) related to the common schools,
and such other matter as the state superintendent or the state board of
education shall determine. Proceeds of the sale of such code shall be
transmitted to the public printer who shall credit the state superintendent's
account within the state printing plant revolving fund by a like amount((.));

(6)
To act as ex officio member and the chief executive officer of the state board
of education((.));

(7)
To act as the administrator for rules adopted under RCW 28A.305.130 (1)
through (5), (7), and (8), including the power to issue any certificates or
permits and revoke the same in accordance with state board of education rules;

(8)
To file all papers, reports and public documents transmitted to the
superintendent by the school officials of the several counties or districts of
the state, each year separately. Copies of all papers filed in the
superintendent's office, and the superintendent's official acts, may, or upon
request, shall be certified by the superintendent and attested by the
superintendent's official seal, and when so certified shall be evidence of the
papers or acts so certified to((.));

(((8)))
(9) To require annually, on or before the 15th day of August, of the
president, manager, or principal of every educational institution in this
state, a report as required by the superintendent of public instruction; and it
is the duty of every president, manager or principal, to complete and return
such forms within such time as the superintendent of public instruction shall
direct((.));

(((9)))
(10) To keep in the superintendent's office a record of all teachers
receiving certificates to teach in the common schools of this state((.));

(((10)))
(11) To issue certificates as provided by law((.));

(((11)))
(12) To keep in the superintendent's office at the capital of the state,
all books and papers pertaining to the business of the superintendent's office,
and to keep and preserve in the superintendent's office a complete record of
statistics, as well as a record of the meetings of the state board of
education((.));

(((12)))
(13) With the assistance of the office of the attorney general, to
decide all points of law which may be submitted to the superintendent in
writing by any educational service district superintendent, or that may be
submitted to the superintendent by any other person, upon appeal from the
decision of any educational service district superintendent; and the superintendent
shall publish his or her rulings and decisions from time to time for the
information of school officials and teachers; and the superintendent's decision
shall be final unless set aside by a court of competent jurisdiction((.));

(((13)))
(14) To administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of the
superintendent's official duties((.));

(((14)))
(15) To deliver to his or her successor, at the expiration of the
superintendent's term of office, all records, books, maps, documents and papers
of whatever kind belonging to the superintendent's office or which may have
been received by the superintendent's for the use of the superintendent's
office((.));

(((15)))
(16) To administer family services and programs to promote the state's
policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025((.));

(((16)))
(17) To perform such other duties as may be required by law.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.305.130 and 1997 c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of
education shall:

(1)
Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school
administrator, and school specialized personnel certification offered by all
institutions of higher education within the state which may be accredited and
whose graduates may become entitled to receive such certification((.));

(2)
Conduct every five years a review of the program approval standards, including
the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of
preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates((.));

(3)
Investigate the character of the work required to be performed as a condition
of entrance to and graduation from any institution of higher education in this
state relative to such certification as provided for in subsection (1) ((above))
of this section, and prepare a list of accredited institutions of higher
education of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded such
certificates((.));

(4)(a)
The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a teacher certification
candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher preparation program requirements through
work experience as a classified teacher's aide in a public school or private
school meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include,
but are not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher preparation
candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations based on the amount
of work experience that may apply toward teacher preparation program
requirements under this chapter((.));

(b)
The state board of education shall require that at the time of the individual's
enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the supervising teacher and the
building principal shall jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of
the higher education institution at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written
assessment of the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall
contain such information as determined by the state board of education and
shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's work as
a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities with
children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and that the candidate
worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the type of
work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the
candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should be
substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance with
such rules as may be established by the state board of education under this section,
the teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution where the
candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what teacher
preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work
experience((.));

(5)
Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1)
((above)) of this section and specify the types and kinds of
certificates necessary for the several departments of the common schools by
rule ((or regulation in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.));

(6)
Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be
established by the state board of education, all schools that apply for
accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010,
private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved
that operates a kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or
private schools shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as
secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require all or
certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and participate in
such preaccreditation examination and evaluation processes as may now or
hereafter be established by the board((.));

(7)
Establish, publish, and enforce rules determining eligibility for and
certification of personnel employed in the common schools of this state,
including certification for emergency or temporary, substitute, or provisional
duty and under such certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or
as otherwise prescribed by law. The rules shall require that the initial application
for certification shall require a record check of the applicant through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal
bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The superintendent of public instruction may
waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the
two years before application;

(8)
In establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of
American sign language, consult with the national association of the deaf,
"sign instructors guidance network" (s.i.g.n.), and the Washington
state association of the deaf for evaluation and certification of sign language
instructors;

(9)
Make rules ((and regulations)) governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new grades in
grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are
established the district must obtain prior approval of the state board((.));

(((8)))
(10) Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the board
shall deem necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general government of
the common schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of attendance, prevent
truancy, secure efficiency, and promote the true interest of the common
schools((.));

(((9)))
(11) Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce ((regulations))
rules within the common schools so as to meet the educational needs of
students and articulate with the institutions of higher education and unify the
work of the public school system((.));

(((10)))
(12) Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization and
reorganization of school districts under RCW 28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680 (as
recodified by this act) and 28A.315.900((.));

(((11)))
(13) By rule ((or regulation promulgated)) adopted upon
the advice of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of
fire protection, provide for instruction of pupils in the public and private
schools carrying out a K through 12 program, or any part thereof, so that in
case of sudden emergency they shall be able to leave their particular school
building in the shortest possible time or take such other steps as the
particular emergency demands, and without confusion or panic; such rules ((and
regulations)) shall be published and distributed to certificated personnel
throughout the state whose duties shall include a familiarization therewith as
well as the means of implementation thereof at their particular school((.));
and

(((12)))
(14) Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.

The
state board of education ((is given the authority to promulgate)) may
adopt information and rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for
purposes of curriculum use in the common schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.350

RCW
28A.315.380

RCW
28A.315.390

RCW
28A.315.400

RCW
28A.315.410

RCW
28A.315.420

RCW
28A.315.430

RCW
28A.315.440

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.450

RCW
28A.315.650

RCW
28A.315.470

RCW
28A.315.480

RCW
28A.315.490

RCW
28A.315.500

RCW
28A.315.530

RCW
28A.315.510

RCW
28A.315.540

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.570

RCW
28A.315.460

RCW
28A.315.600

RCW
28A.315.610

RCW
28A.315.620

RCW
28A.315.630

RCW
28A.315.670

RCW
28A.315.680

RCW
28A.315.550

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
following sections are each recodified as a new chapter in Title 28A RCW:

RCW
28A.315.560

RCW
28A.315.580

RCW
28A.315.590

RCW
28A.315.593

RCW
28A.315.660

RCW
28A.315.597

RCW
28A.315.640

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
28A.04.172 (Post-baccalaureate professional teacher preparation
program‑-Masters degree‑-Implementation‑-Standards) and 1987
c 525 s 214;

(2) RCW
28A.410.010 (Certification--State board duty--Rules and
regulations--Record check--Superintendent of public instruction as
administrator) and 1992 c 159 s 3 & 1992 c 60 s 2; and

(3) RCW
28A.410.013 (Teacher assessment for certification--Study--Report to
the legislature) and 1995 c 222 s 1.

---
END ---