BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.09.240 and 1996 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person other than a parent, if the person is related to a child through
consanguinity, marriage, or adoption, may petition the court for visitation
with ((a)) the child at any time or may intervene in a pending
dissolution, legal separation, or modification of parenting plan proceeding.
((A)) The person ((other than a parent)) may not petition
for visitation under this section unless the child's parent or parents have
commenced an action under this chapter.

(2)
((A)) The petition for visitation ((with a child by a person
other than a parent)) must be filed in the county in which the child
resides.

(3)
((A petition for visitation or a motion to intervene pursuant to this
section shall be dismissed unless the petitioner or intervenor can demonstrate
by clear and convincing evidence that a significant relationship exists with
the child with whom visitation is sought. If the petition or motion is
dismissed for failure to establish the existence of a significant relationship,
the petitioner or intervenor shall be ordered to pay reasonable attorney's fees
and costs to the parent, parents, other custodian, or representative of the
child who responds to this petition or motion.

(4))) The
court may order visitation between the petitioner or intervenor and the child
((between whom a significant relationship exists upon a finding supported by
the evidence that the visitation is in the child's best interests.

(5)(a)
Visitation with a grandparent shall be presumed to be in the child's best
interests when a significant relationship has been shown to exist. This
presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of evidence showing that
visitation would endanger the child's physical, mental, or emotional health.

(b)
If the court finds that reasonable visitation by a grandparent would be in the
child's best interest except for hostilities that exist between the grandparent
and one or both of the parents or person with whom the child lives, the court
may set the matter for mediation under RCW 26.09.015.

(6))) if
the petitioner or intervenor has demonstrated by clear, cogent, and convincing
evidence that:

(a)
A significant relationship exists with the child with whom visitation is
sought;

(b)
Denial of visitation would result in a substantial likelihood of harm to the
child's physical, mental, or emotional well-being; and

(c)
Visitation is in the child's best interests.

If
the petition or motion is dismissed, the petitioner or intervenor shall be
ordered to pay reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the parent, parents, other
custodian, or representative of the child who responds to the petition or
motion.

(4)
The court may consider the following factors when making a determination of the
child's best interests:

(a)
The strength of the relationship between the child and the petitioner or
intervenor;

(b)
The relationship between each of the child's parents or the person with whom
the child is residing and the petitioner or intervenor;

(c)
The nature and reason for either parent's objection to granting the petitioner or
intervenor visitation;

(d)
The effect that granting visitation will have on the relationship between the
child and the child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing;

(e)
The residential time-sharing arrangements between the parents;

(f)
The good faith of the petitioner or intervenor;

(g)
Any criminal history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or
neglect by the petitioner or intervenor; and

(h)
Any other factor relevant to the child's best interest.

(((7)))
(5) The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191 that apply to parents shall be
applied to a petitioner or intervenor who is not a parent, but who is
related to the child through consanguinity, marriage, or adoption. The
nature and extent of visitation, subject to these restrictions, is in the
discretion of the court.

(((8)))
(6) The court may order an investigation and report concerning the
proposed visitation or may appoint a guardian ad litem as provided in RCW
26.09.220.

(((9)))
(7) Visitation granted ((pursuant to)) under this section
shall be incorporated into the parenting plan for the child. If the court
grants visitation under this section, the court shall ensure that the
visitation time granted is divided between the primary residential parent and
the nonprimary residential parent in an amount proportionate to the time
awarded each parent under the parenting plan, unless such arrangement is found
by the court not to be in the best interest of the child in maintaining contact
with both parents.

(((10)))
(8) The court may modify or terminate an order granting
visitation ((rights granted pursuant to)) under this section in
any subsequent modification action upon a showing that the visitation is no
longer in the best interest of the child.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.10.160 and 1996 c 303 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A parent not granted custody of the child is entitled to reasonable visitation
rights except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a)
Visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found that the parent
seeking visitation has engaged in any of the following conduct: (i) Willful
abandonment that continues for an extended period of time or substantial
refusal to perform parenting functions; (ii) physical, sexual, or a pattern of
emotional abuse of a child; (iii) a history of acts of domestic violence as
defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an assault or sexual assault which causes
grievous bodily harm or the fear of such harm; or (iv) the parent has been
convicted as an adult of a sex offense under:

(A)
RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(B)
RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(C)
RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this subsection;

(D)
RCW 9A.44.089;

(E)
RCW 9A.44.093;

(F)
RCW 9A.44.096;

(G)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (d) of this
subsection;

(H)
Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A)
through (H) of this subsection;

(J)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (a)(iv)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This
subsection (2)(a) shall not apply when (c) or (d) of this subsection applies.

(b)
The parent's visitation with the child shall be limited if it is found that the
parent resides with a person who has engaged in any of the following conduct:
(i) Physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of a child; (ii) a
history of acts of domestic violence as defined in RCW 26.50.010(1) or an
assault or sexual assault that causes grievous bodily harm or the fear of such
harm; or (iii) the person has been convicted as an adult or as a juvenile has
been adjudicated of a sex offense under:

(A)
RCW 9A.44.076 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(B)
RCW 9A.44.079 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(C)
RCW 9A.44.086 if, because of the difference in age between the offender and the
victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this subsection;

(D)
RCW 9A.44.089;

(E)
RCW 9A.44.093;

(F)
RCW 9A.44.096;

(G)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2) if, because of the difference in age between the
offender and the victim, no rebuttable presumption exists under (e) of this
subsection;

(H)
Chapter 9.68A RCW;

(I)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A)
through (H) of this subsection;

(J)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (b)(iii)(A) through (H) of this subsection.

This
subsection (2)(b) shall not apply when (c) or (e) of this subsection applies.

(c)
If a parent has been found to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or
under an analogous statute of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain
the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise be allowed under this
chapter. If a parent resides with an adult or a juvenile who has been found
to be a sexual predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or under an analogous statute
of any other jurisdiction, the court shall restrain the parent from contact
with the parent's child except contact that occurs outside that person's
presence.

(d)
There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who has been convicted as an
adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of this subsection poses a
present danger to a child. Unless the parent rebuts this presumption, the
court shall restrain the parent from contact with a child that would otherwise
be allowed under this chapter:

(i)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five
years older than the other person;

(ii)
RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii)
RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(iv)
RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(v)
RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi)
RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(vii)
RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (d)(i) through
(vii) of this subsection;

(ix)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (d)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(e)
There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent who resides with a person who,
as an adult, has been convicted, or as a juvenile has been adjudicated, of the
sex offenses listed in (e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection places a child at
risk of abuse or harm when that parent exercises visitation in the presence of
the convicted or adjudicated person. Unless the parent rebuts the presumption,
the court shall restrain the parent from contact with the parent's child except
for contact that occurs outside of the convicted or adjudicated person's
presence:

(i)
RCW 9A.64.020 (1) or (2), provided that the person convicted was at least five
years older than the other person;

(ii)
RCW 9A.44.073;

(iii)
RCW 9A.44.076, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(iv)
RCW 9A.44.079, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(v)
RCW 9A.44.083;

(vi)
RCW 9A.44.086, provided that the person convicted was at least eight years
older than the victim;

(vii)
RCW 9A.44.100;

(viii)
Any predecessor or antecedent statute for the offenses listed in (e)(i) through
(vii) of this subsection;

(ix)
Any statute from any other jurisdiction that describes an offense analogous to
the offenses listed in (e)(i) through (vii) of this subsection.

(f)
The presumption established in (d) of this subsection may be rebutted only
after a written finding that:

(i)
If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent
requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent
is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, and (B) the offending
parent has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in
and making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii)
If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by the parent
requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child and the offending parent
is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or
has been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes
such contact between the child and the offending parent is in the child's best
interest, and (C) the offending parent has successfully engaged in treatment
for sex offenders or is engaged in and making progress in such treatment, if
any was ordered by a court, and the treatment provider believes such contact is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child.

(g)
The presumption established in (e) of this subsection may be rebutted only
after a written finding that:

(i)
If the child was not the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who
is residing with the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the
child and the parent residing with the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and that parent is able to protect the child in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person, and (B) the convicted or adjudicated person
has successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and
making progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the
treatment provider believes such contact is appropriate and poses minimal risk
to the child; or

(ii)
If the child was the victim of the sex offense committed by the person who is
residing with the parent requesting visitation, (A) contact between the child
and the parent in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is
appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, (B) if the child is in or has
been in therapy for victims of sexual abuse, the child's counselor believes such
contact between the child and the parent residing with the convicted or
adjudicated person in the presence of the convicted or adjudicated person is in
the child's best interest, and (C) the convicted or adjudicated person has
successfully engaged in treatment for sex offenders or is engaged in and making
progress in such treatment, if any was ordered by a court, and the treatment
provider believes contact between the parent and child in the presence of the
convicted or adjudicated person is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the
child.

(h)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (f) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent who has
been convicted as an adult of a sex offense listed in (d)(i) through (ix) of
this subsection to have visitation with the child supervised by a neutral and
independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such
visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between
the child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that
the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer
willing or capable of protecting the child.

(i)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing
with a person who has been adjudicated as a juvenile of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence of the person adjudicated as a juvenile, supervised by a neutral and
independent adult and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such
visitation. The court shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between
the child and the parent unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that
the supervisor is willing and capable of protecting the child from harm. The
court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the
evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer
willing or capable of protecting the child.

(j)
If the court finds that the parent has met the burden of rebutting the
presumption under (g) of this subsection, the court may allow a parent residing
with a person who, as an adult, has been convicted of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection to have visitation with the child in the
presence of the convicted person supervised by a neutral and independent adult
and pursuant to an adequate plan for supervision of such visitation. The court
shall not approve of a supervisor for contact between the child and the parent
unless the court finds, based on the evidence, that the supervisor is willing
and capable of protecting the child from harm. The court shall revoke court
approval of the supervisor upon finding, based on the evidence, that the
supervisor has failed to protect the child or is no longer willing or capable
of protecting the child.

(k)
A court shall not order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a
child of the offending parent who was sexually abused by that parent. A court
may order unsupervised contact between the offending parent and a child who was
not sexually abused by the parent after the presumption under (d) of this
subsection has been rebutted and supervised visitation has occurred for at
least two years with no further arrests or convictions of sex offenses
involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or chapter 9.68A RCW
and (i) the sex offense of the offending parent was not committed against a
child of the offending parent, and (ii) the court finds that unsupervised
contact between the child and the offending parent is appropriate and poses
minimal risk to the child, after consideration of the testimony of a
state-certified therapist, mental health counselor, or social worker with
expertise in treating child sexual abuse victims who has supervised at least
one period of visitation between the parent and the child, and after
consideration of evidence of the offending parent's compliance with community
supervision requirements, if any. If the offending parent was not ordered by a
court to participate in treatment for sex offenders, then the parent shall
obtain a psychosexual evaluation conducted by a state-certified sex offender
treatment provider indicating that the offender has the lowest likelihood of
risk to reoffend before the court grants unsupervised contact between the
parent and a child.

(l)
A court may order unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may
occur in the presence of a juvenile adjudicated of a sex offense listed in
(e)(i) through (ix) of this subsection who resides with the parent after the
presumption under (e) of this subsection has been rebutted and supervised
visitation has occurred for at least two years during which time the
adjudicated juvenile has had no further arrests, adjudications, or convictions
of sex offenses involving children under chapter 9A.44 RCW, RCW 9A.64.020, or
chapter 9.68A RCW, and (i) the court finds that unsupervised contact between
the child and the parent that may occur in the presence of the adjudicated
juvenile is appropriate and poses minimal risk to the child, after
consideration of the testimony of a state-certified therapist, mental health
counselor, or social worker with expertise in treatment of child sexual abuse
victims who has supervised at least one period of visitation between the parent
and the child in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile, and after
consideration of evidence of the adjudicated juvenile's compliance with
community supervision or parole requirements, if any. If the adjudicated
juvenile was not ordered by a court to participate in treatment for sex
offenders, then the adjudicated juvenile shall obtain a psychosexual evaluation
conducted by a state-certified sex offender treatment provider indicating that
the adjudicated juvenile has the lowest likelihood of risk to reoffend before
the court grants unsupervised contact between the parent and a child which may
occur in the presence of the adjudicated juvenile who is residing with the
parent.

(m)(i)
The limitations imposed by the court under (a) or (b) of this subsection shall
be reasonably calculated to protect the child from the physical, sexual, or
emotional abuse or harm that could result if the child has contact with the
parent requesting visitation. If the court expressly finds based on the
evidence that limitations on visitation with the child will not adequately
protect the child from the harm or abuse that could result if the child has
contact with the parent requesting visitation, the court shall restrain the
person seeking visitation from all contact with the child.

(ii)
The court shall not enter an order under (a) of this subsection allowing a
parent to have contact with a child if the parent has been found by clear and
convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the evidence in
a dependency action to have sexually abused the child, except upon
recommendation by an evaluator or therapist for the child that the child is
ready for contact with the parent and will not be harmed by the contact. The court
shall not enter an order allowing a parent to have contact with the child in
the offender's presence if the parent resides with a person who has been found
by clear and convincing evidence in a civil action or by a preponderance of the
evidence in a dependency action to have sexually abused a child, unless the
court finds that the parent accepts that the person engaged in the harmful
conduct and the parent is willing to and capable of protecting the child from
harm from the person.

(iii)
If the court limits visitation under (a) or (b) of this subsection to require
supervised contact between the child and the parent, the court shall not
approve of a supervisor for contact between a child and a parent who has
engaged in physical, sexual, or a pattern of emotional abuse of the child
unless the court finds based upon the evidence that the supervisor accepts that
the harmful conduct occurred and is willing to and capable of protecting the
child from harm. The court shall revoke court approval of the supervisor upon
finding, based on the evidence, that the supervisor has failed to protect the
child or is no longer willing to or capable of protecting the child.

(n)
If the court expressly finds based on the evidence that contact between the
parent and the child will not cause physical, sexual, or emotional abuse or
harm to the child and that the probability that the parent's or other person's
harmful or abusive conduct will recur is so remote that it would not be in the
child's best interests to apply the limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and
(iii) of this subsection, or if the court expressly finds that the parent's
conduct did not have an impact on the child, then the court need not apply the
limitations of (a), (b), and (m)(i) and (iii) of this subsection. The weight
given to the existence of a protection order issued under chapter 26.50 RCW as
to domestic violence is within the discretion of the court. This subsection
shall not apply when (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), (j), (k), (l), and
(m)(ii) of this subsection apply.

(3)(a)
Any person who is related to a child through consanguinity, marriage, or
adoption may petition the court for visitation ((rights)) with
the child at any time including, but not limited to, custody proceedings.
The court may order visitation ((rights for any person when visitation may
serve the best interest of the child)) between the petitioner and the
child whether or not there has been any change of circumstances if the
petitioner has demonstrated by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that:

(i)
A significant relationship exists with the child with whom visitation is
sought;

(ii)
Denial of visitation would result in a substantial likelihood of harm to the
child's physical, mental, or emotional well-being; and

(iii)
Visitation is in the child's best interests.

If
the petition is dismissed, the petitioner shall be ordered to pay reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs to the parent, parents, other custodian, or
representative of the child who responds to the petition.

(((4)))
(b) The court may consider the following factors when making a determination
of the child's best interests:

(i)
The strength of the relationship between the child and the petitioner;

(ii)
The relationship between each of the child's parents or the person with whom
the child is residing and the petitioner;

(iii)
The nature and reason for either parent's objection to granting the petitioner
visitation;

(iv)
The effect that granting visitation will have on the relationship between the
child and the child's parents or the person with whom the child is residing;

(v)
The residential time-sharing arrangements between the parents;

(vi)
The good faith of the petitioner;

(vii)
Any criminal history or history of physical, emotional, or sexual abuse or
neglect by the petitioner; and

(viii)
Any other factor relevant to the child's best interest.

(c)
The restrictions of RCW 26.09.191 that apply to parents shall be applied to a
petitioner or intervenor who is not a parent, but who is related to the child
through consanguinity, marriage, or adoption. The nature and extent of
visitation, subject to these restrictions, is in the discretion of the court.

(4)
Visitation granted under this section shall be incorporated into the parenting
plan for the child. If the court grants visitation under this section, the
court shall ensure that the visitation time granted is divided between the
primary residential parent and the nonprimary residential parent in an amount
proportionate to the time awarded each parent under the parenting plan, unless
such arrangement is found by the court not to be in the best interest of the
child in maintaining contact with both parents.

(5)
The court may modify or terminate an order granting ((or denying))
visitation rights whenever modification or termination would serve the
best interests of the child. Modification of a parent's visitation rights
shall be subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(((5)))
(6) For the purposes of this section, a parent's child means that
parent's natural child, adopted child, or stepchild.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---