BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.030 and 1993 c 252 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and
phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Air contaminant" means dust, fumes, mist, smoke, other particulate
matter, vapor, gas, odorous substance, or any combination thereof.

(2)
"Air pollution" is presence in the outdoor atmosphere of one or more
air contaminants in sufficient quantities and of such characteristics and
duration as is, or is likely to be, injurious to human health, plant or animal
life, or property, or which unreasonably interfere with enjoyment of life and
property. For the purpose of this chapter, air pollution shall not include air
contaminants emitted in compliance with chapter 17.21 RCW.

(3)
"Air quality standard" means an established concentration, exposure
time, and frequency of occurrence of an air contaminant or multiple
contaminants in the ambient air which shall not be exceeded.

(4)
"Ambient air" means the surrounding outside air.

(5)
"Authority" means any air pollution control agency whose
jurisdictional boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of one or more
counties.

(6)
"Best available control technology" (BACT) means an emission
limitation based on the maximum degree of reduction for each air pollutant
subject to regulation under this chapter emitted from or that results from any
new or modified stationary source, that the permitting authority, on a
case-by-case basis, taking into account energy, environmental, and economic
impacts and other costs, determines is achievable for such a source or
modification through application of production processes and available methods,
systems, and techniques, including fuel cleaning, clean fuels, or treatment or
innovative fuel combustion techniques for control of each such a pollutant. In
no event shall application of "best available control technology"
result in emissions of any pollutants that will exceed the emissions allowed by
any applicable standard under 40 C.F.R. Part 60 and Part 61, as they exist on
July 25, 1993, or their later enactments as adopted by reference by the
director by rule. Emissions from any source utilizing clean fuels, or any
other means, to comply with this subsection shall not be allowed to increase
above levels that would have been required under the definition of BACT as it
existed prior to enactment of the [federal] clean air act amendments of 1990.

(7)
"Best available retrofit technology" (BART) means an emission
limitation based on the degree of reduction achievable through the application
of the best system of continuous emission reduction for each pollutant that is
emitted by an existing stationary facility. The emission limitation must be
established, on a case-by-case basis, taking into consideration the technology
available, the costs of compliance, the energy and nonair quality environmental
impacts of compliance, any pollution control equipment in use or in existence
at the source, the remaining useful life of the source, and the degree of
improvement in visibility that might reasonably be anticipated to result from
the use of the technology.

(8)
"Board" means the board of directors of an authority.

(9)
"Control officer" means the air pollution control officer of any
authority.

(10)
"Department" or "ecology" means the department of ecology.

(11)
"Emission" means a release of air contaminants into the ambient air.

(12)
"Emission standard" and "emission limitation" mean a
requirement established under the federal clean air act or this chapter that
limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air contaminants on
a continuous basis, including any requirement relating to the operation or
maintenance of a source to assure continuous emission reduction, and any
design, equipment, work practice, or operational standard adopted under the
federal clean air act or this chapter.

(13)
"Fiscal growth factor" has the meaning in RCW 43.135.025.

(14)
"Lowest achievable emission rate" (LAER) means for any source that
rate of emissions that reflects:

(a)
The most stringent emission limitation that is contained in the implementation
plan of any state for such class or category of source, unless the owner or
operator of the proposed source demonstrates that such limitations are not
achievable; or

(b)
The most stringent emission limitation that is achieved in practice by such
class or category of source, whichever is more stringent.

In
no event shall the application of this term permit a proposed new or modified
source to emit any pollutant in excess of the amount allowable under applicable
new source performance standards.

(((14)))
(15) "Modification" means any physical change in, or change in
the method of operation of, a stationary source that increases the amount of
any air contaminant emitted by such source or that results in the emission of
any air contaminant not previously emitted. The term modification shall be
construed consistent with the definition of modification in Section 7411, Title
42, United States Code, and with rules implementing that section.

(((15)))
(16) "Multicounty authority" means an authority which consists
of two or more counties.

(((16)))
(17) "New source" means (a) the construction or modification
of a stationary source that increases the amount of any air contaminant emitted
by such source or that results in the emission of any air contaminant not
previously emitted, and (b) any other project that constitutes a new source
under the federal clean air act.

(((17)))
(18) "Permit program source" means a source required to apply
for or to maintain an operating permit under RCW 70.94.161.

(((18)))
(19) "Person" means an individual, firm, public or private
corporation, association, partnership, political subdivision of the state,
municipality, or governmental agency.

(((19)))
(20) "Reasonably available control technology" (RACT) means
the lowest emission limit that a particular source or source category is
capable of meeting by the application of control technology that is reasonably
available considering technological and economic feasibility. RACT is
determined on a case-by-case basis for an individual source or source category
taking into account the impact of the source upon air quality, the availability
of additional controls, the emission reduction to be achieved by additional
controls, the impact of additional controls on air quality, and the capital and
operating costs of the additional controls. RACT requirements for a source or
source category shall be adopted only after notice and opportunity for comment
are afforded.

(((20)))
(21) "Silvicultural burning" means burning of wood fiber on
forest land consistent with the provisions of RCW 70.94.660.

(((21)))
(22) "Source" means all of the emissions units including quantifiable
fugitive emissions, that are located on one or more contiguous or adjacent
properties, and are under the control of the same person, or persons under
common control, whose activities are ancillary to the production of a single
product or functionally related group of products.

(((22)))
(23) "Stationary source" means any building, structure,
facility, or installation that emits or may emit any air contaminant.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.94.151 and 1997 c 410 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board of any activated authority or the department, may classify air
contaminant sources, by ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation, which in its
judgment may cause or contribute to air pollution, according to levels and types
of emissions and other characteristics which cause or contribute to air
pollution, and may require registration or reporting or both for any such class
or classes. Classifications made pursuant to this section may be for
application to the area of jurisdiction of such authority, or the state as a
whole or to any designated area within the jurisdiction, and shall be made with
special reference to effects on health, economic and social factors, and
physical effects on property.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, any person operating or
responsible for the operation of air contaminant sources of any class for which
the ordinances, resolutions, rules or regulations of the department or board of
the authority, require registration and reporting shall register therewith and
make reports containing information as may be required by such department or
board concerning location, size and height of contaminant outlets, processes
employed, nature of the contaminant emission and such other information as is
relevant to air pollution and available or reasonably capable of being
assembled. The department or board may require that such registration be
accompanied by a fee and may determine the amount of such fee for such class or
classes: PROVIDED, That the amount of the fee may only be increased in any
given fiscal year up to the percent authorized under the fiscal growth factor
for the preceding fiscal year and shall only be to compensate for the costs
of administering such registration program which shall be defined as initial
registration and annual or other periodic reports from the source owner
providing information directly related to air pollution registration, on-site
inspections necessary to verify compliance with registration requirements, data
storage and retrieval systems necessary for support of the registration
program, emission inventory reports and emission reduction credits computed
from information provided by sources pursuant to registration program
requirements, staff review, including engineering analysis for accuracy and
currentness, of information provided by sources pursuant to registration
program requirements, clerical and other office support provided in direct
furtherance of the registration program, and administrative support provided in
directly carrying out the registration program: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
such registration made with either the board or the department shall preclude a
further registration with any other board or the department.

All
registration program fees collected by the department shall be deposited in the
air pollution control account. All registration program fees collected by the
local air authorities shall be deposited in their respective treasuries.

(3)
If a registration or report has been filed for a grain warehouse or grain
elevator as required under this section, registration, reporting, or a
registration program fee shall not, after January 1, 1997, again be required
under this section for the warehouse or elevator unless the capacity of the
warehouse or elevator as listed as part of the license issued for the facility
has been increased since the date the registration or reporting was last made.
If the capacity of the warehouse or elevator listed as part of the license is
increased, any registration or reporting required for the warehouse or elevator
under this section must be made by the date the warehouse or elevator receives
grain from the first harvest season that occurs after the increase in its
capacity is listed in the license.

For
the purposes of this subsection, a "grain warehouse" or "grain
elevator" is an establishment classified in standard industrial
classification (SIC) code 5153 for wholesale trade; and a "license"
is a license issued by the department of agriculture licensing a facility as a
grain warehouse or grain elevator under chapter 22.09 RCW or a license issued
by the federal government licensing a facility as a grain warehouse or grain
elevator for purposes similar to those of licensure for the facility under chapter
22.09 RCW.

This
subsection does not apply to a grain warehouse or grain elevator if the
warehouse or elevator handles more than ten million bushels of grain annually.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.94.152 and 1996 c 67 s 1 and 1996 c 29 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to
read as follows:

(1)
The department of ecology or board of any authority may require notice of the
establishment of any proposed new sources except single family and duplex
dwellings or de minimis new sources as defined in rules adopted under
subsection (11) of this section. The department of ecology or board may
require such notice to be accompanied by a fee and determine the amount of such
fee: PROVIDED, That the amount of the fee may only be increased in any given
fiscal year up to the percent authorized under the fiscal growth factor for the
preceding fiscal year and may not exceed the cost of reviewing the plans,
specifications, and other information and administering such notice: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That any such notice given or notice of construction application
submitted to either the board or to the department of ecology shall preclude a
further submittal of a duplicate application to any board or to the department
of ecology.

(2)
The department shall, after opportunity for public review and comment, adopt
rules that establish a workload-driven process for determination and review of
the fee covering the direct and indirect costs of processing a notice of
construction application and a methodology for tracking revenues and
expenditures. All new source fees collected by the delegated local air
authorities from sources shall be deposited in the dedicated accounts of their
respective treasuries. All new source fees collected by the department from
sources shall be deposited in the air pollution control account.

(3)
Within thirty days of receipt of a notice of construction application, the
department of ecology or board may require, as a condition precedent to the
establishment of the new source or sources covered thereby, the submission of
plans, specifications, and such other information as it deems necessary to
determine whether the proposed new source will be in accord with applicable
rules and regulations in force under this chapter. If on the basis of plans,
specifications, or other information required under this section the department
of ecology or board determines that the proposed new source will not be in
accord with this chapter or the applicable ordinances, resolutions, rules, and
regulations adopted under this chapter, it shall issue an order denying
permission to establish the new source. If on the basis of plans,
specifications, or other information required under this section, the
department of ecology or board determines that the proposed new source will be
in accord with this chapter, and the applicable rules and regulations adopted
under this chapter, it shall issue an order of approval for the establishment
of the new source or sources, which order may provide such conditions as are
reasonably necessary to assure the maintenance of compliance with this chapter
and the applicable rules and regulations adopted under this chapter. Every
order of approval under this chapter must be reviewed prior to issuance by a
professional engineer or staff under the supervision of a professional engineer
in the employ of the department of ecology or board.

(4)
The determination required under subsection (3) of this section shall include a
determination of whether the operation of the new air contaminant source at the
location proposed will cause any ambient air quality standard to be exceeded.

(5)
New source review of a modification shall be limited to the emission unit or
units proposed to be modified and the air contaminants whose emissions would
increase as a result of the modification.

(6)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the department of
ecology or board to require the use of emission control equipment or other
equipment, machinery, or devices of any particular type, from any particular
supplier, or produced by any particular manufacturer.

(7)
Any features, machines, and devices constituting parts of or called for by
plans, specifications, or other information submitted pursuant to subsection
(1) or (3) of this section shall be maintained and operate in good working
order.

(8)
The absence of an ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation, or the failure to
issue an order pursuant to this section shall not relieve any person from his
or her obligation to comply with applicable emission control requirements or
with any other provision of law.

(9)
Within thirty days of receipt of a notice of construction application the
department of ecology or board shall either notify the applicant in writing
that the application is complete or notify the applicant in writing of all
additional information necessary to complete the application. Within sixty
days of receipt of a complete application the department or board shall either
(a) issue a final decision on the application, or (b) for those projects
subject to public notice, initiate notice and comment on a proposed decision,
followed as promptly as possible by a final decision. A person seeking
approval to construct or modify a source that requires an operating permit may
elect to integrate review of the operating permit application or amendment
required by RCW 70.94.161 and the notice of construction application required
by this section. A notice of construction application designated for
integrated review shall be processed in accordance with operating permit
program procedures and deadlines.

(10)
A notice of construction approval required under subsection (3) of this section
shall include a determination that the new source will achieve best available
control technology. If more stringent controls are required under federal law,
the notice of construction shall include a determination that the new source
will achieve the more stringent federal requirements. Nothing in this
subsection is intended to diminish other state authorities under this chapter.

(11)
No person is required to submit a notice of construction or receive approval
for a new source that is deemed by the department of ecology or board to have
de minimis impact on air quality. The department of ecology shall adopt and
periodically update rules identifying categories of de minimis new sources.
The department of ecology may identify de minimus new sources by category,
size, or emission thresholds.

(12)
For purposes of this section, "de minimus new sources" means new
sources with trivial levels of emissions that do not pose a threat to human
health or the environment.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.94.154 and 1996 c 29 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
RACT as defined in RCW 70.94.030 is required for existing sources except as
otherwise provided in RCW 70.94.331(9).

(2)
RACT for each source category containing three or more sources shall be
determined by rule except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
Source-specific RACT determinations may be performed under any of the following
circumstances:

(a)
As authorized by RCW 70.94.153;

(b)
When required by the federal clean air act;

(c)
For sources in source categories containing fewer than three sources;

(d)
When an air quality problem, for which the source is a contributor, justifies a
source-specific RACT determination prior to development of a categorical RACT
rule; or

(e)
When a source-specific RACT determination is needed to address either specific
air quality problems for which the source is a significant contributor or
source-specific economic concerns.

(4)
By January 1, 1994, ecology shall develop a list of sources and source
categories requiring RACT review and a schedule for conducting that review.
Ecology shall review the list and schedule within six months of receiving the
initial operating permit applications and at least once every five years
thereafter. In developing the list to determine the schedule of RACT review,
ecology shall consider emission reductions achievable through the use of new
available technologies and the impacts of those incremental reductions on air
quality, the remaining useful life of previously installed control equipment,
the impact of the source or source category on air quality, the number of years
since the last BACT, RACT, or LAER determination for that source and other
relevant factors. Prior to finalizing the list and schedule, ecology shall
consult with local air authorities, the regulated community, environmental
groups, and other interested individuals and organizations. The department and
local authorities shall revise RACT requirements, as needed, based on the
review conducted under this subsection.

(5)
In determining RACT, ecology and local authorities shall utilize the factors
set forth in RCW 70.94.030 and shall consider RACT determinations and guidance
made by the federal environmental protection agency, other states and local
authorities for similar sources, and other relevant factors. In establishing
or revising RACT requirements, ecology and local authorities shall address,
where practicable, all air contaminants deemed to be of concern for that source
or source category.

(6)
Emission standards and other requirements contained in rules or regulatory
orders in effect at the time of operating permit issuance or renewal shall be
considered RACT for purposes of permit issuance or renewal. RACT
determinations under subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be
incorporated into operating permits as provided in RCW 70.94.161 and rules
implementing that section.

(7)
The department and local air authorities are authorized to assess and collect a
fee to cover the costs of developing, establishing, or reviewing categorical or
case-by-case RACT requirements. The fee shall apply to determinations of RACT
requirements as defined under this section and RCW 70.94.331(9). The amount of
the fee may not exceed the direct and indirect costs of establishing the
requirement for the particular source or the pro rata portion of the direct and
indirect costs of establishing the requirement for the relevant source category,
and may only be increased in any given fiscal year up to the percent authorized
under the fiscal growth factor for the preceding fiscal year. The
department shall, after opportunity for public review and comment, adopt rules
that establish a workload-driven process for determination and review of the
fee covering the direct and indirect costs of its RACT determinations and a
methodology for tracking revenues and expenditures. All such RACT
determination fees collected by the delegated local air authorities from
sources shall be deposited in the dedicated accounts of their respective
treasuries. All such RACT fees collected by the department from sources shall
be deposited in the air pollution control account.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.94.162 and 1998 c 245 s 129 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department and delegated local air authorities are authorized to determine,
assess, and collect, and each permit program source shall pay, annual fees
sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs of implementing a state
operating permit program approved by the United States environmental protection
agency under the federal clean air act. However, a source that receives its
operating permit from the United States environmental protection agency shall
not be considered a permit program source so long as the environmental
protection agency continues to act as the permitting authority for that
source. Each permitting authority shall develop by rule a fee schedule
allocating among its permit program sources the costs of the operating permit program,
and may, by rule, establish a payment schedule whereby periodic installments of
the annual fee are due and payable more frequently. Such fees may only be
increased in any given fiscal year up to the percent authorized under the
fiscal growth factor for the preceding fiscal year. All operating permit
program fees collected by the department shall be deposited in the air
operating permit account. All operating permit program fees collected by the
delegated local air authorities shall be deposited in their respective air
operating permit accounts or other accounts dedicated exclusively to support of
the operating permit program. The fees assessed under this subsection shall
first be due not less than forty-five days after the United States environmental
protection agency delegates to the department the authority to administer the
operating permit program and then annually thereafter.

The
department shall establish, by rule, procedures for administrative appeals to
the department regarding the fee assessed pursuant to this subsection.

(2)
The fee schedule developed by each permitting authority shall fully cover and
not exceed both its permit administration costs and the permitting authority's
share of state-wide program development and oversight costs.

(a)
Permit administration costs are those incurred by each permitting authority,
including the department, in administering and enforcing the operating permit
program with respect to sources under its jurisdiction. Costs associated with
the following activities are fee eligible as these activities relate to the
operating permit program and to the sources permitted by a permitting
authority, including, where applicable, sources subject to a general permit:

(i)
Preapplication assistance and review of an application and proposed compliance
plan for a permit, permit revision, or renewal;

(ii)
Source inspections, testing, and other data-gathering activities necessary for
the development of a permit, permit revision, or renewal;

(iii)
Acting on an application for a permit, permit revision, or renewal, including
the costs of developing an applicable requirement as part of the processing of
a permit, permit revision, or renewal, preparing a draft permit and fact sheet,
and preparing a final permit, but excluding the costs of developing BACT, LAER,
BART, or RACT requirements for criteria and toxic air pollutants;

(iv)
Notifying and soliciting, reviewing and responding to comment from the public
and contiguous states and tribes, conducting public hearings regarding the
issuance of a draft permit and other costs of providing information to the
public regarding operating permits and the permit issuance process;

(v)
Modeling necessary to establish permit limits or to determine compliance with
permit limits;

(vi)
Reviewing compliance certifications and emissions reports and conducting
related compilation and reporting activities;

(vii)
Conducting compliance inspections, complaint investigations, and other
activities necessary to ensure that a source is complying with permit
conditions;

(viii)
Administrative enforcement activities and penalty assessment, excluding the
costs of proceedings before the pollution control hearings board and all costs
of judicial enforcement;

(ix)
The share attributable to permitted sources of the development and maintenance
of emissions inventories;

(x)
The share attributable to permitted sources of ambient air quality monitoring
and associated recording and reporting activities;

(xi)
Training for permit administration and enforcement;

(xii)
Fee determination, assessment, and collection, including the costs of necessary
administrative dispute resolution and penalty collection;

(xiii)
Required fiscal audits, periodic performance audits, and reporting activities;

(xiv)
Tracking of time, revenues and expenditures, and accounting activities;

(xv)
Administering the permit program including the costs of clerical support,
supervision, and management;

(xvi)
Provision of assistance to small businesses under the jurisdiction of the
permitting authority as required under section 507 of the federal clean air
act; and

(xvii)
Other activities required by operating permit regulations issued by the United
States environmental protection agency under the federal clean air act.

(b)
Development and oversight costs are those incurred by the department in
developing and administering the state operating permit program, and in
overseeing the administration of the program by the delegated local permitting
authorities. Costs associated with the following activities are fee eligible
as these activities relate to the operating permit program:

(i)
Review and determinations necessary for delegation of authority to administer
and enforce a permit program to a local air authority under RCW 70.94.161(2)
and 70.94.860;

(ii)
Conducting fiscal audits and periodic performance audits of delegated local
authorities, and other oversight functions required by the operating permit
program;

(iii)
Administrative enforcement actions taken by the department on behalf of a
permitting authority, including those actions taken by the department under RCW
70.94.785, but excluding the costs of proceedings before the pollution control
hearings board and all costs of judicial enforcement;

(iv)
Determination and assessment with respect to each permitting authority of the
fees covering its share of the costs of development and oversight;

(v)
Training and assistance for permit program administration and oversight,
including training and assistance regarding technical, administrative, and data
management issues;

(vi)
Development of generally applicable regulations or guidance regarding the
permit program or its implementation or enforcement;

(vii)
State codification of federal rules or standards for inclusion in operating
permits;

(viii)
Preparation of delegation package and other activities associated with
submittal of the state permit program to the United States environmental
protection agency for approval, including ongoing coordination activities;

(ix)
General administration and coordination of the state permit program, related
support activities, and other agency indirect costs, including necessary data
management and quality assurance;

(x)
Required fiscal audits and periodic performance audits of the department, and
reporting activities;

(xi)
Tracking of time, revenues and expenditures, and accounting activities;

(xii)
Public education and outreach related to the operating permit program, including
the maintenance of a permit register;

(xiii)
The share attributable to permitted sources of compiling and maintaining
emissions inventories;

(xiv)
The share attributable to permitted sources of ambient air quality monitoring,
related technical support, and associated recording activities;

(xv)
The share attributable to permitted sources of modeling activities;

(xvi)
Provision of assistance to small business as required under section 507 of the
federal clean air act as it exists on July 25, 1993, or its later enactment as
adopted by reference by the director by rule;

(xvii)
Provision of services by the department of revenue and the office of the state
attorney general and other state agencies in support of permit program
administration;

(xviii)
A one-time revision to the state implementation plan to make those
administrative changes necessary to ensure coordination of the state
implementation plan and the operating permit program; and

(xix)
Other activities required by operating permit regulations issued by the United
States environmental protection agency under the federal clean air act.

(3)
The responsibility for operating permit fee determination, assessment, and
collection is to be shared by the department and delegated local air authorities
as follows:

(a)
Each permitting authority, including the department, acting in its capacity as
a permitting authority, shall develop a fee schedule and mechanism for
collecting fees from the permit program sources under its jurisdiction; the
fees collected by each authority shall be sufficient to cover its costs of
permit administration and its share of the department's costs of development
and oversight. Each delegated local authority shall remit to the department
its share of the department's development and oversight costs.

(b)
Only those local air authorities to whom the department has delegated the
authority to administer the program pursuant to RCW 70.94.161(2) (b) and (c)
and 70.94.860 shall have the authority to administer and collect operating
permit fees. The department shall retain the authority to administer and
collect such fees with respect to the sources within the jurisdiction of a
local air authority until the effective date of program delegation to that air
authority.

(c)
The department shall allocate its development and oversight costs among all
permitting authorities, including the department, in proportion to the number
of permit program sources under the jurisdiction of each authority, except that
extraordinary costs or other costs readily attributable to a specific
permitting authority may be assessed that authority. For purposes of this
subsection, all sources covered by a single general permit shall be treated as
one source.

(4)
The department and each delegated local air authority shall adopt by rule a
general permit fee schedule for sources under their respective jurisdictions
after such time as the department adopts provisions for general permit
issuance. Within ninety days of the time that the department adopts a general
permit fee schedule, the department shall report to the relevant standing
committees of the legislature regarding the general permit fee schedules
adopted by the department and by the delegated local air authorities. The
permit administration costs of each general permit shall be allocated equitably
among only those sources subject to that general permit. The share of
development and oversight costs attributable to each general permit shall be
determined pursuant to subsection (3)(c) of this section.

(5)
The fee schedule developed by the department shall allocate among the sources
for whom the department acts as a permitting authority, other than sources
subject to a general permit, those portions of the department's permit
administration costs and the department's share of the development and
oversight costs which the department does not plan to recover under its general
permit fee schedule or schedules as follows:

(a)
The department shall allocate its permit administration costs and its share of
the development and oversight costs not recovered through general permit fees
according to a three-tiered model based upon:

(i)
The number of permit program sources under its jurisdiction;

(ii)
The complexity of permit program sources under its jurisdiction; and

(iii)
The size of permit program sources under its jurisdiction, as measured by the
quantity of each regulated pollutant emitted by the source.

(b)
Each of the three tiers shall be equally weighted.

(c)
The department may, in addition, allocate activities-based costs readily
attributable to a specific source to that source under RCW 70.94.152(1) and
70.94.154(7).

The
quantity of each regulated pollutant emitted by a source shall be determined
based on the annual emissions during the most recent calendar year for which
data is available.

(6)
The department shall, after opportunity for public review and comment, adopt
rules that establish a process for development and review of its operating
permit program fee schedule, a methodology for tracking program revenues and
expenditures and, for both the department and the delegated local air
authorities, a system of fiscal audits, reports, and periodic performance
audits.

(a)
The fee schedule development and review process shall include the following:

(i)
The department shall conduct a biennial workload analysis. The department
shall provide the opportunity for public review of and comment on the workload
analysis. The department shall review and update its workload analysis during
each biennial budget cycle, taking into account information gathered by
tracking previous revenues, time, and expenditures and other information
obtained through fiscal audits and performance audits.

(ii)
The department shall prepare a biennial budget based upon the resource
requirements identified in the workload analysis for that biennium. In
preparing the budget, the department shall take into account the projected
operating permit account balance at the start of the biennium. The department
shall provide the opportunity for public review of and comment on the proposed
budget. The department shall review and update its budget each biennium.

(iii)
The department shall develop a fee schedule allocating the department's permit
administration costs and its share of the development and oversight costs among
the department's permit program sources using the methodology described in
subsection (5) of this section. The department shall provide the opportunity
for public review of and comment on the allocation methodology and fee
schedule. The department shall provide procedures for administrative
resolution of disputes regarding the source data on which allocation
determinations are based; these procedures shall be designed such that
resolution occurs prior to the completion of the allocation process. The
department shall review and update its fee schedule annually.

(b)
The methodology for tracking revenues and expenditures shall include the
following:

(i)
The department shall develop a system for tracking revenues and expenditures
that provides the maximum practicable information. At a minimum, revenues from
fees collected under the operating permit program shall be tracked on a
source-specific basis and time and expenditures required to administer the
program shall be tracked on the basis of source categories and functional
categories. Each general permit will be treated as a separate source category
for tracking and accounting purposes.

(ii)
The department shall use the information obtained from tracking revenues, time,
and expenditures to modify the workload analysis required in subsection (6)(a)
of this section.

(iii)
The information obtained from tracking revenues, time, and expenditures shall
not provide a basis for challenge to the amount of an individual source's fee.

(c)
The system of fiscal audits, reports, and periodic performance audits shall
include the following:

(i)
The department and the delegated local air authorities shall prepare annual
reports and shall submit the reports to, respectively, the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature and the board of directors of the local air
authority.

(ii)
The department shall arrange for fiscal audits and routine performance audits
and for periodic intensive performance audits of each permitting authority and
of the department.

(7)
Each local air authority requesting delegation shall, after opportunity for
public review and comment, publish regulations which establish a process for
development and review of its operating permit program fee schedule, and a
methodology for tracking its revenues and expenditures. These regulations
shall be submitted to the department for review and approval as part of the
local authority's delegation request.

(8)
As used in this section and in RCW 70.94.161(14), "regulated pollutant"
shall have the same meaning as defined in section 502(b) of the federal clean
air act as it exists on July 25, 1993, or its later enactment as adopted by
reference by the director by rule.

(9)
Fee structures as authorized under this section shall remain in effect until
such time as the legislature authorizes an alternative structure following
receipt of the report required by this subsection.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.94.650 and 1998 c 43 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who proposes to set fires in the course of:

(a)
Weed abatement;

(b)
Instruction in methods of fire fighting, except training to fight structural
fires as provided in RCW 52.12.150 or training to fight aircraft crash rescue
fires as provided in subsection (5) of this section, and except forest fire
training; or

(c)
Agricultural activities,

shall
obtain a permit from an air pollution control authority, the department of
ecology, or a local entity delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654.
General permit criteria of state-wide applicability shall be established by the
department, by rule, after consultation with the various air pollution control
authorities. Permits shall be issued under this section based on seasonal
operations or by individual operations, or both. All permits shall be
conditioned to insure that the public interest in air, water, and land
pollution and safety to life and property is fully considered. In addition to
any other requirements established by the department to protect air quality
pursuant to other laws, applicants for permits must show that the setting of
fires as requested is the most reasonable procedure to follow in safeguarding
life or property under all circumstances or is otherwise reasonably necessary
to successfully carry out the enterprise in which the applicant is engaged, or
both. All burning permits will be designed to minimize air pollution insofar
as practical. Nothing in this section shall relieve the applicant from
obtaining permits, licenses, or other approvals required by any other law. An
application for a permit to set fires in the course of agricultural burning for
controlling diseases, insects, weed abatement or development of physiological
conditions conducive to increased crop yield, shall be acted upon within seven
days from the date such application is filed. The department of ecology and
local air authorities shall provide convenient methods for issuance and
oversight of agricultural burning permits. The department and local air
authorities shall, through agreement, work with counties and cities to provide
convenient methods for granting permission for agricultural burning, including
telephone, facsimile transmission, issuance from local city or county offices,
or other methods. A local air authority administering the permit program under
this subsection (1)(c) shall not limit the number of days of allowable
agricultural burning, but may consider the time of year, meteorological
conditions, and other criteria specified in rules adopted by the department to
implement this subsection (1)(c).

(2)
Permit fees shall be assessed for burning under this section and shall be
collected by the department of ecology, the appropriate local air authority, or
a local entity delegated permitting authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.654 at the
time the permit is issued. All fees collected shall be deposited in the air
pollution control account created in RCW 70.94.015, except for that portion of
the fee necessary to cover local costs of administering a permit issued under
this section. Fees shall be set by rule by the permitting agency at the level
determined by the task force created by subsection (4) of this section, but
shall not exceed two dollars and fifty cents per acre to be burned. After fees
are established by rule, any increases in such fees shall be limited to ((annual
inflation adjustments as determined by the state office of the economic and
revenue forecast council)) the percent increase in the fiscal growth
factor for the preceding fiscal year.

(3)
Conservation districts and the Washington State University agricultural
extension program in conjunction with the department shall develop public
education material for the agricultural community identifying the health and
environmental effects of agricultural outdoor burning and providing technical
assistance in alternatives to agricultural outdoor burning.

(4)
An agricultural burning practices and research task force shall be established
under the direction of the department. The task force shall be composed of a
representative from the department who shall serve as chair; one representative
of eastern Washington local air authorities; three representatives of the
agricultural community from different agricultural pursuits; one representative
of the department of agriculture; two representatives from universities or
colleges knowledgeable in agricultural issues; one representative of the public
health or medical community; and one representative of the conservation
districts. The task force shall identify best management practices for
reducing air contaminant emissions from agricultural activities and provide
such information to the department and local air authorities. The task force
shall determine the level of fees to be assessed by the permitting agency
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, based upon the level necessary to
cover the costs of administering and enforcing the permit programs, to provide
funds for research into alternative methods to reduce emissions from such burning,
and to the extent possible be consistent with fees charged for such burning
permits in neighboring states. The fee level shall provide, to the extent
possible, for lesser fees for permittees who use best management practices to
minimize air contaminant emissions. The task force shall identify research
needs related to minimizing emissions from agricultural burning and
alternatives to such burning. Further, the task force shall make
recommendations to the department on priorities for spending funds provided
through this chapter for research into alternative methods to reduce emissions
from agricultural burning.

(5)
A permit is not required under this section, or under RCW 70.94.743 through
70.94.780, from an air pollution control authority, the department, or any
local entity with delegated permit authority, for aircraft crash rescue fire
training activities meeting the following conditions:

(a)
Fire fighters participating in the training fires must be limited to those who
provide fire fighting support to an airport that is either certified by the
federal aviation administration or operated in support of military or
governmental activities;

(b)
The fire training may not be conducted during an air pollution episode or any
stage of impaired air quality declared under RCW 70.94.715 for the area where
training is to be conducted;

(c)
The number of training fires allowed per year without a permit shall be the
minimum number necessary to meet federal aviation administration or other
federal safety requirements;

(d)
The facility shall use current technology and be operated in a manner that will
minimize, to the extent possible, the air contaminants generated during
operation; and

(e)
Prior to the commencement of the aircraft fire training, the organization
conducting training shall notify both the: (i) Local fire district or fire
department; and (ii) air pollution control authority, department of ecology, or
local entity delegated permitting authority under RCW 70.94.654, having
jurisdiction within the area where training is to be conducted.

Written
approval from the department or a local air pollution control authority shall
be obtained prior to the initial operation of aircraft crash rescue fire
training. Such approval will be granted to fire training activities meeting
the conditions in this subsection.

(6)
Aircraft crash rescue fire training activities conducted in compliance with ((this))
subsection (5) of this section are not subject to the prohibition, in
RCW 70.94.775(1), of outdoor fires containing petroleum products and are not
considered outdoor burning under RCW 70.94.743 through 70.94.780.

(7) To provide for fire fighting instruction in instances not
governed by subsection (6) of this section, or other actions to protect public
health and safety, the department or a local air pollution control authority
may issue permits that allow limited burning of prohibited materials listed in
RCW 70.94.775(1).

---
END ---