BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.05.010 and 1995 c 403 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Civil penalty" means a monetary penalty administratively issued by a
regulatory agency for noncompliance with state or federal law or rules. The
term does not include any criminal penalty, damage assessments, wages,
premiums, or taxes owed, or interest or late fees on any existing obligation.

(2)
"Regulatory agency" means an agency as defined in RCW 34.05.010 that
has the authority to issue civil penalties. The term does not include the
state patrol or any institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016.

(3)
"Technical assistance" includes:

(a)
Information on the laws, rules, and compliance methods and technologies
applicable to the regulatory agency's programs;

(b)
Information on methods to avoid compliance problems;

(c)
Assistance in applying for permits; and

(d)
Information on the mission, goals, and objectives of the program.

(4) "Technical assistance documents" means documents
prepared to provide information specified in subsection (3) of this section
entitled a technical assistance document by the agency head or its designee.
Technical assistance documents do not include notices of correction, violation,
or enforcement action. Technical assistance documents do not impose mandatory
obligations or serve as the basis for a citation.

---
END ---