BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.15.005 and 1991 c 179 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that:

(1)
The evergreen state has suffered a significant loss of tree cover and
vegetation in urban and suburban communities over the last twenty years, and
the impact of this tree loss has been costly. Reports indicate that the high
tree canopy coverage from Olympia to Everett has declined by thirty-seven
percent since 1972. The loss of the tree cover has resulted in significant
expenditures for man-made infrastructures to deal with storm water runoff, air
pollution, and energy needs.

(2)
Trees and other woody vegetation are a necessary and important part of
community and urban environments. Community and urban forests have many values
and uses including conserving energy, reducing air and water pollution and soil
erosion, contributing to property values, attracting business, reducing glare
and noise, providing aesthetic and historical values, providing wood products, providing
habitat critical to the preservation of endangered and threatened species
including salmon, and affording comfort and protection for humans and
wildlife.

(((2)))
(3) As urban and community areas in Washington state grow, the need to
plan for and protect community and urban forests increases. Cities and communities
benefit from assistance in developing and maintaining community and urban
forestry programs that also address future growth.

(((3)))
(4) Assistance and encouragement in establishment, retention, and
enhancement of these forests and trees by local governments, citizens,
organizations, and professionals are in the interest of the state based on the
contributions these forests make in preserving and enhancing the quality of
life of Washington's municipalities and counties while providing opportunities for
economic development.

(5)
Trees help protect and enhance residential and business property values.
Studies have shown that trees are good for business because consumers prefer to
shop in business districts with healthy urban forest landscaping.

Sec.
2. RCW
76.15.007 and 1991 c 179 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of this chapter is to:

(1)
Encourage planting and maintenance and management of trees in the state's
municipalities and counties and maximize the potential of tree and vegetative
cover in improving the quality of the environment.

(2)
Encourage the coordination of state and local agency activities and maximize
citizen participation in the development and implementation of community and
urban forestry-related programs.

(3)
Foster healthy economic activity for the state's community and urban
forestry-related businesses through cooperative and supportive contracts with
the private business sector.

(4)
Facilitate the creation of employment opportunities related to community and
urban forestry activities including opportunities for inner city youth to learn
teamwork, resource conservation, environmental appreciation, and job skills.

(5)
Provide meaningful voluntary opportunities for the state's citizens and
organizations interested in community and urban forestry activities.

(6)
Provide funding for local governmental and nongovernmental organizations for
the facilitation of urban and community forestry programs through the grant
program established in section 5 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
76.15.020 and 1991 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((may)) shall, subject to available funding,
establish and maintain a program in community and urban forestry to accomplish
the purpose stated in RCW 76.15.007. The department ((may)) shall,
subject to available funding, assist municipalities and counties in
establishing and maintaining community and urban forestry programs and
encourage persons to engage in appropriate and improved tree management and
care.

(2)
The department ((may)) shall, subject to available funding,
advise, encourage, and assist municipalities, counties, and other public and
private entities in the development and coordination of policies, programs, and
activities for the promotion of community and urban forestry.

(3)
The department ((may)) shall, subject to available funding,
appoint a committee or council to advise the department in establishing and
carrying out a program in community and urban forestry. For the purpose of
building partnerships throughout the state, the committee or council may take
any actions necessary to qualify as a nonprofit corporation under the United
States internal revenue service code.

(4)
The department may assist municipal and county tree maintenance programs by
making surplus equipment available on loan where feasible for community and
urban forestry programs and cooperative projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW to read as follows:

The
committee or council shall have the following duties:

(1)
To perform any task necessary to secure for this state the benefits of federal
urban forestry programs;

(2)
To review and make decisions on applications for grant moneys according to the
criteria established in section 5 of this act;

(3)
To advise and make recommendations to the commissioner of public lands
regarding urban and community forestry issues;

(4)
To provide public education and advocacy for community and urban forestry
issues;

(5)
To provide leadership and direction to state-wide urban forestry efforts;

(6)
To develop and maintain a clearinghouse of information related to urban and
community forestry issues; and

(7)
To advise the legislature and the residents of the state on the best ways to
preserve, protect, and improve the urban and community forests of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 76.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources shall, subject to available funding,
provide grants to local urban and community forestry projects. To receive a
grant, a project must be proposed and managed by municipal, county, or state
governments, or by legally organized nonprofit organizations, and meet the
criteria established in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
The department shall distribute grant moneys to projects that:

(a)
Encourage community and urban forests through the establishment and maintenance
of trees;

(b)
Assist in implementing regional and local land use planning projects related to
urban forestry;

(c)
Prepare urban tree plans;

(d)
Retain native trees and riparian habitats; and

(e)
Address any other matter related to the purposes of this act as stated in RCW
76.15.007.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of natural resources for the purposes of section
5 of this act.

(2) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the department of natural resources for the purposes
of section 5 of this act.

---
END ---