BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.14.370 and 1998 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a ((distressed)) rural county may
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from
those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW
upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax
shall not exceed ((0.04)) 0.08 percent of the selling price in
the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing qualifying public facilities in rural counties. The public
facility must be listed as an item in the county's capital facilities plan or
the capital facilities plan of a city located within the county.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5)
For purposes of this section((, "distressed)):

(a)
"Rural county" means a county ((in which the average level of
unemployment for the three years before the year in which a tax is first
imposed under this section exceeds the average state unemployment for those
years by twenty percent)) with a population density of fewer than one
hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial
management.

(b) "Public facilities" means a project of a local
government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, flood control, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm
sewer, railroad, electricity, natural gas, telecommunications, buildings or
structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation, job
retention, or job expansion.

---
END ---