BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.0282 and 1997 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Social
card game" as used in this chapter means a card game that constitutes
gambling and is authorized by the commission under RCW 9.46.070. Authorized
card games may include a house-banked or a player-funded banked card game. No
one may participate in the card game or have an interest in the proceeds of the
card game who is not a player or a person licensed by the commission to participate
in social card games. There shall be two or more participants in the card game
who are players or persons licensed by the commission. The card game must be
played in accordance with the rules adopted by the commission under RCW
9.46.070, which shall include but not be limited to rules for the collection of
fees, limitation of wagers except for limits on wagers set by cities and
towns under RCW 9.46.192(2), and management of player funds. The number of
tables authorized shall be set by the commission but shall not exceed a total
of fifteen separate tables per establishment.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.46.192 and 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every city or town is authorized to enact as an ordinance of that city or town
any or all of the sections of this chapter the violation of which constitutes a
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor. The city or town may not modify the language
of any section of this chapter in enacting such section except as necessary to
put the section in the proper form of an ordinance or to provide for a sentence
[to] be served in the appropriate detention facility. The ordinance must
provide for the same maximum penalty for its violation as may be imposed under
the section in this chapter.

(2)
A city or town may enact as an ordinance wagering limits for social card games
authorized under this chapter in an amount less than, but in no case greater
than, the limits set for such wagering by the gambling commission.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.46.295 and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any license to engage in any of the gambling activities authorized
by this chapter as now exists or as hereafter amended, and issued under the
authority thereof shall be legal authority to engage in the gambling activities
for which issued throughout the incorporated and unincorporated area of any
county, except that a city located therein with respect to that city, or a
county with respect to all areas within that county except for such cities, may
absolutely prohibit, but may not change the scope of license except under
RCW 9.46.192(2), any or all of the gambling activities for which the
license was issued.

---
END ---