BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.33.340 and 1993 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Department,
agency, and court files regarding an adoption shall be confidential except
as provided for in RCW 26.33.345 and except that reasonably available
nonidentifying information ((may)) shall be disclosed upon the
written request for the information from the adoptive parent, the adoptee, or
the birth parent. If the adoption facilitator refuses to disclose
nonidentifying information, the individual may petition the superior court.
Identifying information may also be disclosed through the procedure described
in RCW 26.33.343 and 26.33.345.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.33.345 and 1993 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services, adoption agencies, and
independent adoption facilitators shall release the name and location of the
court where a relinquishment of parental rights or finalization of an adoption
took place to an adult adoptee, a birth parent of an adult adoptee, an adoptive
parent, a birth or adoptive grandparent of an adult adoptee, or an adult
sibling of an adult adoptee, or the legal guardian of any of these.

(2)
The department of health shall make available a noncertified copy of the
original birth certificate of a child to the child's birth parents upon
request.

(3)
((For adoptions finalized after October 1, 1993)) After receiving a
request by an adopted person eighteen years of age or older, the department
of health shall ((make available)) provide the person with a
noncertified copy of the adopted person's original birth certificate ((to
the adoptee after the adoptee's eighteenth birthday)), unless the
birth parent has filed an affidavit of nondisclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---