BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.70 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds that bicycling is a suitable public use
within the property currently designated as the Chehalis river surge plain
natural area preserve. The department shall incorporate into the management
plan developed for the Chehalis river surge plain natural area preserve and the
Chehalis river surge plain interpretive trail this legislative direction to
allow the use of bicycles in those areas.

---
END ---