BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
57.08.015 and 1996 c 230 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of commissioners of a district may sell, at public or private sale,
property belonging to the district if the board determines that the property is
not and will not be needed for district purposes and if the board gives notice
of intention to sell as in this section provided. However, no such notice of
intention shall be required to sell personal property of less than two thousand
five hundred dollars in value.

The
notice of intention to sell shall be published once a week for two consecutive
weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The notice shall
describe the property and state the time and place at which it will be sold or
offered for sale, the terms of sale, whether the property is to be sold at public
or private sale, and if at public sale the notice shall call for bids, fix the
conditions of the bids and reserve the right to reject any and all bids for
good cause.

Sec.
2. RCW
57.08.016 and 1996 c 230 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be no private sale of real property where the appraised value
exceeds the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars. Subject to the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section, no real property of the district
shall be sold for less than ninety percent of the value thereof as established
by a written appraisal made not more than six months prior to the date of sale
by three disinterested real estate brokers licensed under the laws of the state
or professionally designated real estate appraisers as defined in RCW
74.46.020. The appraisal shall be signed by the appraisers and filed with the
secretary of the board of commissioners of the district, who shall keep it at
the office of the district open to public inspection. Any notice of intention
to sell real property of the district shall recite the appraised value thereof.

(2) If no purchasers can be obtained for the property at ninety
percent or more of its appraised value after one hundred twenty days of
offering the property for sale, the board of commissioners of the district may
adopt a resolution stating that the district has been unable to sell the
property at the ninety percent amount. The district then may sell the property
at the highest price it can obtain at public auction. A notice of intention to
sell at public auction shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks
in a newspaper of general circulation in the district. The notice shall
describe the property, state the time and place at which it will be offered for
sale and the terms of sale, and shall call for bids, fix the conditions
thereof, and reserve the right to reject any and all bids for good cause.

---
END ---