BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the colleges and
universities shall waive tuition and fees, including the nonresident tuition
differential, for any teacher teaching full time in the public schools subject
to the following conditions:

(1)
The teacher must hold an initial or residency certificate from the state board
of education;

(2)
The teacher is working toward, but has not yet received a continuing or
professional certificate from the state board of education;

(3)
Credits from any course for which a waiver is requested meet the board's
academic requirements for a continuing or professional certificate and will be
applied toward the applicant's continuing or professional certificate; and

(4)
The maximum number of quarter hour credits or their equivalent that must be
waived are forty-five credits or the number of credits required for
professional or continuing certification, whichever is lower.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.910 and 1998 c 346 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for revenue waived under programs listed in subsection (3) of this
section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state appropriations
act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by
a state university, a regional university, The Evergreen State College, or the
community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed the percentage of total gross
authorized operating fees revenue set forth below. As used in this section,
"gross authorized operating fees revenue" means the estimated gross
operating fees revenue as estimated under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the
office of financial management, before granting any waivers. This limitation
applies to all tuition waiver programs established before or after July 1,
1992.

(a)
University of Washington 21 percent

(b)
Washington State University 20 percent

(c)
Eastern Washington University 11 percent

(d)
Central Washington University 8 percent

(e)
Western Washington University 10 percent

(f)
The Evergreen State College 6 percent

(g)
Community colleges as a whole 35 percent

(2)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions,
or reductions in operating fees contained in the following:

(a)
RCW 28B.10.265;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.014;

(c)
RCW 28B.15.100;

(d)
RCW 28B.15.225;

(e)
RCW 28B.15.380;

(f)
RCW 28B.15.520;

(g)
RCW 28B.15.526;

(h)
RCW 28B.15.527;

(i)
RCW 28B.15.543;

(j)
RCW 28B.15.545;

(k)
RCW 28B.15.555;

(l)
RCW 28B.15.556;

(m)
RCW 28B.15.615;

(n)
RCW 28B.15.620;

(o)
RCW 28B.15.628;

(p)
RCW 28B.15.730;

(q)
RCW 28B.15.740;

(r)
RCW 28B.15.750;

(s)
RCW 28B.15.756;

(t)
RCW 28B.50.259;

(u)
RCW 28B.70.050;

(v)
RCW 28B.80.580; ((and))

(w)
Section 1 of this act; and

(x)
During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate commission for
higher education undergraduate exchange program for students attending Eastern
Washington University.

(3)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers,
exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees contained in the
following:

(a)
RCW 28B.15.522;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.540; and

(c) RCW 28B.15.558.

---
END ---