BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.330 and 1990 c 8 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each employee who is a member of the retirement system shall contribute at
the same rate as the employer or at six percent of his or her total
compensation earnable, whichever is lower. Effective January 1, 1987,
however, no contributions are required for any calendar month in which the
member is not granted service credit. The officer responsible for making up
the payroll shall deduct from the compensation of each member, on each and
every payroll of such member for each and every payroll period subsequent to
the date on which he or she became a member of the retirement system the
contribution as provided by this section.

(2)
Any member may, pursuant to regulations formulated from time to time by the
department, provide for himself or herself, by means of an increased rate of
contribution to his or her account in the employees' savings fund, an increased
prospective retirement allowance pursuant to RCW 41.40.190 and 41.40.185.

(3) The officer responsible for making up the payroll shall deduct
from the compensation of each member covered by the provisions of RCW
41.40.190(5) and 41.40.185(4) on each and every payroll of such member for each
and every payroll period subsequent to the date on which he or she thereafter
becomes a member of the retirement system, an amount equal to seven and
one-half percent of such member's compensation earnable.

---
END ---