BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.50.140 and 1997 c 281 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
board of trustees:

(1)
Shall operate all existing community and technical colleges in its district;

(2)
Shall create comprehensive programs of community and technical college
education and training and maintain an open-door policy in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 28B.50.090(3). However, technical colleges, and college
districts containing only technical colleges, shall maintain programs solely
for occupational education, basic skills, and literacy purposes. For as long
as a need exists, technical colleges may continue those programs, activities,
and services they offered during the twelve-month period preceding September 1,
1991;

(3)
Shall employ for a period to be fixed by the board a college president for each
community and technical college and, may appoint a president for the district,
and fix their duties and compensation, which may include elements other than
salary. Compensation under this subsection shall not affect but may supplement
retirement, health care, and other benefits that are otherwise applicable to
the presidents as state employees. The board shall also employ for a period to
be fixed by the board members of the faculty and such other administrative
officers and other employees as may be necessary or appropriate and fix their
salaries and duties. Compensation and salary increases under this subsection
shall not exceed the amount or percentage established for those purposes in the
state appropriations act by the legislature as allocated to the board of
trustees by the state board for community and technical colleges. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall adopt rules defining the
permissible elements of compensation under this subsection;

(4)
May establish, under the approval and direction of the college board, new
facilities as community needs and interests demand. However, the authority of
boards of trustees to purchase or lease major off-campus facilities shall be
subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340(5);

(5)
May establish or lease, operate, equip and maintain dormitories, food service
facilities, bookstores and other self-supporting facilities connected with the
operation of the community and technical college;

(6)
May, with the approval of the college board, borrow money and issue and sell
revenue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness for the construction,
reconstruction, erection, equipping with permanent fixtures, demolition and
major alteration of buildings or other capital assets, and the acquisition of
sites, rights-of-way, easements, improvements or appurtenances, for
dormitories, food service facilities, and other self-supporting facilities
connected with the operation of the community and technical college in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330 where
applicable;

(7)
May establish fees and charges for the facilities authorized hereunder, including
reasonable rules ((and regulations)) for the government thereof, not
inconsistent with the rules ((and regulations)) of the college board;
each board of trustees operating a community and technical college may enter
into agreements, subject to rules ((and regulations)) of the college
board, with owners of facilities to be used for housing regarding the
management, operation, and government of such facilities, and any board
entering into such an agreement may:

(a)
Make rules ((and regulations)) for the government, management and
operation of such housing facilities deemed necessary or advisable; and

(b)
Employ necessary employees to govern, manage and operate the same;

(8)
May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and bequests of real or personal
property from private sources, as may be made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out
the community and technical college programs as specified by law and the ((regulations))
rules of the state college board; sell, lease or exchange, invest or
expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to
the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt ((regulations)) rules
to govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and
income thereof;

(9)
May establish and maintain night schools whenever in the discretion of the
board of trustees it is deemed advisable, and authorize classrooms and other
facilities to be used for summer or night schools, or for public meetings and
for any other uses consistent with the use of such classrooms or facilities for
community and technical college purposes;

(10)
May make rules ((and regulations)) for pedestrian and vehicular traffic
on property owned, operated, or maintained by the district;

(11)
Shall prescribe, with the assistance of the faculty, the course of study in the
various departments of the community and technical college or colleges under
its control, and publish such catalogues and bulletins as may become necessary;

(12)
May grant to every student, upon graduation or completion of a course of study,
a suitable diploma, nonbaccalaureate degree or certificate. Technical colleges
shall offer only nonbaccalaureate technical degrees under the rules of the
state board for community and technical colleges that are appropriate to their
work force education and training mission. The primary purpose of this degree
is to lead the individual directly to employment in a specific occupation.
Technical colleges may not offer transfer degrees. The board, upon
recommendation of the faculty, may also confer honorary associate of arts
degrees upon persons other than graduates of the community college, in
recognition of their learning or devotion to education, literature, art, or
science. No degree may be conferred in consideration of the payment of money
or the donation of any kind of property;

(13)
Shall enforce the rules ((and regulations)) prescribed by the state
board for community and technical colleges for the government of community and
technical colleges, students and teachers, and promulgate such rules ((and
regulations)) and perform all other acts not inconsistent with law or rules
((and regulations)) of the state board for community and technical
colleges as the board of trustees may in its discretion deem necessary or
appropriate to the administration of college districts: PROVIDED, That such
rules ((and regulations)) shall include, but not be limited to, rules ((and
regulations)) relating to housing, scholarships, conduct at the various
community and technical college facilities, and discipline: PROVIDED, FURTHER,
That the board of trustees may suspend or expel from community and technical
colleges students who refuse to obey any of the duly promulgated rules ((and
regulations));

(14)
May, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the president or
district president any of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon it by
this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties may be exercised in the name of
the district board;

(15)
May perform such other activities consistent with this chapter and not in
conflict with the directives of the college board;

(16)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer educational services on a
contractual basis other than the tuition and fee basis set forth in chapter
28B.15 RCW for a special fee to private or governmental entities, consistent
with rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the state board for community
and technical colleges: PROVIDED, That the whole of such special fee shall go
to the college district and be not less than the full instructional costs of
such services including any salary increases authorized by the legislature for
community and technical college employees during the term of the agreement:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That enrollments generated hereunder shall not be counted
toward the official enrollment level of the college district for state funding
purposes;

(17)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, may offer educational services on a
contractual basis, charging tuition and fees as set forth in chapter 28B.15
RCW, counting such enrollments for state funding purposes, and may additionally
charge a special supplemental fee when necessary to cover the full
instructional costs of such services: PROVIDED, That such contracts shall be
subject to review by the state board for community and technical colleges and
to such rules as the state board may adopt for that purpose in order to assure
that the sum of the supplemental fee and the normal state funding shall not
exceed the projected total cost of offering the educational service: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That enrollments generated by courses offered on the basis of
contracts requiring payment of a share of the normal costs of the course will
be discounted to the percentage provided by the college;

(18)
Shall be authorized to pay dues to any association of trustees that may be
formed by the various boards of trustees; such association may expend any or
all of such funds to submit biennially, or more often if necessary, to the
governor and to the legislature, the recommendations of the association
regarding changes which would affect the efficiency of such association;

(19)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340(4), may participate in higher education centers and consortia
that involve any four-year public or independent college or university; ((and))

(20)
May make rules pertaining to the possession and use of weapons by students
and visitors on property owned, operated, or maintained by its district; and

(21) Shall perform any other duties and responsibilities
imposed by law or rule ((and regulation)) of the state board.

---
END ---