BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
11.02.005 and 1998 c 292 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

When
used in this title, unless otherwise required from the context:

(1)
"Personal representative" includes executor, administrator, special
administrator, and guardian or limited guardian and special representative.

(2)
"Net estate" refers to the real and personal property of a decedent
exclusive of homestead rights, exempt property, the family allowance and
enforceable claims against, and debts of, the deceased or the estate.

(3)
"Representation" refers to a method of determining distribution in
which the takers are in unequal degrees of kinship with respect to the
intestate, and is accomplished as follows: After first determining who, of
those entitled to share in the estate, are in the nearest degree of kinship,
the estate is divided into equal shares, the number of shares being the sum of
the number of persons who survive the intestate who are in the nearest degree
of kinship and the number of persons in the same degree of kinship who died
before the intestate but who left issue surviving the intestate; each share of
a deceased person in the nearest degree shall be divided among those of the
deceased person's issue who survive the intestate and have no ancestor then
living who is in the line of relationship between them and the intestate, those
more remote in degree taking together the share which their ancestor would have
taken had he or she survived the intestate. Posthumous children are considered
as living at the death of their parent.

(4)
"Issue" includes all the lawful lineal descendants of the ancestor
and all lawfully adopted children.

(5)
"Degree of kinship" means the degree of kinship as computed according
to the rules of the civil law; that is, by counting upward from the intestate
to the nearest common ancestor and then downward to the relative, the degree of
kinship being the sum of these two counts.

(6)
"Heirs" denotes those persons, including the surviving spouse, who
are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the real and
personal property of a decedent on the decedent's death intestate.

(7)
"Real estate" includes, except as otherwise specifically provided
herein, all lands, tenements, and hereditaments, and all rights thereto, and
all interest therein possessed and claimed in fee simple, or for the life of a
third person.

(8)
"Will" means an instrument validly executed as required by RCW
11.12.020.

(9)
"Codicil" means a will that modifies or partially revokes an existing
earlier will. A codicil need not refer to or be attached to the earlier will.

(10)
"Guardian" or "limited guardian" means a personal
representative of the person or estate of an incompetent or disabled person as
defined in RCW 11.88.010 and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.

(11)
"Administrator" means a personal representative of the estate of a
decedent and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.

(12)
"Executor" means a personal representative of the estate of a
decedent appointed by will and the term may be used in lieu of "personal
representative" wherever required by context.

(13)
"Special administrator" means a personal representative of the estate
of a decedent appointed for limited purposes and the term may be used in lieu
of "personal representative" wherever required by context.

(14)
"Trustee" means an original, added, or successor trustee and includes
the state, or any agency thereof, when it is acting as the trustee of a trust
to which chapter 11.98 RCW applies.

(15)
"Nonprobate asset" means those rights and interests of a person
having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the person's death under a
written instrument or arrangement other than the person's will.
"Nonprobate asset" includes, but is not limited to, a right or
interest passing under a joint tenancy with right of survivorship, joint bank
account with right of survivorship, payable on death or trust bank account,
transfer on death security or security account, deed or conveyance if
possession has been postponed until the death of the person, trust of which the
person is grantor and that becomes effective or irrevocable only upon the
person's death, community property agreement, individual retirement account or
bond, or note or other contract the payment or performance of which is affected
by the death of the person. "Nonprobate asset" does not include: A
payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, annuity, or other similar
contract, or of an employee benefit plan; a right or interest passing by
descent and distribution under chapter 11.04 RCW; a right or interest if,
before death, the person has irrevocably transferred the right or interest, the
person has waived the power to transfer it or, in the case of contractual
arrangement, the person has waived the unilateral right to rescind or modify
the arrangement; or a right or interest held by the person solely in a
fiduciary capacity. For the definition of "nonprobate asset"
relating to revocation of a provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of
marriage or declaration of invalidity of marriage, RCW 11.07.010(5) applies.
((For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation
of a provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or declaration
of invalidity of marriage, see RCW 11.07.010(5). For the definition of
"nonprobate asset" relating to testamentary disposition of nonprobate
assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).))

(16)
"Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended or renumbered on January 1, 1998.

Words
that import the singular number may also be applied to the plural of persons
and things.

Words
importing the masculine gender only may be extended to females also.

Sec.
2. RCW
11.07.010 and 1998 c 292 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to all nonprobate assets, wherever situated, held at the
time of entry by a superior court of this state of a decree of dissolution of
marriage or a declaration of invalidity.

(2)(a)
If a marriage is dissolved or invalidated, a provision made prior to that event
that relates to the payment or transfer at death of the decedent's interest in
a nonprobate asset in favor of or granting an interest or power to the
decedent's former spouse is revoked. A provision affected by this section must
be interpreted, and the nonprobate asset affected passes, as if the former
spouse failed to survive the decedent, having died at the time of entry of the
decree of dissolution or declaration of invalidity.

(b)
This subsection does not apply if and to the extent that:

(i)
The instrument governing disposition of the nonprobate asset expressly provides
otherwise;

(ii)
The decree of dissolution or declaration of invalidity requires that the
decedent maintain a nonprobate asset for the benefit of a former spouse or
children of the marriage, payable on the decedent's death either outright or in
trust, and other nonprobate assets of the decedent fulfilling such a
requirement for the benefit of the former spouse or children of the marriage do
not exist at the decedent's death; or

(iii)
If not for this subsection, the decedent could not have effected the revocation
by unilateral action because of the terms of the decree or declaration, or for
any other reason, immediately after the entry of the decree of dissolution or
declaration of invalidity.

(3)(a)
A payor or other third party in possession or control of a nonprobate asset at
the time of the decedent's death is not liable for making a payment or
transferring an interest in a nonprobate asset to a decedent's former spouse
whose interest in the nonprobate asset is revoked under this section, or for
taking another action in reliance on the validity of the instrument governing
disposition of the nonprobate asset, before the payor or other third party has
actual knowledge of the dissolution or other invalidation of marriage. A payor
or other third party is liable for a payment or transfer made or other action
taken after the payor or other third party has actual knowledge of a revocation
under this section.

(b)
This section does not require a payor or other third party to pay or transfer a
nonprobate asset to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument affected
by the dissolution or other invalidation of marriage, or to another person
claiming an interest in the nonprobate asset, if the payor or third party has
actual knowledge of the existence of a dispute between the former spouse and
the beneficiaries or other persons concerning rights of ownership of the
nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section among the
former spouse and the beneficiaries or among other persons, or if the payor or
third party is otherwise uncertain as to who is entitled to the nonprobate
asset under this section. In such a case, the payor or third party may, without
liability, notify in writing all beneficiaries or other persons claiming an
interest in the nonprobate asset of either the existence of the dispute or its
uncertainty as to who is entitled to payment or transfer of the nonprobate
asset. The payor or third party may also, without liability, refuse to pay or
transfer a nonprobate asset in such a circumstance to a beneficiary or other
person claiming an interest until the time that either:

(i)
All beneficiaries and other interested persons claiming an interest have
consented in writing to the payment or transfer; or

(ii)
The payment or transfer is authorized or directed by a court of proper
jurisdiction.

(c)
Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section and (a) and (b) of this
subsection, a payor or other third party having actual knowledge of the
existence of a dispute between beneficiaries or other persons concerning rights
to a nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section may
condition the payment or transfer of the nonprobate asset on execution, in a
form and with security acceptable to the payor or other third party, of a bond
in an amount that is double the fair market value of the nonprobate asset at
the time of the decedent's death or the amount of an adverse claim, whichever
is the lesser, or of a similar instrument to provide security to the payor or
other third party, indemnifying the payor or other third party for any
liability, loss, damage, costs, and expenses for and on account of payment or
transfer of the nonprobate asset.

(d)
As used in this subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a payor or
other third party in possession or control of the nonprobate asset at or
following the decedent's death, written notice to the payor or other third
party, or to an officer of a payor or third party in the course of his or her
employment, received after the decedent's death and within a time that is
sufficient to afford the payor or third party a reasonable opportunity to act
upon the knowledge. The notice must identify the nonprobate asset with
reasonable specificity. The notice also must be sufficient to inform the payor
or other third party of the revocation of the provisions in favor of the
decedent's spouse by reason of the dissolution or invalidation of marriage, or
to inform the payor or third party of a dispute concerning rights to a
nonprobate asset as a result of the application of this section. Receipt of
the notice for a period of more than thirty days is presumed to be received
within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a
reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but receipt of the notice for
a period of less than five business days is presumed not to be a sufficient
time for these purposes. These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and
convincing evidence to the contrary.

(4)(a)
A person who purchases a nonprobate asset from a former spouse or other person,
for value and without actual knowledge, or who receives from a former spouse or
other person payment or transfer of a nonprobate asset without actual knowledge
and in partial or full satisfaction of a legally enforceable obligation, is
neither obligated under this section to return the payment, property, or
benefit nor is liable under this section for the amount of the payment or the
value of the nonprobate asset. However, a former spouse or other person who,
with actual knowledge, not for value, or not in satisfaction of a legally
enforceable obligation, receives payment or transfer of a nonprobate asset to
which that person is not entitled under this section is obligated to return the
payment or nonprobate asset, or is personally liable for the amount of the
payment or value of the nonprobate asset, to the person who is entitled to it
under this section.

(b)
As used in this subsection, "actual knowledge" means, for a person
described in (a) of this subsection who purchases or receives a nonprobate
asset from a former spouse or other person, personal knowledge or possession of
documents relating to the revocation upon dissolution or invalidation of
marriage of provisions relating to the payment or transfer at the decedent's
death of the nonprobate asset, received within a time after the decedent's
death and before the purchase or receipt that is sufficient to afford the
person purchasing or receiving the nonprobate asset reasonable opportunity to
act upon the knowledge. Receipt of the personal knowledge or possession of the
documents for a period of more than thirty days is presumed to be received
within a time that is sufficient to afford the payor or third party a
reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but receipt of the notice for
a period of less than five business days is presumed not to be a sufficient
time for these purposes. These presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and
convincing evidence to the contrary.

(5)
As used in this section, "nonprobate asset" means those rights and
interests of a person having beneficial ownership of an asset that pass on the
person's death under only the following written instruments or arrangements
other than the decedent's will:

(a)
A payable-on-death provision of a life insurance policy, employee benefit plan,
annuity or similar contract, or individual retirement account;

(b)
((A payable-on-death, trust, or joint with right of survivorship bank
account;

(c))) A
trust of which the person is a grantor and that becomes effective or
irrevocable only upon the person's death; or

(((d)))
(c) Transfer on death beneficiary designations of a transfer on death or
pay on death security, if such designations are authorized under Washington
law. However, for the general definition of "nonprobate asset" in
this title, RCW 11.02.005 applies.

((For
the general definition in this title of "nonprobate asset," see RCW
11.02.005(15) and for the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating
to testamentary disposition of nonprobate assets, see RCW 11.11.010(7).))

(6)
This section is remedial in nature and applies as of July 25, 1993, to decrees
of dissolution and declarations of invalidity entered after July 24, 1993, and
this section applies as of January 1, 1995, to decrees of dissolution and
declarations of invalidity entered before July 25, 1993.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
11.11.003 and 1998 c 292 s 102;

(2) RCW
11.11.005 and 1998 c 292 s 103;

(3) RCW
11.11.007 and 1998 c 292 s 107;

(4) RCW
11.11.010 and 1998 c 292 s 104;

(5) RCW
11.11.020 and 1998 c 292 s 105;

(6) RCW
11.11.030 and 1998 c 292 s 106;

(7) RCW
11.11.040 and 1998 c 292 s 108;

(8) RCW
11.11.050 and 1998 c 292 s 109;

(9) RCW
11.11.060 and 1998 c 292 s 110;

(10) RCW
11.11.070 and 1998 c 292 s 111;

(11) RCW
11.11.080 and 1998 c 292 s 112;

(12) RCW
11.11.090 and 1998 c 292 s 113;

(13) RCW
11.11.100 and 1998 c 292 s 114;

(14) RCW
11.11.110 and 1998 c 292 s 115;

(15) RCW
11.11.900 and 1998 c 292 s 101;

(16) RCW
11.11.901 and 1998 c 292 s 116;

(17) RCW
11.11.902 and 1998 c 292 s 601; and

(18) RCW
11.11.903 and 1998 c 292 s 603.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---