BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An employer is allowed a credit against tax due under this chapter for
telecommuting expenditures. A credit claimed under this section may not exceed
the amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. The credit
must be claimed in the year in which the expenditure is made. The employer
must make the expenditure the year in which the credit is approved by the
department. Approved credit may not be carried over to subsequent calendar
years. The credit must be claimed by the due date of the last tax return for
the calendar year in which the expenditure is made. Any unused credit
expires. A refund shall not be given in place of a credit. Total credits
claimed by a person under this section and section 2 of this act may not exceed
fifteen thousand dollars for any tax year. Expenditures made before the
effective date of this section are not eligible for credit. If a person has
used a credit approved under section 2 of this act against tax under chapter
82.16 RCW, that same credit cannot be used against tax under this chapter.

(2)
Application for credits under this section shall be made before making a
telecommuting expenditure. Applications shall be made to the department in a
form and manner as required by the department. The department shall approve or
deny applications for credits using the criteria under this subsection. The
department shall keep a running total of all credits approved under this
subsection during each calendar year, and shall deny any credit application
that would cause the tabulation for any calendar year to exceed three million
dollars. A person claiming a credit must keep records as necessary for the
department to verify eligibility under this section, including records showing
that an employee was regularly scheduled to telecommute from his or her home
two or more days per week.

(3)
The definitions in this subsection apply for the purposes of this section.

(a)
"Telecommuting" means a work arrangement whereby employees are
regularly scheduled two or more days per week to perform the normal duties and
responsibilities of their positions at home, through use of computers or
telecommunications. The term includes only work arrangements made by employers
for employees and excludes persons who are self-employed.

(b)
"Telecommuting equipment" means:

(i)
Desktop computers, computer-related hardware, facsimile machines, modems, and
similar data processing or telecommunication equipment used only at an
employee's home for telecommuting purposes; and

(ii)
Equipment installed at an employer's place of business that is used exclusively
to provide remote voice access to telecommuting employees.

(c)
"Telecommuting expenditures" means amounts spent, including sales or
use taxes paid, to purchase telecommuting equipment or for telecommuting
installation costs. The term includes only expenditures for equipment and
services reasonably necessary to facilitate telecommuting.

(d)
"Telecommuting installation costs" means one-time expenditures for
installation of telecommunication access lines at an employee's home for the
purpose of telecommuting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

An
employer is allowed a credit against tax due under this chapter for
telecommuting expenditures, as defined in section 1 of this act. A credit may
be claimed under this section in the same manner as provided for credits under
section 1 of this act. Credits under this section are subject to the same
conditions and limitations as credits under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect October 1, 1999.

---
END ---