BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.52.071 and 1996 c 271 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall issue a license to any person applying for a nursing home
administrator's license who meets the following requirements:

(1)
Successful completion of the requirements for a baccalaureate degree from a
recognized institution of higher learning and any federal requirements;

(2)
Successful completion of a practical experience requirement as determined by
the board;

(3)
Successful completion of examinations administered or approved by the board, or
both, which shall be designed to test the candidate's competence to administer
a nursing home, and shall include examination on Washington state and
federal nursing home laws and regulations and other topics set by the board;

(4)
At least twenty-one years of age; and

(5)
Not having engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180 or
being unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as defined in RCW 18.130.170.
The board shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting
the above requirements.

A
limited license indicating the limited extent of authority to administer
institutions conducted by and for those who rely upon treatment by prayer or
spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of any well-recognized
church or religious denomination shall be issued to individuals demonstrating
membership in such church or denomination. However, nothing in this chapter
shall be construed to require an applicant employed by such institution to
demonstrate proficiency in any medical techniques or to meet any medical
educational qualifications or medical standards not in accord with the remedial
care and treatment provided in such institutions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---