BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.06B.010 and 1998 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that transportation systems for persons with special needs
are not operated as efficiently as possible. ((Lack of coordination
produces irrational situations, such as several different vehicles arriving
simultaneously at the same location to pick up several different persons with
special needs. When separate vehicles arrive within minutes of each other to
transport individuals with special needs to similar destinations, resources are
wasted and fewer people are being served.)) In some cases, programs
established by the legislature to assist persons with special needs can not be
accessed due to these inefficiencies and coordination barriers.

It
is the intent of the legislature that public transportation agencies, pupil
transportation programs, private nonprofit transportation providers, and
other public agencies sponsoring programs that require transportation services
coordinate those transportation services. Through coordination of
transportation services, programs will achieve increased efficiencies and will
be able to provide more rides to a greater number of persons with special
needs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Persons with special transportation needs" means those persons,
including their personal attendants, who because of physical or mental
disability, income status, or age are unable to transport themselves or
purchase transportation.

(2)
"Special needs coordinated transportation" is transportation for
persons with special transportation needs that is developed through a
collaborative community process involving transportation providers; human
service programs and agencies; consumers; social, educational, and health
service providers; employer and business representatives; employees and
employee representatives; and other affected parties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW to read as follows:

In
order to increase efficiency, to reduce waste and duplication, to enable people
to access social and health services, to provide a basic level of mobility, and
to extend and improve transportation services to people with special
transportation needs, the state shall implement the Program for Agency
Coordinated Transportation. The program will improve transportation efficiency
and effectiveness to maximize the use of community resources so that more
people can be served within available funding levels.

The
Program for Agency Coordinated Transportation will facilitate a state-wide
approach to coordination and will support the development of community-based
coordinated transportation systems that exhibit the following characteristics:

(1)
Organizations serving persons with special transportation needs share
responsibility for ensuring that customers can access services.

(2)
There is a single entry process for customers to use to have trips arranged and
scheduled, so the customer does not have to contact different locations based
on which sponsoring agency or program is paying for the trip.

(3)
A process is in place so that when decisions are made by service organizations
on facility siting or program policy implementation, the costs of client
transportation and the potential effects on the client transportation costs of
other agencies or programs are considered. Affected agencies are given an
opportunity to influence the decision if the potential impact is negative.

(4)
Open local market mechanisms give all providers who meet minimum standards an
opportunity to participate in the program, and, in addition, allow for cost
comparisons so that purchasers can select the least expensive trip most
appropriate to the customer's needs.

(5)
There is flexibility in using the available vehicles in a community so that the
ability to transport people is not restricted by categorical claims to
vehicles.

(6)
There is maximum sharing of operating facilities and administrative services,
to avoid duplication of costly program elements.

(7)
Trip sponsors and service providers have agreed on a process for allocating
costs and billing when they share use of vehicles.

(8)
Minimum standards exist for at least safety, driver training, maintenance,
vehicles, and technology to eliminate barriers that may prevent sponsors from
using each other's vehicles or serving each other's clients.

(9)
The system is user friendly. The fact that the system is supported by a multitude
of programs and agencies with different eligibility, contracting, service
delivery, payment, and funding structures does not negatively affect the
customer's ability to access service.

(10)
Support is provided for research, technology improvements, and sharing of best
practices from other communities, so that the system can be continually
improved.

(11)
There are performance goals and an evaluation process that leads to continuous
system improvement.

Sec.
4. RCW
47.06B.020 and 1998 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The agency council on coordinated transportation is created. The council is
composed of ((nine voting)) three ex officio members, six
members appointed by the governor, and eight ((nonvoting,))
legislative members. All members have a vote on the council.

(2)
The ((nine voting)) three ex officio members are the
superintendent of public instruction or a designee, the secretary of
transportation or a designee, and the secretary of the department of
social and health services or a designee((, and six members appointed by the
governor as follows:)).

(3)
The six members appointed by the governor must represent a balance of
transportation providers and users of the system, and be chosen from
organizations such as:

(a)
((One representative from)) The office of the governor;

(b)
((Two persons who are consumers of special needs transportation services))
The Washington Senior Lobby;

(c)
((One representative from)) The Governor's Committee on Disability
Issues and Employment;

(d)
The Washington Association of Pupil Transportation;

(((d)
One representative from)) (e) The Washington State Transit
Association; ((and

(e)
One of the following:

(i)
A representative from)) (f) The Community
Transportation Association of the Northwest; ((or

(ii)
A representative from)) (g) The Community
Action Council Association;

(h)
A user of the system who is not a member of any of the organizations listed in
(a) through (g) of this subsection.

(((3)))
(4) The eight ((nonvoting)) legislative members are ((legislators))
as follows:

(a)
Four members from the house of representatives, two from each of the two
largest caucuses, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, two
who are members of the house transportation ((policy and budget))
committee and two who are members of the house appropriations committee; and

(b)
Four members from the senate, two from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the president of the senate, two who are members of the
transportation committee and two who are members of the ways and means
committee.

(((4)))
(5) Gubernatorial appointees of the council will serve ((two-year))
three-year terms, staggered so that two members are replaced or
reappointed each year. Individual appointees shall not serve for a period of
more than six consecutive years.

(6)
Members may not receive compensation for their service on the council, but will
be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties
as members as set forth in RCW 43.03.220.

(((5)
The secretary of transportation or a designee shall serve as the)) (7) A
council chair and vice-chair must be elected every two years from among
the ex officio members, by vote of the council.

(((6)))
(8) The council shall carry out its duties to administer the Program for
Agency Coordinated Transportation, to provide and manage grants to fund
demonstration projects, and to provide assistance to community forums and
planning processes within funds appropriated by the legislature or as provided
for in subsection (10) of this section.

(9)
The department of transportation shall provide necessary staff support for the
council to supplement council resources as needed.

(((7)))
(10) The council may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the
use and benefit of the purposes of the council and spend gifts, grants, or
endowments or income from the public or private sources according to their
terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates RCW
42.17.710.

Sec.
5. RCW
47.06B.030 and 1998 c 173 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

To
assure implementation of the Program for Agency Coordinated Transportation, the
council, in coordination with stakeholders, shall:

(1)
Develop ((standards and strategies for coordinating special needs
transportation;

(2)
Identify and develop, fund as resources are made available, and monitor
coordinated transportation pilot projects;

(3)
Disseminate and encourage the widespread implementation of successful
demonstration projects;

(4)
Identify and address barriers to transportation coordination;

(5)
Recommend to the legislature changes in law to assist coordination of
transportation services;

(6)
Act as an information clearinghouse and advocate for coordinated
transportation;

(7))) guidelines
for local planning of coordinated transportation in accordance with this
chapter;

(2)
Initiate local planning processes by contacting the board of commissioners and
county councils in each county and encouraging them to convene local planning
forums for the purpose of implementing special needs coordinated transportation
programs at the community level;

(3)
Work with local community forums to designate a local lead organization that
shall cooperate and coordinate with private and nonprofit transportation
brokers and providers, local public transportation agencies, local governments,
and user groups;

(4)
Provide a forum at the state level in which state agencies will discuss and
resolve coordination issues and program policy issues that may impact
transportation coordination and costs;

(5)
Provide guidelines for state agencies to use in creating policies, rules, or
procedures to encourage the participation of their constituents in
community-based planning and coordination, in accordance with this chapter;

(6)
Facilitate state-level discussion and action on problems and barriers
identified by the local forums that can only be resolved at either the state or
federal level;

(7)
Develop and test models for determining the impacts of facility siting and
program policy decisions on transportation costs;

(8)
Develop methodologies and provide support to local and state agencies in
identifying transportation costs;

(9)
Develop guidelines for setting performance measures and evaluating performance;

(10)
Develop monitoring reporting criteria and processes to assess state and local
level of participation with this chapter;

(11)
Administer and manage grant funds to develop, test, and facilitate the
implementation of coordinated systems;

(12)
Develop minimum standards for safety, driver training, and vehicles, and
provide models for processes and technology to support coordinated service
delivery systems;

(13)
Provide a clearinghouse for sharing information about transportation
coordination best practices and experiences;

(14)
Promote research and development of methods and tools to improve the
performance of transportation coordination in the state;

(15)
Provide technical assistance and support to communities.

(16)
Facilitate, monitor, provide funding as available, and give technical support
to local planning processes;

(17)
Form, convene, and give staff support to stakeholder work groups as needed to
continue work on removing barriers to coordinated transportation;

(18)
Advocate for the coordination of transportation for people with special
transportation needs at the federal, state, and local levels;

(19)
Recommend to the legislature changes in laws to assist coordination of
transportation services;

(20)
Petition the office of financial management to make whatever changes are deemed
necessary to identify transportation costs in all executive agency budgets;

(((8)))
(21) Report to the legislature by December 1, ((1998)) 2000,
on council activities including, but not limited to, the progress of
community planning processes, what demonstration projects have been
undertaken, how coordination affected service levels, and whether these efforts
produced savings that allowed expansion of services. Reports must be made once
every two years thereafter, and other times as the council deems necessary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW to read as follows:

The
council may request, and may require as a condition of receiving coordination
grants, selected county governments to convene local planning forums and invite
participation of all entities, including tribal governments, that serve or
transport persons with special transportation needs. Counties are encouraged
to coordinate and combine their forums and planning processes with other
counties, as they find it appropriate. The local community forums must:

(1)
Designate a lead organization to facilitate the community planning process on
an ongoing basis;

(2)
Identify functional boundaries for the local coordinated transportation system;

(3)
Clarify roles and responsibilities of the various participants;

(4)
Identify community resources and needs;

(5)
Prepare a plan for developing a coordinated transportation system that meets
the intent of this chapter, addresses community needs, and efficiently uses
community resources to address unmet needs;

(6)
Implement the community coordinated transportation plan;

(7)
Develop performance measures consistent with council guidelines;

(8)
Develop a reporting process consistent with council guidelines;

(9)
Raise issues and barriers to the council when resolution is needed at either
the state or federal level;

(10)
Develop a process for open discussion and input on local policy and facility
siting decisions that may have an impact on the special needs transportation
costs and service delivery of other programs and agencies in the community.

Sec.
7. RCW
47.06B.900 and 1998 c 173 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
agency council on coordinated transportation is terminated on June 30, ((2003))
2007, as provided in RCW 47.06B.901.

Sec.
8. RCW
47.06B.901 and 1998 c 173 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective June 30, ((2004)) 2008:

(1)
RCW 47.06B.010 and 1999 c . . . s 1 (section 1 of this act) &
1998 c 173 s 1;

(2)
RCW 47.06B.--- and 1999 c . . . s 2 (section 2 of this act);

(3)
RCW 47.06B.--- and 1999 c . . . s 3 (section 3 of this act);

(4)
RCW 47.06B.020 and 1999 c . . . s 4 (section 4 of this act) &
1998 c 173 s 2; ((and

(3))) (5)
RCW 47.06B.030 and 1999 c . . . s 5 (section 5 of this act) &
1998 c 173 s 3; and

(6) RCW 47.06B.--- and 1999 c . . . s 6 (section 6 of
this act).

---
END ---