BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the presence of a high quality, yet affordable, system
of public colleges and universities is critical to Washington's long-term
economic and civic health. The legislature further finds that both the quality
and affordability of higher education has been jeopardized during the last
decade when eroding state funding levels have resulted in growing pressure for
tuition increases to help maintain quality. The result has been a decade of
tuition increases that exceed the rate of inflation.

The
legislature intends to both keep higher education affordable and maintain its
quality. The legislature intends to keep higher education affordable by
capping tuition increases at no more than the rate of inflation as defined by
the consumer price index. However, the legislature recognizes that maintaining
and improving the quality of higher education requires finding sources beyond
the state general fund. Therefore, the legislature intends to create an
endowment fund program financed jointly by public and private moneys. The
source of the public moneys will be one-fourth of the moneys from the November
23, 1998 settlement with major manufacturers of tobacco products. The source
of private moneys will be in the form of matching funds provided by individual
and business donors.

The
legislature intends that the endowments created by this chapter shall be used
solely for those purposes for which state funds may be unavailable or limited
in the normal biennial budget process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Comprehensive universities" means Central Washington University,
Eastern Washington University, and Western Washington University.

(2)
"Institution of higher education" means an institution of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(3)
"Trust fund" means the Washington state endowment for higher
education trust fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The Washington state endowment for higher education trust fund is established.
Beginning July 1, 1999, one-fourth of the moneys from the November 23, 1998,
settlement with major manufacturers of tobacco products shall be deposited in
the trust fund. Moneys deposited in the trust fund shall be deposited in
separate accounts in the state treasury for each four-year institution of
higher education and the state board for community and technical colleges. The
state treasurer shall administer the trust fund. Moneys in each of the
accounts created in the trust fund are not subject to appropriation.

(2)
State matching funds from the trust fund for quality improvements in public
higher education, when combined with private donations, may be used for one or
more of the following purposes: Student scholarships, including undergraduate
scholarships, graduate fellowships, distinguished professorships, faculty
teaching awards, innovative approaches to faculty development, quality
initiatives for curriculum development and service delivery, equipment, and
library resources.

(3)
The principal of the invested endowment fund shall not be invaded; only
earnings or a portion thereof may be spent.

(4)
Washington state endowment for higher education disbursements are eligible to
match qualifying private contributions to institutions of higher education
designated under this chapter if one of the two following conditions are met:

(a)
The funds were received by the institution of higher education or its
foundation after June 1, 1999; or

(b)
The funds were received or pledged for the distinguished professorship or
graduate fellowship matching grant programs, and certified for state matching
dollars by the higher education coordinating board and for which public
matching dollars have not been received.

(5)
Endowment funds shall not be used to supplant state appropriations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
higher education coordinating board shall certify that private matching funds
have been obtained by a four-year institution of higher education or its
foundation for the purposes of this chapter. For the community and technical
colleges, the state board for community and technical colleges shall certify
that a community or technical college has obtained private matching funds for
the purposes of this chapter. Upon notice of certification, the treasurer
shall release the state matching funds to the designated institution's local
endowment fund or its foundation, or to the state board for community and
technical colleges.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
All institutions of higher education are eligible for matching funds from the
trust fund. Any appropriation to the trust fund by the legislature shall be
allocated in the following manner:

(a)
Thirty-two percent for the state board for community and technical colleges;

(b)
Thirty-two percent for the University of Washington;

(c)
Twenty-two percent for Washington State University; and

(d)
Fourteen percent for the comprehensive institutions and The Evergreen State
College.

(2)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall determine the
allocation of funds for the two-year colleges.

(3)
By written agreement, the comprehensive four-year universities and The Evergreen
State College shall decide how the allocation of the percentage designated for
the comprehensive institutions and The Evergreen State College shall be
distributed among each of the institutions for any appropriation made by the
legislature.

(4)
No moneys may be released from the trust fund to an individual comprehensive
institution or The Evergreen State College until a written agreement of the
allocation distribution is filed with the state treasurer.

(5)
Within the following higher education sectors, any unmatched funds shall be
available to the other institution or institutions within that sector for match
on a first-come basis if the following percentages are not met within the
specified time periods:

(a)
For the University of Washington and Washington State University, at least
sixty percent of their allocation after three years from the effective date of
the legislative appropriation, eighty percent after four years, and one hundred
percent after five years.

(b)
For the comprehensive institutions and The Evergreen State College, at least
sixty percent of their allocation after four years from the effective date of
the appropriation, eighty percent after five years, and one hundred percent
after six years.

(c)
For the state board for community and technical colleges at least sixty percent
of their allocation after four years from the effective date of the
appropriation, eighty percent after five years, and one hundred percent after
six years.

(6)
After seven years, any remaining unmatched funds residing in any of the three
sectors' pools shall revert to a common pool and shall be eligible for match on
a first-come basis by any of the institutions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Each
institution of higher education or its foundation is responsible for soliciting
private donations, investing and maintaining all endowment funds, administering
the uses of the funds, and reporting to the governor and the legislature. Each
institution or its foundation may augment the endowment fund with additional
private donations. The principal of the invested endowment fund shall not be
invaded; only earnings or a portion thereof may be spent.

Each
institution of higher education shall develop or designate an advisory
committee, of which a majority of its members shall be private donors and
business representatives. Each advisory committee shall include at least one
student representative. The advisory committee shall review and approve the
institution's endowment for higher education program and develop specific,
measurable goals for the institution's endowment program. Each institution
shall report annually to the governor and the legislature on progress made
toward its goals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
chapter may be known and cited as the Washington state higher education
affordability and quality act.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the ((emergency reserve)) Washington
state endowment for higher education trust fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management
cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system plan II
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan II retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the department
of licensing services account, the economic development account, the essential
rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the highway
safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management
improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation.
The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from
the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts
as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management
improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior
to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the ((emergency reserve)) Washington
state endowment for higher education trust fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan II and
plan III account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief
and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan II retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement
system combined plan II and III account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
10. RCW
28B.15.067 and 1997 c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term,
shall be as provided in this subsection.

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred
eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs,
nine thousand eight hundred seventy dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight
dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve
dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four
dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six
dollars; and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3)
Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education ((beginning with)) for the 1998-99 academic
year, other than the summer term, shall be as provided in this subsection
unless different rates are adopted in the omnibus appropriations act.

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight
dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
eleven thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten
thousand two hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two
dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, eight thousand four hundred
thirty-six dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred
sixty-four dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six
dollars; and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(4)
Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education, beginning with the 1999-01 academic year, other than the
summer term, shall be as provided in this subsection. Beginning in 1999-01,
annual percentage increases to the tuition rates set forth in subsection (3) of
this section shall be no greater than the annual rate of inflation as defined
by the consumer price index. The higher education coordinating board shall be
responsible for calculating and notifying institutions of the actual annual
tuition rates no later than April 15th for the academic year beginning in the
fall.

(5)
For the 1997-98 and 1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall
use at least ten percent of the revenue received from the difference between a
four percent increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to law
students to assist needy low and middle-income resident law students. For the
1997-98 and 1998-99 academic years, the University of Washington shall use at
least ten percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four
percent increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in graduate,
law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition to the
deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(((5)))
(6) The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to
high school students enrolling in participating institutions of higher
education under RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.395.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Section 8 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13.
Section 9 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---