BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.60.150 and 1990 c 42 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the provisions of RCW 47.60.326, the schedule of charges for the services
and facilities of the system shall be fixed and revised from time to time by
the commission so that the tolls and revenues collected together with any
moneys in the Puget Sound ferry operations account transferred to the ferry
system revolving account for maintenance and operation, and all moneys in the
Puget Sound capital construction account available for debt service will yield
annual revenue and income sufficient, after allowance for all operating,
maintenance, and repair expenses to pay the interest and principal and sinking
fund charges for all outstanding revenue bonds, and to create and maintain a
fund for ordinary renewals and replacements: PROVIDED, That if provision is
made by any resolution for the issuance of revenue bonds for the creation and
maintenance of a special fund for rehabilitating, rebuilding, enlarging, or
improving all or any part of the ferry system then such schedule of tolls and
rates of charges shall be fixed and revised so that the revenue and income will
also be sufficient to comply with such provision. The schedule of charges
may not impose an overheight charge for a vehicle capable of parking on the
outer portions of the main deck of a ferry vessel.

All income and revenues as collected shall be paid to the state
treasurer for the account of the department as a separate trust fund and to be
segregated and disbursed upon order of the department: PROVIDED, That the fund
so segregated and set apart for the payment of the revenue bonds may be
remitted to and held by a designated trustee in such manner and with such
collateral as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of
said bonds. No expenditure may be made from the revenue fund established under
this section and the bond resolution without an appropriation by law. Nothing
in this section requires tolls on the Hood Canal bridge except as may be
required by any bond covenants.

---
END ---