BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the need to address listings that are made under the
federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) in a way that will
make the most efficient use of existing efforts. The legislature finds that
the principle of adaptive management requires that different models should be
tried so that the lessons learned from these models can be put to use
throughout the state. It is the intent of the legislature to create a pilot
program in a northern Puget Sound basin that has been ranked as a high priority
by the state department of fish and wildlife for habitat restoration in light
of the proposed listing of Puget Sound chinook.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
pilot program for salmon recovery is established in Whatcom county within water
resource inventory area 1 established by rule by the department of ecology.

The
management board created under subsection (2) of this section shall constitute
the lead entity for this area responsible for fulfilling the requirements and
exercising the powers of a lead entity under chapter 75.46 RCW.

(2)
A management board consisting of nine voting members is created within water
resource inventory area 1. The members shall consist of one person appointed
by the county executive of the county with the largest land mass in water
resource inventory area 1 in consultation with the county's council, one person
representing the cities contained within water resource inventory area 1
selected by the cities in water resource inventory area 1, one person
representing the Lummi Tribe appointed by the tribe, one person representing
the Nooksack Tribe appointed by the tribe, one state legislator elected from
one of the legislative districts contained within water resource inventory area
1 selected by that group of state legislators representing the area, and five
at large representatives who must reside in water resource inventory area 1.
The at large positions shall be appointed by the board members who are
appointed by the county executive, the cities, and the state legislator. Of
the five at large positions, at least one person shall represent private
property interests, at least one shall represent agricultural interests, and at
least one shall represent environmental interests. The board shall appoint and
consult a technical advisory committee, that shall include four representatives
of state agencies, one each appointed by the directors of the departments of
ecology, fish and wildlife, and transportation, and the commissioner of public
lands. The board may also appoint additional persons to the technical advisory
committee as needed. The chair of the board shall be selected from among the
county representative, the city representative, and the state legislator. In
making appointments under this subsection, the county representative, city
representative, and state legislator shall consider recommendations of
interested parties. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the
original appointments were selected. No action may be brought or maintained
against any management board member, the management board, or any of its
agents, officers, or employees for any noncontractual acts or omissions in
carrying out the purposes of this section.

(3)
The management board shall consider local watershed efforts and activities as
well as habitat conservation plans in the implementation of the recovery plan.
Any of the participating counties may continue its own efforts for restoring
salmon habitat. Nothing in this section limits the authority of units of local
government to enter interlocal agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW or any other
provision of law.

(4)
The management board has the authority to hire and fire staff, including an
executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants and other moneys,
disburse funds, make recommendations to cities and counties about potential
code changes and the development of programs and incentives upon request, pay
all necessary expenses, and may choose a fiduciary agent. The management board
shall report on its progress on a quarterly basis to the legislative body of
the participating county and the state natural resource-related agencies.

(5)
The pilot program terminates July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---