BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
88.12.025 and 1998 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a reckless manner.

(2)
((It shall be a violation for a person to operate a vessel while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug. A person is considered to be
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if:

(a)
The person has 0.08 grams or more of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of
breath, as shown by analysis of the person's breath made under RCW 46.61.506;
or

(b)
The person has 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person's blood,
as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(c)
The person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any
drug; or

(d)
The person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

The
fact that any person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use such drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a
defense against any charge of violating this section. A person cited under
this subsection may upon request be given a breath test for breath alcohol or
may request to have a blood sample taken for blood alcohol analysis. An
arresting officer shall administer field sobriety tests when circumstances
permit.

(3))) A
violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable as provided under RCW 9.92.030.
In addition, the court may order the defendant to pay restitution for any
damages or injuries resulting from the offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
person is guilty of operating a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person operates a vessel within this
state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after operating a vessel, an alcohol
concentration at or above the amount specified in RCW 46.61.502 as shown by
analysis of the person's breath or blood made under section 8 of this act; or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a
defense against a charge of violating this section.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of
operating a vessel and before the administration of an analysis of the person's
breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be at or
above the amount specified in RCW 46.61.502 within two hours after operating a
vessel. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the
defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in
the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged operating a vessel may be used as evidence that within two hours of the
alleged operating a vessel, a person had an alcohol concentration at or above
the amount specified in RCW 46.61.502 in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5)
A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a person is guilty of
operating a vessel after consuming alcohol if the person operates a vessel
within this state and the person:

(a)
Is under the age of twenty-one;

(b)
Has, within two hours after operating the vessel, an alcohol concentration of
0.02 or more, as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under
section 8 of this act.

(2)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1) of this section
which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the
defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of operating
a vessel and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or
blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.02 or more within
two hours after operating a vessel. The court shall not admit evidence of this
defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the earlier of:
(a) Seven days prior to trial; or (b) the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the
case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(3)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged operating a vessel may be used as evidence that within two hours of the
alleged operating a vessel, a person had an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or
more in violation of subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a vessel while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person has actual
physical control of a vessel within this state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after being in actual physical control of
the vessel, an alcohol concentration at or above the amount specified in RCW
46.61.504 as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under section
8 of this act; or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a
defense against any charge of violating this section. No person may be
convicted under this section if he or she is on a vessel moored at a place of
moorage that is owned, leased, or rented by the owner of the vessel.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being
in actual physical control of the vessel and before the administration of an
analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol
concentration to be at or above the amount specified in RCW 46.61.504 within
two hours after being in such control. The court shall not admit evidence of
this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus
or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the
affirmative defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged being in actual physical control of a vessel may be used as evidence
that within two hours of the alleged being in such control, a person had an
alcohol concentration at or above the amount specified in RCW 46.61.504 in
violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in which the
analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that
a person was under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any
drug in violation of subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

(5)
A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
(1)(a) In addition to penalties set forth in section 6 of this act, a one
hundred twenty-five dollar fee shall be assessed to a person who is either
convicted, sentenced to a lesser charge, or given deferred prosecution, as a
result of an arrest for violating section 2 or 4 of this act. This fee is for
the purpose of funding the Washington state toxicology laboratory and local
government for grants and activities to increase the conviction rate and
decrease the incidence of persons operating vessels under the influence of
alcohol or drugs.

(b)
Upon a verified petition by the person assessed the fee, the court may suspend
payment of all or part of the fee if it finds that the person does not have the
ability to pay.

(c)
When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender for an offense which, if
committed by an adult, would constitute a violation of section 2 or 4 of this
act, the court shall assess the one hundred twenty-five dollar fee under (a) of
this subsection. Upon a verified petition by a minor assessed the fee, the
court may suspend payment of all or part of the fee if it finds that the minor
does not have the ability to pay the fee.

(2)
The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and distributed as follows:

(a)
Ninety percent shall be subject to distribution under RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100,
35.20.220, 3.62.020, 3.62.040, or 10.82.070.

(b)
The remainder of the fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit
in the death investigations account to be used solely for funding the state
toxicology laboratory blood or breath testing programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1) A
person who is convicted of a violation of section 2 or 4 of this act and who
has no prior offense within five years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to section 11 of this act there is no test result indicating the
person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four
consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to section
11 of this act there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one year. Two
consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(2)
A person who is convicted of a violation of section 2 or 4 of this act and who
has one prior offense within five years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to section 11 of this act there is no test result indicating the
person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one year. Thirty
days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the
mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon
which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to
section 11 of this act there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than one year.
Forty-five days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the
court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose
a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever
the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state
in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts
upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(3)
A person who is convicted of a violation of section 2 or 4 of this act and who
has two or more prior offenses within five years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to section 11 of this act there is no test result indicating the
person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one year. Ninety
days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the
mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon
which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to
section 11 of this act there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one
year. One hundred twenty days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or
deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum
sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(4)
In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by
this section, the court shall particularly consider whether the person's vessel
operation at the time of the offense was responsible for injury or damage to
another or another's property.

(5)
An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment
and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6)
An offender punishable under subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall be required
by the court to complete a course in boating safety approved by the commission
pursuant to section 7 of this act.

(7)(a)
In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by
this section, whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court
shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not
exceeding two years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that
include: (i) Not operating a vessel within this state while having an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours after operating a vessel; and
(ii) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to
determine alcohol concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who
has reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating or was in actual
physical control of a vessel within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, alcohol or drug treatment, supervised probation, or other
conditions that may be appropriate. The sentence may be imposed in whole or in
part upon violation of a condition of probation during the suspension period.

(b)
For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii)
of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted person to be confined
for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or deferred.

(8)(a)
A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i)
A conviction for a violation of section 2 of this act or an equivalent local
ordinance;

(ii)
A conviction for a violation of section 4 of this act or an equivalent local
ordinance;

(iii)
An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of
(a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection if committed in this state; or

(iv)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of section 2 or 4 of this act, or an equivalent local ordinance.

(b)
"Within five years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within five years of the arrest for the current offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
commission shall prescribe standards for approval of boating safety courses
qualifying for referral of offenders pursuant to section 6 of this act. The
commission shall adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of
acts alleged to have been committed by any person while operating or in actual
physical control of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug, if the person's alcohol concentration is less than the amount
specified in RCW 46.61.502, it is evidence that may be considered with other
competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(2)
The breath analysis shall be based upon grams of alcohol per two hundred ten
liters of breath. The foregoing provisions of this section shall not be
construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing
upon the question whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug.

(3)
Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid under the
provisions of this section or section 2 or 4 of this act shall have been
performed according to methods approved by the state toxicologist and by an individual
possessing a valid permit issued by the state toxicologist for this purpose
pursuant to RCW 46.61.506.

(4)
When a blood test is administered under the provisions of section 11 of this
act, the withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcoholic or
drug content may be performed only by a physician, a registered nurse, or a
qualified technician. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath
specimens.

(5)
The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified technician, chemist,
registered nurse, or other qualified person of his or her own choosing
administer one or more tests in addition to any administered at the direction
of a law enforcement officer. The failure or inability to obtain an additional
test by a person shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the
test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer.

(6)
Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or tests at the
request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the test or
tests shall be made available to him or her or his or her attorney.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
sentencing court may allow persons convicted of violating section 2 or 4 of
this act to fulfill the terms of the sentence provided in section 6 of this act
in nonconsecutive or intermittent time periods. However, any mandatory minimum
sentence under section 6 of this act shall be served consecutively unless
suspended or deferred as otherwise provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
refusal of a person to submit to a test of the alcoholic content of the
person's blood or breath under section 11 of this act is admissible into
evidence at a subsequent criminal trial.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
Any person who operates a vessel within this state is deemed to have given
consent, subject to the provisions of section 8 of this act, to a test or tests
of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol
concentration or presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested
for any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been operating or was in actual
physical control of a vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug or was in violation of section 3 of this act.

(2)
The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have
been operating or in actual physical control of a vessel within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or the person to have been
operating or in actual physical control of a vessel while having alcohol in a
concentration of 0.02 or more in his or her system and being under the age of
twenty-one. However, in those instances where the person is incapable due to
physical injury, physical incapacity, or other physical limitation, of
providing a breath sample or where the person is being treated in a hospital,
clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle, ambulance, or other similar
facility in which a breath testing instrument is not present or where the
officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person is under the
influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a qualified person
as provided in section 8 of this act. The officer shall inform the person of
his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and of his or her right to
have additional tests administered by any qualified person of his or her
choosing as provided in section 8 of this act. The officer shall warn the
operator that:

(a)
The operator's refusal to take the test may subject him or her to civil
penalty; and

(b)
His or her refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial.

(3)
Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall be of the
breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under arrest for the crime
of homicide by watercraft as provided in RCW 88.12.029, assault by watercraft
as provided in RCW 88.12.032, or operating a vessel while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided in section 2 of this act, which
arrest results from an accident in which there has been serious bodily injury
to another person, a breath or blood test may be administered without the
consent of the individual so arrested.

(4)
Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a condition
rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed not to have
withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this section and the test
or tests may be administered, subject to the provisions of section 8 of this
act, and the person shall be deemed to have received the warnings required
under subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of
this section, the person arrested refuses upon the request of a law enforcement
officer to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood, no test
shall be given except as authorized under subsection (3) or (4) of this
section.

(6)
A person's refusal to submit to a test or tests pursuant to subsection (5) of
this section shall constitute a class 1 civil infraction, pursuant to RCW
7.80.120.

Sec.
12. RCW
10.31.100 and 1997 c 66 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

A
police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or
is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest the person without a
warrant. A police officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing
a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the
presence of the officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of
this section.

(1)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or
threats of harm to any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or
involving the use or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition,
possession, or consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one
years under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2)
A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a)
An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under RCW
10.99.040(2), 10.99.050, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.44.063,
chapter 26.26 RCW, or chapter 26.50 RCW restraining the person and the person
has violated the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats
of violence or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care or, in the case of an
order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions
upon the person; or

(b)
The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding four hours has
assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the
officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has
occurred which has resulted in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury
is observable by the responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical
action has occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to
fear imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the officer has
probable cause to believe that family or household members have assaulted each
other, the officer is not required to arrest both persons. The officer shall
arrest the person whom the officer believes to be the primary physical aggressor.
In making this determination, the officer shall make every reasonable effort to
consider: (i) The intent to protect victims of domestic violence under RCW
10.99.010; (ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted or serious threats
creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of domestic violence
between the persons involved.

(3)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have
the authority to arrest the person:

(a)
RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other
property;

(b)
RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(c)
RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d)
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(e)
RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is
suspended or revoked;

(f)
RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4)
A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident if
the officer has probable cause to believe that the driver has committed in
connection with the accident a violation of any traffic law or regulation.

(5)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a violation of RCW 88.12.025 or section 2, 3, or 4 of this
act shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(6)
An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose
presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue
a notice of traffic infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed
the infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an officer
the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the state of
Washington.

(7)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may
arrest the person.

(8)
A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which
the person has knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated
the terms of that order.

(9)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has, within
twenty-four hours of the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW
9A.50.020 may arrest such person.

(10)
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person illegally
possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on
private or public elementary or secondary school premises shall have the
authority to arrest the person.

For
purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the
meaning defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(11)
Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (6) of this
section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of
arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(12)
No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest
pursuant to RCW 10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police officer acts in good faith
and without malice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 2 through 11 of this act are each added to chapter 88.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---