BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the need to develop a graduated licensing system in
light of the disproportionately high incidence of motor vehicle accidents and
fatalities involving young drivers. This system will improve highway safety by
progressively developing and improving the skills of younger drivers in the
safest possible environment, thereby reducing the number of vehicle accidents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An applicant for an intermediate driver's license must have:

(a)
Possessed a valid instruction permit under RCW 46.20.055 for a period of not
less than six months, during which time no conviction of a drug or alcohol
offense under chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, a driver under
twenty-one consuming alcohol violation under RCW 46.61.503, a seat belt
requirement violation under RCW 46.61.688, or other violations of
driver-related safety laws has occurred;

(b)
Passed a driver licensing examination as prescribed by RCW 46.20.130;

(c)
Paid the fee prescribed by RCW 46.20.161; and

(d)
Passed a traffic safety education course meeting the requirements of RCW
46.20.100.

(2)
An intermediate license allows unsupervised driving from 5:00 a.m. to 9:00 p.m.
At all other times the intermediate licensee must be accompanied by a licensed
driver who has had at least five years of driving experience and is occupying a
seat beside the driver. The supervising licensed driver must be the only other
occupant of the front passenger section of the vehicle.

(3)
The intermediate licensee shall not place the vehicle in motion until every
occupant of the vehicle has a seat belt properly fastened in compliance with
RCW 46.61.688.

(4)
An intermediate licencee who has held the intermediate license for at least six
months and has maintained a satisfactory driving record for one year may upon
proper application and payment of the fee prescribed in RCW 46.20.161 be issued
a regular driver's license.

(5)
The intermediate license is valid for a period of at least one year from the
date of its issuance.

(6)
If an intermediate licensee drives a motor vehicle in violation of the
intermediate license conditions specified in this section, the conditions will
remain in effect for an additional six months, and the licensee will be
ineligible to apply for a full license for an additional six months. This
penalty is in addition to any other penalty for the offense that is provided
elsewhere in statute.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.031 and 1995 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall not issue a driver's license hereunder:

(1)
To any person who is under the age of ((sixteen)) eighteen years unless
the applicant has complied with the requirements for intermediate licensing
under section 2 of this act;

(2)
To any person whose license has been suspended during such suspension, nor to
any person whose license has been revoked, except as provided in RCW 46.20.311;

(3)
To any person who has been evaluated by a program approved by the department of
social and health services as being an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser,
and/or drug abuser: PROVIDED, That a license may be issued if the department
determines that such person has been granted a deferred prosecution, pursuant
to chapter 10.05 RCW, or is satisfactorily participating in or has successfully
completed an alcohol or drug abuse treatment program approved by the department
of social and health services and has established control of his or her alcohol
and/or drug abuse problem;

(4)
To any person who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill or insane, or
to be incompetent due to any mental disability or disease, and who has not at
the time of application been restored to competency by the methods provided by
law: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no person so adjudged shall be denied a license
for such cause if the superior court should find him able to operate a motor
vehicle with safety upon the highways during such incompetency;

(5)
To any person who is required by this chapter to take an examination, unless
such person shall have successfully passed such examination;

(6)
To any person who is required under the laws of this state to deposit proof of
financial responsibility and who has not deposited such proof;

(7)
To any person when the department has good and substantial evidence to
reasonably conclude that such person by reason of physical or mental disability
would not be able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the highways;
subject to review by a court of competent jurisdiction;

(8)
To a person when the department has been notified by a court that the person
has violated his or her written promise to appear, respond, or comply regarding
a notice of infraction issued for a violation of RCW 46.55.105, unless the
department has received notice from the court showing that the person has been
found not to have committed the violation of RCW 46.55.105, or that the person
has paid all monetary penalties owing, including completion of community
service, and that the court is satisfied that the person has made restitution
as provided by RCW 46.55.105(2).

Sec.
4. RCW
46.20.100 and 1990 c 250 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of licensing shall not consider an application of any minor under
the age of eighteen years for a driver's license or the issuance of a
motorcycle endorsement for a particular category unless:

(1)
The application is also signed by a parent or guardian having the custody of
such minor, or in the event a minor under the age of eighteen has no father,
mother, or guardian, then a driver's license shall not be issued to the minor
unless his or her application is also signed by the minor's employer; ((and))

(2)
The applicant has satisfactorily completed a traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW 28A.220.020, conducted by a recognized secondary school, that
meets the standards established by the office of the state superintendent of
public instruction or the applicant has satisfactorily completed a traffic
safety education course, conducted by a commercial driving instruction
enterprise, that meets the standards established by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and is officially approved by that office
on an annual basis: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the director may upon a showing
that an applicant was unable to take or complete a driver education course
waive that requirement if the applicant shows to the satisfaction of the
department that a need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle and
he or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to
jeopardize the safety of persons or property, under rules to be promulgated by
the department in concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education
section, office of the superintendent of public instruction. For a person
under the age of eighteen years to obtain a motorcycle endorsement, he or she
must successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course that meets the
standards established by the department of licensing.

The
department may waive any education requirement under this subsection for an
applicant previously licensed to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle outside
this state if the applicant provides proof satisfactory to the department that
he or she has had education equivalent to that required under this subsection;

(3)
The applicant possessed a valid instruction permit under RCW 46.20.055 for a
period of not less that six months;

(4)
The applicant possessed a valid intermediate driver's license under section 2
of this act for a period of not less than six months; and

(5)
The applicant has maintained a satisfactory driving record. For the purposes
of this section, an applicant's driving record is deemed to be satisfactory if
he or she has not been found to have committed or been convicted of violating
any traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles, a state drug or
alcohol law under chapter 66.44, 69.41, 69.50, or 69.52 RCW, being a driver
under twenty-one consuming alcohol under RCW 46.61.503, a seat belt requirement
under RCW 46.61.688, or other driver-related safety law of any state for at
least the period of one year immediately before the date of the application for
a regular driver's license.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.20.105 and 1987 c 463 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may provide a method to distinguish the driver's license of a
person who is under the age of twenty-one from the driver's license of a person
who is twenty-one years of age or older.

(2)
An instruction permit must be identified as an "instruction permit"
and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the department.

(3)
An intermediate license must be identified as an "intermediate
license" and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the department.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.20.120 and 1990 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
new driver's license, whether an intermediate license or a regular license,
may be issued and no previously issued license may be renewed until the
applicant therefor has successfully passed a driver licensing examination.
However, the department may waive all or any part of the examination of any
person applying for the renewal of a driver's license except when the
department determines that an applicant for a driver's license is not qualified
to hold a driver's license under this title. The department may also waive the
actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor vehicle by a person who
surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's previous home state
and who is otherwise qualified to be licensed. For a new license examination a
fee of seven dollars shall be paid by each applicant, in addition to the fee
charged for issuance of the license. A new license is one issued to a driver
who has not been previously licensed in this state or to a driver whose last
previous Washington license has been expired for more than four years.

Any
person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty days after the
license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ten dollars in addition to the
renewal fee under RCW 46.20.181. The penalty fee shall be deposited in the
highway safety fund.

Any
person who is outside the state at the time his or her driver's license expires
or who is unable to renew the license due to any incapacity may renew the
license within sixty days after returning to this state or within sixty days
after the termination of any such incapacity without the payment of the penalty
fee.

The
department shall provide for giving examinations at places and times reasonably
available to the people of this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---