BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to amounts proceeding or accruing (1)
under a written cost-sharing agreement for allocable reimbursement of
administrative services incurred on behalf of a foreign affiliate that engages
in a travel service business and (2) by a person that engages in a travel
service business and also holds a passenger vessel surety bond in compliance
with Subpart A of Part 540 of Title 48, Code of Federal Regulations.
"Affiliate" means a person who directly or indirectly controls, or is
controlled by, or is under common control with, a person. "Foreign"
means the affiliate is organized under laws outside the United States.

---
END ---