BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The department is authorized to process and render decisions on
applications for change or transfer under this chapter and amendments of ground
water rights under chapter 90.44 RCW as a matter of higher priority than
processing and rendering decisions on applications for new water rights. Any
application for a new water right for which a permit decision has not been made
by the department at the time a transfer, change, or amendment is approved
shall not be considered an existing water right subject to analysis as to
whether the application may be injured, impaired, or detrimentally affected by
the transfer or change.

---
END ---