BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.150.305 and 1997 c 265 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board of directors of school districts may contract with alternative
educational service providers for ((eligible students)) educational,
instructional, or specialized services under RCW 28A.320.035. Alternative
educational service providers that the school district may contract with
include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Other schools;

(b)
Alternative education programs not operated by the school district;

(c)
Education centers;

(d)
Skills centers;

(e)
Dropout prevention programs; or

(f)
Other public or private organizations, excluding sectarian or religious
organizations.

(2)
((Eligible students include)) The contracts may provide specialized
programs or services for any student or group of students. However, priority
will be given to programs and services that serve students who are likely
to be expelled or who are enrolled in the school district but have been
suspended, are academically at risk, or who have been subject to repeated
disciplinary actions due to behavioral problems.

(3)
If a school district board of directors chooses to initiate specialized
programs for students at risk of expulsion or who are failing academically by
contracting out with alternative educational service providers identified in
subsection (1) of this section, the school district board of directors and the
organization must specify the specific learning standards that students are
expected to achieve. Placement of the student shall be jointly determined by
the school district, the student's parent or legal guardian, and the
alternative educational service provider.

(4)
For the purpose of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall
adopt rules for reporting and documenting enrollment. Students may reenter at
the grade level appropriate to the student's ability. Students who are sixteen
years of age or older may take the GED test.

(5) The board of directors of school districts may require that
students who would otherwise be suspended or expelled attend schools or
programs listed in subsection (1) of this section as a condition of continued
enrollment in the school district.

---
END ---