BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to enhance the ability of basic education teachers to
address the needs and expectations of highly capable students in public
schools. The legislature further intends to stimulate development by local
schools and school districts of innovative and effective means of serving
highly capable students. The purpose of this act is to increase the
achievement of highly capable students by requiring programs for highly capable
students in basic education and providing funding for such programs in all
school districts in the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.185.020 and 1990 c 33 s 168 are each amended to read as follows:

((Supplementary)) Funds ((as may)) shall
be provided by the state for ((this)) programs for highly capable
students, in accordance with RCW 28A.150.370, and shall be
categorical funding on an excess cost basis based upon a per student amount not
to exceed three percent of any district's full-time equivalent enrollment;
however, the biennial omnibus appropriations act shall specify a minimum level
of funding that shall be provided to small school districts in which the number
of students generating funding for programs for highly capable students is too
low to adequately support services for highly capable students in those
districts.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.185.030 and 1984 c 278 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
school districts ((may)) shall establish and operate, either
separately or jointly, programs for highly capable students. Such authority
shall include the right to employ and pay special instructors and to operate
such programs jointly with a public institution of higher education. Local
school districts ((which establish and operate programs for highly capable
students)) shall adopt identification procedures and provide educational
opportunities as follows:

(1)
In accordance with rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction, school districts shall implement
procedures for nomination, assessment and selection of their most highly
capable students. Nominations shall be based upon data from teachers, other
staff, parents, students, and members of the community. Assessment shall be
based upon a review of each student's capability as shown by multiple criteria
intended to reveal, from a wide variety of sources and data, each student's
unique needs and capabilities. Selection shall be made by a broadly based
committee of professionals, after consideration of the results of the multiple
criteria assessment.

(2) Students selected pursuant to procedures outlined in this
section shall be provided, to the extent feasible, an educational opportunity
which takes into account each student's unique needs and capabilities and the
limits of the resources and program options available to the district,
including those options which can be developed or provided by using funds
allocated by the superintendent of public instruction for that purpose.

---
END ---