BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 15.09 RCW to read as follows:

SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS,
HORTICULTURAL TAX, APPROPRIATIONS FOR HORTICULTURAL PEST AND DISEASE BOARDS. Funding of the operating
budget of the horticultural pest and disease board may be derived from any or
all of the following:

(1)
Moneys from the county general fund or other general revenues, as appropriated
by the board of county commissioners or other county legislative authority;

(2)
A horticultural tax, as authorized in RCW 15.08.260, levied by the county board
of commissioners or other county legislative authority; or

(3)
An assessment against all lands except those exempted from the assessment under
subsection (4) of this section.

(4)
The assessment in subsection (3) of this section does not apply to forest lands
used solely for the planting, growing, or harvesting of trees and which are
typified, except during a single period of five years following clear-cut
logging, by canopies so dense as to prohibit growth of an understory. The
exemption provided by this subsection does not apply to any lands used to raise
hardwood trees such as, but not limited to, hybrid cottonwoods and cultivated
by agricultural methods in growing cycles shorter than twelve years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 15.09 RCW to read as follows:

SPECIAL
ASSESSMENT‑-RATES. (1) Prior to the levying of an assessment authorized
in section 1 of this act, the horticultural pest and disease board shall hold a
public hearing at which it will gather information to serve as a basis for
classification and then classify the lands into suitable classification,
including but not limited to orchard lands, range lands, dry lands, nonuse
lands, forest lands, or federal lands.

(2)
The board shall develop and forward to the county board of commissioners or
other county legislative authority, as a proposed level of assessment for each
class, an amount that seems just. The assessment rate shall be either uniform
per acre in its respective class, a flat rate per parcel, or a flat rate per
parcel rate plus a uniform rate per acre: PROVIDED, That if no benefits are
found to accrue to a class of land, a zero assessment may be levied.

(3)
The county board of commissioners or other county legislative authority, upon
receipt of the proposed levels of assessment from the horticultural pest and
disease board, after a hearing, shall accept or modify by resolution, or refer
back to the horticultural pest and disease board for its reconsideration all or
any portion of the proposed levels of assessment.

(4)
The amount of the assessment constitutes a lien against the property. The
county board of commissioners or other county legislative authority may by
resolution or ordinance require that notice of the lien be sent to each owner
of the property for which the assessment has not been paid by the date it was
due and that each lien created be collected by the treasurer in the same manner
as delinquent real property tax, if within thirty days from the date on which
the owner is sent notice of the lien, including its amount, the lien remains
unpaid. Liens treated as delinquent taxes bear interest at the rate of twelve
percent per annum and the interest accrues as of the date notice of the lien is
sent to the owner, however, any collections for the lien shall not be
considered a tax.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 15.09 RCW to read as follows:

AUTHORITY
TO ENTER INTO AGREEMENTS. The horticultural pest and disease board may enter
into agreements with federal, state, and local government agencies and Indian
tribes to perform any duties pursuant to the identification, detection,
control, eradication, or education of citizens regarding horticultural pests
and diseases.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
15.09.130 (Operating moneys) and 1969 c 113 s 13 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Captions used in sections 1 through 3 of this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---