BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and under eighteen
years of age shall cause such child to attend the public school of the district
in which the child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and
therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session
unless:

(a)
The child is attending an approved private school for the same time or is
enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW 28A.195.010(4);

(b)
The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (((4)))
(5) of this section;

(c)
The child is attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(d)
The school district superintendent of the district in which the child resides
shall have excused such child from attendance because the child is physically
or mentally unable to attend school, is attending a residential school operated
by the department of social and health services, is incarcerated in an adult
correctional facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his
or her parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the
parent: PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed
to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be
claimed as full time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise
have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and
shall not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW
28A.150.220; or

(e)
The child is sixteen years of age or older and:

(i)
The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that
the child should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated
in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;

(ii)
The child has already met graduation requirements in accordance with state
board of education rules and regulations; or

(iii)
The child has received a certificate of educational competence under rules and
regulations established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190.

(2)
If a parent enrolls a child six years of age and under eight years of age in
the public school of the district in which the child resides, that parent has
the responsibility to ensure the child attends, and the child has the
responsibility to attend, for the full time when that school is in session,
unless one of the exceptions in subsection (1) of this section is met. This
subsection does not apply to a child enrolled in a public school part-time for
the purpose of receiving ancillary services. An exception shall be made to
this requirement for children whose parents formally remove them from
enrollment in kindergarten if the child is less than eight years old.

(3)
A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent, guardian, or person
having legal custody of a child.

(((3)))
(4) An approved private school for the purposes of this chapter and
chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under regulations established by the
state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.

(((4)))
(5) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW,
instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and supervised
instructional and related educational activities, including a curriculum and
instruction in the basic skills of occupational education, science,
mathematics, language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing,
spelling, and the development of an appreciation of art and music, provided for
a number of hours equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level
established for approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040
and if such activities are:

(a)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and are
supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of
this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter
28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated
person" means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of
objectives consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average
of one contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the
certificated person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the
certificated person. The number of children supervised by the certificated
person shall not exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or

(b)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has
either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours or its equivalent
in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a
postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or

(c)
Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based
instruction by the superintendent of the local school district in which the
child resides.

(((5)))
(6) The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less
structured and more experiential than the instruction normally provided in a
classroom setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (((4))) (5)
of this section relating to the nature and quantity of instructional and
related educational activities shall be liberally construed.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.225.020 and 1996 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 fails to attend
school without valid justification, the public school in which the child is
enrolled shall:

(a)
Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a notice in
writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to attend school after
one unexcused absence within any month during the current school year. School
officials shall inform the parent of the potential consequences of additional
unexcused absences;

(b)
Schedule a conference or conferences with the custodial parent, parents, or
guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for
the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after two unexcused
absences within any month during the current school year. If a regularly
scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within thirty days of
the second unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and

(c)
Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These steps shall
include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school program or school or
course assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction,
providing appropriate vocational courses or work experience, referring the
child to a community truancy board, requiring the child to attend an
alternative school or program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain supplementary
services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes for the absence
from school. If the child's parent does not attend the scheduled conference,
the conference may be conducted with the student and school official. However,
the parent shall be notified of the steps to be taken to eliminate or reduce
the child's absence.

(2)
For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that a
child:

(a)
Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an average school day
or has failed to comply with a more restrictive school district policy; and

(b)
Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused absences.

(3) If a child transfers from one school district to another,
the receiving school or school district shall honor the attendance record
including the unexcused absences accumulated at the previous school or from the
previous school district.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.225.030 and 1996 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a child is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 and if the
actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are not successful in
substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences from public school, not
later than the seventh unexcused absence by a child within any month during the
current school year or not later than the tenth unexcused absence during the
current school year the school district shall file a petition and supporting
affidavit for a civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of
RCW 28A.225.010: (a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and
the child. However, if the petition alleges a violation of RCW 28A.225.010,
the petition shall only allege a violation by the parent. Except as
provided in this subsection, no additional documents need be filed with the
petition.

(2)
The district shall not later than the fifth unexcused absence in a month:

(a)
Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that establishes school
attendance requirements;

(b)
Refer a student to a community truancy board as defined in RCW 28A.225.025.
The community truancy board shall enter into an agreement with the student and
parent that establishes school attendance requirements and take other
appropriate actions to reduce the child's absences; or

(c)
File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is not an attorney.

(4)
If the school district fails to file a petition under this section, the parent
of a child with five or more unexcused absences in any month during the current
school year or upon the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year
may file a petition with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW
28A.225.010.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.225.035 and 1997 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 shall consist of a written
notification to the court alleging that:

(a)
The child has unexcused absences during the current school year;

(b)
Actions taken by the school district have not been successful in substantially
reducing the child's absences from school; and

(c)
Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the school district
or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.

(2)
The petition shall set forth the name, age, school, and residence of the child
and the names and residence of the child's parents.

(3)
The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations in this section
and shall generally request relief available under this chapter and provide
information about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4)
((When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030)) Upon receipt of a
petition and supporting affidavit from a school district alleging a violation
of RCW 28A.225.010 by a child subject to this chapter, the juvenile court shall
require that the child, a parent, and a school representative appear before a
truancy board as defined in RCW 28A.225.025.

(5)
Within thirty days of receipt of the truancy referral, the truancy board shall
meet with the child, a parent, and the school representative, and enter into an
agreement regarding expectations and any actions necessary to address the
truancy. The agreement shall be presented to the court for its approval. The
court may approve the agreement without a separate hearing.

(6)
Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4) of this section, if the
juvenile court finds that a truancy board would not be the most effective means
of addressing the underlying truancy due to extenuating circumstances, the
juvenile court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the
petition. However, a hearing shall not be required if other actions by the
court would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a
hearing is held, the court shall:

(a)
Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the school district
of the hearing;

(b)
Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the
hearing; and

(c)
Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights available under
chapter 13.32A RCW.

(((5)))
(7) The court may require the attendance of both the child and the
parents at any hearing on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.

(((6)))
(8) A school district is responsible for determining who shall represent the
school district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.

(9)
The court may permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either
party be represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad
litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district,
the court ((may)) shall permit a school district representative
who is not an attorney to represent the school district at any future hearings.

(((7)))
(10) If the allegations in the petition are established by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall grant the petition and enter an
order assuming jurisdiction to intervene for the period of time determined by
the court, after considering the facts alleged in the petition and the
circumstances of the juvenile, to most likely cause the juvenile to return to
and remain in school while the juvenile is subject to this chapter. In no case
may the order expire before the end of the school year in which it is entered.

(((8)))
(11) If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall
regularly report to the court any additional unexcused absences by the child.

(((9)))
(12) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the
extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who are subject
to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or child in
need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.

(13)
If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county the child
relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the receiving county shall,
upon the request of a school district or parent, assume jurisdiction of the petition
filed in the previous county.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.225.090 and 1998 c 296 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to:

(a)
Attend the child's current school;

(b)
If there is space available and the program can provide educational services
appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an
alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention
program, or another public educational program;

(c)
Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center.
Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian
school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private
programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the
child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept
the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by
contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to
enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall
contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the
child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate
that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly
basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district
shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the
remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter
into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d)
Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or

(e)
Submit to testing for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a
determination that such testing is appropriate to the circumstances and
behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the
mandatory attendance law.

(2)
If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may order the
child to be punished by detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may
impose alternatives to detention such as community service. Failure by a child
to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall not be punishable by
detention for a period greater than that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt
proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(3)
If the child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved
agreement with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, or if the child fails
to enter into an agreement with the truancy board, the truancy board shall
return the matter to the juvenile court for a hearing. If upon entering an
order the child continues to be truant, the juvenile court shall find the
child in contempt and impose a remedial sanction in accordance with chapter
7.21 RCW designed to immediately return the child to school, including the
actual imposition of detention. The court shall consider the fact that the
child was provided ample opportunity to attend school with assistance from the
truancy board.

(4)
Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010 or
28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of
unexcused absence from school. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with
violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence
in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that
the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020.
The court may order the parent to provide community service instead of imposing
a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended upon the
condition that a parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 shall
participate with the school and the child in a supervised plan for the child's
attendance at school or upon condition that the parent attend a conference or
conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of analyzing the causes of a
child's absence.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.225.025 and 1996 c 134 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter, "community truancy board" means a board
composed of members of the local community in which the child attends school. Juvenile
courts shall establish and operate community truancy boards. However, this
responsibility may be delegated to school districts with the agreement of both
the courts and the school district. The ((local school district boards
of directors)) juvenile courts may create a community truancy board
or may use other boards that exist or are created, such as diversion boards.
However, a diversion or other existing board must agree before it is used as a
truancy board. ((Members of the board shall be selected from
representatives of the community.)) Duties of a community truancy board
shall include, but not be limited to, recommending methods for improving school
attendance such as assisting the parent or the child to obtain supplementary
services that might eliminate or ameliorate the causes for the absences or
suggesting to the school district that the child enroll in another school, an
alternative education program, an education center, a skill center, a dropout
prevention program, or another public or private educational program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction shall provide, to the extent funds are
appropriated, start-up grants for alternative programs and services that
provide instruction and learning for truant, at-risk, and expelled students.
Each grant application shall contain proposed performance indicators and an
evaluation plan to measure the success of the program and its impact on
improved student learning. Applications shall contain the applicant's plan for
maintaining the program and services after the grant period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If
funds are appropriated by the legislature for this specific purpose the
superintendent of public instruction shall contract with the institute of
public policy or a similar agency to: Evaluate the effectiveness of the
petition process and community truancy boards in chapter 28A.225 RCW in
reducing truancy; determine whether students who do return to school after
being subject to court action create disruptions for other students in the
school, establish patterns of improved attendance, and successfully complete
their education program; and determine the costs imposed on school districts by
the petition process and other truancy-related procedural requirements required
by the legislature in 1992 and thereafter.

The
cost determination shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 15, 1999. The evaluation shall be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 15, 2000.

(4) This section expires December 31, 2000.

---
END ---