BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that the right of each treaty tribe to take anadromous
fish on their reservations is rooted in the historic Stevens treaties. Federal
courts have found this right was reserved and protected under the supreme law
of the land, is distinct from rights or privileges held by others, and may not
be qualified by any action of the state. Treaty fishing rights are also a
right reserved for off-reservation fishing, but it is to be in common with the
citizens of Washington state. The legislature also finds that the state has
been given the police power to regulate off-reservation fishing only to the
extent reasonable and necessary for conservation of the resource. The
legislature further recognizes that federal court orders allow treaty tribes to
become self-policing of off-reservation fishing by their tribal members if the
tribe meets and maintains certain qualifications and conditions. The
legislature finds that codification of United States v. Washington, 384
F. Supp. 312 (1974) (Boldt I) and subsequent case law is in the best interest
of all citizens of Washington state, tribal and nontribal alike, in order to
minimize misunderstandings, identify costs associated with compliance with
federal court orders, clearly define departmental responsibilities in
implementing the Boldt decision and subsequent case law, and maximizing
opportunity for seeking new areas of fisheries management cooperation between
the tribes and states.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

It
is reasonable and necessary for the conservation of the state's wildlife
resources to control poaching. It is therefore necessary for the state to
identify those who are fishing legally. To comply with federal court orders
and enable the state to readily differentiate between treaty right and
nontribal fishers and to assist in minimizing the burden on both treaty and
nontreaty fishers:

(1)
Each tribe must provide for tribal membership certification. At a minimum it
shall include a tribal member's identification by photograph in a suitable form
that shall be carried on the person of each tribal member when approaching,
fishing in, or leaving either on or off-reservation waters. The department
shall request from each federally recognized fishing tribe a sample
identification document to be carried by its tribal fishers by June 30th of
each year.

(2)
Failure of an individual tribal fisher to have proper identification on his or
her person when fishing, or when going to or from the fishing site, will cause
the fisher to be subject to state authority.

(3)
For the purpose of exercising treaty fishing rights, an Indian may only be
enrolled in one tribe. The department shall request an officially approved
tribal membership roll from each federally recognized fishing tribe by June
30th of each year.

(4)
A treaty right fisher may secure the assistance of other tribal fishers with
off-reservation treaty fishing rights in the same usual and accustomed places,
whether or not such fishers are members of the same tribe or another treaty
tribe. His or her spouse, forebears, children, grandchildren, and siblings may
also assist a fisher, but all assisting the fisher must possess the proper
identification.

(5)
If any person shows identification that he or she is exercising the fishing
rights of a treaty tribe, and if he or she is fishing in a usual and accustomed
place, he or she is protected under federal law against any state action that
effects the time, place, manner, purpose, or volume of their harvest of
anadromous fish and naturally occurring clams, oysters, geoduck, shrimp, and
sea cucumbers, unless the state has previously established that such an action
is an appropriate exercise of its power.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

Federal
court orders authorize the department to monitor off-reservation fishing by
treaty tribes with fishing rights. Monitoring is a reasonable and necessary
tool to assist the treaty tribes and the department as comanagers of the
anadromous resources of Washington state in readily identifying illegal
off-reservation treaty right fishing. The department shall request an
officially approved gear identification code from each federally recognized
fishing tribe by June 30th of each year so that department personnel and tribal
enforcement officers can readily distinguish legal fishing gear on the waters of
the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that federal court orders provide legal descriptions of
usual and accustomed fishing grounds for the federally recognized fishing
tribes in Washington. The legislature also recognizes that disputes exist
between western Washington treaty tribes over the federally adjudicated usual
and accustomed fishing places designated for each tribe. It is the responsibility
of the treaty tribes to resolve these disputes, have the federal courts approve
the decisions, and have the courts transmit the changes to the state. The
state has no ability to recognize claims of changes to these usual and
accustomed fishing places unless federal court action changes the boundaries.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that federal court orders stipulate the conduct of
treaty fishing in usual and accustomed places. The department shall recognize:

(1)
That the exercise of a treaty tribe's right to take anadromous fish and
naturally occurring clams, oysters, geoduck, shrimp, and sea cucumbers is
limited only by the geographical extent of the usual and accustomed places, the
limits of the harvestable stock, the tribes fair need for these species, and
the opportunity for non‑Indians to fish in common with Indians outside
reservation boundaries.

(2)
That in order for Washington anadromous fishing rules not to discriminate
against treaty tribes, the department's harvesting plan must provide for an
opportunity for treaty tribes to take, at their off‑reservation usual and
accustomed fishing places, a share of the harvestable fish as defined under United
States v. Washington, 384 F. Supp. 312 (1974) (Boldt I) and contemplated
under RCW 75.08.530.

(3)
That the state of Washington, or its officers, is authorized to arrest a member
of one of the federally recognized treaty tribes fishing in contravention of
state law outside of the area of his or her tribe's usual and accustomed
ground, even though the individual may prove, in their defense in any criminal proceeding
resulting from his or her arrest, that such an area in which they were fishing
is a usual and accustomed fishing ground of their tribe.

(4)
That in order to achieve the monitoring requirements of section 2 of this act,
it is reasonable and necessary for the department to be apprised of all
arrangements between tribes with overlapping usual and accustomed fishing areas
to avoid overharvest of the fisheries resource. The department shall request
that the treaty tribes provide details on the arrangements between tribes with
overlapping usual and accustomed fishing areas to avoid overharvest of the
fisheries resource.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that federal court orders stipulate the number of fish
allowed for ceremonial purposes is limited to the number of fish actually used
for traditional tribal ceremonies. The department shall count ceremonial fish
in the share of fish that treaty right fishers have an opportunity to take. To
minimize misunderstandings and simplify comanagement responsibilities, the
department shall request tribes taking ceremonial fish off-reservation to
notify the department as to time and area of ceremonial fishery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that federal court orders stipulate that fish taken for
subsistence shall be limited to the number of fish actually used for personal
subsistence consumption by tribal members and their immediate families. The
department shall count subsistence fish in the share of fish that treaty right
fishers have an opportunity to take. To help minimize public misunderstandings
of the tribal subsistence harvest right, the department shall seek to develop
jointly with each federally recognized fishing tribe, as a component of its
comanagement plan, agreements as to how subsistence fish will be separated from
commercial fish harvests and how the combined ceremonial, subsistence, and
commercial catch will impact the watersheds in which the harvest occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that federal court orders stipulate that the regulation
of off‑reservation Indian fishing by the United States, the state of
Washington, or northwest Indian tribes does not preempt the regulation by
either of the other two. Jurisdiction of each entity to regulate is unimpaired
by the exercise of another entity's jurisdiction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that federal court orders permit federally recognized
treaty tribes to become self-policing under the following conditions:

(1)
Treaty tribes may become self‑policing off the reservation if they meet
and maintain specific qualifications and conditions as specified under United
States v. Washington, 384 F. Supp. 312 (1974) (Boldt I) and subsequent case
law. Before self‑regulation is authorized, a tribe must establish to the
satisfaction of the department or the court, that the tribe has:

(a)
A competent, responsible, and well‑organized tribal government able to
adopt and apply off‑reservation fishing regulations that, if strictly
enforced, will not adversely affect conservation;

(b)
Personnel trained for and competent to provide effective enforcement of all
tribal fishing regulations;

(c)
Qualified experts in fishery science and management who are either on the
tribal staff or whose services are arranged for and readily available to the
tribe;

(d)
An officially approved tribal membership roll;

(e)
A provision for tribal membership certification. Each individual must have
photographic identification in a suitable form, and each individual must carry
the photographic identification when approaching, fishing in, or leaving either
on or off-reservation waters;

(f)
Full and complete tribal fishing regulations, which before adoption, have been
discussed in their proposed final form with the department and include in the
regulations any state rule that has been established to the satisfaction of the
tribe, or upon hearing by or under direction of the court, to be reasonable and
necessary for conservation;

(g)
A provision for the monitoring of off-reservation Indian fishing by the
department to the extent reasonable and necessary for conservation; and

(h)
Fish catch reports, as to both on and off-reservation treaty right fishing,
when requested by the department for the purpose of establishing escapement
goals and other reasonable and necessary conservation purposes.

(2)
When a tribe has fully met the qualifications and conditions of subsection (1)
of this section, the tribe shall be relieved of state regulation except to the
extent specified in the stated conditions. Failure of a tribe to either
maintain its required qualifications or to abide by and adhere to prescribed
conditions when established and not promptly corrected, shall suspend self‑regulation
by such tribe until that time as all required qualifications and conditions are
fully established.

(3)
A self-regulating tribe does not have the authority to enforce its off‑reservation
fishing regulations against persons who are not members of the tribe. However,
tribes should report an apparent misuse of the fishery to the state if a non‑Indian
is involved or to the tribe of a treaty fisher. If appropriate action is not
taken by the state, the report should be brought to the court for such action
as the court deems appropriate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that federal court orders permit state regulation of the
treaty fishing right in certain circumstances.

(1)
Except for tribes entitled to self-regulation of tribal fishing, the right of
treaty tribes to take anadromous fish may be regulated by the department in the
following manner:

(a)
State regulation of fishing rights must not discriminate against Indians and
must meet appropriate due process standards;

(b)
Every regulation of treaty right fishing must be strictly limited to specific
measures that before becoming effective have been established by the
department, either to the satisfaction of all affected tribes or upon hearing
by or under direction of the district court, to be reasonable and necessary to
prevent demonstrable harm to the actual conservation of fish. In order for a
state fishing rule to be reasonable and necessary for conservation, it must,
when considered in the context of the total regulatory plan, be designed to
preserve and maintain the resource;

(c)
State treaty right fishing rules shall be published either separate and apart
from other state fishing rules or as a separate and plainly labeled part
thereof readily distinguishable from other fishing rules;

(d)
No state fishing rules applied to off‑reservation treaty fishing can be
valid unless and until it has been shown to be reasonable and necessary for
conservation;

(e)
Arrest or seizure of property owned or in permitted custody of a treaty right
fisher under a rule not previously established to be reasonable and necessary for
conservation is unlawful and may be actionable as to any official or private
person authorizing or committing such an unlawful arrest or seizure; and

(f)
To meet appropriate standards, state fishing rules that affect the harvest by
Indian tribes on future runs must receive a full, fair, and public
consideration and determination in accordance with the requirements of chapter
34.05 RCW.

(2)
If any person shows identification that he or she is exercising the fishing
rights of a treaty tribe and if he or she is fishing in a usual and accustomed
place, they are protected under federal law against any state action that
affects time, place, manner, purpose, or volume of his or her harvest of
anadromous fish, unless the state has previously established that such an
action is an appropriate exercise of its power.

(3)
If a member of a nonself‑regulating tribe is alleged to be guilty of
misuse of the treaty fishery, such an incident is to be reported to his or her
tribe for adjudication, and failing prompt and appropriate action there, the
matter must be brought to the court for such action as the court finds
appropriate.

(4)
Any person who would qualify under chapter 34.05 RCW as having standing to
obtain judicial review of the department's failure to enforce any provision of
sections 2 through 13 of this act may file a petition for civil enforcement
seeking an order requiring performance and reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that it is in the best interest of all of the citizens
of the state to have rules that clearly spell out tribal and nontribal fishing
responsibilities.

(1)
The department shall meet with federally recognized fishing tribes to develop a
state treaty right fishing agreement. The agreement shall be completed
annually in time to be incorporated into the submission of tribal regulations
as required by federal court order for tribes seeking to obtain or maintain
off-reservation self-policing authority.

(2)
The department shall annually publish a state treaty right fishing agreement
that is either separate and apart from other state fishing rules or as a
separate and plainly labeled part that is readily distinguishable from other
fishing rules.

(3)
The department shall assist federally recognized Indian tribes to meet the
federal court-ordered requirements to become self-policing of off-reservation
fisheries enforcement. An Indian tribe, seeking to satisfy the qualifications
that its fishing regulations will not adversely affect conservation, must
promptly prepare its regulations and submit them to the department, which will
examine the proposed regulations for alleged inadequacies. Failing agreement
between the parties, the proposed regulations will be reviewable by the court
on application of either party.

(4)
The department may adopt fishing regulations of a self‑regulating tribe,
but only if state adoption is consistent with chapter 34.05 RCW. Before a state
rule can be enforced against any treaty fisher, the state must demonstrate that
the rule is designed to preserve, conserve, and maintain the resource.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall review a tribe's application to obtain or maintain
off-reservation self-policing authority within forty-five days and provide the
tribe, the governor, the leadership of the legislature, and the attorney
general with the findings of the review in writing. The department shall deny
the tribal request for self-policing authority solely for failure to meet the
federal court-ordered requirements in section 9 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall determine which department activities are
directly attributable to compliance with United States v. Washington,
384 F. Supp. 312 (1974) (Boldt I) and its subproceedings and provide a cost for
those activities to the natural resources committees of the house of
representatives and senate annually.

---
END ---