BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The employment security department shall administer an earned income training
credit program for persons either receiving an earned income tax credit from
the federal government for the prior year or who are dislocated workers.

(a)
The earned income training credit for persons receiving an earned income tax
credit shall be for an amount equal to fifty percent of the earned income tax
credit received, with a maximum of three thousand dollars. If training credits
are not used by the person, then additional credits may be accumulated up to
the maximum.

(b)
A dislocated worker, as defined in RCW 50.04.075, is qualified to receive an
earned income training credit in the amount of three hundred seventy-five
dollars per quarter of full-time employment during the eight quarters before
becoming a dislocated worker.

(2)(a)
Credits under this section may be accumulated over time. Credits must be used
within five years from the year in which they are received.

(b)
Recipients must have a minimum of one thousand dollars in credits before the
credits may be redeemed.

(c)
Credits are not transferable.

(3)
Earned income training credits may be used for:

(a)
Tuition at an institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016,
subject to available funding; or

(b)
Employee training, either with a current or prospective employer.

(4)
If training is provided under subsection (3)(b) of this section, there shall be
a contract between the employer or prospective employer, the employee, and the
employment security department. The employment security department shall adopt
rules setting standards for defining the training, employment, and wage
assumptions.

(5)
An employer who accepts the credit on behalf of an employee or prospective
employee for training may use the credit as a credit against taxes under
chapter 82.04 RCW in accordance with section 2 of this act.

(6)
Credits shall be available beginning January 1, 2000, for earned income tax
credits received for federal income taxes filed for the 1999 tax year.

(7)
Only persons who would qualify as resident students under RCW 28B.15.012 are
eligible for the earned income training credit program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter, the value of
state-approved, employer-provided or sponsored job training services designed
to enhance the job-related performance of employees. This credit is allowed up
to the value of the earned income tax credits accepted on behalf of employees
as provided in section 1(5) of this act.

(2)
The value of the state-approved, job training services provided by the employer
to the employee, without charge, shall be determined by the allocation of the
cost method using generally accepted accounting standards.

(3)
The department shall keep a running total of all credits granted during each
calendar year, and shall disallow any credits that would cause the tabulation
for any calendar year to exceed two million dollars.

(4)
The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the cost to the employer
of providing or sponsoring job training services determined under subsection
(2) of this section.

(5)
The department shall adopt rules and forms for the administration of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
earned income training credit reimbursement account is created in the custody
of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
reimbursement to institutions of higher education for earned income training
credits accepted by institutions of higher education. Only the commissioner of
the employment security department or the commissioner's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 50.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
employment security department shall report on the impact of sections 1 and 2
of this act to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1st of
even-numbered years, including:

(1)
The number of people receiving training;

(2)
The cost of the training;

(3)
The cost of program administration;

(4)
For those persons whose credits were used for training at institutions of
higher education:

(a)
Their employment status; and

(b)
The number of workers receiving tuition benefits by institution and general
area of study;

(5)
For those persons using the credit for employee training under section 1(3)(b)
of this act, a report on:

(a)
Their job and wage progression; and

(b)
The number of workers receiving training by industry, size of firm, and
occupation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act expires June 30, 2009.

---
END ---