BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.060 and 1987 c 109 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

(a)
Water masters shall be appointed by the department whenever it shall find the
interests of the state or of the water users to require them((.));
and

(b)
The districts for or in which the water masters serve shall be designated water
master districts, which shall be fixed from time to time by the department, as
required, and they shall be subject to revision as to boundaries or to complete
abandonment as local conditions may indicate to be expedient, the spirit of
this provision being that no district shall be created or continued where the
need for the same does not exist.

(2)
The department shall appoint a water master for each watershed management area
for which a plan has been adopted by a planning unit and by the counties with
territory in the watershed management area under RCW 90.82.130 and the plan
contains a requirement or request that a water master be appointed for the
management area.

(3) Water masters shall be supervised by the department,
shall be compensated for services from funds of the department, and shall be
technically qualified to the extent of understanding the elementary principals
of hydraulics and irrigation, and of being able to make water measurements in
streams and in open and closed conduits of all characters, by the usual methods
employed for that purpose. Counties and municipal and public corporations of
the state are authorized to contribute moneys to the department to be used as
compensation to water masters in carrying out their duties. All such moneys
received by the department shall be used exclusively for said purpose.

---
END ---