BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.78.130 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.130 are each amended to read as follows:

All
printing, binding, and stationery work done for any state agency,
county, city, town, port district, or school district in this state shall be
done within the state, and all proposals, requests, or invitations to submit
bids, prices, or contracts thereon, and all contracts for such work, shall so
stipulate: PROVIDED, That whenever it is established that any such work cannot
be executed within the state, or that the lowest charge for which it can be
procured within the state, exceeds the charge usually and customarily made to
private individuals and corporations for work of similar character and quality,
or that all bids for the work or any part thereof are excessive and not
reasonably competitive, the officers of any such public corporation may have the
work done outside the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.78.140 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.140 are each amended to read as follows:

No bill or claim for any such work shall be allowed by any officer
of a state agency or public corporation or be paid out of its funds,
unless it appears that the work was executed within the state or that the
execution thereof within the state could not have been procured, or procured at
reasonable and competitive rates, and no action shall be maintained against such
corporation or its officers upon any contract for such work unless it is
alleged and proved that the work was done within the state or that the bids
received therefor were unreasonable or not truly competitive.

---
END ---