BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that long-term lease-purchase agreements provide an
alternative to the traditional school construction process by enabling
districts to respond quickly to explosive enrollment growth and changing
student demographics with fewer up-front costs. It is the intent of the
legislature to authorize school districts to use capital project funds,
including state financial assistance, for lease-purchase agreements for school
facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.525 RCW to read as follows:

The
board of directors of any school district may use the proceeds of
voter-approved bonds, voter-approved levies, state allocations for financial
assistance, or other funds available to the district for: (1) Payment of an
installment purchase contract for school plant facilities; or (2) payments
under any financing lease the term of which is ten years or longer and that
contains an option by the school district to purchase the leased property for
nominal consideration. The authority granted by this section for the use of
moneys from such sources is in addition to, and not in limitation of, any other
authority provided by law, and the proceeds of voter approved bonds or tax
levies may be used for such payments to the full extent allowed by Article VII,
section 2 of the state Constitution.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.530.010 and 1991 c 114 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of directors of any school district may borrow money and issue negotiable
bonds therefor for the purpose of:

(1)
Funding outstanding indebtedness or bonds theretofore issued; or

(2)
For the purchase of sites for all buildings, playgrounds, physical education
and athletic facilities and structures authorized by law or necessary or proper
to carry out the functions of a school district; or

(3)
For erecting all buildings authorized by law, including but not limited to
those mentioned in subsection (2) of this section immediately above or
necessary or proper to carry out the functions of a school district, and
providing the necessary furniture, apparatus, or equipment therefor; or

(4)
For improving the energy efficiency of school district buildings and/or
installing systems and components to utilize renewable and/or inexhaustible
energy resources; or

(5)
For major and minor structural changes and structural additions to buildings,
structures, facilities and sites necessary or proper to carrying out the
functions of the school district; or

(6)
For payment of (a) an installment purchase contract for school plant
facilities or (b) a financing lease the term of which is ten years or longer
and that contains an option by the school district to purchase the leased
property for nominal consideration, but only to the extent such payment
constitutes a capital expenditure; or

(7)
For any or all of these and other capital purposes.

Neither
the amount of money borrowed nor bonds issued therefor shall exceed the
limitation of indebtedness prescribed by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter
amended.

Except
for bonds issued under RCW 28A.530.080, bonds may be issued only when
authorized by the vote of the qualified electors of the district as provided by
law.

The bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46
RCW.

---
END ---