BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A school district may impose a regular property tax levy for a two-year period
under this section to support the construction of school plant facilities or
the purchase, rent, or lease of building space or portable buildings, if the
voters of the district have defeated propositions for tax levies for such
purposes under Article VII, section 2 (a) or (b) of the state Constitution
twice within a twelve-month period.

(2)
A levy under this section may be imposed if the proposition submitted to the
voters received approval by at least a majority of the total number of voters
voting on the proposition at each election for the proposition, and is approved
by a majority vote of the school board.

(3)
A levy under this section may not exceed the lesser of the limits specified in
this subsection.

(a)
The levy rate per thousand dollars of assessed value in any year may not exceed
the rate that would have been imposed in the first year under the proposition
most recently submitted to the voters of the district under Article VII,
section 2 (a) or (b) of the state Constitution.

(b)
In the first year of a two-year levy, the levy rate per thousand dollars of
assessed value may not exceed ninety percent of the difference between (i)
three dollars and sixty cents, and (ii) the unequalized levy rate imposed by
the state for the same year.

(c)
In the second year of a two-year levy, the levy rate per thousand dollars of
assessed value may not exceed the difference between (i) three dollars and
sixty cents, and (ii) the unequalized levy rate imposed by the state for the
same year.

(4)
A school district may impose a levy under this section no more frequently than
four years in any six-year period.

(5)
A school district may pledge revenue received under this section for the
payment of principal and interest of debt issued for the purposes of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.525 RCW to read as follows:

Projects
funded with revenues received under section 1 of this act are eligible for
state funding assistance under RCW 28A.525.160 through 28A.525.182. Revenues
received under section 1 of this act qualify as school district matching funds
under RCW 28A.525.162.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy and
levies under section 1 of this act shall take precedence over all other
levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW
84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 84.52.069,
84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was
protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies shall be
reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of regular property
tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent
of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069
that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall
be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and
(c) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the
one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of
any property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of
tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate
no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts,
and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public
hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec.
4. RCW
84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular
ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts
hereafter named shall be as follows:

(1)
Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the
state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively
for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not
exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c)
the levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to
increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two
dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and
any road district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its
levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(2)
The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts,
other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing
districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties,
road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts.
The limitations provided in this subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at
the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility
district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2
of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as
authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or
emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance
affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; ((and))
(f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected
under RCW 84.52.120; and (g) levies imposed by school districts under
section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to levies under section 2 of this act.

---
END ---