BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that certain construction management techniques will improve
the effectiveness of construction and operation of new school buildings, and
that such techniques, including value engineering, constructibility reviews,
building commissioning, and professional construction management, will provide
better value to the taxpayers by reducing construction costs, improving
building operations, improving the building environment for the occupants, and
reducing future replacement costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.525 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state board of education shall adopt rules for appropriate use of the
following construction management techniques: Value engineering,
constructibility review, building commissioning, and construction management.
Rules adopted under this section shall:

(a)
Define each technique as it applies to school buildings;

(b)
Describe the scope of work for each technique;

(c)
Define the timing for implementing each technique in the construction process;

(d)
Determine the appropriate size of projects for the use of each technique; and

(e)
Determine standards for qualification and performance for each technique.

(2)
Except as provided in rules adopted under subsection (1)(d) of this section, in
allocating state moneys provided under this chapter, the state board of
education shall include in funding for each project, at the state matching
percentage, the cost of each of the construction management techniques listed
in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
When assigning priority and allocating state funds for construction of common
school facilities, the state board of education shall consider the adequacy of
the construction management techniques used by a district and the compliance
with the rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
Except as provided in rules adopted under subsection (1)(d) of this section,
the construction management techniques in subsection (1) of this section shall
be used on each project submitted for approval by the state board of education.

(5)(a)
School districts applying for state assistance for school facilities shall:

(i)
Cause value engineering, constructibility review, and building commissioning to
be performed by contract with a professional firm specializing in those
construction management techniques; and

(ii)
Contract or employ personnel to perform professional construction management.

(b)
All recommendations from the value engineering and constructibility review
construction techniques for a school project shall be presented to the school
district's board of directors for acceptance or rejection. If the board of
directors rejects a recommendation it shall provide a statement explaining the
reasons for rejecting the recommendation and include the statement in the
application for state assistance to the state board of education.

(6)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide:

(a)
An information and training program for school districts on the use of the
construction management techniques; and

(b) Consulting services to districts on the benefits and best uses
of these construction management techniques.

---
END ---