BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that current law authorizes school districts to use
nonvoter-approved debt to acquire real or personal property but not to
construct or repair school district property. It is the intent of the
legislature to authorize school districts to use nonvoter-approved debt, within
existing debt limits, to finance the acquisition, remodel, and repair of school
facilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.530.080 and 1991 c 114 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the authority granted under RCW 28A.530.010, a
school district may contract indebtedness for any purpose specified in RCW
28A.530.010 (1), (2), (4), and (5) or for the purpose of purchasing any
real or personal property, or property rights, in connection with the exercise
of any powers or duties which it is now or hereafter authorized to exercise,
and issue bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness therefor without a
vote of the qualified electors of the district, subject to the limitations on
indebtedness set forth in RCW 39.36.020(3). Such bonds, notes, or other
evidences of indebtedness shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter
39.46 RCW, and the proceeds thereof shall be deposited in the capital projects
fund, the transportation vehicle fund, or the general fund, as applicable.

---
END ---