BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that alternative financing agreements are available to
provide practical options to school districts to finance new school buildings.
One alternative is authorized by federal internal revenue service rules,
referred to as "63-20 financing," that allows nonprofit organizations
to issue tax exempt bonds to pay for facilities that will ultimately be turned
over to a governmental entity for ownership and operation. The nonprofit
organization is permitted to lease or sell the facility to the school district
to pay off the bonds. This arrangement would allow a school district or a
private entity, such as a developer, to contract with nonprofit organizations
to build new schools to serve the needs of the school district. It is the intent
of the legislature to authorize school districts to enter into such agreements.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.335.170 and 1990 c 33 s 360 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of directors of any school district may enter into contracts for their
respective districts ((for periods not exceeding five years in duration))
with public and private persons, organizations, and entities for the following
purposes:

(1)
To rent or lease building space((,)) and portable buildings((,
security systems, computers and other equipment));

(2)
To rent security systems, computers, and other equipment or to have
maintained and repaired security systems, computers, and other equipment
for periods not exceeding five years in duration; ((and))

(3)
To provide pupil transportation services for periods not exceeding five
years in duration; and

(4)
To lease, acquire, construct, or finance facilities with a nonprofit
organization that qualifies under federal internal revenue service rules to issue
tax exempt bonds for the purpose of acquiring or constructing a facility for
the school district.

No
school district may enter into a contract for pupil transportation unless it
has notified the superintendent of public instruction that, in the best
judgment of the district, the cost of contracting will not exceed the projected
cost of operating its own pupil transportation.

The
budget of each school district shall identify that portion of each contractual
liability incurred pursuant to this section extending beyond the fiscal year by
amount, duration, and nature of the contracted service and/or item in
accordance with rules and regulations of the superintendent of public
instruction adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.505.140 and 28A.310.330.

The
provisions of this section shall not have any effect on the length of contracts
for school district employees specified by RCW 28A.400.300 and 28A.405.210.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.52.053 and 1997 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and 84.52.043 shall not
prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when authorized so to do by the
voters of such school district in the manner and for the purposes and number of
years allowable under Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this
state. Elections for such taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is
made or, in the case of propositions authorizing two-year through four-year
levies for maintenance and operation support of a school district, authorizing
two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds established in RCW
28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies to support the
construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities, in the year in
which the first annual levy is made: PROVIDED, That once additional tax levies
have been authorized for maintenance and operation support of a school district
for a two-year through four-year period, no further additional tax levies for
maintenance and operation support of the district for that period may be
authorized. For purposes of this limitation, no two-year through six-year
levy made under this section may be considered as a tax levy for maintenance
and operation support.

A special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the
board of school directors, by giving notice thereof by publication in the
manner provided by law for giving notices of general elections, at which
special election the proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be
submitted in such form as to enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote
"yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "no".

---
END ---