BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.230 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No school district may issue a high school diploma to any person who by way of
age and gender appears to be subject to the United States military selective
service act unless:

(a)
That person displays proof of having registered with the selective service
system in accordance with the military selective service act; or

(b)
That person is not required to register with the selective service system and
files with the school district a written statement citing the applicable
federal law and certifying that registration with the selective service system
is not required.

(2) The state board of education shall adopt rules to carry out the
provisions of this section by June 1, 2002.

---
END ---