BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.32.534 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 220 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To implement an impaired dentist program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the
commission shall enter into a contract with a voluntary substance abuse
monitoring program. The impaired dentist program may include any or all of the
following:

(a)
Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b)
Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c)
Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d)
Referring impaired dentists to treatment programs;

(e)
Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired dentists including
those ordered by the commission;

(f)
Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and
support of rehabilitated impaired dentists; and

(g)
Performing other related activities as determined by the commission.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section
shall be financed by a surcharge of ((up to fifteen)) twenty-five
dollars on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department
of health from every dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW. These moneys
shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the
implementation of the impaired dentist program.

---
END ---