BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.81 RCW to read as follows:

When at least one state-wide measure or office is scheduled to
appear on the primary or general election ballot, the secretary of state shall
print and distribute a voters' pamphlet.

---
END ---