BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the purpose of this act to meet the needs of at-risk youth who can benefit from
greater community supervision and stability of housing. Therefore, the
legislature will provide funding for the creation of two residential setting
alternatives for juveniles who have been released from detention centers,
referred through the court system, or referred by the department of social and
health services. The residential setting alternatives will provide guidance
and life skills to juveniles at risk so that they may transition into society
as productive members. The programs shall be available as pilot projects for
at-risk males who are between the ages of fourteen and twenty-one years.
Studies indicate that males between the ages of fourteen and twenty-one years
are more likely than females in the same age group to become victims of
gang-related activities, violence and truancy.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.04.145 and 1990 c 33 s 551 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A program of education shall be provided for by the several counties and school
districts of the state for common school age persons confined in each of the
detention facilities staffed and maintained by the several counties of the
state under this chapter and chapters 13.16 and 13.20 RCW. The division of
duties, authority, and liabilities of the several counties and school districts
of the state respecting the educational programs is the same in all respects as
set forth in RCW 28A.190.030 through 28A.190.060 respecting programs of
education for state residential school residents. For the purposes of this
section, the terms "department of social and health services,"
"residential school" or "schools," and "superintendent
or chief administrator of a residential school" as used in RCW 28A.190.030
through 28A.190.060 shall be respectively construed to mean "the several
counties of the state," "detention facilities," and "the
administrator of juvenile court detention services." Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a school district from utilizing the services of an
educational service district subject to RCW 28A.310.180.

(2)(a)(i)
The juvenile supervision and education program is a residential program for
juvenile males, between the ages of thirteen and twenty-one years, who, as
determined by the department or court, need a stable living and education
environment that is not being provided in the home of the juvenile's parents or
guardian. Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense, as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030, is not eligible for the program. The program participant shall
agree to remain in the program for at least one year.

(ii)
The department shall establish residential supervision and educational programs
for those juveniles who have been released from a detention facility and need
or desire a further structured environment. Entry into such programs may be
determined by local superior court judges upon a finding that either the
at-risk male has exhibited behaviors that can be controlled in such a setting
or that such programs are beneficial for the at-risk male. The department may
refer low-risk males who, as determined, would function well in such a setting
and prevent possible future involvement in crime-related activity.

(iii)
The following locations shall be considered as sites for a juvenile supervision
and education program: A building located at Northern State Multiservice
Center; and the Interlake School located at Eastern State Hospital.

(iv)
The program shall be reviewed annually for appropriateness of setting.

(v)
The department shall contract with local school districts to provide
educational and vocational training programs at each of the locations.
Community groups shall be involved in the educational and social development
programs of the facilities.

(b)(i)
Such educational programs shall include, at a minimum, reading programs that
will ensure that juveniles assigned to the program can attain a minimum of a
sixth-grade reading level.

(ii)
The program shall coordinate with the school districts so that students shall
be taught reading, writing, and arithmetic skills along with instruction in
music, drama, or art. The educational program's goal is to assist students in
achieving high school graduation credits or a graduate equivalency degree
(GED).

(iii)
Students shall be evaluated on a biyearly basis for approval of setting and
progress. Progress reports shall be forwarded to the referring agency.

(c)
The ratio of supervision shall depend on the needs of the students but shall
not be fewer than those established under current state guidelines.

(d) Students who choose to remain at the facility after the age
of eighteen must obtain court approval and shall make arrangements to pay for
room and board on a sliding scale basis and for as long as the local superior
court deems fair, but no longer than the age of majority.

---
END ---