BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds and declares that:

(a)
Lying under oath is one of the most egregious threats possible to the integrity
of our system of justice;

(b)
Lying under oath has profound and harmful consequences not just for individuals
but for society as a whole;

(c)
When society allows people to lie under oath, justice is denied because judges
and juries are unable to reach just results; and

(d)
It is essential that people sworn to testify under oath tell the truth, the
whole truth, and nothing but the truth to prevent both the erosion of the most
fundamental element of the search for justice and the substantial endangerment
of individual rights.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that:

(a)
The truth be zealously pursued in our criminal and civil justice systems; and

(b)
Severe sanctions be leveled against people who lie under oath.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.72.020 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.020 are each amended to read as
follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of perjury in the first degree if in any official proceeding
((he)) the person makes a materially false statement ((which
he knows to be false)) that the person does not believe to be true
under an oath required or authorized by law.

(2)
Knowledge of the materiality of the statement is not an element of this crime,
and the ((actor's)) person's mistaken belief that ((his)) the
person's statement was not material is not a defense to a prosecution under
this section.

(3)
Perjury in the first degree is a class B felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 9.72 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever it appears probable to a judge, magistrate, or other officer lawfully
authorized to conduct a hearing, proceeding, or investigation that a person who
has testified before the judge, magistrate, or officer has lied in testimony so
given or offered false evidence, the judge, magistrate, or officer may impose
sanctions upon the person for contempt of court under this section.

(2)
The judge, magistrate, or officer, or any party may bring a motion for contempt
under this section before the end of the hearing, proceeding, or investigation.

(3)
The person committing the contempt of court under this section must be given an
opportunity to speak in mitigation of the contempt unless compelling
circumstances demand otherwise.

(4)
The order of contempt must recite the facts, state the sanctions imposed, and
be signed by the judge, magistrate, or other officer and entered on the record.

(5)
No person may be sanctioned for contempt under this section if the person
retracts the false statement or false evidence in the course of the same
hearing, proceeding, or investigation in which it was made or offered so long
as the person makes the retraction before the false statement or false evidence
substantially affects the hearing, proceeding, or investigation.

(6)
A judge, magistrate, or other officer, after a finding of contempt under this
section, may impose for each separate contempt a fine of not more than five
thousand dollars or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than thirty
days, or both.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. For
each year, beginning in 1999 through 2003, the administrator for the courts
shall:

(1)
Determine the number of charges of first degree perjury brought against persons
within the state of Washington, the resolution of the charges, and any
penalties imposed;

(2)
Determine the number of charges of contempt of court for lying under oath
brought against persons within the state of Washington, the resolution of the
charges, and any sanctions imposed; and

(3)
Submit a report of its findings to both houses of the legislature no later than
December 31st of each year. The administrator for the courts shall include any
available data for the year 1998 in its report for purposes of comparison.

(4)
This section expires July 1, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---