BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that released prisoners frequently remain in the county
containing the correctional facility from which they are released, resulting in
counties that contain correctional facilities having a disproportionate share
of released prisoners. The legislature intends to discover what impact this
disproportionate share of released prisoners has on the counties in which they
reside.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a special study to
determine:

(1)
Which counties retain a disproportionate share of released prisoners;

(2)
What the recidivism rate is in these counties compared to other counties; and

(3)
What is the cost impact of criminal justice and treatment services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Washington state institute for public policy shall report its findings to the
legislature no later than January 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the Washington state institute for public
policy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to carry out the purposes of
this act.

---
END ---