BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.44.026 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 732 are each amended to read as follows:

Checks in payment for claims pursuant to any health care service
contract for health care services provided by persons licensed or regulated
under chapters 18.25, 18.29, 18.30, 18.32, 18.53, 18.57, 18.64, 18.71,
18.73, 18.74, 18.83, or 18.79 RCW, as it applies to registered nurses and
advanced registered nurse practitioners, where the provider is not a
participating provider under a contract with the health care service
contractor, shall be made out to both the provider and the enrolled participant
with the provider as the first named payee, jointly, to require endorsement by
each: PROVIDED, That payment shall be made in the single name of the enrolled
participant if the enrolled participant as part of his or her claim furnishes
evidence of prepayment to the health care service provider: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That nothing in this section shall preclude a health care service
contractor from voluntarily issuing payment in the single name of the provider.

---
END ---