BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, health care carriers includes disability insurers
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care services contractors
regulated under chapter 48.44 RCW, health maintenance organizations regulated
under chapter 48.46 RCW, plans operating under the health care authority under
chapter 41.05 RCW, the state health insurance pool operating under chapter
48.41 RCW, and insuring entities regulated under chapter 48.43 RCW.

(2)
For purposes of this section and consistent with their lawful scopes of
practice, health care practitioners that provide covered chiropractic health
care services includes only chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW and
osteopathic physicians and surgeons licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW.

(3)
For purposes of this section, chiropractic health care services includes all
services included in the chiropractic scope of practice under chapter 18.25
RCW.

(4)
Health care carriers shall ensure that enrolled patients have direct access to
timely and appropriate covered chiropractic services from the health care
practitioner of their choice in accordance with subsection (5) of this section.

(5)(a)
Health care carrier policies, plans, and programs written, amended, or renewed
after January 1, 2000, shall provide enrolled patients with direct access to
the health care practitioner of their choice for covered chiropractic health
care services without the necessity of prior referral from another type of health
care practitioner.

(b) This section does not prevent health care carriers from
restricting patients to seeing only health care practitioners who have signed
participating provider agreements with the health care carrier.

---
END ---