BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.22.010 and 1989 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(2)
"((Late night)) Evening retail establishment" means any
business or commercial establishment making sales to the public between the
hours of ((eleven)) seven o'clock p.m. and ((six)) seven
o'clock a.m., except restaurants, hotels, taverns, or any lodging facility.

(3)
"Employer" means the operator, lessee, or franchisee of ((a late
night)) an evening retail establishment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.22 RCW to read as follows:

All
employers operating evening retail establishments shall provide to their
employees crime prevention training. Such crime prevention training shall be a
part of the accident prevention program requirements imposed under the
Washington industrial safety and health act of 1973, chapter 49.17 RCW, and
shall include, but not be limited to:

(1)
Providing a training manual developed and distributed by the department to
employers or a manual that has been certified by the department under this
section containing security policies, safety and security procedures, and
personal safety and crime avoidance techniques; and

(2)
Attendance at a training seminar or training video presentation developed and
distributed, or certified, by the department under this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.22.020 and 1989 c 357 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to providing crime prevention training as provided in ((section 2
of this act)) section 2 of this act, all employers operating ((late
night)) evening retail establishments shall:

(1)
Post a conspicuous sign in the window or door which states that there is a safe
on the premises and it is not accessible to the employees on the premises and
that the cash register contains only the minimal amount of cash needed to
conduct business: PROVIDED, That an employer shall not be subject to penalties
under RCW 49.22.030 for having moneys in the cash register in excess of the
minimal amount needed to conduct business;

(2)
So arrange all material posted in the window or door so as to provide a clear
and unobstructed view of the cash register, provided the cash register is
otherwise in a position visible from the street;

(3)
Have a drop-safe, limited access safe, or comparable device on the premises;
and

(4)
Operate the outside lights for that portion of the parking area that is
necessary to accommodate customers during all night hours the ((late night))
evening retail establishment is open, if the ((late night)) evening
retail establishment has a parking area for its customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department of labor and industries shall review and update existing rules and
administrative procedures to reflect changes made by this act.

---
END ---