BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW
43.97.015 (Columbia River Gorge Compact‑-Columbia River
Gorge commission) and 1987 c 499 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.97 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature of the State of Washington hereby ratifies the Columbia River Gorge
Compact set forth in this section, and the provisions of such compact hereby
are declared to be the law of this state upon such compact becoming effective
as provided in Article III and subject to sections 3 and 4 of this act.

A
compact is entered into by and between the States of Washington and Oregon,
signatories hereto, with the consent of the Congress of the United States of
America, granted by an Act entitled, "The Columbia River Gorge National
Scenic Area Act," P.L. 99-663.

ARTICLE I

COLUMBIA GORGE COMMISSION ESTABLISHED

a.
The States of Oregon and Washington establish by way of this interstate compact
a regional agency known as the Columbia River Gorge Commission. The commission
established in accordance with this compact shall have the power and authority
to perform all functions and responsibilities in accordance with the provisions
of this compact and of the Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act (the
federal Act), which is incorporated by this specific reference in this
agreement. The commission's powers shall include, but not be limited to:

1.
The power to sue and be sued.

2.
The power to disapprove a land use ordinance enacted by a county if the
ordinance is inconsistent with the management plan, as provided in P.L. 96-663,
Sec. 7(b)(3)(B).

3.
The power to enact a land use ordinance setting standards for the use of nonfederal
land in a county within the scenic area if the county fails to enact land use
ordinances consistent with the management plan, as provided in P.L. 99-663,
Sec. 7(c).

4.
According to the provisions of P.L. 99-663, Sec. 10(c), the power to review all
proposals for major development action and new residential development in each
county in the scenic area, except urban areas, and the power to disapprove such
development if the commission finds the development is inconsistent with the
purposes of P.L. 99-663.

b.
The commission shall appoint and remove or discharge such personnel as may be
necessary for the performance of the commission's functions, irrespective of
the civil service, personnel or other merit system laws of any of the party
states.

c.
The commission may establish and maintain, independently or in conjunction with
any one or more of the party states, a suitable retirement system for its
full-time employees. Employees of the commission shall be eligible for social
security coverage in respect of old age and survivors insurance provided that
the commission takes such steps as may be necessary pursuant to federal law to
participate in such program of insurance as a governmental agency or unit. The
commission may establish and maintain or participate in such additional
programs of employee benefits as may be appropriate.

d.
The commission shall obtain the services of such professional, technical,
clerical and other personnel as may be deemed necessary to enable it to carry
out its functions under this compact. The commission may borrow, accept, or
contract for the services of personnel from any state of the United States or
any subdivision or agency thereof, from any interstate agency, or from any
institution, person, firm or corporation.

e.
Funds necessary to fulfill the powers and duties imposed upon and entrusted to
the commission shall be provided as appropriated by the legislatures of the
states in accordance with Article IV. The commission may also receive gifts,
grants, endowments and other funds from public or private sources as may be
made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the
purposes of the commission and expend the same or any income therefrom
according to the terms of the gifts, grants, endowments or other funds.

f.
The commission may establish and maintain such facilities as may be necessary
for the transacting of its business. The commission may acquire, hold and
convey real and personal property and any interest therein.

g.
The commission shall adopt bylaws, rules, and regulations for the conduct of
its business, and shall have the power to amend and rescind these bylaws, rules
and regulations. The commission shall publish its bylaws, rules and
regulations in convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and of any
amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the party
states.

ARTICLE II

THE COMMISSION MEMBERSHIP

a.
The commission shall be made up of twelve voting members appointed by the
states, as set forth herein, and one non-voting member appointed by the U.S.
Secretary of Agriculture.

b.
Each state governor shall appoint the members of the commission, with senate
confirmation, as provided in the federal Act as follows: Three members who
reside in the State of Oregon, including one resident of the scenic area, to be
appointed by the Governor of Oregon; and three members who reside in the State
of Washington, including one resident of the scenic area, appointed by the
Governor of Washington.

c.
Six members shall be provided as follows: Three members who are elected in a
county election in the counties of Clark, Klickitat, and Skamania in
Washington, and three members who are elected in a county election in the
counties of Hood River, Multnomah, and Wasco in Oregon. Such elections shall
be held on the same schedule and in the same location as regularly held local
elections, beginning in November 2000.

d.
The terms of the members and procedure for filling vacancies shall all be as
set forth in the federal Act.

ARTICLE
III

COLUMBIA
RIVER GORGE APPEALS BOARD

a.
There is hereby created the Columbia River Gorge Appeals Board. The board
shall consist of four members qualified by experience and training in pertinent
matters pertaining to land use.

b.
Two members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor of the State of
Washington, with senate confirmation, and be residents of that state, and two
members shall be appointed by the Governor of the State of Oregon, with senate
confirmation, and be residents of that state.

c.
At least one member from Washington shall have been admitted to the practice of
law in the State of Washington, and one member from Oregon shall have been
admitted to the practice of law in the State of Oregon.

d.
The board shall have jurisdiction to hear any and all claims regarding land use
decisions made by the Columbia River Gorge Commission, including any decisions
that the commission makes regarding county ordinances. Upon the request of any
party, the board shall promptly schedule a conference for the purpose of
attempting to mediate the dispute. The mediation conference shall be held
prior to the hearing on not less than seven days' advance written notice to all
parties. All other proceedings pertaining to the appeal shall be stayed until
completion of mediation, which shall continue so long as all parties consent:
PROVIDED, That this shall not prevent the appeals board from deciding motions
filed by the parties while mediation is ongoing: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
discovery may be conducted while mediation is ongoing if agreed to by all
parties. Mediation shall be conducted by an administrative appeals judge or
other duly authorized agent of the board who has received training in dispute
resolution techniques or has a demonstrated history of successfully resolving
disputes, as determined by the appeals board. A person who mediates in a
particular appeal shall not participate in a hearing on that appeal or in
writing the decision and order in the appeal. Documentary and other physical
evidence presented and evidence of conduct or statements made during the course
of mediation shall be treated by the mediator and the parties in a confidential
manner and shall not be admissible in subsequent proceedings in the appeal
except in accordance with the provision of the federal rules of evidence
operating to compromise negotiations.

In
addition, either a county or the Columbia River Gorge Commission may also
request mediation. In such an instance, if deemed reasonable by the board, the
board shall call a meeting of those considered by the board to be essential to
the best implementation of the Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act.
The board may also make recommendations to both parties who have entered into
mediation and to both governors for the cooperation and best implementation of
the federal Act.

e.
Members shall be appointed for a term of six years and shall serve until their
successors are appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the
governor from which state the member was initially appointed, and shall last
for the unexpired portion of the term in which such vacancy occurs. The terms
of the first four members of the board shall be staggered so that their term
shall expire after two, four, and six years.

f.
Any member may be removed for inefficiency, malfeasance, or misfeasance in
office, upon specific written charges filed by the governor from which state
the member is appointed, who shall transmit such written charges to the member
accused and to the chief justice of the supreme court in the state from which
the member is appointed. The chief justice shall thereupon designate a tribunal
composed of three judges of the superior court from the state from which the
member is appointed to hear and adjudicate the charges. Such tribunal shall
fix the time of the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal shall be final
and not subject to review by the supreme court. Removal of any member by the
tribunal shall disqualify such member for reappointment.

g.
Each member of the board shall not be a candidate for nor hold any other public
office or trust, and shall not engage in any occupation or business interfering
with or inconsistent with his or her duty as a member, nor shall he or she
serve on or under any committee of any political party. Each member of the
board shall not for a period of one year after the termination of his or her membership,
act in a representative capacity before the appeals board on any matter.

h.
In all appeals the board shall have all powers relating to administration of
oaths, issuance of subpoenas, and taking of depositions, but such powers shall
be exercised in conformity with federal law. All proceedings before the board
or any of its members shall be conducted in accordance with such rules of
practice and procedure as the board may prescribe. The board shall publish
such rules and arrange for the reasonable distribution thereof.

i.
The board shall arrange to hold hearings, as required by its schedule, in both
Washington and Oregon.

ARTICLE
IV

EFFECTIVE
DATE OF COMPACT AND COMMISSION

This
compact shall take effect, and the commission may exercise its authorities
pursuant to the compact and pursuant to the Columbia River Gorge National
Scenic Area Act when it has been ratified by both states and upon the
appointment of four initial members from each state. The date of this compact
shall be the date of the establishment of the commission.

ARTICLE
V

FUNDING

a.
The States of Washington and Oregon hereby agree to provide by separate
agreement or statute of each state for funding necessary to effectuate the
commission, including the establishment of compensation or expenses of
commission members from each state which shall be paid by the state of origin.

b.
The commission shall submit to the Governor or designated officer or officers
of each party state a budget of its estimated expenditures for such period as
may be required by the laws of that jurisdiction for presentation to the legislature
thereof.

c.
Subject to appropriation by their respective legislatures, the commission shall
be provided with such funds by each of the party states as are necessary to
provide the means of establishing and maintaining facilities, a staff of personnel,
and such activities as may be necessary to fulfill the powers and duties
imposed upon and entrusted to the commission.

d.
The commission's proposed budget and expenditures shall be apportioned equally
between the states.

e.
The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements.
The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit
and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts
and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by
the appropriate state auditing official and the report of the audit shall be
included in and become a part of the annual report of the commission.

f.
The accounts of the commission shall be open at any reasonable time for
inspection by the public.

ARTICLE
VI

SEVERABILITY

If
any provision of this compact, or its application to any person or
circumstance, is held to be invalid, all other provisions of this compact, and
the application of all of its provisions to all other persons and
circumstances, shall remain valid, and to this end the provisions of this
compact are severable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Upon the passage of this act by the legislature, the secretary of state shall
send a letter to the congress of the United States, and to the legislature of
the State of Oregon. The content of the letter will provide notice of the
passage of this bill, indicating that it is the wish of the State of Washington
to amend the Columbia River Gorge Compact.

(2)
The secretary of state shall request notice from the legislature of the State
of Oregon and from the congress of the United States, regarding the passage of
this measure in each body. Upon receipt of notice from each body, the
secretary of state shall inform the legislature of the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The provisions of this act shall not take effect until such time as the
proposed amendment to the Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act in
section 2 of this act is approved by the legislature of the State of Oregon and
the congress of the United States.

(2) The date upon which notice is received from either the State of
Oregon or the congress of the United States, whichever is later, shall serve as
the effective date of this act.

---
END ---