BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.16 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that federally recognized Native American tribes are
guaranteed the privilege of hunting on all open and unclaimed lands within the
borders of the state of Washington. This privilege was originally established
through the Stevens treaties and has been affirmed through subsequent case law.

The
legislature further finds that it has sovereign authority under the United
States Constitution to regulate hunting in the state of Washington. The
legislature may establish regulations applying to Native American hunters who
hunt on open and unclaimed lands within the state, regulations that are
nondiscriminatory and are reasonable and necessary for the conservation of
wildlife species, as has been consistently upheld by state and federal courts.

The
legislature further finds that several federally recognized Native American
tribes regulate the hunting activities of their members on the open and
unclaimed lands of the state. Many tribes have implemented comprehensive
regulations that are effectively enforced by tribal officers both on and off
the reservation. The tribes have gathered valuable scientific data and information,
and manage their hunting activities in a manner that ensures species
conservation.

The
legislature further finds that the state has a reasonable and necessary
conservation interest in ensuring that the wildlife resources of the state are
not over-harvested. To this end, it is necessary to ensure that all hunters be
regulated by some authority. Regulation by either state or tribal authorities
requires the ability to verify which hunters are lawful and which are not. It
is therefore reasonable and necessary for conservation purposes that all
hunters be licensed either by the state or by tribes, and that every unlicensed
hunter be subject to enforcement action regardless of whether the hunter is
tribal or nontribal.

The
legislature further finds that it may establish regulations which are
rationally related to ensuring the public safety and welfare of the citizenry.
A considerable tension has grown between tribal and nontribal hunters based
upon perceptions of fairness and equity held by both groups. If left
unchecked, this tension has the potential to result in considerable animosity,
prejudice, and even violence. This tension can only be resolved through the
uniform and nondiscriminatory regulation of all hunters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall enforce the hunting laws and regulations of the state on
the open and unclaimed lands of the state. The department shall not enforce
such laws and regulations against any person possessing a hunting license,
which includes a picture identification, and a transportation tag, issued by a
federally recognized Native American tribal authority. In implementing this
section, the department shall not discriminate against tribal hunters in any
way, and shall fully enforce the hunting and conservation laws of the state.

(2)
The department shall review all tribal hunting laws and regulations, and
identify any tribal hunting laws and regulations that substantially impede the
enforcement of state hunting laws and regulations. If the department finds
that any tribal law or regulation impedes the enforcement of state hunting laws
or regulations, the department shall notify the tribal hunting authority responsible
for enforcing that tribal law or regulation, indicating the nature of the
impediment. The department shall request a meeting with the tribal hunting
authority, and take all reasonable measures to resolve the impediment to the
enforcement of state hunting laws and regulations. If the tribal authority
does not respond to the request of the department within sixty days, the
department shall enforce the hunting laws and regulations of the state on the
open and unclaimed lands of the state equally between native and nonnative
hunters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.16 RCW to read as follows:

The
attorney general shall assist the department in enforcing all state laws and
regulations reasonably necessary for the conservation of wildlife species. The
attorney general shall apply all state laws and regulations equally to tribal
and nontribal hunters on open and unclaimed lands within the state, consistent
with section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 77.16 RCW to read as follows:

In
the event of any act of God or naturally occurring disaster which causes
wildlife species of the state to become excessively vulnerable to hunting on open
and unclaimed lands within the state, the department shall enforce the laws and
regulations of the state against any person, including members of federally
recognized Native American tribes. The department may not enforce the laws and
regulations of the state against a member of a federally recognized Native
American tribe whose tribe has adopted rules or regulations that govern the
situation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 77.16 RCW to read as follows:

At
the request of tribal elders, if a hunting offense not proscribed by the laws
of the United States is committed by a nontribal hunter on the reservation of a
federally recognized Native American tribe, the offense is subject to the same
penalties provided under chapter 77.15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---