BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that it is in the interest of Washington citizens and
current and prospective higher education students for the state's institutions
of higher education to have in place an incentive system of performance funding
and accountability to encourage performance improvements in specified areas.
The legislature also finds that annual performance progress reports will draw
the attention of the public and the state's policymakers to important issues
related to students' educational attainment and learning outcomes.

(2)
The 1997 legislature established a performance incentive system when it placed
funds in reserve status for each institution of higher education and made
release of the funds contingent on specific performance achievements. This
incentive system resulted in one million four hundred sixty-five thousand
dollars of the ten million six hundred sixty-one thousand dollars held in
reserve for the six four-year institutions of higher education not being
approved for release. Under the provisions of chapter 43.79 RCW, these funds
will be directed to the education savings account. While the intention of the
1997 legislature was a performance incentive system, the resultant loss of
aggregate funding for higher education contradicts the legislature's goal of
maintaining institutions of the highest quality. Therefore, the legislature
intends to direct unreleased performance funds for fiscal year 1999 to the
Washington higher education improvement fund established in section 7 of this
act.

(3)
For future biennia, it is the intent of the legislature to provide performance
incentive funding rather than place funds in reserve. For the 1999-2001
biennium, the legislature intends to appropriate no less than ten million
dollars to the Washington higher education improvement fund established in
section 7 of this act. The purpose of the funding is to encourage public
four-year institutions of higher education to develop new, innovative, and
creative approaches to improvement in student learning outcomes. Further the
incentive funding would be used to encourage continued progress by the
four-year institutions of higher education in the following areas:
Undergraduate retention, graduation efficiency, graduation rates, and areas
unique to each institution of higher education. The incentive system would
also initiate new measures for student learning and distance education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

Four-year
institutions of higher education shall strive to make continuous improvement
and meaningful and substantial progress on all performance measures, and shall
report their progress to the higher education coordinating board and to the
legislature each year. Performance measures shall address undergraduate
retention, graduation efficiency, graduation rates, student learning, distance
education, and measures unique to each institution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

The
higher education coordinating board, in consultation with the four-year
institutions of higher education, shall develop criteria for a competitive
grant process. The higher education coordinating board shall use those
criteria to evaluate institutions' proposals for making progress in
undergraduate retention, graduation efficiency, graduation rates, and areas
unique to each institution of higher education. Subject to available funds in
the Washington higher education improvement fund created in section 7 of this
act, the higher education coordinating board shall award grants to the
institutions based on the strength of the institutions' proposals in meeting
the established criteria.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. In
collaboration with Washington's public four-year institutions of higher
education, the higher education coordinating board shall establish distance
education performance measures by June 30, 1999. Institutions of higher
education shall use these measures to establish baseline information by
September 1, 2000. The higher education coordinating board shall report to the
legislature in January 2001 on the outcomes of this effort and recommended next
steps.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

Incentive
funds may be used to reinforce institutional and state initiatives in the area
of student learning outcomes, and to encourage new assessment projects,
particularly in the areas of writing, quantitative skills, and technological
literacy. By 2003, all four-year institutions of higher education should have
student learning outcomes in place for every undergraduate academic program,
aligning those outcomes where appropriate with the K-12 and community college
systems. Beginning in December 1999, institutions of higher education should
report annually to the higher education coordinating board on progress in
establishing and assessing these outcomes.

Sec.
6. 1998
c 346 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a)
The salary increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the
allowable salary increases provided at institutions of higher education,
excluding increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases
related to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases
associated with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant
to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015.

(b)
Each institution of higher education shall provide to each classified staff
employee as defined by the office of financial management a salary increase of
3.0 percent on July 1, 1997. Each institution of higher education shall
provide to instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff,
academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants as classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, including those employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an average
salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1, 1997. For employees under the
jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015,
distribution of the salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable collective
bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to any
classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum for
the class to which the employee's position is allocated. To collect consistent
data for use by the legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies for policy and planning purposes, institutions of higher
education shall report personnel data to be used in the department of
personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with uniform reporting
procedures established by the department of personnel.

(c)
Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections
604 through 609 of this act may provide to instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians,
counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of
financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including
employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an additional average salary increase of 1.0
percent on July 1, 1997, and an average salary increase of 2.0 percent on July
1, 1998. Any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c) shall
not be included in an institution's salary base. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund‑-state support for an institution shall not
increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary
increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c).

(d)
Specific salary increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act
are in addition to any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(3)(a)
Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act shall submit plans for achieving measurable and specific improvements
in academic years 1997-98 and 1998-99 to the higher education coordinating
board. The plans, to be prepared at the direction of the board, shall be
submitted by August 15, 1997 (for academic year 1997-98) and June 30, 1998 (for
academic year 1998-99). The following measures and goals will be used for the
1997-99 biennium:

Goal

(i)
Undergraduate graduation efficiency index:

For
students beginning as freshmen 95

For
transfer students 90

(ii)
Undergraduate student retention, defined as the percentage of all undergraduate
students who return for the next year at the same

institution,
measured from fall to fall:

Research
universities 95%

Comprehensive
universities and college 90%

(iii)
Graduation rates, defined as the percentage of an entering

freshmen
class at each institution that graduates within five years:

Research
universities 65%

Comprehensive
universities and college 55%

(iv)
A measure of faculty productivity, with goals and targets in accord with the
legislative intent to achieve measurable and specific improvements, to be
determined by the higher education coordinating board, in consultation with the
institutions receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this
act.

(v)
An additional measure and goal to be selected by the higher education
coordinating board for each institution, in consultation with each institution.

(b)
Academic year 1995-96 shall be the baseline year against which performance in
academic year 1997-98 shall be measured. Academic year 1997-98 shall be the
baseline year against which performance in academic year 1998-99 shall be
measured. The difference between each institution's baseline year and the
state-wide performance goals shall be calculated and shall be the performance
gap for each institution for each measure for each year. The higher education
coordinating board shall set performance targets for closing the performance
gap for each measure for each institution. Performance targets shall be set at
levels that reflect meaningful and substantial progress towards the state-wide
performance goals. Each institution shall report to the higher education
coordinating board on its actual performance achievement for each measure for academic
year 1997-98 by November 1, 1998.

(c)
General fund‑-state appropriations made to institutions of higher
education under sections 604 through 609, chapter 346, Laws of 1998, shall be
reduced by any amounts placed in reserve for fiscal year 1999 that are not
approved for allotment by December 31, 1998, under the provisions specified.
An amount equal to the total of these reductions shall be appropriated to the
Washington higher education improvement fund in section 7 of this act.

(4)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop an
implementation plan for measurable and specific improvements in productivity,
efficiency, and student retention in academic years 1997-98 and 1998-99
consistent with the performance management system developed by the work force
training and education coordinating board and for the following long-term
performance goals:

Goal

(a)
Hourly wages for vocational graduates $12/hour

(b)
Academic students transferring to Washington

higher
education institutions 67%

(c)
Core course completion rates 85%

(d)
Graduation efficiency index 95

(5)
The state's public institutions of higher education increasingly are being
called upon to become more efficient in conducting the business operations
necessary to support the carrying out of their academic missions. The
legislature recognizes that state laws and regulations may have the unintended
effect of acting as barriers to efficient operation in some instances, and
desires to encourage the institutions of higher education to think beyond the
constraints of current law in identifying opportunities for improved
efficiency. Accordingly, the legislature requests that the institutions of
higher education, working together through the council of presidents' office
and the state board for community and technical colleges, identify
opportunities for changes in state law that would form the basis for a new
efficiency compact with the state, for consideration no later than the 1999
legislative session.

(6)
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to
increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the
1997-99 fiscal biennium. Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection
shall not exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from the academic year
tuition levels established by the legislature in RCW 28B.15.067.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington higher education improvement fund is established in the custody of
the state treasurer. Moneys in the fund may be spent only for the purposes of
sections 3 and 5 of this act. Disbursements from the fund shall be on the
authorization of the higher education coordinating board. The fund is subject
to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for disbursements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---