BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.010 and 1997 c 3 s 202 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing district
in any year shall be set so that the regular property taxes payable in the
following year shall not exceed the limit factor multiplied by the base
amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied for such district in the
highest of the three most recent years in which such taxes were levied for such
district plus an additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the
increase in assessed value in that district resulting from new construction,
improvements to property, and any increase in the assessed value of
state-assessed property by the regular property tax levy rate of that district
for the preceding year. The base amount of regular property taxes for each
year shall be computed without any amount resulting from a finding of
substantial need under RCW 84.55.0101.

---
END ---