BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. The legislature intends to authorize the establishment
of charter schools for the purpose of providing a unique setting for learning
that will improve pupil achievement and provide additional public school
choices for students, parents, and teachers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a nonprofit corporation that has submitted an
application to a sponsor or an alternate sponsor to obtain approval to operate
a charter school. "Applicant" also means a person or group of
persons who have prepared an application to incorporate as a nonprofit
corporation and who have submitted an application to a sponsor or an alternate
sponsor to operate a charter school. The nonprofit corporation must either be
a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490, or a
nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that has applied for
tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986
(26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)). An applicant may not be a sectarian or religious
organization and must be approved or conditionally approved by the internal
revenue service for tax exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) before receiving any funding
under section 15 of this act.

(2)
"Charter" means a contract between an applicant and a sponsor or an
alternate sponsor. The charter establishes, in accordance with this chapter,
the terms and conditions for the management, operation, and educational program
of the charter school.

(3)
"Charter school" means a public school managed by an applicant's
board of directors and operating independently of any school district board
under a charter approved in accordance with this chapter.

(4)
"Board of directors" means the board of directors of the public
benefit nonprofit corporation that manages and operates the charter school.

(5)
"Sponsor" means the school district in which the charter school is
located.

(6)
"Alternate sponsor" means the state and regional universities as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or The Evergreen State College.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
CHARTER SCHOOLS‑-POWERS. (1) The charter school's board of directors may
hire, manage, and discharge any charter school employee in accordance with the
terms of this chapter and that school's charter.

(2)
The charter school's board of directors may enter into a contract with any
school district, or any other public or private entity also empowered to enter
into contracts, for any and all real property, equipment, goods, supplies, and
services, including educational instructional services.

(3)
Charter schools may rent, lease, or own property, but may not acquire property
by eminent domain. All charters and charter school contracts with other public
and private entities must include provisions regarding the disposition of the
property if the charter school fails to open as planned, closes, or the charter
is revoked or not renewed. Charter schools may accept gifts and donations from
other governmental and private entities, excluding sectarian or religious
organizations. Charter schools may not accept any gifts or donations the
conditions of which violate this chapter.

(4)
Charter schools may not charge tuition, levy taxes, or issue bonds, however
they may charge fees to the same extent as other public schools and school
districts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. LEGAL
STATUS. A charter school is a public school including one or more of grades
kindergarten through twelve, operated according to the terms of a renewable
five-year contract granted by a sponsor or an alternate sponsor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
CHARTER SCHOOLS‑-EXEMPTIONS. (1) A charter school shall operate
independently of any school district board, under a charter approved by a
sponsor or an alternate sponsor under this chapter.

(2)
Charter schools are exempt from all state statutes and rules applicable to
school districts and school district boards of directors except as provided in
this chapter and in the school's approved charter.

(3)
A charter school's board of directors may elect to comply with one or more
provisions of the statutes or rules that are applicable to school districts and
school district board of directors.

(4)
All approved charter schools shall:

(a)
Comply with state and federal health, safety, and civil rights laws and rules
applicable to public schools;

(b)
Meet or exceed the student academic and assessment standards as established for
students in other public schools, including the essential academic learning
requirements and academic standards developed under a performance-based
education system according to RCW 28A.630.885;

(c)
Participate in nationally normed standardized achievement tests as required in
RCW 28A.230.190, 28A.230.230, and 28A.230.240;

(d)
Employ certificated instructional staff in accordance with chapter 28A.410 RCW;

(e)
Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW 28A.400.303;

(f)
Be subject to financial audit by the state auditor;

(g)
Comply with the annual performance report under RCW 28A.320.205;

(h)
Report at least annually to its sponsor or alternate sponsor and to parents of
children enrolled at the charter school on progress toward the student academic
goals and other provisions specified in the charter; and

(i)
Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
ADMISSION REQUIREMENTS. (1) A charter school must enroll all students who
submit a timely application. If capacity is insufficient to enroll all
students who submit a timely application, the charter school must give
enrollment priority to students who reside within the school district
boundaries in which the charter school is physically located. Priority also
must be given to siblings of students who are currently enrolled in the
school. Students must be selected through an equitable selection process, such
as a lottery, to fill any remaining spaces.

(2)
A charter school may not limit admission based on race, religion, ethnicity,
national origin, gender, income level, intellectual ability, disabling condition,
proficiency in the English language, or athletic ability. A charter school may
limit admission to students within a given age group or grade level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
CHARTER APPLICATION‑-CHARTERING PROCESS. (1) An applicant may apply to a
sponsor or alternate sponsor to establish a charter school as provided in this
section.

(2)
Before July 1, 2001, an applicant for a charter school must submit its
application to the local school district board of directors of the district in
which the proposed school is to be located. Alternate sponsors may not sponsor
charter schools before July 1, 2001. On and after July 1, 2001, an applicant
must submit its application to the local school district board of directors of
the district in which the proposed school is to be located before the applicant
submits an application to an alternate sponsor.

(3)
The local school district board of directors must hold a public hearing in the
school district on the application within sixty days of receipt of the
application. The school board must either accept or reject the application
within thirty days after the hearing. The thirty-day deadline for acceptance
or rejection of the charter school application may be extended for an
additional thirty days if both parties agree in writing.

(4)
If the local school board rejects the application, the school board must notify
the applicant in writing of the reasons for the rejection. The applicant may
submit a revised application for the school board's reconsideration. The
school board may provide assistance to improve the application. If the school
board rejects the application after submission of a revised application, the
school board must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the rejection.

(5)
If the school board rejects the application, the applicant may appeal the local
school board's decision to the superintendent of public instruction as provided
in section 11 of this act, or on and after July 1, 2001, may apply to an
alternate sponsor for a charter. The alternate sponsor must comply with the
procedures specified in the guidelines established by the superintendent of
public instruction as provided under section 8 of this act for consideration of
the charter application. The alternate sponsor is not bound by the school
board's findings or decision to deny the application.

(6)
The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain copies of all approved
charter applications. An applicant may obtain copies of those applications
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
GUIDELINES FOR ALTERNATE SPONSORS. By November 1, 2000, the superintendent of
public instruction must develop guidelines to implement the provisions of this
chapter that authorize alternate sponsors to sponsor charter schools on or
after July 1, 2001. Before July 1, 2001, only school districts may sponsor
charter schools, however institutions of higher education are encouraged to
form partnerships with school districts and applicants to assist with the
chartering process, operation, monitoring, and oversight of charter schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. The charter school application is a proposed
contract and must include:

(1)
The identification and description of the nonprofit corporation submitting the
application, including the names and descriptions of the individuals who will
operate the school;

(2)
The nonprofit corporation's proposed articles of incorporation, bylaws, and
most recent financial statement and balance sheet;

(3)
A mission statement for the proposed school, consistent with the description of
legislative intent in this chapter;

(4)
A description of the school's educational program, including curriculum and
instructional strategies;

(5)
A description of the school's admissions policy and marketing program,
including deadlines for applications or admission;

(6)
A description of student performance standards, which must meet those
determined under RCW 28A.630.885, and be measured according to the assessment
system determined under RCW 28A.630.885;

(7)
A description of the plan for evaluating student performance and the procedures
for taking corrective action in the event that student performance at the
charter school falls below standards established in its charter;

(8)
A description of school performance standards, which must meet those determined
under any state-wide accountability system adopted by the legislature under RCW
28A.630.885(3)(i)(i);

(9)
A description of the financial plan for the school. The plan shall include:
(a) A proposed five-year budget of projected revenues and expenditures; (b) a
plan for starting the school; (c) a five-year facilities plan; (d) evidence
supporting student enrollment projections of at least twenty students; and (e)
a description of major contracts planned for equipment and services, leases,
improvements, purchases of real property, and insurance;

(10)
A description of the proposed financial management procedures, including annual
audits of the school's financial and administrative operations, which shall
meet or exceed generally accepted standards of management and public
accounting;

(11)
An assessment of the school's potential legal liability and a description of
the types and limits of insurance coverage the nonprofit corporation plans to
obtain that are adequate. For purposes of this subsection, a liability policy
of at least one million dollars is required;

(12)
A description of the procedures to discipline and dismiss students; and

(13)
A description of procedures to assure the health and safety of students,
employees, and guests of the school and to comply with applicable federal and
state health and safety laws and regulations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
APPROVAL CRITERIA. A school district shall, or an alternate sponsor may,
approve an application for a charter school, if in the sponsor's or alternate
sponsor's discretion, after exercising due diligence and good faith, the
sponsor or alternate sponsor finds:

(1)
The applicant is a public benefit nonprofit corporation and the individuals it
proposes to manage the school are qualified to operate a charter school and
implement the proposed educational program;

(2)
The mission statement is consistent with the description of legislative intent
and restrictions on charter school operations in this chapter;

(3)
The school's proposed educational program is free from religious or sectarian
influence;

(4)
The school's proposed educational program includes student academic standards
that meet those determined under RCW 28A.630.885 and are measured according to
the assessment system determined under RCW 28A.630.885;

(5)
The application includes a viable plan for evaluating pupil performance and
procedures for taking appropriate corrective action in the event that pupil
performance at the charter school falls below standards established in its
charter;

(6)
The application includes school performance standards, which must meet those
determined under any state-wide accountability system adopted by the
legislature pursuant to RCW 28A.630.885(3)(i)(i);

(7)
The school's educational program, including curriculum and instructional
strategies, has the potential to improve student performance as measured under
section 9(8) of this act;

(8)
The school's admissions policy and marketing program is consistent with state
and federal law;

(9)
The financial plan for the school is designed to reasonably support the charter
school's educational program based on a review of the proposed five-year budget
of projected revenues, expenditures, and facilities;

(10)
The school's financial and administrative operations, including its annual
audits, meet or exceed generally accepted standards of accounting and
management;

(11)
The assessment of the school's potential legal liability, and the types and
limits of insurance coverage the school plans to obtain, are adequate. For purposes
of this subsection, a liability policy of at least one million dollars is
required;

(12)
The procedures the school plans to follow for discipline and dismissal of
students are reasonable and comply with federal law;

(13)
The procedures the school plans to follow to assure the health and safety of
students, employees, and guests of the school comply with applicable state and
federal health and safety laws and regulations;

(14)
The public benefit nonprofit corporation has been approved or conditionally
approved by the internal revenue service for tax exempt status under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)); and

(15)
The approval of an application will not result in significant financial impact
on the district as a whole. The superintendent of public instruction shall
develop guidelines for determining what constitutes a significant financial
impact in consultation with the chairs of the fiscal and education committees
in the house of representatives and senate and school district officials. The
guidelines must be developed by November 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
APPEAL TO THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION. If a sponsor or an
alternate sponsor rejects a charter application, the applicant may submit a
motion for appeal within thirty days to the superintendent of public
instruction. The superintendent of public instruction may select and convene a
review panel to review the appeal, to work with the sponsor or alternate
sponsor and the applicant to reach an agreement, to provide assistance to the
applicant to improve the application, and to make a recommendation to the
superintendent regarding the appeal. The superintendent shall conduct the
review using the substantial evidence test. If the superintendent of public
instruction approves an application to a school district sponsor, the school
district sponsor shall enter into a charter with the applicant. If the
superintendent denies an appeal from a rejection of the application by a
school district, the applicant may not apply to an alternate sponsor. The
superintendent of public instruction may not require an alternate sponsor to
enter into a charter with an applicant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. STUDY
OF CHARTER SCHOOLS. The Washington institute of public policy shall study the
implementation and effectiveness of this act. The institute shall make
recommendations to the legislature about the effectiveness of charter schools
and the impact of charter schools. The institute shall also recommend changes
to chapter 28A.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11, 13 through 21, 27, and 28 of this
act) including improvements that could be made to the application and approval
process. A preliminary report of the study is due to the legislature by
September 1, 2001, and a final report is due September 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
CHARTER AGREEMENT‑-AMENDMENT. (1) A charter application approved by a
sponsor or an alternate sponsor with any changes made during the application
process constitutes a charter.

(2)
A charter may be amended during its term at the request of either party and on
the mutual approval of both the charter school board of directors and the
sponsor or the alternate sponsor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
CHARTER RENEWAL AND REVOCATION. (1) An approved plan to establish a charter
school is effective for five years from the first day of operation. At the
conclusion of the first three and one-half years of operation, the charter
school may apply to the sponsor or alternate sponsor, as applicable, for
renewal. A request for renewal must be submitted no later than six months
before the expiration of the charter.

(2)
A charter school renewal application must include:

(a)
A report on the progress of the charter school in achieving the goals, student
performance standards, and other terms of the charter; and

(b)
A financial statement that discloses the costs of administration, instruction,
and other expenditure objects and activities of the charter school.

(3)
The sponsor or alternate sponsor may reject the application for renewal if, in
its judgment, any of the following occurred:

(a)
The charter school materially violated its contract with the sponsor or
alternate sponsor, as set forth in the charter;

(b)
The students enrolled in the charter school failed to meet or make reasonable
progress toward achievement of the student performance standards identified in
the charter;

(c)
The charter school failed to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal
management; or

(d)
The charter school violated provisions in law that have not been waived in
accordance with this chapter.

(4)
A sponsor or alternate sponsor shall give written notice of its intent not to
renew the charter school's request for renewal to the charter school within one
month of the request for renewal to allow the charter school an opportunity to
correct identified deficiencies in its operation. At the request of the board
of directors of the charter school, the sponsor or alternate sponsor shall
review its decision for nonrenewal after the charter school has corrected any
identified deficiencies. The sponsor or alternate sponsor must issue a
decision within sixty days.

(5)
The sponsor or alternate sponsor may revoke a previously approved charter
before the expiration of the term of the charter, and before application for
renewal, for any of the reasons specified in subsection (3) of this section.
Except in cases of emergency where the health and safety of children are at
risk, a charter may not be revoked unless the sponsor or alternate sponsor
first provides written notice of the specific violations alleged, a public
hearing, and a reasonable opportunity for the charter school to correct the
identified areas of concern. The sponsor or alternate sponsor of a charter
school shall provide for an appeal process upon a determination by the sponsor
or alternate sponsor that grounds exist to revoke a charter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
FUNDING. (1) When the sponsor is a school district:

(a)
For purposes of funding, students in charter schools shall be considered
students of the sponsoring district for general fund apportionment purposes.
The sponsoring school district shall provide funding for charter schools on a
per student basis in amounts the schools would have received if the students
were enrolled in a noncharter school in the district except that a charter
school shall not generate eligibility for small school assistance. Funding for
charter schools shall include regular apportionment, categorical, and nonbasic
education funds, as appropriate;

(b)
No local levy moneys approved by the voters before the effective date of a
charter between a school district and an applicant may be allocated to a
charter school unless the sponsoring school district determines it has received
sufficient authority from voters to allocate maintenance and operation excess
tax levy money to the charter school. For levies approved after the effective
date of a charter, charter schools shall be included in levy planning, budgets,
and funding distribution in the same manner as other schools in the district;
and

(c)
A charter school is eligible for state matching funds for common school
construction if a sponsoring school district determines it has received voter
approval of local capital funds for the project.

(2)(a)
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop recommendations for
funding charter schools sponsored by alternate sponsors. The superintendent
shall submit the recommendations to the education and fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and senate by November 1, 2000.

(b)
No local levy money may be allocated to a charter school if the charter school
is sponsored by an alternate sponsor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16.
ADMINISTRATION FEE. To offset costs of oversight and administering the
charter, a sponsor may retain up to three percent of state funding and local
excess levy funding, if applicable, that is being driven to the charter
school. Except for the administration fee in this section, no other offsets or
deductions are allowed, whether for central administration or other off-site
support services, from a charter school's per-pupil share of state
appropriations, local levies, or other funds, unless the charter school has
contracted with a school district to obtain specific additional services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
CHARTER SCHOOL LOAN ACCOUNT. (1) The charter school loan account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations shall be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only to
provide financial loans to approved charter schools for start-up costs.
Charter schools may receive up to two hundred fifty dollars per student for
start-up costs. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the
superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for expenditures.

(2)
Start-up moneys shall be distributed to schools with approved charters on a
first-come, first-served basis. The charter school must repay the loan within
five years. Interest shall be fixed at one-half percentage point above the
United States thirty-year treasury bill rate in effect at the time of the loan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. RULES‑-LOANS.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement section 17 of this act.

If
an applicant for a charter school receives a loan under section 17 of this act
and fails to begin operating a charter school within the next eighteen months,
the applicant must immediately reimburse the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for the amount of the loan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19.
LEAVES OF ABSENCE. If a school district employee makes a written request for
an extended leave of absence to work at a charter school, the school district
shall grant the request. The school district may require that the request for
a leave be made up to ninety days before the employee would otherwise have to
report for duty. The leave shall be granted for up to three years. If the
employee returns to the school district within the three-year period, the
employee shall be hired before the district hires anyone else with fewer years
of service, with respect to any position for which the returning employee is
certificated or otherwise qualified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. CAPS
ON CHARTER SCHOOLS. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, the maximum number of charters that may be granted state-wide in the
first school year after the effective date of this section is twenty-five. The
maximum number of charters that may be granted in the first two school years
after the effective date of this section is fifty. The total number of
charters that may be granted under this chapter is fifty.

(2)
The cap on charter schools shall not apply to public schools that convert to
charter schools.

(3)
Neither a school district nor an alternate sponsor may sponsor a charter school
in a school district with a student enrollment of less than one thousand
students until June 1, 2002.

(4)
For purposes of monitoring compliance with this section and providing
information to new charter school applicants, the superintendent of public
instruction shall maintain a running total of the projected and actual
enrollment at charter schools and the number of charters granted.

(5)
For purposes of implementing this subsection, a sponsor or alternate sponsor
shall notify the office of the superintendent of public instruction when it
receives a charter school application, when it approves a charter school, and
when a charter school is terminated. Once fifty charter schools are approved,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall notify all school
districts and potential alternate sponsors. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction shall notify all school districts and potential alternate
sponsors when additional charter schools may be approved due to charter school
contract terminations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. LABOR
RELATIONS. (1) Employees of a charter school are public employees. It is the
intent of the legislature that employees of a charter school may enter into
collective bargaining agreements with the board of directors of the charter
school under chapters 41.56 and 41.59 RCW, as applicable.

(2)
Teachers employed by charter schools are eligible for and retain their status
in the Washington state teachers' retirement system under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(3)
Classified employees employed by charter schools are eligible for and retain
their status in the public employees' retirement system under chapter 41.40
RCW.

Sec.
22. RCW
28A.150.010 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.01.055 are each amended to read as
follows:

Public
schools shall mean the common schools as referred to in Article IX of the state
Constitution and those schools and institutions of learning having a curriculum
below the college or university level as now or may be established by law and
maintained at public expense. A charter school as defined in section 4 of
this act is a public school.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. A
new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW to read as follows:

Teachers
employed by charter schools as defined in section 4 of this act are members
under this chapter. Charter schools are employers under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. A
new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW to read as follows:

Classified
employees employed by a charter school as defined in section 4 of this act are
members under this chapter. Charter schools are employers under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. A
new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter applies to charter schools as defined in section 4 of this act and to
the charter schools' employees in the bargaining unit. The bargaining unit of
employees of charter schools must be limited to the employees of the charter
schools and must be separate from other bargaining units within the sponsoring
or alternative sponsoring organization unless the charter school board of
directors and the exclusive bargaining representative of the charter school
employees agree to include the charter school employees in an appropriate
bargaining unit represented by the same employee organization in the school
district in which the charter school is located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. A
new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter applies to charter schools as defined in section 4 of this act and to
the charter schools' employees in the bargaining unit. The bargaining unit of
employees of charter schools must be limited to the employees of the charter schools
and must be separate from other bargaining units within the sponsoring or
alternative sponsoring organization unless the charter school board of
directors and the exclusive bargaining representative of the charter school
employees agree to include the charter school employees in an appropriate
bargaining unit represented by the same employee organization in the school
district in which the charter school is located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27.
RULES. The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter do not constitute any part of
the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29.
Sections 1 through 11, 13 through 21, 27, and 28 of this act constitute a new
chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 30. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---