BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.130.160 and 1993 c 367 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
a finding, after hearing, that a license holder or applicant has committed
unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with reasonable skill and
safety due to a physical or mental condition, the disciplining authority may
issue an order providing for one or any combination of the following:

(1)
Revocation of the license;

(2)
Suspension of the license for a fixed or indefinite term;

(3)
Restriction or limitation of the practice;

(4)
Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program of remedial
education or treatment;

(5)
The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the disciplining
authority;

(6)
Censure or reprimand;

(7)
Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period of time;

(8)
Payment of a fine for each violation of this chapter, not to exceed five
thousand dollars per violation. Funds received shall be placed in the health
professions account;

(9)
Denial of the license request;

(10)
Corrective action;

(11)
Refund of fees billed to and collected from the consumer;

(12)
A surrender of the practitioner's license in lieu of other sanctions. A
surrender of the practitioner's license shall not be imposed as part of a
stipulation to informal disposition under RCW 18.130.172.

Any
of the actions under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the
disciplining authority. In determining what action is appropriate, the
disciplining authority must first consider what sanctions are necessary to
protect or compensate the public. Only after such provisions have been made
may the disciplining authority consider and include in the order requirements
designed to rehabilitate the license holder or applicant. All costs associated
with compliance with orders issued under this section are the obligation of the
license holder or applicant.

The licensee or applicant may enter into a stipulated disposition
of charges that includes one or more of the sanctions of this section, but only
after a statement of charges has been issued and the licensee has been afforded
the opportunity for a hearing and has elected on the record to forego such a
hearing. The stipulation shall either contain one or more specific findings of
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, or a statement by the licensee
acknowledging that evidence is sufficient to justify one or more specified
findings of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice. The stipulation
entered into pursuant to this subsection shall be considered formal
disciplinary action for all purposes.

---
END ---