BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any part-time commission that has rule-making authority, performs
quasi-judicial functions, has responsibility for the policy direction of a
health profession credentialing program, and performs regulatory and licensing
functions with respect to a health care profession licensed under Title 18 RCW
shall be identified as a class five group for purposes of compensation.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member of a class five group
is eligible to receive compensation in an amount not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars for each day during which the member attends an official meeting
of the group or performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the
chairperson of the group. A person shall not receive compensation for a day of
service under this section if the person (a) occupies a position, normally
regarded as full-time in nature, in any agency of the federal government,
Washington state government, or Washington state local government; and (b)
receives any compensation from such government for working that day.

(3) Compensation may be paid a member under this section only if it
is necessarily incurred in the course of authorized business consistent with
the responsibilities of the commission established by law.

---
END ---