BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
registration of surgical technologists is in the interest of the public health,
safety, and welfare.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of health.

(2)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(3)
"Surgical technologist" means a person, regardless of title, who is
supervised in the surgical setting under the delegation of authority of a
health care practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license and
under the laws of this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. No
person may represent oneself as a surgical technologist by use of any title or
description without being registered by the department under the provisions of
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1)
The practice of an individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws
of this state and performing services within his or her authorized scope of
practice;

(2)
The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States
while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United
States;

(3)
The practice by a person who is a regular student in an educational program
approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a
regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the
general supervision of the instructor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In
addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the
authority to:

(1)
Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement this chapter;

(2)
Establish all registration and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3)
Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4)
Register an applicant or deny registration based upon unprofessional conduct or
impairment governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5)
Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to
implement this chapter; and

(6)
Maintain the official department record of all applicants and persons with
registrations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. An
applicant shall identify the name and address of the applicant and other
information required by the secretary necessary to establish whether there are
grounds for denial of a registration or conditional registration under chapter
18.130 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
secretary shall register an applicant on forms provided by the secretary. Each
applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The
fee shall accompany the application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for
renewal of registration. Failure to renew shall invalidate the registration
and all privileges granted by the registration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unregistered practice,
the issuance and denial of registration, and the discipline of persons
registered under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining
authority under this chapter.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.130.040 and 1998 c 243 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions
having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a)
The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following
professions:

(i)
Dispensing opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii)
Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii)
Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv)
Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v)
Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi)
Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii)
Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii)
Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under
chapter 18.84 RCW;

(ix)
Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x)
Persons registered or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi)
Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii)
Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii)
Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv)
Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv)
Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi)
Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii)
Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii)
Persons registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under
RCW 18.48.020;

(xix)
Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW; ((and))

(xx)
Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; and

(xxi)
Surgical technologists registered under chapter 18.--- RCW (sections 1 through
9 of this act).

(b)
The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i)
The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii)
The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25
RCW;

(iii)
The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv)
The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v)
The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in
chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi)
The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii)
The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57
RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii)
The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix)
The medical quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW
governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A
RCW;

(x)
The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi)
The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii)
The nursing care quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79
RCW governing licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii)
The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established
in chapter 18.83 RCW; and

(xiv)
The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3)
In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining
authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions
and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters specified in
subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs any investigation,
hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a
license conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered
pursuant to RCW 18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4)
All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially
consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---