BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that many youth are living on the streets in dangerous
situations. Many of these youth do not have a nurturing nuclear family, and
state-sponsored alternatives such as foster homes do not address the needs of
this population. The number of licensed residential beds for older adolescents
has declined dramatically over the past fifteen years. The legislature finds
that additional placement and treatment services are needed for dependent youth
ages sixteen to eighteen. The legislature finds that the failure to provide
safe, time limited residential and transitional living services places
thousands of older adolescents at risk of predators, drug abuse, prostitution,
isolation, and hopelessness. The legislature further finds that this act will
engage youth and provide them access to services through development of life
skills in a setting that supports them.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

This
act may be known and cited as the homeless youth prevention, protection, and
education act, or the HOPE act.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.15.020 and 1998 c 269 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031, and unless otherwise
clearly indicated by the context thereof, the following terms shall mean:

(1)
"Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or persons
with developmental disabilities for control, care, or maintenance outside their
own homes, or which places, arranges the placement of, or assists in the
placement of children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental
disabilities for foster care or placement of children for adoption, and shall
include the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the
agency or to the children, expectant mothers or persons with developmental
disabilities for services rendered:

(a)
"Child day-care center" means an agency which regularly provides care
for a group of children for periods of less than twenty-four hours;

(b)
"Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or
children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;

(c)
"Community facility" means a group care facility operated for the
care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county
detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW
13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the department is not a community
facility;

(d)
"Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a temporary
protective residential facility operated to perform the duties specified in
chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW 74.13.032 through 74.13.036;

(e)
"Family day-care provider" means a child day-care provider who
regularly provides child day care for not more than twelve children in the
provider's home in the family living quarters;

(f)
"Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly provides care on
a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant mothers, or persons
with developmental disabilities in the family abode of the person or persons
under whose direct care and supervision the child, expectant mother, or person
with a developmental disability is placed;

(g)
"Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family
home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group of children on a
twenty-four hour basis;

(h)
"HOPE center" means an agency that provides temporary residential
placement and other transitional services to street youth for a maximum period
of thirty days while services are arranged and permanent placement is
coordinated;

(i)
"Maternity service" means an agency which provides or arranges for
care or services to expectant mothers, before or during confinement, or which
provides care as needed to mothers and their infants after confinement;

(((i)))
(j) "Responsible living skills program" means an agency that
provides residential and transitional living services to youth ages sixteen to
eighteen who are unable to live at home or in other licensed agencies or are
currently living in an unsafe location;

(k)
"Service provider" means the entity that operates a community
facility.

(2)
"Agency" shall not include the following:

(a)
Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with developmental
disability in the following ways:

(i)
Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins,
nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes
of grand, great, or great-great;

(ii)
Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(iii)
A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the
natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives
of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;

(iv)
Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection (2)(a),
even after the marriage is terminated; or

(v)
Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's
tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the
age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle,
brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or
second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a
twenty-four-hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(b)
Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother, or persons with
developmental disabilities;

(c)
Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or
without compensation, where: (i) The person providing care for periods of less
than twenty-four hours does not conduct such activity on an ongoing, regularly
scheduled basis for the purpose of engaging in business, which includes, but is
not limited to, advertising such care; or (ii) the parent and person providing
care on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement in writing and
the state is not providing any payment for the care;

(d)
Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one another's
children;

(e)
A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or
similar services to exchange students or international student exchange
visitors or persons who have the care of an exchange student in their home;

(f)
Nursery schools or kindergartens which are engaged primarily in educational
work with preschool children and in which no child is enrolled on a regular
basis for more than four hours per day;

(g)
Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged primarily in education,
operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic
curriculum, accept only school-age children and do not accept custody of
children;

(h)
Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged primarily in
recreational or educational activities;

(i)
Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when performing functions
defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
and boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;

(j)
Licensed physicians or lawyers;

(k)
Facilities providing care to children for periods of less than twenty-four
hours whose parents remain on the premises to participate in activities other
than employment;

(l)
Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;

(m)
Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years prior to June 8,
1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance from any state or
federal agency, and is supported in part by an endowment or trust fund;

(n)
Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of adoption, if the child
was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized
public or tribal agency or court or if a replacement report has been filed
under chapter 26.33 RCW and the placement has been approved by the court;

(o)
An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal government or an
agency, located within the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian
reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;

(p)
An agency located on a federal military reservation, except where the military
authorities request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements
of this chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(4)
"Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been
sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department
under RCW 13.40.185.

(5)
"Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out
of compliance with licensing standards.

(6)
"Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care to be
maintained by an agency.

(7)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(8)
"Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen who is not
living with a parent or legal guardian, is not living in a licensed agency
under this chapter, and is currently living in an unsafe location not intended
for occupancy by a minor.

(9)
"Transitional living services" include, but are not limited to, the
following:

(a)
Educational services, including basic literacy and computational skills
training, either in local alternative or public high schools or in a high
school equivalency program that leads to obtaining a high school equivalency
degree;

(b)
Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational training or higher
education, job readiness, job search assistance, and placement programs;

(c)
Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money management, home
management, consumer skills, parenting, health care, access to community
resources, and transportation and housing options;

(d)
Individual and group counseling with emphasis on issues of abuse, sexual abuse,
prostitution, drug and alcohol abuse, depression, motivation, self-esteem, and
interpersonal and social skills training and development;

(e)
Recognizing and facilitating long-term relationships with significant adults;
and

(f)
Establishing working relationships with federal agencies and state and local
organizations involved in job training, vocational education and training, and
vocational rehabilitation.

Transitional
living services shall be tailored to meet the needs of each individual youth.
If a youth demonstrates a consistent unwillingness to participate in the
acquisition of transitional living skills and services, a reassessment shall be
done of the youth's appropriateness for the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall contract for the establishment of HOPE centers in
communities across the state, within funds appropriated by the legislature
specifically for this purpose. Street youth may be served in HOPE centers for
a period not to exceed thirty days in one calendar year. Street youth admitted
to a HOPE center shall agree to remain for up to thirty days while services are
provided and a long-term placement can be arranged. Street youth may only
leave a HOPE center with the permission of the center administrator or
designee. The HOPE center administrator shall set conditions under which
street youth may leave the facility, including, requiring the youth to specify
their destination and expected time of return, and the possibility of requiring
staff accompaniment.

Street
youth who run away from a HOPE center may be readmitted, at the discretion of
the administrator.

(2)
The department shall contract for placement and liaison specialists in each
community served by a HOPE center. The department shall contract for one
placement and liaison specialist for every fifteen youth served in a HOPE
center. The placement and liaison specialist shall have a master's degree in
counseling, social work, or related field and at least one year of experience
working with street youth or a bachelor of arts degree in social work or a
related field and five years of experience working with street youth.
Placement and liaison specialists shall have training or expertise in mental
health and chemical dependency treatment for youth.

(3)
The placement and liaison specialist shall:

(a)
Conduct an assessment of the street youth that includes a determination of the
street youth's legal status regarding residential placement;

(b)
Facilitate the street youth's return to his or her legally authorized residence
at the earliest possible date or initiate processes to arrange legally
authorized appropriate placement. Any street youth who may be a dependent
child under chapter 13.34 RCW shall be referred to the department. The
department shall determine whether a dependency petition should be filed under
chapter 13.34 RCW;

(c)
Interface with other relevant resources and system representatives to secure
long-term residential placement and other needed services for the street youth;

(d)
Be assigned to each youth within seventy-two hours of the youth receiving HOPE
center services;

(e)
Develop a therapeutic relationship with the youth that enables the specialist
to help the street youth receive appropriate services from social service and
child welfare agencies;

(f)
Facilitate a physical examination of any street youth who has not seen a
physician within one year prior to residence in a HOPE center;

(g)
Provide outreach services; and

(h)
Arrange an educational assessment to measure the street youth's competency
level in reading, writing, and basic mathematics, and that will measure
learning disabilities or special needs.

(4)
Each HOPE center shall have an administrator who has a master's degree in
counseling, social work, or a related field and at least one year of experience
working with street youth, who will work with the placement and liaison
specialist to provide appropriate services on site;

(5)
The department shall establish a data collection system that measures outcomes
for the population served, and enables research and evaluation that can be used
for future program development and service delivery. The department shall
establish confidentiality rules and protocols for the data collection system.

(6)
The HOPE center administrator shall comply with the notification requirements
contained in RCW 13.32A.082.

(7)
The HOPE center administrator shall notify the parent of a street youth and the
appropriate law enforcement agency immediately as to any unauthorized leave
from the center by a street youth placed at the center.

(8)
The department must approve or deny the placement of a street youth in a HOPE
center if the youth is a dependent child under chapter 13.34 RCW. Street youth
who are not a dependent child under chapter 13.34 RCW may be placed voluntarily
in a HOPE center by a parent or legal guardian.

(9)
The HOPE center shall provide counseling and education services to street youth
served at the center.

(10)
The HOPE center may accept self referrals, and referrals from parents, police,
and other licensed agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall establish responsible living skills programs in communities
across the state, within funds provided by the legislature specifically for
that purpose. Responsible living skills programs shall have the following:

(1)
A professional staff person with a master's degree in counseling, social work,
or related field and at least one year of experience working with older
adolescents. The professional staff person shall provide counseling services
and interface with other relevant resources and systems to prepare the youth
for adult living. The professional staff person shall have training or
expertise in mental health and chemical dependency treatment for youth;

(2)
Other staff trained in the development needs of older adolescents eligible to participate
in responsible living skills programs;

(3)
Transitional living services and a therapeutic model of service delivery that
provides necessary program supervision of residents and at the same time
includes a philosophy, program structure, and treatment planning that
emphasizes achievement of competency in independent living skills. A baseline
skill level in ability to function productively and independently shall be
determined at entry. Performance shall be measured and must demonstrate
improvement from involvement in the program. Each resident shall have a plan
for achieving independent living skills. The plan shall be written within the
first thirty days of placement; and

(4)
A data collection system that measures outcomes for the population served, and
enables research and evaluation that can be used for future program development
and service delivery. The department shall establish confidentiality rules and
protocols for the data collection system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

To
be eligible for placement in a responsible living skills program, the youth
shall be between the ages of sixteen and eighteen and unable to live at home or
in other licensed agencies, or is currently living in an unsafe location.
Responsible living skills programs must have parental authorization and
financial support of the placement for a voluntary placement, or a court order
pursuant to a dependency petition under chapter 13.34 RCW placing the youth in
the responsible living skills program.

Sec.
7. RCW
13.34.130 and 1998 c 314 s 2 and 1998 c 130 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

If,
after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has been proven by a
preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of
RCW 13.34.030; after consideration of the predisposition report prepared
pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a disposition hearing has been held
pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court shall enter an order of disposition
pursuant to this section.

(1)
The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the case:

(a)
Order a disposition other than removal of the child from his or her home, which
shall provide a program designed to alleviate the immediate danger to the
child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child has already suffered, and to
aid the parents so that the child will not be endangered in the future. In
selecting a program, the court should choose those services that least
interfere with family autonomy, provided that the services are adequate to
protect the child.

(b)
Order that the child be removed from his or her home and ordered into the
custody, control, and care of a relative or the department of social and health
services or a licensed child placing agency for placement in a foster family
home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or in a home
not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW. Unless there is
reasonable cause to believe that the safety or welfare of the child would be
jeopardized or that efforts to reunite the parent and child will be hindered,
such child shall be placed with a person who is related to the child as defined
in RCW 74.15.020(((4))) (2)(a) and with whom the child has a
relationship and is comfortable, and who is willing and available to care for
the child. Placement of the child with a relative under this subsection shall
be given preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be
made only if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent
or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home and to
make it possible for the child to return home, specifying the services that
have been provided to the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, and that preventive services have been offered or provided and have
failed to prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health,
safety, and welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home,
and that:

(i)
There is no parent or guardian available to care for such child;

(ii)
The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take custody of the
child;

(iii)
The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a manifest danger
exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or neglect if the child is not
removed from the home and an order under RCW 26.44.063 would not protect the
child from danger; or

(iv)
The extent of the child's disability is such that the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian is unable to provide the necessary care for the child and the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian has determined that the child would
benefit from placement outside of the home.

(2)
If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home pursuant to
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that a petition seeking
termination of the parent and child relationship be filed if the court finds:
(a) Termination is recommended by the supervising agency; (b) termination is in
the best interests of the child; and (c) that because of the existence of
aggravated circumstances, reasonable efforts to unify the family are not
required. Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated circumstances,
reasonable efforts may be required if the court or department determines it is
in the best interest of the child. In determining whether aggravated
circumstances exist, the court shall consider one or more of the following:

(i)
Conviction of the parent of rape of the child in the first, second, or third
degree as defined in RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079;

(ii)
Conviction of the parent of criminal mistreatment of the child in the first or
second degree as defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and 9A.42.030;

(iii)
Conviction of the parent of one of the following assault crimes, when the child
is the victim: Assault in the first or second degree as defined in RCW
9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021 or assault of a child in the first or second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.36.120 or 9A.36.130;

(iv)
Conviction of the parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide by abuse of the
child's other parent, sibling, or another child;

(v)
Conviction of the parent of attempting, soliciting, or conspiracy to commit a
crime listed in (c)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection;

(vi)
A finding by a court that a parent is a sexually violent predator as defined in
RCW 71.09.020;

(vii)
Failure of the parent to complete available treatment ordered under this chapter
or the equivalent laws of another state, where such failure has resulted in a
prior termination of parental rights to another child and the parent has failed
to effect significant change in the interim. In the case of a parent of an
Indian child, as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, P.L. 95-608 (25
U.S.C. (([Sec.])) Sec. 1903), the court shall also consider
tribal efforts to assist the parent in completing treatment and make it
possible for the child to return home;

(viii)
An infant under three years of age has been abandoned as defined in RCW
13.34.030(4)(a);

(ix)
The mother has given birth to three or more drug-affected infants, resulting in
the department filing a petition under section 23 ((of this act)),
chapter 314, Laws of 1998.

(3)
If reasonable efforts are not ordered under subsection (2) of this section a
permanency ((plan [planning])) planning hearing shall be held
within thirty days. Reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a
timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever
steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

(4)
Whenever a child is ordered removed from the child's home, the agency charged
with his or her care shall provide the court with:

(a)
A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the following outcomes as
a primary goal and may identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; ((or))
long-term relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a
written agreement between the parties and the care provider; and independent
living, if appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older; or a
responsible living skills program. Whenever a permanency plan identifies
independent living as a goal, the plan shall also specifically identify the
services that will be provided to assist the child to make a successful
transition from foster care to independent living. Before the court approves
independent living as a permanency plan of care, the court shall make a finding
that the provision of services to assist the child in making a transition from
foster care to independent living will allow the child to manage his or her
financial affairs and to manage his or her personal, social, educational, and
nonfinancial affairs. The department shall not discharge a child to an
independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age unless the
child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.

(b)
Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that
a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to return the child home, and what actions the
agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.

(i)
The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be offered in
order to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents must meet
in order to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and parental
requirement.

(ii)
The agency shall be required to encourage the maximum parent-child contact
possible, including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the
care of the child while the child is in placement. Visitation may be limited
or denied only if the court determines that such limitation or denial is
necessary to protect the child's health, safety, or welfare.

(iii)
A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as possible, preferably in
the child's own neighborhood, unless the court finds that placement at a
greater distance is necessary to promote the child's or parents' well-being.

(iv)
The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the agency, or within the
community, or those services which the department of social and health services
has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services.

(c)
If the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the child, services
to be offered or provided to the child, and, if visitation would be in the best
interests of the child, a recommendation to the court regarding visitation
between parent and child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination
petition. The agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for
the parents or provide services to the parents.

(5)
If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable efforts to prevent
or eliminate the need to remove the child from his or her home or to safely
return the child home should not be part of the permanency plan of care for the
child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner
and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent
placement of the child.

(6)
If there is insufficient information at the time of the disposition hearing
upon which to base a determination regarding the suitability of a proposed
placement with a relative, the child shall remain in foster care and the court
shall direct the supervising agency to conduct necessary background
investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report the results of such
investigation to the court within thirty days. However, if such relative
appears otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment, the
criminal history background check need not be completed before placement, but
as soon as possible after placement. Any placements with relatives, pursuant
to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation by the relative with the
agency case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders regarding
parent-child contacts and any other conditions imposed by the court.
Noncompliance with the case plan or court order shall be grounds for removal of
the child from the relative's home, subject to review by the court.

(7)
Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen review board under
chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found to be dependent shall be
reviewed by the court at least every six months from the beginning date of the
placement episode or the date dependency is established, whichever is first, at
a hearing in which it shall be determined whether court supervision should
continue. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and parental
completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary, revised
permanency time limits. The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and their right to an
opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only
if that person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to any
person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.

(a)
A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless the court finds
that a reason for removal as set forth in this section no longer exists. The
parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall report to the court the efforts
they have made to correct the conditions which led to removal. If a child is
returned, casework supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at
which time there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.

(b)
If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in writing:

(i)
Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to the parties to
facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or offered;

(ii)
Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate
to the child's needs, including whether consideration and preference has been
given to placement with the child's relatives;

(iii)
Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether the placement is
appropriate;

(iv)
Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the child, the child's
parents, and the agency supervising the placement;

(v)
Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems that necessitated
the child's placement in out-of-home care;

(vi)
Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why visitation has
not occurred or has been infrequent;

(vii)
Whether additional services are needed to facilitate the return of the child to
the child's parents; if so, the court shall order that reasonable services be
offered specifying such services; and

(viii)
The projected date by which the child will be returned home or other permanent
plan of care will be implemented.

(c)
The court at the review hearing may order that a petition seeking termination
of the parent and child relationship be filed.

Sec.
8. RCW
13.34.145 and 1998 c 314 s 3 and 1998 c 130 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
A permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services, including
placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever
occurs first. The permanency planning process continues until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or dependency is dismissed. The planning process
shall include reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.

(a)
Whenever a child is placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130, the
agency that has custody of the child shall provide the court with a written
permanency plan of care directed towards securing a safe, stable, and permanent
home for the child as soon as possible. The plan shall identify one of the
following outcomes as the primary goal and may also identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the child's
parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal
custody; or long-term relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen,
with a written agreement between the parties and the care provider; a
responsible living skills program; and independent living, if appropriate
and if the child is age sixteen or older and the provisions of subsection (2)
of this section are met.

(b)
The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may change over time
based upon the circumstances of the particular case.

(c)
Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest possible date,
preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen months.
In cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally free
for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency
planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months
following entry of the termination order.

(d)
For purposes related to permanency planning:

(i)
"Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship pursuant to this
chapter, a legal guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW, or equivalent laws
of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(ii)
"Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW.

(iii)
"Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to chapter
26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or of a federally recognized
Indian tribe.

(2)
Whenever a permanency plan identifies independent living as a goal, the plan
shall also specifically identify the services that will be provided to assist
the child to make a successful transition from foster care to independent
living. Before the court approves independent living as a permanency plan of
care, the court shall make a finding that the provision of services to assist
the child in making a transition from foster care to independent living will
allow the child to manage his or her financial affairs and to manage his or her
personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs. The department shall
not discharge a child to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen
years of age unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64
RCW.

(3)
A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where the child has
remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and an adoption decree,
guardianship order, or permanent custody order has not previously been
entered. The hearing shall take place no later than twelve months following
commencement of the current placement episode.

(4)
Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency guardian or long-term
relative or foster care provider, and the child is not returned to the home of
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian but is placed in out-of-home care, a
permanency planning hearing shall take place no later than twelve months, as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, following the date of removal unless, prior
to the hearing, the child returns to the home of the dependency guardian or
long-term care provider, the child is placed in the home of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order, or
permanent custody order is entered, or the dependency is dismissed.

(5)
No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning hearing, the
agency having custody of the child shall submit a written permanency plan to
the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all parties and their legal
counsel, if any.

(6)
At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall enter findings as required
by RCW 13.34.130(7) and shall review the permanency plan prepared by the
agency. If the child has resided in the home of a foster parent or relative
for more than six months prior to the permanency planning hearing, the court
shall also enter a finding regarding whether the foster parent or relative was
informed of the hearing as required in RCW 74.13.280 and 13.34.130(7). If a
goal of long-term foster or relative care has been achieved prior to the
permanency planning hearing, the court shall review the child's status to
determine whether the placement and the plan for the child's care remain
appropriate. In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not yet
been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the primary
goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done to make it
possible to achieve the primary goal. In all cases, the court shall:

(a)(i)
Order the permanency plan prepared by the agency to be implemented; or

(ii)
Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the modified plan; and

(b)(i)
Order the child returned home only if the court finds that a reason for removal
as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or

(ii)
Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited specified time
period while efforts are made to implement the permanency plan.

(7)
If the court orders the child returned home, casework supervision shall
continue for at least six months, at which time a review hearing shall be held
pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(7), and the court shall determine the need for
continued intervention.

(8)
Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this chapter shall not be a barrier
to the entry of an order establishing a legal guardianship or permanent legal
custody when, (a) the court has ordered implementation of a permanency plan
that includes legal guardianship or permanent legal custody, and (b) the party
pursuing the legal guardianship or permanent legal custody is the party
identified in the permanency plan as the prospective legal guardian or
custodian. During the pendency of such proceeding, juvenile court shall
conduct review hearings and further permanency planning hearings as provided in
this chapter. At the conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal
custody proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship or
permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be dismissed.

(9)
Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold a further
permanency planning hearing in accordance with this section at least once every
twelve months until a permanency planning goal is achieved or the dependency is
dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(10)
Except as otherwise provided in RCW 13.34.235, the status of all dependent
children shall continue to be reviewed by the court at least once every six
months, in accordance with RCW 13.34.130(7), until the dependency is
dismissed. Prior to the second permanency planning hearing, the agency that
has custody of the child shall consider whether to file a petition for
termination of parental rights.

(11)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability of the agency
that has custody of the child to file a petition for termination of parental
rights or a guardianship petition at any time following the establishment of
dependency. Upon the filing of such a petition, a fact-finding hearing shall
be scheduled and held in accordance with this chapter unless the agency
requests dismissal of the petition prior to the hearing or unless the parties
enter an agreed order terminating parental rights, establishing guardianship,
or otherwise resolving the matter.

(12)
The approval of a permanency plan that does not contemplate return of the child
to the parent does not relieve the supervising agency of its obligation to
provide reasonable services, under this chapter, intended to effectuate the
return of the child to the parent, including but not limited to, visitation
rights.

(13)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the procedural due process
rights of any party in a termination or guardianship proceeding filed under
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 13.60 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services shall develop a procedure for
obtaining missing children information from the missing children clearinghouse
and disseminating the information to placement and liaison specialists, crisis
residential center staff, and HOPE center staff. When the department of social
and health services has obtained information that a minor child has been located,
the department shall notify the clearinghouse and the child's legal custodian,
advising the parent or legal custodian of the child's whereabouts. The
department shall inform the clearinghouse when reunification occurs. No
information may be disseminated in a manner likely to present a risk of harm to
the child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
Washington institute for public policy shall review the effectiveness of the
procedures established in section 9 of this act. The study shall include: (1)
The number of legal custodians who utilize the clearinghouse; (2) the number of
children who are located after the department's procedures are operational; (3)
the average length of time between the notice from the clearinghouse and locating
the child; (4) the impediments to effective utilization of the procedures and
what steps may be taken to reduce or eliminate the impediments; (5) the methods
of public education regarding the availability of the procedures and how to
increase public awareness of the procedures.

The
review shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the senate and house
of representatives and the governor not later than December 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The HOPE educational assistance account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from private donations and appropriations specified
for the purposes of this account must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for educational financial
assistance for former street youth who qualify under subsection (2) of this
section. Only the director of the board or the director's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

(2)
Only former street youth who have been residents of a HOPE center as defined in
RCW 74.15.020 and who have received transitional living services as defined in
RCW 74.15.020 may apply for and receive educational financial assistance under
this section. The educational financial assistance may be used for expenses
incurred in conjunction with enrollment in any institution of higher education
in this state. Yearly educational financial assistance under this section is
limited to an amount equal to the highest yearly undergraduate resident tuition
charged by a public institution of higher education within this state, and may
only be provided to an individual twice in any four-year period. The director
shall take into account family and other financial resources available to the
individual before awarding educational financial assistance under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A tax credit is authorized equal to one hundred percent of the amounts donated
to the HOPE educational assistance account, subject to the limits specified in
this section.

(2)(a)
The credit under subsection (1) of this section may be applied to taxes under
chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW. A person may not receive a credit for the same
expenditures under both chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW. The credit shall be
taken against taxes due for the same calendar year in which the amounts were
paid. The credit must be claimed by the due date of the last tax return for
the calendar year in which the payment is made.

(b)
The annual credit claimed by any person under this section shall not exceed the
lesser of the tax otherwise due under this chapter during the same calendar
year or five thousand dollars.

(c)
No portion of an application for credit under this section may be carried back
or carried forward to a different calendar year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---