BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
goal four voluntary grant program is created to aid parents, schools, and
communities in their efforts to help students understand the importance of work
and how performance, effort, and decisions directly affect a student's future
career and educational opportunities. The grant program shall be administered
by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. In its
administration of the program, the responsibilities of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall include, but need not be limited to:

(1)
Distribution of program guidelines;

(2)
Use of simple, brief, and clear application processes, forms, and reporting
requirements that help make the grant program accessible to schools and school
districts with minimal administrative teams;

(3)
Selection of grant recipients. The selection criteria shall include a priority
for the extent of community support including matching funds and in-kind
services; and

(4)
Distribution of a report at least once every two years to the governor, the
education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the educational community,
and other interested parties. The report shall focus primarily on the results
of grant recipients and the program as a whole, and shall include any
recommendations for program improvements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
goal four voluntary grant program shall include the following elements:

(1)
Participation is open to school districts and individual public high schools,
middle schools, and junior high schools.

(2)
Participating school districts may develop a district-wide career development
component and shall require each participating school in the district to
develop a school career development component to its school improvement plan.
The career development component shall be designed to provide high school
students with an opportunity to identify and pursue both career and educational
objectives.

(3)
The elements in each career development component shall include, but need not
be limited to:

(a)
Career preparation activities that include, but need not be limited to: Career
awareness and exploration; development of career goals; workplace habits;
work-based learning experiences; and job search and job retention skills;

(b)
Curriculum components designed to provide opportunities throughout the high
school years for students to gain the skills required to transition from high
school to the workplace successfully or to additional education and training
programs. The curriculum components shall include, but need not be limited to:

(i)
Applied and contextual learning opportunities that reinforce core learning,
motivate learning, respond to different learning styles, enable students to
explore or survey career interests, and promote student leadership;

(ii)
Programs that incorporate industry-approved skill standards and industry
certification;

(iii)
Programs that articulate with postsecondary institutions;

(iv)
Programs that enable students to receive college credit for knowledge and
skills learned while enrolled in high school; and

(v)
Programs with a math and technology emphasis.

(c)
Program components should be designed for the transition of high school
students to their thirteenth year, through career pathways, school-to-work
efforts, or school-to-career efforts and should include early planning,
individual planning with parental involvement, and a community presentation
that reaches beyond the school;

(d)
Learning opportunities for teachers and staff that include training on
contextual learning and teaching methods, work-based learning experiences; and
methods to standardize assessments;

(e)
The development of a work-ready endorsement for inclusion in the high school
transcript of students who have successfully demonstrated entry-level
proficiency of workplace skills. Workplace skills shall include, but need not
be limited to workplace habits, including safety, and skills that encompass job
search and job retention;

(f)
Methods to impart and assess the understanding of rules of conduct and
activities that reenforce the values of personal responsibility, honesty, and
integrity. The methods shall include consequences for student attendance,
homework completion, and student discipline; and

(g)
An accountability system that measures the work-related learning occurring in
the school and, if applicable, school district. The system shall include, but
need not be limited to: Employment or enrollment in postsecondary education
programs, and attendance, drop-out, and graduation and high school completion
rates.

(4) The career development component shall be developed and
monitored by a local advisory committee that includes, but need not be limited
to secondary and postsecondary vocational teachers, parents, students, and community
members including representatives from local businesses and labor
organizations. The majority of the committee shall be comprised of customers
of the educational system. In its deliberations, the committee shall consult
with appropriate educational and economic organizations within the local labor
market, including public and private providers of postsecondary education and
training. This advisory committee may have other functions so long as
membership criteria is met.

---
END ---