BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that salmon recovery in Washington state will involve
everyone and will require funds to accomplish recovery measures. Several
species of salmon in Washington are, or are expected to be, listed as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act. At present,
these species include chinook, chum, bull trout and coho. To bring attention
to the importance of the recovery of salmon and their place in Washington's
heritage, raise funds for salmon recovery projects, and involve citizens of all
ages, the Washington salmon stamp and Washington junior salmon stamp programs
are created.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through 7 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Salmon" means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except those
classified as game fish in this title, and includes:

Scientific
Name Common Name

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye salmon

(2)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(3)
"Committee" means the salmon stamp selection committee created in
section 5 of this act.

(4)
"Stamp" means the stamp created under the Washington salmon stamp
program and the Washington junior salmon stamp program, created in sections 2
through 7 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The Washington salmon stamp program is created in the department. The purpose
of the program is the creation of a stamp that will portray a salmonid species
native to Washington and will be used for stamps, prints, and posters that can
be sold in a wide range of prices and editions to appeal to citizens and
collectors interested in supporting salmon restoration. The proceeds from the
sale of the Washington salmon stamp shall be used for protection, preservation,
and restoration of salmonid habitat in Washington.

(2)
Every year the department will announce competition, open to all Washington
artists, for the creation of the year's Washington salmon stamp. The
department will market the stamp and prints through a wide distribution method
including web sites, license sites, and at public events.

(3)
The winning artist will receive a monetary award and a certain number of artist
proof prints.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The Washington junior salmon stamp program is created in the department. The
purpose of the program is the creation of a stamp that will portray a salmonid
species native to Washington and will be used for stamps, prints, and posters
that can be sold in a wide range of prices and editions to appeal to citizens
and collectors interested in supporting salmon restoration.

(2)
Every year the department will announce a competition for the Washington
junior salmon stamp program among Washington K-12 students. The top winner
will receive a scholarship award.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
salmon stamp selection committee is created. The committee is comprised of
five individuals selected by the governor who will judge and select the winning
entrant for the Washington salmon stamp program and Washington junior salmon
stamp program. The governor will select names from a collection of names
forwarded from the department and from the state arts commission in the
following categories: Artist, not competing in the salmon stamp program; art
collector; fish biologist; printer; and public school teacher.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. All
receipts from the salmon stamp program created under sections 2 through 7 of
this act must be deposited into the regional fisheries enhancement salmonid
recovery account created under RCW 75.50.125. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the purposes specified in RCW 75.50.125 and this act. The
department shall report biennially to the legislature on the amount of money
the salmon stamp program has generated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department is granted the authority to establish by rule the method for
selecting appropriate designs for the Washington salmon stamp program and
Washington junior salmon stamp program. The stamp shall be designed and
produced in accordance with department rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each added to chapter 77.12 RCW.

---
END ---