BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the citizens of the state increasingly rely on the dependability
of enhanced 911, a system that allows the person answering an emergency call to
determine the location of the emergency immediately without the caller needing
to speak. The legislature further finds that the degree of accuracy of the
displayed information must be adequate to permit rapid location of the caller
while taking into consideration variables specific to local conditions. The
legislature further finds that it is appropriate that rules permitting local
fire agencies to evaluate and approve the accuracy of location information
relating to their service areas be adopted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

The
adjutant general shall establish rules on minimum information requirements of
automatic location identification for the purposes of enhanced 911 emergency
service. Such rules shall permit the chief of a local fire department or a
chief fire protection officer or such other person as may be designated by the
governing body of a city or county to take into consideration local
circumstances when approving the accuracy of location information generated
when calls are made to 911 from facilities within his or her service area.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.43.934 and 1998 c 245 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
for matters relating to the statutory duties of the chief of the Washington
state patrol that are to be carried out through the director of fire
protection, the board shall have the responsibility of developing a
comprehensive state policy regarding fire protection services. In carrying out
its duties, the board shall:

(1)(a)
Adopt a state fire training and education master plan that allows to the
maximum feasible extent for negotiated agreements: (i) With the state board
for community and technical colleges to provide academic, vocational, and field
training programs for the fire service and (ii) with the higher education
coordinating board and the state colleges and universities to provide
instructional programs requiring advanced training, especially in command and
management skills;

(b)
Adopt minimum standards for each level of responsibility among personnel with
fire suppression, prevention, inspection, and investigation responsibilities
that assure continuing assessment of skills and are flexible enough to meet
emerging technologies. With particular respect to training for fire
investigations, the master plan shall encourage cross training in appropriate
law enforcement skills. To meet special local needs, fire agencies may adopt
more stringent requirements than those adopted by the state;

(c)
Cooperate with the common schools, technical and community colleges,
institutions of higher education, and any department or division of the state,
or of any county or municipal corporation in establishing and maintaining
instruction in fire service training and education in accordance with any act
of congress and legislation enacted by the legislature in pursuance thereof and
in establishing, building, and operating training and education facilities.

Industrial
fire departments and private fire investigators may participate in training and
education programs under this chapter for a reasonable fee established by rule;

(d)
Develop and adopt a master plan for constructing, equipping, maintaining, and
operating necessary fire service training and education facilities subject to
the provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW; and

(e)
Develop and adopt a master plan for the purchase, lease, or other acquisition
of real estate necessary for fire service training and education facilities in
a manner provided by law.

(2)
In addition to its responsibilities for fire service training, the board shall:

(a)
Adopt a state fire protection master plan;

(b)
Monitor fire protection in the state and develop objectives and priorities to
improve fire protection for the state's citizens including: (i) The
comprehensiveness of state and local inspections required by law for fire and
life safety; (ii) the level of skills and training of inspectors, as well as
needs for additional training; and (iii) the efforts of local, regional, and
state inspection agencies to improve coordination and reduce duplication among
inspection efforts;

(c)
Establish and promote state arson control programs and ensure development of
local arson control programs;

(d)
Provide representation for local fire protection services to the governor in
state-level fire protection planning matters such as, but not limited to,
hazardous materials control;

(e)
Recommend to the ((director of community, trade, and economic development))
adjutant general rules on minimum information requirements of automatic
location identification for the purposes of enhanced 911 emergency service;

(f)
Seek and solicit grants, gifts, bequests, devises, and matching funds for use
in furthering the objectives and duties of the board, and establish procedures
for administering them;

(g)
Promote mutual aid and disaster planning for fire services in this state;

(h)
Assure the dissemination of information concerning the amount of fire damage
including that damage caused by arson, and its causes and prevention; and

(i)
Implement any legislation enacted by the legislature to meet the requirements
of any acts of congress that apply to this section.

(3)
In carrying out its statutory duties, the board shall give particular
consideration to the appropriate roles to be played by the state and by local
jurisdictions with fire protection responsibilities. Any determinations on the
division of responsibility shall be made in consultation with local fire
officials and their representatives.

To the extent possible, the board shall encourage development of
regional units along compatible geographic, population, economic, and fire risk
dimensions. Such regional units may serve to: (a) Reinforce coordination
among state and local activities in fire service training, reporting,
inspections, and investigations; (b) identify areas of special need,
particularly in smaller jurisdictions with inadequate resources; (c) assist the
state in its oversight responsibilities; (d) identify funding needs and options
at both the state and local levels; and (e) provide models for building local
capacity in fire protection programs.

---
END ---