BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
78.44.085 and 1997 c 413 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An applicant for a public or private reclamation permit shall pay an
application fee to the department before being granted a surface mining
permit. The amount of the application fee shall be six hundred fifty dollars.

(2)
After June 30, 1993, each public or private permit holder shall pay an annual
permit fee of six hundred fifty dollars. The annual permit fee shall be
payable to the department on the first anniversary of the permit date and each
year thereafter. Annual fees paid by a county for mines used exclusively for
public works projects and having less than seven acres of disturbed area per
mine shall not exceed one thousand dollars. For counties with 1993
populations of at least twenty thousand persons but less than fifty thousand
persons, the one thousand dollar maximum also applies to annual fees paid by
the county for mines that are owned or leased by the county, that are used
primarily for public works projects, and that have less than seven acres of
disturbed area per mine. Annual fees are waived for all mines used
primarily for public works projects if the mines are owned and primarily
operated by counties with 1993 populations of less than twenty thousand
persons, and if each mine has less than seven acres of disturbed area.

(3)
Appeals from any determination of the department shall not stay the requirement
to pay any annual permit fee. Failure to pay the annual fee may constitute
grounds for an order to suspend surface mining or cancellation of the
reclamation permit as provided in this chapter.

(4)
All fees collected by the department shall be deposited into the surface mining
reclamation account.

(5)
If the department delegates enforcement responsibilities to a county, city, or
town, the department may allocate funds collected under this section to the
county, city, or town.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

Minerals from any mine owned or operated by a county with 1993
populations of at least twenty thousand persons but less than fifty thousand
persons may not be sold to any person located within a five-mile radius of a
commercial mining operation.

---
END ---