BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

"Electronic
bingo" means an instate networked bingo game utilized by licensed
charitable and nonprofit organizations that conduct and have conducted
traditional, nonelectronic "bingo" for a period of at least twelve
consecutive months prior to utilizing electronic bingo, and in which a minimum
of two players participating in licensed bingo locations compete against
players in the same or other licensed bingo locations for prizes awarded on the
basis of achieving a bingo. A bingo is achieved by matching and daubing
designated numbers or symbols on electronic or computer generated bingo cards
to corresponding numbers or symbols that have been selected at random from
either a manual bingo ball blower or an approved electronic number generator.
In adopting rules for this activity, the commission shall not limit electronic
bingo to current bingo technology, but shall allow charitable and nonprofit
organizations to use electronic, computer, or other modern technological aids
to increase player participation and enhance profitability for those
organizations utilizing this activity. Electronic bingo shall not include the
use of stand-alone or networked player terminals or other electronic devices
that allow for individual play against such terminals or devices. Such
terminals or devices shall be deemed to be unauthorized gambling devices
subject to the penalties set forth under RCW 9.46.231. Electronic bingo shall
not be utilized by any charitable, nonprofit organization that does not conduct
traditional, nonelectronic bingo.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.46.0205 and 1987 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bingo," as used in this chapter, includes
"electronic bingo," as defined in this chapter, and means a game
conducted only in the county within which the organization is principally
located in which prizes are awarded on the basis of designated numbers or
symbols on a card conforming to numbers or symbols selected at random and in
which no cards are sold except at the time and place of said game, when said
game is conducted by a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization which
does not conduct or allow its premises to be used for conducting bingo,
except for electronic bingo, on more than three occasions per week and
which does not conduct bingo in any location which is used for conducting bingo
on more than three occasions per week, or if an agricultural fair authorized
under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, which does not conduct bingo on more than
twelve consecutive days in any calendar year, and except in the case of any
agricultural fair as authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, and
except for electronic bingo, no person other than a bona fide member or an
employee of said organization takes any part in the management or operation of
said game, and no person who takes any part in the management or operation of
said game takes any part in the management or operation of any game conducted
by any other organization or any other branch of the same organization, unless
approved by the commission, and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to the
benefit of any person other than the organization conducting said game. For
the purposes of this section, the organization shall be deemed to be
principally located in the county within which it has its primary business
office. If the organization has no business office, the organization shall be
deemed to be located in the county of principal residence of its chief
executive officer((: PROVIDED, That any organization which is conducting
any licensed and established bingo game in any locale as of January 1, 1981,
shall be exempt from the requirement that such game be conducted in the county
in which the organization is principally located)).

---
END ---