BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.88A.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby recognizes the necessity of developing a uniform and
coordinated procedure for determining the expected fiscal and incidence
impact of bills and resolutions on state government. The legislature also
recognizes that developing such statements ((of fiscal impact)), which
shall be known as fiscal notes and incidence notes, requires the
designation of a state agency to be principally responsible therefor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.88A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The office of financial management shall, in cooperation with appropriate
legislative committees and legislative staff, establish a procedure for the
provision of incidence notes for any bill or proposal that increases,
decreases, or redistributes state government revenues by more than five million
dollars per fiscal year, for any of the following taxes:

(a)
State and local sales and use taxes under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW
and RCW 81.104.170;

(b)
Motor vehicle and special fuels taxes under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW;

(c)
King county restaurant and bar taxes under chapter 82.14 RCW;

(d)
Local admissions taxes under RCW 35.21.280 and 36.38.010;

(e)
Leasehold excise taxes under chapter 82.29A RCW;

(f)
State and local property taxes under chapter 84.52 RCW;

(g)
Public utility district privilege taxes under chapter 54.28 RCW;

(h)
Motor vehicle excise taxes under chapter 82.44 RCW;

(i)
Aircraft fuel taxes under chapter 82.42 RCW;

(j)
Camper and travel trailer and boat excise taxes under chapters 82.50 and 82.49
RCW;

(k)
State business and occupation taxes under chapter 82.04 RCW;

(l)
State public utility taxes including garbage collection under chapter 82.16 RCW
and RCW 82.18.020;

(m)
Local utility taxes under chapter 35.21 RCW;

(n)
Insurance premiums taxes under chapter 48.14 RCW;

(o)
Timber excise taxes under chapter 84.33 RCW;

(p)
Carbonated beverage syrup taxes under chapter 82.64 RCW;

(q)
Food fish and shellfish taxes under chapter 82.27 RCW;

(r)
Cigarette and tobacco products taxes under chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW;

(s)
Liquor, beer, and wine taxes under RCW 82.08.150, 66.24.210, and 66.24.290;

(t)
Local gambling taxes under RCW 9.46.110;

(u)
State and local real estate excise taxes under chapters 82.45 and 82.46 RCW;

(v)
Estate taxes under chapter 83.100 RCW;

(w)
State and local rental car taxes under RCW 82.08.020(2), 82.14.049, and
82.14.360(2);

(x)
State and local hotel‑motel taxes under chapter 67.28 RCW and RCW
67.40.090 and 36.100.040; and

(y)
State and local telephone taxes under chapter 82.14B RCW.

(2)
To the extent data is available on the changes in the distribution of the tax
burden that are affected by the bill or resolution, the note shall report on
the incidence effects that would result if the bill were enacted. The note may
present information using system-wide measures by income classes, taxpayer
characteristics, or other relevant categories. The note may include analysis
of the effect of the bill or resolution on representative taxpayers. The note
must include a statement of the incidence assumptions that were used in
computing the burdens. An incidence analysis shall use the broadest measure of
economic income for which reliable data is available.

(3)
An incidence impact note shall indicate the incidence impact for the first full
year in which the bill or resolution will be effective. Incidence impacts
shall be calculated using the procedures contained in instructions issued by
the office of financial management.

(4)
In establishing an incidence impact analysis called for under this chapter, the
office of financial management shall coordinate the development of fiscal notes
with all state agencies affected.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.88A.030 and 1986 c 158 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a fiscal or incidence note is prepared and approved as to form,
accuracy, and completeness by the office of financial management, which depicts
the expected ((fiscal)) impact of a bill or resolution, copies shall be
filed immediately with:

(1)
The chairperson of the committee to which the bill or resolution was referred
upon introduction in the house of origin;

(2)
The senate committee on ways and means, or its successor; and

(3)
The house committees on ((revenue)) finance and appropriations,
or their successors.

Whenever
possible, ((such fiscal)) the note shall be provided prior to or
at the time the bill or resolution is first heard by the committee of reference
in the house of origin.

When
a fiscal or incidence note has been prepared for a bill or resolution, a
copy of the ((fiscal)) note shall be placed in the bill books or
otherwise attached to the bill or resolution and shall remain with the bill or
resolution throughout the legislative process insofar as possible.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.88A.040 and 1979 c 151 s 148 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of financial management shall also provide a fiscal or incidence
note on any legislative proposal at the request of any legislator. Such ((fiscal))
note shall be returned to the requesting legislator, and copies shall be filed
with the appropriate legislative committees pursuant to RCW 43.88A.030 at the
time such proposed legislation is introduced in either house.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.88A.900 and 1977 ex.s. c 25 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter shall prevent either house of the legislature from acting on
any bill or resolution before it as otherwise provided by the state
Constitution, by law, and by the rules and joint rules of the senate and house
of representatives, nor shall the lack of any fiscal note or incidence
impact analysis as provided in this chapter or any error in the accuracy
thereof affect the validity of any measure otherwise duly passed by the
legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 82.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In January of every odd‑numbered year, the department shall submit to the
legislature before the regular session a report on the overall incidence of
each of the taxes listed in section 2(1) of this act.

(2) The report shall present information on the distribution of the
tax burden (a) by overall income distribution, using a system-wide incidence
measure with appropriate measures of equality and inequality, (b) by income
classes, including at a minimum deciles of the income distribution, and (c) by
other appropriate taxpayer characteristics.

---
END ---