BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.36.031 and 1998 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of assault in the third degree if he or she, under
circumstances not amounting to assault in the first or second degree:

(a)
((With intent to prevent or resist the execution of any lawful process or
mandate of any court officer or the lawful apprehension or detention of himself
or another person, assaults another; or

(b)
Assaults a person employed as a transit operator or driver by a public or
private transit company while that person is performing his or her official
duties at the time of the assault; or

(c)
Assaults a school bus driver employed by a school district or a private company
under contract for transportation services with a school district while the
driver is performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(d)))
With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm to another person by means of a
weapon or other instrument or thing likely to produce bodily harm; or

(((e)
Assaults a fire fighter or other employee of a fire department, county fire
marshal's office, county fire prevention bureau, or fire protection district
who was performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(f))) (b)
With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm accompanied by substantial pain
that extends for a period sufficient to cause considerable suffering; or

(((g)
Assaults a law enforcement officer or other employee of a law enforcement
agency who was performing his or her official duties at the time of the
assault; or

(h)
Assaults a nurse, physician, or health care provider who was performing his or
her nursing or health care duties at the time of the assault. For purposes of
this subsection: "Nurse" means a person licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW; "physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71
RCW; and "health care provider" means a person certified under
chapter 18.71 or 18.73 RCW who performs emergency medical services or a person
regulated under Title 18 RCW and employed by, or contracting with, a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.))

(c)
Assaults a person who is employed by a public entity or by a private entity on
contract to a public entity to provide or perform a public service while that
person is in the performance of the person's official duties; or

(d)
Assaults a person who is employed to provide any medical or health care
service, treatment, or care while that person is in the performance of the
person's official duties.

(2) Assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

---
END ---