BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW 41.05.065
and 1996 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall study all matters connected with the provision of health care
coverage, life insurance, liability insurance, accidental death and
dismemberment insurance, and disability income insurance or any of, or a
combination of, the enumerated types of insurance for employees and their
dependents on the best basis possible with relation both to the welfare of the
employees and to the state. However, liability insurance shall not be made
available to dependents.

(2)
The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include comprehensive
health care benefits for all employees. In developing these plans, the board
shall consider the following elements:

(a)
Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to quality health
care;

(b)
Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost containment and ensure
access to quality care, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems
and prospective payment methods;

(c)
Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as smoking cessation,
injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight
reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol
reduction, and nutrition education;

(d)
Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a cost-efficient
method for prior authorization of services, hospital inpatient length of stay
review, requirements for use of outpatient surgeries and second opinions for
surgeries, review of invoices or claims submitted by service providers, and
performance audit of providers;

(e)
Effective coordination of benefits;

(f)
Minimum standards for insuring entities; and

(g)
Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to be offered to
enrollees participating in the employee health benefit plans. To maintain the
comprehensive nature of employee health care benefits, employee eligibility
criteria related to the number of hours worked and the benefits provided to
employees shall be substantially equivalent to the state employees' health
benefits plan and eligibility criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing
in this subsection (2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee
point-of-service payments or employee premium payments for benefits.

(3)
The board shall design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of
employee participation and coverage, including establishment of eligibility
criteria. In defining eligible dependents, the board shall include as an
eligible dependent the dependent of a qualifying dependent if the dependent of
the qualifying dependent resides with the subscriber and qualifies as a
dependent of the subscriber under the internal revenue code.

(4)
The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee and the
employee's dependents in a manner that encourages the use of cost-efficient
managed health care systems.

(5)
Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care benefit plans
developed by the board and may be permitted to waive coverage under terms and
conditions established by the board.

(6)
The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that desire to offer
property insurance and/or accident and casualty insurance to state employees
through payroll deduction. The board may approve any such plan for payroll
deduction by insuring entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the
state of Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests
of employees and the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting forth
criteria by which it shall evaluate the plans.

(7)
Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board shall make
available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance plans that comply
with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such programs shall be made
available to eligible employees, retired employees, and retired school
employees as well as eligible dependents which, for the purpose of this
section, includes the parents of the employee or retiree and the parents of the
spouse of the employee or retiree. Employees of local governments and
employees of political subdivisions not otherwise enrolled in the public
employees' benefits board sponsored medical programs may enroll under terms and
conditions established by the administrator, if it does not jeopardize the
financial viability of the public employees' benefits board's long-term care
offering.

(a)
Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and retired school
employees in any long-term care insurance plan made available by the public
employees' benefits board is voluntary and shall not be subject to binding
arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW. Participation is subject to reasonable
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules established by the public
employees' benefits board and the health care authority.

(b)
The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are solely
responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by the health care
authority. The health care authority is authorized to charge a reasonable
administrative fee in addition to the premium charged by the long-term care
insurer, which shall include the health care authority's cost of
administration, marketing, and consumer education materials prepared by the
health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner.

(c)
To the extent administratively possible, the state shall establish an automatic
payroll or pension deduction system for the payment of the long-term care
insurance premiums.

(d)
The public employees' benefits board and the health care authority shall
establish a technical advisory committee to provide advice in the development
of the benefit design and establishment of underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules. The committee shall also advise the board and authority on
effective and cost-effective ways to market and distribute the long-term care
product. The technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers of
long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in long-term
care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school employees, and
other interested parties determined to be appropriate by the board.

(e)
The health care authority shall offer employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through
licensed agents or brokers appointed by the long-term care insurer. The
authority, in consultation with the public employees' benefits board, shall
establish marketing procedures and may consider all premium components as a
part of the contract negotiations with the long-term care insurer.

(f)
In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the public
employees' benefits board shall include an alternative plan of care benefit,
including adult day services, as approved by the office of the insurance
commissioner.

(g)
The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office of the insurance
commissioner, shall develop a consumer education program for the eligible
employees, retired employees, and retired school employees designed to provide
education on the potential need for long-term care, methods of financing
long-term care, and the availability of long-term care insurance products
including the products offered by the board.

(h)
By December 1998, the health care authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall submit a report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature, including an analysis of the marketing and distribution of
the long-term care insurance provided under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.05.140 and 1994 c 153 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The authority may self-fund, self-insure, or enter into other methods of
providing insurance coverage for insurance programs under its jurisdiction
except property and casualty insurance. The authority shall contract for
payment of claims or other administrative services for programs under its
jurisdiction. If a program does not require the prepayment of reserves, the
authority shall establish such reserves within a reasonable period of time for the
payment of claims as are normally required for that type of insurance under an
insured program.

(2)
Reserves established by the authority for employee and retiree benefit programs
shall be held in a separate trust fund by the state treasurer and shall be
known as the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund. The state
investment board shall act as the investor for the funds and, except as
provided in RCW 43.33A.160, one hundred percent of all earnings from these
investments shall accrue directly to the public employees' and retirees'
insurance reserve fund.

(3)
Any savings realized as a result of a program created for employees and
retirees under this section shall not be used to increase benefits unless such
use is authorized by statute.

(4)
Any program created under this section shall be subject to coordination of
benefits provisions in Title 48 RCW, including coordination of benefit rules
adopted by the office of the insurance commissioner, and the examination
requirements of chapter 48.03 RCW as if the program were a domestic insurer.
In conducting an examination, the commissioner shall determine the adequacy of
the reserves established for the program.

(5)
The authority shall keep full and adequate accounts and records of the assets,
obligations, transactions, and affairs of any program created under this
section.

(6) The authority shall file a quarterly statement of the financial
condition, transactions, and affairs of any program created under this section
in a form and manner prescribed by the insurance commissioner. The statement
shall contain information as required by the commissioner for the type of
insurance being offered under the program. A copy of the annual statement
shall be filed with the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate.

---
END ---