BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.080 and 1995 c 397 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
On the day the treasurer is designated, each candidate or political committee
shall file with the commission and the county auditor or elections officer of
the county in which the candidate resides, or in the case of a political
committee, the county in which the treasurer resides, in addition to any
statement of organization required under RCW 42.17.040 or 42.17.050, a report
of all contributions received and expenditures made prior to that date, if any.

(2)
At the following intervals each treasurer shall file with the commission and
the county auditor or elections officer of the county in which the candidate
resides, or in the case of a political committee, the county in which the
committee maintains its office or headquarters, and if there is no office or
headquarters then in the county in which the treasurer resides, a report containing
the information required by RCW 42.17.090:

(a)
On the twenty-first day and the seventh day immediately preceding the date on
which the election is held; and

(b)
On the tenth day of the first month after the election: PROVIDED, That this
report shall not be required following a primary election from:

(i)
A candidate whose name will appear on the subsequent general election ballot;
or

(ii)
Any continuing political committee; and

(c)
On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are required to be
filed under this section: PROVIDED, That such report shall only be filed if
the committee has received a contribution or made an expenditure in the
preceding calendar month and either the total contributions received or total
expenditures made since the last such report exceed two hundred dollars.

When
there is no outstanding debt or obligation, and the campaign fund is closed,
and the campaign is concluded in all respects, and in the case of a political
committee, the committee has ceased to function and has dissolved, the
treasurer shall file a final report. Upon submitting a final report, the
duties of the treasurer shall cease and there shall be no obligation to make
any further reports.

The
report filed twenty-one days before the election shall report all contributions
received and expenditures made as of the end of the fifth business day before
the date of the report. The report filed seven days before the election shall
report all contributions received and expenditures made as of the end of the
one business day before the date of the report. Reports filed on the tenth day
of the month shall report all contributions received and expenditures made from
the closing date of the last report filed through the last day of the month
preceding the date of the current report.

(3)
For the period beginning the first day of the fourth month preceding the date
on which the special or general election is held and ending on the date of that
election, each Friday the treasurer shall file with the commission and the
appropriate county elections officer a report of each bank deposit made during
the previous seven calendar days. The report shall contain the name of each
person contributing the funds so deposited and the amount contributed by each
person. However, contributions of no more than twenty-five dollars in the
aggregate from any one person may be deposited without identifying the
contributor. A copy of the report shall be retained by the treasurer for his
or her records. In the event of deposits made by a deputy treasurer, the copy
shall be forwarded to the treasurer for his or her records. Each report shall
be certified as correct by the treasurer or deputy treasurer making the
deposit.

(4)
The treasurer or candidate shall maintain books of account accurately
reflecting all contributions and expenditures on a current basis within five
business days of receipt or expenditure. During the eight days immediately
preceding the date of the election the books of account shall be kept current
within one business day ((and shall)). As specified in the
committee's statement of organization filed under RCW 42.17.040, the books of
account must be open for public inspection as follows:

(a)
For at least two consecutive hours ((Monday through Friday, excluding
legal holidays)) on the eighth day immediately before the election,
between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of
organization filed pursuant to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal headquarters or,
if there is no headquarters, at the address of the treasurer or such other
place as may be authorized by the commission; and

(b)
By appointment for inspections to be conducted at the designated place for
inspections between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00 p.m. on any other day from the seventh day
through the day immediately before the election, other than Saturday, Sunday,
or a legal holiday. It is a violation of this chapter for a candidate or
political committee to refuse to allow and keep an appointment for an
inspection to be conducted during these authorized times and days in the week
prior to the election. The appointment must be allowed at an authorized time
and day for such inspections that is within twenty-four hours of the time and
day that is requested for the inspection.

(5)
The treasurer or candidate shall preserve books of account, bills, receipts,
and all other financial records of the campaign or political committee for not
less than five calendar years following the year during which the transaction
occurred.

(((5)))
(6) All reports filed pursuant to subsections (1) or (2) of this section
shall be certified as correct by the candidate and the treasurer.

(((6)))
(7) Copies of all reports filed pursuant to this section shall be
readily available for public inspection for at least two consecutive hours
Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays, between 8:00 a.m. and 8:00
p.m., as specified in the committee's statement of organization filed pursuant
to RCW 42.17.040, at the principal headquarters or, if there is no headquarters,
at the address of the treasurer or such other place as may be authorized by the
commission.

(((7))) (8) The commission shall adopt administrative
rules establishing requirements for filer participation in any system designed
and implemented by the commission for the electronic filing of reports.

---
END ---