BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that in a free society, government must proceed very
carefully when balancing the public interests against the fundamental
constitutional rights of private property owners and, therefore, when
government considers a taking of an individual's private personal property it
should be done only when sanctioned by a court of law or to protect the public
health and safety.

To
secure the rights of private property owners, ensure due process, and more
adequately protect the public from unnecessary public nuisances, the
legislature hereby intends to enhance the current standard by which vehicles
may be abated or removed from private property without the consent of the owner.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.55.240 and 1994 c 176 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A city, town, or county that adopts an ordinance or resolution concerning
unauthorized, abandoned, or impounded vehicles shall include the applicable
provisions of this chapter.

(a)
A city, town, or county may, by ordinance, authorize other impound situations
that may arise locally upon the public right-of-way or other publicly owned or
controlled property.

(b)
A city, town, or county ordinance shall contain language that establishes a
written form of authorization to impound, which may include a law enforcement
notice of infraction or citation, clearly denoting the agency's authorization
to impound.

(c)
A city, town, or county may, by ordinance, provide for release of an impounded
vehicle by means of a promissory note in lieu of immediate payment, if at the
time of redemption the legal or registered owner requests a hearing on the
validity of the impoundment. If the municipal ordinance directs the release of
an impounded vehicle before the payment of the impoundment charges, the
municipality is responsible for the payment of those charges to the registered
tow truck operator within thirty days of the hearing date.

(d)
The hearing specified in RCW 46.55.120(2) and in this section may be conducted
by an administrative hearings officer instead of in the district court. A
decision made by an administrative hearing officer may be appealed to the
district court for final judgment.

(2)
A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance establishing procedures for the
abatement and removal as public nuisances of junk vehicles or parts thereof
from private property. Costs of removal may be assessed against the registered
owner of the vehicle if the identity of the owner can be determined, unless the
owner in the transfer of ownership of the vehicle has complied with RCW
46.12.101, or the costs may be assessed against the owner of the property on
which the vehicle is stored. A city, town, or county may also provide for the
payment to the tow truck operator or wrecker as a part of a neighborhood
revitalization program.

(3)
Ordinances pertaining to public nuisances involving vehicles shall
contain:

(a)
A provision requiring notice to the last registered owner of record and the property
owner of record that a hearing may be requested and that if no hearing is
requested, the vehicle will be removed;

(b)
A provision requiring that if a request for a hearing is received, a notice
giving the time, location, and date of the hearing on the question of abatement
and removal of the vehicle or part thereof as a public nuisance shall be
mailed, by certified mail, with a five-day return receipt requested, to the
owner of the land as shown on the last equalized assessment roll and to the
last registered and legal owner of record unless the vehicle is in such
condition that identification numbers are not available to determine ownership;

(c)
A provision that the ordinance shall not apply to:

(i)
A vehicle or part thereof that is completely enclosed within a building
in a lawful manner where it is not visible from the street or other public or
private property ((or));

(ii)
A vehicle or part thereof that is stored or parked in a lawful manner on
private property in connection with the business of a licensed dismantler or
licensed vehicle dealer and is fenced according to RCW 46.80.130; or

(iii)
A vehicle or part thereof for which the body thereof is fully covered with a
cloth or opaque plastic car cover, if the vehicle or part thereof is located on
the private property of the vehicle title holder, or on the private property of
a family member of the vehicle title holder, unless such vehicle or part
thereof is a safety or health hazard. This exception applies to three or fewer
vehicles or parts thereof;

(d)
A provision that the owner of the land on which the vehicle is located may
appear in person at the hearing or present a written statement in time for
consideration at the hearing, and deny responsibility for the presence of the
vehicle on the land, with his reasons for the denial. If it is determined at
the hearing that the vehicle was placed on the land without the consent of the
landowner and that he has not subsequently acquiesced in its presence, then the
local agency shall not assess costs of administration or removal of the vehicle
against the property upon which the vehicle is located or otherwise attempt to
collect the cost from the owner;

(e)
A provision that after notice has been given of the intent of the city, town,
or county to dispose of the vehicle and after a hearing, if requested, has been
held, the vehicle or part thereof shall be removed at the request of a law
enforcement officer with notice to the Washington state patrol and the
department of licensing that the vehicle has been wrecked. The city, town, or
county may operate such a disposal site when its governing body determines that
commercial channels of disposition are not available or are inadequate, and it
may make final disposition of such vehicles or parts, or may transfer such
vehicle or parts to another governmental body provided such disposal shall be
only as scrap.

(4)
A registered disposer under contract to a city or county for the impounding of
vehicles shall comply with any administrative regulations adopted by the city
or county on the handling and disposing of vehicles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

A city, town, or county that adopts local ordinances pertaining to
public nuisances involving vehicles may not allow a law enforcement officer
having jurisdiction or any other authorized person to inspect or certify the
abatement or removal of those vehicles or parts thereof that are included in
RCW 46.55.240(3) from private property except as specified therein.

---
END ---