BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

TABLE OF CONTENTS

Sec. Caption Page
#

Sec.
1. PATIENT RIGHTS......................................... 2

Sec.
2. CHOICE OF HEALTH CARE PROVIDER......................... 3

Sec.
3. QUALITY HEALTH CARE.................................... 5

Sec.
4. HEALTH CARE DECISIONS.................................. 5

Sec.
5. MEDICAL DIRECTORS...................................... 6

Sec.
6. HEALTH INFORMATION PRIVACY............................. 6

Sec.
7. INFORMATION DISCLOSURE................................. 7

Sec.
8. GRIEVANCE PROCESS...................................... 9

Sec.
9. INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF HEALTH CARE DISPUTES............ 11

Sec.
10. INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF ORGANIZATIONS.................. 11

Sec.
11. UNFAIR AND DECEPTIVE ACTS............................ 14

Sec.
12. DELEGATION REQUIREMENTS.............................. 14

Sec.
13. SHORT TITLE.......................................... 14

Sec.
14. CAPTIONS AND TABLE OF CONTENTS NOT LAW............... 14

Sec.
15. CONFLICTS OF LAW..................................... 14

Sec.
16. CODIFICATION DIRECTIVE............................... 14

Sec.
17. REPEALER............................................. 15

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
1.
PATIENT RIGHTS. It is
the intent of the legislature that patients covered by health plans receive
quality health care designed to maintain and improve their health. The purpose
of this act is to ensure that health plan patients:

(1)
Have sufficient and timely access to clinically and culturally appropriate
health care services designed to maintain and improve health;

(2)
Have adequate choice among qualified health care professionals;

(3)
Are assured that health care decisions are made by appropriate medical
personnel based upon sound medical standards;

(4)
Have improved access to information regarding their health plans;

(5)
Have access to a quick and impartial process for appealing plan denials of
health care coverage;

(6)
Are protected from unnecessary invasions of health care privacy;

(7)
Are assured that personal health care information will be used only as
necessary to obtain and pay for health care or to improve the quality of care;
and

(8)
Are protected from unfair and deceptive practices.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
3.
CHOICE OF HEALTH CARE PROVIDER. (1)
Each enrollee in a health plan must have adequate choice among qualified health
care providers.

(2)
Each health plan must allow an enrollee to choose a primary care provider who
is accepting new enrollees from a list of participating providers who
substantially share the varied characteristics of the enrolled population.

(3)
Each health carrier must have a process whereby an enrollee whose medical
condition so warrants may be authorized to use a medical specialist as a
primary care provider. This may include enrollees suffering from chronic
diseases and those with other special needs.

(4)
Each health plan must provide for appropriate and timely referral of enrollees
to a choice of specialists within the plan if specialty care is warranted. If
the type of medical specialist needed for a specific condition is not
represented on the speciality panel, enrollees must have access to
nonparticipating speciality health care providers.

(5)
Each health plan must provide for continuity of care by:

(a)
Assuring that primary care providers are responsible for at least:

(i)
Supervision, coordination, and provision of health services to meet the needs
of each enrollee; and

(ii)
Initiation and coordination of referrals for specialty care;

(b)
Allowing enrollees, already undergoing an active course of treatment that began
while enrolled in the plan, to continue receiving services for a reasonable
period from a participating provider who is not affiliated with the enrollee's
primary care provider's network; and

(c)
Educating enrollees about the carrier's process for assuring continuity of
care.

(6)
Each health plan must provide, upon the request of an enrollee, access by the
enrollee to a second opinion from a participating provider regarding any
medical diagnosis or treatment plan.

(7)
To ensure enrollees' choice of provider and to meet the health care needs of
enrollees for covered benefits without unreasonable delay, each health plan
must include a sufficient number and type of health care providers and
facilities throughout the plan's service area. Each health plan must provide
enrollees with access to an adequate number of acute care hospital services,
primary care providers, specialists and subspecialists, and specialty medical
services, including physical therapy, occupational therapy, and rehabilitation
services within a reasonable distance or travel time.

(8)
Each health plan offered by a carrier must provide a point‑of‑service
option that allows an enrollee to choose to receive service from a
nonparticipating health care provider or facility. The point‑of‑service
option may require that an enrollee pay a reasonable portion of the costs of
the out‑of‑network care.

(9)
Each health carrier must have reasonable standards for waiting times for health
plan enrollees to obtain appointments with participating providers. The
standards must include appointment scheduling guidelines based upon the type of
health care service, including: Preventive, nonsymptomatic care; routine,
nonurgent symptomatic care; urgent care; and emergency care.

(10)
Each health carrier must provide enrollees with adequate telephone access to
information necessary for enrolles to receive health services needed for
covered health conditions without unreasonable delay.

(11)
Each carrier must develop an access plan to meet the needs of vulnerable and
underserved populations among its health plan enrollees.

(a)
The plan must provide culturally appropriate services to the greatest extent
practicable.

(b)
When a significant number of enrollees in the plan speak a first language other
than English, the plan must provide access to personnel fluent in languages
other than English, to the greatest extent practicable.

(12)
Each health carrier must communicate enrollee information required in this
chapter by means that ensure that a substantial portion of the enrollee
population can make use of this information.

(13)
Each health plan must, at the carrier's expense, allow enrollees to continue
receiving services from a primary care provider whose contract with the plan or
whose contract with a subcontractor is being terminated by the plan or
subcontractor without cause under the terms of that contract for no longer than
sixty days following notice of termination to the enrollees or, in group
coverage arrangements involving periods of open enrollment, only until the end
of the next open enrollment period. The provider's relationship with the
health plan or subcontractor must be continued on the same terms and conditions
as those of the contract the plan or subcontractor is terminating, except for
any provision requiring that the health plan assign new enrollees to the terminated
provider.

(14)
Each health plan must hold enrollees harmless against claims from participating
providers for payment of costs of covered health services other than enrollees'
cost-sharing obligations. A health service that is the subject of an unresolved
grievance is a covered service for the purposes of this section.

(15)
Every health carrier shall meet the standards set forth in this section and any
rules adopted by the commissioner to implement this section. For the purposes
of this section, the commissioner shall consider relevant standards adopted by
national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
5.
QUALITY HEALTH CARE. A
carrier must have a fully operational, comprehensive, written, quality
improvement program that addresses access, continuity, and quality of care for
all health plan enrollees. The commissioner shall adopt in rule quality
improvement program requirements after considering relevant standards adopted
by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
7.
HEALTH CARE DECISIONS. Each
health carrier, in its review of inpatient medical and surgical benefits and
outpatient medical and surgical benefits for residents of this state, shall
meet the standards set forth in this section.

(2)
Any decision to deny an admission, length of stay, or extension of stay, and
any decision to deny, modify, or discontinue a health service or procedure must
be made by a participating provider who has reasonable access to
board-certified specialty providers in making such determinations.

(3)
Carriers shall maintain a documented utilization review program description and
written utilization review criteria based on reasonable medical evidence. The
program must include a method for reviewing and updating criteria. Carriers
shall make clinical protocols, medical management standards, and other review
criteria available upon request to participating providers.

(4)
The commissioner shall adopt in rule standards for this section after
considering relevant standards adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations and the state agencies that purchase managed health care
services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
9.
MEDICAL DIRECTORS. No
health carrier may appoint a medical director who is not a licensed physician
in the state of Washington. The medical director is responsible for all
medical decisions, treatment policies, protocols, quality assurance
activities, and utilization management decisions for any health plan offered by
the carrier. The medical quality assurance commission shall develop a
definition of unprofessional conduct as it applies to the conduct of a
physician practicing as a health carrier medical director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
11.
HEALTH INFORMATION PRIVACY. (1)
Each health carrier must develop and implement policies and procedures
governing the collection, use, and disclosure of health information. These
policies and procedures must include methods for enrollees to access
information and amend incorrect information, for enrollees to restrict the
disclosure of sensitive information, and for enrollees to obtain information
about the carrier's health information policies. In addition, these policies
and procedures must include methods for carrier oversight and enforcement of
information policies, for carrier storage and disposal of health information,
and for carrier conformance to state and federal laws governing the collection,
use, and disclosure of personally identifiable health information. Each carrier
must provide a summary notice of its health information policies to enrollees,
including the enrollee's right to restrict the collection, use, and disclosure
of health information.

(2)
Except as otherwise required by statute or rule, a health carrier is, and all
persons acting at the direction of or on behalf of a carrier or in receipt of
an enrollee's personally identifiable health information are, prohibited from
collecting, using, or disclosing personally identifiable health information
unless authorized in writing by the person who is the subject of the
information. At a minimum, such authorization must be valid for a limited time
and purpose; be specific as to purpose and type of information to be collected,
used, or disclosed; and identify the persons who will be receiving the
information.

(3)
Any person who is the subject of an unauthorized collection, use, or disclosure
of personally identifiable health information is entitled to the remedies
provided under RCW 9.73.060 governing violations of the right to privacy.

(4)
The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section and shall take
into consideration health information privacy standards recommended by the
national association of insurance commissioners and other related professional
organizations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
13.
INFORMATION DISCLOSURE. (1) It
is a false and deceptive act for a health carrier to offer to sell a health
plan to an enrollee or to any group representative, agent, employer, or
enrollee representative or to an individual in a group plan if that person is
not given the following information before purchase or selection:

(a)
A listing of covered benefits, including prescription drugs, if any;

(b)
A listing of exclusions, reductions, and limitations to covered benefits,
including policies and practices related to any drug formulary, and any
definition of medical necessity or other coverage criteria upon which they may
be based;

(c)
A statement of the carrier's policies for protecting the confidentiality of
health information;

(d)
A statement containing the cost of premiums and enrollee point-of-service
cost-sharing requirements;

(e)
A summary explanation of grievance and appeal procedures;

(f)
A statement affirming the availability of a point-of-service option and how the
option operates; and

(g)
A convenient means of obtaining a list of participating providers, including
disclosure of network arrangements that restrict access to providers within any
plan network.

(2)
Upon the request of any person, including a current enrollee, prospective
enrollee, or the insurance commissioner, a health carrier and the Washington
state health care authority, established by chapter 41.05 RCW, in relation to
the uniform medical plan must provide written information regarding any health
care plan it offers, that includes the following written information:

(a)
Any documents, instruments, or other information referred to in the enrollment
agreement;

(b)
A full description of the procedures to be followed by an enrollee for
consulting a provider other than the primary care provider and whether the
enrollee's primary care provider, the carrier's medical director, or another
entity must authorize the referral;

(c)
Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for obtaining prior
authorization for health care services;

(d)
A written description of any reimbursement or payment arrangements, including,
but not limited to, capitation provisions, fee-for-service provisions, and
health care delivery efficiency provisions, between a carrier and a provider or
network;

(e)
Circumstances under which the plan may retrospectively deny coverage for
emergency and nonemergency care that had prior authorization under the plan's
written policies;

(f)
A copy of all grievance procedures for claim or service denial and for
dissatisfaction with care; and

(g)
Descriptions and justifications for provider compensation programs, including
any incentives or penalties that are intended to encourage providers to
withhold services or minimize or avoid referrals to specialists.

(3)
Each health carrier and the Washington state health care authority shall
provide to all enrollees and prospective enrollees a list of available
disclosure items.

(4)
Nothing in this section requires a carrier to divulge proprietary information
to an enrollee.

(5)
No carrier may advertise, market, or present any health plan to the public as a
plan that covers services that help prevent illness or promote the health of
enrollees unless it:

(a)
Provides all clinical preventive health services provided by the basic health
plan;

(b)
Monitors and reports annually to enrollees on standardized measures of health
care and satisfaction of all enrollees in the health plan as defined by the
state department of health, after consideration of national standardized
measurement systems adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health care services;

(c)
Has a certificate of approved partnership with the state department of health
or a local health jurisdiction, attesting to the plan's active participation in
community-wide efforts to maintain and improve the health status of its
enrollees through activities such as public health educational programs; and

(d)
Makes available upon request to enrollees its integrated plan to identify and
manage the most prevalent diseases within its enrolled population, including
cancer, heart disease, and stroke.

(6)
No health carrier may preclude or discourage its providers from informing
patients of the care he or she requires, including various treatment options,
and whether in the providers' view such care is consistent with the plan's
health coverage criteria, or otherwise covered by the patient's service
agreement with the health carrier. No health carrier may prohibit, discourage,
or penalize a provider otherwise practicing in compliance with the law from
advocating on behalf of a patient with a health carrier. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to authorize providers to bind health carriers to
pay for any service.

(7)
No health carrier may preclude or discourage patients or those paying for their
coverage from discussing the comparative merits of different health carriers
with their providers. This prohibition specifically includes prohibiting or
limiting providers participating in those discussions even if critical of a
carrier.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
15.
GRIEVANCE PROCESS. (1)
Each health carrier must have a fully operational, comprehensive grievance
process that complies with the requirements of this section and any rules
adopted by the commissioner to implement this section. For the purposes of
this section, the commissioner shall consider grievance process standards
adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies
that purchase managed health care services.

(2)
Each health carrier must provide written notice to an enrollee and the
enrollee's provider of its decision to modify, discontinue, or deny a health
service for the enrollee.

(3)
Each health carrier must process as a grievance:

(a)
An enrollee's complaint about the quality or availability of a health service;

(b)
An enrollee's complaint about an issue other than the quality or availability
of a health service that the health carrier has not resolved within response
timelines established by the commissioner in rules; and

(c)
An enrollee's request that the carrier reconsider: (i) Its decision to modify,
or (ii) its initial resolution of a complaint or grievance made by an enrollee.

(4)
To process a grievance, each carrier must:

(a)
Provide written notice to the enrollee when the grievance is received;

(b)
Assist the enrollee with the grievance process;

(c)
Expedite a grievance if the enrollee's provider or the carrier's medical
director determines, or if other evidence indicates that following the
grievance process response timelines could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's
health or ability to regain maximum function;

(d)
Cooperate with a representative chosen by the enrollee;

(e)
Consider information submitted by the enrollee;

(f)
Investigate and resolve the grievance; and

(g)
Provide written notice of its resolution of the grievance to the enrollee.

(5)
Written notice required by subsections (2) and (4) of this section must
explain:

(a)
The carrier's decision and the supporting coverage or clinical reasons,
including any alternative health service that may be appropriate; and

(b)
The carrier's grievance process, including information, as appropriate, about
how to exercise enrollee's rights to obtain a second opinion, how to continue
receiving services as provided in this section, and how to discuss a grievance
resolution with an impartial carrier representative authorized to review and
modify the grievance resolution.

(6)
When an enrollee requests that the carrier reconsider its decision to modify or
discontinue a health service that an enrollee is receiving through the plan,
the health carrier must continue to provide that health service until the
grievance is resolved. If the resolution affirms the carrier's decision, the
enrollee may be responsible for the cost of this continued health service.

(7)
Each health carrier must provide a clear explanation of the grievance process
upon request, upon enrollment to new enrollees, and annually to enrollees and
subcontractors.

(8)
Each carrier must: Track each grievance until final resolution; maintain, and
make accessible to the commissioner for a period of three years, a log of all
grievances; and identify and evaluate trends in grievances as part of the
quality improvement program described in section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
17.
INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF HEALTH CARE DISPUTES. (1) A
process for the fair consideration of consumer complaints relating to decisions
by the health plan to deny or limit coverage of or payment for health care is
needed. The commissioner shall adopt rules that:

(a)
Permit a person, whose appeal of an adverse decision is denied by a carrier, to
seek review of that determination by an independent review organization
assigned to the appeal;

(b)
Require carriers to provide to the appropriate independent review organization
not later than the third business day after the date the carrier receives a
request for review a copy of:

(i)
Any medical records of the enrollee that are relevant to the review;

(ii)
Any documents used by the plan in making the determination to be reviewed by
the organization;

(iii)
Any documentation and written information submitted to the carrier in support
of the appeal; and

(iv)
A list of each physician or health care provider who has provided care to the
enrollee and who may have medical records relevant to the appeal; and

(c)
Require carriers to comply with the independent review organization's
determination regarding the medical necessity or appropriateness of, or the
application of other health plan coverage criterion to, health care items and
services for an enrollee, and to pay for the independent review.

(2)
Health information or other confidential or proprietary information in the
custody of a carrier may be provided to an independent review organization,
subject to rules adopted by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
19.
INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF ORGANIZATIONS. (1)
The commissioner shall:

(a)
Adopt rules for:

(i)
The certification, selection, and operation of independent review organizations
to perform independent review of health care disputes described by section 9 of
this act; and

(ii)
The suspension and revocation of the certification;

(b)
Designate annually each organization that meets the standards as an independent
review organization;

(c)
Charge health carriers fees as necessary to fund the operations of independent
review organizations; and

(d)
Provide ongoing oversight of independent review organizations to ensure
continued compliance with this section and section 9 of this act and the rules
adopted under those sections.

(2)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must ensure:

(a)
The confidentiality of medical records transmitted to an independent review
organization for use in independent reviews;

(b)
The qualifications and independence of each health care provider or physician
making review determinations for an independent review organization;

(c)
The fairness of the procedures used by an independent review organization in
making the determinations; and

(d)
Timely notice to enrollees of the results of the independent review, including
the clinical basis for the determination.

(3)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must require that
each independent review organization make its determination:

(a)
Not later than the earlier of:

(i)
The fifteenth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The twentieth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the request that the determination be made; and

(b)
In the case of a life‑threatening condition, not later than the earlier
of:

(i)
The fifth day after the date the independent review organization receives the
information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The eighth day after the date the independent review organization receives the
request that the determination be made.

(4)
To be certified as an independent review organization under this chapter, an
organization must submit to the commissioner an application in the form
required by the commissioner. The application must include:

(a)
For an applicant that is publicly held, the name of each stockholder or owner
of more than five percent of any stock or options;

(b)
The name of any holder of bonds or notes of the applicant that exceed one
hundred thousand dollars;

(c)
The name and type of business of each corporation or other organization that
the applicant controls or is affiliated with and the nature and extent of the
affiliation or control;

(d)
The name and a biographical sketch of each director, officer, and executive of
the applicant and any entity listed under (c) of this subsection and a
description of any relationship the named individual has with:

(i)
A health plan;

(ii)
A health carrier;

(iii)
A utilization review agent;

(iv)
A nonprofit health corporation;

(v)
A health care provider; or

(vi)
A group representing any of the entities described by (d)(i) through (v) of
this subsection;

(e)
The percentage of the applicant's revenues that are anticipated to be derived
from reviews conducted under section 9 of this act;

(f)
A description of the areas of expertise of the health care professionals making
review determinations for the applicant; and

(g)
The procedures to be used by the independent review organization in making
review determinations regarding reviews conducted under section 9 of this act.

(5)
The independent review organization shall annually submit the information
required by subsection (4) of this section. If at any time there is a material
change in the information included in the application under subsection (4) of
this section, the independent review organization shall submit updated
information to the commissioner.

(6)
An independent review organization may not be a subsidiary of, or in any way
owned or controlled by, a health carrier or a trade or professional association
of health carriers.

(7)
An independent review organization conducting a review under section 9 of this
act is not liable for damages arising from the determination made by the
organization. This subsection does not apply to an act or omission of the independent
review organization that is made in bad faith or that involves gross
negligence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
21.
UNFAIR AND DECEPTIVE ACTS. (1) A
health carrier shall not engage in unfair or deceptive acts or practices as
such acts and practices are prohibited under chapter 48.30 RCW. Such acts and
practices include but are not limited to the placement of any advertisement
before the public that is false, inaccurate, or misleading. Such advertising
is a matter affecting the public interest for the purposes of applying chapter
19.86 RCW, and is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business. A violation of this section constitutes an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying
chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2)
The commissioner may by rule define and prohibit other acts and practices by
health carriers found by the commissioner to be unfair and deceptive and harmful
to consumers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
23.
DELEGATION REQUIREMENTS. (1)
Each carrier is accountable for and must oversee any activities required by
this act that it delegates to any subcontractor. No carrier may delegate any
activity required by this act unless the carrier has a written and fully
operational delegation policy that ensures that the subcontractor fulfills the
requirements of this chapter.

(2)
No contract with a subcontractor executed by the health carrier may relieve the
health carrier of its obligations to any enrollee for the provision of health
care services or of its responsibility for compliance with statutes or rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
25. SHORT
TITLE. This
act may be known and cited as the health care patient bill of rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
27.
CAPTIONS AND TABLE OF CONTENTS NOT LAW.
Captions and the table of contents used in this act are not any part of the
law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
29.
CONFLICTS OF LAW. If
any provision of this chapter conflicts with state or federal law, such
provision must be construed in a manner most favorable to the enrollee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
31.
CODIFICATION DIRECTIVE.
Sections 1 through 15 of this act are each added to chapter 48.43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
33.
REPEALER. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
48.43.075 (Informing patients about their care--Health carriers
may not preclude or discourage) and 1996 c 312 s 2;

(2) RCW
48.43.095 (Information provided to an enrollee or a prospective
enrollee) and 1996 c 312 s 4; and

(3) RCW
48.43.105 (Preparation of documents that compare health
carriers--Immunity--Due diligence) and 1996 c 312 s 5.

---
END ---