BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each employee benefit plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or ambulatory surgery
center services must cover hospital and general anesthesia services in
conjunction with dental procedures in a hospital or ambulatory surgical center
if the covered person:

(a)
Is under the age of seven and the required procedure cannot be safely and
effectively performed in a dental office;

(b)
Is physically or developmentally disabled and cannot be safely and effectively
treated in a dental office; or

(c)
Has at least one medical condition that would create an undue medical risk if
treatment is not performed in a hospital or ambulatory surgery center; such
treatment must be approved by the patient's physician.

(2)
Each employee benefit plan offered to public employees and their covered
dependents that provides coverage for dental services must cover general
anesthesia services in conjunction with dental procedures if the covered person
is:

(a)
Under the age of seven and the required procedure can be safely and effectively
performed in a dental office; or

(b)
Physically or developmentally disabled and can be safely and effectively treated
in a dental office.

(3)
This section does not:

(a)
Prevent the application of standard cost-sharing requirements applicable to
other covered benefits;

(b)
Limit the authority in negotiating rates and contracts with specific providers;

(c)
Apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a
specified disease or other limited benefits; or

(d)
Prevent the requirement that services be provided in a participating health
care facility.

(4)
Prior authorization may be required in a manner similar for hospitalization of
other covered conditions.

(5)
For the purpose of this section, "general anesthesia" means a state
of unconsciousness accompanied by a loss of protective reflexes, including the
ability to maintain an airway independently and respond purposefully to
physical stimulation or verbal command.

(6)
This section applies to employee benefit plans issued or renewed on or after
the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each health carrier that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or ambulatory
surgery center services must cover hospital and general anesthesia services in
conjunction with dental procedures in a hospital or ambulatory surgical center
if the covered person:

(a)
Is under the age of seven and the required procedure cannot be safely and
effectively performed in a dental office;

(b)
Is physically or developmentally disabled and cannot be safely and effectively
treated in a dental office; or

(c)
Has at least one medical condition that would create an undue medical risk if
treatment is not performed in a hospital or ambulatory surgery center; such
treatment must be approved by the patient's physician.

(2)
Each health carrier that provides coverage for dental benefits must cover
general anesthesia services in conjunction with dental procedures if the
covered person is:

(a)
Under the age of seven and the required procedure can be safely and effectively
performed in the dental office; or

(b)
Physically or developmentally disabled and can safely and effectively be
treated in the dental office.

(3)
This section does not:

(a)
Prevent the application of standard cost-sharing requirements applicable to
other covered benefits;

(b)
Limit the health carrier in negotiating rates and contracts with specific
providers;

(c)
Apply to medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a
specified disease or other limited benefits; or

(d)
Prevent the requirement that services be provided in a participating health
care facility.

(4)
Prior authorization may be required in a manner similar for hospitalization of
other covered conditions.

(5)
For the purpose of this section, "general anesthesia" means a state
of unconsciousness accompanied by a loss of protective reflexes, including the
ability to maintain an airway independently and respond purposefully to
physical stimulation or verbal command.

(6) This section applies to employee benefit plans issued or
renewed on or after the effective date of this section.

---
END ---