BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section, "health care facility" has the same
meaning as set forth in RCW 48.43.005.

(2) Effective January 1, 2000, the use of powder latex products in
health care facilities is prohibited. Health care facilities shall establish,
upon the recommendations of the department of health, written policies on
methods to prevent latex allergic reactions through the use of low-protein
latex products.

---
END ---