BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that a recent report by the United States department of
agriculture reported that Washington ranked third in the nation in hunger. The
legislature further finds that hunger affects the growth and development of
children, the productivity of adults, and the self-sufficiency of elders. The
legislature further finds that it is critical to understand the extent and
dimensions of the hunger problem in Washington so that it can be addressed in
the most effective manner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department of health shall administer and coordinate a hunger survey project.
The project shall determine:

(1)
The prevalence of hunger in the total population, and among low-income
families;

(2)
The characteristics of hungry families and the extent to which antihunger
resources are or are not addressing their needs; and

(3)
The ways hungry families attempt to cope with food shortages and the lessons
their efforts provide in making services more effective.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of health shall provide the appropriate committees of the senate and
the house of representatives with a progress report on December 1, 1999, and a
final report on December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act expires June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The sum of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from
the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---