BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that facilitating the environmental permit process will
increase citizen satisfaction and compliance with state and local permit
requirements. Lack of coordination in the processing of permit applications
causes costly delays and frustration to the applicant. The public deserves a
clear, predictable system for land-use decisions. The legislature also finds
that permit issuance can be expedited by requiring state agencies and local
jurisdictions to coordinate their permit processes.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.020 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following goals are adopted to guide the development and adoption of
comprehensive plans and development regulations of those counties and cities
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040. The following goals
are not listed in order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the
purpose of guiding the development of comprehensive plans and development
regulations:

(1)
Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public
facilities and services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.

(2)
Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into
sprawling, low-density development.

(3)
Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that are
based on regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive
plans.

(4)
Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to all economic
segments of the population of this state, promote a variety of residential
densities and housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing
stock.

(5)
Economic development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that
is consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity
for all citizens of this state, especially for unemployed and for disadvantaged
persons, and encourage growth in areas experiencing insufficient economic
growth, all within the capacities of the state's natural resources, public
services, and public facilities.

(6)
Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for public use without
just compensation having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be
protected from arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

(7)
Permits. ((Applications for both)) State and local government
permit((s)) agencies should ((be processed)) coordinate
and process permits in a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability for
applicants.

(8)
Natural resource industries. Maintain and enhance natural resource-based
industries, including productive timber, agricultural, and fisheries
industries. Encourage the conservation of productive forest lands and
productive agricultural lands, and discourage incompatible uses.

(9)
Open space and recreation. Encourage the retention of open space and
development of recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks.

(10)
Environment. Protect the environment and enhance the state's high quality of
life, including air and water quality, and the availability of water.

(11)
Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens
in the planning process and ensure coordination between communities and
jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.

(12)
Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public facilities and
services necessary to support development shall be adequate to serve the
development at the time the development is available for occupancy and use
without decreasing current service levels below locally established minimum
standards.

(13)
Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands,
sites, and structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to the issuance of all new permits under this chapter
except permits issued pursuant to RCW 90.48.215, 90.48.220, and 90.48.260.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department
shall issue a final permit determination based on a project permit application
within sixty days after the department notifies the applicant that the
application is complete. In determining the number of days that have elapsed
after the department has notified the applicant that the application is
complete, the following periods shall be excluded:

(a)(i)
Any period during which the applicant has been requested by the department to
correct plans, perform required studies, or provide additional required
information. The period shall be calculated from the date the department
notifies the applicant of the need for additional information until the earlier
of the date the department determines whether the additional information
satisfies the request for information or fourteen days after the date the
information has been provided to the department.

(ii)
If the department determines that the information submitted by the applicant
under (a)(i) of this subsection is insufficient, it shall notify the applicant
of the deficiencies and the procedures under (a)(i) of this subsection shall
apply as if a new request for studies had been made;

(b)
Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an open record
appeal hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are allowed; and

(c)
Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the department.

(3)
The time limits established by subsection (2) of this section do not apply if a
project permit application is substantially revised by the applicant, in which
case the time period shall start from the date at which the revised project application
is determined to be complete under section 4 of this act.

(4)
Until July 1, 2000, if the department is unable to issue a final permit
determination within the time limits provided for in this section, it shall
provide written notice of this fact to the project applicant. The notice shall
include a statement of reasons why the time limits have not been met and an
estimated date for issuance of the final permit determination. On and after
July 1, 2000, if the department is unable to issue a final permit determination
within the time limits provided for in this section, the applicant is deemed to
have received a temporary permit. The department shall provide written notice
to the project applicant that the applicant is deemed to have a temporary permit
and may discharge waste materials as proposed in the permit application.

(5)(a)
Temporary permits issued under this section remain fully effective and
enforceable based on the information submitted as part of the completed
application to discharge waste materials.

(b)
Temporary permits shall be valid for no more than five years and shall continue
in force until:

(i)
The effective date of a permit issued by the department; or

(ii)
The temporary permit is revoked by the department.

(c)
The department may revoke a temporary permit or may initiate other actions
under this chapter if:

(i)
There is an unreported change in the nature or character of the wastes being
discharged; or

(ii)
If the department determines that the continued discharge as authorized by the
temporary permit will pollute the waters of the state in violation of state or
federal standards adopted under this chapter.

(6)
Beginning July 1, 1999, the department shall track the number of permits issued
within sixty days, the number of approvals issued after the sixty-day timeline,
the number of denials, the number of requests for information, and the number
of applications that are withdrawn.

(7)
This section applies to project permit applications filed on or after July 1,
1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to the issuance of all new permits pursuant to RCW
90.48.215, 90.48.220, and 90.48.260.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department
shall issue a final permit determination on a project permit application within
one hundred twenty days after the department notifies the applicant that the
application is complete, except when federal law requires otherwise, as
provided in section 5 of this act. In determining the number of days that have
elapsed after the department has notified the applicant that the application is
complete, the following periods shall be excluded:

(a)(i)
Any period during which the applicant has been requested by the department to
correct plans, perform required studies, or provide additional required
information. The period shall be calculated from the date the department
notifies the applicant of the need for additional information until the earlier
of the date the department determines whether the additional information
satisfies the request for information or fourteen days after the date the
information has been provided to the department.

(ii)
If the department determines that the information submitted by the applicant
under (a)(i) of this subsection is insufficient, it shall notify the applicant
of the deficiencies and the procedures under (a)(i) of this subsection shall
apply as if a new request for studies had been made;

(b)
Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an open record
appeal hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are allowed; and

(c)
Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the department.

(3)
The time limits established by subsection (2) of this section do not apply if a
project permit application is substantially revised by the applicant, in which
case the time period shall start from the date at which the revised project
application is determined to be complete under section 5 of this act.

(4)
If the department is unable to issue a final permit determination within the
time limits specified in this section, the department shall provide written
notice of this fact to the project applicant. The notice shall include a
statement of reasons why the time limits have not been met and an estimated
date for issuance of the final permit determination.

(5)
Beginning July 1, 1999, the department shall track the number of permits issued
within one hundred twenty days, the number of approvals issued after the one
hundred twenty-day timeline, the number of denials, the number of requests for
information, and the number of applications that are withdrawn.

(6)
This section applies to project permit applications filed on or after July 1,
1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Within twenty-eight days after receiving a new project permit application, the
department shall mail or provide in person a written determination to the
applicant, stating either:

(a)
That the application is complete; or

(b)
That the application is incomplete and what is necessary to make the application
complete.

(2)
A project permit application is complete for purposes of this section when it:
(a) Meets the procedural submission requirements of the department; (b) has a
threshold determination under chapter 43.21C RCW for either a determination of
nonsignificance or a mitigated determination of nonsignificance or has a
completed final environmental impact statement; (c) meets procedural and
substantive requirements of federal law if applicable; and (d) is sufficient
for continued processing even though additional information may be required or
project modifications may be undertaken subsequently.

(3)
Within fourteen days after an applicant has submitted to the department
additional information identified by the department as being necessary for a complete
application, the department shall notify the applicant whether the application
is complete or what additional information is necessary.

(4)
The determination of completeness shall not preclude the department from
requesting additional information or studies either at the time of the notice
of completeness or subsequently if new information is required or substantial
changes in the proposed action occur.

(5)
For purposes of determining time limits in sections 3 and 4 of this act, an
application shall be deemed complete under this section if the department does
not provide a written determination to the applicant that the application is
incomplete as provided in subsections (1)(b) and (3) of this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
90.48.215 and 1989 c 293 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The following definition shall apply to this section: "Upland finfish
hatching and rearing facilities" means those facilities not located within
waters of the state where finfish are hatched, fed, nurtured, held, maintained,
or reared to reach the size of release or for market sale. This shall include
fish hatcheries, rearing ponds, spawning channels, and other similarly
constructed or fabricated public or private facilities.

(2)
Not later than September 30, 1989, the department shall adopt standards
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW for waste discharges from upland finfish hatching
and rearing facilities. In establishing these standards, the department shall
incorporate, to the extent applicable, studies conducted by the United States
environmental protection agency on finfish rearing facilities and other
relevant information. The department shall also issue a general permit as
authorized by the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq., or RCW
90.48.160 by September 30, 1989, for upland finfish hatching and rearing
facilities. Except as provided in section 4 of this act, the department
shall approve or deny applications for coverage under the general permit for
upland finfish hatching and rearing facilities within one hundred ((eighty))
twenty days ((from the date of application)) after the
department notifies the applicant that the application is complete according to
section 5 of this act, except when federal law requires otherwise or
unless a longer time is required to satisfy public participation requirements
in the permit process in accordance with applicable rules, or compliance with
the requirements of the state environmental policy act under chapter 43.21C
RCW. The department shall notify applicants for coverage by a general permit
as soon as it determines that a proposed discharge meets or fails to comply
with the standards or general permit conditions set forth pursuant to this
section, or that a time period longer than one hundred ((eighty)) twenty
days is necessary to satisfy public participation requirements or the state
environmental policy act.

Sec.
7. RCW
90.48.220 and 1993 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section "marine finfish rearing facilities"
means those private and public facilities located within the salt water of the
state where finfish are fed, nurtured, held, maintained, or reared to reach the
size of release or for market sale.

(2)
Not later than October 31, 1994, the department shall adopt criteria under
chapter 34.05 RCW for allowable sediment impacts from organic enrichment due to
marine finfish rearing facilities.

(3)
Not later than June 30, 1995, the department shall adopt standards under
chapter 34.05 RCW for waste discharges from marine finfish rearing facilities.
In establishing these standards, the department shall review and incorporate,
to the extent possible, studies conducted by state and federal agencies on
waste discharges from marine finfish rearing facilities, and any reports and
other materials prepared by technical committees on waste discharges from
marine finfish rearing facilities. Except as provided in section 4 of this
act, the department shall approve or deny discharge permit applications for
marine finfish rearing facilities within one hundred ((eighty)) twenty
days ((from the date of application)) after the department notifies
the applicant that the application is complete according to section 5 of this
act, except when federal law requires otherwise or unless a longer
time is required to satisfy public participation requirements in the permit
process in accordance with applicable rules, or compliance with the
requirements of the state environmental policy act under chapter 43.21C RCW.
The department shall notify applicants as soon as it determines that a proposed
discharge meets or fails to comply with the standards adopted pursuant to this
section, or if a time period longer than one hundred eighty days is necessary
to satisfy public participation requirements of the state environmental policy
act.

(4)
The department may adopt rules to exempt marine finfish rearing facilities not
requiring national pollutant discharge elimination system permits under the
federal water pollution control act from the discharge permit requirement.

Sec.
8. RCW
58.17.095 and 1986 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A county, city, or town may adopt an ordinance providing for the administrative
review of a preliminary plat without a public hearing ((by adopting an
ordinance providing for such administrative review)). The ordinance may
specify a threshold number of lots in a subdivision above which a public
hearing must be held, and may specify other factors which necessitate the
holding of a public hearing. ((The administrative review process shall
include the))

(2)
If the county, city, or town has not adopted consolidated permitting procedures
and time frames as provided in chapter 36.70B RCW, it shall conduct
administrative review of preliminary plats consistent with the following
minimum conditions:

(((1)))
(a) The notice requirements of RCW 58.17.090 shall be followed, except
that the publication shall be made within ten days of the filing of the
application. Additionally, at least ten days after the filing of the
application notice both shall be: (((a))) (i) Posted on or
around the land proposed to be subdivided in at least five conspicuous places
designed to attract public awareness of the proposal; and (((b))) (ii)
mailed to the owner of each lot or parcel of property located within at least
three hundred feet of the site. The applicant shall provide the county, city,
or town with a list of such property owners and their addresses. The notice
shall include notification that no public hearing will be held on the
application, except as provided by this section. The notice shall set out the
procedures and time limitations for persons to require a public hearing and
make comments.

(((2)))
(b) Any person shall have a period of twenty days from the date of the
notice to comment upon the proposed preliminary plat. All comments received
shall be provided to the applicant. The applicant has seven days from receipt
of the comments to respond thereto.

(((3)))
(c) A public hearing on the proposed subdivision shall be held if any
person files a request for a hearing with the county, city, or town within
twenty-one days of the publishing of such notice. If such a hearing is
requested, notice requirements for the public hearing shall be in conformance
with RCW 58.17.090, and the ninety-day period for approval or disapproval of
the proposed subdivision provided for in RCW 58.17.140 shall commence with the
date of the filing of the request for a public hearing. Any hearing ordered
under this subsection shall be conducted by the planning commission or hearings
officer as required by county or city ordinance.

(((4)))
(d) On its own initiative within twenty-one days of the filing of the
request for approval of the subdivision, the governing body, or a designated
employee or official, of the county, city, or town, shall be authorized to
cause a public hearing to be held on the proposed subdivision within ninety
days of the filing of the request for the subdivision.

(((5)))
(e) If the public hearing is waived as provided in this section, the
planning commission or planning agency shall complete the review of the
proposed preliminary plat and transmit its recommendation to the legislative
body as provided in RCW 58.17.100.

(3)
If the county, city, or town has adopted consolidated permitting procedures and
time frames as provided in chapter 36.70B RCW, it may conduct administrative
review of preliminary plats consistent with its procedures and time frames. At
a minimum, local permitting procedures and time frames related to
administrative review of preliminary plats shall provide for:

(a)
Notice of application by publication, posting, and mailing. All forms of
notice shall include a prominent statement that no public hearing will be held
on the application, except as provided by this section. All forms of notice
shall clearly state procedures and time frames for persons to make comments on
the proposal and request a public hearing.

(b)
Written comments on the application by any person. Comments received shall be
provided to the applicant, and the applicant shall be provided seven days from
receipt of the comments to respond thereto.

(c)
A public hearing on the application if any person files a request for a hearing
within the time frame specified. If a hearing is requested, notice
requirements for the public hearing and the time frame for approval or
disapproval of the application shall be consistent with other local permitting
procedures. Any hearing conducted under this subsection shall be conducted by
the planning commission or hearing officer as required by local ordinance.

(d)
A public hearing on the application if the legislative or executive branch of
the county, city, or town so requests within the time frame specified.

(e)
Expedited agency review and transmittal of its recommendation on the
application to the legislative body of the county, city, or town, if there is
no request for public hearing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall develop a pilot project to authorize the issuance of hydraulic
permits by a county with a population greater than one million five hundred
thousand people. Upon authorization, the county shall issue permits according
to the department's rules. The county receiving authorization may impose fees
to cover the costs of permit processing, except that no fees may be imposed for
fish habitat restoration projects permitted under RCW 75.20.350, and no fees
may be imposed for monitoring or enforcing hydraulic permits. The agreement
between the department and the county shall contain provisions for effective
monitoring and enforcement of hydraulic permits. The department shall not
delegate rule-making authority in the pilot program. The department shall
report the results of the pilot project to the legislature by December 31,
2000. This section expires June 30, 2001. This section shall not apply to
activities and areas covered by chapter 76.09 RCW.

Sec.
10. RCW
90.60.010 and 1995 c 347 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby finds and declares:

(1)
Washington's environmental protection programs have established strict standards
to reduce pollution and protect the public health and safety and the
environment. The single-purpose programs instituted to achieve these standards
have been successful in many respects, and have produced significant gains in
protecting Washington's environment in the face of substantial population
growth.

(2)
Continued progress to achieve the environmental standards in the face of
continued population growth will require greater coordination between the
single-purpose environmental programs and more efficient operation of these
programs overall. Pollution must be prevented and controlled and not simply
transferred to another media or another place. This goal can only be achieved
by maintaining the current environmental protection standards and by greater
integration of the existing programs.

(3)
As the number of environmental laws and regulations have grown in Washington,
so have the number of permits required of business and government. This
regulatory burden has significantly added to the cost and time needed to obtain
essential permits in Washington. The increasing number of individual permits
and permit authorities has generated the continuing potential for conflict,
overlap, and duplication between the various state, local, and federal permits.

(4)
The purpose of this chapter is to institute new, efficient procedures that will
assist businesses and public agencies in complying with the environmental
quality laws in an expedited fashion, without reducing protection of public
health and safety and the environment.

(5)
Those procedures need to provide a permit process that promotes effective
dialogue and ensures ease in the transfer and clarification of technical
information, while preventing duplication. It is necessary that the procedures
establish a process for preliminary and ongoing meetings between the applicant,
the coordinating permit agency, and the participating permit agencies, but do
not preclude the applicant or participating permit agencies from individually
coordinating with each other.

(6)
It is necessary, to the maximum extent practicable, that the procedures
established in this chapter ensure that the coordinated permit agency process
and applicable permit requirements and criteria are integrated and run
concurrently, rather than consecutively.

(7)
It is necessary to provide a reliable and consolidated source of information
concerning federal, state, and local environmental and land use laws and
procedures that apply to any given proposal.

(8)
It is the intent of this chapter to provide an optional process by which a
project proponent may obtain active coordination of all applicable regulatory
and land-use permitting procedures. This process is not to replace individual
laws, or diminish the substantive decision-making role of individual
jurisdictions. Rather it is to provide predictability, administrative
consolidation, and, where possible, consolidation of appeal processes.

(9)
It is also the intent of this chapter to provide consolidated, effective, and
easier opportunities for members of the public to receive information and
present their views about proposed projects.

(10)
It is also the intent of this chapter to provide a forum for the resolution of
significant issues related to the permitting and authorization of projects that
are proposed on state-owned aquatic lands. "Aquatic lands" have the
meaning provided in RCW 79.90.010. The inability of state government to speak
with one voice is a source of great frustration for project applicants.
Projects on state-owned aquatic lands can bring existing conflicts between
statutory and regulatory authorities, and between state agency missions and
policies, into sharper focus. It is a goal of this chapter to encourage all
agencies and local governments that authorize projects on state-owned aquatic
lands to accept full and equal responsibility for project review, and to resolve
conflicts among state agency authorities, missions, and policies wherever
possible. It is also the intent of this chapter that all permitting or
authorizing state agencies and local governments be involved in identifying and
resolving issues related to permits or authorizations from the outset of any
review process, that these agencies and governments respect the legitimacy of
the missions and mandates of other agencies and governments, and that they
reach consensus on environmental review of projects.

(11)
The legislature finds that the coordination of a process to analyze permitting
issues, and to resolve interagency disputes related to the permitting of
projects, is a natural outgrowth of the original duties of the permit
assistance center.

Sec.
11. RCW
90.60.020 and 1995 c 347 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Center" means the permit assistance center established in the ((commission
[department])) department by RCW 90.60.030.

(2)
"Coordinating permit agency" means the permit agency that has the
greatest overall jurisdiction over a project.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(4)
"Local government" means counties, cities, and towns.

(5)
"Participating permit agency" means a permit agency, or a state
agency or local government other than the coordinating permit agency, that
is responsible for the issuance of a permit or use authorization for a
project.

(((5)))
(6) "Parties" collectively means the coordinating permit agency,
permit agency, and participating permit agency.

(7)
"Permit" means any license, certificate, registration, permit, or
other form of use authorization required by a permit agency to engage in
a particular activity.

(((6)))
(8) "Permit agency" means:

(a)
The department of ecology, an air pollution control authority, the department
of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department
of health; and

(b)
Any other state or federal agency or county, city, or town that participates at
the request of the permit applicant and upon the agency's agreement to be
subject to this chapter.

(((7)))
(9) "Project" means an activity, the conduct of which requires
permits from one or more permit agencies.

(10)
"Use authorization" means a lease, material purchase, easement,
permit, or other document authorizing use of state-owned aquatic lands and/or
materials.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 90.60 RCW to read as follows:

The
center shall establish regional center offices at four department regional or
field offices to provide better access to the center's services in all areas of
the state.

Sec.
13. RCW
90.60.030 and 1997 c 429 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The permit assistance center is established within the department. The center
shall:

(((1)))
(a) Publish and keep current one or more handbooks containing lists and
explanations of all permit laws. To the extent possible, the handbook shall
include relevant local, state, federal, and tribal laws. A state
agency or local government shall provide a reasonable number of copies of
application forms, statutes, ordinances, rules, handbooks, and other
informational material requested by the center and shall otherwise fully
cooperate with the center. The center shall seek the cooperation of relevant
federal agencies and tribal governments;

(((2)))
(b) Establish, and make known, a point of contact for distribution of
the handbook and advice to the public as to its interpretation in any given
case;

(((3)))
(c) Work closely and cooperatively with the business license center in
providing efficient and nonduplicative service to the public;

(((4)))
(d) Seek the assignment of employees from the permit agencies ((listed
under RCW 90.60.020(6)(a))) as defined in this chapter to serve on a
rotating basis in staffing the center;

(((5)))
(e) Collect and disseminate information to public and private entities
on federal, state, local, and tribal government programs that rely on private
professional expertise to assist governmental agencies in project permit
review; and

(((6)))
(f) Provide ((an annual)) a biennial report to the
legislature ((on potential conflicts and perceived inconsistencies among
existing statutes. The first report shall be submitted to the appropriate
standing committees of the house of representatives and senate by December 1,
1996.)) that:

(i)
Includes statutory and other recommendations for streamlining and coordinating
environmental permitting in Washington;

(ii)
Summarizes the results of the center's efforts to measure performance and
outcomes over time;

(iii)
Summarizes, evaluates, and makes statutory and other recommendations for
improving the center's and permitting agencies' efforts to provide public
notice efficiently and for promoting effective public participation in
permitting processes;

(iv)
Details efforts on the part of the center, the department, and the parties to
promote the public's trust and confidence in the permitting process. Examples
of such efforts include, but are not limited to, the development of statutory
and other policies and procedures, guidance, roles, and responsibilities; and

(v)
Shows revenues generated by the center's services, and the center's budget and
expenditures.

(2)
The department shall prioritize the expenditure of general fund moneys allotted
to the center to provide a set of services to the applicants of small projects.

Sec.
14. RCW
90.60.100 and 1995 c 347 s 610 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((coordinating permit agency)) parties may enter into a
written cost-reimbursement agreement with the applicant to recover from
the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the ((coordinating permit
agency)) parties in carrying out the requirements of this chapter,
as well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical studies, and
permit processing.

(2)
The ((coordinating permit agency may recover only the costs of performing
those coordinated permit services and)) written cost-reimbursement
agreement shall be negotiated with the permit applicant ((in)) following
the meeting required pursuant to RCW 90.60.070. Permit agencies may assign
work to current staff, temporary staff, or technical consultants in order to
carry out the work covered by the written cost-reimbursement agreement or the
work remaining for the permit agency as a result of the coordinated permit
process. The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost
accounting and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. A
new section is added to chapter 90.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The permit assistance center shall work in collaboration with local governments
and state agencies to jointly develop and coordinate an integrated permit
process. By December 1, 1999, the permit assistance center shall report on the
progress of the center and others to develop an integrated permit process.

(2)
At a minimum, the integrated permit process developed according to this section
shall consist of:

(a)
One or more preapplication conferences that:

(i)
Include the applicant, the project coordinator, the local permit facilitator,
and the permit assistance center acting as state permit facilitator;

(ii)
Discuss options for project design and for land use, environmental review, and
permitting;

(iii)
Identify potential permitting agencies, permits, schedules, and costs; and

(iv)
Identify a potential project team that includes representatives of the
applicant and relevant local and state permitting agencies;

(b)
A determination of completeness of the project application provided by the
permitting agencies or jurisdictions to the applicant within a determined time
frame after receipt of requested supplementation that includes both a
determination of completeness issued by the municipality, according to its
local permit review process, and determinations of completeness issued by the
state permitting agencies;

(c)
Coordination of permitting and integration of processes that:

(i)
Is achieved by negotiation among the applicant and the various permitting
agencies;

(ii)
Results in an integrated schedule keyed to the longest notice and public
hearing requirement;

(iii)
Includes negotiations for cost recovery arrangements for permitting agencies;
and

(iv)
Uses an integrated record of decision;

(d)
An integrated review that includes:

(i)
Issuance of threshold determination under chapter 43.21C RCW;

(ii)
Public notice that describes the project, the permits, the applicable
regulations, and any preliminary determinations; lists and gives the location of
documents and studies; describes public comment, hearing, and appeal processes;
and sets out the schedule; and

(iii)
An integrated public hearing held in the municipality;

(e)
Coordination of local appeals and state appeals; and

(f)
An integrated decision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. A
new section is added to chapter 90.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
State permitting agencies shall participate in developing the integrated permit
process, including the integrated public hearing, and use the integrated record
of decision.

(2)
State permitting agencies shall review procedures for developing an integrated
state appeal procedure, which would utilize the integrated record of decision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 90.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A joint aquatic resource permit application form may be obtained from the
permit assistance center when a project is proposed for the use of state-owned
aquatic lands managed by the department of natural resources, and one or more
permits are required from state and local governments. Upon receipt of a
completed application as defined under RCW 36.70B.070, the center shall
identify the permits and use authorizations necessary for project approval. If
the project requires two or more permits from state or local permitting
agencies and a use authorization from the department of natural resources, the
center shall coordinate a review process and notify the appropriate aquatic
resource agencies, which shall become participating agencies as defined in this
chapter for purposes of application review.

(2)
The following state agencies and local governments are considered aquatic
resource agencies for purposes of this section and, if notified of their status
as participating agencies, shall be required to participate in the review of
any proposal for which an applicant has submitted a complete form as defined in
subsection (1) of this section: The department of natural resources, the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the local
government in whose jurisdiction the project is proposed, and any port district
or other local political subdivision requiring a use authorization for the
project. In addition, federal agencies and tribal governments that will
require a permit or a use authorization for the project shall each be invited
to name a representative to participate in the joint aquatic resource permit
review process. All participating agencies, including state agencies, and
local governments shall be involved in such review process from the outset.

(3)
The permit assistance center shall coordinate a meeting of the parties to
identify the issues of concern to each participant with regard to the proposed
project and a strategy for resolving the permitting and authorizing processes.
Participating agencies shall undertake a review process not to exceed thirty
days. This review process shall not delay the decision time frames under RCW
36.70B.090.

(a)
During this review, the participating agencies shall identify:

(i)
The specific issues of concern to each participant with regard to the proposed
project;

(ii)
The significance of each issue and its impact on the permitting or authorizing
decision, including whether permits or authorizations are likely to be denied
based on any specific issues;

(iii)
Potential reasons why the proposed project should or should not be permitted or
provided with a use authorization;

(iv)
Any statutory and regulatory conflicts that arise from the permitting or
authorization of the project;

(v)
Any state or local jurisdiction liability that may result from permitting or
authorizing the project; and

(vi)
Any environmental impacts, including federal or state listed species that may
be impacted by the permitting or authorizing decision.

(b)
Following this review, the outcome shall be documented in written form and
approved by each of the participating agencies. The center shall publish
public notice and provide a written notice to the applicant.

(c)
Upon completion of this review, permitting and authorizing agencies and
governments shall proceed according to statutorily defined decision time
frames.

(d)
If a project that has had a threshold determination under chapter 43.21C RCW
for either a determination of nonsignificance or a mitigated determination of
nonsignificance has not received all required permits or authorizations within
six months of receipt of a completed application, the project applicant or the
participating agencies may request that the center retain a facilitator,
mediator, or arbitrator to resolve the remaining disputes. The center shall be
reimbursed for the costs of these processes. The costs shall be shared equally
by the participating agencies and the project applicant. In addition, the
appropriate committees of the legislature shall be notified.

(e)
If a project that requires a final environmental impact statement under chapter
43.21C RCW, has not received all required permits or authorizations within nine
months of receipt of a completed application, the project applicant or the
participating agencies may request that the center retain a facilitator,
mediator, or arbitrator to resolve the remaining disputes. The center shall be
reimbursed for the costs of these processes. The costs shall be shared equally
by the participating agencies and the project applicant. In addition, the
appropriate committees of the legislature shall be notified.

(f)
The following periods shall be excluded from the time periods specified in (d)
and (e) of this subsection:

(i)
Any period during which the applicant has been requested by an agency to
correct plans, perform required studies, or provide additional required
information. The period shall be calculated from the date the agency notifies
the applicant of the need for additional information until the earlier of the
date the agency determines whether the additional information satisfies the
request for information or fourteen days after the date the information has
been provided to the department. If the agency determines that the information
submitted by the applicant under this subsection is insufficient, it shall
notify the applicant of the deficiencies and the procedures of this subsection
shall apply as if a new request for studies had been made;

(ii)
Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an open record
appeal hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are allowed;

(iii)
Any period during which the project is undergoing a threshold determination
under chapter 43.21C RCW for either a determination of nonsignificance or a
mitigated determination of nonsignificance, or any period during which an
environmental impact statement is being prepared following a determination of
significance under chapter 43.21C RCW; and

(iv)
Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the department is working to develop a programmatic
approach and general permits with state and federal agencies to address project
and maintenance impacts under the federal endangered species act and the
federal clean water act. The legislature supports the department's efforts in
this regard and encourages the department to work collaboratively with local
governments when negotiating and developing these programmatic permits and to
provide local governments with opportunity to participate in this process to
the extent practicable.

The
department shall report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the
status of any programmatic permits developed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.387 (Permit assistance center--Termination) and 1995 c 347
s 617; and

(2) RCW
43.131.388 (Permit assistance center--Repeal) and 1995 c 347 s
618.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. A
new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature encourages the department to develop a programmatic approach and
general permits with state and federal agencies to address impacts under the
federal endangered species act and the federal clean water act. The
legislature also encourages the department to work collaboratively with local
governments when negotiating and developing these programmatic permits to the
extent practicable.

The
department shall report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the
status of any programmatic permits developed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. A
new section is added to chapter 43.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature encourages the department to develop a programmatic approach and
general permits with state and federal agencies to address impacts under the
federal endangered species act and the federal clean water act. The
legislature also encourages the department to work collaboratively with local
governments when negotiating and developing these programmatic permits to the
extent practicable.

The
department shall report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the
status of any programmatic permits developed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature encourages the department to develop a programmatic approach and
general permits with state and federal agencies to address impacts under the
federal endangered species act and the federal clean water act. The
legislature also encourages the department to work collaboratively with local
governments when negotiating and developing these programmatic permits to the
extent practicable.

The
department shall report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the
status of any programmatic permits developed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. The
permit assistance center shall terminate June 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25.
Section 19 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---