BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.141 and 1991 c 199 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of any activated authority in addition to any other powers vested in them
by law, shall have power to:

(1)
Adopt, amend and repeal its own rules and regulations, implementing this
chapter and consistent with it, after consideration at a public hearing held in
accordance with chapter 42.30 RCW. The rule-making process shall be
consistent with, but not limited to, the following:

(a)
Rules ((and regulations)) shall ((also)) be adopted in accordance
with the notice and adoption procedures set forth in RCW 34.05.320, those
provisions of RCW 34.05.325 that are not in conflict with chapter 42.30 RCW,
and with the procedures of RCW 34.05.340, 34.05.355 through 34.05.380, and with
chapter 34.08 RCW, except that rules shall not be published in the Washington
Administrative Code. (b) The board shall prepare a small business
economic impact statement pursuant to the requirements of chapter 19.85 RCW;

(c)
Before adopting a rule that:

(i)
Adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to delegated authority under this
chapter, the violation of which subjects a violator of such rule to a penalty
or sanction;

(ii)
Establishes, alters, or revokes any qualification or standard for the issuance,
suspension, or revocation of a license or permit;

(iii)
Adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a policy or regulatory
program; or

(iv)
Adopts any provisions of law, rules, regulations, or standards from other
states or authorities, the board shall:

(A)
Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific objectives of the rule
being adopted;

(B)
Determine that the rule is needed to maintain compliance with this chapter, and
analyze alternatives to rule making and the consequences of not adopting the
rule;

(C)
Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable
costs, taking into account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and
costs;

(D)
Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis
required under (c)(iv)(B) and (C) of this subsection, that the rule being
adopted is the least burdensome alternative for those required to comply with
it;

(E)
Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an
action that violates requirements of another federal or state law, or local
ordinance;

(F)
Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements
on private entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal
or state law;

(G)
Determine if the rule differs from any state statute or rule applicable to the
same activity or subject matter and, if so, determine by substantial evidence
that the difference is necessary to maintain compliance with this chapter;

(H)
The board shall place in the rule-making file documentation of sufficient
quantity and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the
determinations required above are justified;

(d)
Judicial review of rules adopted by an authority shall be in accordance with
Part V of chapter 34.05 RCW. An air pollution control authority shall not be
deemed to be a state agency.

(2)
Hold hearings relating to any aspect of or matter in the administration of this
chapter not prohibited by the provisions of chapter 62, Laws of 1970 ex. sess.
and in connection therewith issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of
witnesses and the production of evidence, administer oaths and take the testimony
of any person under oath.

(3)
Issue such orders as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this
chapter and enforce the same by all appropriate administrative and judicial
proceedings subject to the rights of appeal as provided in chapter 62, Laws of
1970 ex. sess.

(4)
Require access to records, books, files and other information specific to the
control, recovery or release of air contaminants into the atmosphere.

(5)
Secure necessary scientific, technical, administrative and operational services,
including laboratory facilities, by contract or otherwise.

(6)
Prepare and develop a comprehensive plan or plans for the prevention, abatement
and control of air pollution within its jurisdiction.

(7)
Encourage voluntary cooperation by persons or affected groups to achieve the
purposes of this chapter.

(8)
Encourage and conduct studies, investigation and research relating to air
pollution and its causes, effects, prevention, abatement and control.

(9)
Collect and disseminate information and conduct educational and training
programs relating to air pollution.

(10)
Advise, consult, cooperate and contract with agencies and departments and the
educational institutions of the state, other political subdivisions,
industries, other states, interstate or interlocal agencies, and the United
States government, and with interested persons or groups.

(11)
Consult, upon request, with any person proposing to construct, install, or
otherwise acquire an air contaminant source or device or system for the control
thereof, concerning the efficacy of such device or system, or the air pollution
problems which may be related to the source, device or system. Nothing in any
such consultation shall be construed to relieve any person from compliance with
this chapter, ordinances, resolutions, rules and regulations in force pursuant
thereto, or any other provision of law.

(12) Accept, receive, disburse and administer grants or other funds
or gifts from any source, including public and private agencies and the United
States government for the purpose of carrying out any of the functions of this
chapter.

---
END ---