BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.28.010 and 1998 c 127 s 1 and 1998 c 126 s 11 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, no manufacturer,
importer, or distributor, or person financially interested, directly or
indirectly, in such business; whether resident or nonresident, shall have any
financial interest, direct or indirect, in any licensed retail business, unless
the retail business is owned by a corporation in which a manufacturer or
importer has no direct stock ownership and there are no interlocking officers
and directors, the retail license is held by a corporation that is not owned
directly or indirectly by a manufacturer or importer, the sales of liquor are
incidental to the primary activity of operating the property as a hotel,
alcoholic beverages produced by the manufacturer or importer or their
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board reviews the
ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved entities and
determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of control or undue
influence over the operation or the retail licensee; nor shall any
manufacturer, importer, or distributor own any of the property upon which such
licensed persons conduct their business; nor shall any such licensed person,
under any arrangement whatsoever, conduct his or her business upon property in
which any manufacturer, importer, or distributor has any interest unless title
to that property is owned by a corporation in which a manufacturer has no
direct stock ownership and there are no interlocking officers or directors, the
retail license is held by a corporation that is not owned directly or
indirectly by the manufacturer, the sales of liquor are incidental to the
primary activity of operating the property either as a hotel or as an
amphitheater offering live musical and similar live entertainment activities to
the public, alcoholic beverages produced by the manufacturer or any of its
subsidiaries are not sold at the licensed premises, and the board reviews the
ownership and proposed method of operation of all involved entities and
determines that there will not be an unacceptable level of control or undue
influence over the operation of the retail licensee. Except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, no manufacturer, importer, or distributor shall
advance moneys or moneys' worth to a licensed person under an arrangement, nor
shall such licensed person receive, under an arrangement, an advance of moneys
or moneys' worth. "Person" as used in this section only shall not
include those state or federally chartered banks, state or federally chartered
savings and loan associations, state or federally chartered mutual savings
banks, or institutional investors which are not controlled directly or
indirectly by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor as long as the bank,
savings and loan association, or institutional investor does not influence or
attempt to influence the purchasing practices of the retailer with respect to
alcoholic beverages. No manufacturer, importer, or distributor shall be
eligible to receive or hold a retail license under this title, nor shall such
manufacturer, importer, or distributor sell at retail any liquor as herein defined.
A corporation granted an exemption under this subsection may use debt
instruments issued in connection with financing construction or operations of
its facilities.

(b)
Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic brewery or
microbrewery from being licensed as a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW
for the purpose of selling beer or wine at retail on the brewery premises and
nothing in this section shall prohibit a domestic winery from being licensed as
a retailer pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling beer or
wine at retail on the winery premises. Such beer and wine so sold at retail
shall be subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210 and to
reporting and bonding requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted by the
board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, and beer and wine that is not produced by
the brewery or winery shall be purchased from a licensed beer or wine
distributor.

(c)
Nothing in this section shall prohibit a licensed domestic brewery, microbrewery,
domestic winery, or a lessee of a licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or
domestic winery, from being licensed as a spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
pursuant to chapter 66.24 RCW for the purpose of selling liquor at a spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant premises on the property on which the primary
manufacturing facility of the licensed domestic brewer, microbrewery, or
domestic winery is located or on contiguous property owned by the licensed
domestic brewer, microbrewery, or domestic winery as prescribed by rules
adopted by the board pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2)
Financial interest, direct or indirect, as used in this section, shall include
any interest, whether by stock ownership, mortgage, lien, or through
interlocking directors, or otherwise. Pursuant to rules promulgated by the
board in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW manufacturers, distributors, and
importers may perform, and retailers may accept the service of building,
rotating and restocking case displays and stock room inventories; rotating and
rearranging can and bottle displays of their own products; provide point of
sale material and brand signs; price case goods of their own brands; and
perform such similar normal business services as the board may by regulation
prescribe.

(3)(a)
This section does not prohibit a manufacturer, importer, or distributor from
providing services to a special occasion licensee for: (i) Installation of
draft beer dispensing equipment or advertising, (ii) advertising, pouring, or
dispensing of beer or wine at a beer or wine tasting exhibition or judging
event, or (iii) a special occasion licensee from receiving any such services as
may be provided by a manufacturer, importer, or distributor. Nothing in this
section shall prohibit a retail licensee, or any person financially interested,
directly or indirectly, in such a retail licensee from having a financial
interest, direct or indirect, in a business which provides, for a compensation
commensurate in value to the services provided, bottling, canning or other
services to a manufacturer, so long as the retail licensee or person interested
therein has no direct financial interest in or control of said manufacturer.

(b)
A person holding contractual rights to payment from selling a liquor
distributor's business and transferring the license shall not be deemed to have
a financial interest under this section if the person (i) lacks any ownership
in or control of the distributor, (ii) is not employed by the distributor, and
(iii) does not influence or attempt to influence liquor purchases by retail
liquor licensees from the distributor.

(c)
The board shall adopt such rules as are deemed necessary to carry out the
purposes and provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section in accordance with
the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4)
A license issued under RCW 66.24.395 does not constitute a retail license for
the purposes of this section.

(5)
A public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580 does not violate the
provisions of this section as to a retailer having an interest directly or
indirectly in a liquor-licensed manufacturer.

(6)
This section does not prohibit a manufacturer from securing and holding any
financial interest, directly or indirectly, by stock ownership or through
interlocking directors, in any licensed retail business or the property upon
which the licensed retail business is conducted, provided all of the following
conditions are met:

(a)
Either the manufacturer or one of its parent companies is listed on a national
securities exchange;

(b)
All purchases of alcoholic beverages by the licensed retail business are made
from wholesalers in this state;

(c)
If the licensed retail business sells brands of alcoholic beverages that are
produced or distributed by the manufacturer that holds the interest, then: (i)
The licensed retail business must also sell other competing brands of alcoholic
beverages produced by other manufacturers; (ii) no preference may be given to
the products of the manufacturer; and (iii) there is no exclusion, in whole or
in part, of products sold or offered for sale by other manufacturers,
wholesalers, or importers of alcoholic beverages that constitutes a substantial
impairment of commerce; and

(d) The primary purpose of the licensed retail business is a
purpose other than to sell alcoholic beverages, and the sale of other goods and
services exceeds fifty percent of the total gross receipts of the licensed
retail business at each of its premises.

---
END ---