BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.27.010 and 1997 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or which, in
the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or offers to undertake,
or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve,
move, wreck or demolish, for another, any building, highway, road, railroad,
excavation or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to
real estate or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting
or other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or
works in connection therewith or who installs or repairs roofing or siding; or,
who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members of more
than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single building permit
except as otherwise provided herein. "Contractor" includes any
person, firm, or corporation covered by this subsection, whether or not
registered as required under this chapter.

(2)
"General contractor" means a contractor whose business operations require
the use of more than two unrelated building trades or crafts whose work the
contractor shall superintend or do in whole or in part. "General
contractor" shall not include an individual who does all work personally
without employees or other "specialty contractors" as defined in this
section. The terms "general contractor" and "builder" are
synonymous.

(3)
"Performance bond" means a surety bond given by a residential
contractor to the property owner, to protect the property owner against any
loss in the event the residential contractor fails to fulfill the terms of the
contract, including but not limited to payment of liens filed by subcontractors
and suppliers.

(4)
"Residential contractor" means a general contractor who performs work
in connection with residential structures and the appurtenances thereto.
"Residential contractor" includes, but is not limited to, a person
who purchases or owns property and constructs or for compensation arranges for
the construction of one or more residential structures with the intent of
selling the residential structure or structures.

(5)
"Residential structure" means a residence, including a site-built
home, a modular home constructed off-site, a condominium, a duplex, or
multifamily residential building consisting of four or fewer dwelling units.

(6)
"Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do not
fall within the foregoing definition of "general contractor".

(((4)))
(7) "Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, or
corporation doing work as a contractor without being registered in compliance
with this chapter. "Unregistered contractor" includes contractors
whose registration is expired for more than thirty days beyond the renewal date
or has been suspended.

(((5)))
(8) "Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(((6)))
(9) "Director" means the director of the department of labor
and industries.

(((7)))
(10) "Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the
city, town, or county of a contractor registration card that is current on its
face, checking the department's contractor registration data base, or calling
the department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.27.030 and 1998 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an application under
oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and which shall include the
following information pertaining to the applicant:

(a)
Employer social security number.

(b)
Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees
working in Washington, as follows:

(i)
The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii)
The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii)
For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an
agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement,
filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile
certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation law.

(c)
Employment security department number.

(d)
State excise tax registration number.

(e)
Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the
information required by (b) of this subsection if the applicant will not employ
employees in Washington, and by (c) and (d) of this subsection.

(f)
Type of contracting activity, whether a general, a residential, or a
specialty contractor and if the latter, the type of specialty.

(g)
The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm or partnership,
or the name and address of the owner if the applicant is an individual
proprietorship, or the name and address of the corporate officers and statutory
agent, if any, if the applicant is a corporation. The information contained in
such application is a matter of public record and open to public inspection.

(2)
The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information
provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(b) of this section, including
but not limited to information regarding the coverage of an individual employee
of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the
department may notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees
in Washington.

(3)(a)
The department shall deny an application for registration if the applicant has
been previously registered as a sole proprietor, partnership, or corporation
and the applicant has an unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an
action based on this chapter that was incurred during a previous registration
under this chapter.

(b)
The department shall suspend any active registration as a residential
contractor if the department has notice that the registrant is a sole
proprietor or a principal or officer named in the application of another registered
entity that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it.

(c)
The department shall not deny an application or suspend a registration as a
residential contractor because of an unsatisfied final judgment if the
applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied final judgment was the result of the
fraud or negligence of another party.

(d)
As used in this section, "an unsatisfied final judgment" includes a
judgment assigned under RCW 19.72.070.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.27.040 and 1997 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond issued by a surety
insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in the sum of:

(a)
Six thousand dollars if the applicant is a general contractor ((and four));

(b)
Fifty thousand dollars if the applicant is a residential contractor; and

(c)
Ten thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty contractor.

(2)
If no valid bond is already on file with the department at the time the
application is filed, a bond must accompany the registration application. The
bond shall have the state of Washington named as obligee with good and
sufficient surety in a form to be approved by the department. The bond shall
be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written
notice to the director of its intent to cancel the bond. A cancellation or
revocation of the bond or withdrawal of the surety from the bond suspends the
registration issued to the registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice
has been filed and approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be
conditioned that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor, including
employee benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and contributions due
to the state of Washington, and will pay all persons furnishing labor or
material or renting or supplying equipment to the contractor and will pay all
amounts that may be adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of
contract including negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contracting
business. A change in the name of a business or a change in the type of
business entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so
long as one of the original applicants for such bond maintains partial
ownership in the business covered by the bond.

(((2)))
(3) Any contractor registered as of July 1, 1997, who maintains such
registration in accordance with this chapter shall be in compliance with this
chapter until the next annual renewal of the contractor's certificate of
registration. At that time, the contractor shall provide a bond, cash deposit,
or other security deposit as required by this chapter and comply with all of
the other provisions of this chapter before the department shall renew the
contractor's certificate of registration.

(((3)))
(4) Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the
contractor for any of the items referred to in this section may bring suit upon
the bond or deposit in the superior court of the county in which the work was
done or of any county in which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The
surety issuing the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond.
Action upon the bond or deposit shall be commenced by filing the summons and
complaint with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from
the date of expiration of the certificate of registration in force at the time
the claimed labor was performed and benefits accrued, taxes and contributions
owing the state of Washington became due, materials and equipment were
furnished, or the claimed contract work was completed or abandoned. Service of
process in an action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the
deposit shall be exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of
the summons and complaint and a fee of ten dollars to cover the handling costs
shall be served by registered or certified mail upon the department at the time
suit is started and the department shall maintain a record, available for
public inspection, of all suits so commenced. Service is not complete until
the department receives the ten-dollar fee and three copies of the summons and
complaint. The service shall constitute service on the registrant and the
surety for suit upon the bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the
summons and complaint or a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed
in the registrant's application and to the surety within forty-eight hours
after it shall have been received.

(((4)))
(5) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount
in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed
pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The liability of the surety shall
not cumulate where the bond has been renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued
or otherwise extended. The surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the
department and the parties, tender to the clerk of the court having
jurisdiction of the action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the
amount of the bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond shall be
exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one time exceed the
amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be satisfied from the bond in
the following order:

(a)
Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee benefits;

(b)
Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction contract;

(c)
Subcontractors, material, and equipment;

(d)
Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;

(e)
Any court costs, interest, and attorney's fees plaintiff may be entitled to
recover. The surety is not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit
of its bond.

A
payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to the extent of
any payment made by the surety.

(((5)))
(6) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the
bond so furnished that there shall not be in effect a bond undertaking in the
full amount prescribed in this section, the department shall suspend the
registration of the contractor until the bond liability in the required amount
unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished. If the bond becomes
fully impaired, a new bond must be furnished at the rates prescribed by this
section.

(((6)))
(7) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the contractor
may file with the department a deposit consisting of cash or other security
acceptable to the department.

(((7)))
(8) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against the
registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute upon the
security held by the department by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied
final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the department within one
year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of
such certified copy the department shall pay or order paid from the deposit,
through the registry of the superior court which rendered judgment, towards the
amount of the unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the department
shall be the order of receipt by the department, but the department shall have
no liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.

(((8)))
(9) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper administration
of the security.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.27.060 and 1997 c 314 s 6 and 1997 c 58 s 817 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
A certificate of registration shall be valid for ((one)) two years
and shall be renewed on or before the expiration date. The department shall
issue to the applicant a certificate of registration upon compliance with the
registration requirements of this chapter.

(2)
If the department approves an application, it shall issue a certificate of
registration to the applicant. The certificate shall be valid for:

(a)
((One)) Two years;

(b)
Until the bond expires; or

(c)
Until the insurance expires, whichever comes first. The department shall place
the expiration date on the certificate.

(3)
A contractor may supply a short-term bond or insurance policy to bring its
registration period to the full one year.

(4)
If a contractor's surety bond or other security has an unsatisfied judgment
against it or is canceled, or if the contractor's insurance policy is canceled,
the contractor's registration shall be automatically suspended on the effective
date of the impairment or cancellation. The department shall mail notice of
the suspension to the contractor's address on the certificate of registration
by certified and by first class mail within forty-eight hours after suspension.

(5)
Renewal of registration is valid on the date the department receives the
required fee and proof of bond and liability insurance, if sent by certified
mail or other means requiring proof of delivery. The receipt or proof of
delivery shall serve as the contractor's proof of renewed registration until he
or she receives verification from the department.

(6)
The department shall immediately suspend the certificate of registration of a
contractor who has been certified by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a
residential or visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. The certificate
of registration shall not be reissued or renewed unless the person provides to
the department a release from the department of social and health services
stating that he or she is in compliance with the order and the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for certification during the
suspension.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.27.114 and 1997 c 314 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in section 6 of this act, any contractor agreeing to
perform any contracting project: (a) For the repair, alteration, or
construction of four or fewer residential units or accessory structures on such
residential property when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars
or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration, or construction of a commercial
building when the bid or contract price totals one thousand dollars or more but
less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide the customer with the following
disclosure statement prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is registered with the state of
Washington, registration no. . . . ., as a general/specialty
contractor and has posted with the state a bond or cash deposit of
$6,000/$4,000 for the purpose of satisfying claims against the contractor for
negligent or improper work or breach of contract in the conduct of the
contractor's business. The expiration date of this contractor's registration
is . . . . . . This bond or cash deposit may not be
sufficient to cover a claim which might arise from the work done under your
contract. If any supplier of materials used in your construction project or
any employee of the contractor or subcontractor is not paid by the contractor
or subcontractor on your job, your property may be liened to force payment. If
you wish additional protection, you may request the contractor to provide you
with original "lien release" documents from each supplier or
subcontractor on your project. The contractor is required to provide you with
further information about lien release documents if you request it. General
information is also available from the department of labor and
industries."

(2)
A contractor subject to this section shall notify any consumer to whom notice
is required under subsection (1) of this section if the contractor's
registration has expired or is revoked or suspended by the department prior to
completion or other termination of the contract with the consumer.

(3)
No contractor subject to this section may bring or maintain any lien claim
under chapter 60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section applies
without alleging and proving that the contractor has provided the customer with
a copy of the disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) of this
section.

(4)
This section does not apply to contracts authorized under chapter 39.04 RCW or
to contractors contracting with other contractors.

(5)
Failure to comply with this section shall constitute an infraction under the
provisions of this chapter.

(6)
The department shall produce model disclosure statements, and public service
announcements detailing the information needed to assist contractors and
contractors' customers to comply under this section. As necessary, the
department shall periodically update these education materials.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any residential contractor agreeing to perform any contracting project for the
repair, alteration, or construction of a residential structure when the bid or
contract price total one thousand dollars or more, shall provide the customer
the following disclosure statement prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

This contractor is registered with the state of
Washington, registration no. . . . ., as a residential contractor
and has posted with the state a bond or cash deposit of fifty thousand dollars
($50,000) for the purpose of satisfying claims against the residential
contractor for breach of contract including negligent or improper work in the
conduct of the contractor's business. The expiration date of this residential
contractor's registration is . . . . . .

THIS BOND MAY NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO COVER A CLAIM WHICH
MIGHT ARISE FROM WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This bond or cash deposit is not for your exclusive use
because it covers all work performed by this contractor. The bond or cash
deposit is intended to pay valid claim that you and other customers, suppliers,
subcontractors, or taxing authorities may have.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If any supplier of materials or subcontractor used in
your construction project or any employee of the contractor is not paid by the
contractor on your job, your property may be liened to force payment.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY REQUEST YOUR CONTRACTOR
TO PROVIDE YOU WITH A PERFORMANCE BOND FOR YOUR JOB.

Your contractor may obtain a performance bond for an
additional fee. A performance bond would give you greater protection against
claims filed against your property by subcontractors, suppliers, or the
contractor's employees in the event your contractor fails to perform as agreed.

The contractor is required to provide you with further
information about lien release documents if you request it. General
information is also available for the department of labor and industries."

(2)
In addition to the bond requirements under RCW 18.27.040(1)(b), the residential
contractor may be required to provide a performance bond up to an amount equal
to the total cost of the construction contract. The performance bond must be
issued by a surety insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in
an amount that covers the total cost of the construction contract.

(3)
A residential contractor shall notify any customer to whom notice is required
under subsection (1) of this section if the contractor's registration has
expired or is revoked or suspended by the department before completion or other
termination of the contract with the customer.

(4)
No residential contractor may bring or maintain any lien claims under chapter
60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section applies without alleging
and providing that the residential contractor has provided the customer with a
copy of the disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) of this section.

(5)
Failure to comply with this section constitutes an infraction under this
chapter.

(6)
The department shall produce model disclosure statements and public service
announcements detailing the information needed to assist residential
contractors and residential contractors' customers to comply with this
section. As necessary, the department shall periodically update these
education materials.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

The
residential contractor and customer shall agree in writing to submit any
dispute arising under the provisions of this chapter or under the terms,
conditions, or performance of the contract, to mediate by an independent third
party. The parties must submit any dispute to mediation before the customer
can exercise a claim against the residential contractor's bond or cash deposit
or performance bond required under this chapter.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.27.120 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall compile a list of all contractors registered under this
chapter and update the list at least bimonthly. The list shall be considered
as public record information and shall be available to the public upon
request: PROVIDED, That the department may charge a reasonable fee under RCW
42.17.300.

(2)(a)
Except in the case of residential contractors, the department shall inform
any person, firm, or corporation, if a contractor is registered, and if a
contractor is bonded or insured, without charge except for a reasonable fee
under RCW 42.17.300 for copies made.

(b) The department shall inform any person, firm, or
corporation, if a residential contractor is registered, if a residential
contractor is bonded or insured, if the residential contractor was a principal
or officer named on a previous application of a previously registered
partnership or corporation that has an unsatisfied final judgment against it in
an action based on this chapter that was incurred during a previous
registration under this chapter, or if the department has received complaints
from customers, suppliers, and subcontractors regarding a residential
contractor, without charge except for a reasonable fee under RCW 42.17.300 for
copies made.

Sec.
9. RCW
19.28.120 and 1998 c 279 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing or maintaining
equipment to be operated by electric current as it pertains to the electrical
industry, without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired electrical
contractor license, issued by the department in accordance with this chapter.
All electrical contractor licenses expire twenty-four calendar months following
the day of their issue. The department may issue an electrical contractors
license for a period of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of
equalizing the number of electrical contractor licenses that expire each
month. Application for an electrical contractor license shall be made in
writing to the department, accompanied by the required fee. The application
shall state:

(a)
The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or partnerships, the names
of the individuals composing the firm or partnership; in case of corporations,
the names of the managing officials thereof;

(b)
The location of the place of business of the applicant and the name under which
the business is conducted;

(c)
Employer social security number;

(d)
Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees
working in Washington, as follows:

(i)
The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii)
The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii)
For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an
agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement,
filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile
certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation law;

(e)
Employment security department number;

(f)
State excise tax registration number;

(g)
Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the
information required by (d) of this subsection if the applicant will not employ
employees in Washington, and by (e) and (f) of this subsection; and

(h)
Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is sought and, if
the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical contractor specialties include,
but are not limited to: Residential, domestic appliances, pump and irrigation,
limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, and a combination
specialty. A general electrical contractor license shall grant to the holder
the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or
maintaining wires or equipment to carry electric current, and installing or
maintaining equipment, or installing or maintaining material to fasten or
insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current, in the
state of Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to
the holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of
installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry electrical current, and
installing or maintaining equipment; or installing or maintaining material to
fasten or insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current
in the state of Washington as expressly allowed by the license.

(2)
The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information
provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this section, including
but not limited to information regarding the coverage of an individual employee
of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the
department may notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees
in Washington.

(3)
The application for a contractor license shall be accompanied by a bond in the
sum of ((four)) ten thousand dollars with the state of Washington
named as obligee in the bond, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved
by the department. The bond shall at all times be kept in full force and
effect, and any cancellation or revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety
therefrom, suspends the license issued to the principal until a new bond has been
filed and approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall on the next business day deposit the fee accompanying the
application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond in the
office. The department shall upon request furnish to any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified copy of the bond upon the
payment of a fee that the department shall set by rule. The fee shall cover
but not exceed the cost of furnishing the certified copy. The bond shall be
conditioned that in any installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to
convey electrical current, and equipment to be operated by electrical current,
the principal will comply with the provisions of this chapter and with any electrical
ordinance, building code, or regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to
RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of entering into a contract.
The bond shall be conditioned further that the principal will pay for all
labor, including employee benefits, and material furnished or used upon the
work, taxes and contributions to the state of Washington, and all damages that
may be sustained by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
due to a failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building code, or
regulation of a city or town adopted pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3). In lieu of
the surety bond required by this section the license applicant may file with
the department a cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable to the
department. If the license applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department
shall deposit the funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial
bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay
annually to the depositor the interest derived from the account.

(4)
The department shall issue general or specialty electrical contractor licenses
to applicants meeting all of the requirements of this chapter. The provisions
of this chapter relating to the licensing of any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity including the requirement of a bond with the state
of Washington named as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor,
are exclusive, and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may
require or issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a
similar purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter may be
required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or to post more
than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash deposit, or other
negotiable security.

(5) To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license
the applicant must designate an individual who currently possesses an
administrator's certificate as a general electrical contractor administrator or
as a specialty electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for which
application has been made. Administrator certificate specialties include but
are not limited to: Residential, domestic, appliance, pump and irrigation,
limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, and combination
specialty. To obtain an administrator's certificate an individual must pass an
examination as set forth in RCW 19.28.123 unless the applicant was a licensed
electrical contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were electrical
contractors licensed by the state of Washington at any time during 1974 are
entitled to receive a general electrical contractor administrator's certificate
without examination if the applicants apply prior to January 1, 1984. The
board of electrical examiners shall certify to the department the names of all
persons who are entitled to either a general or specialty electrical contractor
administrator's certificate.

---
END ---