BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

Applications for changing, transferring, or amending existing
ground or surface water rights shall not be treated in the same manner as
applications for permits for new water rights. The provisions of RCW 90.03.290
do not apply to applications for such changes, transfers, or amendments. The
requirements for such changes, transfers, and amendments are exclusively as
specified in RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.390, and 90.44.100. Any right represented by
an application for a water right for which a permit for water use has not been
issued by the time such a change, transfer, or amendment of an existing ground
or surface water right is approved by the department may not be construed as
being injured or detrimentally affected by the change, transfer, or amendment.
Processing applications for changes, transfers, and amendments of existing
water rights shall not be delayed or postponed for the purpose of processing
applications for new water right permits.

---
END ---