BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
There is established in the employment security department, the domestic
violence compensation program. The commissioner shall administer the program
using the funds appropriated by the legislature for this act. The expenses
incurred by the commissioner in carrying out the provisions of this chapter
shall be paid entirely out of the funds appropriated by the legislature for
this act.

(2)
To be eligible for benefits under the program, an applicant must:

(a)
Be unemployed as a result of domestic violence and must have been denied
benefits under RCW 50.20.050;

(b)
Be otherwise eligible for unemployment insurance benefits but temporarily
unable to search for work because the person is seeking safety or relief for
the person or the person's immediate family from domestic violence or stalking,
as defined in RCW 9A.46.110, and must have been denied benefits under RCW
50.20.010;

(c)
Have been the victim of domestic violence within two years prior to the date of
application. The fact that a person has been a victim of domestic violence
must be reasonably established by medical records, court documents, police
records, or the records of a certified counselor; and

(d)
Show that the person is:

(i)
Relocated or attempting to relocate due to domestic violence;

(ii)
Obtaining or receiving medical treatment due to domestic violence;

(iii)
Actively pursuing legal protection or remedies to domestic violence; or

(iv)
Participating in counseling or support activities to assist the applicant's
return to work.

(3)
For purposes of this section, "domestic violence" means an act as
defined in RCW 26.50.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, and to the extent funds
are available, if a person establishes eligibility under section 1(2)(a) of
this act, the commissioner shall provide a weekly wage subsidy to the person
for a period of up to twelve weeks beginning with the calendar week in which
application was made for unemployment insurance benefits. The weekly wage
subsidy will extend for a duration and for an amount equal to the duration and
weekly benefit amount the person would have received if benefits had not been
denied under chapter 50.20 RCW.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, if a person establishes
eligibility under section 1(2)(b) of this act, the commissioner shall provide a
weekly wage subsidy to the person for up to twelve weeks beginning with the
calendar week in which unemployment insurance benefits were denied. The weekly
wage subsidy will extend for a duration and for an amount equal to the duration
and weekly benefit amount the person was receiving when benefits were denied.

(3)
If the applicant has established all eligibility requirements in section 1 of
this act except the requirement of section 1(2)(c) of this act, the
commissioner shall provide weekly wage subsidies to the applicant for up to
four weeks contingent on the establishment of the requirement. When an
applicant fulfills the eligibility requirement in section 1(2)(c) of this act, the
department shall provide the weekly wage subsidy to the person for any
remaining weeks the person would have received benefits if benefits had not
been denied.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The department shall provide information to applicants for weekly wage
subsidies regarding local services provided under chapter 70.123 RCW and the
availability of orders of protection under chapter 26.50 RCW.

(2)
Weekly wage subsidies are not benefits under this title and issuance of wage subsidies
shall not affect an employer's payment contribution determined under chapter
50.24 RCW, or an employer's experience rating determined under chapter 50.29
RCW.

(3)
Information or records concerning an individual receiving or applying for
weekly wage subsidy under this program shall be subject to chapter 50.13 RCW
and shall not be subject to discovery in any judicial proceeding unless the
requirements of RCW 70.123.075 are satisfied.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of six hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the employment security department for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

---
END ---