BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.155.050 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 918 and 1995 c 376 s 11 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:

The public works assistance account is hereby established in the
state treasury. Money may be placed in the public works assistance account
from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other
lawful source. Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to
make loans and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public
works projects. Moneys in the account may also be appropriated to provide for
state match requirements under federal law for projects and activities
conducted and financed by the board under the drinking water assistance
account. During the ((1995-97)) 1999-2001 fiscal biennium,
moneys in the public works assistance account may be appropriated for transfer
to the flood control assistance account to be used for flood control
assistance, including grants under chapter 86.26 RCW. To the extent that
moneys in the public works assistance account are not appropriated during the
((1995-97)) 1999-2001 fiscal biennium for public works or flood
control assistance, the legislature may direct their transfer to the state
general fund. In awarding grants under chapter 86.26 RCW, the department of
ecology shall give strong preference to local governments that have: (1)
Implemented, or are in the process of implementing, an ordinance that
establishes a flood plain policy that is substantially more stringent than
minimum federal requirements; (2) completed a comprehensive flood control plan
meeting the requirements of RCW 86.12.200; or (3) ((constructed, or are in
the process of constructing, a system of overtopping dikes or levees that allow
public access)) projects that achieve flood management benefits both for
people and for habitat for salmon and steelhead species that are listed or
proposed to be listed under the federal endangered species act.

---
END ---