BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 76.09 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this section, "public safety" means reducing the risk
to the public at large from snow avalanches, as identified by the department of
transportation, landslides, or debris torrents caused by forest practices.

The department shall consider public safety when reviewing an
application for forest practices under RCW 76.09.060. The department may
condition the approval of, or deny a forest practices permit application being
reviewed under RCW 76.09.060, based upon reasonable concerns regarding public
safety.

---
END ---