BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.190.060 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

A
long-term care ombudsman shall:

(1)
Identify, investigate, and resolve complaints made by or on
behalf of residents of long-term care facilities relating to ((administrative))
action, inaction, or decisions, which may adversely affect the health,
safety, welfare, and rights of these individuals;

(2)
Monitor the development and implementation of federal, state, and local laws,
rules, regulations, and policies with respect to long-term care facilities in
this state;

(3)
Provide information as appropriate to public agencies regarding the problems of
individuals residing in long-term care facilities; and

(4) Provide for training volunteers and promoting the development
of citizen organizations to participate in the ombudsman program. A trained
volunteer long-term care ombudsman ((shall be able to identify and resolve
problems regarding the care of residents in long-term care facilities and to
assist such residents in the assertion of their civil and human rights.
However, volunteers shall not be used for complaint investigations but may
engage in fact-finding activities to determine whether a formal complaint
should be submitted to the department)) may identify, investigate, and
resolve complaints made by or on behalf of residents of long-term care
facilities relating to action, inaction, or decisions, which may adversely
affect the health, safety, welfare, and rights of these individuals.

---
END ---