BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.630.885 and 1998 c 225 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington commission on student learning is hereby established. The
primary purposes of the commission are to identify the knowledge and skills all
public school students need to know and be able to do based on the student
learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, to develop student assessment and school
accountability systems, to review current school district data reporting requirements
and make recommendations on what data is necessary for the purposes of
accountability and meeting state information needs, and to take other steps
necessary to develop a performance-based education system. The commission
shall include three members of the state board of education, three members
appointed by the governor before July 1, 1992, and five members appointed no
later than June 1, 1993, by the governor elected in the November 1992
election. The governor shall appoint a chair from the commission members, and
fill any vacancies in gubernatorial appointments that may occur. The state
board of education shall fill any vacancies of state board of education
appointments that may occur. In making the appointments, educators, business
leaders, and parents shall be represented, and nominations from state-wide
education, business, and parent organizations shall be requested. Efforts
shall be made to ensure that the commission reflects the racial and ethnic
diversity of the state's K-12 student population and that the major geographic
regions in the state are represented. Appointees shall be qualified
individuals who are supportive of educational restructuring, who have a
positive record of service, and who will devote sufficient time to the responsibilities
of the commission to ensure that the objectives of the commission are achieved.

(2)
The commission shall establish advisory committees. Membership of the advisory
committees shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, professionals from
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of
education, and other state and local educational practitioners and student
assessment specialists.

(3)
The commission, with the assistance of the advisory committees, shall:

(a)
Develop essential academic learning requirements based on the student learning
goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Essential academic learning requirements shall be
developed, to the extent possible, for each of the student learning goals in
RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. Essential
academic learning requirements for RCW 28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the
mathematics component of RCW 28A.150.210(2), goal two, shall be completed no
later than March 1, 1995. Essential academic learning requirements that
incorporate the remainder of RCW 28A.150.210 (2), (3), and (4), goals two,
three, and four, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1996. To the
maximum extent possible, the commission shall integrate goal four and the
knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the development of the
essential academic learning requirements;

(b)(i)
The commission shall present to the state board of education and superintendent
of public instruction a state-wide academic assessment system for use in the
elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each student
has mastered the essential academic learning requirements identified in (a) of
this subsection. The academic assessment system shall include a variety of
assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based
measures. Performance standards for determining if a student has successfully
completed an assessment shall be initially determined by the commission in
consultation with the advisory committees required in subsection (2) of this
section.

(ii)
The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the
assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional
practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who
have not mastered the essential academic learning requirements at the
appropriate periods in the student's educational development.

(iii)
Assessments measuring the essential academic learning requirements developed
for RCW 28A.150.210(1) and the mathematics component of RCW 28A.150.210(2)
referred to in this section as reading, writing, communications, and
mathematics shall be developed and initially implemented by the commission
before transferring the assessment system to the superintendent of public
instruction on June 30, 1999. The elementary assessments for reading, writing,
communications, and mathematics shall be available for use by school districts
no later than the 1996-97 school year, the middle school assessment no later than
the 1997-98 school year, and the high school assessment no later than the
1998-99 school year, unless the legislature takes action to delay or prevent
implementation of the assessment system and essential academic learning
requirements. Assessments measuring the essential academic learning
requirements developed for the science component of RCW 28A.150.210(2) at the
middle school and high school levels shall be available for use by districts no
later than the 1998-99 school year unless the legislature takes action to delay
or prevent implementation of the assessment system and essential academic
learning requirements.

The
completed assessments and assessments still in development shall be transferred
to the superintendent of public instruction by June 30, 1999, unless the
legislature takes action to delay implementation of the assessment system and
essential academic learning requirements. The superintendent shall continue
the development of assessments on the following schedule: The history, civics,
and geography assessments at the middle and high school levels shall be
available for use by districts no later than the 2000-01 school year; the arts
assessment for middle and high school levels shall be available for use by
districts no later than the 2000-01 school year; and the health and fitness
assessments for middle and high school levels shall be available no later than
the 2001-02 school year. The elementary science assessment shall be available
for use by districts not later than the 2001-02 school year. The commission or
the superintendent, as applicable, shall upon request, provide opportunities
for the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to
review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential academic
learning requirements before the modifications are adopted. By December 15,
1998, the commission on student learning shall recommend to the appropriate
committees of the legislature a revised timeline for implementing these
assessments and when the school districts should be required to participate.
All school districts shall be required to participate in the history, civics,
geography, arts, health, fitness, and elementary science assessments in the
third year after the assessments are available to school districts.

To
the maximum extent possible, the commission shall integrate knowledge and skill
areas in development of the assessments.

(iv)
Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in
the essential academic learning requirements and assessments for goals one and
two. Before the 1997-98 school year, the elementary assessment system in
reading, writing, communications, and mathematics shall be optional. School
districts that desire to participate before the 1997-98 school year shall
notify the commission on student learning in a manner determined by the
commission. Beginning in the 1997-98 school year, school districts shall be
required to participate in the elementary assessment system for reading,
writing, communications, and mathematics. Before the 2000-01 school year,
participation by school districts in the middle school and high school
assessment system for reading, writing, communications, mathematics, and
science shall be optional. School districts that desire to participate before
the 1998-99 school year shall notify the commission on student learning in a
manner determined by the commission on student learning. Schools that desire
to participate after the 1998-99 school year, shall notify the superintendent
of public instruction in a manner determined by the superintendent. Beginning
in the 2000-01 school year, all school districts shall be required to
participate in the assessment system for reading, writing, communications,
mathematics, and science.

(v)
The commission on student learning may modify the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessments for reading, writing, communications,
mathematics, and science, as needed, before June 30, 1999. The commission
shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the
house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed
modifications to the essential academic learning requirements before the
modifications are adopted.

(vi)
The commission shall develop assessments that are directly related to the
essential academic learning requirements, and are not biased toward persons
with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis
of gender;

(c)
After a determination is made by the state board of education that the high
school assessment system has been implemented and that it is sufficiently
reliable and valid, successful completion of the high school assessment shall
lead to a certificate of mastery. The certificate of mastery shall be obtained
by most students at about the age of sixteen, and is evidence that the student
has successfully mastered the essential academic learning requirements during
his or her educational career. The certificate of mastery shall be required
for graduation but shall not be the only requirement for graduation. The
state board of education shall not require students receiving private education
under chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW
to meet the requirements for the certificate of mastery or the essential
academic learning requirements. The commission shall make recommendations
to the state board of education regarding the relationship between the
certificate of mastery and high school graduation requirements. Upon achieving
the certificate of mastery, schools shall provide students with the opportunity
to pursue career and educational objectives through educational pathways that
emphasize integration of academic and vocational education. Educational
pathways may include, but are not limited to, programs such as work-based
learning, school-to-work transition, tech prep, vocational-technical education,
running start, and preparation for technical college, community college, or
university education. Any middle school, junior high school, or high school
using educational pathways shall ensure that all participating students will
continue to have access to the courses and instruction necessary to meet
admission requirements at baccalaureate institutions. Students shall be
allowed to enter the educational pathway of their choice. Before accepting a
student into an educational pathway, the school shall inform the student's
parent of the pathway chosen, the opportunities available to the student
through the pathway, and the career objectives the student will have exposure
to while pursuing the pathway. Parents and students dissatisfied with the
opportunities available through the selected educational pathway shall be
provided with the opportunity to transfer the student to any other pathway
provided in the school. Schools may not develop educational pathways that
retain students in high school beyond the date they are eligible to graduate,
and may not require students who transfer between pathways to complete pathway requirements
beyond the date the student is eligible to graduate;

(d)
Consider methods to address the unique needs of special education students when
developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(e)
Consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when
developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(f)
Develop recommendations on the time, support, and resources, including
technical assistance, needed by schools and school districts to help students
achieve the essential academic learning requirements. These recommendations
shall include an estimate for the legislature, superintendent of public
instruction, and governor on the expected cost of implementing the academic
assessment system;

(g)
Develop recommendations for consideration by the higher education coordinating
board for adopting college and university entrance requirements for public
school students that are consistent with the essential academic learning
requirements and the certificate of mastery;

(h)
Review current school district data reporting requirements for the purposes of
accountability and meeting state information needs. The commission on student
learning shall report recommendations to the joint select committee on
education restructuring by September 15, 1996, on:

(i)
What data is necessary to compare how school districts are performing before
the essential academic learning requirements and the assessment system are
implemented with how school districts are performing after the essential
academic learning requirements and the assessment system are implemented; and

(ii)
What data is necessary pertaining to school district reports under the
accountability systems developed by the commission on student learning under
this section;

(i)
Recommend to the legislature, governor, state board of education, and
superintendent of public instruction:

(i)
A state-wide accountability system to monitor and evaluate accurately and
fairly at elementary, middle, and high schools the level of learning occurring
in individual schools and school districts with regard to the goals included in
RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The accountability system must assess each
school individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and schools state-wide. The system shall include school-site,
school district, and state-level accountability reports;

(ii)
A school assistance program to help schools and school districts that are
having difficulty helping students meet the essential academic learning
requirements as measured by performance on the elementary, middle school, and
high school assessments;

(iii)
A system to intervene in schools and school districts in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to learn the essential academic learning
requirements or meet the standards established for the elementary, middle
school, and high school assessments; and

(iv)
An awards program to provide incentives to school staff to help their students
learn the essential academic learning requirements, with each school being
assessed individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and the state-wide average. Incentives shall be based on the
rate of percentage change of students achieving the essential academic learning
requirements and progress on meeting the state-wide average. School staff
shall determine how the awards will be spent.

The
commission shall make recommendations regarding a state-wide accountability
system for reading in grades kindergarten through four by November 1, 1997.
Recommendations for an accountability system in the other subject areas and
grade levels shall be made no later than June 30, 1999;

(j)
Report annually by December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education on the
progress, findings, and recommendations of the commission; and

(k)
Make recommendations to the legislature and take other actions necessary or desirable
to help students meet the student learning goals.

(4)
The commission shall coordinate its activities with the state board of
education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5)
The commission shall seek advice broadly from the public and all interested
educational organizations in the conduct of its work, including holding
periodic regional public hearings.

(6)
The commission shall select an entity to provide staff support and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide administrative
oversight and be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter into
subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school districts,
teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and
other individuals and organizations to assist the commission in its
deliberations.

(7)
Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8)(a)
By September 30, 1997, the commission on student learning, the state board of
education, and the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly present
recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate regarding the high school assessments, the certificate of mastery,
and high school graduation requirements.

In
preparing recommendations, the commission on student learning shall convene an
ad hoc working group to address questions, including:

(i)
What type of document shall be used to identify student performance and
achievement and how will the document be described?

(ii)
Should the students be required to pass the high school assessments in all
skill and content areas, or only in select skill and content areas, to
graduate?

(iii)
How will the criteria for establishing the standards for passing scores on the
assessments be determined?

(iv)
What timeline should be used in phasing-in the assessments as a graduation
requirement?

(v)
What options may be used in demonstrating how the results of the assessments
will be displayed in a way that is meaningful to students, parents,
institutions of higher education, and potential employers?

(vi)
Are there other or additional methods by which the assessments could be used to
identify achievement such as endorsements, standards of proficiency, merit
badges, or levels of achievement?

(vii)
Should the assessments and certificate of mastery be used to satisfy college or
university entrance criteria for public school students? If yes, how should
these methods be phased-in?

(b)
The ad hoc working group shall report its recommendations to the commission on
student learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction by June 15, 1997. The commission shall report the ad hoc
working group's recommendations to the education committees of the house of
representatives and senate by July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the
commission on student learning, the state board of education, and the
superintendent of public instruction shall be presented to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30,
1997.

(9)
The Washington commission on student learning shall expire on June 30, 1999.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.230.090 and 1997 c 222 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state board of education shall establish high school graduation
requirements or equivalencies for students. The board may not establish
graduation requirements that require students receiving private education under
chapter 28A.195 RCW or home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet
the essential academic learning requirements or the certificate of mastery in
RCW 28A.630.885. Any course in Washington state history and government
used to fulfill high school graduation requirements is encouraged to include
information on the culture, history, and government of the American Indian
peoples who were the first inhabitants of the state.

(2)
In recognition of the statutory authority of the state board of education to
establish and enforce minimum high school graduation requirements, the state
board shall periodically reevaluate the graduation requirements and shall
report such findings to the legislature in a timely manner as determined by the
state board.

(3)
Pursuant to any requirement for instruction in languages other than English
established by the state board of education or a local school district, or
both, for purposes of high school graduation, students who receive instruction
in American sign language or one or more American Indian languages shall be
considered to have satisfied the state or local school district graduation
requirement for instruction in one or more languages other than English.

(4)
If requested by the student and his or her family, a student who has completed
high school courses before attending high school shall be given high school
credit which shall be applied to fulfilling high school graduation requirements
if:

(a)
The course was taken with high school students, if the academic level of the
course exceeds the requirements for seventh and eighth grade classes, and the
student has successfully passed by completing the same course requirements and
examinations as the high school students enrolled in the class; or

(b)
The academic level of the course exceeds the requirements for seventh and
eighth grade classes and the course would qualify for high school credit,
because the course is similar or equivalent to a course offered at a high
school in the district as determined by the school district board of directors.

(5)
Students who have taken and successfully completed high school courses under
the circumstances in subsection (4) of this section shall not be required to
take an additional competency examination or perform any other additional
assignment to receive credit. Subsection (4) of this section shall also apply
to students enrolled in high school on April 11, 1990, who took the courses
before attending high school.

(6)
At the college or university level, five quarter or three semester hours equals
one high school credit.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.80.350 and 1993 c 77 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall coordinate educational activities among all segments of higher
education taking into account the educational programs, facilities, and other
resources of both public and independent two and four-year colleges and
universities. The four-year institutions and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall coordinate information and activities with the board.
The board shall have the following additional responsibilities:

(1)
Promote interinstitutional cooperation;

(2)
Establish minimum admission standards for four-year institutions, including a
requirement that coursework in American sign language or an American Indian
language shall satisfy any requirement for instruction in a language other than
English that the board or the institutions may establish as a general
undergraduate admissions requirement. The board may not establish admission
requirements that require students who have graduated from a private secondary
school under chapter 28A.195 RCW or who have completed a home-based instruction
program under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the learning requirements or
certificate of mastery in RCW 28A.630.885;

(3)
Establish transfer policies;

(4)
Adopt rules implementing statutory residency requirements;

(5)
Develop and administer reciprocity agreements with bordering states and the
province of British Columbia;

(6)
Review and recommend compensation practices and levels for administrative
employees, exempt under chapter 28B.16 RCW, and faculty using comparative data
from peer institutions;

(7)
Monitor higher education activities for compliance with all relevant state
policies for higher education;

(8)
Arbitrate disputes between and among four-year institutions or between and
among four-year institutions and community colleges at the request of one or
more of the institutions involved, or at the request of the governor, or from a
resolution adopted by the legislature. The decision of the board shall be
binding on the participants in the dispute;

(9)
Establish and implement a state system for collecting, analyzing, and
distributing information;

(10)
Recommend to the governor and the legislature ways to remove any economic
incentives to use off-campus program funds for on-campus activities; and

(11)
Make recommendations to increase minority participation, and monitor and report
on the progress of minority participation in higher education.

Sec.
4. RCW
28B.30.150 and 1998 c 245 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
regents of Washington State University, in addition to other duties prescribed
by law, shall:

(1)
Have full control of the university and its property of various kinds, except
as otherwise provided by law.

(2)
Employ the president of the university, his or her assistants, members of the
faculty, and employees of the university, who, except as otherwise provided by
law, shall hold their positions during the pleasure of said board of regents.

(3)
Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission to the
university which meet or exceed the standards specified under RCW
28B.80.350(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the university may
be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant, at the university's
discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools and other
educational institutions whose courses of study meet the approval of the
university may be acceptable for entrance. The board may not establish
admission requirements that require students who have graduated from a private
secondary school under chapter 28A.195 RCW or who have completed a home-based
instruction program under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the learning requirements
or certificate of mastery in RCW 28A.630.885.

(4)
Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the
purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs, participate
in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational programs, and
purchase or lease major off-campus facilities.

(6)
With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe the courses of
instruction in the various colleges, schools, and departments of the
institution and publish the necessary catalogues thereof.

(7)
Collect such information as the board deems desirable as to the schemes of
technical instruction adopted in other parts of the United States and foreign
countries.

(8)
Provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm marketing forums.

(9)
Provide that instruction given in the university, as far as practicable, be
conveyed by means of laboratory work and provide in connection with the
university one or more physical, chemical, and biological laboratories, and
suitably furnish and equip the same.

(10)
Provide training in military tactics for those students electing to participate
therein.

(11)
Establish a department of elementary science and in connection therewith
provide instruction in elementary mathematics, including elementary
trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and mechanical drawing, and land
surveying.

(12)
Establish a department of agriculture and in connection therewith provide
instruction in physics with special application of its principles to
agriculture, chemistry with special application of its principles to
agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with special reference to
common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology and physiology of the lower
forms of animal life, with special reference to insect pests, morphology and
physiology of the higher forms of animal life and in particular of the horse,
cow, sheep, and swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and
feeding of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these subjects to
superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give practical instruction
therein.

(13)
Establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the department of
agriculture, including at least one in the western portion of the state, and
appoint the officers and prescribe regulations for their management.

(14)
Grant to students such certificates or degrees, as recommended for such
students by the faculty.

(15)
Confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of the university in
recognition of their learning or devotion to literature, art, or science when
recommended thereto by the faculty: PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be
conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the giving of property of
whatsoever kind.

(16)
Adopt plans and specifications for university buildings and facilities or
improvements thereto and employ skilled architects and engineers to prepare
such plans and specifications and supervise the construction of buildings or
facilities which the board is authorized to erect, and fix the compensation for
such services. The board shall enter into contracts with one or more
contractors for such suitable buildings, facilities, or improvements as the
available funds will warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a
public competitive letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established
by the board. The board shall require of all persons with whom they contract
for construction and improvements a good and sufficient bond for the faithful
performance of the work and full protection against all liens.

(17)
Except as otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of all money
appropriated to or belonging to the state university.

(18)
Receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of congress approved
May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for cooperative agricultural
extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several States
receiving the benefits of the Act of Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts
supplemental thereto and the United States Department of Agriculture" and
organize and conduct agricultural extension work in connection with the state
university in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the acts of
congress.

(19)
Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the
regents deem essential to university purposes.

(20)
Acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to further the work of
the university or for experimental or demonstrational purposes.

(21)
Establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment station in an
irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon the principles and
practices of irrigational agriculture including the utilization of water and
its relation to soil types, crops, climatic conditions, ditch and drain
construction, fertility investigations, plant disease, insect pests, marketing,
farm management, utilization of fruit byproducts, and general development of
agriculture under irrigation conditions.

(22)
Supervise and control the agricultural experiment station at Puyallup.

(23)
Establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment substation for
the purpose of conducting investigational work upon the principles and
practices of orchard culture, spraying, fertilization, pollenization, new fruit
varieties, fruit diseases and pests, byproducts, marketing, management, and
general horticultural problems.

(24)
Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests, whether real or
personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the
university, its colleges, schools, or departments; and sell, lease or exchange,
invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof
except as limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests,
and devises; and adopt proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and expenditure
of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of
all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.

(25)
Construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a mining, physical,
technological building, and fabrication shop at the university, or add to the
present foundry and other buildings, in order that both instruction and
research be expanded to include permanent molding and die casting with a
section for new fabricating techniques, especially for light metals, including
magnesium and aluminum; purchase equipment for the shops and laboratories in
mechanical, electrical, and civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the
extraction of alumina from native clays and other possible light metal
research; purchase equipment for a research laboratory for technological
research generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics of
materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.

(26)
Make and transmit to the governor and members of the legislature upon request
such reports as will be helpful in providing for the institution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.35 RCW to read as follows:

The
board of trustees may not establish admission requirements that require
students who have graduated from a private secondary school under chapter
28A.195 RCW or who have completed a home-based instruction program under
chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the learning requirements or certificate of mastery
in RCW 28A.630.885.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.40 RCW to read as follows:

The board of trustees may not establish admission requirements that
require students who have graduated from a private secondary school under
chapter 28A.195 RCW or who have completed a home-based instruction program
under chapter 28A.200 RCW to meet the learning requirements or certificate of
mastery in RCW 28A.630.885.

---
END ---