BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.020 and 1994 c 124 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following real and personal property shall be exempt from taxation:

All
lands, buildings, and personal property required for necessary administration
and maintenance, used, or to the extent used, exclusively for public burying
grounds or cemeteries without discrimination as to race, color, national origin
or ancestry;

All
churches, personal property, and the ground, not exceeding ((five)) twenty
acres in area, upon which a church of any nonprofit recognized religious
denomination is or shall be built, together with a parsonage, convent, and
buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of
such property. The area exempted shall in any case include all ground covered
by the church, parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for
the maintenance and safeguarding of such property and the structures and ground
necessary for street access, parking, light, and ventilation, but the area of
unoccupied ground exempted in such cases, in connection with church, parsonage,
convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and
safeguarding of such property, shall not exceed the equivalent of one ((hundred
twenty by one hundred twenty feet)) and one-third acres except where
additional unoccupied land may be required to conform with state or local
codes, zoning, or licensing requirements. The parsonage and convent need not
be on land contiguous to the church property. To be exempt the property must
be wholly used for church purposes: PROVIDED, That the loan or rental of
property otherwise exempt under this paragraph to a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation, or school for use for an eleemosynary activity
shall not nullify the exemption provided in this paragraph if the rental
income, if any, is reasonable and is devoted solely to the operation and
maintenance of the property.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.030 and 1993 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following real and personal property shall be exempt from taxation:

(1)
Property owned by nonprofit organizations or associations, organized and
conducted for nonsectarian purposes, which shall be used for
character-building, benevolent, protective or rehabilitative social services
directed at persons of all ages. The sale of donated merchandise shall not be
considered a commercial use of the property under this section if the proceeds
are devoted to the furtherance of the purposes of the selling organization or
association as specified in this paragraph.

(2)
Property owned by any nonprofit church, denomination, group of churches, or an
organization or association, the membership of which is comprised solely of
churches or their qualified representatives, which is utilized as a camp
facility if used for organized and supervised recreational activities and
church purposes as related to such camp facilities. The exemption provided by
this paragraph shall apply to a maximum of ((two)) four hundred
acres of any such camp as selected by the church, including buildings and other
improvements thereon.

(3)
Property, including buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and
safeguarding of such property, owned by nonprofit organizations or associations
engaged in character building of boys and girls under eighteen years of age,
and used for such purposes and uses, provided such purposes and uses are for
the general public good: PROVIDED, That if existing charters provide that
organizations or associations, which would otherwise qualify under the
provisions of this paragraph, serve boys and girls up to the age of twenty-one
years, then such organizations or associations shall be deemed qualified
pursuant to this section.

(4)
Property owned by all organizations and societies of veterans of any war of the
United States, recognized as such by the department of defense, which shall
have national charters, and which shall have for their general purposes and
objects the preservation of the memories and associations incident to their war
service and the consecration of the efforts of their members to mutual
helpfulness and to patriotic and community service to state and nation. To be
exempt such property must be used in such manner as may be reasonably necessary
to carry out the purposes and objects of such societies.

The
use of the property for pecuniary gain or to promote business activities,
except as provided in this subsection (4), nullifies the exemption otherwise
available for the property for the assessment year. The exemption is not
nullified by:

(a)
The collection of rent or donations if the amount is reasonable and does not
exceed maintenance and operation expenses.

(b)
Fund-raising activities conducted by a nonprofit organization.

(c)
The use of the property for pecuniary gain for periods of not more than three
days in a year.

(d)
An inadvertent use of the property in a manner inconsistent with the purpose
for which exemption is granted, if the inadvertent use is not part of a pattern
of use. A pattern of use is presumed when an inadvertent use is repeated in
the same assessment year or in two or more successive assessment years.

(5)
Property owned by all corporations, incorporated under any act of congress,
whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to members of the armed
forces of the United States and also to carry on a system of national and
international relief and to apply the same in mitigating the sufferings caused
by pestilence, famine, fire, floods, and other national calamities and to
devise and carry on measures for preventing the same.

(6)
Property owned by nonprofit organizations exempt from federal income tax under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1954, as amended, that are
guarantee agencies under the federal guaranteed student loan program or that
issue debt to provide or acquire student loans.

(7)
To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the
purposes for which exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---