BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
15.86.060 and 1992 c 71 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall adopt such rules and regulations, in conformity with chapter
34.05 RCW, as the director believes are appropriate for the proper
administration of this chapter.

(2)
The director shall establish a list of approved substances that may be used in
the production, processing, and handling of organic food. This list shall:

(a)
Approve the use of natural substances except for specific natural substances
that may not be used in the production and handling of agricultural products
labeled as organic because these substances would be harmful to human health or
the environment and are inconsistent with organic farming principles;

(b)
Prohibit the use of synthetic substances except for specific synthetic
substances that may be used in the production and handling of agricultural
products labeled as organic because these substances:

(i)
Would not be harmful to human health or the environment;

(ii)
Are necessary to the production or handling of the agricultural products;

(iii)
Are consistent with organic farming principles; and

(iv)
Are used in the production of agricultural products and contain active
synthetic ingredients in the following categories: Copper and sulfur
compounds; toxins derived from bacteria; pheromones; soaps; horticultural oils;
vitamins and minerals; livestock parasiticides and medicines; and production
aids including netting, tree wraps and seals, insect traps, sticky barriers,
row covers, and equipment cleansers; or

(v)
Are used in production and contain synthetic inert ingredients.

(3)
Unless otherwise provided for by rule, substances approved by the director
and registered for use in organic food production under rules adopted by the
director may be identified by the use of a logo. Such a logo may include the
seal of the state of Washington. This subsection may not be construed as
requiring rule making or limiting the authority of the director to adopt rules
allowing and regulating under this chapter the use of other logos which include
or do not include the state seal.

(4)
The director shall issue orders to producers, processors, or vendors whom he or
she finds are violating any provision of this chapter, or rules or regulations
adopted under this chapter, to cease their violations and desist from future
violations. Whenever the director finds that a producer, processor, or vendor
has committed a violation, the director shall impose on and collect from the
violator a civil fine not exceeding the total of the following amounts: (a)
The state's estimated costs of investigating and taking appropriate
administrative and enforcement actions in respect to the violation; and (b) one
thousand dollars.

(((4))) (5) The director may deny, suspend, or revoke
a certification provided for in this chapter if he or she determines that an
applicant or certified person has violated this chapter or rules adopted under
it.

---
END ---