BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the essential academic learning requirements are high
academic standards. These standards are intended to be rigorous and
challenging for students to attain. Successful performance on the first
state-wide assessment of student progress toward achievement of the standards
for the fourth grade represents the culmination of a great deal of effort on
the part of students and teachers.

The
legislature finds that students who are not enrolled in and attending school
before the age of eight may be denied significant opportunities to learn the
essential academic learning requirements, and that students not enrolled by the
age of six may encounter extraordinary difficulties in their efforts to achieve
the challenging performance standards set for the fourth grade Washington
assessment of student learning. Therefore, the legislature intends to
encourage parents to enroll children between the ages of six and eight years of
age in school, and keep them there once those children have been enrolled.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and under eighteen
years of age shall cause such child to attend the public school of the district
in which the child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and
therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session
unless:

(a)
The child is attending an approved private school for the same time or is
enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW 28A.195.010(4);

(b)
The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (((4)))
(5) of this section;

(c)
The child is attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(d)
The school district superintendent of the district in which the child resides
shall have excused such child from attendance because the child is physically
or mentally unable to attend school, is attending a residential school operated
by the department of social and health services, is incarcerated in an adult
correctional facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his
or her parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the
parent: PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed
to cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be
claimed as full time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise
have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and
shall not affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW
28A.150.220; or

(e)
The child is sixteen years of age or older and:

(i)
The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that
the child should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated
in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;

(ii)
The child has already met graduation requirements in accordance with state
board of education rules and regulations; or

(iii)
The child has received a certificate of educational competence under rules and
regulations established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190.

(2)
If a parent enrolls a child of six or seven years of age in the public
school of the district in which the child resides, that parent has the
responsibility to ensure the child attends for the full time when that school
is in session, unless one of the exceptions in subsection (1) of this section
is met. This subsection does not apply to a child enrolled in a public school
part time for the purpose of receiving ancillary services.

(3)
A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent, guardian, or person
having legal custody of a child.

(((3)))
(4) An approved private school for the purposes of this chapter and
chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be one approved under regulations established by the
state board of education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.

(((4)))
(5) For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW,
instruction shall be home-based if it consists of planned and supervised
instructional and related educational activities, including a curriculum and
instruction in the basic skills of occupational education, science, mathematics,
language, social studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the
development of an appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours
equivalent to the total annual program hours per grade level established for
approved private schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such
activities are:

(a)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and are
supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of
this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter
28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated
person" means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of
objectives consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average
of one contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the
certificated person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the
certificated person. The number of children supervised by the certificated
person shall not exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or

(b)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has
either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours or its equivalent
in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a
postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or

(c)
Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based
instruction by the superintendent of the local school district in which the
child resides.

(((5))) (6) The legislature recognizes that
home-based instruction is less structured and more experiential than the
instruction normally provided in a classroom setting. Therefore, the
provisions of subsection (((4))) (5) of this section relating to
the nature and quantity of instructional and related educational activities
shall be liberally construed.

---
END ---