BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.36.030 and 1929 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be the duty of every person, firm, corporation or company having
possession or control of any artesian well, as provided in RCW 90.36.020, to
securely cap the same over on or before the fifteenth day of October in each
and every year in such manner as to prevent the flow or escape of water
therefrom, and to keep the same securely capped and prevent the flow or escape
of water therefrom until the fifteenth day of March next ensuing; PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, It shall and may be lawful for any such person, firm, corporation or
company to insert a three-quarters inch stop and waste cock in the piping of
such well, and to take and use water therefrom through such stop and waste cock
at any time for household, stock, or domestic purposes, but not otherwise.

(2)(a)
The regulations set forth in subsection (1) of this section are subject to
exceptions stated in this subsection.

(b)
Any well constructed according to the well construction regulations completed
into a confined aquifer that results in a flowing well with a discharge rate
not to exceed ten gallons per minute may flow freely for public use within the
city limits of Olympia if that flowing well is owned, operated, and maintained
by a public body.

(c)
The operator of the well shall ensure that the unused portion of the flow is
piped from the well head and discharged directly into a surface water body
within the city limits of Olympia, and shall ensure that the discharge does not
allow any degradation of water quality.

(d)
For purposes of this section, "public body" means the state of
Washington or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal
or public corporation thereof.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.44.110 and 1987 c 109 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No public ground waters that have been withdrawn shall be wasted without
economical beneficial use. The department shall require all wells producing
waters which contaminate other waters to be plugged or capped. The department
shall also require all flowing wells to be so capped or equipped with valves that
the flow of water can be completely stopped when the wells are not in use under
the terms of their respective permits or approved declarations of vested
rights. Likewise, the department shall also require both flowing and
nonflowing wells to be so constructed and maintained as to prevent the waste of
public ground waters through leaky casings, pipes, fittings, valves, or pumps‑-either
above or below the land surface: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the withdrawal of
reasonable quantities of public ground water in connection with the
construction, development, testing, or repair of a well shall not be construed
as waste; also, that the inadvertent loss of such water owing to breakage of a
pump, valve, pipe, or fitting shall not be construed as waste if reasonable
diligence is shown by the permittee in effecting the necessary repair.

(2)
In the issuance of an original permit, or of an amendment to an original permit
or certificate of vested right to withdraw and appropriate public ground waters
under the provisions of this chapter, the department may, as in his judgment is
necessary, specify for the proposed well or wells or other works a manner of
construction adequate to accomplish the provisions of this section.

(3)(a)
The regulations set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section are
subject to exceptions stated in this subsection.

(b)
Any well constructed according to the well construction regulations completed
into a confined aquifer that results in a flowing well with a discharge rate
not to exceed ten gallons per minute may flow freely for public use within the
city limits of Olympia if that flowing well is owned, operated, and maintained
by a public body.

(c)
The operator of the well shall ensure that the unused portion of the flow is
piped from the well head and discharged directly into a surface water body
within the city limits of Olympia, and shall ensure that the discharge does not
allow any degradation of water quality.

(d) For purposes of this section, "public body" means
the state of Washington or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district,
or municipal or public corporation thereof.

---
END ---