BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.0265 and 1997 c 118 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

"Player,"
as used in this chapter, means a natural person who engages, on equal terms
with the other participants, and solely as a contestant or bettor, in any form
of gambling in which no person may receive or become entitled to receive any
profit therefrom other than personal gambling winnings, and without otherwise
rendering any material assistance to the establishment, conduct or operation of
a particular gambling activity. A natural person who gambles at a social game
of chance on equal terms with the other participants shall not be considered as
rendering material assistance to the establishment, conduct or operation of the
social game merely by performing, without fee or remuneration, acts directed
toward the arrangement or facilitation of the game, such as inviting persons to
play, permitting the use of premises for the game, or supplying cards or other
equipment to be used in the games. A person who engages in
"bookmaking" as defined in this chapter is not a "player."
A person who pays a fee or "vigorish" enabling him or her to place a
wager with a bookmaker, or pays a fee ((other than as authorized by this
chapter)) to participate in a card game, contest of chance, lottery, or
gambling activity, is not a player.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.46.0282 and 1997 c 118 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Social
card game," as used in this chapter, means a card game ((that
constitutes gambling and is authorized by the commission under RCW 9.46.070.
Authorized card games may include a house-banked or a player-funded banked card
game. No one may participate in the card game or have an interest in the
proceeds of the card game who is not a player or a person licensed by the
commission to participate in social card games. There shall be two or more
participants in the card game who are players or persons licensed by the
commission. The card game must be played in accordance with the rules adopted
by the commission under RCW 9.46.070, which shall include but not be limited to
rules for the collection of fees, limitation of wagers, and management of
player funds. The number of tables authorized shall be set by the commission
but shall not exceed a total of fifteen separate tables per establishment))
including but not limited to the game commonly known as
"Mah-Jongg," which constitutes gambling and contains each of the
following characteristics:

(1)
There are two or more participants and each of them are players. The number of
card tables shall be set by the commission but shall not exceed a total of
fifteen separate tables per establishment;

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a player's success at
winning money or other thing of value by overcoming chance is in the long run
largely determined by the skill of the player;

(3)
A cardroom may serve as the custodian of a player-supported progressive prize
contest, in any card game authorized by the commission;

(4)
No organization or corporation, or person other than one licensed by the
commission to operate a cardroom, collects or obtains any money or thing of
value from, or charges or imposes any fee upon, any person which either enables
him or her to play or results in or from his or her playing;

(5)
The type of card game is one specifically approved by the commission pursuant
to RCW 9.46.070; and

(6) The extent of wagers, money, or other thing of value which
may be wagered or contributed by any player does not exceed the amount or value
specified by the commission pursuant to RCW 9.46.070.

---
END ---