BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.67.370 and 1998 c 61 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Cities, towns, or counties may not require existing mobile home
parks to replace existing, functional septic systems with a sewer system within
the community unless: (1) The mobile home park is within an area designated
under chapter 36.70A RCW as an area with a critical recharging effect on
aquifers used for potable water and such an aquifer is the primary drinking
water source for a city east of the crest of the Cascade mountains with a
population of over one hundred fifty thousand; or (2) the local board of
health determines that the septic system is failing.

---
END ---