BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a shortage of available quality child care
because of a growing number of working persons who need child care assistance.
The legislature further finds that the lack of affordable quality day care
causes problems for both employees and employers. The legislature further
finds that employer assistance with quality child care has advantages for the
employee through access to higher quality more stable child care and parental
choice and for the employer through lower absenteeism, lower job turnover, and
more productivity.

It
is the intent of the legislature to provide tax credits to small businesses,
located in distressed areas, that provide employee child care benefits to their
employees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be deducted against the tax imposed by this chapter, the value of
state-approved, employer-provided child care benefits to employees, for a small
business that is located within an eligible area.

(2)
The credit allowed under this section is equal to one hundred percent of the
state-approved, employer-provided child care benefit to the employee. The
total credits allowed to all small businesses claiming tax credits under this
section may not exceed two million dollars per biennium.

(3)
Before claiming the credit under this section, a business must obtain approval
of the proposed child care benefit from the department of social and health
services. The employer's request for approval must include a description of
the child care benefit provided to the employee and the cost of the proposed
child care benefit to the employer and employee, if applicable.

(4)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Child care benefit" means: (i) An employer-provided voucher that
can be used to pay part or all of the cost of day care or
before-and-after-school care in a state-approved and licensed facility; (ii)
the cost of construction of an employer-provided day care or before-and-after-school
care facility; or (iii) the cost of operation and maintenance of an
employer-provided day care or before-and-after-school care facility;

(b)
"Eligible area" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.62.010; and

(c) "Small business" means an entity subject to taxation
under this chapter and that has less than one hundred full-time employees. The
term "small business" also includes a consortium of two or more small
businesses.

---
END ---