BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of corrections shall implement and obtain through a request for
proposal process, a pilot postsecondary educational program for inmates.

(1)
The secretary shall ensure that the request for proposal is offered to
community and four-year colleges to provide postsecondary educational courses
for inmates on a self-pay system.

(2)
Inmates shall pay all costs and tuition for participation in the postsecondary
courses.

(3)
The secretary shall select for the pilot program one institution for males and
one institution for females.

(4)
The secretary shall ensure that the pilot program addresses all modes of
instruction, including distance learning and other technologies.

(5)
Inmates may use their own funds and funds deducted by the department under RCW
72.09.111 from their personal inmate savings account for the sole purposes of
their postsecondary educational classes.

(6)
The department may not preclude an inmate from participating in a postsecondary
education course based upon the inmate's release date or custody level.

(7)
The department shall provide any necessary space and administrative support if
the college or university provides the postsecondary educational classes.

(8)
The department shall administer the pilot postsecondary educational program for
one year.

(9) The department shall prepare and submit a report to the
legislature, not later than January 1, 2001, including recommendations
regarding whether the pilot postsecondary educational program should be
extended and stating the number of inmates who participated in the program.

---
END ---