BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

Within two hundred days of the effective date of a rule that
imposes additional requirements on businesses the violation of which subjects a
person to a penalty, assessment, or administrative sanction, an agency shall
make a good faith effort to notify businesses affected by the rule of the
requirements of the rule and how to obtain technical assistance to comply. For
purposes of this section, "good faith" means: (1) The agency at
least notifies businesses in the standard industrial classifications or their
successor identified in the rule-making file as businesses affected by the rule
that are registered with the department of revenue; or (2) for rules imposing
additional requirements only on persons or firms licensed, registered, or
operating under a permit, the agency notifies those persons or firms holding
the license, registration, or permit. The notification shall announce the rule
change, briefly summarize the rule change, and include a contact for more
information. Notification may be by individual notice, agency bulletins or newsletters,
or any other means that will reasonably inform affected businesses. Failure to
notify a specific business under this section does not invalidate a rule or
waive the requirement to comply with the rule.

---
END ---