BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that, for many citizens of Washington state, the ability
to purchase a home in which families can be raised has increasingly become
difficult. Home ownership is recognized as a main symbol of economic and
social success and is a primary goal for most citizens in Washington. In
addition, the design, construction, and rehabilitation of homes employs local
labor and uses a vast array of American-made products and services. As a
result of the positive attributes associated with high home ownership rates,
and in an attempt to educate potential home owners in the costs associated with
new home construction, the legislature intends to require sellers of new
construction to itemize and disclose all direct and indirect costs associated
with the construction of new residential housing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 64.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In a transaction for the sale of newly constructed residential real property,
the seller shall deliver to the buyer a completed real property transfer
disclosure statement containing, but not limited to, the following
information: (a) Any and all impact fees paid to the local jurisdiction as a
condition of permit approval; (b) real estate excise taxes paid under authority
of chapter 82.45 RCW; (c) sewer and water connection fees paid under chapters
35.92 and 35.91 RCW; (d) costs associated with compliance under chapter 43.21C
RCW; (e) costs, including studies and permit fees, associated with compliance
under chapter 90.58 RCW; and (f) federal, state, and local taxes paid by the
builder.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "impact fees" means
payment of money, including payments made as voluntary agreements under RCW
82.02.020, imposed upon development as a condition of development approval to
generate revenue for the construction or expansion of capital facilities
located outside the boundaries of new development that serve the contributing
and peripheral developments. "Capital facilities" means the
following facilities owned or operated by government entities: (a) Public
streets and roads; (b) publicly owned parks, open space, and recreational
facilities; (c) school facilities; (d) fire protection facilities in
jurisdictions that are not part of a fire district; (e) sewer and water
connection fees imposed under authority of RCW 35.92.025; (f) water and sewer
fees imposed under RCW 35.91.020; (g) street fees imposed under chapter 35.72
RCW; and (h) state environmental policy act mitigation measures imposed under
chapter 43.21C RCW.

---
END ---