BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the board finds that a county or city is in compliance as provided in RCW
36.70A.300 or 36.70A.330(2), a county or city may request assistance with the
defense of any subsequent appeals of the board's decision. If the board's
decision is appealed under RCW 36.70A.300(5), the county or city found in
compliance may request that the office of the attorney general:

(a)
Defend the county or city in any or all appeal proceedings at no cost to the
county or city;

(b)
Assist in the county's or city's defense in any or all appeal proceedings at no
cost to the county or city; or

(c)
Reimburse the county or city for the defense costs of any or all appeal
proceedings at the billing rate for an attorney general.

(2)
This section applies only to appeals or the portion of an appeal related to a
board's finding of compliance. If an appeal involves issues other than a
board's finding of compliance, the county or city may request assistance under
subsection (1) of this section only for the portion of the appeal related to a
board's finding of compliance.

(3)
In order to receive assistance from the office of the attorney general, a
county or city must show substantial financial need. For the purposes this
section, "substantial financial need" means a severe financial
hardship to a county's or city's budget such that the funding of other essential
services or programs will be jeopardized. The office of the attorney general
shall respond as to whether it will satisfy or deny the county's or city's
request for assistance within thirty calendar days of receiving such request.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---