BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.28.070 and 1990 c 209 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Information contained in the claim files and records of injured workers, under
the provisions of this title, shall be deemed confidential and shall not be
open to public inspection (other than to public employees in the performance of
their official duties), but representatives of a claimant, be it an individual
or an organization, may review a claim file or receive specific information
therefrom upon the presentation of the signed authorization of the claimant. A
claimant may review his or her claim file if the director determines, pursuant
to criteria adopted by rule, that the review is in the claimant's interest.

(2)
An employer((s)) or ((their)) its duly authorized
representatives may review any files of ((their)) its own injured
workers only in connection with any pending claims under this title.
The employer or representatives may collect, use, or disclose only as much
personal health information from the files as is reasonably necessary for
purposes directly related to proceedings on the claim. An employer may not use
any personal health information collected about a worker under this title in
making decisions concerning the hiring, termination, or promotion of the worker.

(3)
Physicians treating or examining workers claiming benefits under this title, or
physicians giving medical advice to the department regarding any claim may, at
the discretion of the department, inspect the claim files and records of
injured workers, and other persons may make such inspection, at the
department's discretion, when such persons are rendering assistance to the
department at any stage of the proceedings on any matter pertaining to the
administration of this title.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.32.110 and 1997 c 325 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Any worker entitled to receive any benefits or claiming such under this title
shall, if requested by the department or self-insurer as authorized under
this title, submit himself or herself for medical examination, at a time
and from time to time, at a place reasonably convenient for the worker and as
may be provided by the rules of the department. An injured worker, whether an
alien or other injured worker, who is not residing in the United States at the
time that a medical examination is requested may be required to submit to an
examination at any location in the United States determined by the department
or self-insurer.

(b)
The worker may, at his or her own expense, have a representative present at the
medical examination. The representative may observe the examination but not
interfere with or obstruct the examination. The worker or worker's
representative may, at his or her own expense, make an audio or video recording
of the examination, if the recording is made in an unobtrusive manner.

(2)
If the worker refuses to submit to medical examination, or obstructs the same,
or, if any injured worker shall persist in unsanitary or injurious practices
which tend to imperil or retard his or her recovery, or shall refuse to submit
to such medical or surgical treatment as is reasonably essential to his or her
recovery or refuse or obstruct evaluation or examination for the purpose of
vocational rehabilitation or does not cooperate in reasonable efforts at such
rehabilitation, the department or the self-insurer upon approval by the
department, with notice to the worker may suspend any further action on any
claim of such worker so long as such refusal, obstruction, noncooperation, or
practice continues and reduce, suspend, or deny any compensation for such
period: PROVIDED, That the department or the self-insurer shall not suspend
any further action on any claim of a worker or reduce, suspend, or deny any
compensation if a worker has good cause for refusing to submit to or to
obstruct any examination, evaluation, treatment or practice requested by the
department or required under this section.

(3)
If the worker necessarily incurs traveling expenses in attending the
examination pursuant to the request of the department, such traveling expenses
shall be repaid to him or her out of the accident fund upon proper voucher and
audit or shall be repaid by the self-insurer, as the case may be.

(4)(a)
If the medical examination required by this section causes the worker to be
absent from his or her work without pay:

(i)
In the case of a worker insured by the department, the worker shall be paid
compensation out of the accident fund in an amount equal to his or her usual
wages for the time lost from work while attending the medical examination; or

(ii)
In the case of a worker of a self-insurer, the self-insurer shall pay the
worker an amount equal to his or her usual wages for the time lost from work
while attending the medical examination.

(b)
This subsection (4) shall apply prospectively to all claims regardless of the
date of injury.

Sec.
3. RCW
51.32.160 and 1995 c 253 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
If aggravation, diminution, or termination of disability takes place, the
director may at any time, upon the application of the beneficiary((,
made within seven years from the date the first closing order becomes final, or
at any time)) or upon ((his or her)) the director's
own motion, readjust the rate of compensation in accordance with the rules in
this section provided for the same, or in a proper case terminate the payment((:
PROVIDED, That the director may, upon application of the worker made at any
time,)) or provide proper and necessary medical and surgical
services as authorized under RCW 51.36.010. The department shall promptly mail
a copy of the application to the employer at the employer's last known address
as shown by the records of the department.

(b)
(("Closing order" as used in this section means an order based on
factors which include medical recommendation, advice, or examination.

(c)
Applications for benefits where the claim has been closed without medical
recommendation, advice, or examination are not subject to the seven year
limitation of this section. The preceding sentence shall not apply to any
closing order issued prior to July 1, 1981. First closing orders issued
between July 1, 1981, and July 1, 1985, shall, for the purposes of this section
only, be deemed issued on July 1, 1985. The time limitation of this section
shall be ten years in claims involving loss of vision or function of the eyes.

(d))) If
an order denying an application to reopen filed on or after July 1, 1988, is
not issued within ninety days of receipt of such application by the
self-insured employer or the department, such application shall be deemed
granted. However, for good cause, the department may extend the time for
making the final determination on the application for an additional sixty days.

(2)
If a worker receiving a pension for total disability returns to gainful
employment for wages, the director may suspend or terminate the rate of
compensation established for the disability without producing medical evidence
that shows that a diminution of the disability has occurred.

(3)
No act done or ordered to be done by the director, or the department prior to
the signing and filing in the matter of a written order for such readjustment
shall be grounds for such readjustment.

Sec.
4. RCW
51.32.240 and 1991 c 88 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever any payment of benefits under this title is made or withheld
because of clerical error, mistake of identity, innocent misrepresentation by
or on behalf of the recipient thereof mistakenly acted upon, or any other
circumstance of a similar nature, all not induced by fraud, the recipient
thereof shall be entitled to the benefits underpaid, or shall repay ((it))
the benefits overpaid and recoupment may be made from any future
payments due to the recipient on any claim with the state fund or self-insurer,
as the case may be. The recipient, department, or self-insurer,
as the case may be, must make claim for such underpayment, repayment,
or recoupment within one year of the making of any such payment or
underpayment or it will be deemed any claim therefor has been waived. The
director, pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the procedures provided
in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise his
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such timely claim
where the recovery would be against equity and good conscience.

(2)
Whenever the department issues an order rejecting a claim for benefits paid
pursuant to RCW 51.32.190 or 51.32.210, after payment for temporary disability
benefits has been paid by a self-insurer pursuant to RCW 51.32.190(3) or by the
department pursuant to RCW 51.32.210, the recipient thereof shall repay such
benefits and recoupment may be made from any future payments due to the
recipient on any claim with the state fund or self-insurer, as the case may
be. The director, under rules adopted in accordance with the procedures
provided in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise
discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such payments where
the recovery would be against equity and good conscience.

(3)
Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been made pursuant to an
adjudication by the department or by order of the board or any court and timely
appeal therefrom has been made where the final decision is that any such
payment was made pursuant to an erroneous adjudication, the recipient thereof
shall repay it and recoupment may be made from any future payments due to the
recipient on any claim with the state fund or self-insurer, as the case may
be. The director, pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with the procedures
provided in the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, may exercise
his discretion to waive, in whole or in part, the amount of any such payments
where the recovery would be against equity and good conscience.

(4)
Whenever any payment of benefits under this title has been induced by fraud the
recipient thereof shall repay any such payment together with a penalty of fifty
percent of the total of any such payments and the amount of such total sum may
be recouped from any future payments due to the recipient on any claim with the
state fund or self-insurer against whom the fraud was committed, as the case
may be, and the amount of such penalty shall be placed in the supplemental
pension fund. Such repayment or recoupment must be demanded or ordered within
one year of the discovery of the fraud.

(5)
The worker, beneficiary, or other person affected thereby shall have the right
to contest an order assessing an overpayment pursuant to this section in the
same manner and to the same extent as provided under RCW 51.52.050 and
51.52.060. In the event such an order becomes final under chapter 51.52 RCW
and notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) through (4) of this
section, the director, director's designee, or self-insurer may file with the
clerk in any county within the state a warrant in the amount of the sum
representing the unpaid overpayment and/or penalty plus interest accruing from
the date the order became final. The clerk of the county in which the warrant
is filed shall immediately designate a superior court cause number for such
warrant and the clerk shall cause to be entered in the judgment docket under
the superior court cause number assigned to the warrant, the name of the
worker, beneficiary, or other person mentioned in the warrant, the amount of
the unpaid overpayment and/or penalty plus interest accrued, and the date the
warrant was filed. The amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien
upon the title to and interest in all real and personal property of the worker,
beneficiary, or other person against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a
judgment in a civil case docketed in the office of such clerk. The sheriff
shall then proceed in the same manner and with like effect as prescribed by law
with respect to execution or other process issued against rights or property
upon judgment in the superior court. Such warrant so docketed shall be sufficient
to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the department or
self-insurer in the manner provided by law in the case of judgment, wholly or
partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the court shall be entitled to a filing
fee of five dollars, which shall be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy
of such warrant shall be mailed to the worker, beneficiary, or other person
within three days of filing with the clerk.

The
director, director's designee, or self-insurer may issue to any person, firm,
corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state, a notice to withhold and deliver property
of any kind if there is reason to believe that there is in the possession of
such person, firm, corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of
the state, public corporation, or agency of the state, property that is due,
owing, or belonging to any worker, beneficiary, or other person upon whom a
warrant has been served for payments due the department or self-insurer. The
notice and order to withhold and deliver shall be served by certified mail
accompanied by an affidavit of service by mailing or served by the sheriff of
the county, or by the sheriff's deputy, or by any authorized representative of
the director, director's designee, or self-insurer. Any person, firm,
corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall
answer the notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under
oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired or in
the notice and order to withhold and deliver. In the event there is in the
possession of the party named and served with such notice and order, any
property that may be subject to the claim of the department or self-insurer,
such property shall be delivered forthwith to the director, the director's
authorized representative, or self-insurer upon demand. If the party served
and named in the notice and order fails to answer the notice and order within
the time prescribed in this section, the court may, after the time to answer
such order has expired, render judgment by default against the party named in
the notice for the full amount, plus costs, claimed by the director, director's
designee, or self-insurer in the notice. In the event that a notice to
withhold and deliver is served upon an employer and the property found to be
subject thereto is wages, the employer may assert in the answer all exemptions
provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage earner may be entitled.

This
subsection shall only apply to orders assessing an overpayment which are issued
on or after July 28, 1991: PROVIDED, That this subsection shall apply
retroactively to all orders assessing an overpayment resulting from fraud,
civil or criminal.

(6)
Orders assessing an overpayment which are issued on or after July 28, 1991,
shall include a conspicuous notice of the collection methods available to the
department or self-insurer.

Sec.
5. RCW
51.36.060 and 1991 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Physicians examining or attending injured workers under this title shall comply
with rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the director, and shall make
such reports as may be requested by the department or self-insurer upon the
condition or treatment of any such worker, or upon any other matters concerning
such workers in their care. Except for information collected under RCW
49.17.210 and 49.17.250, and subject to RCW 51.28.070, all medical
information in the possession or control of any person and relevant to the
particular injury in the opinion of the department pertaining to any worker
whose injury or occupational disease is the basis of a claim under this title
shall be made available at any stage of the proceedings to the employer, the
claimant's representative, and the department upon request((, and)) to
be used only for purposes directly related to the proceedings on the claim
under this title.

(2)
No person shall incur any legal liability by reason of releasing ((such))
information as required by this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
51.36.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the requirements of this title, whenever the director or the
self-insurer deems it necessary ((in order to resolve any medical issue, a))
to order a medical examination of a worker, the worker shall submit to
examination by a ((physician or physicians)) provider or providers
selected by the director, with the rendition of a report to the person ordering
the examination and to the worker's treating provider or providers, who must
be given a reasonable opportunity to respond to the report. The director,
in his or her discretion, may charge the cost of such examination or
examinations to the self-insurer or to the medical aid fund as the case may
be. The cost of said examination shall include payment to the worker of
reasonable expenses connected therewith.

(2)
Examinations by the worker's treating provider or providers may be ordered
whenever necessary to resolve a medical issue. Examinations by independent
examiners may be ordered no more than twice in a calendar year, except by
agreement between the worker and the department or self-insurer, and only in
the following circumstances:

(a)
To resolve a disagreement among the treating providers concerning the best
course of treatment or the need for continuing treatment;

(b)
To determine whether the worker's condition is fixed and stable after
completion of a course of treatment, if the treating provider agrees that the
course of treatment is complete. If the treating provider does not agree that
the course of treatment is complete, an examination by an independent examiner
may be ordered under this subsection only if the examiner is chosen by
agreement between the worker and the department or self-insurer;

(c)
To provide consultation to the worker's treating provider when the care of the
worker has exceeded practice parameters established by the department. The
consultation is limited to reviewing diagnoses, determining the reason that
care has exceeded practice parameters, and/or providing suggestions for
alternate diagnoses and treatment procedures.

(3)
The course of treatment or care, including emergency services, for an accepted
condition may not be interrupted or delayed pending the examination report of
an independent examiner unless the director or designee finds that the
treatment or care is not medically necessary. This subsection does not apply
to procedures, determined by department rule, that can be delayed without harm
to the injured worker until a consultation opinion is obtained.

(4)
If the department or self-insurer relies on the report of an independent
examiner to deny, limit, or terminate benefits to a worker, the examiner must
be currently licensed, certified, or registered to practice in the same field
or specialty as the claimant's treating provider or providers.

(5)
Any provider licensed to practice in medicine and surgery under chapter 18.71
RCW, osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapter 18.57 RCW, podiatric
medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW, dentistry under chapter 18.30
RCW, chiropractic under chapter 18.25 RCW, and psychology under chapter 18.83
RCW may be an independent examiner, within the appropriate scope of practice
for the examination to be performed and subject to department rules regarding
approval as an independent examiner.

(6)
For purposes of this section, "independent examiner" means a provider
or panel of providers, none of whom are a treating provider for the worker
being examined.

(7)
This section does not apply to special examinations for determining permanent
disabilities.

Sec.
7. RCW
51.52.050 and 1987 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the department has made any order, decision, or award, it shall
promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person affected
thereby, with a copy thereof by mail, which shall be addressed to such person
at his or her last known address as shown by the records of the department.
The copy, in case the same is a final order, decision, or award, shall bear on
the same side of the same page on which is found the amount of the award, a
statement, set in black faced type of at least ten point body or size, that
such final order, decision, or award shall become final within sixty days from
the date the order is communicated to the parties unless a written request for
reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries, Olympia,
or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, a department order or decision making
demand, whether with or without penalty, for repayment of sums paid to a
provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health services rendered to
an industrially injured worker, shall state that such order or decision shall
become final within twenty days from the date the order or decision is
communicated to the parties unless a written request for reconsideration is
filed with the department of labor and industries, Olympia, or an appeal is
filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia.

(2)
Whenever the department has taken any action or made any decision relating to
any phase of the administration of this title, the worker, beneficiary,
employer, or other person aggrieved thereby may request reconsideration of the
department, or may appeal to the board. If an employer requests
reconsideration of a department order in favor of an injured worker, temporary
total disability compensation or medical aid benefits granted to the worker by
the order under reconsideration shall continue while the reconsideration is
pending, subject to the requirements of RCW 51.32.240(3).

(3)
In an appeal before the board, the appellant shall have the burden of
proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the relief
sought in such appeal((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in an
appeal from an order of the department that alleges fraud, the department or
self-insured employer shall initially introduce all evidence in its case in
chief. ((Any such)) A person aggrieved by the decision and order
of the board may thereafter appeal to the superior court, as prescribed in this
chapter.

Sec.
8. RCW
51.52.060 and 1995 c 253 s 1 and 1995 c 199 s 7 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, a worker,
beneficiary, employer, health services provider, or other person aggrieved by
an order, decision, or award of the department must, before he or she appeals
to the courts, file with the board and the director, by mail or personally,
within sixty days from the day on which a copy of the order, decision, or award
was communicated to such person, a notice of appeal to the board. However, a
health services provider or other person aggrieved by a department order or
decision making demand, whether with or without penalty, solely for repayment of
sums paid to a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health
services rendered to an industrially injured worker must, before he or she
appeals to the courts, file with the board and the director, by mail or
personally, within twenty days from the day on which a copy of the order or
decision was communicated to the health services provider upon whom the
department order or decision was served, a notice of appeal to the board.

(b)
Failure to file a notice of appeal with both the board and the department shall
not be grounds for denying the appeal if the notice of appeal is filed with
either the board or the department.

(2)
Within ten days of the date on which an appeal has been granted by the board,
the board shall notify the other interested parties to the appeal of the
receipt of the appeal and shall forward a copy of the notice of appeal to the
other interested parties. Within twenty days of the receipt of such notice of
the board, the worker or the employer may file with the board a cross-appeal
from the order of the department from which the original appeal was taken.

(3)
If within the time limited for filing a notice of appeal to the board from an
order, decision, or award of the department, the department directs the submission
of further evidence or the investigation of any further fact, the time for
filing the notice of appeal shall not commence to run until the person has been
advised in writing of the final decision of the department in the matter. In
the event the department directs the submission of further evidence or the
investigation of any further fact, as provided in this section, the department
shall render a final order, decision, or award within ninety days from the date
further submission of evidence or investigation of further fact is ordered
which time period may be extended by the department for good cause stated in
writing to all interested parties for an additional ninety days.

(4)
The department, either within the time limited for appeal, or within thirty
days after receiving a notice of appeal, may:

(a)
Modify, reverse, or change any order, decision, or award; or

(b)(i)
Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, hold an order, decision, or
award in abeyance for a period of ninety days which time period may be extended
by the department for good cause stated in writing to all interested parties
for an additional ninety days pending further investigation in light of the
allegations of the notice of appeal; or

(ii)
Hold an order, decision, or award issued under RCW 51.32.160 in abeyance for a
period not to exceed ninety days from the date of receipt of an application
under RCW 51.32.160. The department may extend the ninety-day time period for
an additional sixty days for good cause.

For
purposes of this subsection, good cause includes delay that results from
conduct of the claimant that is subject to sanction under RCW 51.32.110.

The
board shall deny the appeal upon the issuance of an order under (b)(i) or (ii)
of this subsection holding an earlier order, decision, or award in abeyance,
without prejudice to the appellant's right to appeal from any subsequent
determinative order issued by the department.

This
subsection (4)(b) does not apply to applications deemed granted under RCW
51.32.160.

(5)
An employer shall have the right to appeal an application deemed granted under
RCW 51.32.160 on the same basis as any other application adjudicated pursuant
to that section.

(6)
A provision of this section shall not be deemed to change, alter, or modify the
practice or procedure of the department for the payment of awards pending
appeal. However, if an employer appeals to the board a department order
granting temporary total disability compensation or medical aid benefits to a
worker, the worker shall be entitled to the compensation or medical aid
benefits while the appeal is pending before the board, subject to the
requirements of RCW 51.32.240(3).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
Sections 2 and 6 of this act apply to all medical examinations, other than
special examinations for determining permanent disabilities, ordered by the
department of labor and industries or a self-insured employer under Title 51
RCW on or after the effective date of this act.

(2)
Section 3 of this act applies to all claims filed under Title 51 RCW on or
after the effective date of this act and to all claims that are open, or remain
subject to appeal, as of the effective date of this act, regardless of the date
of injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---