BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act is in response to the decision of the Washington supreme court in Paccar
Inc. v. State of Washington, 135 Wn.2d 301 (1998). The decision results in
increased burdens upon taxpayers and the department of revenue in the
determination of tax liabilities. The legislature finds that the normal
statutory limitations for assessments and refund claims of taxes should be
subject only to certain limited exceptions. Therefore, the legislature finds
it necessary to enact this remedial legislation regarding the offsetting of
taxes.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.32.050 and 1997 c 157 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If upon examination of any returns or from other information obtained by the
department it appears that a tax or penalty has been paid less than that
properly due, the department shall assess against the taxpayer such additional
amount found to be due and shall add thereto interest on the tax only. The
department shall notify the taxpayer by mail of the additional amount and the
additional amount shall become due and shall be paid within thirty days from
the date of the notice, or within such further time as the department may
provide. The department shall make an assessment or a correction of an
assessment within the time period and subject to the limitations in subsection
(3) of this section.

(a)
For tax liabilities arising before January 1, 1992, interest shall be computed
at the rate of nine percent per annum from the last day of the year in which
the deficiency is incurred until the earlier of December 31, 1998, or the date
of payment. After December 31, 1998, the rate of interest shall be variable
and computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so
computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in
computing interest for that calendar year.

(b)
For tax liabilities arising after December 31, 1991, the rate of interest shall
be variable and computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section from the
last day of the year in which the deficiency is incurred until the date of
payment. The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of
each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(c)
Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed from the last day
of the month following each calendar year included in a notice, and the last
day of the month following the final month included in a notice if not the end
of a calendar year, until the due date of the notice. If payment in full is
not made by the due date of the notice, additional interest shall be computed
until the date of payment. The rate of interest shall be variable and computed
as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The rate so computed shall be
adjusted on the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest
for that calendar year.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the rate of interest to be charged to the
taxpayer shall be an average of the federal short-term rate as defined in 26
U.S.C. Sec. 1274(d) plus two percentage points. The rate shall be computed by
taking an arithmetical average to the nearest percentage point of the federal
short-term rate, compounded annually, for the months of January, April, July,
and October of the immediately preceding calendar year as published by the
United States secretary of the treasury.

(3)
No assessment or correction of an assessment for any additional ((taxes,
penalties)) tax, penalty, or interest due may be made by the
department more than four years after the close of the tax year, except (a)
against a taxpayer who has not registered as required by this chapter, (b) upon
a showing of fraud or of misrepresentation of a material fact by the taxpayer,
or (c) where a taxpayer has executed a written waiver of such limitation. The
execution of a written waiver shall also extend the period for making a refund
or credit as provided in RCW 82.32.060(2). An assessment for an additional
amount of a tax may be offset by an overpayment of a like tax for the same tax
period in an amount not exceeding the amount of the assessment, where refund of
the overpaid tax may not be made because of the lapse of the claim period. No
offset may be allowed against taxes that are not alike; for example a use tax
overpayment may be offset against a use tax assessment but a business and
occupation tax overpayment may not be offset against a use tax or a hazardous
substance tax assessment. For the purposes of this subsection, the taxes
imposed by chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW, respectively, shall be considered
"like taxes." Therefore, any tax under chapter 82.04 RCW may be
offset against any other tax under chapter 82.04 RCW and any tax under chapter
82.16 RCW may be offset against any other tax under chapter 82.16 RCW.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "return" means any document a
person is required by the state of Washington to file to satisfy or establish a
tax or fee obligation that is administered or collected by the department of
revenue and that has a statutorily defined due date.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.32.060 and 1997 c 157 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If, upon receipt of an application by a taxpayer for a refund or for an audit
of the taxpayer's records, or upon an examination of the returns or records of
any taxpayer, it is determined by the department that within the statutory
period for assessment of ((taxes, penalties)) any tax, penalty,
or interest prescribed by RCW 82.32.050 any ((amount of)) tax, penalty,
or interest has been paid in excess of that properly due, the excess amount
paid within, or attributable to, such period shall be credited to the
taxpayer's account or shall be refunded to the taxpayer, at the taxpayer's
option. Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, no
refund or credit shall be made for ((taxes, penalties)) any tax,
penalty, or interest paid more than four years prior to the beginning of
the calendar year in which the refund application is made or examination of
records is completed. A refund claim determined to be otherwise proper may
be offset by an underpayment of a like tax for the same tax period in an amount
not exceeding the amount of the refund claim, where assessment of the underpaid
tax may not be made because of the lapse of the assessment period. No offset
may be allowed against taxes that are not alike; for example a use tax
underpayment may be offset against a use tax refund claim but a business and
occupation tax underpayment may not be offset against a use tax or a hazardous
substance tax refund claim. For the purposes of this subsection, the taxes
imposed by chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW, respectively, shall be considered
"like taxes." Therefore, any tax under chapter 82.04 RCW may be
offset against any other tax under chapter 82.04 RCW and any tax under chapter
82.16 RCW may be offset against any other tax under chapter 82.16 RCW.

(2)
The execution of a written waiver under RCW 82.32.050 or 82.32.100 shall extend
the time for making a refund or credit of any taxes paid during, or
attributable to, the years covered by the waiver if, prior to the expiration of
the waiver period, an application for refund of such taxes is made by the
taxpayer or the department discovers a refund or credit is due.

(3)
Notwithstanding the foregoing limitations there shall be refunded or credited
to taxpayers engaged in the performance of United States government contracts
or subcontracts the amount of any tax paid, measured by that portion of the
amounts received from the United States, which the taxpayer is required by
contract or applicable federal statute to refund or credit to the United
States, if claim for such refund is filed by the taxpayer with the department
within one year of the date that the amount of the refund or credit due to the
United States is finally determined and filed within four years of the date on
which the tax was paid: PROVIDED, That no interest shall be allowed on such
refund.

(4)
Any such refunds shall be made by means of vouchers approved by the department
and by the issuance of state warrants drawn upon and payable from such funds as
the legislature may provide. However, taxpayers who are required to pay taxes
by electronic funds transfer under RCW 82.32.080 shall have any refunds paid by
electronic funds transfer.

(5)
Any judgment for which a recovery is granted by any court of competent
jurisdiction, not appealed from, for tax, penalties, and interest which were
paid by the taxpayer, and costs, in a suit by any taxpayer shall be paid in the
same manner, as provided in subsection (4) of this section, upon the filing
with the department of a certified copy of the order or judgment of the court.

(a)
Interest at the rate of three percent per annum shall be allowed by the
department and by any court on the amount of any refund, credit, or other
recovery allowed to a taxpayer for taxes, penalties, or interest paid by the
taxpayer before January 1, 1992. This rate of interest shall apply for all
interest allowed through December 31, 1998. Interest allowed after December
31, 1998, shall be computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2).
The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year
for use in computing interest for that calendar year.

(b)
For refunds or credits of amounts paid or other recovery allowed to a taxpayer
after December 31, 1991, the rate of interest shall be the rate as computed for
assessments under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be adjusted on
the first day of January of each year for use in computing interest for that
calendar year.

Sec.
4. RCW
82.32.180 and 1997 c 156 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person, except one who has failed to keep and preserve books, records, and
invoices as required in this chapter and chapter 82.24 RCW, having paid any tax
as required and feeling aggrieved by the amount of the tax may appeal to the
superior court of Thurston county, within the time limitation for a refund
provided in chapter 82.32 RCW or, if an application for refund has been made to
the department within that time limitation, then within thirty days after
rejection of the application, whichever time limitation is later. In the
appeal the taxpayer shall set forth the amount of ((the)) each
tax imposed upon the taxpayer which the taxpayer concedes to be the correct tax
and the reason why ((the)) such tax or taxes should be
reduced or abated. The appeal shall be perfected by serving a copy of the
notice of appeal upon the department within the time herein specified and by
filing the original thereof with proof of service with the clerk of the
superior court of Thurston county.

The
trial in the superior court on appeal shall be de novo and without the
necessity of any pleadings other than the notice of appeal. At trial, the
burden shall rest upon the taxpayer to prove that the tax as paid by the
taxpayer is incorrect, either in whole or in part, and to establish the correct
amount of the tax. The amount of refund of any tax to which the taxpayer
may otherwise be entitled shall be subject to offset in accordance with RCW
82.32.050(3) and 82.32.060(1). In such proceeding the taxpayer shall be
deemed the plaintiff, and the state, the defendant; and both parties shall be
entitled to subpoena the attendance of witnesses as in other civil actions and
to produce evidence that is competent, relevant, and material to determine the
correct amount of the tax that should be paid by the taxpayer. Either party
may seek appellate review in the same manner as other civil actions are
appealed to the appellate courts.

It
shall not be necessary for the taxpayer to protest against the payment of any
tax or to make any demand to have the same refunded or to petition the director
for a hearing in order to appeal to the superior court, but no court action or
proceeding of any kind shall be maintained by the taxpayer to recover any tax
paid, or any part thereof, except as herein provided.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any tax payment
which has been the subject of an appeal to the board of tax appeals with
respect to which appeal a formal hearing has been elected.

---
END ---