BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that several areas in the state are characterized by high
levels of unemployment and poverty. The legislature further finds that
economic stagnation is the primary cause of this high unemployment rate and
poverty.

The
legislature also finds that new, small businesses offer the best opportunity
for job creation in these areas. The legislature also finds that the creation
of new, small businesses are vital to the overall vitality of the state's
economy. However, the legislature finds that many of these new, small
businesses incur significant costs during their initial years of operation
before they are profitable.

For
these reasons, the legislature establishes a business and occupation tax
deferral program designed to assist new, small businesses, located in impact
areas, during the initial years of operation. The legislature declares that
this limited program serves the vital public purpose of creating employment
opportunities and reducing poverty in impact areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Impact area" means: (a) Eligible area as defined in RCW 82.62.010;
(b) rural natural resources impact area as defined in RCW 43.31.601; or (c)
distressed area as defined in RCW 43.165.010.

(2)(a)
"New small business" means a business that: (i) Obtained or was
required to obtain a registration certificate under RCW 82.32.030 for the first
time during the calendar year for which the exemption is first claimed under
this chapter; and (ii) that employs less than fifty full-time employees.

(b)
"New business" does not include:

(i)
A business that has been restructured, reorganized, or transferred, unless the
majority of the activities to be conducted after restructuring, reorganization,
or transferral are significantly different from the activities previously
conducted;

(ii)
A new branch location or other facility except by an existing out-of-state
entity first doing business in this state; or

(iii)
A business that is substantially similar to a business currently operated, or
operated within the past five years, by the same principals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Application for deferral of business and occupation taxes under chapter 82.04
RCW must be made within twelve months of obtaining a registration certificate
under RCW 82.32.030. The application shall be made to the department in a form
and manner prescribed by the department. The application shall contain
information regarding the location of the new small business, estimated or
actual employees related to the new small business, and other information
required by the department. The department shall rule on the application
within sixty days.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department shall issue a business and occupation tax deferral certificate for
state business and occupation taxes due under chapter 82.04 RCW for each new
small business.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The recipient of the business and occupation tax deferral shall begin paying
the deferred taxes in the sixth year after receipt of the registration
certification required under RCW 82.32.030. The first payment will be due on
December 31st of the sixth calendar year after issuance of the tax deferral
certificate issued under section 4 of this act, with subsequent annual payments
due on December 31st of the following nine years with amounts of payment
scheduled as follows:

Repayment
Year % of Deferred Tax Due

1 10%

2 10%

3 10%

4 10%

5 10%

6 10%

7 10%

8 10%

9 10%

10 10%

(2)
The department may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule upon request of
the recipient.

(3)
Interest shall not be charged on any taxes deferred under this chapter for the
period of deferral, although all other penalties and interest may be assessed
and imposed for delinquent payments under this chapter. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, the debt for deferred taxes may not be
extinguished by insolvency or other failure of the recipient of the tax
deferral.

(4)
If the recipient of the tax deferral under this chapter ceases operation due to
insolvency or other failure, the taxes due for the first thirty-six month
period of operation after issuance of the registration certificate under RCW
82.32.030, need not be repaid.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

---
END ---