BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.215.110 and 1994 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through
28A.215.908.

(1)
"Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW
28A.215.140.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Eligible child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten whose
family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the federal
poverty level, as published annually by the federal department of health and
human services, and includes a child whose family is eligible for public
assistance, and who is not a participant in a federal or state program
providing comprehensive services and may include children who are eligible
under rules adopted by the department if the number of such children equals not
more than ten percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program.
Priority for enrollment shall be given to children from families with the
lowest income or to eligible children from families with multiple needs.

(4)
"Approved programs" means those state-supported education and special
assistance programs which are recognized by the department of community, trade,
and economic development as meeting the minimum program rules adopted by the
department to qualify under RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900
through 28A.215.908 and are designated as eligible for funding by the
department under RCW 28A.215.160 and 28A.215.180.

(5)
"Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the needs
of the child and includes education, health, and family support services.

(6)
"Family support services" means providing opportunities for parents
to:

(a)
Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;

(b)
Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting skills;

(c)
Further their education and training;

(d)
Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;

(e) Increase their self-reliance.

---
END ---