BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

Each recipient approved to receive temporary assistance for needy
families shall be subject to an employability screening after determination of
program eligibility and before referral to job search. If the employability
screening determines the recipient is not employable, or meets the criteria
specified in RCW 74.08A.270 for a good cause exemption to work requirements,
the department shall defer the job search requirement under RCW 74.08A.285 and
refer the recipient immediately to the assessment procedure required under RCW
74.08A.260.

---
END ---