BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that a long-term care facility is home for the individual
residing therein, and the individual has the right to receive services in his
or her own home and to be cared for by the organization with which he or she
has a contractual agreement to provide housing and related services. The
legislature further finds that health maintenance organizations, or any other
similar health plan, that restricts individuals from returning to the long-term
care facility in which they were residing prior to hospitalization may be
impacting the health and well-being of frail individuals and their families.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

Upon
the request of the patient, or his or her legal representative, a health
maintenance organization licensed under this chapter shall discharge
individuals from a hospital stay, back to the nursing facility licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, continuing care retirement community defined under RCW
70.38.025, boarding home licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW, or assisted living
facility in which they resided prior to the hospital stay, provided that the
following conditions are met:

(1)
The primary care physician determines that the individual needs a specific
level of care and refers the enrollee to that nursing home facility, continuing
care retirement community, boarding home, or assisted living facility's
appropriate care setting. If the attending physician is unable to provide care
for the patient at that nursing home facility, continuing care retirement
community, boarding home, or assisted living facility, the attending physician
shall transfer the care to another physician who is willing and able to follow
the patient's care at that facility;

(2)
The nursing facility, continuing care retirement community, boarding home, or
assisted living facility agrees to be reimbursed at the rate that the health
maintenance organization plan company's contract rate negotiated with similar
providers for the same services and supplies; and

(3) The nursing facility, continuing care retirement community,
boarding home, or assisted living facility meets all guidelines established by
the health maintenance organization plan company related to health, safety, and
quality of care standards, and other appropriate criteria applicable to
providers under contract for the same services and supplies.

---
END ---