BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.225.020 and 1996 c 134 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a child required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 fails to attend
school without valid justification, the public school in which the child is
enrolled shall:

(a)
Inform the child's custodial parent, parents, or guardian by a notice in
writing or by telephone whenever the child has failed to attend school after
one unexcused absence within any month during the current school year. School
officials shall inform the parent of the potential consequences of additional
unexcused absences;

(b)
Schedule a conference or conferences with the custodial parent, parents, or
guardian and child at a time reasonably convenient for all persons included for
the purpose of analyzing the causes of the child's absences after two unexcused
absences within any month during the current school year. If a regularly
scheduled parent-teacher conference day is to take place within thirty days of
the second unexcused absence, then the school district may schedule this
conference on that day; and

(c)
Take steps to eliminate or reduce the child's absences. These steps shall
include, where appropriate, adjusting the child's school program or school or
course assignment, providing more individualized or remedial instruction,
providing appropriate vocational courses or work experience, referring the
child to a community truancy board, requiring the child to attend an
alternative school or program, or assisting the parent or child to obtain
supplementary services that might eliminate or ameliorate the cause or causes
for the absence from school. If the child's parent does not attend the
scheduled conference, the conference may be conducted with the student and
school official. However, the parent shall be notified of the steps to be
taken to eliminate or reduce the child's absence.

(2)
For purposes of this chapter, an "unexcused absence" means that a
child:

(a)
Has failed to attend the majority of hours or periods in an average school day
or has failed to comply with a more restrictive school district policy; and

(b)
Has failed to meet the school district's policy for excused absences.

(3)
If a child transfers from one school district to another, the receiving school
or school district shall honor the attendance record including the unexcused
absences accumulated at the previous school or from the previous school
district.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.225.035 and 1997 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 shall consist of a written
notification to the court alleging that:

(a)
The child has unexcused absences during the current school year;

(b)
Actions taken by the school district have not been successful in substantially
reducing the child's absences from school; and

(c)
Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the school district
or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.

(2)
The petition shall set forth the name, age, school, and residence of the child
and the names and residence of the child's parents.

(3)
The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations in this section
and shall generally request relief available under this chapter and provide
information about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4)
When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030, the juvenile court shall
schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition. However, a
hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court would substantially
reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a hearing is held, the court
shall:

(a)
Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the school district
of the hearing;

(b)
Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the
hearing; and

(c)
Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights available under
chapter 13.32A RCW.

(5)
The court may require the attendance of both the child and the parents at any
hearing on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.

(6)
The court may permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either
party be represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad
litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district,
the court may permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to
represent the school district at any future hearings.

(7)
If the allegations in the petition are established by a preponderance of the
evidence, the court shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming
jurisdiction to intervene for the period of time determined by the court, after
considering the facts alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the
juvenile, to most likely cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school
while the juvenile is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire
before the end of the school year in which it is entered.

(8)
If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall regularly report
to the court any additional unexcused absences by the child.

(9)
Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the extent
possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who are subject to
truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or child in
need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.

(10) If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one
county the child relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the
receiving county shall, upon the request of a school district or parent, assume
jurisdiction of the petition filed in the previous county.

---
END ---