BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that public officers and public employees hold a special
position of trust as public servants, and as fiduciaries of that trust must be
held to a higher standard of accountability for criminal actions that result in
the theft of government property or services paid for with public funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW to read as follows:

A public officer or employee who is convicted of theft of any
property or service, where the property or service was government property or a
government service, or was paid for, in whole or in part, with public funds,
shall serve no less than one-third the maximum time of confinement imposed
within the sentence range for the offense based on the offender score, and
without the possibility of release until such minimum time has been served.

---
END ---