BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. For
the purposes of this chapter, "department" means the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department shall establish and administer the emergency mortgage and rental
assistance program. The department shall identify the communities most
adversely affected by reductions in the aerospace industry and shall prioritize
assistance under this program to these communities. Organizations eligible to
receive grant funds for distribution under the program are those organizations
that are eligible to receive assistance through the Washington housing trust
fund. The department shall disburse the funds to eligible local organizations
as grants. The local organizations shall use the funds to make grants or loans
as specified in sections 2 through 6 of this act. If funds are disbursed as
loans, the local organization shall establish a revolving grant and loan fund
with funds received as loan repayments, and shall continue to make grants or
loans or both from funds received as loan repayments to dislocated aerospace
workers eligible under the provisions of sections 2 through 6 of this act.

(2)
The goals of the program are to:

(a)
Provide temporary emergency mortgage loans or rental assistance grants or loans
on behalf of dislocated aerospace workers who are unable to make mortgage,
property tax, or rental payments on their permanent residences and are subject
to immediate eviction for nonpayment of mortgage installments, property taxes,
or nonpayment of rent;

(b)
Prevent the dislocation of individuals and families from their permanent
residences and their communities; and

(c)
Maintain economic and social stability in communities affected by reductions in
the aerospace industry.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Emergency mortgage assistance shall be provided under the following general
guidelines:

(1)
Loans provided under the program may not exceed an amount equal to twenty-four
months of mortgage payments.

(2)
The maximum loan amount allowed under the program may not exceed twenty
thousand dollars.

(3)
Loans shall be made to applicants who meet specific income guidelines
established by the department.

(4)
Loan payments shall be made directly to the mortgage lender.

(5)
Loans shall be granted on a first-come, first-served basis.

(6)
Repayment of loans provided under the program shall be made to eligible local
organizations, and may not take more than twenty years. Funds repaid to the
program shall be used as grants or loans under the provisions of sections 2
through 6 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Emergency rental assistance shall be provided under the following general
guidelines:

(1)
Rental assistance provided under the program may be in the form of loans or
grants and may not exceed an amount equal to twenty-four months of rental
payments.

(2)
Rental assistance shall be made to applicants who meet specific income
guidelines established by the department.

(3)
Rental payments shall be made directly to the landlord.

(4)
Rental assistance shall be granted on a first-come, first-served basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. To be
eligible for assistance under the program, an applicant must:

(1)
Be unable to keep mortgage or rental payments current due to a loss of
employment, and shall be at significant risk of eviction;

(2)
Have his or her permanent residence located in an eligible community;

(3)
If requesting emergency mortgage assistance, be the owner of an equitable
interest in the permanent residence and intend to reside in the home being
financed;

(4)
Be actively seeking new employment or be enrolled in a training program
approved by the director; and

(5)
Submit an application for assistance to an organization eligible to receive
funds under section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department shall carry out the following duties:

(1)
Administer the program;

(2)
Identify organizations eligible to receive funds to implement the program;

(3)
Develop and adopt the necessary rules and procedures for implementation of the
program and for dispersal of program funds to eligible organizations;

(4)
Establish the interest rate for repayment of loans at two percent below the
market rate;

(5)
Work with lending institutions and social service providers in the eligible
communities to assure that all eligible persons are informed about the program;

(6)
Utilize federal and state programs that complement or facilitate carrying out
the program;

(7)
Ensure that local eligible organizations that dissolve or become ineligible
assign their program funds, rights to loan repayments, and loan security
instruments, to the government of the county in which the local organization is
located. If the county government accepts the program assets described in this
subsection, it shall act as a local eligible organization under the provisions
of sections 2 through 6 of this act. If the county government declines to
participate, the program assets shall revert to the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act shall constitute a chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---