BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that cost containment measures in the delivery of health
care often involve third-party payors reviewing the care delivered by
physicians or physician assistants for coverage under the terms of the
patient's insurance policy, including medical efficacy, cost-effectiveness,
quality assurance, utilization review, and similar provisions.

(2)
The utilization of persons to make operation decisions requiring evaluation of
medical review who are not licensed to provide the medical services being
reviewed in the state of Washington creates an undue risk of harm to patients
because of uncertainties regarding their training and lack of accountability to
the same authority that treating practitioners are accountable. Having
treating and reviewing physicians similarly accountable to the public and held
to the same standard of performance and ethics is in the public interest.

(3)
While reviewing physicians do not actually deliver care they make financial and
related decisions which often determine and always influence whether care will
be delivered and under what financial arrangements. Therefore, the reviewing
decision has a material effect on the delivery of health care in the state of
Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Full contractual coverage" means full coverage in accordance with
the terms of the insured's contract with the third-party payor except for the
effect of the decision regarding medical necessity or the equivalent.

(2)
"Medical necessity or the equivalent" means whether a health service
or item:

(a)
Is a clinically appropriate choice;

(b)
Has a reasonable probability of achieving the intended clinical outcome,
particularly in consideration of expected enrollee compliance with treatment
requirements; and

(c)
Is consistent with recognized professional standards of the physician or
physician assistant providing or prescribing the health care service or item.

(3)
"Operational decision" means a decision that does not require further
approval within a third-party payor to be effective for any purpose relevant to
full contractual coverage. The fact that such a decision is subject to appeal
does not mean that it is not operational.

(4)
"Third-party payor" means any third-party insuring entity, public or
private, fully insured or self-insured doing business in the state of
Washington and specifically includes, but is not limited to, any insuring
entity regulated under chapter 48.20, 48.21, 48.44, or 48.46 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Each
third-party payor that makes coverage decisions described in section 4 of this
act shall designate a medical director, who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW, to make the operational decision or assume full responsibility for
those decisions. Each third-party payor will be responsible for ensuring that
organizations acting on its behalf or at its direction will comply with this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. No
person may make an operational decision failing to provide a third-party
payor's full contractual coverage of a health care service or item based on the
medical necessity or the equivalent of the service or item provided or
prescribed by a physician or physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.57,
18.57A, 18.71, or 18.71A RCW for care delivered in the state of Washington
unless that person is licensed in the state of Washington under chapter 18.57
or 18.71 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
medical quality assurance commission and the state board of osteopathic
medicine and surgery may jointly adopt rules to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Nothing in this chapter affects the practitioner-patient relationship under
which health care is delivered. This chapter applies to the relationship
between the third-party payor and the patient.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---