BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The real and personal property owned by a for-profit organization, association,
or corporation in providing rental housing that is occupied by very low-income
households is exempt from taxation if:

(a)
The rental housing is considered federally assisted housing under RCW
59.28.020;

(b)
The federally assisted housing is subject to a rental subsidy contract or use
restrictions that will expire within two years of application for the exemption
under this section;

(c)
The owner or owners of the federally assisted housing agrees to renew the
rental subsidy contract or extend the use restrictions for the term of the
exemption under this section;

(d)
The owner or owners is in compliance with all federal or state regulatory
agreements regarding the use of the property;

(e)
The owner or owners enters into a contractual agreement with the United States
department of housing and urban development to not reduce the subsidy level to
the federally assisted housing; and

(f)
The owner or owners commit to give the right of first refusal to purchase the
property to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation that will
maintain the housing for very low-income households.

(2)
If less than seventy-five percent of the dwelling units are occupied by very
low-income households, the federally assisted housing is eligible for a partial
exemption on the real property and a total exemption of the federally assisted
housing's personal property as follows:

(a)
The partial exemption shall be allowed for each dwelling unit in the federally
assisted housing that is occupied by very low-income households.

(b)
The amount of the exemption shall be calculated by multiplying the assessed
value of the property reasonably necessary to provide the rental housing by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the number of dwelling units
occupied by very low-income households as of January 1st of the year for which
the exemption is claimed. The denominator of the fraction is the total number
of occupied dwelling units as of January 1st of the year for which the
exemption is claimed.

(3)
To be exempt under this section, the property must be used exclusively for the
purposes for which exemption is granted, except as provided in RCW 84.36.805.

(4)
The for-profit organization, association, or corporation qualifying for the
exemption under this section by providing rental housing for very low-income
households may agree to make payments to the city, county, or other political
subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by the city,
county, or political subdivision for the benefit of the rental housing.
However, these payments shall not exceed the amount last levied as the annual
tax of the city, county, or political subdivision upon the property prior to
exemption.

(5)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Federally assisted housing" has the same meaning as in RCW
59.28.020;

(b)
"Occupied dwelling unit" means a living unit that is occupied on
January 1st of the year in which the claim for exemption is submitted;

(c)
"Rental housing" means residential housing that is occupied but not
owned by very low-income households; and

(d)
"Very low-income households" means a single person, family, or
unrelated persons living together whose income is at or below fifty percent of
the median income adjusted for family size as most recently determined by the
federal department of housing and urban development for the county in which the
rental housing is located and in effect as of January 1st of the year the
application for exemption is submitted.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to taxes levied in 1999 for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---