BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The construction industry accounts for approximately six percent of the state's
work force, but accounts for over fifteen percent of all workers' compensation
claims;

(2)
Musculoskeletal injuries among construction workers are by far the most
significant source of workers' compensation claims, accounting for more than
fifty percent of workers' compensation claims in some trades;

(3)
Injuries from using wallboard, also known as sheetrock, accounts for the
majority of workers' compensation claims in some trades, such as carpentry;

(4)
There is substantial evidence that chronic injuries arising from manual
handling of wallboard are greatly underreported to the department of labor and
industries;

(5)
The most significant risk factors for musculoskeletal injuries arising from
work with wallboard are their size and weight;

(6)
Wallboard size and weight have been increasing steadily, to where it is beyond
human capacity to manually handle these boards on construction jobs; and

(7)
The forces of the free market do not incorporate the human costs to workers and
their families from injuries arising due to the material handling of wallboard
in construction work. Therefore, it is necessary to address the inequities
caused by the market through legislation and subsequent regulatory action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall adopt occupational safety and health standards that are
necessary to address the costs to workers and their families from injuries
arising from the material handling of wallboard in construction work. The
department shall also, within thirty days of the effective date of this act,
establish a working group on wallboard improvement.

(2)
The director shall appoint as members of the working group on wallboard
improvement:

(a)
A chair who has substantial technical experience in the construction industry
as an employee in a wallboard trade;

(b)
Four representatives of construction employers and four representatives of
construction employees in trades involving substantial wallboard handling;

(c)
One representative of manufacturers of wallboard products; and

(d)
Any ex officio members as are determined to be of use to the working group on
wallboard improvement.

(3)
Within sixty days of appointment to the working group on wallboard improvement,
the members shall issue recommendations to the department for size and weight
limits on wallboard, and work procedures and technologies for the manual
handling of wallboards on construction sites. The maximum size and weight
requirements governing manual handling of wallboard may not exceed the
following:

(a)
A single employee may not be required to manually handle wallboard in excess of
three feet in width and nine feet in length, or any wallboard weighing more
than fifty pounds;

(b)
Any wallboard exceeding four feet in width, nine feet in length, or
seventy-five pounds in weight shall be transported and installed using
mechanical devices;

(c)
Any installation of wallboard at heights above five feet, or any installations
on ceilings or elevated horizontal surfaces shall be put in place using
mechanical lifting devices.

(4)
The working group on wallboard improvement shall hold a minimum of one public
hearing each in western Washington, central Washington, and eastern Washington,
where industry representatives will have the opportunity to present opinions.

(5)
Members of the working group on wallboard improvement shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses and mileage in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this act, a temporary
emergency safety and health standard governing the manual handling of wallboard
shall be issued by the department. This standard shall remain in effect until
a permanent standard is issued under normal administrative procedures.

(2)
An information and training program for employers and employees in construction
addressing the hazards of manual handling of wallboard and work procedures and
technologies to prevent such hazards shall be developed and made available to
the industry within one hundred eighty days of the effective date of this act.

(3)
A permanent safety and health standard governing the manual material handling
of wallboard shall be issued as soon as it is technically and administratively
feasible, but may not be issued any later than seven hundred thirty days after
the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of twenty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of labor and industries for the purposes of obtaining the expert
services of one or more highly experienced safety and health consultants with
extensive knowledge of the construction industry to assist the working group on
wallboard improvement in its activities.

---
END ---