BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.10 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state shall create a standard electronic file
format (state transfer format) to be used for the transfer of voter
registration information between county elections departments and the office of
the secretary of state. The format must be prescribed by rule and contain at
least the following information: Voter name, address, date of birth, date of
registration, mailing address, legislative and congressional district, and
digitized signature image. Each county shall program its voter registration
system to convert this data from the county's storage format into the state
transfer format. Every county shall complete this work by January 1, 2000.
Each county may bill reasonable programming costs incurred by it to the office
of the secretary of state by June 1, 2000.

---
END ---