BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 65.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
auditor or recording officer shall show a condition on the title of any
property recorded that is dedicated as a cemetery pursuant to RCW 68.60.020
stating that property dedication.

Sec.
2. RCW
68.24.090 and 1987 c 331 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

Property
dedicated to cemetery purposes shall be held and used exclusively for cemetery
purposes, unless and until the dedication is removed from all or any part of it
by an order and decree of the superior court of the county in which the
property is situated, in a proceeding brought by the cemetery authority for
that purpose and upon notice of hearing and proof satisfactory to the court:

(1)
That no interments were made in or that all interments have been removed from
that portion of the property from which dedication is sought to be removed.

(2)
That the portion of the property from which dedication is sought to be removed
is not being used for interment of human remains.

(3) That notice of the proposed removal of dedication has been
given the (a) cemetery board, (b) the office of archaeology and
historic preservation, and (c) the county auditor of the county in which the
property is located in writing at least sixty days before filing the
proceedings in superior court.

Sec.
3. RCW
68.60.020 and 1990 c 92 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any cemetery, abandoned cemetery, historical cemetery, or
historic grave that has not been dedicated pursuant to RCW 68.24.030 and
68.24.040 shall be considered permanently dedicated and subject to RCW
68.24.070. Removal of dedication may only be made pursuant to RCW 68.24.090
and 68.24.100.

---
END ---