BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that welfare reforms have been successful in encouraging and
supporting recipients of public assistance to move into the work force. In
order to continue and enhance the successful results of welfare reform, the
legislature intends to resolve the conflicting requirements of welfare reform
to work at least twenty hours per week with the prohibition against working
more than nineteen hours per week under the state work-study financial aid
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.12 RCW to read as follows:

State reimbursement under the work-study program shall not be
limited to an average of a maximum of nineteen hours per week in the case of an
undergraduate student or twenty hours per week in the case of on-campus
graduate assistants.

---
END ---