BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
16.08.070 and 1987 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 16.08.070 through 16.08.100.

(1)
"Potentially dangerous dog" means any dog that when unprovoked: (a)
Inflicts bites on a human or a domestic animal either on public or private
property, or (b) chases or approaches a person upon the streets, sidewalks, or
any public grounds in a menacing fashion or apparent attitude of attack, or any
dog with a known propensity, tendency, or disposition to attack unprovoked, to
cause injury, or to cause injury or otherwise to threaten the safety of humans
or domestic animals.

(2)
"Dangerous dog" means any dog that ((according to the records of
the appropriate authority, (a) has inflicted)) (a) inflicts severe
injury on a human being without provocation on public or private property, or
(b) ((has killed)) kills a domestic animal without provocation
while off the owner's property, or (c) has been previously found to be
potentially dangerous, the owner having received notice of such and the dog
again aggressively bites, attacks, or endangers the safety of humans or
domestic animals.

(3)
"Severe injury" means any physical injury that results in broken
bones or disfiguring lacerations requiring multiple sutures or cosmetic surgery.

(4)
"Proper enclosure of a dangerous dog" means, while on the owner's
property, a dangerous dog shall be securely confined indoors or in a securely
enclosed and locked pen or structure, suitable to prevent the entry of young
children and designed to prevent the animal from escaping. Such pen or
structure shall have secure sides and a secure top, and shall also provide
protection from the elements for the dog.

(5)
"Animal control authority" means an entity acting alone or in concert
with other local governmental units for enforcement of the animal control laws
of the city, county, and state and the shelter and welfare of animals.

(6)
"Animal control officer" means any individual employed, contracted
with, or appointed by the animal control authority for the purpose of aiding in
the enforcement of this chapter or any other law or ordinance relating to the
licensure of animals, control of animals, or seizure and impoundment of
animals, and includes any state or local law enforcement officer or other employee
whose duties in whole or in part include assignments that involve the seizure
and impoundment of any animal.

(7)
"Owner" means any person, firm, corporation, organization, or
department possessing, harboring, keeping, having an interest in, or having control
or custody of an animal.

Sec.
2. RCW
16.08.100 and 1987 c 94 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any dangerous dog shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control
authority if the: (a) Dog is not validly registered under RCW 16.08.080; or
(b) owner does not secure the liability insurance coverage required under RCW
16.08.080; or (c) dog is not maintained in the proper enclosure; or
(d) dog is outside ((of)) the dwelling of the owner, or outside ((of))
the proper enclosure and not under the physical restraint of the
responsible person. In addition, the owner shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

(2)
If a dangerous dog of an owner with a prior conviction under this chapter
attacks or bites a person or another domestic animal, the dog's owner is guilty
of a class C felony, punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021. In addition,
the dangerous dog shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control authority,
placed in quarantine for the proper length of time, and thereafter destroyed in
an expeditious and humane manner.

(3)
The owner of any dog that aggressively attacks and causes severe injury or
death of any human, whether or not the dog has previously been declared
potentially dangerous or dangerous, shall be guilty of a class C felony
punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021. In such a prosecution, the
state has the burden of showing that the owner of the dog either knew or should
have known that the dog was potentially dangerous. In addition, the dog
shall be immediately confiscated by an animal control authority, placed in
quarantine for the proper length of time, and thereafter destroyed in an
expeditious and humane manner.

(4) Any person entering a dog in a dog fight is guilty of a class C
felony punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

---
END ---