BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.12.070 and 1993 c 404 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of labor and industries may charge fees to awarding agencies on
public works for the approval of statements of intent to pay prevailing wages
and the certification of affidavits of wages paid. The department may also
charge fees to persons or organizations requesting the arbitration of disputes
under RCW 39.12.060. The amount of the fees shall be established by rules
adopted by the department under the procedures in the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The fees shall apply to all approvals, certifications,
and arbitration requests made after the effective date of the rules. All fees
shall be deposited in the public works administration account. ((On the
fifteenth day of the first month of each quarterly period, an amount equalling
thirty percent of the revenues received into the public works administration
account shall be transferred into the general fund.)) The department may
refuse to arbitrate for contractors, subcontractors, persons, or organizations
which have not paid the proper fees. The department may, if necessary, request
the attorney general to take legal action to collect delinquent fees.

The
department shall set the fees permitted by this section at a level that
generates revenue that is as near as practicable to the amount of the
appropriation to administer this chapter, including, but not limited to, the
performance of adequate wage surveys, and to investigate and enforce all
alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not limited to, incorrect
statements of intent to pay prevailing wage, incorrect certificates of
affidavits of wages paid, and wage claims, as provided for in this chapter and
chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW. However, the fees charged for the approval of
statements of intent to pay prevailing wages and the certification of
affidavits of wages paid shall be no greater than twenty-five dollars.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.12.080 and 1993 c 404 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
public works administration account is created in the state treasury. The
department of labor and industries shall deposit in the account all moneys
received from fees collected under RCW 39.12.070. Appropriations from the
account((, not including moneys transferred to the general fund pursuant to
RCW 39.12.070,)) may be made only for the purposes of administration of
this chapter, including, but not limited to, the performance of adequate wage
surveys, and for the investigation and enforcement of all alleged violations of
this chapter as provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW.

---
END ---