BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.32.045 and 1996 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the taxes imposed
under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW, along with reports
and returns on forms prescribed by the department, are due monthly within
twenty-five days after the end of the month in which the taxable activities
occur.

(2)
The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of taxpayers from
the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the return to cover other
longer reporting periods, but in no event may returns be filed for a period
greater than one year. For these taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before
the last day of the month next succeeding the end of the period covered by the
return.

(3)
The department of revenue may implement through rule a procedure for the
remittance of estimated tax if, after review and examination of the advantages
and disadvantages to the department and to taxpayers, the department finds that
the advantages outweigh the disadvantages and that implementation would be an
improvement over the existing reporting system. As part of the review and
examination, the department shall seek input from taxpayers on this issue and
shall consult with other states regarding experience with estimated tax. The
department must make a "yes" or "no" decision regarding
whether it will implement an estimated tax procedure by December 1, 1999, and
shall in writing inform the fiscal committees of the senate and the house of
representatives of the decision to proceed or not proceed with a rule.

(4)
The department of revenue may also require verified annual returns from any
taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as it may deem necessary to
correctly determine tax liability.

(((4)))
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
department may relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if the
following conditions are met:

(a)
The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the
business, from all business activities taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less
than twenty-four thousand dollars per year;

(b)
The person's gross income of the business from all activities taxable under
chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand dollars per year; and

(c)
The person is not required to collect or pay to the department of revenue any
other tax or fee which the department is authorized to collect.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature finds that retailers have an important role in the state's tax
system by collecting sales tax from consumers and remitting it to the state.
Changes to the tax system, such as rate or exemption changes place an
accounting and organizational burden on these businesses. In recognition of
that burden, it is the intent of the legislature to limit changes to state and
local sales and use tax to once a year. Additionally, it is the intent of the
legislature to require the local government enacting or revising a tax to give
advance notice to the department of revenue of any such change so that the
department may provide adequate notice to retailers of pending changes.
Sections 3 through 6 of this act are intended to minimize the retailer computer
reprogramming costs that result from changes in the tax.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 35.58 RCW to read as follows:

In
order to lessen the disruption on sellers, ordinances enacting or revising a
sales and use tax under the authority of this chapter shall require ordinances
to take effect October 1st. Ordinances must be enacted no later than July 1st
to take effect the following October 1st. The department of revenue must
receive notice of any changes to taxes authorized under this chapter no later
than fifteen days after the date of enactment of such changes. The department
of revenue must notify the sellers responsible for collecting the tax of the
change not less than sixty days prior to the effective date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

In
order to lessen the disruption on sellers, legislation enacting or revising a
sales and use tax under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW shall provide that
the act take effect October 1st. The department of revenue must notify the
sellers responsible for collecting the tax of the change not less than sixty
days prior to the effective date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW to read as follows:

In
order to lessen the disruption on sellers, ordinances enacting or revising a
sales and use tax under the authority of this chapter shall require ordinances
to take effect October 1st. Ordinances must be enacted no later than July 1st
to take effect the following October 1st. The department of revenue must
receive notice of any changes to taxes authorized under this chapter no later
than fifteen days after the date of enactment of such changes. The department
of revenue must notify the sellers responsible for collecting the tax of the
change not less than sixty days prior to the effective date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

In order to lessen the disruption on sellers, ordinances enacting
or revising a sales and use tax under the authority of this chapter shall
require ordinances to take effect October 1st. Ordinances must be enacted no later
than July 1st to take effect the following October 1st. The department of
revenue must receive notice of any changes to taxes authorized under this
chapter no later than fifteen days after the date of enactment of such
changes. The department of revenue must notify the sellers responsible for
collecting the tax of the change not less than sixty days prior to the
effective date.

---
END ---