BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

ARTICLE
1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101.
SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the uniform child custody
jurisdiction and enforcement act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Abandoned" means left without provision for reasonable and necessary
care or supervision.

(2)
"Child" means an individual who has not attained eighteen years of
age.

(3)
"Child custody determination" means a judgment, decree, or other
order of a court providing for the legal custody, physical custody, or
visitation with respect to a child. The term includes a permanent, temporary,
initial, and modification order. The term does not include an order relating
to child support or other monetary obligation of an individual.

(4)
"Child custody proceeding" means a proceeding in which legal custody,
physical custody, or visitation with respect to a child is an issue. The term
includes a proceeding for dissolution, divorce, separation, neglect, abuse,
dependency, guardianship, paternity, termination of parental rights, and
protection from domestic violence, in which the issue may appear. The term
does not include a proceeding involving juvenile delinquency, contractual
emancipation, or enforcement under Article 3.

(5)
"Commencement" means the filing of the first pleading in a
proceeding.

(6)
"Court" means an entity authorized under the law of a state to
establish, enforce, or modify a child custody determination.

(7)
"Home state" means the state in which a child lived with a parent or
a person acting as a parent for at least six consecutive months immediately
before the commencement of a child custody proceeding. In the case of a child
less than six months of age, the term means the state in which the child lived
from birth with a parent or person acting as a parent. A period of temporary
absence of a parent or person acting as a parent is part of the period.

(8)
"Initial determination" means the first child custody determination
concerning a particular child.

(9)
"Issuing court" means the court that makes a child custody
determination for which enforcement is sought under this chapter.

(10)
"Issuing state" means the state in which a child custody
determination is made.

(11)
"Modification" means a child custody determination that changes,
replaces, supersedes, or is otherwise made after a previous determination
concerning the same child, whether or not it is made by the court that made the
previous determination.

(12)
"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture,
government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, public
corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(13)
"Person acting as a parent" means a person, other than a parent, who:

(a)
Has physical custody of the child or has had physical custody for a period of
six consecutive months, including any temporary absence, within one year
immediately before the commencement of a child custody proceeding; and

(b)
Has been awarded legal custody by a court or claims a right to legal custody
under the law of this state.

(14)
"Physical custody" means the physical care and supervision of a
child.

(15)
"State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia,
Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular
possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(16)
"Tribe" means an Indian tribe or band, or Alaskan Native village,
that is recognized by federal law or formally acknowledged by a state.

(17)
"Warrant" means an order issued by a court authorizing law enforcement
officers to take physical custody of a child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103.
PROCEEDINGS GOVERNED BY OTHER LAW. This chapter does not govern an adoption
proceeding or a proceeding pertaining to the authorization of emergency medical
care for a child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104.
APPLICATION TO INDIAN TRIBES. (1) A child custody proceeding that pertains to
an Indian child as defined in the federal Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C.
Sec. 1901 et seq., is not subject to this chapter to the extent that it is
governed by the federal Indian child welfare act.

(2)
A court of this state shall treat a tribe as if it were a state of the United
States for the purpose of applying Articles 1 and 2.

(3)
A child custody determination made by a tribe under factual circumstances in
substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this chapter must
be recognized and enforced under Article 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105.
INTERNATIONAL APPLICATION OF CHAPTER. (1) A court of this state shall treat a
foreign country as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose of
applying Articles 1 and 2.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a child custody
determination made in a foreign country under factual circumstances in
substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this chapter must
be recognized and enforced under Article 3.

(3)
A court of this state need not apply this chapter if the child custody law of a
foreign country violates fundamental principles of human rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106.
EFFECT OF CHILD CUSTODY DETERMINATION. A child custody determination made by a
court of this state that had jurisdiction under this chapter binds all persons
who have been served in accordance with the laws of this state or notified in
accordance with section 108 of this act or who have submitted to the
jurisdiction of the court, and who have been given an opportunity to be heard.
As to those persons, the determination is conclusive as to all decided issues
of law and fact except to the extent the determination is modified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107.
PRIORITY. If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this
chapter is raised in a child custody proceeding, the question, upon request of
a party, must be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108.
NOTICE TO PERSONS OUTSIDE STATE. (1) Notice required for the exercise of
jurisdiction when a person is outside this state may be given in a manner
prescribed by the law of this state for service of process or by the law of the
state in which the service is made. Notice must be given in a manner
reasonably calculated to give actual notice but may be by publication if other
means are not effective.

(2)
Proof of service may be made in the manner prescribed by the law of this state
or by the law of the state in which the service is made.

(3)
Notice is not required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a
person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109.
APPEARANCE AND LIMITED IMMUNITY. (1) A party to a child custody proceeding,
including a modification proceeding, or a petitioner or respondent in a
proceeding to enforce or register a child custody determination, is not subject
to personal jurisdiction in this state for another proceeding or purpose solely
by reason of having participated, or of having been physically present for the
purpose of participating, in the proceeding.

(2)
A person who is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state on a basis other
than physical presence is not immune from service of process in this state. A
party present in this state who is subject to the jurisdiction of another state
is not immune from service of process allowable under the laws of that state.

(3)
The immunity granted by subsection (1) of this section does not extend to civil
litigation based on acts unrelated to the participation in a proceeding under
this chapter committed by an individual while present in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110.
COMMUNICATION BETWEEN COURTS. (1) A court of this state may communicate with a
court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter.

(2)
The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. If the
parties are not able to participate in the communication, they must be given
the opportunity to present facts and legal arguments before a decision on
jurisdiction is made.

(3)
Communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and
similar matters may occur without informing the parties. A record need not be
made of the communication.

(4)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a record must
be made of a communication under this section. The parties must be informed
promptly of the communication and granted access to the record.

(5)
For the purposes of this section, "record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111.
TAKING TESTIMONY IN ANOTHER STATE. (1) In addition to other procedures
available to a party, a party to a child custody proceeding may offer testimony
of witnesses who are located in another state, including testimony of the
parties and the child, by deposition or other means allowable in this state for
testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that
the testimony of a person be taken in another state and may prescribe the
manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is taken.

(2)
A court of this state may permit an individual residing in another state to be
deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic
means before a designated court or at another location in that state. A court
of this state shall cooperate with courts of other states in designating an
appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

(3)
Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this state by
technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded
from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 112.
COOPERATION BETWEEN COURTS‑-PRESERVATION OF RECORDS. (1) A court of this
state may request the appropriate court of another state to:

(a)
Hold an evidentiary hearing;

(b)
Order a person to produce or give evidence pursuant to procedures of that
state;

(c)
Order that an evaluation be made with respect to the custody of a child involved
in a pending proceeding;

(d)
Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript of the
record of the hearing, the evidence otherwise presented, and any evaluation
prepared in compliance with the request; and

(e)
Order a party to a child custody proceeding or any person having physical
custody of the child to appear in the proceeding with or without the child.

(2)
Upon request of a court of another state, a court of this state may hold a
hearing or enter an order described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Travel and other necessary and reasonable expenses incurred under subsections
(1) and (2) of this section may be assessed against the parties according to
the law of this state.

(4)
A court of this state shall preserve the pleadings, orders, decrees, records of
hearings, evaluations, and other pertinent records with respect to a child
custody proceeding until the child attains eighteen years of age. Upon
appropriate request by a court or law enforcement official of another state,
the court shall forward a certified copy of those records.

ARTICLE
2

JURISDICTION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201.
INITIAL CHILD CUSTODY JURISDICTION. (1) Except as otherwise provided in
section 204 of this act, a court of this state has jurisdiction to make an
initial child custody determination only if:

(a)
This state is the home state of the child on the date of the commencement of
the proceeding, or was the home state of the child within six months before the
commencement of the proceeding and the child is absent from this state but a
parent or person acting as a parent continues to live in this state;

(b)
A court of another state does not have jurisdiction under (a) of this
subsection, or a court of the home state of the child has declined to exercise
jurisdiction on the ground that this state is the more appropriate forum under
section 207 or 208 of this act, and:

(i)
The child and the child's parents, or the child and at least one parent or a
person acting as a parent, have a significant connection with this state other
than mere physical presence; and

(ii)
Substantial evidence is available in this state concerning the child's care,
protection, training, and personal relationships;

(c)
All courts having jurisdiction under (a) or (b) of this subsection have
declined to exercise jurisdiction on the ground that a court of this state is
the more appropriate forum to determine the custody of the child under section
207 or 208 of this act; or

(d)
No court of any other state would have jurisdiction under the criteria
specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section is the exclusive jurisdictional basis for making
a child custody determination by a court of this state.

(3)
Physical presence of, or personal jurisdiction over, a party or a child is not
necessary or sufficient to make a child custody determination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. EXCLUSIVE,
CONTINUING JURISDICTION. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of
this act, a court of this state that has made a child custody determination
consistent with section 201 or 203 of this act has exclusive, continuing
jurisdiction over the determination until:

(a)
A court of this state determines that neither the child, the child's parents,
and any person acting as a parent do not have a significant connection with
this state and that substantial evidence is no longer available in this state concerning
the child's care, protection, training, and personal relationships; or

(b)
A court of this state or a court of another state determines that the child,
the child's parents, and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside
in this state.

(2)
A court of this state that has made a child custody determination and does not
have exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under this section may modify that
determination only if it has jurisdiction to make an initial determination
under section 201 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203.
JURISDICTION TO MODIFY DETERMINATION. Except as otherwise provided in section
204 of this act, a court of this state may not modify a child custody
determination made by a court of another state unless a court of this state has
jurisdiction to make an initial determination under section 201(1) (a) or (b)
of this act and:

(1)
The court of the other state determines it no longer has exclusive, continuing
jurisdiction under section 202 of this act or that a court of this state would
be a more convenient forum under section 207 of this act; or

(2)
A court of this state or a court of the other state determines that the child,
the child's parents, and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside
in the other state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204.
TEMPORARY EMERGENCY JURISDICTION. (1) A court of this state has temporary
emergency jurisdiction if the child is present in this state and the child has
been abandoned or it is necessary in an emergency to protect the child because
the child, or a sibling or parent of the child, is subjected to or threatened
with mistreatment or abuse.

(2)
If there is no previous child custody determination that is entitled to be
enforced under this chapter and a child custody proceeding has not been
commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under sections 201 through
203 of this act, a child custody determination made under this section remains
in effect until an order is obtained from a court of a state having
jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act. If a child custody
proceeding has not been or is not commenced in a court of a state having
jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act, a child custody
determination made under this section becomes a final determination, if it so
provides and this state becomes the home state of the child.

(3)
If there is a previous child custody determination that is entitled to be
enforced under this chapter, or a child custody proceeding has been commenced
in a court of a state having jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of
this act, any order issued by a court of this state under this section must
specify in the order a period that the court considers adequate to allow the
person seeking an order to obtain an order from the state having jurisdiction
under sections 201 through 203 of this act. The order issued in this state
remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other state within the
period specified or the period expires.

(4)
A court of this state that has been asked to make a child custody determination
under this section, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has
been commenced in, or a child custody determination has been made by, a court
of a state having jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act,
shall immediately communicate with the other court. A court of this state that
is exercising jurisdiction pursuant to sections 201 through 203 of this act,
upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in, or a
child custody determination has been made by, a court of another state under a
statute similar to this section shall immediately communicate with the court of
that state to resolve the emergency, protect the safety of the parties and the
child, and determine a period for the duration of the temporary order.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205.
NOTICE‑-OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD‑-JOINDER. (1) Before a child
custody determination is made under this chapter, notice and an opportunity to
be heard in accordance with the standards of section 108 of this act must be
given to all persons entitled to notice under the law of this state as in child
custody proceedings between residents of this state, any parent whose parental
rights have not been previously terminated, and any person having physical
custody of the child.

(2)
This chapter does not govern the enforceability of a child custody
determination made without notice or an opportunity to be heard.

(3)
The obligation to join a party and the right to intervene as a party in a child
custody proceeding under this chapter are governed by the law of this state as
in child custody proceedings between residents of this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206.
SIMULTANEOUS PROCEEDINGS. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of
this act, a court of this state may not exercise its jurisdiction under this
article if, at the time of the commencement of the proceeding, a proceeding
concerning the custody of the child has been commenced in a court of another
state having jurisdiction substantially in conformity with this chapter, unless
the proceeding has been terminated or is stayed by the court of the other state
because a court of this state is a more convenient forum under section 207 of
this act.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in section 204 of this act, a court of this state,
before hearing a child custody proceeding, shall examine the court documents
and other information supplied by the parties pursuant to section 209 of this
act. If the court determines that a child custody proceeding has been
commenced in a court in another state having jurisdiction substantially in
accordance with this chapter, the court of this state shall stay its proceeding
and communicate with the court of the other state. If the court of the state
having jurisdiction substantially in accordance with this chapter does not
determine that the court of this state is a more appropriate forum, the court
of this state shall dismiss the proceeding.

(3)
In a proceeding to modify a child custody determination, a court of this state
shall determine whether a proceeding to enforce the determination has been
commenced in another state. If a proceeding to enforce a child custody
determination has been commenced in another state, the court may:

(a)
Stay the proceeding for modification pending the entry of an order of a court
of the other state enforcing, staying, denying, or dismissing the proceeding
for enforcement;

(b)
Enjoin the parties from continuing with the proceeding for enforcement; or

(c)
Proceed with the modification under conditions it considers appropriate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207.
INCONVENIENT FORUM. (1) A court of this state which has jurisdiction under
this chapter to make a child custody determination may decline to exercise its
jurisdiction at any time if it determines that it is an inconvenient forum
under the circumstances and that a court of another state is a more appropriate
forum. The issue of inconvenient forum may be raised upon motion of a party,
the court's own motion, or request of another court.

(2)
Before determining whether it is an inconvenient forum, a court of this state
shall consider whether it is appropriate for a court of another state to
exercise jurisdiction. For this purpose, the court shall allow the parties to
submit information and shall consider all relevant factors, including:

(a)
Whether domestic violence has occurred and is likely to continue in the future
and which state could best protect the parties and the child;

(b)
The length of time the child has resided outside this state;

(c)
The distance between the court in this state and the court in the state that
would assume jurisdiction;

(d)
The relative financial circumstances of the parties;

(e)
Any agreement of the parties as to which state should assume jurisdiction;

(f)
The nature and location of the evidence required to resolve the pending
litigation, including testimony of the child;

(g)
The ability of the court of each state to decide the issue expeditiously and
the procedures necessary to present the evidence; and

(h)
The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the
pending litigation.

(3)
If a court of this state determines that it is an inconvenient forum and that a
court of another state is a more appropriate forum, it shall stay the
proceedings upon condition that a child custody proceeding be promptly
commenced in another designated state and may impose any other condition the
court considers just and proper.

(4)
A court of this state may decline to exercise its jurisdiction under this
chapter if a child custody determination is incidental to an action for
dissolution or another proceeding while still retaining jurisdiction over the
dissolution or other proceeding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208.
JURISDICTION DECLINED BY REASON OF CONDUCT. (1) Except as otherwise provided
in section 204 of this act or by other law of this state, if a court of this
state has jurisdiction under this chapter because a person seeking to invoke
its jurisdiction has engaged in unjustifiable conduct, the court shall decline
to exercise its jurisdiction unless:

(a)
The parents and all persons acting as parents have acquiesced in the exercise
of jurisdiction;

(b)
A court of the state otherwise having jurisdiction under sections 201 through
203 of this act determines that this state is a more appropriate forum under
section 207 of this act; or

(c)
No court of any other state would have jurisdiction under the criteria
specified in sections 201 through 203 of this act.

(2)
If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, it may fashion an appropriate remedy to ensure
the safety of the child and prevent a repetition of the unjustifiable conduct,
including staying the proceeding until a child custody proceeding is commenced
in a court having jurisdiction under sections 201 through 203 of this act.

(3)
If a court dismisses a petition or stays a proceeding because it declines to
exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, it shall
assess against the party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction necessary and
reasonable expenses including costs, communication expenses, attorneys' fees,
investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care
during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees are
sought establishes that the assessment would be clearly inappropriate. The
court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against this state unless
authorized by law other than this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209.
INFORMATION TO BE SUBMITTED TO COURT. (1) Subject to laws providing for the
confidentiality of procedures, addresses, and other identifying information, in
a child custody proceeding, each party, in its first pleading or in an attached
affidavit, shall give information, if reasonably ascertainable, under oath as
to the child's present address or whereabouts, the places where the child has
lived during the last five years, and the names and present addresses of the
persons with whom the child has lived during that period. The pleading or
affidavit must state whether the party:

(a)
Has participated, as a party or witness or in any other capacity, in any other
proceeding concerning the custody of or visitation with the child and, if so,
identify the court, the case number, and the date of the child custody
determination, if any;

(b)
Knows of any proceeding that could affect the current proceeding, including
proceedings for enforcement and proceedings relating to domestic violence,
protective orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so,
identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding; and

(c)
Knows the names and addresses of any person not a party to the proceeding who
has physical custody of the child or claims rights of legal custody or physical
custody of, or visitation with, the child and, if so, the names and addresses
of those persons.

(2)
If the information required by subsection (1) of this section is not furnished,
the court, upon motion of a party or its own motion, may stay the proceeding
until the information is furnished.

(3)
If the declaration as to any of the items described in subsection (1)(a)
through (c) of this section is in the affirmative, the declarant shall give
additional information under oath as required by the court. The court may
examine the parties under oath as to details of the information furnished and
other matters pertinent to the court's jurisdiction and the disposition of the
case.

(4)
Each party has a continuing duty to inform the court of any proceeding in this
or any other state that could affect the current proceeding.

(5)
If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health,
safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of
identifying information, the information must be sealed and may not be
disclosed to the other party or the public unless the court orders the
disclosure to be made after a hearing in which the court takes into
consideration the health, safety, or liberty of the party or child and
determines that the disclosure is in the interest of justice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210.
APPEARANCE OF PARTIES AND CHILD. (1) In a child custody proceeding in this
state, the court may order a party to the proceeding who is in this state to
appear before the court in person with or without the child. The court may order
any person who is in this state and who has physical custody or control of the
child to appear in person with the child.

(2)
If a party to a child custody proceeding whose presence is desired by the court
is outside this state, the court may order that a notice given pursuant to
section 108 of this act include a statement directing the party to appear in
person with or without the child and informing the party that failure to appear
may result in a decision adverse to the party.

(3)
The court may enter any orders necessary to ensure the safety of the child and
of any person ordered to appear under this section.

(4)
If a party to a child custody proceeding who is outside this state is directed
to appear under subsection (2) of this section or desires to appear personally
before the court with or without the child, the court may require another party
to pay reasonable and necessary travel and other expenses of the party so
appearing and of the child.

ARTICLE
3

ENFORCEMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this article,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Petitioner" means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for
return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of
International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

(2)
"Respondent" means a person against whom a proceeding has been
commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague
Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement
of a child custody determination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302.
ENFORCEMENT UNDER HAGUE CONVENTION. Under this article a court of this state
may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the Hague
Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction as if it were
a child custody determination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. DUTY
TO ENFORCE. (1) A court of this state shall recognize and enforce a child
custody determination of a court of another state if the latter court exercised
jurisdiction in substantial conformity with this chapter or the determination
was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of
this chapter and the determination has not been modified in accordance with
this chapter.

(2)
A court of this state may use any remedy available under other law of this
state to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another
state. The remedies provided in this article are cumulative and do not affect
the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody determination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304.
TEMPORARY VISITATION. (1) A court of this state that does not have
jurisdiction to modify a child custody determination may issue a temporary
order enforcing:

(a)
A visitation schedule made by a court of another state; or

(b)
The visitation provisions of a child custody determination of another state
that does not provide for a specific visitation schedule.

(2)
If a court of this state makes an order under subsection (1)(b) of this
section, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to
allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under
the criteria specified in Article 2. The order remains in effect until an
order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305.
REGISTRATION OF CHILD CUSTODY DETERMINATION. (1) A child custody determination
issued by a court of another state may be registered in this state, with or
without a simultaneous request for enforcement, by sending to the appropriate
court in this state:

(a)
A letter or other document requesting registration;

(b)
Two copies, including one certified copy, of the determination sought to be
registered, and a statement under penalty of perjury that to the best of the
knowledge and belief of the person seeking registration the order has not been
modified; and

(c)
Except as otherwise provided in section 209 of this act, the name and address
of the person seeking registration and any parent or person acting as a parent
who has been awarded custody or visitation in the child custody determination
sought to be registered.

(2)
On receipt of the documents required by subsection (1) of this section, the
registering court shall:

(a)
Cause the determination to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one
copy of any accompanying documents and information, regardless of their form;
and

(b)
Serve notice upon the persons named pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this
section and provide them with an opportunity to contest the registration in
accordance with this section.

(3)
The notice required by subsection (2)(b) of this section must state that:

(a)
A registered determination is enforceable as of the date of the registration in
the same manner as a determination issued by a court of this state;

(b)
A hearing to contest the validity of the registered determination must be
requested within twenty days after service of notice; and

(c)
Failure to contest the registration will result in confirmation of the child
custody determination and preclude further contest of that determination with
respect to any matter that could have been asserted.

(4)
A person seeking to contest the validity of a registered order must request a
hearing within twenty days after service of the notice. At that hearing, the
court shall confirm the registered order unless the person contesting
registration establishes that:

(a)
The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under Article 2;

(b)
The child custody determination sought to be registered has been vacated,
stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2; or

(c)
The person contesting registration was entitled to notice, but notice was not
given in accordance with the standards of section 108 of this act, in the
proceedings before the court that issued the order for which registration is
sought.

(5)
If a timely request for a hearing to contest the validity of the registration
is not made, the registration is confirmed as a matter of law and the person
requesting registration and all persons served must be notified of the
confirmation.

(6)
Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice
and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter
that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306.
ENFORCEMENT OF REGISTERED DETERMINATION. (1) A court of this state may grant
any relief normally available under the law of this state to enforce a
registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

(2)
A court of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, except
in accordance with Article 2, a registered child custody determination of a
court of another state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307.
SIMULTANEOUS PROCEEDINGS. If a proceeding for enforcement under this article
is commenced in a court of this state and the court determines that a
proceeding to modify the determination is pending in a court of another state
having jurisdiction to modify the determination under Article 2, the enforcing
court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding
for enforcement continues unless the enforcing court, after consultation with
the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308.
EXPEDITED ENFORCEMENT OF CHILD CUSTODY DETERMINATION. (1) A petition under
this article must be verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be
enforced and of any order confirming registration must be attached to the
petition. A copy of a certified copy of an order may be attached instead of
the original.

(2)
A petition for enforcement of a child custody determination must state:

(a)
Whether the court that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional
basis it relied upon in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

(b)
Whether the determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated,
stayed, or modified by a court whose decision must be enforced under this
chapter and, if so, identify the court, the case number, and the nature of the
proceeding;

(c)
Whether any proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current
proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective
orders, termination of parental rights, and adoptions and, if so, identify the
court, the case number, and the nature of the proceeding;

(d)
The present physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

(e)
Whether relief in addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and
attorneys' fees is sought, including a request for assistance from law
enforcement officials and, if so, the relief sought; and

(f)
If the child custody determination has been registered and confirmed under
section 305 of this act, the date and place of registration.

(3)
Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall issue an order directing the
respondent to appear in person with or without the child at a hearing and may
enter any order necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child.
The hearing must be held on the next judicial day after service of the order
unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold the
hearing on the first judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of
hearing at the request of the petitioner.

(4)
An order issued under subsection (3) of this section must state the time and
place of the hearing and advise the respondent that at the hearing the court
will order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child
and the payment of fees, costs, and expenses under section 312 of this act, and
may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate,
unless the respondent appears and establishes that:

(a)
The child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under
section 305 of this act and that:

(i)
The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under Article 2;

(ii)
The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been
vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under
Article 2;

(iii)
The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance
with the standards of section 108 of this act, in the proceedings before the
court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

(b)
The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered
and confirmed under section 304 of this act, but has been vacated, stayed, or
modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309.
SERVICE OF PETITION AND ORDER. Except as otherwise provided in section 311 of
this act, the petition and order must be served, by any method authorized by
the law of this state, upon the respondent and any person who has physical
custody of the child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 310.
HEARING AND ORDER. (1) Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order
pursuant to section 204 of this act, upon a finding that a petitioner is
entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that
the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the
respondent establishes that:

(a)
The child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under
section 305 of this act and that:

(i)
The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under Article 2;

(ii)
The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been
vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so
under Article 2; or

(iii)
The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance
with the standards of section 108 of this act, in the proceedings before the
court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or

(b)
The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered
and confirmed under section 305 of this act but has been vacated, stayed, or
modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under Article 2.

(2)
The court shall award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under section
312 of this act and may grant additional relief, including a request for the
assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine
whether additional relief is appropriate.

(3)
If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony
may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the
refusal.

(4)
A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense
of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child
may not be invoked in a proceeding under this article.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 311.
WARRANT TO TAKE PHYSICAL CUSTODY OF CHILD. (1) Upon the filing of a petition
seeking enforcement of a child custody determination, the petitioner may file a
verified application for the issuance of a warrant to take physical custody of
the child if the child is immediately likely to suffer serious physical harm or
be removed from this state.

(2)
If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that
the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed
from this state, it may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child.
The petition must be heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is
executed unless that date is impossible. In that event, the court shall hold
the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The application for the
warrant must include the statements required by section 308(2) of this act.

(3)
A warrant to take physical custody of a child must:

(a)
Recite the facts upon which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or
removal from the jurisdiction is based;

(b)
Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child
immediately; and

(c)
Provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.

(4)
The respondent must be served with the petition, warrant, and order immediately
after the child is taken into physical custody.

(5)
A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this
state. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or
other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize
law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of
the child. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may
authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

(6)
The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the
appearance of the child and the child's custodian.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 312.
COSTS, FEES, AND EXPENSES. (1) The court shall award the prevailing party,
including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf
of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorneys' fees,
investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care
during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or
expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

(2)
The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless
authorized by law other than this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 313.
RECOGNITION AND ENFORCEMENT. A court of this state shall accord full faith and
credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this chapter
that enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless
the order has been vacated, stayed, or modified by a court having jurisdiction
to do so under Article 2.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 314.
APPEALS. An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this
article in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil
cases. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under section 204
of this act, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child
custody determination pending appeal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 315. ROLE
OF PROSECUTOR. (1) In a case arising under this chapter or involving the Hague
Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the
prosecutor may take any lawful action, including resorting to a proceeding
under this article or any other available civil proceeding to locate a child,
obtain the return of a child, or enforce a child custody determination if there
is:

(a)
An existing child custody determination;

(b)
A request to do so from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

(c)
A reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or

(d)
A reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in
violation of the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child
Abduction.

(2)
A prosecutor acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and may not
represent any party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 316. ROLE
OF LAW ENFORCEMENT. At the request of a prosecutor acting under section 315 of
this act, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably
necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a prosecutor with
responsibilities under section 315 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 317. COSTS
AND EXPENSES. If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may
assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the
prosecutor and law enforcement officers under section 315 or 316 of this act.

ARTICLE
4

MISCELLANEOUS
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401.
APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION. In applying and construing this chapter,
consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with
respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402.
SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of this act or its application to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
26.27.010 and 1979 c 98 s 1;

(2) RCW
26.27.020 and 1979 c 98 s 2;

(3) RCW
26.27.030 and 1979 c 98 s 3;

(4) RCW
26.27.040 and 1979 c 98 s 4;

(5) RCW
26.27.050 and 1979 c 98 s 5;

(6) RCW
26.27.060 and 1979 c 98 s 6;

(7) RCW
26.27.070 and 1979 c 98 s 7;

(8) RCW
26.27.080 and 1979 c 98 s 8;

(9) RCW
26.27.090 and 1979 c 98 s 9;

(10) RCW
26.27.100 and 1979 c 98 s 10;

(11) RCW
26.27.110 and 1979 c 98 s 11;

(12) RCW
26.27.120 and 1979 c 98 s 12;

(13) RCW
26.27.130 and 1979 c 98 s 13;

(14) RCW
26.27.140 and 1979 c 98 s 14;

(15) RCW
26.27.150 and 1979 c 98 s 15;

(16) RCW
26.27.160 and 1984 c 128 s 7 & 1979 c 98 s 16;

(17) RCW 26.27.170 and
1979 c 98 s 17;

(18) RCW
26.27.180 and 1979 c 98 s 18;

(19) RCW
26.27.190 and 1979 c 98 s 19;

(20) RCW
26.27.200 and 1979 c 98 s 20;

(21) RCW
26.27.210 and 1979 c 98 s 21;

(22) RCW
26.27.220 and 1979 c 98 s 22;

(23) RCW
26.27.230 and 1979 c 98 s 23;

(24) RCW
26.27.900 and 1979 c 98 s 24;

(25) RCW
26.27.910 and 1979 c 98 s 25;

(26) RCW
26.27.920 and 1979 c 98 s 26; and

(27) RCW
26.27.930 and 1979 c 98 s 27.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 404.
TRANSITIONAL PROVISION. A motion or other request for relief made in a child
custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination that was
commenced before the effective date of this section is governed by the law in
effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405.
CAPTIONS, ARTICLE DESIGNATIONS, AND ARTICLE HEADINGS NOT LAW. Captions,
article designations, and article headings used in this chapter are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 406.
Sections 101 through 112, 201 through 210, 301 through 317, 401, 404, and 405
of this act are each added to chapter 26.27 RCW.

---
END ---