BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that current processes for the siting and operation of major
regional public facilities often fail to adequately address regional and
localized impacts and benefits of such facilities. Throughout the state there
are proposals for siting major public facilities in which surrounding
neighborhoods and communities will be disproportionately impacted while the
benefits of the facility are provided to the larger region or to the entire
state. These facilities include major transportation facilities such as
highways, bridges, airports, and rail lines, and other nontransportation
facilities such as prisons and landfills. The legislature also finds that
although the growth management act provides procedures for establishing
county-wide policies for coordinated planning of such facilities, those
procedures do not include all public entities that provide such facilities and
do not provide sufficient guidance to local jurisdictions to ensure
consideration and mitigation of impacts to surrounding communities and
participation in siting processes by those communities.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to ensure that these considerations are
incorporated into the county-wide planning policies required under the growth
management act, and to provide sufficient authority so that siting decisions
and mitigation measures adopted through using such policies may be fully
implemented.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use
plan.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial
production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary,
vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed,
Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term
commercial significance for agricultural production.

(3)
"City" means any city or town, including a code city.

(4)
"Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or
"plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of
the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(5)
"Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a)
Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for
potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently
flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7)
"Development regulations" or "regulation" means the controls
placed on development or land use activities by a county or city, including,
but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances, shoreline
master programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances,
subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any
amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to
approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though
the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative
body of the county or city.

(8)
"Essential public facilities" are those public facilities, and
their expansion, that are typically difficult to site, and include: (a)
"Local essential public facilities" planned for the primary purpose
of serving the residents of the jurisdiction in which the facilities are
planned to be located, and (b) "regional or state-wide essential public
facilities," which include airports, state education facilities, state or
regional transportation facilities, sewage treatment facilities, solid waste
handling facilities, and additional facilities that may be defined in a
county-wide planning policy developed pursuant to RCW 36.70A.210.
"Essential public facilities" do not include facilities whose siting
is governed by chapter 80.50 or 70.105 RCW.

(9)
"Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and
practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to
the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has
long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is
primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production
on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production,
the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to
urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(((9)))
(10) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because
of their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological
events, are not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial
development consistent with public health or safety concerns.

(((10)))
(11) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing
capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term
commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to
population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(((11)))
(12) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic
substances.

(((12)))
(13) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, airports,
bridges, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks
and recreational facilities, ((and)) schools, correctional
facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and in-patient facilities.

(((13)))
(14) "Public services" include fire protection and
suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation,
environmental protection, and other governmental services.

(((14)))
(15) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and
development established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive
plan:

(a)
In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the
built environment;

(b)
That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and
opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;

(c)
That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and
communities;

(d)
That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and
wildlife habitat;

(e)
That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low‑density development;

(f)
That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g)
That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and
ground water and surface water recharge and discharge areas.

(((15)))
(16) "Rural development" refers to development outside the
urban growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a
variety of uses and residential densities, including clustered residential
development, at levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural
character and the requirements of the rural element. Rural development does
not refer to agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural
areas.

(((16)))
(17) "Rural governmental services" or "rural
services" include those public services and public facilities historically
and typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may
include domestic water systems, fire and police protection services,
transportation and public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with rural development and normally not associated with urban
areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as
otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).

(((17)))
(18) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use
of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to
such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the
production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of
mineral resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands
designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural
development, as provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When
allowed to spread over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban
governmental services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to
land having urban growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to
an area with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18)))
(19) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a
county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19)))
(20) "Urban governmental services" or "urban
services" include those public services and public facilities at an
intensity historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning
services, fire and police protection services, public transit services, and
other public utilities associated with urban areas and normally not associated
with rural areas.

(((20)))
(21) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and
duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands
do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland
sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage ditches,
grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.70A.200 and 1998 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The comprehensive plan of each county and city that is planning under this
chapter shall include a process for identifying and siting essential public
facilities. ((Essential public facilities include those facilities that are
typically difficult to site, such as airports, state education facilities and
state or regional transportation facilities as defined in RCW 47.06.140, state
and local correctional facilities, solid waste handling facilities, and
in-patient facilities including substance abuse facilities, mental health
facilities, and group homes.)) The processes for identifying and siting
regional or state-wide essential public facilities shall be coordinated through
the county-wide planning policy adopted under RCW 36.70A.210.

(2)
The office of financial management shall maintain a list of those essential
state-owned and state-operated public facilities that are required or
likely to be built within the next six years. The office of financial
management may ((at any time)) add facilities to the list, following
consultation with the governing bodies of the cities or counties under
consideration for siting of the facilities. No county or city shall be
required to amend its comprehensive plan to meet the requirements of this
section due to the listing of a facility by the office of financial management,
prior to the next scheduled plan revision.

(3)
No local comprehensive plan or development regulation may preclude the siting
of essential public facilities. This subsection does not limit the authority
of a local government to require the avoidance or mitigation of impacts of a
proposed essential public facility under chapter 43.21C RCW or other applicable
authority, and the imposition of requirements to avoid or mitigate such impacts
shall not be construed as precluding the siting of an essential public
facility.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that counties are regional governments within their
boundaries, and cities are primary providers of urban governmental services
within urban growth areas. For the purposes of this section, a
"county-wide planning policy" is a written policy statement or
statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which
county and city comprehensive plans are developed ((and)),
adopted, and implemented pursuant to this chapter. This framework shall
ensure that city and county comprehensive plans are consistent as required in
RCW 36.70A.100, and that such plans and the planning for public facilities
by the county, cities, and special districts are consistent as required by
subsection (9) of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed
to alter the land-use powers of cities.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in
whole or in part within the county as follows:

(a)
No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority
of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with representatives of each city located
within the county for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that
will provide a framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In
other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county
adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial
management.

(b)
The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide planning policy
specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner in which the
county and the cities agree to all procedures and provisions including but not
limited to desired planning policies, deadlines, ratification of final
agreements and demonstration thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities
associated therewith.

(c)
If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of
cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately
impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d)
If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no
agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management
in any other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or
reasons for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate,
the governor may immediately request the assistance of the department of
community, trade, and economic development to mediate any disputes that
preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes
that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions from
those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or cities for failure
to reach an agreement as provided in this section. The governor shall specify
the reason or reasons for the imposition of any sanction.

(e)
No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later
than fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management the county
legislative authority of any other county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to
the process provided under this section and that is consistent with the
agreement pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public
hearing or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.

(3)
A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a)
Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of
urban services to such development;

(c)
Policies for identifying and siting regional and state-wide essential
public ((capital)) facilities ((of a county-wide or state-wide nature)),
including transportation facilities ((of state-wide significance as defined
in RCW 47.06.140)). Such policies shall include the procedures and
provisions required by subsection (4) of this section;

(d)
Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e)
Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all
economic segments of the population and parameters for its distribution;

(f)
Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g)
Policies for county-wide economic development and employment; and

(h)
An analysis of the fiscal impact.

(4)
The county-wide planning policy for identifying and siting regional or
state-wide essential public facilities shall be developed collaboratively by
the county, the cities, the state agencies with regulatory jurisdiction over
the siting of such facilities, and special purpose districts that are located
within the county and provide one or more types of such facilities.
Participation by special purpose districts shall be limited to districts that
provide one or more types of regional or state-wide essential public facilities
or additional types of facilities proposed to be included in the county-wide policy.
The policy shall at a minimum address the following:

(a)
Criteria and procedures to determine which facilities will be subject to the
policy;

(b)
Creation of a regional entity to apply the policy and make regional decisions
regarding the siting of a facility. The policy shall ensure the fair
participation or representation of all jurisdictions that may be impacted or
benefited by the facility. The policy shall ensure an active public
participation process in which the public may propose siting dispute provisions
and may comment upon proposals by the regional decisional entity. The
decisional procedures shall define circumstances in which alternative dispute
resolution mechanisms may be employed. The procedures shall also include
criteria for determining when a decisional impasse has occurred;

(c)
Provide criteria and procedures by which the decisional entity considers
whether the facility:

(i)
Unreasonably interferes with the objectives of the adopted comprehensive plan
of a jurisdiction adversely impacted by the facility;

(ii)
Is consistent with the adopted comprehensive plan and development regulation of
a jurisdiction adversely impacted by the facility;

(iii)
Fairly apportions the relative burdens and benefits of the facility;

(iv)
To the extent practicable, avoids or minimizes the impacts upon local
jurisdictions, and if avoidance or minimization of the impacts is not
practicable, provides other mitigation measures that compensate for the
impacts;

(d)
Provides procedures by which impacted local jurisdictions with the approval of
the regional decisional entity may ensure the implementation of mitigation
conditions or compensation, including the imposition of such conditions upon
the permits issued by the permitting jurisdictions, including local governments
and state agencies; and

(e)
Funding of mitigating measures on a regional basis, including the contribution
of funding from multiple jurisdictions that will be benefited by the facility.

(5)
Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the
county-wide planning policy adoption process. Adopted county-wide planning
policies shall be adhered to by state agencies.

(((5)))
(6) Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the
requirements of this section may result in the imposition of a sanction or
sanctions on a county or city within the county, as specified in RCW
36.70A.340. In imposing a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall specify
the reasons for failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy in order that
any imposed sanction or sanctions are fairly and equitably related to the
failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy.

(((6)))
(7) Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide planning
policy to the growth management hearings board within sixty days of the
adoption of the county-wide planning policy.

(((7)))
(8) Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more
counties, each with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with
contiguous urban areas and may be adopted by other counties, according to the
process established under this section or other processes agreed to among the
counties and cities within the affected counties throughout the multicounty
region.

(9)
In a county with an adopted county-wide planning policy adopted before July 1,
1999, the county shall adopt an element governing the siting of regional or
state-wide essential public facilities pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section in the next scheduled comprehensive revision of its policy, but not
later than July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall adopt minimum guidelines for the development of county-wide
planning policies on the siting of essential public facilities under RCW
36.70A.210(4).

Sec.
6. RCW
43.21C.031 and 1995 c 347 s 203 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An environmental impact statement (the detailed statement required by RCW
43.21C.030(2)(c)) shall be prepared on proposals for legislation and other
major actions having a probable significant, adverse environmental impact. The
environmental impact statement may be combined with the recommendation or
report on the proposal or issued as a separate document. The substantive
decisions or recommendations shall be clearly identifiable in the combined
document. Actions categorically exempt under RCW 43.21C.110(1)(a) do not
require environmental review or the preparation of an environmental impact
statement under this chapter. In a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040, a planned action, as provided for in subsection (2) of this
section, does not require a threshold determination or the preparation of an
environmental impact statement under this chapter, but is subject to
environmental review and mitigation as provided in this chapter.

An
environmental impact statement is required to analyze only those probable
adverse environmental impacts which are significant. Beneficial environmental
impacts may be discussed. The responsible official shall consult with agencies
and the public to identify such impacts and limit the scope of an environmental
impact statement. The subjects listed in RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c) need not be
treated as separate sections of an environmental impact statement. Discussions
of significant short-term and long-term environmental impacts, significant
irrevocable commitments of natural resources, significant alternatives
including mitigation measures, and significant environmental impacts which
cannot be mitigated should be consolidated or included, as applicable, in those
sections of an environmental impact statement where the responsible official
decides they logically belong.

(2)(a)
For purposes of this section, a planned action means one or more types of
project action that:

(i)
Are designated planned actions by an ordinance or resolution adopted by a
county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040;

(ii)
Have had the significant impacts adequately addressed in an environmental
impact statement prepared in conjunction with (A) a comprehensive plan or
subarea plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or (B) a fully contained community,
a master planned resort, a master planned development, or a phased project;

(iii)
Are subsequent or implementing projects for the proposals listed in (a)(ii) of
this subsection;

(iv)
Are located within an urban growth area, as defined in RCW 36.70A.030;

(v)
Are not essential public facilities, as defined in RCW ((36.70A.200)) 36.70A.030;
and

(vi)
Are consistent with a comprehensive plan adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW.

(b)
A county, city, or town shall limit planned actions to certain types of
development or to specific geographical areas that are less extensive than the
jurisdictional boundaries of the county, city, or town and may limit a planned
action to a time period identified in the environmental impact statement or the
ordinance or resolution adopted under this subsection.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.21C.060 and 1983 c 117 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The policies and goals set forth in this chapter are supplementary to those set
forth in existing authorizations of all branches of government of this state,
including state agencies, municipal and public corporations, and counties. Any
governmental action may be conditioned or denied pursuant to this chapter:
PROVIDED, That such conditions or denials shall be based upon policies
identified by the appropriate governmental authority and incorporated into
regulations, plans, or codes which are formally designated by the agency (or
appropriate legislative body, in the case of local government) as possible bases
for the exercise of authority pursuant to this chapter. Such designation shall
occur at the time specified by RCW 43.21C.120. Such action may be conditioned
only to mitigate specific adverse environmental impacts which are identified in
the environmental documents prepared under this chapter. These conditions
shall be stated in writing by the decisionmaker. Mitigation measures shall be
reasonable and capable of being accomplished. In order to deny a proposal
under this chapter, an agency must find that: (((1))) (a) The
proposal would result in significant adverse impacts identified in a final or
supplemental environmental impact statement prepared under this chapter; and (((2)))
(b) reasonable mitigation measures are insufficient to mitigate the identified
impact. Except for permits and variances issued pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW,
when such a governmental action, not requiring a legislative decision, is
conditioned or denied by a nonelected official of a local governmental agency,
the decision shall be appealable to the legislative authority of the acting
local governmental agency unless that legislative authority formally eliminates
such appeals. Such appeals shall be in accordance with procedures established
for such appeals by the legislative authority of the acting local governmental
agency.

(2)
In the siting of essential public facilities through the procedures of a
county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210, the governing body of a city
or county may identify mitigation measures in the environmental impact
statement and impose those as conditions upon the siting decision.

Sec.
8. RCW
82.02.090 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply
in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090:

(1)
"Development activity" means any construction or expansion of a
building, structure, or use, any change in use of a building or structure, or
any changes in the use of land, that creates additional demand and need for
public facilities.

(2)
"Development approval" means any written authorization from a county,
city, or town which authorizes the commencement of development activity.

(3)
"Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed upon development as a
condition of development approval to pay for public facilities needed to serve
new growth and development, and that is reasonably related to the new
development that creates additional demand and need for public facilities, that
is a proportionate share of the cost of the public facilities, and that is used
for facilities that reasonably benefit the new development. "Impact
fee" does not include a reasonable permit or application fee.

(4)
"Owner" means the owner of record of real property, although when
real property is being purchased under a real estate contract, the purchaser
shall be considered the owner of the real property if the contract is recorded.

(5)
"Proportionate share" means that portion of the cost of public facility
improvements that are reasonably related to the service demands and needs of
new development.

(6)
"Project improvements" mean site improvements and facilities that are
planned and designed to provide service for a particular development project
and that are necessary for the use and convenience of the occupants or users of
the project, and are not system improvements. No improvement or facility
included in a capital facilities plan approved by the governing body of the
county, city, or town shall be considered a project improvement.

(7)
"Public facilities" means the following capital facilities owned or
operated by government entities: (a) Public streets ((and)),
roads, and other transportation facilities; (b) publicly owned parks,
open space, and recreation facilities; (c) school facilities; and (d) fire
protection facilities in jurisdictions that are not part of a fire district.

(8)
"Service area" means a geographic area defined by a county, city,
town, or intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of public
facilities provide service to development within the area. Service areas shall
be designated on the basis of sound planning or engineering principles.

(9) "System improvements" mean public facilities that are
included in the capital facilities plan and are designed to provide service to
service areas within the community at large, in contrast to project
improvements.

---
END ---