BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.70.040 and 1994 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall have the power, and it shall be its duty:

(1)
To promulgate such rules governing the establishment and operation of a state
lottery as it deems necessary and desirable in order that such a lottery be
initiated at the earliest feasible and practicable time, and in order that such
lottery produce the maximum amount of net revenues for the state consonant with
the dignity of the state and the general welfare of the people. Such rules
shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

(a)
The type of lottery to be conducted which may include the selling of tickets or
shares. The use of electronic or mechanical devices or video terminals which
allow for individual play against such devices or terminals shall be
prohibited. Approval of the legislature shall be required before entering any
agreement with other state lotteries to conduct shared games;

(b)
The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the lottery;

(c)
The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning tickets or shares;

(d)
The manner of selecting the winning tickets or shares;

(e)
The manner and time of payment of prizes to the holder of winning tickets or
shares which, at the director's option, may be paid in lump sum amounts or
installments over a period of years;

(f)
The frequency of the drawings or selections of winning tickets or shares. Approval
of the legislature is required before conducting any on-line game in which the
drawing or selection of winning tickets occurs more frequently than once every
twenty-four hours;

(g)
Without limit as to number, the type or types of locations at which tickets or
shares may be sold;

(h)
The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;

(i)
The licensing of agents to sell or distribute tickets or shares, except that a
person under the age of eighteen shall not be licensed as an agent;

(j)
The manner and amount of compensation, if any, to be paid licensed sales agents
necessary to provide for the adequate availability of tickets or shares to
prospective buyers and for the convenience of the public;

(k)
The apportionment of the total revenues accruing from the sale of lottery
tickets or shares and from all other sources among: (i) The payment of prizes
to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which shall not be less than
forty-five percent of the gross annual revenue from such lottery, (ii) transfers
to the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260, and (iii)
transfer to the state's ((general fund)) dedicated education account.
Transfers to the ((state general fund)) dedicated education account
shall be made in compliance with RCW 43.01.050;

(l)
Such other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical
operation and administration of the lottery and for the convenience of the
purchasers of tickets or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares.

(2)
To ensure that in each place authorized to sell lottery tickets or shares, on
the back of the ticket or share, and in any advertising or promotion there
shall be conspicuously displayed an estimate of the probability of purchasing a
winning ticket.

(3)
To amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules from time to time as it deems
necessary or desirable.

(4) To advise and make recommendations to the director for the
operation and administration of the lottery.

Sec.
2. RCW
67.70.240 and 1997 c 220 s 206 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The
moneys in the state lottery account shall be used only:

(1)
For the payment of prizes to the holders of winning lottery tickets or shares;

(2)
For purposes of making deposits into the reserve account created by RCW
67.70.250 and into the lottery administrative account created by RCW 67.70.260;

(3)
For purposes of making deposits into the state's ((general fund)) dedicated
education account;

(4)
For distribution to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs. Three million dollars shall be distributed under this
subsection during calendar year 1996. During subsequent years, such
distributions shall equal the prior year's distributions increased by four
percent. Distributions under this subsection shall cease when the bonds issued
for the construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not more than
twenty years after the tax under RCW 82.14.0485 is first imposed;

(5)
For distribution to the stadium and exhibition center account, created in RCW
43.99N.060. Subject to the conditions of RCW 43.99N.070, six million dollars
shall be distributed under this subsection during the calendar year 1998.
During subsequent years, such distribution shall equal the prior year's
distributions increased by four percent. No distribution may be made under
this subsection after December 31, 1999, unless the conditions for issuance of
the bonds under RCW 43.99N.020(2) are met. Distributions under this subsection
shall cease when the bonds are retired, but not later than December 31, 2020;

(6)
For the purchase and promotion of lottery games and game-related services; and

(7)
For the payment of agent compensation.

The
office of financial management shall require the allotment of all expenses paid
from the account and shall report to the ways and means committees of the
senate and house of representatives any changes in the allotments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
dedicated education account is created in the state treasury. All receipts
from the lottery proceeds described in RCW 67.70.040 and 67.70.240 must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account are for the exclusive use for the
support of common schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
43.135.035(4) does not apply to RCW 67.70.040 and 67.70.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---