BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Washington's students are being asked to meet new and rigorous academic
standards;

(b)
Schools and school districts may have considerable difficulty in helping all
students reach the high standard on the Washington assessment of student
learning;

(c)
Young students need significant assistance at the very earliest grade levels to
acquire the basic foundational skills they will need in order to achieve the
high standard on the fourth grade Washington assessment of student learning;

(d)
Substantial and extensive research studies consistently demonstrate that
reducing class size in the early grades can significantly improve student
achievement;

(e)
The research findings on improving student achievement through class size
reduction confirms the common sense views of parents and teachers that smaller
class sizes give students more individual attention and better opportunities to
excel academically; and

(f)
Some studies associate smaller classes with lower retention rates, lower levels
of special education diagnoses and referrals, fewer disruptions in classrooms,
higher teacher satisfaction, and a better overall classroom environment.

(2)
The legislature intends to help schools reduce class size through a phased plan
that targets funding first to schools encountering the greatest struggles
helping students achieve the state's essential academic learning requirements.

(a)
Initially, priority for assistance will be offered to elementary schools that
are encountering the greatest challenge in their efforts to help struggling
students achieve the essential academic learning requirements. The legislature
intends to offer this assistance through a grant program intended to assist, in
the 1999-2001 biennium, approximately the lowest quartile of elementary schools
as measured by the percentage of students who met the standard in all four
subjects on the Washington assessment of student learning administered to
fourth grade students in 1998.

(b)
Subject to available funding, the legislature intends to expand the program in
the 2001-03 biennium to include a priority for any elementary school in the
lowest or second lowest quartiles as measured by the percentage of students who
met the standard in all four subjects on the Washington assessment of student
learning administered to fourth grade students in 2000.

(c)
Subject to available funding, the legislature intends to expand the program in
the 2003-05 biennium to include a priority for any elementary school in the
lowest three quartiles as measured by the percentage of students who met the
standard in all four subjects on the Washington assessment of student learning
administered to fourth grade students in 2002.

(d)
Subject to available funding, the legislature intends to expand eligibility for
this program in the 2005-07 biennium to include all elementary schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The class size reduction voluntary grant program is established. The purpose
of the program is to target state assistance to struggling schools that wish to
participate in the program in order to help the students in those schools
achieve the state's essential academic learning requirements.

(2)
The program shall be administered by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. In its administration of the program, the responsibilities of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall include, but need not
be limited to:

(a)
Adoption and distribution of rules and program guidelines;

(b)
Use of simple, brief, and clear application processes, forms, and reporting
requirements that help make the program accessible to schools with minimal
administrative teams;

(c)
Selection of grant recipients;

(d)
Approval of the release of funds from the smaller classes for struggling
schools account under section 5 of this act;

(e)
The annual adjustment of grant amounts, which may reflect compensation
increases and other fiscal changes adopted by the legislature;

(f)
Preparation of a study that evaluates the effect of the program on student
achievement, classroom environment, and teacher satisfaction. The study shall
include, but need not be limited to, a class size study of participating and
nonparticipating elementary schools, using a representative sampling technique
of actual student-teacher classroom ratios for both types of schools. The
results of the study shall be provided to the governor and the house of representatives
and senate education and fiscal committees by December 1, 2002; and

(g)
Distribution of a report by November 15th of each even-numbered year to the
governor, and the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the
educational community, and other interested parties. The report shall focus
primarily on the results of grant recipients and the program as a whole, and
shall include any recommendations for program improvements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to the conditions of section 4 of this act, any public elementary school may
participate in the program subject to the following requirements:

(1)
The school must reduce actual class size in kindergarten through second grade
classes to a ratio of no more than sixteen students to each classroom teacher.
If a school already has achieved a ratio of sixteen students or fewer to each
classroom teacher, the school may use grant funds either to further reduce
class size in kindergarten through second grade classes, or to reduce class
size in any or all third through fifth grade classrooms.

(2)
The school shall provide to the office of the superintendent of public
instruction a plan that indicates how the school will meet the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section. In addition to any required elements, the
school is encouraged to integrate its class reduction plan with plans for any
federal funds designated for class size reduction in elementary schools.

(3)
At the request of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, no
more often than once annually, the school shall provide data on the actual
ratio of students to classroom teacher in each classroom in the school.

(4)
Grant recipients that meet the requirements of subsections (1) through (3) of
this section are eligible to retain grant funds for a minimum of five years.
At the end of the five-year period, the office of the superintendent of public
instruction may require the recipients to reapply for future funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to available funding, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall select grant recipients based on the requirements in section 3 of this
act and on the following priorities:

(1)
During the 1999-2001 biennium, priority shall be given to an elementary school
that was in the lowest quartile of elementary schools as measured by the
percentage of its fourth grade students who met the standard in all four subjects
on the 1998 Washington assessment of student learning.

(2)
During the 2001-03 biennium, priority shall be given to any elementary school
that was in one of the two lowest quartiles of elementary schools as measured
by the percentage of its fourth grade students who met the standard in all four
subjects on the 2000 Washington assessment of student learning.

(3)
During the 2003-05 biennium, priority shall be given to any elementary school
that was in one of the three lowest quartiles of elementary schools as measured
by the percentage of its fourth grade students who met the standard in all four
subjects on the 2002 Washington assessment of student learning.

(4)
During the 2005-07 biennium, all elementary schools shall have equal priority
in applying for grant funds.

(5)
No school receiving a grant under this program shall lose eligibility for
continued funding based solely on improved test scores on the Washington
assessment of student learning.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

The smaller classes for struggling schools account is created in
the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations and funds
received from public and private sources must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only to reduce class size in
elementary schools in accordance with sections 2 through 4 of this act. Only
the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

---
END ---