BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
11.11.010 and 1998 c 292 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)(a)
"Actual knowledge" means:

(i)
For a financial institution, whether acting as personal representative or
otherwise, or other third party in possession or control of a nonprobate asset,
receipt of written notice that: (A) Complies with RCW 11.11.050; (B) pertains
to the testamentary disposition or ownership of a nonprobate asset in its
possession or control; and (C) is received by the financial institution or
third party after the death of the owner in a time sufficient to afford the
financial institution or third party a reasonable opportunity to act upon the
knowledge; and

(ii)
For a personal representative that is not a financial institution, personal
knowledge or possession of documents relating to the testamentary disposition
or ownership of a nonprobate asset of the owner sufficient to afford the
personal representative reasonable opportunity to act upon the knowledge,
including reasonable opportunity for the personal representative to provide the
written notice under RCW 11.11.050.

(b)
For the purposes of (a) of this subsection, notice of more than thirty days is
presumed to be notice that is sufficient to afford the party a reasonable
opportunity to act upon the knowledge, but notice of less than five business
days is presumed not to be a sufficient notice for these purposes. These
presumptions may be rebutted only by clear and convincing evidence to the
contrary.

(2)
"Beneficiary" means the person designated to receive a nonprobate
asset upon the death of the owner by means other than the owner's will.

(3)
"Broker" means a person defined as a broker or dealer under the
federal securities laws.

(4)
"Date of will" means, as to any nonprobate asset, the date of
signature of the will or codicil that refers to the asset and disposes of it.

(5)
"Designate" means a written means by which the owner selects a
beneficiary, including but not limited to instruments under contractual
arrangements and registration of accounts, and "designation" means
the selection.

(6)
"Financial institution" means: A bank, trust company, mutual savings
bank, savings and loan association, ((credit union,)) broker, or issuer
of stock or its transfer agent. Credit unions are exempt from this chapter.

(7)(a)
"Nonprobate asset" means a nonprobate asset within the meaning of RCW
11.02.005, but excluding the following:

(i)
A right or interest in real property passing under a joint tenancy with right
of survivorship;

(ii)
A deed or conveyance for which possession has been postponed until the death of
the owner;

(iii)
A right or interest passing under a community property agreement; and

(iv)
An individual retirement account or bond.

(b)
For the definition of "nonprobate asset" relating to revocation of a
provision for a former spouse upon dissolution of marriage or declaration of
invalidity of marriage, see RCW 11.07.010(5).

(8)
"Owner" means a person who, during life, has beneficial ownership of
the nonprobate asset.

(9)
"Request" means a request by the beneficiary for transfer of a
nonprobate asset after the death of the owner, if it complies with all
conditions of the arrangement, including reasonable special requirements
concerning necessary signatures and regulations of the financial institution or
other third party, or by the personal representative of the owner's estate or
the testamentary beneficiary, if it complies with the owner's will and any
additional conditions of the financial institution or third party for such
transfer.

(10)
"Testamentary beneficiary" means a person named under the owner's
will to receive a nonprobate asset under this chapter, including but not
limited to the trustee of a testamentary trust.

(11)
"Third party" means a person, including a financial institution,
having possession of or control over a nonprobate asset at the death of the
owner, including the trustee of a revocable living trust and surviving joint
tenant or tenants.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---