BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the number of communicable disease outbreaks is
increasing in size, frequency, and variety of disease. These outbreaks often
strain the resources of local health jurisdictions to both meet the costs of
controlling the specific outbreak as well as continuing to perform their other
vital responsibilities. The legislature also finds that new, drug-resistant
strains of tuberculosis are developing across the country requiring lengthy and
sometimes expensive treatment regimens. In rare cases, the person contracting
the disease refuses treatment and must be involuntarily detained to protect the
safety of the surrounding community. These cases can also cause extraordinary
expense to local health jurisdictions who lack suitable detention facilities at
the local level and who have been forced to utilize expensive and already
overcrowded local jails and state institutions. The legislature intends to
create an emergency fund to assist local health jurisdictions in meeting the
extraordinary costs of both communicable disease outbreaks and tuberculosis
detentions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
communicable disease/tuberculosis detention emergency account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from legislative appropriations
designated for this account must be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the purpose of funding the program
created in sections 3 through 5 and 7 of this act. Only the secretary of
health or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department shall provide funds from the communicable disease/tuberculosis
detention emergency account created under section 2 of this act to meet the
extraordinary expenses of local health jurisdictions in meeting the costs of
communicable disease outbreaks and tuberculosis detentions when the outbreaks
or detentions exceed a set of criteria established by section 4 of this act and
by the department, in consultation with local public health departments,
interested representatives of the health care committees in the senate and
house of representatives, not to exceed one member of each major party, and the
office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
established criteria for the expenditure of funds appropriated for either
communicable disease outbreaks, or tuberculosis detentions, or both includes
the following factors:

(1)
There is an outbreak of a communicable disease of public health significance at
a rate substantially higher than the usual rate for the jurisdiction with the
rate calculated as cases of illness per one hundred thousand population during
a defined period of time or other defined public health emergency. The
economic ability of the county or counties to meet the extraordinary cost shall
be included in the analysis;

(2)
A local match not to exceed twenty-five percent in cash or in kind;

(3)
Whether the impacted jurisdiction can demonstrate that continued expenditure of
local funds will jeopardize its ability to continue its statutorily mandated
responsibilities to protect the public health and safety of the community;

(4)
Whether the local jurisdiction has explored other funding options, including
the transfer of equipment, personnel, or material from other local
jurisdictions or the department and exhausted those options;

(5)
In regard to tuberculosis detention, the cost exceeds by a factor of two the
average annual per capita expenditure for tuberculosis in the state;

(6)
Whether the local board of health has made a declaration of the existence of an
emergency; and

(7)
The amount of money spent, and money remaining, to provide funds to local
health jurisdictions from the communicable disease/tuberculosis detention
emergency account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
final criteria shall be completed no later than six months following the
effective date of this section, or December 31, 1999, whichever is sooner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department, in consultation with local health jurisdictions, shall develop
rules for the process to be followed in disbursing funds from the communicable
disease/tuberculosis detention emergency account created in section 2 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Each
local health jurisdiction utilizing funds from the communicable
disease/tuberculosis detention emergency account created in section 2 of this
act shall provide a report of the expenditures to the department for inclusion
in a yearly report to the appropriate health care committees of the legislature
and the office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The sum of six hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the communicable disease/tuberculosis detention emergency
account created in section 2 of this act for the purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of six hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the communicable disease/tuberculosis detention emergency
account created in section 2 of this act for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 2 through 5 and 7 of this act are each added to chapter 43.70 RCW.

---
END ---