BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.20.775 and 1998 c 195 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
demonstration program consisting of ((two)) three projects must
be implemented using the design-build method of contracting, as prescribed
under a process developed by the department of transportation under RCW
47.20.755. The department shall select projects valued over ten million
dollars for the demonstration program. One of the three demonstration
projects authorized under this section shall be the construction of the new
Tacoma Narrows bridge on state route number 16.

The
department shall present progress reports on the demonstration projects to the
legislative transportation committee and the alternative public works oversight
committee during the course of the performance of the demonstration projects.
The department shall present a final detailed report to the legislative
transportation committee within one year of completion of the demonstration
projects. The report must detail the advantages and disadvantages of the design-build
construction process and make recommendations for possible changes in law, and
in how the process may be used for future department projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act expires April 30, 2001, unless extended by the legislature.

---
END ---