BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.46.050 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may enter into agreements using federal, state, and local
financing in connection with the projects, including without limitation,
grants, loans, and other measures authorized by section 1012 of ISTEA, and to
do such things as necessary and desirable to maximize the funding and
financing, including the formation of a revolving loan fund to implement this
section.

(2)
Agreements entered into under this section shall authorize the private entity
to lease the facilities within a designated area or areas from the state and to
impose user fees or tolls within the designated area to allow a reasonable rate
of return on investment, as established through a negotiated agreement between
the state and the private entity. The negotiated agreement shall determine a
maximum rate of return on investment, based on project characteristics. If the
negotiated rate of return on investment is not affected, the private entity may
establish and modify toll rates and user fees.

(3)
Agreements may establish "incentive" rates of return beyond the
negotiated maximum rate of return on investment. The incentive rates of return
shall be designed to provide financial benefits to the affected public
jurisdictions and the private entity, given the attainment of various safety,
performance, or transportation demand management goals. The incentive rates of
return shall be negotiated in the agreement.

(4)
No appropriation of public funds for public-private partnerships for state
route number 16 corridor improvements or the Tacoma Narrows bridge, or any
other expenditure of funds, that came from the proceeds of the bonds authorized
under RCW 47.10.834 through 47.10.842 may be required to be repaid to the state
from the revenue derived from tolls or user fees imposed on the state route
number 16 corridor.

(5) Agreements shall require that over the term of the
ownership or lease the user fees or toll revenues be applied only to payment of
the private entity's capital outlay costs for the project, including project
development costs, interest expense, the costs associated with design,
construction, operations, toll collection, maintenance and administration of the
project, reimbursement to the state for all costs associated with an election
as required under RCW 47.46.030, the costs of project review and oversight,
technical and law enforcement services, establishment of a fund to assure the
adequacy of maintenance expenditures, and a reasonable return on investment to
the private entity. A negotiated agreement shall not extend the term of the
ownership or lease beyond the period of time required for payment of the
private entity's capital outlay costs for the project under this subsection.

---
END ---