BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

Any agreement or contract and any private or public entity that
enters into an agreement or contract with the department to implement any
provision of this chapter is subject to all laws and statutes applicable to
public entities performing similar activities, including, but not limited to,
audit by the state auditor under chapter 43.09 RCW, prohibitions on the use of
its facilities for campaign purposes under RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180, public
inspection and copying of records to the same extent as if the records were
public records under chapter 42.17 RCW, requirements for open public meetings
as if any private contractor were a public agency under chapter 42.30 RCW, and
employee whistleblower protection under chapter 42.40 RCW. Any information
gained by a private entity as a result of any agreement or contract authorized
by this chapter may not be sold or transferred to another private or public
entity or used by the private entity for purposes other than those strictly
related to performing the services under the contract, without express
statutory authority.

---
END ---