BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.46.020 and 1993 c 370 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, "transportation systems and
facilities" means capital-related improvements and additions to the
state's transportation infrastructure, including but not limited to highways,
roads, bridges, vehicles, and equipment, marine-related facilities, vehicles,
and equipment, park and ride lots, transit stations and equipment,
transportation management systems, and other transportation-related investments,
but does not include any improvements or additions that are financed or funded
by the state.

---
END ---