BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

By
January 1, 2000, the commission shall raise the basic training requirement for
law enforcement officers from four hundred forty hours to a minimum of seven
hundred twenty hours.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

By
January 1, 2000, the commission shall offer in-service training to law
enforcement officers through operation of a mobile training facility.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Funding for the expanded training and for the mobile training facility required
by this act shall be provided to the criminal justice training commission from
the public safety and education account as provided by RCW 43.08.250.

---
END ---