BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not apply to any person in respect to the business of boarding,
breeding, training, or selling horses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of feed for horses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of feed for
horses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---