BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. As
used in sections 1 through 5 of this act, the following terms have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Harmful to minors" means any matter or live performance:

(a)
That the average adult person, applying contemporary community standards, would
find, when considered as a whole, appeals to the prurient interest of minors;
and

(b)
That explicitly depicts or describes, by prevailing standards in the adult
community with respect to what is suitable for minors, patently offensive
representations or descriptions of:

(i)
Ultimate sexual acts, normal or perverted, actual or simulated; or

(ii)
Masturbation, fellatio, cunnilingus, bestiality, excretory functions, lewd
exhibition of the genitals or genital area, sexually explicit conduct, sexual
excitement, or sexually explicit nudity; or

(iii)
Sexual acts that are violent or destructive, including but not limited to human
or animal mutilation, dismemberment, rape, or torture; and

(c)
That, when considered as a whole, and in the context in which it is used, lacks
serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value for minors.

(2)
"Matter" means a motion picture film, a publication, a sexual device,
or any combination thereof.

(3)
"Motion picture film" means any:

(a)
Film or plate negative;

(b)
Film or plate positive;

(c)
Film designed to be projected on a screen for exhibition;

(d)
Film, glass slides, or transparencies, either in negative or positive form,
designed for exhibition by projection on a screen;

(e)
Videotape; or

(f)
Any other medium used to electronically transmit or reproduce images on a
screen.

(4)
"Publication" means any book, magazine, article, pamphlet, writing,
printing illustration, picture, sound recording, telephonic communication, or
coin-operated machine.

(5)
"Live performance" means any play, show, skit, dance, or other
exhibition performed or presented to or before an audience of one or more, in
person or by electronic transmission, or by telephonic communication, with or
without consideration.

(6)
"Knowledge" means knowledge as defined in RCW 9A.08.010(1)(b).

(7)
"Knowledge of its character" means that the person has knowledge that
the matter or performance contains, depicts, or describes activity or conduct
that may be found to be patently offensive under subsection (1)(b) of this
section. Such knowledge may be proved by direct or circumstantial evidence, or
both.

(8)
"Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(9)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, or other legal entity.

(10)
"Sexual device" means any artificial device primarily designed,
promoted, or marketed to physically stimulate or manipulate the human genitals.

(11)
"Sexual excitement" means the condition of human male or female
genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal; or the depiction of
covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state.

(12)
"Sexually explicit conduct" means physical contact with a person's
clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, perineum, or, if such
person is a female, breast.

(13)
"Sexually explicit nudity" means the showing of the human male or
female genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or perineum with less than a full opaque
covering; or the showing of the female breast with less than a full opaque
covering of any portion thereof below the top of the nipple.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. No
person may with knowledge of its character:

(1)
Display matter that is harmful to minors in such a way that minors, as part of
the invited general public, will be exposed to view the matter; however, a
person is deemed not to have displayed matter harmful to minors if:

(a)
The matter is kept behind devices commonly known as blinder racks so that the
lower two-thirds of the matter is not exposed to view; or

(b)
In the case of an operator who transmits matter that is harmful to minors via
cable television transmissions, the operator first notifies the subscriber of
the availability of a device that allows a subscriber to prohibit the viewing
of a particular cable transmission; or

(c)
In the case of a person who provides a minor with access to a computer
containing matter that is harmful to minors stored locally, or that can be
connected to the Internet, the computer is equipped with specialized filtering
software actively installed for the purpose of protecting minors from accessing
matter that is harmful to minors; or

(d)
In the case of a person publishing a World Wide Web page containing matter that
is harmful to minors, the web page contains codes or hidden comments that
trigger the blocking mechanisms of any browser-filtering software that is
designed for the purpose of protecting minors from accessing matter that is
harmful to minors; or

(e)
In the case of a person hosting or mirroring Internet content on servers located
within the state of Washington, the person mandates the inclusion in all web
pages of codes or hidden comments that trigger the blocking mechanisms of any
browser-filtering software that is designed for the purpose of protecting
minors from accessing matter that is harmful to minors; or

(f)
In the case of a person providing electronic communications or
telecommunications access or connection to or from a facility, system, or
network, whether one-way or interactive, including transmission, downloading, storage,
navigational tools, and related capabilities that are incidental to the
provision of the electronic communications or telecommunications access or
connection, the person mandates the inclusion in all web pages of codes or
hidden comments that trigger the blocking mechanisms of any browser-filtering
software that is designed for the purpose of protecting minors from accessing
matter that is harmful to minors;

(2)
Sell, furnish, present, distribute, allow to view or hear, or otherwise
disseminate to a minor, with or without consideration, any matter that is
harmful to minors; or

(3)
Present to a minor or participate in presenting to a minor, with or without
consideration, any live performance that is harmful to minors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. In
any prosecution for violation of section 2 of this act, it is an affirmative
defense that:

(1)
The matter or performance involved was displayed or otherwise disseminated to a
minor by the minor's parent or legal guardian, for bona fide purposes; or

(2)
The matter or performance involved was displayed or otherwise disseminated to a
minor with the written permission of the minor's parent or legal guardian, for
bona fide purposes; or

(3)
The person made a reasonable good faith attempt to ascertain the true age of
the minor by requiring production of a driver's license, marriage license,
birth certificate, or other governmental or educational identification card or
paper, or copy thereof if supplied by mail or electronic facsimile when
in-person production thereof is impractical, and not relying solely on the oral
allegations or apparent age of the minor; or

(4)
If engaged in the commercial distribution of material that is harmful to minors
by electronic or telephonic transmission, access by persons under eighteen
years of age is restricted by requiring use of a verified credit card, debit
account, adult access code, or adult personal identification number before
transmission of the material.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person who is convicted of violating section 2 of this act is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

(2)
Each day that a violation of section 2 of this act occurs or continues is a
separate offense and is punishable as a separate violation.

(3)
Every act, thing, or transaction prohibited by section 2 of this act is a
separate offense as to each item, issue, or title involved and is punishable as
such.

(4)
For the purpose of this section, multiple copies of the same identical title,
monthly issue, volume, and number issue, or other such identical material are a
single offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The state of Washington fully occupies and preempts within the boundaries of
the state the entire field of regulation and sanctions for displaying, selling,
furnishing, presenting, or otherwise distributing matter or performances that
are harmful to minors.

(2)
Counties, cities, towns, or other municipalities may enact only those laws and
ordinances relating to matter and performances harmful to minors that are
consistent with this chapter.

(3)
Local laws and ordinances that are inconsistent with, more restrictive than, or
exceed the requirements of this chapter may not be enacted and are preempted
and repealed, regardless of the nature of the code, charter, or home rule
status of such county, city, town, or municipality.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
9.68.015 (Obscene literature, shows, etc.--Exemptions) and 1959
c 260 s 2;

(2) RCW
9.68.050 ("Erotic material"--Definitions) and 1992 c 5
s 1 & 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 13;

(3) RCW
9.68.060 ("Erotic material"--Determination by
court--Labeling--Penalties) and 1992 c 5 s 2 & 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 14;

(4) RCW
9.68.070 (Prosecution for violation of RCW 9.68.060--Defense)
and 1992 c 5 s 4 & 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 15;

(5) RCW
9.68.080 (Unlawful acts) and 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 16;

(6) RCW
9.68.090 (Civil liability of wholesaler or
wholesaler-distributor) and 1992 c 5 s 3 & 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 17;

(7) RCW
9.68.100 (Exceptions to RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120) and 1969
ex.s. c 256 s 18;

(8) RCW
9.68.110 (Motion picture operator or projectionist exempt, when)
and 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 19;

(9) RCW
9.68.120 (Provisions of RCW 9.68.050 through 9.68.120 exclusive)
and 1969 ex.s. c 256 s 20;

(10) RCW
9.68.130 ("Sexually explicit material"--Defined--Unlawful
display) and 1975 1st ex.s. c 156 s 1;

(11) RCW
9.68A.140 (Definitions) and 1987 c 396 s 1;

(12) RCW
9.68A.150 (Allowing minor on premises of live erotic performance)
and 1987 c 396 s 2; and

(13) RCW
9.68A.160 (Penalty) and 1987 c 396 s 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 9.68 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---