BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.46.030 and 1996 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary or a designee shall solicit proposals from, and negotiate and
enter into agreements with, private entities to undertake as appropriate,
together with the department and other public entities, all or a portion of the
study, planning, design, construction, operation, and maintenance of
transportation systems and facilities, using in whole or in part private
sources of financing.

The
public-private initiatives program may develop up to six demonstration
projects. Each proposal shall be weighed on its own merits, and each of the
six agreements shall be negotiated individually, and as a stand-alone project.

(2)
If project proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, are terminated by the
public or private sectors, the department shall not select any new projects,
including project proposals submitted to the department prior to September 1,
1994, and designated by the transportation commission as placeholder projects, after
June 16, 1995, until June 30, 1997.

The
department, in consultation with the legislative transportation committee,
shall conduct a program and fiscal audit of the public-private initiatives
program for the biennium ending June 30, 1997. The department shall submit a
progress report to the legislative transportation committee on the program and
fiscal audit by June 30, 1996, with preliminary and final audit reports due
December 1, 1996, and June 30, 1997, respectively.

The
department shall develop and submit a proposed public involvement plan to the
1997 legislature to identify the process for selecting new potential projects
and the associated costs of implementing the plan. The legislature must adopt
the public involvement plan before the department may proceed with any activity
related to project identification and selection. Following legislative
adoption of the public involvement plan, the department is authorized to
implement the plan and to identify potential new projects.

The
public involvement plan for projects selected after June 30, 1997, shall, at a
minimum, identify projects that: (a) Have the potential of achieving overall
public support among users of the projects, residents of communities in the
vicinity of the projects, and residents of communities impacted by the
projects; (b) meet a state transportation need; (c) provide a significant state
benefit; and (d) provide competition among proposers and maximum cost benefits
to users. Prospective projects may include projects identified by the
department or submitted by the private sector.

Projects
that meet the minimum criteria established under this section and the
requirements of the public involvement plan developed by the department and
approved by the legislature shall be submitted to the Washington state
transportation commission for its review. The commission, in turn, shall
submit a list of eligible projects to the legislative transportation committee
for its consideration. Forty-five days after the submission to the legislative
transportation committee of the list of eligible projects, the secretary is
authorized to solicit proposals for the eligible project.

(3)
Prior to entering into agreements with private entities under the requirements
of RCW 47.46.040 for any project proposal selected before September 1, 1994, or
after June 30, 1997, except as provided for in subsections (((11) and))
(12) and (13) of this section, the department shall require an advisory
vote as provided under subsections (5) through (10) of this section.

(4)
The advisory vote shall apply to project proposals selected prior to September
1, 1994, or after June 30, 1997, that receive public opposition as demonstrated
by the submission to the department of original petitions bearing at least five
thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project collected and submitted
in accordance with the dates established in subsections (12) and (13) of this
section. The advisory vote shall be on the preferred alternative identified
under the requirements of chapter 43.21C RCW and, if applicable, the national
environmental policy act, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq. The execution by the
department of the advisory vote process established in this section is subject
to the prior appropriation of funds by the legislature for the purpose of
conducting environmental impact studies, a public involvement program, local
involvement committee activities, traffic and economic impact analyses,
engineering and technical studies, and the advisory vote.

(5)
In preparing for the advisory vote, the department shall conduct a
comprehensive analysis of traffic patterns and economic impact to define the
geographical boundary of the project area that is affected by the imposition of
tolls or user fees authorized under this chapter. The area so defined is
referred to in this section as the affected project area. In defining the
affected project area, the department shall, at a minimum, undertake: (a) A
comparison of the estimated percentage of residents of communities in the
vicinity of the project and in other communities impacted by the project who
could be subject to tolls or user fees and the estimated percentage of other
users and transient traffic that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (b) an
analysis of the anticipated traffic diversion patterns; (c) an analysis of the
potential economic impact resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates
imposed on residents, commercial traffic, and commercial entities in
communities in the vicinity of and impacted by the project; (d) an analysis of
the economic impact of tolls or user fees on the price of goods and services
generally; and (e) an analysis of the relationship of the project to state
transportation needs and benefits.

(6)(a)
After determining the definition of the affected project area, the department
shall establish a committee comprised of individuals who represent cities and
counties in the affected project area; organizations formed to support or
oppose the project; and users of the project. The committee shall be named the
public-private local involvement committee, and be known as the local
involvement committee.

(b)
The members of the local involvement committee shall be: (i) An elected
official from each city within the affected project area; (ii) an elected
official from each county within the affected project area; (iii) two persons
from each county within the affected project area who represent an organization
formed in support of the project, if the organization exists; (iv) two persons
from each county within the affected project area who represent an organization
formed to oppose the project, if the organization exists; and (v) four public
members active in a state-wide transportation organization. If the committee
makeup results in an even number of committee members, there shall be an
additional appointment of an elected official from the county in which all, or
the greatest portion of the project is located.

(c)
City and county elected officials shall be appointed by a majority of the
members of the city or county legislative authorities of each city or county
within the affected project area, respectively. The county legislative
authority of each county within the affected project area shall identify and
validate organizations officially formed in support of or in opposition to the
project and shall make the appointments required under this section from a list
submitted by the chair of the organizations. Public members shall be appointed
by the governor. All appointments to the local involvement committee shall be
made and submitted to the department of transportation no later than January 1,
1996, for projects selected prior to September 1, 1994, and no later than
thirty days after the affected project area is defined for projects selected
after June 30, 1997. Vacancies in the membership of the local involvement
committee shall be filled by the appointing authority under (b)(i) through (v)
of this subsection for each position on the committee.

(d)
The local involvement committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the
department on all matters related to the execution of the advisory vote.

(e)
Members of the local involvement committee serve without compensation and may
not receive subsistence, lodging expenses, or travel expenses.

(7)
The department shall conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period on the
definition of the geographical boundary of the project area. The department,
in consultation with the local involvement committee, shall make adjustments,
if required, to the definition of the geographical boundary of the affected
project area, based on comments received from the public. Within fourteen
calendar days after the public comment period, the department shall set the
boundaries of the affected project area in units no smaller than a precinct as
defined in RCW 29.01.120.

(8)
The department, in consultation with the local involvement committee, shall
develop a description for selected project proposals. After developing the
description of the project proposal, the department shall publish the project
proposal description in newspapers of general circulation for seven calendar
days in the affected project area. Within fourteen calendar days after the
last day of the publication of the project proposal description, the department
shall transmit a copy of the map depicting the affected project area and the
description of the project proposal to the county auditor of the county in
which any portion of the affected project area is located.

(9)
The department shall provide the legislative transportation committee with
progress reports on the status of the definition of the affected project area
and the description of the project proposal.

(10)
Upon receipt of the map and the description of the project proposal, the county
auditor shall, within thirty days, verify the precincts that are located within
the affected project area. The county auditor shall prepare the text
identifying and describing the affected project area and the project proposal
using the definition of the geographical boundary of the affected project area
and the project description submitted by the department and shall set an
election date for the submission of a ballot proposition authorizing the
imposition of tolls or user fees to implement the proposed project within the
affected project area, which date may be the next succeeding general election
to be held in the state, or at a special election, if requested by the
department. The text of the project proposal must appear in a voter's pamphlet
for the affected project area. The department shall pay the costs of
publication and distribution. The special election date must be the next date
for a special election provided under RCW 29.13.020 that is at least sixty days
but, if authorized under RCW 29.13.020, no more than ninety days after the
receipt of the final map and project description by the auditor. The
department shall pay the cost of an election held under this section.

(11)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may contract with a
private developer of a selected project proposal to conduct environmental
impact studies, a public involvement program, and engineering and technical
studies funded by the legislature. For projects subject to this subsection,
the department shall not enter into an agreement under RCW 47.46.040 prior to
the advisory vote on the preferred alternative.

(12)
Subsections (5) through (10) of this section shall not apply to project
proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, that have no organized public
opposition as demonstrated by the submission to the department of original
petitions bearing at least five thousand signatures of individuals opposing the
project, collected and submitted after September 1, 1994, and by thirty
calendar days after June 16, 1995.

(13)
Subsections (5) through (10) of this section shall not apply to project
proposals selected after June 30, 1997, that have no organized public
opposition as demonstrated by the submission to the department of original
petitions bearing at least five thousand signatures of individuals opposing the
project, collected and submitted by ninety calendar days after project
selection.

(14) The secretary of transportation, with the approval of the
transportation commission, may complete preliminary negotiations with the
private entity as specified in RCW 47.46.040, subject to final approval of the
contract by the legislature and appropriation or commitment of funds necessary
to complete the state route number 16 corridor project.

---
END ---