BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the maternity care access system has improved birth
outcomes and reduced unintended pregnancies, contributing to the growth of a
healthy and productive society. The legislature further finds that expanding
the maternity care access system to serve some young children and their parents
until the child's third birthday will further these outcomes, by strengthening
at-risk families and lowering the incidence of child abuse and neglect.

The
legislature recognizes that the community as well as the state bears the costs
of unhealthy families, including poor academic achievement, low productivity,
crime, social service demands, and medical care costs. Research demonstrates
that voluntary home visiting programs can significantly reduce these costs.

The
legislature finds that collaboration between the state, corporations,
foundations, and individuals to encourage a nurturing environment for child
growth and development will benefit both the public and private sectors. The
legislature further finds that a partnership between the state and the private
sector provides the strongest foundation for strengthening parent support
programs. Thus, the legislature intends to provide a vehicle and incentives
for individuals, corporations, and foundations to contribute to the state's
efforts to improve the quality of life for children in our state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall, to the extent that funds are available, extend the existing
maternity care access program that is designed to ensure healthy child
development and to reduce child abuse and neglect. The program shall provide
extended maternity care services to at-risk eligible persons and their
children, up to age three, to the maximum extent allowable under the medical
assistance program, Title XIX of the federal social security act.

For
the purposes of this act, "extended maternity care services" means
postpartum inpatient and outpatient medical care, case management, and support
services, which may include health assessments, health and parent education,
psychological assessment and counseling, outreach services, case management,
nutritional assessment and counseling, and transportation. Assessment services
may be provided by public health nurses or by supervised and trained lay
personnel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall phase in the extended coverage of at-risk children from birth
to age three by providing services in one county with both an urban and a rural
area. In developing a plan to phase in services, the department shall
collaborate with organizations concerned with and having experience with
maternity care, parent education, and child development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall seek all necessary waivers from the federal government to
allow for the extension of the existing maternity care access program to
provide extended maternity care services to at-risk eligible persons and their
children up to age three.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
maternity care endowment fund is established in the custody of the state
treasurer. Moneys received from private donations and funds received from
other sources may be deposited into the endowment fund. At the request of the
department, the treasurer shall release principal and earnings from the
endowment fund to the department for the services authorized under chapter
. . ., Laws of 1999 (this act). No appropriation is required for
expenditures from the endowment fund. The earnings on the fund shall be used
solely for the purposes included in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter, any amount
donated to the maternity care endowment fund, as created in section 5 of this
act.

(2)
The credits allowed under this section shall be equal to fifty percent of the
amount donated by the person or company subject to taxation under this
chapter. The total credits allowed under this section shall not exceed twenty
million dollars of credits each fiscal year. Tax credits are available on a
first‑come basis. The department shall keep a running total of all
credits approved. If the amount submitted for a credit will cause the cap to
be exceeded for the fiscal year, the department shall give a partial approval
of the application, equal to the amount of remaining credit available for the
fiscal year.

(3)
Application for credits under this section shall be made to the department in a
form and manner as required by the department. A person receiving approval
must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this
section. A person shall apply for the credit after making the donation.

(4)
A person qualifying for the credit must take the credit against taxes due
within two years of the date of qualification, or the credit is no longer
valid. Any unused excess credit may be carried forward to future periods for a
maximum of one year.

(5)
The department shall allow accrual of tax credits to a successor if the
business or firm is sold, assigned, conveyed, or otherwise transferred.

(6)
No applicant is eligible for tax credits under this section in excess of the
amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of
health for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to carry out the purposes of
this act.

(2)
The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of
health for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes of
this act. Expenditures under this section may not exceed the amount donated to
the maternity care endowment fund established by section 5 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---