BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that allergies are a serious medical disorder that affect
more than one in five persons in the United States and are the sixth leading
cause of chronic disease. Anaphylaxis is the most severe form of allergic
reaction. Rapid and appropriate administration of the drug epinephrine to a
patient suffering an anaphylaxis allergic reaction may make the difference
between the life and death of that patient. The legislature further finds that
some situations may arise when the administration of epinephrine by an
emergency medical technician is required to save a person's life and that it is
paramount that these valuable emergency response personnel receive the
appropriate training on the use of epinephrine to treat anaphylaxis.

It
is the purpose of this act to investigate the rate of anaphylaxis state-wide
and the training and care standards needed to allow emergency medical
technicians to administer life saving epinephrine.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Using
existing data and resources, the department of health, in cooperation with the
house of representatives health care committee, shall review the use of
epinephrine for anaphylaxis by emergency medical personnel and report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 12, 1999. The report
shall determine the following:

(1)
An estimate of the total number of expected incidents of anaphylaxis
state-wide, grouped by age;

(2)
The approximate education and training costs associated with preparing emergency
medical systems personnel to carry and administer a prefilled measured dose of
1:1000 epinephrine for anaphylaxis;

(3)
Any mitigating circumstances for the use of 1:1000 epinephrine by certified
emergency medical systems personnel, including but not limited to, age factors,
on-line versus off-line protocols, and specific signs and symptoms present
before drug administration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of health may establish a pilot program to determine the effectiveness
of training emergency medical technicians to carry and administer epinephrine
to persons under age thirty who display symptoms of anaphylaxis. If a pilot
program is established, the department shall establish a voluntary technical
advisory committee to advise the department in the development and review of
the program. The technical advisory committee shall include appropriate
state-wide organizations that represent emergency care personnel, individuals
that are trained in pediatric emergency medicine, and board-certified
allergists.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---