BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall set child care rates at minimum at the
seventy-fifth percentile of the most recent biennial rate survey conducted by
the department. The subsidy rates shall vary based on regional differences,
the age of the child, and the type of care provided, as reflected in the rate
survey.

---
END ---