BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that as a group, individuals with disabilities have the
lowest employment rate in the nation. Only thirty-five percent of citizens
with disabilities of working age are employed, but seventy-four percent report
that they want to be employed.

There
are approximately one hundred eighty thousand Washington residents who are
disabled and of working age, but only sixty-three thousand are employed.
Another seventy thousand would work if they could get jobs. These individuals
have severe barriers to employment and require assistance simply to obtain
access to employment. With the increase in the numbers of additional targeted groups,
individuals with disabilities are experiencing increased competition for
employment.

The
intent of this act is to increase employment and self-sufficiency of
individuals with disabilities by providing an incentive to employers to hire
such individuals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Employers in this state who are taxable under this chapter and employ, full or
part-time, individuals with disabilities shall be allowed a credit against the
tax due. The credit shall be based on amounts paid as wages and salaries for
such individuals or amounts paid for contracts with community rehabilitation
programs for goods or services produced by individuals with disabilities. The
minimum eligible contract value shall be no less than six thousand dollars.
The credit equals the competitive salaries or wages paid to one or more
individuals with disabilities employed or the value of the wages paid to
workers with disabilities working on the contract, multiplied by the following
rates: (a) Ten percent of the first six thousand; and (b) twenty percent of
the next six thousand. For contracts with community rehabilitation programs,
only amounts accruing to individuals with disabilities shall be included in the
determination of the credit.

(2)
The wages or contract amounts paid to individuals with disabilities must be
reasonable based on the type of work and ability of the individual.

(3)
Application for tax credit under this chapter shall be made in the form and
manner prescribed by the department. Furthermore, in order to receive the
credit, the employer must notify the department within a time specified by the
department of the employment of an individual who may qualify the employer for
the credit. In a manner and form prescribed by the department, the department
of social and health services shall certify to the department that the
individual possesses an existing disability that has prevented or limited the
individual's ability to work.

(4)
If an employer owes no tax there shall be no carryforward allowed for this
credit.

(5)
Disability under this section means an individual who has a permanent or
temporary physical, mental, or sensory disability which has made it significantly
difficult to engage in and retain gainful employment consistent with his or her
capacities and abilities and is deemed to have such a disability by the
department of social and health services.

(6) An employer may appeal a decision by the department of social
and health services or the department of revenue to the superior court of the
county in which the employer's principal place of business is located.

---
END ---