BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Compensation" means the reduction in the present fair market value
of property measured in dollars that is attributable to a restriction on the
use of private property.

(2)
"Governmental entity" means Washington state, state agencies,
agencies and commissions funded fully or partially by the state, counties,
cities, and other political subdivisions.

(3)
"Imposes" means for a governmental entity to apply any restriction on
land use to a particular piece of property in response to the property owner's
use or request to use the property in any particular manner.

(4)
"Private property" means a monetary interest in real property
recognized under Washington law, including:

(a)
Land;

(b)
An interest in land or improvements on the land;

(c)
A proprietary water right; and

(d)
Any crops, forest products, or resources capable of being harvested or
extracted.

(5)
"Regulatory taking" occurs when a governmental entity imposes a
restriction which interferes with the owner's use of real property or a portion
of real property, with the owner's right to exclude others, or with the right
to transfer ownership or possession and that decreases by twenty percent or
more the fair market value of the owner's entire monetary interest in the
separate and legally created parcel of property subject to the restriction in
question.

(6)
"Restriction" means a limitation, requirement, or restriction by a
governmental entity that limits the use of private property, including
ordinances, resolutions, rules, statutes, and conditions of development
approval.

(7)
"Unreasonable use of property" means use of property that a
reasonable person would consider unreasonable in light of the historically
permitted uses of similar property within the same general area as the subject
property. This definition is intended to include at a minimum all actions that
constitute nuisances under common law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
governmental entity shall pay compensation to the owner of real property when
it causes a regulatory taking of any part of the property. Compensation need
not be paid in the form of cash as long as the value given by the governmental
entity at least equals the compensation required under this chapter.

(2)
The compensation requirement in subsection (1) of this section does not apply
when the restriction:

(a)
Is imposed under an ordinance, resolution, or rule adopted by local government
prior to January 1, 1999, or adopted by local government because the
restriction is required under a state law that was adopted by the legislature
prior to January 1, 1999. Restrictions imposed under these ordinances,
resolutions, or rules that are amended after the effective date of this act
create a duty to pay compensation only to the extent the amendment increases
the restriction;

(b)
Only prevents, mitigates, or abates the injuries to another person or property
that are likely to be caused by an unreasonable use of property;

(c)
Only mitigates the adverse effects to another person or property caused by the
use of the property subject to the restriction;

(d)
Is part of a zoning ordinance common to the area surrounding the property that
regulates the type or intensity of use permitted on the property.

(3)
Restrictions imposed by more than one governmental entity that cumulatively
decrease the property value by twenty percent or more require each responsible
governmental entity to pay its share of the decrease.

(4)
The compensation required under this section shall not exceed four hundred
thousand dollars to any landowner for any restriction on land use of a separate
and legally created parcel of real property.

(5)
A governmental entity may not require waiving the compensation under this
section as a condition of approval of a use or another permit or as a condition
for subdivision of land.

(6)
The state is responsible for the compensation liability of other governmental
entities for a restriction on the use of property which is mandated by state
law or a state agency.

(7)
Claims for compensation as a result of a regulatory taking of private property
under this chapter must be brought within the time period specified in RCW
4.16.080.

(8)
When compensation under this chapter is ordered by a court or accepted by a
landowner, the property owner shall deliver to the governmental entity paying
compensation title to whatever accurately represents the property interest that
has been taken, such as a conservation easement, view easement, or fee title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
A property owner seeking to enforce this chapter must request compensation from
the department of the governmental entity that is imposing the restriction. A
property owner is not required to pursue any other administrative remedies
relating to a pending request for a permit to use the property in any
particular manner.

(2)
The governmental entity has forty-five days to reject a property owner's
request for compensation under subsection (1) of this section. If the request
is rejected in whole or in part, this chapter may be enforced in superior court
against a governmental entity that fails to comply with this chapter by the
owner of the property subject to the jurisdiction of that governmental entity.
The property owner may also raise any state or federal statutory or
constitutional claims arising from the government's decision to reject in whole
or in part the property owner's request for compensation. The property owner
may also request compensation from the executive, or designee, of the
governmental entity imposing the restriction. Such a request shall not be a
prerequisite to enforcing this chapter in superior court.

(3)
The superior court shall rule on all issues de novo and give no deference to
findings issued by the government, if any, relating to the government's
compliance with this chapter. The property owner enforcing this chapter has
the burden to prove that the private property was devalued by twenty percent or
more and that the devaluation was caused by the governmental entity's
restriction on land use. The government has the burden of proving that any
exception to the compensation requirement in section 2(2) of this act applies.
Mere assertion that the restriction is to prevent or alleviate public harm is
insufficient to insulate the government from responsibility for paying compensation.
A local government also has the burden of joining the state in any litigation
if the local government claims the state is responsible for paying compensation
under section 2(6) of this act.

(4)
A prevailing property owner is entitled to recover the costs of litigation,
including reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
chapter is intended to provide protection to private property owners in
addition to any constitutional rights under either or both the state and
federal Constitutions, such as the due process and takings clauses. This
chapter is not intended to affect any constitutional rights. The provisions of
this chapter are to be liberally construed to effectuate the policies and
purposes of this chapter. In the event of conflict between this chapter and
any other statute, the provisions of this chapter shall govern.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
chapter may be known and cited as the regulatory takings fairness act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

---
END ---