BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Tobacco use is the leading cause of disease and premature death in every
population group in the United States and tends to affect the low-income
population disproportionately. People with low income have higher smoking rates
and are less likely to stop their smoking habit. It has been estimated that
the state currently spends approximately two hundred thirty million dollars
each year through its medical assistance programs to pay for medical and
long-term care services for people with health conditions associated with
tobacco use.

(2)
Smoking cessation programs have been found to be effective when they are
targeted to specific groups. Effective prevention and control programs that
stress appropriate and direct intervention strategies need to be implemented to
reduce the devastating health effects of tobacco use among low-income people
and to simultaneously reduce the medical assistance expenditures for the
treatment of the health effects of tobacco.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall develop and implement a smoking cessation
program for medical assistance clients with payments received from the master
settlement agreement entered into by the state of Washington with leading
United States tobacco product manufacturers. The smoking cessation program
shall include but is not limited to using intervention strategies using federal
food and drug administration approved cessation pharmaceutical products and
therapies. The program shall begin offering services by July 1, 2001. The
department may establish an advisory group of technical experts and citizens to
provide advice related to the design and implementation of the smoking
cessation program.

---
END ---