BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The department of social and health services shall establish a pilot project to
create an education specialist position to coordinate information and services
for transient children attending school. The department shall issue a request
for proposal to establish a position or positions of education specialist for
transient children. The education specialist shall:

(a)
Be employed by a nonprofit organization;

(b)
Be provided work space in a school district facility;

(c)
Seek to minimize the educational disruption faced by transient children;

(d)
Ensure the educational component of the passport required under RCW 74.13.285
is completed; and

(e)
Provide transient children with postsecondary education guidance and
counseling.

(2)
The department shall require potential bidders to establish an advisory
committee comprised of representatives of the participating school district,
the local office of the department of social and health services, and nonprofit
organizations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
the purposes of this act, "transient children" means a foster child,
homeless child, or migrant child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of social and health services shall report back to the appropriate
committees of the senate and house of representatives by December 5, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---