BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the national highway and traffic safety administration
has established minimum performance specifications for speed measuring
devices. The international association of chiefs of police, in cooperation
with the national highway and traffic safety administration, has tested various
radar speed measuring devices using the testing standards in the minimum
performance specifications. Radar devices that are designed and constructed to
provide accurate measurements of the speed of moving vehicles when properly
calibrated and operated are approved for use as police traffic radar speed
measuring devices. The national highway and traffic safety administration
publishes a consumer products list of those radar devices. The legislature
finds that those devices are sufficiently reliable when properly calibrated and
operated that a court may take judicial notice of their reliability.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

In
a hearing held to contest the determination that a traffic infraction has been
committed, the court may take judicial notice of the reliability of the design,
construction, and function of a radar speed measuring device if the device has
been approved by the national highway and traffic safety administration for use
as a police traffic radar speed measuring device and is contained in the
national highway and traffic safety administration's published consumer
products list of approved radar devices.

This section does not abrogate the rules of evidence that govern
other foundational requirements to admit radar test results such as the proper
calibration and operation of the particular radar device.

---
END ---