BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
71A.10.020 and 1998 c 216 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this title, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Community residential support services," or "community support
services," and "in-home services" means one or more of the
services listed in RCW 71A.12.040.

(2)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(3)
"Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to mental
retardation, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, fetal alcohol syndrome,
or another neurological or other condition of an individual found by the
secretary to be closely related to mental retardation or to require treatment
similar to that required for individuals with mental retardation, which
disability originates before the individual attains age eighteen, which has
continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a
substantial handicap to the individual. By January 1, 1989, the department
shall promulgate rules which define neurological or other conditions in a way
that is not limited to intelligence quotient scores as the sole determinant of
these conditions, and notify the legislature of this action.

(4)
"Eligible person" means a person who has been found by the secretary
under RCW 71A.16.040 to be eligible for services.

(5)
"Habilitative services" means those services provided by program
personnel to assist persons in acquiring and maintaining life skills and to
raise their levels of physical, mental, social, and vocational functioning.
Habilitative services include education, training for employment, and therapy.

(6)
"Legal representative" means a parent of a person who is under
eighteen years of age, a person's legal guardian, a person's limited guardian
when the subject matter is within the scope of the limited guardianship, a
person's attorney at law, a person's attorney in fact, or any other person who
is authorized by law to act for another person.

(7)
"Notice" or "notification" of an action of the secretary
means notice in compliance with RCW 71A.10.060.

(8)
"Residential habilitation center" means a state-operated facility for
persons with developmental disabilities governed by chapter 71A.20 RCW.

(9)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services or the
secretary's designee.

(10)
"Service" or "services" means services provided by state or
local government to carry out this title.

(11)
"Vacancy" means an opening at a residential habilitation center,
which when filled, would not require the center to exceed its biannually
budgeted capacity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary shall, with the funds appropriated from the general
fund and with the additional revenue provided under RCW 66.24.290, provide
services for individuals diagnosed with fetal alcohol syndrome regardless of
the intelligence quotient of the individual.

Sec.
3. RCW
66.24.290 and 1997 c 451 s 1 and 1997 c 321 s 16 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor licensed under this
title may sell and deliver beer to holders of authorized licenses direct, but
to no other person, other than the board; and every such brewery or beer
distributor shall report all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the
regulations, and shall pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of
manufacturing and selling the beer within the state a tax of ((one)) two
dollars and ((thirty)) sixty cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees within the state and on sales to
licensees within the state of bottled and canned beer shall pay a tax computed
in gallons at the rate of ((one)) two dollars and ((thirty))
sixty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons. Any brewery or beer
distributor whose applicable tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day
following the month of sale will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two
percent per month or fraction thereof. Beer shall be sold by breweries and
distributors in sealed barrels or packages. ((The moneys collected under
this subsection shall be distributed as follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent
shall be distributed to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and (b) of the
remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall be distributed to counties in the
same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (ii) eighty percent shall be
distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the same manner as under RCW
66.08.210.))

(2)
An additional tax is imposed equal to seven percent multiplied by the tax
payable under subsection (1) of this section. All revenues collected during
any month from this additional tax shall be transferred to the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.

(3)
An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of
this section. The additional tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.

(((3)))
(4)(a) An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section. The additional tax is equal to ninety-six
cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons through June 30, 1995, two dollars and
thirty-nine cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995,
through June 30, 1997, and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons thereafter.

(b)
The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply to the sale of
the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by breweries that are
entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on
July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.

(c)
All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection (((3)))
(4) shall be deposited in the health services account under RCW
43.72.900.

(((4)
An additional tax is imposed on all beer that is subject to tax under
subsection (1) of this section that is in the first sixty thousand barrels of
beer by breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C.
Sec. 5051, as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be
provided by the board by rule consistent with the purposes of the exemption
under subsection (3)(b) of this section. The additional tax is equal to one
dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons.
By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three percent of the revenues
collected from this additional tax shall be distributed to border areas under
RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be transferred to the state
general fund.))

(5)
The tax imposed under this section shall not apply to "strong beer"
as defined in this title.

Sec.
4. RCW
69.50.520 and 1998 c 346 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

The
violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in the state
treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4),
66.24.290 (2), and (3), 69.50.505(h)(1), 82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2),
82.64.020, and section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding
services and programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of
1994 sp. sess., including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account
may also be appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs associated
with implementing criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of
1997. Funds from the account may also be used to fund services under
section 2 of this act. During the 1997-1999 biennium, funds from the
account may also be used for costs associated with conducting a feasibility
study of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system,
providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of 1997,
and for multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, 1999, at
least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the account shall be used
for providing grants to community networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the
family policy council.

Sec.
5. RCW
66.08.180 and 1997 c 451 s 3 and 1997 c 321 s 57 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

((Except
as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1),)) Moneys in the liquor revolving
fund shall be distributed by the board at least once every three months in
accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210: PROVIDED, That the
board shall reserve from distribution such amount not exceeding five hundred
thousand dollars as may be necessary for the proper administration of this
title.

(1)
All license fees, penalties and forfeitures derived under this act from ((class
H licenses or class H licensees)) spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licenses and licensees shall every three months be disbursed by the board
as follows:

(a)
Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the University of Washington
for the forensic investigations council to conduct the state toxicological
laboratory pursuant to RCW 68.50.107; and

(b)
Of the remaining funds:

(i)
6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent to Washington
State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research and for the
dissemination of such research; and

(ii)
89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department of social and
health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW 70.96A.050;

(2)
The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW 66.24.320 and
66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars annually shall
be disbursed every three months by the board to the general fund to be used for
juvenile alcohol and drug prevention programs for kindergarten through third
grade to be administered by the superintendent of public instruction;

(3)
Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from license fees pursuant
to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and 66.24.360, shall be transferred to
the general fund to be used by the department of social and health services
solely to carry out the purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and

(4)
One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210 shall every three
months be disbursed by the board to Washington State University solely for wine
and wine grape research, extension programs related to wine and wine grape
research, and resident instruction in both wine grape production and the
processing aspects of the wine industry in accordance with RCW 28B.30.068. The
director of financial management shall prescribe suitable accounting procedures
to ensure that the funds transferred to the general fund to be used by the
department of social and health services and appropriated are separately
accounted for.

Sec.
6. RCW
66.08.196 and 1997 c 451 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Distribution
of funds to border areas under RCW 66.08.190 ((and 66.24.290 (1)(a) and (4)))
shall be as follows:

(1)
Sixty-five percent of the funds shall be distributed to border areas ratably
based on border area traffic totals;

(2)
Twenty-five percent of the funds shall be distributed to border areas ratably
based on border-related crime statistics; and

(3)
Ten percent of the funds shall be distributed to border areas ratably based
upon border area per capita law enforcement spending.

Distributions
to an unincorporated area that is a point of land surrounded on three sides by
saltwater and adjacent to the Canadian border shall be made to the county in
which such an area is located and may only be spent on services provided to
that area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act may be known and cited as the fetal alcohol syndrome disability act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---