BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the conditions provided under RCW 43.03.050, each
state legislator's legislative assistant who resides more than sixty miles from
the legislative building shall receive an allowance for each day during a
regular or special legislative session that the legislative assistant works as
a reimbursement for any subsistence or lodging expenses the legislative
assistant may have incurred during the legislative session that is equal to the
daily allowance rate paid to members of the legislature under RCW 44.04.120.

---
END ---