BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
7.28.010 and 1911 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person having a valid subsisting interest in real property, and
a right to the possession thereof, may recover the same by action in the
superior court of the proper county, to be brought against the tenant in
possession; if there is no such tenant, then against the person claiming the
title or some interest therein, and may have judgment in such action quieting
or removing a cloud from plaintiff's title; an action to quiet title may be
brought by the known heirs of any deceased person, or of any person presumed in
law to be deceased, or by the successors in interest of such known heirs against
the unknown heirs of such deceased person or against such person presumed to be
deceased and his or her unknown heirs, and if it shall be made to appear
in such action that the plaintiffs are heirs of the deceased person, or the
person presumed in law to be deceased, or the successors in interest of such
heirs, and have been in possession of the real property involved in such action
for ((ten)) twenty years preceding the time of the commencement
of such action, and that during said time no person other than the plaintiff in
the action or his or her grantors has claimed or asserted any right or
title or interest in said property, the court may adjudge and decree the
plaintiff or plaintiffs in such action to be the owners of such real property,
free from all claims of any unknown heirs of such deceased person, or person
presumed in law to be deceased; and an action to quiet title may be maintained
by any person in the actual possession of real property against the unknown
heirs of a person known to be dead, or against any person where it is not known
whether such person is dead or not, and against the unknown heirs of such
person, and if it shall thereafter transpire that such person was at the time
of commencing such action dead the judgment or decree in such action shall be
as binding and conclusive on the heirs of such person as though they had been
known and named; and in all actions, under this section, to quiet or remove a
cloud from the title to real property, if the defendant be absent or a nonresident
of this state, or cannot, after due diligence, be found within the state, or
conceals himself or herself to avoid the service of summons, service may
be made upon such defendant by publication of summons as provided by law; and
the court may appoint a trustee for such absent or nonresident defendant, to
make or cancel any deed or conveyance of whatsoever nature, or do any other act
to carry into effect the judgment or the decree of the court. In an action
claiming adverse possession, continuity of possession for the requisite time
limit is not established by privity between successive occupants holding
adversely to the holder of the true title, unless the interest passed to the
plaintiff pursuant to a will or by intestate succession.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.16.020 and 1994 c 189 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The period prescribed for the commencement of actions shall be as
follows:

(1)
Within ((ten)) twenty years:

(((1)))
For actions for the recovery of real property, or for the recovery of the
possession thereof; and no action shall be maintained for such recovery unless
it appears that the plaintiff, his or her ancestor, predecessor or grantor was
seized or possessed of the premises in question within ((ten)) twenty
years before the commencement of the action. In an action claiming adverse
possession, continuity of possession for the requisite time limit is not
established by privity between successive occupants holding adversely to the
holder of the true title, unless the interest passed to the plaintiff pursuant
to a will or by intestate succession.

(2)
Within ten years:

(a)
For an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the United States, or
of any state or territory within the United States, or of any territory or
possession of the United States outside the boundaries thereof, or of any
extraterritorial court of the United States, unless the ten-year period is
extended in accordance with RCW 6.17.020(3).

(((3)))
(b) Of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named in the order
for whom support is ordered for an action to collect past due child support
that has accrued under an order entered after July 23, 1989, by any of the
above-named courts or that has accrued under an administrative order as defined
in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is issued after July 23, 1989.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 4.16 RCW to read as follows:

The
prevailing party in any proceeding concerning adverse possession of real
property must pay to the county auditor of the county in which the real
property is located an amount equal to the property taxes paid by another party
or owed with regard to the real property during the period of the adverse
possession. The county auditor shall reimburse any party to the proceeding
other than the prevailing party for any taxes actually paid with regard to the
real property during the period of the adverse possession.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 7.28 RCW to read as follows:

In
any action involving adverse possession:

(1)
It shall be an absolute defense to any claim of adverse possession, if proved
by a preponderance of the evidence, that the person asserting adverse
possession originally entered onto the land with the intent to acquire fee
title or use rights in the property.

(2)
The person asserting adverse possession must show a clearly identified boundary
line demonstrating his or her use of the land for the period of limitations.

(3)
If the landowner gave written notice, by certified mail to the person claiming
adverse possession, that the landowner is aware of the trespass at any time
during the statutory period of limitations, any use of the land subsequent to
the date of notice by the person asserting adverse possession, or anyone else
residing at the address where the notice was sent, shall be deemed to be
permissive as of the date of the notice.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---