BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.08 RCW to read as follows:

The state of Washington and all of its agencies and institutions,
including institutions of higher education as defined under RCW 28B.10.016, in
the aggregate are subject to a policy of no net gain in land ownership. Under
this policy, the state of Washington may not own greater combined acreage at
the end of any fiscal year than the state of Washington owned at the beginning
of that fiscal year. If a state agency or institution of higher education
acquires land during a fiscal year by any method, including purchase, gift,
transfer, condemnation, or trade, that agency or institution itself, or another
state agency or institution of higher education, must convey at least an equal
amount of acreage of publicly owned lands to persons or entities other than a
state agency or institution of higher education by the end of that fiscal year.

---
END ---