BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A one-dollar surcharge is imposed on the issuance and renewal of a driver's
license and on an initial motorcycle endorsement and a motorcycle endorsement
for a new category.

(2)
The brain injury trust fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from surcharges under subsection (1) of this section must be
deposited into the fund. After covering administrative costs of collecting and
depositing the surcharge, expenditures from the fund may be used only to
provide services to persons disabled by traumatic brain injuries. The fund is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for expenditures.

(3)
The governor's committee on disability issues and employment is responsible for
oversight over the brain injury trust fund. Only the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment may authorize expenditures from the fund.

(4) The governor's committee on disability issues and employment
may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to establish eligibility
for benefits and amounts under this section.

---
END ---