BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
88.16.190 and 1994 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of greater than one hundred and
twenty-five thousand deadweight tons shall be prohibited from proceeding beyond
a point, within United States waters, east of a line extending from ((Discovery
Island light south to New Dungeness)) Bonilla Point light on Vancouver
Island to Tatoosh Island light.

(2)
An oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of forty to one hundred and
twenty-five thousand deadweight tons may proceed beyond the points enumerated
in subsection (1) if such tanker possesses all of the following standard safety
features:

(a)
Shaft horsepower in the ratio of one horsepower to each two and one-half
deadweight tons; and

(b)
Twin screws; and

(c)
Double bottoms, underneath all oil and liquid cargo compartments; and

(d)
Two radars in working order and operating, one of which must be collision
avoidance radar; and

(e)
Such other navigational position location systems as may be prescribed from
time to time by the board of pilotage commissioners:

PROVIDED, That, if such forty to one hundred and twenty-five
thousand deadweight ton tanker is in ballast or is under escort of a tug or
tugs with an aggregate shaft horsepower equivalent to five percent of the
deadweight tons of that tanker, subsection (2) of this section shall not
apply: PROVIDED FURTHER, That additional tug shaft horsepower equivalencies
may be required under certain conditions as established by rule and regulation
of the Washington utilities and transportation commission pursuant to chapter
34.05 RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a tanker assigned a deadweight of less than
forty thousand deadweight tons at the time of construction or reconstruction as
reported in Lloyd's Register of Ships is not subject to the provisions of RCW
88.16.170 through 88.16.190.

---
END ---