BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the citizens of the state of Washington have
suffered substantial harm as a result of the marketing, sale, and use of
tobacco products. Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance
with the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be deposited in
the tobacco settlement account created in section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
tobacco settlement account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
tobacco settlement account may only be transferred to the health services
account for the purposes set forth in RCW 43.72.900, and to the tobacco
prevention and control account created in section 3 of this act, for purposes
set forth in section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the state treasury.
The source of revenue for this account is moneys transferred to the account
from the tobacco settlement account, investment earnings, and donations to the
account.

(2)
The tobacco prevention and control account shall be administered by the
department of health, in consultation with the tobacco prevention and control
advisory board created in section 4 of this act. Annually by November 1st, the
department of health shall provide an accounting of the account for the prior
fiscal year, to the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(3)
Moneys in the account may be spent by the secretary of the department of health
only for public health purposes relating to tobacco, including but not limited
to enforcing prohibitions on tobacco sales to minors, countermarketing and
advertising efforts relating to tobacco, school and community educational
programs discouraging tobacco use, tobacco use cessation programs, research
regarding tobacco related illnesses, and administrative expenses of the tobacco
prevention and control board. Moneys in the account may be spent without
appropriation.

(4)
Expenditures from the account shall begin in fiscal year 2001, and for any
fiscal year shall not exceed twenty million six hundred thousand dollars.
These limitations shall not apply to appropriations from the account to the
department of health, if any.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

There
is hereby created the tobacco prevention and control advisory board to consist
of fourteen members designated or appointed as provided in this section.

(1)
The attorney general or the attorney general's designee.

(2)
One member of the senate, designated by the president of the senate.

(3)
One member of the house of representatives, designated by the speaker of the
house of representatives.

(4)
One member of the governor's policy staff, designated by the governor.

(5)
Two members representing populations at risk for tobacco use, appointed by the
governor. The initial term of appointment for one member is two years and for
the other member, three years.

(6)
Three members having demonstrated interest in and backgrounds beneficial to
controlling and preventing the use of tobacco, appointed by the governor. The
initial term of appointment for two members is two years and for the remaining
member, three years.

(7)
One tribal representative, appointed by the governor. The initial term of
appointment is two years.

(8)
Two members of the public health community, appointed by the secretary of the
department of health. The initial term of appointment for one member is two
years and for the second member, three years.

(9)
The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's designee.

(10)
The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee.

Any
appointed member of the board remains a board member until his or her successor
is appointed. Appointed members of the board may be reappointed for additional
terms. Appointments for vacancies are made for the unexpired term, in the same
manner as the original appointment. After the term of initial appointment, the
term of appointed members of the board is three years. Any appointed member of
the board may be removed for cause by the authority appointing that member.

The
attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall serve as chair of the
board for an initial two-year term. Thereafter, the board shall select a chair
from among its members. The board shall adopt procedures for conducting its
affairs and accomplishing its duties. Necessary administrative support for the
board shall be provided by the department of health.

Members
of the board who are state officers or employees shall serve without additional
compensation or reimbursement for expenses. Such members shall be compensated
and reimbursed for expenses by their employer and according to their regular
position or employment. Members of the board who are not state officers or
employees shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.220.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
board shall advise and assist the secretary of the department of health in
developing, selecting, and evaluating strategies for the tobacco prevention and
control efforts that are supported by the tobacco prevention and control
account, and in monitoring selected strategies and efforts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
state treasurer is authorized and directed to transfer a total of one hundred
fifty-five million dollars from the tobacco settlement account, to the tobacco
prevention and control account, upon authorization of the director of financial
management. The director shall authorize transfer of the total amount no later
than June 30, 2001.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system plan II account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the volunteer fire
fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan II and plan III account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal
account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan II and III account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account,
the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city hardship
assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the economic development account, the essential
rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the ferry bond
retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade crossing
protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway bond
retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the highway
safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Section 7 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
Sections 1 through 7 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

(2) Section 8 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---