BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 4.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Agency" means any state or local government board, commission,
bureau, committee, department, institution, division, or tribunal in the
legislative, executive, or judicial branch, including elective and legislative
offices, institutions of higher education created and supported by state
government, counties, cities, towns, special purpose districts, local service
districts, municipal corporations, quasi-municipal corporations, including
electric cooperatives and mutual utilities, and political subdivisions of such
agencies and corporations, and any officer, employee, or agent of these
entities acting within the scope of the officer, employee, or agent's
employment or duties.

(b)
"Electronic computing device" means any computer hardware or
software, computer chip, embedded chip, process control equipment, or other
information system used to capture, store, manipulate, or process data, or that
controls, monitors, or assists in the operation of physical apparatus that is
not primarily used as a computer, but that relies on automation or digital
technology to function, including but not limited to vehicles, vessels,
buildings, structures, facilities, elevators, medical equipment, traffic
signals, factory machinery, and the like.

(2)
In any action against an agency, whether based in tort, contract, or otherwise,
for damages caused in whole or in part by computational or interpretive errors
generated by an electronic computing device in connection with the year 2000
date-change:

(a)
Any liability of the agency shall be several, not joint, and the liability of
the agency shall be determined as a percentage of fault in a manner consistent
with RCW 4.22.070; and

(b)
The agency shall have no liability for the first one hundred dollars of damages
per claimant that would otherwise be owed by the agency.

(3)
This section shall not apply to any action for damages arising from bodily personal
injury, or to wrongful death and survival actions under chapter 4.20 RCW or RCW
4.24.010.

(4)
This section does not apply to any act or omission occurring after December 31,
2003.

(5) This section expires December 31, 2009.

---
END ---