BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.130 and 1997 c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject
to continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them.
Not later than September 1, 2002, and ((at least)) every five years
thereafter, a county or city shall take action to review and, if needed, revise
its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure that the
plan and regulations are complying with the requirements of this chapter. However,
a county or city may review and revise its comprehensive plan every two years.
The review and evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the
review required by subsection (3) of this section.

Any
amendment or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this
chapter, and any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a)
Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments
or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of
the county or city ((no more frequently than once every year)) at
least every year, and if a county or city so chooses, as frequently as every
six months except that amendments may be considered more frequently under
the following circumstances:

(i)
The initial adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii)
The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures
set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii)
The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that
occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b)
Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be
considered by the governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the
various proposals can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public
participation a county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its
comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists
or to resolve an appeal of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management
hearings board or with the court.

(3)
Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall
review, at least every ((ten)) five years, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the incorporated
and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with
this review by the county, each city located within an urban growth area shall
review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which
the urban growth occurring within the county has located within each city and
the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas. The county
comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted
in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each
city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year
period. The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section, a county shall
adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide planning policies to
establish a review and evaluation program. This program shall be in addition
to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In
developing and implementing the review and evaluation program required by this
section, the county and its cities shall consider information from other
appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review and
evaluation program shall be to:

(a)
Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban densities within
urban growth areas by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets,
and objectives contained in the county-wide planning policies and the county
and city comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has
occurred in the county and its cities; and

(b)
Identify reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that
will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The review and evaluation program shall:

(a)
Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of urban growth
areas and provide for annual collection of data on urban and rural land uses,
development, critical areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary to
determine the quantity and type of land suitable for development, both for
residential and employment-based activities;

(b)
Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every
five years as provided in subsection (3) of this section. However, if a
county or city chooses to evaluate its urban growth area more often than once
in five years, that review may occur once every two years. The first
evaluation shall be completed not later than September 1, 2002. The county and
its cities may establish in the county-wide planning policies indicators,
benchmarks, and other similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(c)
Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the
county-wide planning policies required by this section and procedures to
resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of data; and

(d)
Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and county and city
comprehensive plans as needed to remedy an inconsistency identified through the
evaluation required by this section, or to bring these policies into compliance
with the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required by subsection
(1) of this section shall:

(a)
Determine whether there is sufficient suitable land to accommodate the
county-wide population projection established for the county pursuant to RCW
43.62.035 and the subsequent population allocations within the county and
between the county and its cities and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Determine the actual density of housing that has been constructed and the actual
amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the urban
growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter or
since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this
section; and

(c)
Based on the actual density of development as determined under (b) of this
subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and
density range to determine the amount of land needed for commercial,
industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning
period used in the most recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4)
If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an
inconsistency between what has occurred since the adoption of the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the county and its cities shall adopt and implement measures that are
reasonably likely to increase consistency during the subsequent ((five-year))
two-year period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with its
cities as required by RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to county-wide
planning policies to increase consistency. The county and its cities shall
annually monitor the measures adopted under this subsection to determine their
effect and may revise or rescind them as appropriate.

(5)(a)
Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods
used by counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by
this section. The department shall provide this information and appropriate
technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply
with the provisions of this section.

(b)
By December 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the appropriate committees
of the legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness of the activities
described in this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the county-wide
planning policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of
the counties and cities.

(6)
From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the department
shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning organizations
required under subsection (7) of this section to conduct the review and perform
the evaluation required by this section.

(7) The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the
cities within those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand
in population in 1995 as determined by office of financial management
population estimates and that are located west of the crest of the Cascade
mountain range. Any other county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out
the review, evaluation, and amendment programs and procedures as provided in
this section.

---
END ---