BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Within urban growth areas designated under RCW 36.70A.110, decisions pertaining
to the following activities are exempt from this chapter: (a) Construction of
or location of any residential structures of ten or fewer dwelling units; (b)
construction of an office, school, commercial, recreational, service, or
storage building with eight thousand or fewer square feet of gross floor area,
and with associated parking for forty or fewer automobiles; (c) construction of
a parking lot designed for forty or fewer automobiles; (d) division of land
into nine or fewer lots or parcels; and (e) any landfill or excavation of five
hundred cubic yards throughout the total lifetime of the fill or excavation.

(2) The legislative authority of a county or city that is planning
under RCW 36.70A.040 may raise the exemption levels specified in subsection
(1)(a) or (b) of this section by ordinance or resolution to the following
maximum levels within urban growth areas: (a) Construction of or location of
any residential structures of a maximum of twenty or fewer dwelling units; and
(b) construction of an office, school, commercial, recreational, service, or
storage building with a maximum of twelve thousand or fewer square feet of
gross floor area, and with associated parking for forty or fewer automobiles.

---
END ---