BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

An
offender forfeits all earned early release time attributable to good conduct
that was earned up to the time of the commission of the act, or forfeits such
part of the earned early release time as the secretary considers just, if a
state or federal court finds that the offender committed one or more of the
following acts in the course of a civil action concerning the department of
corrections or any of its employees:

(1)
Bringing a claim without substantial justification;

(2)
Bringing a claim solely or primarily for delay or harassment;

(3)
Unreasonably expanding or delaying a proceeding;

(4)
Engaging in abuse of discovery;

(5)
Presenting forged, false, or intentionally misleading documents or statements;
or

(6)
Contempt.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.92 RCW to read as follows:

An
offender forfeits all earned early release time attributable to good behavior
that was earned up to the time of the commission of the act, or forfeits such
part of the earned early release time as the correctional agency having
jurisdiction considers just, if a state or federal court finds that the
offender committed one or more of the following acts in the course of a civil
action concerning the correctional agency or any of its employees:

(1)
Bringing a claim without substantial justification;

(2)
Bringing a claim solely or primarily for delay or harassment;

(3)
Unreasonably expanding or delaying a proceeding;

(4)
Engaging in abuse of discovery;

(5)
Presenting forged, false, or intentionally misleading documents or statements;
or

(6)
Contempt.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

An
offender forfeits all earned early release time attributable to good behavior
that was earned up to the time of the commission of the act, or forfeits such
part of the earned early release time as the person responsible for the
operation of the jail considers just, if a state or federal court finds that the
offender committed one or more of the following acts in the course of a civil
action concerning the jail or any of its employees:

(1)
Bringing a claim without substantial justification;

(2)
Bringing a claim solely or primarily for delay or harassment;

(3)
Unreasonably expanding or delaying a proceeding;

(4)
Engaging in abuse of discovery;

(5)
Presenting forged, false, or intentionally misleading documents or statements;
or

(6) Contempt.

---
END ---