BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds and declares that:

(a)
Truth is the most important factor in our justice system, and without the
requirement that people tell the truth under oath, the justice system becomes
unreliable, easily misused, and eventually ineffectual;

(b)
Parties involved in family law proceedings, such as dissolutions, child
custody, and other domestic proceedings, are involved in highly sensitive and
emotional situations. However, despite such volatile situations, the parties
are entitled to truth and accuracy in these proceedings, especially when a
party's reputation or involvement with his or her child is at stake.

(2)
The legislature intends to deter intentional false accusations of child abuse
or neglect and domestic violence in proceedings related to parenting plans,
child custody, and domestic violence to ensure that those proceedings remain
reliable and beneficial to the parties involved.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If a court determines that a false accusation of child abuse or neglect has
been made during a proceeding under this title relating to a parenting plan or
child custody, and the person making or the person enticing another to make the
accusation knew it to be false at the time the accusation was made, the court
may impose a monetary penalty, not to exceed one thousand dollars and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in recovering the penalty, against the
person making or the person enticing another to make the accusation. The
remedy provided by this subsection is in addition to any other remedy or
penalty provided by law.

(2)
A person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW if he
or she intentionally makes or entices another to make a false accusation of
child abuse or neglect during a proceeding under this title relating to a
parenting plan or child custody and the person making or the person enticing
another to make the accusation knew it to be false at the time the accusation
is made.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 26.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If a court determines that a false accusation of domestic violence has been
made in a petition filed under this chapter or during a proceeding under this
chapter, and the person making or the person enticing another to make the
accusation knew it to be false at the time the accusation was made, the court
may impose a monetary penalty, not to exceed one thousand dollars and
reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in recovering the penalty, against the
person making or the person enticing another to make the accusation. The
remedy provided by this subsection is in addition to any other remedy or
penalty provided by law.

(2) A person is guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW if he or she intentionally makes or entices another to make a false
accusation of domestic violence in a petition filed under this chapter or
during a proceeding under this chapter and the person making or the person
enticing another to make the accusation knew it to be false at the time the
accusation is made.

---
END ---