BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.05.051 and 1998 c 175 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive six-year investment program shall be based upon the needs
identified in the state-owned highway component of the state-wide multimodal
transportation plan as defined in RCW 47.01.071(3) and priority selection
systems that incorporate the following criteria:

(1)
Priority programming for the preservation program shall take into account the
following, not necessarily in order of importance:

(a)
Extending the service life of the existing highway system;

(b)
Ensuring the structural ability to carry loads imposed upon highways and
bridges; and

(c)
Minimizing life cycle costs. The transportation commission in carrying out the
provisions of this section may delegate to the department of transportation the
authority to select preservation projects to be included in the six-year
program.

(2)
Priority programming for the improvement program must give first
consideration to increased capacity projects that, consistent with accident and
accident risk reduction considerations, increase mobility and decrease
congestion. Those projects must be evaluated by means of a system using data
and methodology like that developed by the Texas Transportation Institute with
the intent of creating a substantive, objective basis for ranking and selecting
projects. In addition, priority programming for the improvement program
shall take into account the following:

(a)
Support for the state's economy, including job creation and job preservation;

(b)
The cost-effective movement of people and goods;

(c)
Accident and accident risk reduction;

(d)
Protection of the state's natural environment;

(e)
Continuity and systematic development of the highway transportation network;

(f)
Consistency with local comprehensive plans developed under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(g)
Consistency with regional transportation plans developed under chapter 47.80
RCW;

(h)
Public views concerning proposed improvements;

(i)
The conservation of energy resources;

(j)
Feasibility of financing the full proposed improvement;

(k)
Commitments established in previous legislative sessions;

(l)
Relative costs and benefits of candidate programs;

(m)
Major projects addressing capacity deficiencies which prioritize allowing for
preliminary engineering shall be reprioritized during the succeeding biennium,
based upon updated project data. Reprioritized projects may be delayed or
canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority projects are
awaiting funding; and

(n)
Major project approvals which significantly increase a project's scope or cost
from original prioritization estimates shall include a review of the project's
estimated revised priority rank and the level of funding provided. Projects
may be delayed or canceled by the transportation commission if higher priority
projects are awaiting funding.

(3)
The commission may depart from the priority programming established under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section: (a) To the extent that otherwise
funds cannot be utilized feasibly within the program; (b) as may be required by
a court judgment, legally binding agreement, or state and federal laws and
regulations; (c) as may be required to coordinate with federal, local, or other
state agency construction projects; (d) to take advantage of some substantial
financial benefit that may be available; (e) for continuity of route
development; or (f) because of changed financial or physical conditions of an
unforeseen or emergent nature. The commission or secretary of transportation
shall maintain in its files information sufficient to show the extent to which
the commission has departed from the established priority.

(4) The commission shall identify those projects that yield freight
mobility benefits or that alleviate the impacts of freight mobility upon
affected communities.

---
END ---