BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.103.010 and 1994 c 234 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this section and RCW 28B.103.020 and 28B.103.030.

(1)
"Eligible student" means an enlisted member or an officer of the rank
of captain or below in the Washington national guard who ((is a resident
student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, who)) attends an
institution of higher education that is located in this state and accredited by
the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges, and who meets any additional
selection criteria adopted by the office.

(2)
"Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or
in part if the recipient renders service as a member of the Washington national
guard under rules adopted by the office.

(3)
"Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means
either to render service in the Washington national guard in lieu of monetary
repayment, or to be relieved of the service obligation under rules adopted by
the office.

(4)
"Office" means the office of the adjutant general of the state
military department.

(5)
"Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.

(6) "Service obligation" means serving in the Washington
national guard for one additional year for each year of conditional scholarship
received under this program.

---
END ---