BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.11.070 and 1989 c 307 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to act as an auctioneer or for an auction company
to engage in any business in this state without a license.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to:

(a)
An auction of goods conducted by an individual who personally owns those goods
and who did not acquire those goods for resale;

(b)
An auction conducted by or under the direction of a public authority;

(c)
An auction held under judicial order in the settlement of a decedent's estate;

(d)
An auction which is required by law to be at auction;

(e)
An auction conducted by or on behalf of a political organization or a
charitable corporation or association if the person conducting the sale
receives no compensation;

(f)
An auction of livestock or agricultural products which is conducted under
chapter 16.65 or 20.01 RCW. Auctions not regulated under chapter 16.65 or
20.01 RCW shall be fully subject to the provisions of this chapter;

(g)
An auction held under chapter 19.150 RCW; ((or))

(h)
An auction of an abandoned vehicle under chapter 46.55 RCW; or

(i)
An auction of fur pelts conducted by any cooperative association organized
under chapter 23.86 RCW or its wholly owned subsidiary. In order to qualify for
this exemption, the fur pelts must be from members of the association.
However, the association, without loss of the exemption, may auction pelts that
it purchased from nonmembers for the purpose of completing lots or orders, so
long as the purchased pelts do not exceed fifteen percent of the total pelts
auctioned.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state patrol shall provide by rule for a uniform
impound authorization and inventory form. All law enforcement agencies must
use this form for all vehicle impounds after June 30, 2001.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.55.120 and 1998 c 203 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department that are impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW
46.55.080, 46.55.085, or 46.55.113 may be redeemed only under the following
circumstances:

(a)
Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by
the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and
verified by the operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department, or one who has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department from the registered owner who produces
proof of ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is
in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person
eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements
of (b) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and storage
fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a government
agency. If the department's records show that the operator has been convicted
of a violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded
because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be
released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the
vehicle impounded. An agency may issue a written order to release pursuant to
a provision of an applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing
release on the basis of economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the
operator, taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record.

If
a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the
department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held at the written direction of the agency
ordering the vehicle impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days
if the operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded
because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle
may not be released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (b) of this subsection, including paying
all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold
was ordered by a government agency.

(b)
The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department shall be released upon the presentation to any person having custody
of the vehicle of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs
of towing, storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing,
removing, impounding, or storing any such vehicle. In addition, if a vehicle
is impounded because the operator was arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342
or 46.20.420 and was being operated by the registered owner when it was impounded,
it must not be released to any person until the registered owner establishes
with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded that any penalties, fines,
or forfeitures owed by him or her have been satisfied. Commercially reasonable
tender shall include, without limitation, cash, major bank credit cards, or
personal checks drawn on in-state banks if accompanied by two pieces of valid
identification, one of which may be required by the operator to have a
photograph. If the towing firm can determine through the customer's bank or a
check verification service that the presented check would not be paid by the
bank or guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may refuse to accept the
check. Any person who stops payment on a personal check or credit card, or
does not make restitution within ten days from the date a check becomes
insufficient due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a service
pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the towing firm in
connection with services rendered pursuant to this section shall be liable for
damages in the amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus costs and
reasonable attorney's fees.

(2)(a)
The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem
an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a
hearing, which notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting
a hearing, the name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy
of the towing and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall
maintain a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.

(b)
Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a
right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in
which the vehicle was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or
the amount of towing and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction
to determine the issues involving all impoundments including those authorized
by the state or its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine
the issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for
that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of
the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section and
more than five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the
filing of the hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a
filing fee in the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district
court. If the hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day
period, the right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for
any towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to
hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a)
The court, within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the
registered tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the
owner, the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency
authorizing the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b)
At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any
relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged
were not proper. The court may consider a written report made under oath by
the officer who authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal
appearance at the hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the
impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees charged were in
compliance with the posted rates, and who is responsible for payment of the
fees. The court may not adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the
posted or contracted rates.

(d)
If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
as permitted under this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed
against the person or persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did
not have a signed and valid impoundment authorization from a private property
owner or an authorized agent.

(e)
If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or
storage fees, and any security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate, and
the person or agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator
against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment,
towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in
favor of the registered and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of
personal property registered or titled with the department, for the amount of
the filing fee required by law for the impound hearing petition as well as
reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during the time the same
was impounded, for not less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or agency
authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an alleged
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.420 is determined to be in violation of
this chapter, then the law enforcement officer directing the impoundment and
the government employing the officer are not liable for damages if the officer
relied in good faith and without gross negligence on the records of the
department in ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle had a suspended or
revoked driver's license. If any judgment entered is not paid within fifteen
days of notice in writing of its entry, the court shall award reasonable
attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant in any action to enforce the
judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may be made by registered or certified
mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of the party mailing the
notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read essentially as follows:

TO:
. . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you
in the . . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature ..................

Typed name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within fifteen
days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required by RCW
46.55.110(2) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with all the
provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130. A vehicle or
item of personal property registered or titled with the department may be
redeemed at any time before the start of the auction upon payment of the applicable
towing and storage fees.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.55.130 and 1998 c 203 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If, after the expiration of fifteen days from the date of mailing of notice of
custody and sale required in RCW 46.55.110(2) to the registered and legal
owners, the vehicle remains unclaimed and has not been listed as a stolen
vehicle, then the registered tow truck operator having custody of the vehicle
shall conduct a sale of the vehicle at public auction after having first
published a notice of the date, place, and time of the auction in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county in which the vehicle is located not less
than three days and no more than ten days before the date of the auction. The
notice shall contain a description of the vehicle including the make, model,
year, and license number and a notification that a three-hour public viewing
period will be available before the auction. The auction shall be held during
daylight hours of a normal business day.

(2)
The following procedures are required in any public auction of such abandoned
vehicles:

(a)
The auction shall be held in such a manner that all persons present are given
an equal time and opportunity to bid;

(b)
All bidders must be present at the time of auction unless they have submitted
to the registered tow truck operator, who may or may not choose to use the
preauction bid method, a written bid on a specific vehicle. Written bids may
be submitted up to five days before the auction and shall clearly state which
vehicle is being bid upon, the amount of the bid, and who is submitting the
bid;

(c)
The open bid process, including all written bids, shall be used so that
everyone knows the dollar value that must be exceeded;

(d)
The highest two bids received shall be recorded in written form and shall
include the name, address, and telephone number of each such bidder;

(e)
In case the high bidder defaults, the next bidder has the right to purchase the
vehicle for the amount of his or her bid;

(f)
The successful bidder shall apply for title within fifteen days;

(g)
The registered tow truck operator shall post a copy of the auction procedure at
the bidding site. If the bidding site is different from the licensed office
location, the operator shall post a clearly visible sign at the office location
that describes in detail where the auction will be held. At the bidding site a
copy of the newspaper advertisement that lists the vehicles for sale shall be
posted;

(h)
All surplus moneys derived from the auction after satisfaction of the
registered tow truck operator's lien shall be remitted within thirty days to
the department for deposit in the state motor vehicle fund. A report
identifying the vehicles resulting in any surplus shall accompany the remitted
funds. If the director subsequently receives a valid claim from the registered
vehicle owner of record as determined by the department within one year from
the date of the auction, the surplus moneys shall be remitted to such owner;

(i)
If an operator receives no bid, or if the operator is the successful bidder at
auction, the operator shall, within forty-five days sell the vehicle to a
licensed vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap processor by use of the abandoned
vehicle report-affidavit of sale, or the operator shall apply for title to the
vehicle.

(3)
In no case may an operator hold a vehicle for longer than ninety days without
holding an auction on the vehicle, except for vehicles that are under a police or
judicial hold.

(4)(a)
In no case may the accumulation of storage charges exceed fifteen days from the
date of receipt of the information by the operator from the department as
provided by RCW 46.55.110(2).

(b) The failure of the registered tow truck operator to comply with
the time limits provided in this chapter limits the accumulation of storage
charges to ((five)) fifteen days except where delay is
unavoidable. Providing incorrect or incomplete identifying information to the
department in the abandoned vehicle report shall be considered a failure to
comply with these time limits if correct information is available.

---
END ---