BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature is in agreement with founding father Thomas Jefferson's statements
that "[t]o compel a man to furnish contributions of money for the
propagation of opinions which he disbelieves and abhors is sinful and
tyrannical"; that "[t]he opinions of men are not the object of civil
government, nor under its jurisdiction"; and that "[t]o suffer the
civil magistrate to intrude his powers into the field of opinion and to
restrain the profession or propagation of principles on supposition of their
ill tendency is a dangerous fallacy, which at once destroys all religious
liberty."

The
legislature recognizes and reaffirms the Enabling Act that permitted
Washington to become a state and that required the following ordinance to be
irrevocable without the consent of the United States and the people of
Washington: "That perfect toleration of religious sentiment shall be
secured and that no inhabitant of said States shall ever be molested in person
or property on account of his or her mode of religious worship."

The
legislature recognizes and reaffirms Article XXVI of the state Constitution,
the Compact with the United States, requiring the following ordinance to be
irrevocable without consent of the United States and the people of Washington:
"That perfect toleration of religious sentiment shall be secured and that
no inhabitant of this state shall ever be molested in person or property on
account of his or her mode of religious worship."

The
legislature further recognizes and reaffirms Article I, section 11 of the state
Constitution: "Absolute freedom of conscience in all matters of religious
sentiment, belief and worship, shall be guaranteed to every individual, and no
one shall be molested or disturbed in person or property on account of
religion.

Therefore,
to support these unalienable rights of conscience and beliefs, the legislature
hereby provides a remedy for the fulfillment of the obligation of that portion
of the taxpayer's property tax designated for K-12 public education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Fulfillment of that portion of a taxpayer's property tax obligation designated
for K-12 education, under this chapter, is met as follows:

(1)
An amount equal to that portion of the taxpayer's property taxes designated for
K-12 public education that has been contributed to one or more private schools
located within the county of the taxpayer's residence that are consistent with
the taxpayer's conscience, in exercise of his or her freedom of conscience, if:

(a)
The taxpayer files a notarized Freedom of Conscience statement with the county
treasurer; and

(b)
The taxpayer provides the county treasurer with written proof of the receipt of
the contribution by the school; and

(2)
If the taxpayer is a parent who through the exercise of his or her freedom of
conscience has elected to home school the taxpayer's children, an amount equal
to that portion of the taxpayer's property taxes designated for K-12 public
education up to the amount that taxpayer expended for the education of the
taxpayer's children, if:

(a)
The taxpayer files a notarized Freedom of Conscience statement with the county
treasurer; and

(b)
The taxpayer submits written receipts to the county treasurer as evidence that
the taxpayer expended equal funds for the education of the taxpayer's children.

If
the taxpayer, under subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section has a tax
obligation that exceeds the amount expended under that subsection the balance
of the tax obligation may be met under the terms of subsection (1)(a) and (b)
of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act applies to property taxes levied for collection in the year 2000 and
thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

---
END ---