BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
PATIENT RIGHTS. It is the intent of the legislature that
patients covered by health plans receive quality health care and that they:
Have sufficient and timely access to appropriate health care services; have
choice among providers; are assured that health care decisions are made by
appropriate medical personnel; have access to information regarding their
health plans; have access to a quick and impartial process for appealing plan
denials; are protected from unnecessary invasions of health care privacy; are
assured that personal health care information will be used appropriately; and
are protected from unfair and deceptive practices.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
CHOICE OF HEALTH CARE PROVIDER. (1) Each enrollee in a health plan must have
adequate choice among qualified health care providers.

(2)
Each health plan must allow an enrollee to choose a primary care provider who
is accepting new enrollees from a list of participating providers who share the
enrolled population's varied characteristics.

(3)
Each health plan must provide for appropriate and timely referral of enrollees
to a choice of specialists within the plan if specialty care is warranted.

(4)
Each health plan must provide, upon the request of an enrollee, access by the
enrollee to a second opinion from a participating provider regarding any
medical diagnosis or treatment plan.

(5)
Each health carrier must have a process whereby an enrollee whose medical
condition so warrants may be authorized to use a medical specialist as a
primary care provider. This may include enrollees suffering from chronic
diseases and those with other special needs.

(6)
Each health plan must provide for continuity of care by:

(a)
Assuring that primary care providers are responsible for at least:

(i)
Supervision, coordination, and provision of health services to meet the needs
of each enrollee; and

(ii)
Initiation and coordination of referrals for specialty care;

(b)
Allowing enrollees, already undergoing an active course of treatment that began
while enrolled in the plan, to continue receiving services for a reasonable
period from a participating provider who is not affiliated with the enrollee's
primary care provider's network; and

(c)
Educating enrollees about the carrier's process for assuring continuity of
care.

(7)
Each health plan offered by a carrier must provide a point‑of‑service
option that allows an enrollee to choose to receive service from a
nonparticipating health care provider or facility; however, enrollees must pay
the full additional cost for choosing this option.

(8)
To ensure enrollees' choice of provider and to meet the health care needs of
enrollees for covered benefits without unreasonable delay, each health plan
must include a sufficient number and type of health care providers and
facilities throughout the plan's service area. Each health plan must provide
enrollees with access to an adequate number of acute care hospital services,
primary care providers, specialists and subspecialists, and specialty medical
services, including chiropractic services, physical therapy, occupational
therapy, and rehabilitation services, within a reasonable distance or travel
time.

(9)
Each carrier must develop an access plan to meet the needs of vulnerable and
underserved populations among its health plan enrollees.

(a)
The plan must provide culturally appropriate services to the greatest extent
possible.

(b)
When a significant number of enrollees in the plan speak a first language other
than English, the plan must provide access to personnel fluent in languages
other than English, to the greatest extent possible.

(10)
Each health carrier must communicate enrollee information required in this
chapter by means that ensure that a substantial portion of the enrollee
population can make use of this information.

(11)
Each health carrier must have reasonable standards for waiting times for health
plan enrollees to obtain appointments with participating providers. The
standards must include appointment scheduling guidelines based upon the type of
health care service, including: Preventive, nonsymptomatic care; routine,
nonurgent symptomatic care; urgent care; and emergency care.

(12)
Each health plan must, at the carrier's expense, allow enrollees to continue
receiving services from a primary care provider whose contract with the plan or
whose contract with a subcontractor is being terminated by the plan without
cause under the terms of that contract, but must allow continued receipt of
services for no longer than sixty days following notice of termination to the
enrollees or, in group coverage arrangements involving periods of open
enrollment, only until the end of the next open enrollment period. The
provider's relationship with the health plan must be continued on the same
terms and conditions as those of the contract the plan is terminating, except
for any provision requiring that the health plan assign new enrollees to the
terminated provider.

(13)
Each health carrier must provide adequate telephone access by enrollees to
facilities and providers for sufficient time during business and evening hours
to ensure enrollee access to health services for covered health conditions.

(14)
Each health plan must hold enrollees harmless against claims from participating
providers for payment of costs of covered health services other than enrollees'
cost-sharing obligations. A health service that is the subject of an
unresolved grievance is a covered service for the purposes of this section.

(15)
Each carrier is accountable for and must oversee any activities required by
this section that it delegates to any subcontractor. No carrier may delegate
any activity required by this section unless the carrier has a written and
fully operational delegation policy that ensures that the subcontractor
fulfills the requirements of this chapter.

(16)
No contract with a subcontractor executed by the health carrier may relieve the
health carrier of its obligations to any enrollee for the provision of health
care services or of its responsibility for compliance with statutes or rules.

(17)
Every health carrier shall meet the standards set forth in this section and any
rules adopted by the commissioner to implement this section. For the purposes
of this section, the commissioner shall, when determining what is adequate and
reasonable, consider relevant standards adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health
care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
QUALITY HEALTH CARE. A carrier must have a fully operational, comprehensive,
written, quality improvement program that addresses access, continuity, and
quality of care for all health plan enrollees. The commissioner shall adopt,
in rule, quality improvement program requirements after considering relevant
standards adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and the
state agencies that purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
HEALTH INFORMATION PRIVACY. (1) Each health carrier shall develop and
implement policies and procedures governing the collection, use, and disclosure
of health information. These policies and procedures shall include methods for
enrollees to access information and amend incorrect information, for enrollees
to restrict the disclosure of sensitive information, and for enrollees to
obtain information about the carrier's health information policies. In
addition, these policies and procedures shall include methods for carrier
oversight and enforcement of information policies, for carrier storage and
disposal of health information, and for carrier conformance to state and
federal laws governing the collection, use, and disclosure of personally
identifiable health information. Each carrier shall provide a summary notice
of its health information policies to enrollees, including the enrollee's right
to restrict the collection, use, and disclosure of health information.

(2)
Except as otherwise required by statute or rule, a health carrier is, and all
persons acting at the direction of or on behalf of a carrier or in receipt of
an enrollee's personally identifiable health information are, prohibited from
collecting, using, or disclosing personally identifiable health information
unless authorized in writing by the person who is the subject of the
information. At a minimum, such authorization shall be valid for a limited
time and purpose; shall be specific as to purpose and type of information to be
collected, used, or disclosed; and shall identify the persons who will be
receiving the information.

(3)
Any person who is the subject of an unauthorized collection, use, or disclosure
of personally identifiable health information is entitled to the remedies
provided under RCW 9.73.060 governing violations of the right to privacy.

(4)
The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section and shall take
into consideration health information privacy standards recommended by the
national association of insurance commissioners and other related professional
organizations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
MEDICAL DIRECTORS. No health carrier may appoint a medical director who is not
a licensed physician in the state of Washington. The medical director is
responsible for all medical necessity determinations and any medical management
practices, including treatment policies, protocols, quality assurance
activities, and utilization management decisions for any health plan offered by
the carrier. The medical quality assurance commission shall develop a
definition of unprofessional conduct as it applies to the conduct of a
physician practicing as a health carrier medical director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
GRIEVANCE PROCESS. (1) Each health carrier must have a fully operational,
comprehensive, written grievance process that complies with the requirements of
this section and any rules adopted by the commissioner to implement this
section. For the purposes of this section, the commissioner shall consider grievance
process requirements adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations and state agency health care purchasers.

(2)
Each health carrier must process as a grievance:

(a)
An enrollee's complaint about the quality or availability of a health service;

(b)
An enrollee's request that the carrier reconsider its decision to modify,
discontinue, or deny a health service; its resolution of the enrollee's
complaint; or its first resolution of a grievance made by the enrollee; and

(c)
An enrollee's complaint about an issue other than the quality or availability
of a health service that the health carrier does not resolve within the
required response timeline.

(3)
Each health carrier must provide a clear explanation of the grievance process
upon request, upon enrollment to new enrollees, and annually to enrollees and
subcontractors.

(4)
To process a grievance, each carrier must:

(a)
Provide written notice to the enrollee when the grievance is received;

(b)
Assist the enrollee with the grievance process;

(c)
Expedite a grievance if the enrollee's provider or the carrier's medical
director determines, or if other evidence indicates, that following the
grievance process timelines could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's health or
ability to regain maximum function;

(d)
Cooperate with the representative that the enrollee may have chosen;

(e)
Consider information submitted by the enrollee;

(f)
Investigate and resolve the grievance; and

(g)
Provide written notice to the enrollee.

(5)
Each health carrier must provide written notice to an enrollee and the
enrollee's provider of its decision to modify, discontinue, or deny a health
service for the enrollee.

(6)
Written notice required by subsections (4) and (5) of this section must explain:

(a)
The carrier's decision and the supporting coverage or clinical reasons,
including any alternative health service that may be appropriate; and

(b)
The carrier's grievance process, including information, as appropriate, about
how to exercise enrollee's rights to a second opinion, how to continue
receiving services, and how to discuss a grievance resolution with an impartial
carrier representative authorized to resolve the grievance differently.

(7)
When an enrollee requests that the carrier reconsider its decision to modify or
discontinue a health service that an enrollee is receiving through the plan,
the health carrier must continue to provide that health service until the
grievance is resolved. If the resolution affirms the carrier's decision, the
enrollee may be responsible for the cost of this continued health service.

(8)
Each carrier must: Track each grievance until final resolution; maintain, and
make accessible to the commissioner for a period of three years, a log of all
grievances; and trend grievances for quality improvement purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF HEALTH CARE DISPUTES. (1) A health carrier
must develop and implement a process for the fair consideration of consumer
complaints relating to decisions by the health plan to deny or limit coverage
of or payment for health care in accordance with rules adopted by the
commissioner. Those rules shall:

(a)
Permit a person, whose appeal of an adverse decision is denied by the carrier,
to seek review of that determination by an independent review organization
assigned to the appeal in accordance with rules adopted by the commissioner;

(b)
Require carriers to provide to the appropriate independent review organization
not later than the third business day after the date the carrier receives a
request for review a copy of:

(i)
Any medical records of the enrollee that are relevant to the review;

(ii)
Any documents used by the plan in making the determination to be reviewed by
the organization;

(iii)
Any documentation and written information submitted to the carrier in support
of the appeal; and

(iv)
A list of each physician or health care provider who has provided care to the
enrollee and who may have medical records relevant to the appeal; and

(c)
Require carriers to comply with the independent review organization's
determination regarding the medical necessity or appropriateness of, or the
application of other health plan coverage criterion to, health care items and
services for an enrollee, and to pay for the independent review.

(2)
The review must be conducted by a health care provider currently licensed to
practice in this state and in the same field or specialty as the enrollee's
treating provider; however, such providers are limited to physicians licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, of podiatric physicians licensed under
chapter 18.22 RCW, and chiropractors licensed under chapter 18.25 RCW.

(3)
Health information or other confidential or proprietary information in the custody
of a carrier may be provided to an independent review organization, subject to
rules adopted by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF MEDICAL DECISIONS. (1) The commissioner shall:

(a)
Adopt rules for:

(i)
The certification, selection, and operation of independent review organizations
to perform independent review described by section 7 of this act; and

(ii)
The suspension and revocation of the certification;

(b)
Designate annually each organization that meets the standards as an independent
review organization;

(c)
Charge health carriers fees as necessary to fund the operations of independent
review organizations; and

(d)
Provide ongoing oversight of the independent review organizations to ensure
continued compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter.

(2)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must ensure:

(a)
The timely response of an independent review organization selected under this
chapter;

(b)
The confidentiality of medical records transmitted to an independent review
organization for use in independent reviews;

(c)
The qualifications and independence of each health care provider or physician
making review determinations for an independent review organization;

(d)
The fairness of the procedures used by an independent review organization in
making the determinations; and

(e)
Timely notice to enrollees of the results of the independent review, including
the clinical basis for the determination.

(3)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must include rules
that require each independent review organization to make its determination:

(a)
Not later than the earlier of:

(i)
The fifteenth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The twentieth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the request that the determination be made; and

(b)
In the case of a life‑threatening condition, not later than the earlier
of:

(i)
The fifth day after the date the independent review organization receives the
information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The eighth day after the date the independent review organization receives the
request that the determination be made.

(4)
To be certified as an independent review organization under this chapter, an
organization must submit to the commissioner an application in the form
required by the commissioner. The application must include:

(a)
For an applicant that is publicly held, the name of each stockholder or owner
of more than five percent of any stock or options;

(b)
The name of any holder of bonds or notes of the applicant that exceed one
hundred thousand dollars;

(c)
The name and type of business of each corporation or other organization that
the applicant controls or is affiliated with and the nature and extent of the
affiliation or control;

(d)
The name and a biographical sketch of each director, officer, and executive of
the applicant and any entity listed under (c) of this subsection and a
description of any relationship the named individual has with:

(i)
A health benefit plan;

(ii)
A health carrier;

(iii)
A utilization review agent;

(iv)
A nonprofit health corporation;

(v)
A health care provider; or

(vi)
A group representing any of the entities described in (d)(i) through (v) of
this subsection;

(e)
The percentage of the applicant's revenues that are anticipated to be derived
from reviews conducted under section 7 of this act;

(f)
A description of the areas of expertise of the health care professionals making
review determinations for the applicant; and

(g)
The procedures to be used by the independent review organization in making
review determinations regarding reviews conducted under section 7 of this act.

(5)
The independent review organization shall annually submit the information
required by subsection (4) of this section. If at any time there is a material
change in the information included in the application under subsection (4) of
this section, the independent review organization shall submit updated
information to the commissioner.

(6)
An independent review organization may not be a subsidiary of, or be in any way
owned or controlled by, a health carrier or a trade or professional association
of health carriers.

(7)
An independent review organization conducting a review under section 7 of this
act is not liable for damages arising from the determination made by the
organization. This subsection does not apply to an act or omission of the
independent review organization that is made in bad faith or that involves
gross negligence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
UNFAIR AND DECEPTIVE ACTS. (1) A health carrier shall not engage in unfair or
deceptive acts or practices as such acts and practices are prohibited under
chapter 48.30 RCW. Such acts and practices include but are not limited to the
placement of any advertisement before the public that is false, inaccurate, or
misleading. Such advertising is a matter affecting the public interest for the
purposes of applying chapter 19.86 RCW, and is not reasonable in relation to
the development and preservation of business. A violation of this section
constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce for the
purpose of applying chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2)
The commissioner may by rule define and prohibit other acts and practices by
health carriers found by the commissioner to be unfair and deceptive and
harmful to consumers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
HEALTH CARE DECISIONS. (1) Each health carrier, in its review of inpatient
medical and surgical benefits and outpatient medical and surgical benefits for
residents of this state, shall meet the standards set forth in this section.

(2)
Any decision to deny an admission, length of stay, extension of stay, or health
service or procedure must be made by a participating provider in consultation
with an appropriate specialty provider.

(3)
Carriers shall maintain a documented utilization review program description and
written utilization review criteria based on reasonable medical evidence. The
program must include a method for reviewing and updating criteria. Carriers
shall make clinical protocols, medical management standards, and other review
criteria available upon request to participating providers.

(4)
The commissioner shall adopt, in rule, standards for this section after
considering relevant standards adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations and the state agencies that purchase managed health care
services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. CARRIER
LIABILITY FINDINGS. The legislature finds that health carrier practices that
unjustly delay or deny medically appropriate care and treatment to consumers
are unconscionable. When consumers are facing serious, even life-threatening
diseases or conditions, they are least able to fight with their health carrier
in order to get access to needed health care and treatment. In order to
protect Washington residents in need of medically necessary care and treatment,
and to prevent inappropriate treatment delays or denials, the legislature finds
it is necessary to enact the consumer protections set out in this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

CARRIER
LIABILITY DEFINITIONS. (1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section.

(a)
"Appropriate and medically necessary" means the standard for health
care services as determined by physicians and health care providers in
accordance with the prevailing practice and standards of the medical profession
and community.

(b)
"Enrollee" means an individual covered by a health plan, including
dependents.

(c)
"Health care provider" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(d)
"Health care treatment decision" means a determination made regarding
whether a health care service or services are actually provided by the health
plan and a decision that affects the quality of the diagnosis, care, or
treatment provided to the plan's enrollees.

(e)
"Health carrier" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(f)
"Health plan" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005, except that
it includes a policy, contract, or agreement offered by any person, not merely
a health carrier.

(g)
"Managed care entity" means an entity other than a health carrier
that delivers, administers, or assumes risk for health care services with
systems or techniques to control or influence the quality, accessibility,
utilization, or costs and prices of the services to a defined enrollee
population, but does not include an employer purchasing coverage or acting on
behalf of its employees or the employees of one or more subsidiaries or
affiliated corporations of the employer or a pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW.

(h)
"Ordinary care" means, for a health carrier or managed care entity,
that degree of care that a health carrier or managed care entity of ordinary
prudence would use under the same or similar circumstances. For a person who
is an employee, agent, ostensible agent, or representative of a health carrier
or managed care entity, "ordinary care" means that degree of care
that a person of ordinary prudence in the same profession, specialty, or area
of practice as the person would use in the same or similar circumstances.

(2)(a)
A health carrier or a managed care entity for a health plan shall exercise
ordinary care when making health care treatment decisions and is liable for
damages for harm to an enrollee proximately caused by its failure to exercise
the ordinary care.

(b)
A health carrier or a managed care entity for a health plan is also liable for
damages for harm to an enrollee proximately caused by health care treatment
decisions made by its:

(i)
Employees;

(ii)
Agents;

(iii)
Ostensible agents; or

(iv)
Representatives who are acting on its behalf and over whom it has the right to
exercise influence or control or has actually exercised influence or control
that result in the failure to exercise ordinary care.

(3)
It is a defense to any action asserted under this section against a health
carrier or managed care entity for a health plan that:

(a)
Neither the health carrier or managed care entity, nor any employee, agent,
ostensible agent, or representative for whose conduct the health carrier or
managed care entity is liable under subsection (2)(b) of this section,
controlled, influenced, or participated in the health care decision; or

(b)
The health carrier or managed care entity did not deny or delay payment for
treatment prescribed or recommended by a provider to the enrollee.

(4)
The standards in subsection (2) of this section do not create an obligation on
the part of the health carrier or managed care entity to provide to an enrollee
treatment that is not covered by the health plan.

(5)
This section does not create any liability on the part of an employer or an
employer group purchasing organization that purchases coverage or assumes risk
on behalf of its employers.

(6)
Nothing in any law of this state prohibiting a health carrier or managed care
entity from practicing medicine or being licensed to practice medicine may be
asserted as a defense by the health carrier or managed care entity in an action
brought against it under this section.

(7)(a)
A person may not maintain a cause of action under this section against a health
carrier or managed care entity unless the affected enrollee or the enrollee's
representative:

(i)
Has exhausted any applicable reasonable grievance procedures provided for in
the health plan; or

(ii)
Has participated in the grievance process in good faith for ninety days.

(b)
The enrollee is not required to comply with (a) of this subsection and no
abatement or other penalty for failure to comply shall be imposed if the
enrollee has filed a pleading alleging in substance that:

(i)
Harm to the enrollee has already occurred because of the conduct of the health
carrier or managed care entity or because of an act or omission of an employee,
agent, ostensible agent, or representative of the carrier or entity for whose
conduct it is liable; or

(ii)
The review would not be beneficial to the enrollee, unless the court, upon
motion by a defendant carrier or entity, finds after hearing that the pleading
was not made in good faith.

(c)
This subsection (7) does not prohibit an enrollee from pursuing other
appropriate remedies, including injunctive relief, a declaratory judgment, or
other relief available under law, if their requirements place the enrollee's
health in serious jeopardy.

(8)
In an action against a health carrier, a finding that a physician or other
health care provider is an employee, agent, ostensible agent, or representative
of such a health carrier shall not be based solely on proof that the person's
name appears in a listing of approved physicians or health care providers made
available to enrollees under a health plan.

(9)
A person who is injured by a violation of this section may bring a civil action
in superior court to enjoin further violations, to recover the actual damages
sustained, or both, together with the costs of the suit, including reasonable
attorneys' fees, and the court may in its discretion, upon a finding of bad
faith on the part of the health carrier, increase the award of damages to an
amount not exceeding three times the actual damages sustained.

(10)
This section does not apply to workers' compensation insurance under Title 51
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A new
section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW to read as follows:

CARRIER
LIABILITY EXCLUSIONS. This chapter does not apply to actions under section 12
of this act for injuries resulting from health care treatment decisions made by
or on behalf of health carriers or managed care entities, including entities
listed in RCW 7.70.020(3). For purposes of this section:

(1)
"Health care treatment decision" means a determination made regarding
whether a health care service or services are actually provided by the health
plan and a decision that affects the quality of the diagnosis, care, or
treatment provided to the plan's enrollees;

(2)
"Health carrier" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005; and

(3)
"Managed care entity" means an entity other than a health carrier
that delivers, administers, or assumes risk for health care services with
systems or techniques to control or influence the quality, accessibility,
utilization, or costs and prices of the services to a defined enrollee
population, but does not include an employer purchasing coverage or acting on
behalf of its employees or the employees of one or more subsidiaries or
affiliated corporations of the employer or a pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW.

Sec.
14. RCW
4.16.350 and 1998 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any civil action for
damages for injury occurring as a result of health care which is provided after
June 25, 1976 against:

(((1)))
(a) A person licensed by this state to provide health care or related
services, including, but not limited to, a physician, osteopathic physician,
dentist, nurse, optometrist, ((podiatric)) pediatric physician
and surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist,
optician, physician's assistant, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse
practitioner, or physician's trained mobile intensive care paramedic,
including, in the event such person is deceased, his estate or personal
representative;

(((2)))
(b) An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), acting in the course and scope of
his employment, including, in the event such employee or agent is deceased, his
estate or personal representative; or

(((3)))
(c) An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or institution
employing one or more persons described in (a) of this subsection (((1)
of this section)), including, but not limited to, a hospital, clinic,
health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an officer, director,
employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of his employment,
including, in the event such officer, director, employee, or agent is deceased,
his estate or personal representative;

based
upon alleged professional negligence shall be commenced within three years of
the act or omission alleged to have caused the injury or condition, or one year
of the time the patient or his representative discovered or reasonably should
have discovered that the injury or condition was caused by said act or
omission, whichever period expires later, except that in no event shall an
action be commenced more than eight years after said act or omission:
PROVIDED, That the time for commencement of an action is tolled upon proof of
fraud, intentional concealment, or the presence of a foreign body not intended
to have a therapeutic or diagnostic purpose or effect, until the date the
patient or the patient's representative has actual knowledge of the act of
fraud or concealment, or of the presence of the foreign body; the patient or
the patient's representative has one year from the date of the actual knowledge
in which to commence a civil action for damages.

For
purposes of this ((section)) subsection, notwithstanding RCW
4.16.190, the knowledge of a custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed to a
person under the age of eighteen years, and such imputed knowledge shall
operate to bar the claim of such minor to the same extent that the claim of an
adult would be barred under this ((section)) subsection. Any
action not commenced in accordance with this ((section)) subsection
shall be barred.

For
purposes of this ((section)) subsection, with respect to care
provided after June 25, 1976, and before August 1, 1986, the knowledge of a
custodial parent or guardian shall be imputed as of April 29, 1987, to persons
under the age of eighteen years.

This
((section)) subsection does not apply to a civil action based on
intentional conduct brought against those individuals or entities specified in
this ((section)) subsection by a person for recovery of damages
for injury occurring as a result of childhood sexual abuse as defined in RCW
4.16.340(5).

(2)
Any action under section 12 of this act shall be commenced within three years
of the completion of the grievance process, if applicable, under section 12(7)
of this act, within three years of the accrual of the cause of action if the
grievance process under section 12(7) of this act is not applicable, but in no
event shall an action be commenced more than eight years after the relevant act
or omission occurred.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act are each added to chapter 48.43 RCW.

---
END ---