BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW to read as follows:

When the spouse of a fifty-five year old or older insured dies,
insurance companies writing automobile liability and physical damage insurance
in this state shall continue to apply to the premium paid by the surviving
insured, on a prorated basis, all discounts associated with marital status and
the driving record of the deceased spouse for a period of one year after the
death of the spouse or until the insured remarries.

---
END ---