BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that many issues relating to the marine environment can and
should be addressed at the county level. The legislature further finds that
county governments could benefit from the establishment of marine resource
committees. The committees would be responsible for ensuring that issues of
importance relating to the marine environment were solved in a public manner,
and with the input of interested parties. The legislature further finds that
state governmental entities often can provide technical expertise that would
aid in solving marine issues of local importance. Therefore, it is the intent
of the legislature to enable county governments to adopt the marine resource
committee structure, and to encourage state government agencies to assist in
such processes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

County
governments may form marine resource committees for the purpose of addressing
issues of concern relating to the local marine environment. These issues may
include but are not limited to: Declines in fisheries, the operation of
personal and other watercraft, general increases in human activity on a
development of the shoreline, the impact of both point and nonpoint pollution
sources, and the establishment of voluntary no-take fishing zones in
conjunction with the Washington fish and wildlife commission. The committees
may be specifically authorized to provide advice to the county legislative
authority.

A
committee that is formed under this section may request the involvement and
assistance of state agencies. A state agency that receives such a request
should provide needed assistance, unless specific reasons for not providing
assistance exist. The assistance may include: Technical aid, identification
of funding sources, and expertise on state programs relating to wildlife,
habitat, pollution sources, recreation, economic development, aquatic lands, or
any other related subject.

A committee that adopts a voluntary no-take zone shall provide
specific details regarding the zone, including a map, to the fish and wildlife
commission. This information shall be included in all published informational
materials relating to fishing seasons that are regularly issued by the fish and
wildlife commission.

---
END ---