BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.05.011 and 1996 c 39 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2)
"State purchased health care" or "health care" means
medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority,
the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the
department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4)
"Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a
health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health
maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5)
"Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to
choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee
contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the
authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the
authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each
such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for
the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such
employee organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract
with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7)
"Dependent" means the spouse of the employee, the dependent child
and dependent parent of the employee or of the employee's spouse and, in
addition, with respect to state employees, includes a state employee's domestic
partner and domestic partner's dependent child or dependent parent.

(8)
"Domestic partner" means the person designated by a state employee in
an affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

(9)
"Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under
RCW 41.05.055.

(((8)))
(10) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:

(a)
Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational
service district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32
or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation
receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW;

(c)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to
receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW.

(((9)))
(11) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only
contribution plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs
which will allow the employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26
U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(((10)))
(12) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or
wages.

(((11)))
(13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the
eligibility and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(((12)))
(14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.

(((13)))
(15) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1,
1996, and who are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of
service under the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.32.010(40).

Sec.
2. RCW
41.05.011 and 1998 c 341 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2)
"State purchased health care" or "health care" means
medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority,
the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the
department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4)
"Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a
health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health
maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5)
"Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to
choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee
contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the
authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the
authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each
such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for
the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such
employee organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract
with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7)
"Dependent" means the spouse of the employee, the dependent child
and dependent parent of the employee or of the employee's spouse and, in
addition, with respect to state employees, includes a state employee's domestic
partner and domestic partner's dependent child or dependent parent.

(8)
"Domestic partner" means the person designated by a state employee in
an affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

(9)
"Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under
RCW 41.05.055.

(((8)))
(10) "Retired or disabled school employee" means:

(a)
Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational service
district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40
RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation
receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW;

(c)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to
receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32 or 41.40 RCW.

(((9)))
(11) "Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only
contribution plan, a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan
whereby state and public employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs
which will allow the employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26
U.S.C. Sec. 125 or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(((10)))
(12) "Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or
wages.

(((11)))
(13) "Participant" means an individual who fulfills the
eligibility and enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(((12)))
(14) "Plan year" means the time period established by the
authority.

(((13)))
(15) "Separated employees" means persons who separate from
employment with an employer as defined in:

(a)
RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b)
RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000;

and who
are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the
teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40) or the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.35.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A state employee may designate a person as a domestic partner by providing an
affidavit in a form prescribed by the administrator in which the employee
attests that:

(a)
The employee is participating in a domestic partnership;

(b)
The employee and the domestic partner:

(i)
Share the same regular and permanent residence;

(ii)
Have a close personal relationship;

(iii)
Have agreed to be jointly responsible for basic living expenses incurred during
the domestic partnership;

(iv)
Are not married to anyone;

(v)
Are each eighteen years of age or older;

(vi)
Are not related to each other by blood closer than would bar marriage in this
state;

(vii)
Were mentally competent to consent to contract when their domestic partnership
began; and

(viii)
Are each other's sole domestic partner and are responsible for each other's
common welfare; and

(c)
Any prior domestic partnership in which the employee or his or her domestic
partner participated with a third party was terminated not less than ninety
days prior to the date of the affidavit, or by the death of that third party,
whichever was earlier.

(2)
The administrator may require by rule that the affidavit include other
information deemed necessary to establishing a domestic partnership.

(3)
The state employee must agree to notify the administrator if there is a change
in the circumstances attested to in the affidavit.

(4)
A domestic partnership ends when one or more of the conditions attested to in
the affidavit are no longer met or upon the death of a domestic partner.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.05.065 and 1996 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall study all matters connected with the provision of health care
coverage, life insurance, liability insurance, accidental death and
dismemberment insurance, and disability income insurance or any of, or a
combination of, the enumerated types of insurance for employees and their
dependents on the best basis possible with relation both to the welfare of the
employees and to the state. However, liability insurance shall not be made
available to dependents.

(2)
The board shall develop employee benefit plans that include comprehensive
health care benefits for all employees. In developing these plans, the board
shall consider the following elements:

(a)
Methods of maximizing cost containment while ensuring access to quality health
care;

(b)
Development of provider arrangements that encourage cost containment and ensure
access to quality care, including but not limited to prepaid delivery systems
and prospective payment methods;

(c)
Wellness incentives that focus on proven strategies, such as smoking cessation,
injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse, appropriate weight
reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood cholesterol
reduction, and nutrition education;

(d)
Utilization review procedures including, but not limited to a cost-efficient
method for prior authorization of services, hospital inpatient length of stay
review, requirements for use of outpatient surgeries and second opinions for
surgeries, review of invoices or claims submitted by service providers, and
performance audit of providers;

(e)
Effective coordination of benefits;

(f)
Minimum standards for insuring entities; and

(g)
Minimum scope and content of public employee benefit plans to be offered to
enrollees participating in the employee health benefit plans. To maintain the
comprehensive nature of employee health care benefits, employee eligibility
criteria related to the number of hours worked and the benefits provided to
employees shall be substantially equivalent to the state employees' health
benefits plan and eligibility criteria in effect on January 1, 1993. Nothing
in this subsection (2)(g) shall prohibit changes or increases in employee
point-of-service payments or employee premium payments for benefits.

(3)
The board shall design benefits and determine the terms and conditions of
employee participation and coverage, including establishment of eligibility
criteria.

(4)
The board may authorize premium contributions for an employee and the employee's
dependents in a manner that encourages the use of cost-efficient managed health
care systems.

(5)
Employees shall choose participation in one of the health care benefit plans
developed by the board and may be permitted to waive coverage under terms and conditions
established by the board.

(6)
The board shall review plans proposed by insuring entities that desire to offer
property insurance and/or accident and casualty insurance to state employees
through payroll deduction. The board may approve any such plan for payroll
deduction by insuring entities holding a valid certificate of authority in the
state of Washington and which the board determines to be in the best interests
of employees and the state. The board shall promulgate rules setting forth criteria
by which it shall evaluate the plans.

(7)
Before January 1, 1998, the public employees' benefits board shall make
available one or more fully insured long-term care insurance plans that comply
with the requirements of chapter 48.84 RCW. Such programs shall be made
available to eligible employees, retired employees, and retired school
employees as well as eligible dependents which, for the purpose of this
section, includes the parents of the employee or retiree and the parents of the
spouse or domestic partner of the employee or retiree. Employees of
local governments and employees of political subdivisions not otherwise
enrolled in the public employees' benefits board sponsored medical programs may
enroll under terms and conditions established by the administrator, if it does
not jeopardize the financial viability of the public employees' benefits
board's long-term care offering.

(a)
Participation of eligible employees or retired employees and retired school
employees in any long-term care insurance plan made available by the public
employees' benefits board is voluntary and shall not be subject to binding
arbitration under chapter 41.56 RCW. Participation is subject to reasonable
underwriting guidelines and eligibility rules established by the public
employees' benefits board and the health care authority.

(b)
The employee, retired employee, and retired school employee are solely
responsible for the payment of the premium rates developed by the health care
authority. The health care authority is authorized to charge a reasonable
administrative fee in addition to the premium charged by the long-term care
insurer, which shall include the health care authority's cost of
administration, marketing, and consumer education materials prepared by the
health care authority and the office of the insurance commissioner.

(c)
To the extent administratively possible, the state shall establish an automatic
payroll or pension deduction system for the payment of the long-term care
insurance premiums.

(d)
The public employees' benefits board and the health care authority shall
establish a technical advisory committee to provide advice in the development
of the benefit design and establishment of underwriting guidelines and
eligibility rules. The committee shall also advise the board and authority on
effective and cost-effective ways to market and distribute the long-term care
product. The technical advisory committee shall be comprised, at a minimum, of
representatives of the office of the insurance commissioner, providers of
long-term care services, licensed insurance agents with expertise in long-term
care insurance, employees, retired employees, retired school employees, and
other interested parties determined to be appropriate by the board.

(e)
The health care authority shall offer employees, retired employees, and retired
school employees the option of purchasing long-term care insurance through
licensed agents or brokers appointed by the long-term care insurer. The
authority, in consultation with the public employees' benefits board, shall
establish marketing procedures and may consider all premium components as a
part of the contract negotiations with the long-term care insurer.

(f)
In developing the long-term care insurance benefit designs, the public employees'
benefits board shall include an alternative plan of care benefit, including
adult day services, as approved by the office of the insurance commissioner.

(g)
The health care authority, with the cooperation of the office of the insurance
commissioner, shall develop a consumer education program for the eligible
employees, retired employees, and retired school employees designed to provide
education on the potential need for long-term care, methods of financing
long-term care, and the availability of long-term care insurance products
including the products offered by the board.

(h)
By December 1998, the health care authority, in consultation with the public
employees' benefits board, shall submit a report to the appropriate committees
of the legislature, including an analysis of the marketing and distribution of
the long-term care insurance provided under this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
41.05.080 and 1996 c 39 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set by the board:

(a)
Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school employees, or
employees of county, municipal, or other political subdivisions covered by this
chapter who are retired may continue their participation in insurance plans and
contracts after retirement or disablement;

(b)
Separated employees may continue their participation in insurance plans and
contracts if participation is selected immediately upon separation from
employment.

(2)
Rates charged to retired or disabled employees, separated employees,
spouses or domestic partners, or dependent children who are not eligible
for parts A and B of medicare shall be based on the experience of the community
rated risk pool established under RCW 41.05.022.

(3)
Rates charged to retired or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses or
domestic partners, or children who are eligible for parts A and B of
medicare shall be calculated from a separate experience risk pool comprised
only of individuals eligible for parts A and B of medicare; however, the
premiums charged to medicare-eligible retirees and disabled employees shall be
reduced by the amount of the subsidy provided under RCW 41.05.085.

(4)
Retired or disabled and separated employees shall be responsible for payment of
premium rates developed by the authority which shall include the cost to the
authority of providing insurance coverage including any amounts necessary for
reserves and administration in accordance with this chapter. These self pay
rates will be established based on a separate rate for the employee, the spouse
or domestic partner, and the children.

(5)
The term "retired state employees" for the purpose of this section
shall include but not be limited to members of the legislature whether
voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

Sec.
6. RCW
41.05.085 and 1994 c 153 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
with the appropriations act for the 1995-1997 biennium, the legislature shall
establish as part of both the state employees' and the school and educational
service district employees' insurance benefit allocation the portion of the
allocation to be used to provide a subsidy to reduce the health care insurance
premiums charged to retired or disabled school district and educational service
district employees, or retired state employees, who are eligible for parts A
and B of medicare. The amount of any premium reduction shall be established by
the board, but shall not result in a premium reduction of more than fifty
percent. The board may also determine the amount of any subsidy to be
available to spouses or domestic partners and dependents.

Sec.
7. RCW
41.05.090 and 1990 c 222 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an employee, spouse or domestic partner, or covered dependent
becomes ineligible under the state plan and wishes to continue coverage on an
individual basis with the same provider under the state plan, such employee, spouse
or domestic partner, or covered dependent shall be entitled to
immediately transfer and shall not be required to undergo any waiting period
before obtaining individual coverage.

(2)
Entitlement to a conversion contract under the terms of this section shall not
apply to any employee, spouse or domestic partner, or covered dependent
who is:

(a)
Eligible for federal medicare coverage; or

(b)
Covered under another group plan, policy, contract, or agreement providing
benefits for hospital or medical care.

(3)
Entitlement to conversion under the terms of this section shall not apply to
any employee terminated for misconduct, except that conversion shall be offered
to the spouse or domestic partner and covered dependents of the
terminated employee.

Sec.
8. RCW
41.06.150 and 1996 c 319 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this
chapter, as now or hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1)
The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2)
Certification of names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with
the number of names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be
filled, such names representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists:
PROVIDED, That when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score
among the names certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3)
Examinations for all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4)
Appointments;

(5)
Training and career development;

(6)
Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary
employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry
level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7)
Transfers;

(8)
Sick leaves and vacations. The rules shall include the same provisions with
respect to employee domestic partners as defined in RCW 41.05.011 and the
children or other family members of employee domestic partners as is provided
with respect to employee spouses and the children or other family members of
employee spouses;

(9)
Hours of work;

(10)
Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to
seniority;

(11)
Determination of appropriate bargaining units within any agency: PROVIDED,
That in making such determination the board shall consider the duties, skills,
and working conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining
by the employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of
organization among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

(12)
Certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives:
PROVIDED, That after certification of an exclusive bargaining representative
and upon the representative's request, the director shall hold an election
among employees in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to
require as a condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive
bargaining representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning
of employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an
election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of
employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment
of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right
of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee is a
member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular
union dues minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs, and such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled
to all the representation rights of a union member;

(13)
Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives
providing for grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel
matters over which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit
of such agency may lawfully exercise discretion;

(14)
Written agreements may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee
organization dues upon authorization by the employee member and for the
cancellation of such payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice
by the employee with the appointing authority and the employee organization:
PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein permits or grants to any employee the
right to strike or refuse to perform his or her official duties;

(15)
Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan for all positions
in the classified service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties
and responsibilities of each such position.

(a)
The board shall not adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless
implementation of the proposed revision or study will result in net cost
savings, increased efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or
services, and the proposed revision or study has been approved by the director
of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b)
Beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the requirements
of (a) of this subsection:

(i)
The board may approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only
if:

(A)
The implementation will not result in additional net costs and the proposed
implementation has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B)
The implementation will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of
all such actions approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature
specifically for this purpose; or

(C)
The implementation is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are
defined as emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions
necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general
welfare, which do not exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section 718(2),
chapter 18, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii)
The board shall approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments
to the classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and
retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii)
Adjustments made to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt
from (b)(i) through (ii) of this subsection.

(c)
Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented
during the 1997-99 and subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this
subsection and RCW 41.06.152;

(16)
Allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(17)
Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing
rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental units but
the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to
attain comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and
that, for institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be
competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in
which an institution of higher education or related board is located, such
adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of financial
management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(18)
Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on
length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as
to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(19)
Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with
recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for
veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their
surviving spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to
their unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in
the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active military
service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who has less
than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred in the
line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and who,
upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(20)
Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss,
suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not
have specific statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may
not authorize such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major
subdivision of the agency;

(21)
Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified positions before
July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and
promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this chapter;

(22)
Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training,
and career development; development and implementation of affirmative action
goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and
timetables.

The
board shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of
rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department of personnel shall
transmit a report annually to the human rights commission which states the
progress each state agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and
timetables.

Sec.
9. RCW
49.12.270 and 1988 c 236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An employer shall allow an employee to use the employee's accrued sick leave to
care for a child of the employee under the age of eighteen with a health
condition that requires treatment or supervision. Use of leave other than
accrued sick leave to care for a child under the circumstances described in
this section shall be governed by the terms of the appropriate collective
bargaining agreement or employer policy, as applicable.

(2)
"Child of the employee" means the biological or adopted child of the
employee or employee's spouse, or a child under the legal guardianship, legal
custody, or foster care of the employee and, with respect to state employees,
includes the biological or adopted child of the employee's domestic partner as
defined in RCW 41.05.011.

Sec.
10. RCW
49.78.020 and 1996 c 178 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Child" means a biological or adopted child, or a stepchild, living
with the employee, including, with respect to state employees, the
biological or adopted child of a domestic partner as defined in RCW 41.05.011.

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Employee" means a person other than an independent contractor
employed by an employer on a continuous basis for the previous fifty-two weeks
for at least thirty-five hours per week.

(4)
"Employer" means: (a) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and includes any
unit of local government including, but not limited to, a county, city, town,
municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political subdivision,
which (i) employed a daily average of one hundred or more employees during the
last calendar quarter at the place where the employee requesting leave reports
for work, or (ii) employed a daily average of one hundred or more employees
during the last calendar quarter within a twenty mile radius of the place where
the employee requesting leave reports for work, where the employer maintains a
central hiring location and customarily transfers employees among workplaces;
and (b) the state, state institutions, and state agencies.

(5)
"Family leave" means leave from employment to care for a newborn or
newly adopted child under the age of six or a child under eighteen years old
with a terminal health condition, as provided in RCW 49.78.030.

(6)
"Health care provider" means a person licensed as a physician under
chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57
RCW.

(7)
"Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent, or a stepparent.

(8)
"Reduced leave schedule" means leave scheduled for fewer than an
employee's usual number of hours or days per workweek.

(9) "Terminal health condition" means a condition caused
by injury, disease, or illness, that, within reasonable medical judgment, is
incurable and will produce death within the period of leave to which the
employee is entitled.

Sec.
11. RCW
49.12.350 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that employers often distinguish between biological parents,
and adoptive parents and stepparents, including the domestic partner of the
biological parent, in their employee leave policies. Many employers who
grant leave to their employees to care for a newborn child either have no
policy or establish a more restrictive policy regarding whether an adoptive
parent or stepparent can take similar leave. The legislature further finds
that many employers establish different leave policies for men and women
regarding the care of a newborn or newly placed child. The legislature
recognizes that the bonding that occurs between a parent and child is important
to the nurturing of that child, regardless of whether the parent is the child's
biological parent and regardless of the gender of the parent. For these
reasons, the legislature declares that it is the public policy of this state to
require that employers who grant leave to their employees to care for a newborn
child make the same leave available upon the same terms for adoptive parents
and stepparents, men and women.

Sec.
12. RCW
49.12.360 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
An employer must grant an adoptive parent or a stepparent, at the time of birth
or initial placement for adoption of a child under the age of six, the same
leave under the same terms as the employer grants to biological parents.

(b)
An employer who is a state agency as defined in RCW 41.06.020(1), in addition
to complying with (a) of this subsection, must grant a state employee who is a
domestic partner, at the time of birth or initial placement for adoption of a
child, the same leave under the same terms as the employer grants to biological
parents.

(c)
As a term of leave under this section, an employer may restrict leave to
those living with the child at the time of birth or initial placement.

(2)
An employer must grant the same leave upon the same terms for men as it does
for women.

(3)
The department shall administer and investigate violations of this section.
Notices of infraction, penalties, and appeals shall be administered in the same
manner as violations under RCW 49.12.285.

(4)
For purposes of this section((,)):

(a)
"Employer" includes all private and public employers listed in
RCW 49.12.005(3).

(((5)
For purposes of this section,)) (b) "Leave" means
any leave from employment granted to care for a newborn or a newly adopted
child at the time of placement for adoption.

(c)
"Domestic partner" means a state employee in a domestic partnership
complying with section 3 of this act.

(((6)))
(5) Nothing in this section requires an employer to:

(a)
Grant leave equivalent to maternity disability leave; or

(b)
Establish a leave policy to care for a newborn or newly placed child if no such
leave policy is in place for any of its employees.

Sec.
13. RCW
2.10.030 and 1997 c 88 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the "Washington judicial retirement
system" provided herein.

(2)
"Judge" means a person elected or appointed to serve as judge of a
court of record as provided in chapters 2.04, 2.06, and 2.08 RCW.
"Judge" does not include a person serving as a judge pro tempore
except for a judge pro tempore appointed under RCW 2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2).

(3)
"Retirement board" means the "Washington judicial retirement
board" established herein.

(4)
"Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a judge.
"Surviving spouse" does not include the divorced spouse of a judge.

(5)
"Retirement fund" means the "Washington judicial retirement
fund" established herein.

(6)
"Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of a retirement allowance,
disability allowance or any other benefit described herein.

(7)
"Monthly salary" means the monthly salary of the position held by the
judge.

(8)
"Service" means all periods of time served as a judge, as herein
defined. Any calendar month at the beginning or end of a term in which ten or
more days are served shall be counted as a full month of service: PROVIDED,
That no more than one month's service may be granted for any one calendar
month. Only months of service will be counted in the computation of any
retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter. Years of
service shall be determined by dividing the total months of service by twelve.
Any fraction of a year of service as so determined shall be taken into account
in the computation of such retirement allowance or benefit.

(9)
"Final average salary" means (a) for a judge in service in the same
court for a minimum of twelve consecutive months preceding the date of
retirement, the salary attached to the position held by the judge immediately
prior to retirement; (b) for any other judge, the average monthly salary paid
over the highest twenty-four month period in the last ten years of service.

(10)
"Retirement allowance" for the purpose of applying cost of living
increases or decreases includes retirement allowances, disability allowances
and survivorship benefit.

(11)
"Index" means for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index for urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items
(1957-1959 equal one hundred) ‑- compiled by the bureau of labor statistics,
United States department of labor.

(12)
"Accumulated contributions" means the total amount deducted from the
judge's monthly salary pursuant to RCW 2.10.090, together with the regular
interest thereon from July 1, 1988, as determined by the director of the
department of retirement systems.

(13)
"Domestic partner" means the person designated by a judge in an
affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

Sec.
14. RCW
2.10.140 and 1988 c 109 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A surviving spouse or domestic partner of any judge holding such office,
or if he dies after having retired and who, at the time of his death, has
served ten or more years in the aggregate, shall receive a monthly allowance
equal to fifty percent of the retirement allowance the retired judge was
receiving, or fifty percent of the retirement allowance the active judge would
have received had he been retired on the date of his death, but in no event
less than twenty-five percent of the final average salary that the deceased
judge was receiving: PROVIDED, That said surviving spouse had been married to
the judge for a minimum of two years at time of death, or the domestic
partner had been designated as a domestic partner for a minimum of two years at
the time of death.

(2)
A judge holding office on July 1, 1988, may make an irrevocable choice to
relinquish the survivor benefits provided by this section in exchange for the
survivor benefits provided by RCW 2.10.144 and 2.10.146 by indicating the
choice in a written declaration submitted to the department of retirement
systems by December 31, 1988.

(3)
The surviving spouse or domestic partner of any judge who died in office
after January 1, 1986, but before July 1, 1988, may elect to receive the
survivor benefit provided in RCW 2.10.144(1).

Sec.
15. RCW
2.12.030 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Supreme
court, court of appeals, or superior court judges of the state who retire from
office under the provisions of this chapter other than as provided in RCW
2.12.012 shall be entitled to receive monthly during the period of their
natural life, out of the fund hereinafter created, an amount equal to one-half
of the monthly salary they were receiving as a judge at the time of their
retirement, or at the end of the term immediately prior to their retirement if
their retirement is made after expiration of their term. The surviving spouse or
domestic partner of any judge who shall have heretofore retired or may
hereafter retire, or of a judge who was heretofore or may hereafter be eligible
for retirement at the time of death, if the surviving spouse had been married
to the judge for three years or domestic partner designated for three years,
if the surviving spouse had been married to the judge prior to retirement or
the domestic partner designated prior to retirement, shall be paid an
amount equal to one-half of the retirement pay of the judge, as long as such
surviving spouse remains unmarried and is not a domestic partner or domestic
partner remains unmarried and is not a domestic partner. The retirement
pay shall be paid monthly by the state treasurer on or before the tenth day of
each month. The provisions of this section shall apply to the surviving spouse
or domestic partner of any judge who dies while holding such office or
dies after having retired under the provisions of this chapter and who at the
time of death had served ten or more years in the aggregate as a judge of the
supreme court, court of appeals, or superior court or any of such courts, or
had served an aggregate of twelve years in the supreme court, court of appeals,
or superior court if such pension rights are based upon RCW 2.12.012.

Sec.
16. RCW
28B.10.400 and 1979 ex.s. c 259 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
boards of regents of the state universities, the boards of trustees of the
regional universities and of The Evergreen State College, and the state board
for community and technical colleges ((education)) are
authorized and empowered:

(1)
To assist the faculties and such other employees as any such board may
designate in the purchase of old age annuities or retirement income plans under
such rules and regulations as any such board may prescribe. County
agricultural agents, home demonstration agents, 4-H club agents, and assistant
county agricultural agents paid jointly by the Washington State University and
the several counties shall be deemed to be full time employees of the
Washington State University for the purposes hereof;

(2)
To provide, under such rules and regulations as any such board may prescribe
for the faculty members or other employees under its supervision, for the
retirement of any such faculty member or other employee on account of age or
condition of health, retirement on account of age to be not earlier than the
sixty-fifth birthday: PROVIDED, That such faculty member or such other
employee may elect to retire at the earliest age specified for retirement by
federal social security law: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any supplemental payment
authorized by subsection (3) of this section and paid as a result of retirement
earlier than age sixty-five shall be at an actuarially reduced rate;

(3)
To pay to any such retired person or to his designated beneficiary(s), each
year after his retirement, a supplemental amount which, when added to the
amount of such annuity or retirement income plan, or retirement income benefit
pursuant to RCW 28B.10.415, received by him or his designated beneficiary(s) in
such year, will not exceed fifty percent of the average annual salary paid to
such retired person for his highest two consecutive years of full time service
under an annuity or retirement income plan established pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section at an institution of higher education: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That if such retired person prior to his retirement elected a supplemental
payment survivors option, any such supplemental payments to such retired person
or his designated beneficiary(s) shall be at actuarially reduced rates:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That if a faculty member or other employee of an institution
of higher education who is a participant in a retirement plan authorized by
this section dies, or has died before retirement but after becoming eligible
for retirement on account of age, the designated beneficiary(s) shall be
entitled to receive the supplemental payment authorized by this subsection (3)
of this section to which such designated beneficiary(s) would have been
entitled had said deceased faculty member or other employee retired on the date
of death after electing a supplemental payment survivors option: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That for the purpose of this subsection, the designated beneficiary(s)
shall be (a) the surviving spouse or domestic partner of the retiree;
or, (b) with the written consent of such spouse, if any, such other person or
persons as shall have an insurable interest in the retiree's life and shall
have been nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
retiree's institution of higher education. As used in this section and RCW
28B.10.431, "domestic partner" means the person designated by the
retiree in an affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

Sec.
17. RCW
28B.10.431 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 56 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any provision of law to the contrary, effective July 1, 1983, the monthly
benefit of each person who either is receiving a benefit pursuant to a program
established under RCW 28B.10.400 for their service as of July 1, 1978, or
commenced receiving a monthly benefit as a surviving spouse or domestic
partner or written designated beneficiary with an insurable interest in the
retiree as of a date no later than December 31, 1982, shall be permanently
increased by a post-retirement adjustment of $.74 per month for each year of
creditable service the faculty member or employee established with the annuity
or retirement income plan. Any fraction of a year of service shall be counted
in the computation of the post-retirement adjustment.

Sec.
18. RCW
28B.10.567 and 1987 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
boards of regents of the state universities and board of trustees of the
regional universities and the board of trustees of The Evergreen State College
are authorized and empowered, under such rules and regulations as any such
board may prescribe for the duly sworn police officers employed by any such
board as members of a police force established pursuant to RCW 28B.10.550, to
provide for the payment of death or disability benefits or medical expense
reimbursement for death, disability, or injury of any such duly sworn police
officer who, in the line of duty, loses his life or becomes disabled or is
injured, and for the payment of such benefits to be made to any such duly sworn
police officer or his surviving spouse or domestic partner or the legal
guardian of his child or children, as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), or his
estate: PROVIDED, That the duty-related benefits authorized by this section
shall in no event be greater than the benefits authorized on June 25, 1976 for
duty-related death, disability, or injury of a law enforcement officer under
chapter 41.26 RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the duty-related benefits authorized
by this section shall be reduced to the extent of any amounts received or
eligible to be received on account of the duty-related death, disability, or
injury to any such duly sworn police officer, his surviving spouse or
domestic partner, the legal guardian of his child or children, or his
estate, under workers' compensation, social security including the changes
incorporated under Public Law 89-97 as now or hereafter amended, or disability
income insurance and health care plans under chapter 41.05 RCW. As used in
this section, "domestic partner" means the person designated by the
police officer in an affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

Sec.
19. RCW
41.26.030 and 1996 c 178 s 11 and 1996 c 38 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(2)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any
city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal
corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter, any
authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of
RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents
the fire fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over
20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which
is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or fire fighters
as defined in this chapter.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to the
extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter:

(i)
The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or district;

(ii)
The elected officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii)
The governing body of any other general authority law enforcement agency; or

(iv)
A four-year institution of higher education having a fully operational fire
department as of January 1, 1996.

(3)
"Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person
who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully
compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington
generally, with the following qualifications:

(a)
No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or
secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law
enforcement officer;

(b)
Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title
pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service
examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different
title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized
by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement
officers;

(c)
Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been
appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have
been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by
city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the
city shall be considered city police officers;

(d)
The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer
under RCW 41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years previous membership
in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of
this subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e)
The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on
or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public
safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or
fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population
of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not
apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is
receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(4)
"Fire fighter" means:

(a)
Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member
of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which
requires passing a civil service examination for fire fighter, and who is
actively employed as such;

(b)
Anyone who is actively employed as a full time fire fighter where the fire
department does not have a civil service examination;

(c)
Supervisory fire fighter personnel;

(d)
Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection
districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection
(4)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(e)
The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is
an employer under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or hereafter amended), if such
individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system
established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection
(4)(e) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(f)
Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an
employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a
dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for fire
fighter; and

(g)
Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated
basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement
contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW.

(5)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(6)
"Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member.
"Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member
except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.

(7)(a)
"Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is
under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full time care of a state
institution, who is:

(i)
A natural born child;

(ii)
A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits
are payable under this chapter;

(iii)
A posthumous child;

(iv)
A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date
benefits are payable under this chapter; or

(v)
An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable
under this chapter.

(b)
A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of
twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or
vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved
by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and
all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational
institution after which the child returns to school.

(8)
"Member" means any fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or other
person as would apply under subsections (3) or (4) of this section whose
membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law
enforcement officer and fire fighter who is employed in that capacity on or
after such date.

(9)
"Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system fund" as provided for
herein.

(10)
"Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(11)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit
described herein.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.

(12)(a)
"Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member
holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the
date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at
time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member
who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank
preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries
payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within
such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed,
computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests
pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of vesting.

(b)
"Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly average
of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit
months of service prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death.
Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the
calculation of final average salary.

(13)(a)
"Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of
salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or
special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be
computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be
based.

(b)
"Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by
a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime
payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions
established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States
Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual
sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or
any form of severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the
legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's basic
salary be the greater of:

(i)
The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in
the legislature; or

(ii)
Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment
and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the
retirement system required because basic salary under (b)(i) of this subsection
is greater than basic salary under (b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by
the member for both member and employer contributions.

(14)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an
employer as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation
is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in
duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service
in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit
shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member
from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy
or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only
service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any
retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i)
For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of
a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also
include (A) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to
the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension
act, and (B) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a
particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160 or
41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service
rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of
such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless
such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under
the provisions of such prior act.

(ii)
A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be
credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the
member rendered such dual service.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member
for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more
hours per calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month.
Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic
salary is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per
calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of
employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is
earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service
credit month.

Members
of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective
position may elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service
credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the total number of
service credit months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit
year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation
of such retirement allowance or benefits.

If
a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar
month, the individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit
during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is
rendered; or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar
month in which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety
hours is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(15)
"Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made
by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued
interest credited thereon.

(16)
"Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or
retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit
payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the
date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during
the period of retirement.

(17)
"Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the financial
condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the present
monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present monetary
value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to mortality
among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability,
retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(18)
"Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county
disability board or the city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(19)
"Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion
thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's
full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition
contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20)
"Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period
following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member
is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.

(21)
"Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which
may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(22)
"Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as
minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall
be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a)
Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own
behalf, for

(i)
Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is
required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii)
Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the
hospital.

(b)
Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other
medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered as
"hospital expenses".

(i)
The fees of the following:

(A)
A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B)
An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter
18.57 RCW;

(C)
A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii)
The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily
resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member
or the member's spouse or domestic partner.

(iii)
The charges for the following medical services and supplies:

(A)
Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B)
Diagnostic x-ray and laboratory examinations;

(C)
X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D)
Anesthesia and oxygen;

(E)
Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F)
Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G)
Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a
hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H)
Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or
her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within
ninety days after the accident;

(I)
Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J)
Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;

(K)
Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced
by voluntary donors;

(L)
An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(23)
"Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)
"Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement
system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer by such member.

(25)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(26)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(27)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to state-wide office or elected or appointed as a member
of the legislature.

(28)
"Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1,
1977.

(29)
"Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1,
1977.

(30)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(31)
"Service credit month" means a full service credit month or an
accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(32)
"General authority law enforcement agency" means any agency,
department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or
other unit of local government of this state, and any agency, department, or
division of state government, having as its primary function the detection and
apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or
criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state patrol. Such
an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a limited authority
law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the apprehension or
detection of persons committing infractions or violating the traffic or
criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not limited to,
the state departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and social and
health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery commission,
the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and
transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and the state
department of corrections.

(33)
"Domestic partner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 41.05.011.

Sec.
20. RCW
41.26.048 and 1996 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's
estate, or such person or persons, trust or organization as the member shall
have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at
the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to
the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such
spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or
if there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such
member's legal representatives.

(2)
The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a
result of injuries sustained in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec.
21. RCW
41.26.090 and 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Retirement
of a member for service shall be made by the department as follows:

(1)
Any member having five or more service credit years of service and having
attained the age of fifty years shall be eligible for a service retirement
allowance and shall be retired upon the member's written request effective the
first day following the date upon which the member is separated from service.

(2)
Any member having five or more service credit years of service, who terminates
his or her employment with any employer, may leave his or her contributions in
the fund. Any employee who so elects, upon attaining age fifty, shall be
eligible to apply for and receive a service retirement allowance based on his
or her years of service, commencing on the first day following his or her
attainment of age fifty.

(3)
Any member selecting optional vesting under subsection (2) of this section with
less than twenty service credit years of service shall not be covered by the
provisions of RCW 41.26.150, and the member's survivors shall not be entitled
to the benefits of RCW 41.26.160 unless his or her death occurs after he or she
has attained the age of fifty years. Those members selecting this optional
vesting with twenty or more years service shall not be covered by the provisions
of RCW 41.26.150 until the attainment of the age of fifty years. A member
selecting this optional vesting, with less than twenty service credit years of
service credit, who dies prior to attaining the age of fifty years, shall have
paid from the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement fund, to such member's surviving spouse or domestic partner,
if any, otherwise to such beneficiary as the member shall have designated in
writing, or if no such designation has been made, to the personal
representative of his or her estate, a lump sum which is equal to the amount of
such member's accumulated contributions plus accrued interest. If the vested
member has twenty or more service credit years of service credit the surviving
spouse or domestic partner or children shall then become eligible for
the benefits of RCW 41.26.160 regardless of the member's age at the time of his
or her death, to the exclusion of the lump sum amount provided by this
subsection.

(4)
Any member who has attained the age of sixty years shall be retired on the
first day of the calendar month next succeeding that in which said member shall
have attained the age of sixty and may not thereafter be employed as a law
enforcement officer or fire fighter: PROVIDED, That for any member who is
elected or appointed to the office of sheriff, chief of police, or fire chief,
his or her election or appointment shall be considered as a waiver of the age
sixty provision for retirement and nonemployment for whatever number of years remain
in his or her present term of office and any succeeding periods for which he or
she may be so elected or appointed. The provisions of this subsection shall
not apply to any member who is employed as a law enforcement officer or fire
fighter on March 1, 1970.

Sec.
22. RCW
41.26.160 and 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the event of the death of any member who is in active service, or who has
vested under the provisions of RCW 41.26.090 with twenty or more service credit
years of service, or who is on disability leave or retired, whether for
disability or service, the surviving spouse or domestic partner shall
become entitled to receive a monthly allowance equal to fifty percent of the
final average salary at the date of death if active, or the amount of
retirement allowance the vested member would have received at age fifty, or the
amount of the retirement allowance such retired member was receiving at the
time of death if retired for service or disability. The amount of this
allowance will be increased five percent of final average salary for each child
as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), as now or hereafter amended, subject to a
maximum combined allowance of sixty percent of final average salary: PROVIDED,
That if the child or children is or are in the care of a legal guardian,
payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made to the child's
legal guardian or, in the absence of a legal guardian and if the member has
created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, payment of the
increase attributable to each child will be made to the trust.

(2)
If at the time of the death of a vested member with twenty or more service
credit years of service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a
member retired for service or disability, the surviving spouse has not been
lawfully married to such member for one year prior to retirement or separation
from service if a vested member or, if a domestic partner, has not been
designated as a domestic partner for one year prior to retirement or separation
from service, the surviving spouse or domestic partner shall not be
eligible to receive the benefits under this section: PROVIDED, That if a
member dies as a result of a disability incurred in the line of duty, then if
he or she was married or in a domestic partnership at the time he or she
was disabled, the surviving spouse or domestic partner shall be eligible
to receive the benefits under this section.

(3)
If there be no surviving spouse or domestic partner eligible to receive
benefits at the time of such member's death, then the child or children of such
member shall receive a monthly allowance equal to thirty percent of final
average salary for one child and an additional ten percent for each additional
child subject to a maximum combined payment, under this subsection, of sixty
percent of final average salary. When there cease to be any eligible children
as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), as now or hereafter amended, there shall be paid
to the legal heirs of said member the excess, if any, of accumulated
contributions of said member at the time of death over all payments made to
survivors on his or her behalf under this chapter: PROVIDED, That payments
under this subsection to children shall be prorated equally among the children,
if more than one. If the member has created a trust for the benefit of the
child or children, the payment shall be made to the trust.

(4)
In the event that there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner eligible
to receive benefits under this section, and that there be no child or children
eligible to receive benefits under this section, then the accumulated
contributions shall be paid to the estate of said member.

(5)
If a surviving spouse or domestic partner receiving benefits under the
provisions of this section thereafter dies and there are children as defined in
RCW 41.26.030(7), as now or hereafter amended, payment to the spouse or
domestic partner shall cease and the child or children shall receive the
benefits as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(6)
The payment provided by this section shall become due the day following the
date of death and payments shall be retroactive to that date.

Sec.
23. RCW
41.26.460 and 1998 c 340 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.26.430 or disability
retirement under RCW 41.26.470, a member shall elect to have the retirement
allowance paid pursuant to the following options, calculated so as to be
actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a)
Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement
allowance payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the
amount of such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement,
then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death,
then to the surviving spouse or domestic partner; or if there be neither
such designated person or persons still living at the time of death nor a
surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to the retiree's legal
representative.

(b)
The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement
option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule
designates shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a designated
person. Such person shall be nominated by the member by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The
options adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty percent
survivor option.

(2)(a)
A member, if married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to
the option selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection. If a member is married and both the member and member's spouse do
not give written consent to an option under this section, the department will
pay the member a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the
member's spouse as the beneficiary. Such benefit shall be calculated to be
actuarially equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b)
If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.50.790 has been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a
member's retirement:

(i)
The department shall honor the designation as if made by the member under
subsection (1) of this section; and

(ii)
The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a)
Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a
reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of
this subsection, if they meet the following conditions:

(i)
The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the
retiree; and

(ii)
The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated
beneficiary's death.

(b)
The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the
date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be
increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c)
The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:

(i)
One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection
converted to a percent;

(ii)
Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option
factor;

(iii)
The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of
July 1, 1998.

(d)
The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of
the month following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July
1, 1998, whichever comes last.

Sec.
24. RCW
41.26.470 and 1995 c 144 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the director shall be
eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through
41.26.550. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed
as provided for in RCW 41.26.420 and shall have such allowance actuarially
reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
disability and the attainment of age fifty-five.

(2)
Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall
be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as required by the
department. If such medical examinations reveal that such a member has
recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is no longer
entitled to benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be
canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service
rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if unable to
perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's request, in such other
like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which
the member is then able to perform. In no event shall a member previously
drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary
or rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position held
by the member at the date of the retirement for disability. If the department
determines that the member is able to return to service, the member is entitled
to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing shall comply with the
requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.

(3)
Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty
on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits under RCW 41.04.500 through
41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW 41.04.535 shall receive or continue to
receive service credit subject to the following:

(a)
No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(b)
No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or
is separated without leave of absence.

(c)
Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for
the period of the service credited.

(d)
Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the
department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(e)
State contributions shall be as provided in RCW 41.26.450.

(f)
Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would
have received had the disability not occurred.

(g)
The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted for a
period not to exceed six consecutive months.

(h)
Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section
or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit
as a matter of contractual right.

(4)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse or domestic partner, or, if there is neither such
designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a
surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to his or her legal
representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or domestic
partner or, if there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner, then
in equal shares to the member's children. If there is no surviving spouse or
domestic partner, or children, the department shall retain the
contributions.

Sec.
25. RCW
41.26.510 and 1995 c 245 s 1 and 1995 c 144 s 19 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not
completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the accumulated
contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement system at the
time of such member's death, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death,
such member's accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the
retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under
RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic
partner as if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been
nominated by written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or
domestic partner, then to such member's legal representatives.

(2)
If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at
least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or domestic partner
or eligible child or children shall elect to receive either:

(a)
A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.26.430(1),
actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing
to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 41.26.460 and if the member was
not eligible for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as
described in RCW 41.26.430(2); if a surviving spouse or domestic partner
who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the
member under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue to
receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the
surviving spouse or domestic partner, share and share alike, until such
child or children reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse or
domestic partner eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the
member's death, such member's child or children under the age of majority shall
receive an allowance share and share alike calculated as herein provided making
the assumption that the ages of the spouse or domestic partner and
member were equal at the time of the member's death; or

(b)(i)
The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or

(ii)
If the member dies on or after July 25, 1993, one hundred fifty percent of the
member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order
filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any accumulated contributions attributable to
restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred
percent.

(3)
If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at
least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and is not survived by a
spouse or domestic partner, or an eligible child, then the accumulated
contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as
owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:

(a)
To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall
have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department; or

(b) If there is no such designated person or persons still living
at the time of the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.

Sec.
26. RCW
41.40.010 and 1997 c 254 s 10 and 1997 c 88 s 6 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly
required by the context:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the public employees' retirement system
provided for in this chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3)
"State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any political subdivision
or association of political subdivisions of the state admitted into the
retirement system, and legal entities authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060
or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the term shall also include any labor guild,
association, or organization the membership of a local lodge or division of
which is comprised of at least forty percent employees of an employer (other
than such labor guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The
term may also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement
system.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any political
subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted into the retirement
system, including public agencies created pursuant to RCW 35.63.070, 36.70.060,
and 39.34.030.

(5)
"Member" means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045 does not
prohibit a person otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system
from establishing such membership effective when he or she first entered an
eligible position.

(6)
"Original member" of this retirement system means:

(a)
Any person who became a member of the system prior to April 1, 1949;

(b)
Any person who becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the
retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, and prior to April 1, 1951;

(c)
Any person who first becomes a member by securing employment with an employer
prior to April 1, 1951, provided the member has rendered at least one or more
years of service to any employer prior to October 1, 1947;

(d)
Any person who first becomes a member through the admission of an employer into
the retirement system on or after April 1, 1951, provided, such person has been
in the regular employ of the employer for at least six months of the
twelve-month period preceding the said admission date;

(e)
Any member who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as
provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's
retirement becomes entitled to be credited with ten years or more of membership
service except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement
allowance for the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW
41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member;

(f)
Any member who has been a contributor under the system for two or more years
and who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided
by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement
has rendered five or more years of service for the state or any political
subdivision prior to the time of the admission of the employer into the system;
except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement
allowance for the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW
41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member.

(7)
"New member" means a person who becomes a member on or after April 1,
1949, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(8)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries or wages
earned during a payroll period for personal services and where the compensation
is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation shall be included upon the
basis of the schedules established by the member's employer.

(i)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered compensation earnable and the individual shall
receive the equivalent service credit;

(B)
If a leave of absence is taken by an individual for the purpose of serving in
the state legislature, the salary which would have been received for the
position from which the leave of absence was taken, shall be considered as
compensation earnable if the employee's contribution is paid by the employee
and the employer's contribution is paid by the employer or employee;

(C)
Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(D)
Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring
in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(E)
Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing
program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(F)
Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the
purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for
time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to
report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not
arise. Standby compensation is regular salary for the purposes of RCW
41.50.150(2).

(ii)
"Compensation earnable" does not include:

(A)
Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210,
or 28A.310.490;

(B)
Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by
RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.

(b)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including
overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under
provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the
United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance
compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay.

"Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 members also includes the following actual or imputed
payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above,
and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii)
In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have
the option of having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A)
The compensation earnable the member would have received had such member not
served in the legislature; or

(B)
Such member's actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public
employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to
the retirement system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A)
of this subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of
this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer contributions;

(iii)
Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv)
Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring
in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v)
Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing
program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi)
Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the
purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for
time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to
report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not
arise. Standby compensation is regular salary for the purposes of RCW
41.50.150(2).

(9)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW 41.40.088,
means periods of employment in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers rendered to any employer for which compensation is paid, and
includes time spent in office as an elected or appointed official of an
employer. Compensation earnable earned in full time work for seventy hours or
more in any given calendar month shall constitute one service credit month
except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service
credit month of service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service
credit months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this
chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the
computation of such retirement allowance or benefits. Time spent in standby
status, whether compensated or not, is not service.

(i)
Service by a state employee officially assigned by the state on a temporary
basis to assist another public agency, shall be considered as service as a
state employee: PROVIDED, That service to any other public agency shall not be
considered service as a state employee if such service has been used to
establish benefits in any other public retirement system.

(ii)
An individual shall receive no more than a total of twelve service credit
months of service during any calendar year. If an individual is employed in an
eligible position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more
than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple
service for seventy or more hours is rendered.

(iii)
A school district employee may count up to forty-five days of sick leave as
creditable service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1
"forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service
credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as
allowed under this subsection as follows:

(A)
Less than twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(C)
More than twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member
in an eligible position or positions for one or more employers for which
compensation earnable is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more
hours in any calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as
provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy
hours but less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute
one-half service credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for
less than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter
service credit month of service. Time spent in standby status, whether
compensated or not, is not service.

Any
fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the computation of
such retirement allowance or benefits.

(i)
Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be full time service,
except that persons serving in state elective positions who are members of the
teachers' retirement system or law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system at the time of election or appointment to such position may
elect to continue membership in the teachers' retirement system or law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

(ii)
A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of
service for such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible
position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for
ninety or more hours is rendered.

(iii)
Up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the
purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized
by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 2 "forty-five days" as used
in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than
forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as
follows:

(A)
Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service
credit month;

(C)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(D)
More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month;

(E)
Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half
service credit month.

(10)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(11)
"Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one.

(12)
"Prior service" means all service of an original member rendered to
any employer prior to October 1, 1947.

(13)
"Membership service" means:

(a)
All service rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;

(b)
All service after October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the time of its
admission into the retirement system for which member and employer
contributions, plus interest as required by RCW 41.50.125, have been paid under
RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;

(c)
Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service rendered
after April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member,
upon payment in full by such member of the total amount of the employer's
contribution to the retirement fund which would have been required under the
law in effect when such probationary service was rendered if the member had
been a member during such period, except that the amount of the employer's
contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the first month's
compensation earnable as a member;

(d)
Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service, rendered
after October 1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a
member, in the case of any member, upon payment in full by such member of five
percent of such member's salary during said period of probationary service,
except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be calculated by
the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as a member.

(14)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.

(15)
"Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(16)
"Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular
interest thereon.

(17)(a)
"Average final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the annual
average of the greatest compensation earnable by a member during any
consecutive two year period of service credit months for which service credit
is allowed; or if the member has less than two years of service credit months
then the annual average compensation earnable during the total years of service
for which service credit is allowed.

(b)
"Average final compensation" for plan 2 members, means the member's
average compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or
death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in
the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(18)
"Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable
by a member at the time of termination of employment.

(19)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly installments.

(20)
"Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by
the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(21)
"Retirement allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the pension.

(22)
"Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(23)
"Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed
upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the
director.

(24)
"Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement
allowance as provided by this chapter.

(25)
"Eligible position" means:

(a)
Any position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more
months of service a year for which regular compensation for at least seventy
hours is earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an
employer shall not define "position" in such a manner that an
employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position;

(b)
Any position occupied by an elected official or person appointed directly by
the governor, or appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court under RCW
2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2), for which compensation is paid.

(26)
"Ineligible position" means any position which does not conform with
the requirements set forth in subsection (25) of this section.

(27)
"Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by
the employer to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(28)
"Totally incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the
duties of a member's employment or office or any other work for which the
member is qualified by training or experience.

(29)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(30)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(31)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to state-wide office or elected or appointed as a member
of the legislature.

(32)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(33)
"Plan 1" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 1
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became
members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(34)
"Plan 2" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 2
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became
members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(35)
"Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor.

(36)
"Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of
a postretirement adjustment.

(37)
"Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(38)
"Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is
more than sixty percent of index A.

(39)
"Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(40)
"Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per
year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent,
rounded to the nearest cent.

(41)
"Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated all
employment with an employer.

(42)
"Domestic partner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 41.05.011.

Sec.
27. RCW
41.40.010 and 1998 c 341 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the public employees' retirement system
provided for in this chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3)
"State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any political subdivision
or association of political subdivisions of the state admitted into the retirement
system, and legal entities authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060 or chapter
39.34 RCW; and the term shall also include any labor guild, association, or
organization the membership of a local lodge or division of which is comprised
of at least forty percent employees of an employer (other than such labor
guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The term may also
include any city of the first class that has its own retirement system.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any political
subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted into the retirement
system, including public agencies created pursuant to RCW 35.63.070, 36.70.060,
and 39.34.030; except that after August 31, 2000, school districts and
educational service districts will no longer be employers for the public
employees' retirement system plan 2.

(5)
"Member" means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045 does not
prohibit a person otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system
from establishing such membership effective when he or she first entered an
eligible position.

(6)
"Original member" of this retirement system means:

(a)
Any person who became a member of the system prior to April 1, 1949;

(b)
Any person who becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the
retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, and prior to April 1, 1951;

(c)
Any person who first becomes a member by securing employment with an employer
prior to April 1, 1951, provided the member has rendered at least one or more
years of service to any employer prior to October 1, 1947;

(d)
Any person who first becomes a member through the admission of an employer into
the retirement system on or after April 1, 1951, provided, such person has been
in the regular employ of the employer for at least six months of the
twelve-month period preceding the said admission date;

(e)
Any member who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as
provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's
retirement becomes entitled to be credited with ten years or more of membership
service except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement
allowance for the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW
41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member;

(f)
Any member who has been a contributor under the system for two or more years
and who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided
by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement
has rendered five or more years of service for the state or any political
subdivision prior to the time of the admission of the employer into the system;
except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement
allowance for the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW
41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member.

(7)
"New member" means a person who becomes a member on or after April 1,
1949, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(8)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries or wages
earned during a payroll period for personal services and where the compensation
is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation shall be included upon the
basis of the schedules established by the member's employer.

(i)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered compensation earnable and the individual shall
receive the equivalent service credit;

(B)
If a leave of absence is taken by an individual for the purpose of serving in
the state legislature, the salary which would have been received for the
position from which the leave of absence was taken, shall be considered as
compensation earnable if the employee's contribution is paid by the employee
and the employer's contribution is paid by the employer or employee;

(C)
Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(D)
Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring
in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(E)
Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing
program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(F)
Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the
purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for
time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to
report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not
arise.

(ii)
"Compensation earnable" does not include:

(A)
Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210,
or 28A.310.490;

(B)
Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by
RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.

(b)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages
earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services, including
overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under
provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the
United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude nonmoney maintenance
compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred annual sick leave,
unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or any form of
severance pay.

"Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 members also includes the following actual or imputed
payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above,
and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii)
In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have
the option of having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A)
The compensation earnable the member would have received had such member not
served in the legislature; or

(B)
Such member's actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public employment
and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the
retirement system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A) of
this subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of this
subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions;

(iii)
Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv)
Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring
in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v)
Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing
program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi)
Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the
purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for
time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to
report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not arise.

(9)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW 41.40.088,
means periods of employment in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers rendered to any employer for which compensation is paid, and
includes time spent in office as an elected or appointed official of an
employer. Compensation earnable earned in full time work for seventy hours or
more in any given calendar month shall constitute one service credit month
except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service
credit month of service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service
credit months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this
chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the
computation of such retirement allowance or benefits. Time spent in standby
status, whether compensated or not, is not service.

(i)
Service by a state employee officially assigned by the state on a temporary
basis to assist another public agency, shall be considered as service as a
state employee: PROVIDED, That service to any other public agency shall not be
considered service as a state employee if such service has been used to
establish benefits in any other public retirement system.

(ii)
An individual shall receive no more than a total of twelve service credit
months of service during any calendar year. If an individual is employed in an
eligible position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more
than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple
service for seventy or more hours is rendered.

(iii)
A school district employee may count up to forty-five days of sick leave as
creditable service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1
"forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service
credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as
allowed under this subsection as follows:

(A)
Less than twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(C)
More than twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member
in an eligible position or positions for one or more employers for which
compensation earnable is paid. Compensation earnable earned for ninety or more
hours in any calendar month shall constitute one service credit month except as
provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for at least seventy
hours but less than ninety hours in any calendar month shall constitute
one-half service credit month of service. Compensation earnable earned for
less than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter
service credit month of service. Time spent in standby status, whether
compensated or not, is not service.

Any
fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the computation of
such retirement allowance or benefits.

(i)
Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be full time service,
except that persons serving in state elective positions who are members of the
Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, or
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system at the time of
election or appointment to such position may elect to continue membership in
the Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, or law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

(ii)
A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of
service for such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible
position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for
ninety or more hours is rendered.

(iii)
Up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the
purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized
by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 2 "forty-five days" as used
in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months. Use of less than
forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under this subsection as
follows:

(A)
Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service
credit month;

(C)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(D)
More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month;

(E)
Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half
service credit month.

(10)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(11)
"Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one.

(12)
"Prior service" means all service of an original member rendered to
any employer prior to October 1, 1947.

(13)
"Membership service" means:

(a)
All service rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;

(b)
All service after October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the time of its
admission into the retirement system for which member and employer
contributions, plus interest as required by RCW 41.50.125, have been paid under
RCW 41.40.056 or 41.40.057;

(c)
Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service rendered
after April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member,
upon payment in full by such member of the total amount of the employer's
contribution to the retirement fund which would have been required under the
law in effect when such probationary service was rendered if the member had
been a member during such period, except that the amount of the employer's
contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the first month's
compensation earnable as a member;

(d)
Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service, rendered
after October 1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a
member, in the case of any member, upon payment in full by such member of five
percent of such member's salary during said period of probationary service,
except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be calculated by
the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as a member.

(14)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.

(15)
"Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(16)
"Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular
interest thereon.

(17)(a)
"Average final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the annual
average of the greatest compensation earnable by a member during any
consecutive two year period of service credit months for which service credit
is allowed; or if the member has less than two years of service credit months
then the annual average compensation earnable during the total years of service
for which service credit is allowed.

(b)
"Average final compensation" for plan 2 members, means the member's
average compensation earnable of the highest consecutive sixty months of
service credit months prior to such member's retirement, termination, or
death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may not be used in
the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW 41.40.710(2).

(18)
"Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable
by a member at the time of termination of employment.

(19)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.

(20)
"Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by
the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(21)
"Retirement allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the pension.

(22)
"Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(23)
"Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed
upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the
director.

(24)
"Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement
allowance as provided by this chapter.

(25)
"Eligible position" means:

(a)
Any position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more
months of service a year for which regular compensation for at least seventy
hours is earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an
employer shall not define "position" in such a manner that an
employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position;

(b)
Any position occupied by an elected official or person appointed directly by
the governor, or appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court under RCW
2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2), for which compensation is paid.

(26)
"Ineligible position" means any position which does not conform with
the requirements set forth in subsection (25) of this section.

(27)
"Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by
the employer to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(28)
"Totally incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the
duties of a member's employment or office or any other work for which the
member is qualified by training or experience.

(29)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(30)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(31)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to state-wide office or elected or appointed as a member
of the legislature.

(32)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(33)
"Plan 1" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 1
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became
members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(34)
"Plan 2" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 2
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became
members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(35)
"Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor.

(36)
"Index A" means the index for the year prior to the determination of
a postretirement adjustment.

(37)
"Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(38)
"Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which the index is
more than sixty percent of index A.

(39)
"Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by index B.

(40)
"Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per month per
year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by three percent,
rounded to the nearest cent.

(41)
"Separation from service" occurs when a person has terminated all
employment with an employer.

(42)
"Domestic partner" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 41.05.011.

Sec.
28. RCW
41.40.023 and 1997 c 254 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Membership
in the retirement system shall consist of all regularly compensated employees
and appointive and elective officials of employers, as defined in this chapter,
with the following exceptions:

(1)
Persons in ineligible positions;

(2)
Employees of the legislature except the officers thereof elected by the members
of the senate and the house and legislative committees, unless membership of
such employees be authorized by the said committee;

(3)(a)
Persons holding elective offices or persons appointed directly by the
governor: PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the option of applying for
membership during such periods of employment: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
persons holding or who have held elective offices or persons appointed by the
governor who are members in the retirement system and who have, prior to
becoming such members, previously held an elective office, and did not at the
start of such initial or successive terms of office exercise their option to
become members, may apply for membership to be effective during such term or
terms of office, and shall be allowed to establish the service credit
applicable to such term or terms of office upon payment of the employee
contributions therefor by the employee with interest as determined by the director
and employer contributions therefor by the employer or employee with interest
as determined by the director: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all contributions
with interest submitted by the employee under this subsection shall be placed
in the employee's individual account in the employee's savings fund and be
treated as any other contribution made by the employee, with the exception that
any contributions submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's
obligation, together with the interest the director may apply to the employer's
contribution, shall not be considered part of the member's annuity for any
purpose except withdrawal of contributions;

(b)
A member holding elective office who has elected to apply for membership
pursuant to (a) of this subsection and who later wishes to be eligible for a
retirement allowance shall have the option of ending his or her membership in
the retirement system. A member wishing to end his or her membership under
this subsection must file, on a form supplied by the department, a statement
indicating that the member agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service
for future periods served as an elected official. A member who receives more
than fifteen thousand dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective
service, adjusted annually for inflation by the director, is not eligible for
the option provided by this subsection (3)(b);

(4)
Employees holding membership in, or receiving pension benefits under, any
retirement plan operated wholly or in part by an agency of the state or
political subdivision thereof, or who are by reason of their current employment
contributing to or otherwise establishing the right to receive benefits from
any such retirement plan: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, In any case where the retirement
system has in existence an agreement with another retirement system in
connection with exchange of service credit or an agreement whereby members can
retain service credit in more than one system, such an employee shall be
allowed membership rights should the agreement so provide: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That an employee shall be allowed membership if otherwise eligible
while receiving survivor's benefits: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That an employee
shall not either before or after June 7, 1984, be excluded from membership or
denied service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on account of: (a)
Membership in the plan created under chapter 2.14 RCW; or (b) enrollment under
the relief and compensation provisions or the pension provisions of the volunteer
fire fighters' relief and pension fund under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(5)
Patient and inmate help in state charitable, penal, and correctional
institutions;

(6)
"Members" of a state veterans' home or state soldiers' home;

(7)
Persons employed by an institution of higher learning or community college,
primarily as an incident to and in furtherance of their education or training,
or the education or training of a spouse or domestic partner;

(8)
Employees of an institution of higher learning or community college during the
period of service necessary to establish eligibility for membership in the
retirement plans operated by such institutions;

(9)
Persons rendering professional services to an employer on a fee, retainer, or
contract basis or when the income from these services is less than fifty
percent of the gross income received from the person's practice of a
profession;

(10)
Persons appointed after April 1, 1963, by the liquor control board as agency
vendors;

(11)
Employees of a labor guild, association, or organization: PROVIDED, That
elective officials and employees of a labor guild, association, or organization
which qualifies as an employer within this chapter shall have the option of
applying for membership;

(12)
Retirement system retirees: PROVIDED, That following reemployment in an
eligible position, a retiree may elect to prospectively become a member of the
retirement system if otherwise eligible;

(13)
Persons employed by or appointed or elected as an official of a first class
city that has its own retirement system: PROVIDED, That any member elected or
appointed to an elective office on or after April 1, 1971, shall have the
option of continuing as a member of this system in lieu of becoming a member of
the city system. A member who elects to continue as a member of this system
shall pay the appropriate member contributions and the city shall pay the
employer contributions at the rates prescribed by this chapter. The city shall
also transfer to this system all of such member's accumulated contributions
together with such further amounts as necessary to equal all employee and
employer contributions which would have been paid into this system on account
of such service with the city and thereupon the member shall be granted credit
for all such service. Any city that becomes an employer as defined in RCW
41.40.010(4) as the result of an individual's election under this subsection
shall not be required to have all employees covered for retirement under the
provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a city
of the first class with its own retirement system from: (a) Transferring all
of its current employees to the retirement system established under this
chapter, or (b) allowing newly hired employees the option of continuing
coverage under the retirement system established by this chapter.

Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, persons transferring from employment with
a first class city of over four hundred thousand population that has its own
retirement system to employment with the state department of agriculture may
elect to remain within the retirement system of such city and the state shall
pay the employer contributions for such persons at like rates as prescribed for
employers of other members of such system;

(14)
Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) do not reside in
the United States, and (c) perform duties outside of the United States;

(15)
Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) are not covered by
chapter 41.48 RCW, (c) are not excluded from membership under this chapter or
chapter 41.04 RCW, (d) are residents of this state, and (e) make an irrevocable
election to be excluded from membership, in writing, which is submitted to the
director within thirty days after employment in an eligible position;

(16)
Employees who are citizens of the United States and who reside and perform
duties for an employer outside of the United States: PROVIDED, That unless
otherwise excluded under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, the employee may
apply for membership (a) within thirty days after employment in an eligible
position and membership service credit shall be granted from the first day of
membership service, and (b) after this thirty-day period, but membership
service credit shall be granted only if payment is made for the noncredited
membership service under RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the
date of application;

(17)
The city manager or chief administrative officer of a city or town, other than
a retiree, who serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority: PROVIDED,
That such persons shall have the option of applying for membership within
thirty days from date of their appointment to such positions. Persons serving
in such positions as of April 4, 1986, shall continue to be members in the
retirement system unless they notify the director in writing prior to December
31, 1986, of their desire to withdraw from membership in the retirement
system. A member who withdraws from membership in the system under this
section shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions.

Persons
serving in such positions who have not opted for membership within the
specified thirty days, may do so by paying the amount required under RCW
41.50.165(2) for the period from the date of their appointment to the date of
acceptance into membership;

(18)
Persons enrolled in state-approved apprenticeship programs, authorized under
chapter 49.04 RCW, and who are employed by local governments to earn hours to
complete such apprenticeship programs, if the employee is a member of a
union-sponsored retirement plan and is making contributions to such a
retirement plan or if the employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement
plan.

Sec.
29. RCW
41.40.188 and 1998 c 340 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.180 or retirement for disability
under RCW 41.40.210 or 41.40.230, a member shall elect to have the retirement
allowance paid pursuant to one of the following options calculated so as to be
actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a)
Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement
allowance payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the
amount of such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement,
then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death,
then to the surviving spouse or domestic partner; or if there be neither
such designated person or persons still living at the time of death nor a
surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to the retiree's legal
representative.

(b)
The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement
option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule
designates shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person
nominated by the member by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department at the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department shall
include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor
option and a joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(c)
A member may elect to include the benefit provided under RCW 41.40.640 along
with the retirement options available under this section. This retirement
allowance option shall be calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to the
options offered under this subsection.

(2)(a)
A member, if married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to
the option selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection. If a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse
do not give written consent to an option under this section, the department
shall pay a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be
actuarially equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b)
If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.50.790 has been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a
member's retirement:

(i)
The department shall honor the designation as if made by the member under
subsection (1) of this section; and

(ii)
The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a)
Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a
reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of
this subsection, if they meet the following conditions:

(i)
The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the
retiree; and

(ii)
The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated
beneficiary's death.

(b)
The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the
date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be
increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c)
The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:

(i)
One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection
converted to a percent;

(ii)
Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option
factor;

(iii)
The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of
July 1, 1998.

(d) The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from
the beginning of the month following the date of the designated beneficiary's
death or from July 1, 1998, whichever comes last.

Sec.
30. RCW
41.40.190 and 1990 c 249 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In
lieu of the retirement allowance provided in RCW 41.40.185, an individual
employed on or before April 25, 1973 may, after complying with RCW 41.40.180 or
41.40.210, make an irrevocable election to receive the retirement allowance
provided by this section which shall consist of:

(1)
An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his or her accumulated
contributions at the time of his or her retirement; and

(2)
A basic service pension of one hundred dollars per annum; and

(3)
A membership service pension, subject to the provisions of subdivision (4) of
this section, which shall be equal to one one-hundredth of his or her average
final compensation for each year or fraction of a year of membership service
credited to his or her service account; and

(4)
A prior service pension which shall be equal to one-seventieth of his or her
average final compensation for each year or fraction of a year of prior service
not to exceed thirty years credited to his or her service accounts. In no
event shall any original member upon retirement at age seventy with ten or more
years of service credit receive less than nine hundred dollars per annum as a
retirement allowance, nor shall any member upon retirement at any age receive a
retirement allowance of less than nine hundred dollars per annum if such member
has twelve or more years of service credit, or less than one thousand and two
hundred dollars per annum if such member has sixteen or more years of service
credit, or less than one thousand five hundred and sixty dollars per annum if
such member has twenty or more years of service credit. In the event that the
retirement allowance as to such member provided by subdivisions (1), (2), (3),
and (4) hereof shall amount to less than the aforesaid minimum retirement allowance,
the basic service pension of the member shall be increased from one hundred
dollars to a sum sufficient to make a retirement allowance of the applicable
minimum amount.

(5)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) through (4) of this section,
the retirement allowance payable for service where a member was elected or
appointed pursuant to Articles II or III of the Constitution of the state of
Washington or RCW 48.02.010 and the implementing statutes shall be a combined
pension and annuity. Said retirement allowance shall be equal to three percent
of the average final compensation for each year of such service. Any member
covered by this subsection who upon retirement has served ten or more years
shall receive a retirement allowance of at least one thousand two hundred
dollars per annum; such member who has served fifteen or more years shall
receive a retirement allowance of at least one thousand eight hundred dollars
per annum; and such member who has served twenty or more years shall receive a
retirement allowance of at least two thousand four hundred dollars per annum:
PROVIDED, That the initial retirement allowance of a member retiring only under
the provisions of this subsection shall not exceed the average final
compensation upon which the retirement allowance is based. The minimum
benefits provided in this subsection shall apply to all retired members or to
the surviving spouse or domestic partner of deceased members who were
elected under the provisions of Article II of the Washington state
Constitution.

(6)
Unless payment shall be made under RCW 41.40.270, a joint and one hundred
percent survivor benefit under RCW 41.40.188 shall automatically be given
effect as if selected for the benefit of the surviving spouse or domestic
partner upon the death in service, or while on authorized leave of absence
for a period not to exceed one hundred and twenty days from the date of payroll
separation, of any member who is qualified for a service retirement allowance
or has completed ten years of service at the time of death, except that if the
member is not then qualified for a service retirement allowance, such option 2
benefit shall be based upon the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to
pay the accrued regular retirement allowance commencing when the deceased
member would have first qualified for a service retirement allowance.

Sec.
31. RCW
41.40.220 and 1995 c 144 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
retirement for disability, as provided in RCW 41.40.200, a member who has not
attained age sixty shall receive the following benefits, subject to the
provisions of RCW 41.40.310 and 41.40.320:

(1)
A disability retirement pension of two-thirds of his or her average final
compensation to his or her attainment of age sixty, subject to the provisions
of RCW 41.40.310. The disability retirement pension provided by the employer
shall not exceed forty-two hundred dollars per annum, and

(2)
Upon attainment of age sixty, the disabled member shall receive a service
retirement allowance as provided in RCW 41.40.210. The department shall grant
the disabled member membership service for the period of time prior to age
sixty he or she was out of such service due to disability.

(3) During the period a disabled member is receiving a disability
pension, as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, his or her
contributions to the employees' savings fund shall be suspended and his or her
balance in the employees' savings fund, standing to his or her credit as of the
date his or her disability pension is to begin, shall remain in the employees'
savings fund. If the disabled member should die before attaining age sixty,
while a disability beneficiary, upon receipt by the department of proper proof
of death, the member's accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit
in the employees' savings fund, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such
person or persons, trust, or organization as he or she shall have nominated by
written designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there is
no designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death,
the accumulated contributions standing to the member's credit in the employees'
savings fund shall be paid to his or her surviving spouse or domestic
partner, or if there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner,
then to the member's legal representative.

Sec.
32. RCW
41.40.235 and 1995 c 144 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon retirement, a member shall receive a nonduty disability retirement
allowance equal to two percent of average final compensation for each service
credit year of service: PROVIDED, That this allowance shall be reduced by two
percent of itself for each year or fraction thereof that his or her age is less
than fifty-five years: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in no case may the allowance
provided by this section exceed sixty percent of average final compensation.

(2)
If the recipient of a retirement allowance under this section dies before the
total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the amount of
the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the balance shall
be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or
organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse or domestic partner or, if there is neither a
designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a
surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to his or her legal
representative.

Sec.
33. RCW
41.40.250 and 1995 c 144 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

An
individual who was a member on February 25, 1972, may upon qualifying pursuant
to RCW 41.40.230, make an irrevocable election to receive the nonduty
disability retirement allowance provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section subject to the provisions of RCW 41.40.310 and 41.40.320. Upon
attaining or becoming disabled after age sixty the member shall receive a
service retirement allowance as provided for in RCW 41.40.190 except that the annuity
portion thereof shall consist of a continuation of the cash refund annuity
previously provided to him or her. The disability retirement allowance prior
to age sixty shall consist of:

(1)
A cash refund annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the member's
accumulated contributions at the time of his or her retirement; and

(2) A pension, in addition to the annuity, equal to one
one-hundredth of the member's average final compensation for each year of
service. If the recipient of a retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the annuity portions of the retirement allowance paid to
him or her equals the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or
the person or persons, trust, or organization as he or she shall have nominated
by written designation duly executed and filed with the department, or if there
is no designated person or persons, still living at the time of his or her
death, then to his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner, or if
there is no designated person or persons still living at the time of his or her
death nor a surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to his or her
legal representatives.

Sec.
34. RCW
41.40.270 and 1997 c 73 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, should a member die
before the date of retirement the amount of the accumulated contributions
standing to the member's credit in the employees' savings fund, less any amount
identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions
pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, at the time of death:

(a)
Shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department; or

(b)
If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of
the member's death, or if a member fails to file a new beneficiary designation
subsequent to marriage, remarriage, dissolution of marriage, divorce, or
reestablishment of membership following termination by withdrawal or
retirement, such accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing
to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the surviving spouse or
domestic partner as if in fact such spouse or domestic partner had
been nominated by written designation as aforesaid, or if there be no such
surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to the member's legal
representatives.

(2)
Upon the death in service, or while on authorized leave of absence for a period
not to exceed one hundred and twenty days from the date of payroll separation,
of any member who is qualified but has not applied for a service retirement
allowance or has completed ten years of service at the time of death, the
designated beneficiary, or the surviving spouse or domestic partner as
provided in subsection (1) of this section, may elect to waive the payment
provided by subsection (1) of this section. Upon such an election, a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 41.40.188, calculated under the
retirement allowance described in RCW 41.40.185 or 41.40.190, whichever is
greater, actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified
as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to
a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670 shall automatically be given effect as
if selected for the benefit of the designated beneficiary. If the member is
not then qualified for a service retirement allowance, such benefit shall be
based upon the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay the accrued
regular retirement allowance commencing when the deceased member would have
first qualified for a service retirement allowance.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section, unless elected, shall not apply to any member
who has applied for service retirement in RCW 41.40.180, as now or hereafter
amended, and thereafter dies between the date of separation from service and
the member's effective retirement date, where the member has selected a
survivorship option under RCW 41.40.188. In those cases the beneficiary named
in the member's final application for service retirement may elect to receive
either a cash refund, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under
RCW 41.50.670, or monthly payments according to the option selected by the
member.

(4)
If a member dies within sixty days following application for disability
retirement under RCW 41.40.230, the beneficiary named in the application may
elect to receive the benefit provided by:

(a)
This section; or

(b) RCW 41.40.235, according to the option chosen under RCW
41.40.188 in the disability application.

Sec.
35. RCW
41.40.660 and 1998 c 340 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.630 or retirement for
disability under RCW 41.40.670, a member shall elect to have the retirement
allowance paid pursuant to one of the following options, calculated so as to be
actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a)
Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement
allowance payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the
amount of such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement,
then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death,
then to the surviving spouse or domestic partner; or if there be neither
such designated person or persons still living at the time of death nor a
surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to the retiree's legal
representative.

(b)
The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement
option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule
designates shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person
nominated by the member by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department at the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department
shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor
option and a joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(2)(a)
A member, if married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to
the option selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection. If a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse
do not give written consent to an option under this section, the department
shall pay a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be
actuarially equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b)
If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.50.790 has been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a
member's retirement:

(i)
The department shall honor the designation as if made by the member under
subsection (1) of this section; and

(ii)
The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a)
Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a
reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of
this subsection, if they meet the following conditions:

(i)
The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the
retiree; and

(ii)
The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated
beneficiary's death.

(b)
The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the
date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be
increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c)
The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:

(i)
One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection
converted to a percent;

(ii)
Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option
factor;

(iii)
The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of
July 1, 1998.

(d)
The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of
the month following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July
1, 1998, whichever comes last.

Sec.
36. RCW
41.40.670 and 1995 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon
recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance
under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740. The member shall
receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.40.620 and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment
of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
The retirement for disability of a judge, who is a member of the retirement
system, by the supreme court under Article IV, section 31 of the Constitution
of the state of Washington (Amendment 71), with the concurrence of the
department, shall be considered a retirement under subsection (1) of this
section.

(3)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse or domestic partner, or, if there is no designated
person or persons still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving
spouse or domestic partner, then to his or her legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the date
of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the accumulated
contributions to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner or,
if there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner, then in equal
shares to the member's children. If there is no surviving spouse or
domestic partner, or children, the department shall retain the
contributions.

Sec.
37. RCW
41.40.700 and 1995 c 144 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not
completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the accumulated
contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement system at the
time of such member's death, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's
accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement
system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of
accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670,
shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if
in fact such spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by written
designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner,
then to such member's legal representatives.

(2)
If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at
least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or domestic partner,
or eligible child or children, shall elect to receive either:

(a)
A retirement allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.40.630(1),
actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing
to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option under RCW 41.40.660 and if the member was
not eligible for normal retirement at the date of death a further reduction as
described in RCW 41.40.630(2); if a surviving spouse or domestic partner
who is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the
member under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue to
receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the
surviving spouse or domestic partner, share and share alike, until such
child or children reach the age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse or
domestic partner eligible to receive an allowance at the time of the
member's death, such member's child or children under the age of majority shall
receive an allowance share and share alike calculated as herein provided making
the assumption that the ages of the spouse or domestic partner and
member were equal at the time of the member's death; or

(b)
The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670.

(3)
If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at
least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and is not survived by a
spouse or domestic partner, or an eligible child, then the accumulated
contributions standing to the member's credit, less any amount identified as
owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:

(a)
To a person or persons, estate, trust, or organization as the member shall have
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department;
or

(b)
If there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of
the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.

Sec.
38. RCW
41.54.010 and 1993 c 517 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Base salary" means salaries or wages earned by a member of a system
during a payroll period for personal services and includes wages and salaries
deferred under provisions of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude overtime payments, nonmoney maintenance compensation, and lump sum
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused
accumulated annual leave, any form of severance pay, any bonus for voluntary
retirement, any other form of leave, or any similar lump sum payment.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.

(4)
"Dual member" means a person who (a) is or becomes a member of a
system on or after July 1, 1988, (b) has been a member of one or more other
systems, and (c) has never been retired for service from a retirement system
and is not receiving a disability retirement or disability leave benefit from
any retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 or subsection (6) of this
section.

(5)
"Service" means the same as it may be defined in each respective
system. For the purposes of RCW 41.54.030, military service granted under RCW
41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260 may only be based on service accrued under chapter
41.40 or 43.43 RCW, respectively.

(6)
"System" means the retirement systems established under chapters
41.32, 41.40, 41.44, and 43.43 RCW; plan 2 of the system established under
chapter 41.26 RCW; and the city employee retirement systems for Seattle,
Tacoma, and Spokane. The inclusion of an individual first class city system is
subject to the procedure set forth in RCW 41.54.061.

(7) "Domestic partner" means the person designated by
a state employee in an affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

Sec.
39. RCW
41.54.010 and 1998 c 341 s 702 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Base salary" means salaries or wages earned by a member of a system
during a payroll period for personal services and includes wages and salaries
deferred under provisions of the United States internal revenue code, but shall
exclude overtime payments, nonmoney maintenance compensation, and lump sum
payments for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused
accumulated annual leave, any form of severance pay, any bonus for voluntary
retirement, any other form of leave, or any similar lump sum payment.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.

(4)
"Dual member" means a person who (a) is or becomes a member of a
system on or after July 1, 1988, (b) has been a member of one or more other
systems, and (c) has never been retired for service from a retirement system
and is not receiving a disability retirement or disability leave benefit from
any retirement system listed in RCW 41.50.030 or subsection (6) of this
section.

(5)
"Service" means the same as it may be defined in each respective
system. For the purposes of RCW 41.54.030, military service granted under RCW
41.40.170(3) or 43.43.260 may only be based on service accrued under chapter
41.40 or 43.43 RCW, respectively.

(6)
"System" means the retirement systems established under chapters
41.32, 41.40, 41.44, 41.35, and 43.43 RCW; plan 2 of the system established
under chapter 41.26 RCW; and the city employee retirement systems for Seattle,
Tacoma, and Spokane. The inclusion of an individual first class city system is
subject to the procedure set forth in RCW 41.54.061.

(7)
"Domestic partner" means the person designated by a state employee in
an affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

Sec.
40. RCW
41.54.034 and 1996 c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a dual member dies in service in any system, the member's service in all
systems may be combined for the sole purpose of determining the surviving
spouse's or domestic partner's eligibility to receive a death benefit
from each of the member's current and prior systems.

(2)
Each system shall use its own criteria to:

(a)
Determine the surviving spouse's or domestic partner's eligibility for a
death benefit; and

(b)
Calculate the death benefit based on service actually established in that
system.

(3)
The surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive the same benefit
from each system that would have been received if the member were active in the
system at the time of death. The spouse or domestic partner shall be
allowed to substitute the member's base salary from any system as the
compensation used in calculating the allowance.

(4)
This section shall not apply to the Washington state patrol retirement system
established under chapter 43.43 RCW.

Sec.
41. RCW
43.43.120 and 1983 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in the following sections, unless a different meaning is plainly required
by the context:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the Washington state patrol retirement
system.

(2)
"Retirement fund" means the Washington state patrol retirement fund.

(3)
"State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)
"Member" means any person included in the membership of the
retirement fund.

(5)
"Employee" means any commissioned employee of the Washington state
patrol.

(6)(a)
"Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement system
after June 12, 1980, is a person who has passed the Washington state patrol's entry-level
oral, written, physical performance, and background examinations and is,
thereby, appointed by the chief as a candidate to be a commissioned officer of
the Washington state patrol.

(b)
"Cadet," for a person who became a member of the retirement system
before June 12, 1980, is a trooper cadet, patrol cadet, or employee of like
classification, employed for the express purpose of receiving the on-the-job
training required for attendance at the state patrol academy and for becoming a
commissioned trooper. "Like classification" includes: Radio
operators or dispatchers; persons providing security for the governor or
legislature; patrolmen; drivers' license examiners; weighmasters; vehicle
safety inspectors; central wireless operators; and warehousemen.

(7)
"Beneficiary" means any person in receipt of retirement allowance or
any other benefit allowed by this chapter.

(8)
"Regular interest" means interest compounded annually at such rates
as may be determined by the director.

(9)
"Retirement board" means the board provided for in this chapter.

(10)
"Insurance commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of the
state of Washington.

(11)
"Lieutenant governor" means the lieutenant governor of the state of
Washington.

(12)
"Service" shall mean services rendered to the state of Washington or
any political subdivisions thereof for which compensation has been paid. Full
time employment for seventy or more hours in any given calendar month shall
constitute one month of service. An employee who is reinstated in accordance
with RCW 43.43.110 shall suffer no loss of service for the period reinstated
subject to the contribution requirements of this chapter. Only months of
service shall be counted in the computation of any retirement allowance or
other benefit provided for herein. Years of service shall be determined by
dividing the total number of months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a
year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation
of such retirement allowance or benefit.

(13)
"Prior service" shall mean all services rendered by a member to the
state of Washington, or any of its political subdivisions prior to August 1,
1947, unless such service has been credited in another public retirement or
pension system operating in the state of Washington.

(14)
"Current service" shall mean all service as a member rendered on or
after August 1, 1947.

(15)
"Average final salary" shall mean the average monthly salary received
by a member during the member's last two years of service or any consecutive
two-year period of service, whichever is the greater, as an employee of the
Washington state patrol; or if the member has less than two years of service,
then the average monthly salary received by the member during the member's
total years of service.

(16)
"Actuarial equivalent" shall mean a benefit of equal value when
computed upon the basis of such mortality table as may be adopted and such
interest rate as may be determined by the director.

(17)
Unless the context expressly indicates otherwise, words importing the masculine
gender shall be extended to include the feminine gender and words importing the
feminine gender shall be extended to include the masculine gender.

(18)
"Director" means the director of the department of retirement
systems.

(19)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(20)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(21)
"Contributions" means the deduction from the compensation of each
member in accordance with the contribution rates established under RCW
43.43.300.

(22)
"Domestic partner" means the person designated by a member in an
affidavit filed under section 3 of this act.

Sec.
42. RCW
43.43.270 and 1989 c 108 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The normal form of retirement allowance shall be an allowance which shall
continue as long as the member lives.

(2)
If a member should die while in service the member's lawful spouse or
domestic partner shall be paid an allowance which shall be equal to fifty
percent of the average final salary of the member. If the member should die
after retirement the member's lawful spouse or domestic partner shall be
paid an allowance which shall be equal to the retirement allowance then payable
to the member or fifty percent of the final average salary used in computing
the member's retirement allowance, whichever is less. The allowance paid to
the lawful spouse or domestic partner shall continue as long as the
spouse or domestic partner lives: PROVIDED, That if a surviving spouse or
domestic partner who is receiving benefits under this subsection marries or
becomes a domestic partner of another member of this retirement system who
subsequently predeceases such spouse or domestic partner, the spouse or
domestic partner shall then be entitled to receive the higher of the two
survivors' allowances for which eligibility requirements were met, but a
surviving spouse or domestic partner shall not receive more than one
survivor's allowance from this system at the same time under this subsection.
To be eligible for an allowance the lawful surviving spouse or domestic
partner of a retired member shall have been married to or been a
domestic partner of the member prior to the member's retirement and continuously
thereafter until the date of the member's death or shall have been married to or
been a domestic partner of the retired member at least two years prior to
the member's death.

(3)
If a member should die, either while in service or after retirement, the
member's surviving unmarried children under the age of eighteen years shall be
provided for in the following manner:

(a)
If there is a surviving spouse or domestic partner, each child shall be
entitled to a benefit equal to five percent of the final average salary of the
member or retired member. The combined benefits to the surviving spouse or
domestic partner and all children shall not exceed sixty percent of the
final average salary of the member or retired member; and

(b)
If there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner, or the spouse or
domestic partner should die, the child or children shall be entitled to a
benefit equal to thirty percent of the final average salary of the member or
retired member for one child and an additional ten percent for each additional
child. The combined benefits to the children under this subsection shall not
exceed sixty percent of the final average salary of the member or retired
member. Payments under this subsection shall be prorated equally among the
children, if more than one.

(4)
If a member should die in the line of duty while employed by the Washington
state patrol, the member's surviving children under the age of twenty years and
eleven months if attending any high school, college, university, or vocational
or other educational institution accredited or approved by the state of
Washington shall be provided for in the following manner:

(a)
If there is a surviving spouse or domestic partner, each child shall be
entitled to a benefit equal to five percent of the final average salary of the
member. The combined benefits to the surviving spouse or domestic partner
and all children shall not exceed sixty percent of the final average salary of
the member;

(b)
If there is no surviving spouse or domestic partner, or the spouse or
domestic partner should die, the unmarried child or children shall be
entitled to receive a benefit equal to thirty percent of the final average
salary of the member or retired member for one child and an additional ten
percent for each additional child. The combined benefits to the children under
this subsection shall not exceed sixty percent of the final average salary.
Payments under this subsection shall be prorated equally among the children, if
more than one; and

(c)
If a beneficiary under this subsection reaches the age of twenty-one years
during the middle of a term of enrollment the benefit shall continue until the
end of that term.

(5)
The provisions of this section shall apply to members who have been retired on
disability as provided in RCW 43.43.040 if the officer was a member of the
Washington state patrol retirement system at the time of such disability
retirement.

Sec.
43. RCW
43.43.280 and 1994 c 197 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a member dies before retirement, and has no surviving spouse or domestic
partner, or children under the age of eighteen years, all contributions
made by the member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), with
interest as determined by the director, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to such person or persons as the
member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with
the department, or if there be no such designated person or persons, then to
the member's legal representative.

(2)
If a member should cease to be an employee before attaining age sixty for
reasons other than the member's death, or retirement, the individual shall
thereupon cease to be a member except as provided under RCW 43.43.130 (2) ((and)),
(3), and (4) and, the individual may withdraw the member's contributions
to the retirement fund, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), with
interest as determined by the director, by making application therefor to the
department, except that: A member who ceases to be an employee after having
completed at least five years of service shall remain a member during the
period of the member's absence from employment for the exclusive purpose only
of receiving a retirement allowance to begin at attainment of age sixty, however
such a member may upon written notice to the department elect to receive a
reduced retirement allowance on or after age fifty-five which allowance shall
be the actuarial equivalent of the sum necessary to pay regular retirement
benefits as of age sixty: PROVIDED, That if such member should withdraw all or
part of the member's accumulated contributions, the individual shall thereupon
cease to be a member and this subsection shall not apply.

Sec.
44. RCW
43.43.285 and 1996 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's
estate, or such person or persons, trust or organization as the member shall
have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at
the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to
the member's surviving spouse or domestic partner as if in fact such
spouse or domestic partner had been nominated by written designation, or
if there be no such surviving spouse or domestic partner, then to such
member's legal representatives.

(2)
The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a
result of injuries sustained in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 45.
Sections 1, 26, and 38 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 46.
Sections 2, 27, and 39 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---