BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any leave provided to classified employees for purposes of bereavement shall
extend to bereavement for the death of domestic partners, and any leave
provided to classified employees to care for sick family members shall extend
to care for sick domestic partners.

(2) As used in this section, "domestic partner" means the
person other than a spouse who an employee designates in writing to his or her
employer as the employee's domestic partner meeting each of the following
requirements: (a) The employee and domestic partner have a close personal
relationship where they are responsible for each other's common welfare and
have agreed to be jointly responsible for each other's basic living expenses
incurred during their domestic relationship; (b) the employee and domestic
partner share the same regular address; (c) the employee and domestic partner
are both at least eighteen years of age; (d) the employee and the domestic
partner are not married to anyone; (e) the employee and designated domestic
partner are not related by blood closer than would bar marriage in this state;
(f) the employee and domestic partner were both mentally competent to consent
to their domestic partnership when it began; and (g) any prior domestic
partnership in which the employee or the employee's domestic partner
participated with another party was at least ninety days before the date the
employee submits written notice to his or her employer identifying the person
as his or her domestic partner.

---
END ---