BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Since 1981, when Washington instituted its present death penalty law, the costs
associated with death penalty defense have steadily increased. Reasons for the
rising costs of death penalty appeals include: (a) Federal requirements that
defense attorneys thoroughly investigate and raise every legitimate issue in
state court; (b) new state supreme court rules establishing that counsel
appointed to death penalty appeals and personal restraint petitions must have
experience or training in death penalty law and that two such attorneys be
appointed for each appeal; (c) increased number of vigorous prosecutions of
death penalty appeals by prosecutors; (d) increased investigation needs; (e)
rising administrative costs and out-of-pocket expenses; and (f) increasing
complexity of legal issues in death penalty cases;

(2)
In death penalty appellate cases, a defendant's constitutional right to the
effective assistance of counsel is guaranteed;

(3)
Death penalty defendants have a statutory right to collaterally attack their
convictions and to the assistance of counsel in their collateral attacks;

(4)
Failure to devise a fair and functional fee system could have serious
implications in the representation of death penalty defendants, including the
state's failure to provide defendants their constitutional rights and the
reversal of death sentences; and

(5)
The creation of a death penalty appellate unit will ensure the fulfillment of
the state's constitutional and statutory duty to death penalty defendants while
providing death penalty appellate attorneys compensation in an amount that
reflects the gravity of the cases and market rates.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 2.70 RCW to read as follows:

A
death penalty appellate unit is created within the office of public defense to:

(1)
Provide legal representation to indigent defendants under a sentence of death
who have a constitutional right to counsel in filing and prosecuting direct
appeals challenging the trial court convictions and sentences; and

(2)
Provide legal representation to indigent defendants under a sentence of death
who have a statutory right to counsel under RCW 10.73.150 to file and prosecute
motions or petitions for collateral attack of the trial court convictions and
sentences and who request counsel.

Sec.
3. RCW
2.70.020 and 1996 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, under the supervision and direction of the advisory committee, shall:

(1)
Administer all criminal appellate indigent defense services;

(2)
Establish and administer a death penalty appellate unit under section 2 of
this act;

(3)
Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to state appellate indigent
defense;

(((3)))
(4) Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines for
the program and the death penalty appellate unit, including a
cost-efficient system that provides for recovery of costs;

(((4)))
(5) Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying
indigency. In recommending criteria for determining indigency, the director
shall compile and review the indigency standards used by other state agencies
and shall periodically submit the compilation and report to the legislature on
the appropriateness and consistency of such standards;

(((5)))
(6) Collect information regarding indigency cases funded by the state
and report annually to the legislature and the supreme court;

(((6)))
(7) Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of each division of
the court of appeals to determine how attorney services should be provided.

Except
for the representation provided by the death penalty appellate unit, the
office of public defense shall not provide direct representation of clients.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 2.70 RCW to read as follows:

All
powers, duties, and functions of the supreme court and the office of the
administrator for the courts pertaining to the appointment of attorneys in
death penalty appellate cases are transferred to the office of public defense
beginning January 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 2.70 RCW to read as follows:

Among
other responsibilities in establishing and administering the death penalty
appellate unit, the director shall:

(1)
Employ qualified attorneys to the death penalty appellate unit as needed;

(2)
Provide investigative, clerical, and other support to the death penalty
appellate unit;

(3)
Contract with qualified private or nonprofit attorneys for death penalty
appellate representation where a conflict of interest arises or when necessary;

(4)
Establish standards for the delivery of death penalty appellate services,
including, but not limited to: Compensation of counsel, duties and
responsibilities of counsel, case load limits, training, evaluation of
attorneys, substitution of attorneys or assignment of contracts, compensation
for expert witness fees, administrative expenses, support services, and other
costs associated with representation. The director may work with the
Washington state bar association and the supreme court in establishing
standards; and

(5) Ensure accountability and encourage efficient work by death
penalty appellate defense attorneys.

Sec.
6. RCW
2.70.040 and 1996 c 221 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

All employees of the office of public defense and the death
penalty appellate unit shall be exempt from state civil service under
chapter 41.06 RCW.

---
END ---