BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall prohibit activities that harm or disturb the spawning beds
of salmon and other fish on the Skagit river. Prohibited acts include, but are
not limited to, wading in or standing on, driving motor vehicles or riding
bicycles over, dragging boat anchors through, digging or removing spawning
gravel, or any other physical disturbance of the nests of salmon or other fish.

(2)
The department shall post such areas adjacent to known or probable salmon nests
by affixing a durable sign to a post or a tree that includes the following
information:

NOTICE

THE SHORELINE OF THIS AREA CONTAINS SALMON NESTS, ALSO
KNOWN AS REDDS. DRIVING OVER, WADING IN, ANCHORING IN, OR STANDING ON OR
OTHERWISE DISTURBING SALMON REDDS IS PROHIBITED. FISHING IS ALLOWED ONLY FROM
UPLANDS OR FROM A BOAT THAT IS FREE FLOATING OR TETHERED TO AN ABOVE-WATER
APPURTENANCE. A VIOLATION OF THIS PROVISION IS AN INFRACTION UNDER CHAPTER
7.84 RCW AND IS SUBJECT TO A PENALTY OF NOT LESS THAN ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS PER
VIOLATION.

(3)
The department shall post the notice described in subsection (2) of this
section in the main stem and every tributary of the Skagit river.

(4)
The department shall provide the information contained in the notice described
in subsection (2) of this section in brochures that are disseminated to persons
applying for fishing and boating licenses, and shall distribute the brochures
widely to retail outlets in Skagit county that cater to outdoor recreation.

(5)
The department shall work cooperatively with the tribal comanagers for Skagit
river fish resources in implementing and enforcing the requirements of this
section.

(6)
The pilot project shall terminate July 1, 2008.

(7)
Upon completion of the pilot project, the department shall report to the
legislature by December 31, 2008, on whether there was an increase in salmon
numbers that can be attributed solely to the implementation of the project.

(8) This section expires January 1, 2009.

---
END ---