BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.383 and 1991 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability
of public water systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently
utilizing the increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the
most populous areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water
supply management, and the trend toward regional planning and regional
solutions to resource issues, interconnections of public water systems through
interties provide a valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for
the citizens of the state. Public water systems have been encouraged in the
past to utilize interties to achieve public health and resource management
objectives. The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to recognize
interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, and to have associated
water rights modified by the department of ecology to reflect current use of
water through those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The
legislature further finds it in the public interest for the public water
systems of municipalities to be linked through interties now and whenever
possible in the future, to promote the development of those interties, and
to develop a coordinated process to review proposals for interties commencing
use after January 1, 1991.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water between those
systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or
delivery is within established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates
specified in the systems' existing water right permits or certificates, or
contained in claims filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better management of public water supply consistent with existing rights and
obligations. Interties include interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water to serve as
primary or secondary sources of supply((, but do not include development of
new sources of supply to meet future demand)).

(b)
"Service area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a
coordinated water system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW
respectively. When a public water system does not have a designated service
area subject to the approval process of those chapters, the service area shall
be the designated place of use contained in the water right permit or
certificate, or contained in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3)
Public water systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991,
or that have received written approval from the department of health prior to
that date, shall file written notice of those interties with the department of
health and the department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated into the
public water system's five-year update of its water system plan, but shall be
filed no later than June 30, 1996. The notice shall identify the location of
the intertie; the dates of its first use; the purpose, capacity, and current
use; the intertie agreement of the parties and the service areas assigned; and
other information reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, the
department of ecology, upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this
subsection, shall, as soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions
in the water right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use through
such interties, provided that the place of use is within service area
designations established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW, or a coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
70.116 RCW, and further provided that the water used is within the
instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit
and that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing water rights have
been filed with the department of ecology prior to September 1, 1991. Where
such complaints of impairment have been received, the department of ecology
shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through
agreement of the parties or through available administrative remedies.

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or
delivery of water through interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall
be permitted when the intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances
the manageability of the systems, provides opportunities for conjunctive use,
or delays or avoids the need to develop new water sources, and otherwise meets
the requirements of this section, provided that each public water system's
water use shall not exceed the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate
specified in its water right authorization, shall not adversely affect existing
water rights, and shall not be inconsistent with state-approved plans such as
water system plans or other plans which include specific proposals for
construction of interties. Interties commencing use after January 1, 1991,
shall not be inconsistent with regional water resource plans developed pursuant
to chapter 90.54 RCW.

(5)
For public water systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW
or chapter 70.116 RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1,
1991, shall be incorporated into water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20
RCW or coordinated water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and
submitted to the department of health and the department of ecology for review
and approval as provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section.
The plan shall state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system
reliability, enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities
for conjunctive use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

(6)
The department of health shall be responsible for review and approval of
proposals for new interties. In its review the department of health shall
determine whether the intertie satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this
section, with the exception of water rights considerations, which are the
responsibility of the department of ecology, and shall determine whether the
intertie is necessary to address emergent public health or safety concerns
associated with public water supply.

(7)
If the intertie is determined by the department of health to be necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the public water system shall amend its water system plan as required
and shall file an application with the department of ecology to change its
existing water right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described in
the approved water system plan. The department of ecology shall process the
application for change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate,
except that, notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding
notice and protest periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one
time, and the comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication
of the notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department
of ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely
affected by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of health and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which
its determination will be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and
in no event shall the total review period for the department of ecology exceed
one hundred eighty days.

(8)
If the department of health determines the proposed intertie appears to meet
the requirements of subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the department of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the
department of ecology an application for change to the underlying water right or
claim as necessary to reflect the new place of use. The department of ecology
shall consider the applications pursuant to the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and
90.44.100 as appropriate. If in its review of proposed interties and
associated water rights the department of ecology determines that additional
information is required to act on the application, the department may request
applicants to provide information necessary for its decision, consistent with
agency rules and written guidelines. Parties disagreeing with the decision of
the department of ecology on the application for change in place of use may
appeal the decision to the pollution control hearings board.

(9) The department of health may approve plans containing intertie
proposals prior to the department of ecology's decision on the water right
application for change in place of use. However, notwithstanding such
approval, construction work on the intertie shall not begin until the
department of ecology issues the appropriate water right document to the
applicant consistent with the approved plan.

---
END ---