BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that cable operators collect personal information about their
subscribers as a necessary part of providing cable service. This information
may reflect the subscriber's intimate life, including personal, political, and
religious beliefs and interests, as well as financial status. The legislature
further finds that cable subscribers desire and expect this information to be
kept private, and used only as necessary to provide cable service. The
legislature declares that it is a matter of public interest to ensure that
individuals' privacy is protected, and finds the provisions of this chapter
necessary to protect the privacy of cable subscribers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Cable operator" means any person or group of persons who provides
cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or more
affiliates owns a significant interest in such cable system, or who otherwise
controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and
operation of such a cable system.

(2)
"Cable service" means programming, in any combination, or any other
service provided by a cable operator on or in connection with a cable system.

(3)
"Cable system" means all or part of the facilities owned, rented,
leased, or otherwise controlled by a cable operator. This includes plant,
facilities, equipment, and closed signal transmission paths; switches,
software, hardware, and other processing equipment; antennas, cables,
amplifiers, towers, microwave links, studios, and real and personal property;
and any and all conductors, home terminals, converters, remote control units,
and all associated equipment or facilities, the purposes of which include
distributing cable service or programming or producing, receiving, amplifying,
storing, processing, or distributing voice, data, video, multimedia or other
forms of electronic, optical, or other signals.

(4)
"Personally identifiable information" means information that can be
associated with a particular individual through one or more identifiers or
other information or circumstances.

(5)
"Programming" means the video, audio, voice, data, multimedia, or
other material or programs prepared for or capable of transmission on a cable
system.

(6)
"Subscriber" means any person who is lawfully receiving, for any
purpose or reason, any cable service whether or not a fee is paid, including
each such person in a multiple unit building, except for purposes of reporting
or cost allocation, where equivalent subscriber basis may be used.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
cable operator shall not collect personally identifiable information concerning
any subscriber without the prior written consent of the subscriber concerned,
unless the information is necessary to provide requested cable service to the
subscriber. In no case shall a cable operator observe or record, or allow any
third party to observe or record, the viewing habits or communications of
subscribers over the cable system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
cable operator shall not disclose personally identifiable information
concerning any subscriber unless:

(a)
The subscriber has provided written consent to the disclosure;

(b)
The disclosure is necessary to provide cable service to the subscriber;

(c)
The disclosure is made pursuant to a court order authorizing such disclosure,
if the subscriber is notified of such order by the person to whom the order is
directed; or

(d)
The disclosure is limited to names and addresses of subscribers and the cable
operator has provided the subscriber the opportunity to prohibit or limit such
disclosure.

(2)
Under no circumstances shall a cable operator reveal, directly or indirectly,
to any third party which cable services an individual subscriber receives, or
the extent or nature of any viewing or other use of a cable service by a
subscriber.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
subscriber whose personally identifiable information is collected or disclosed
in violation of this chapter may collect damages of one thousand dollars, or
actual damages, whichever is greater.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---