BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A one hundred dollar fine shall be assessed to a person who is either convicted,
sentenced to a lesser charge, or given deferred prosecution as a result of an
arrest for violating RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, or 46.61.522. This
fine is for the purpose of providing services to persons disabled by traumatic
brain injuries.

(b)
If a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender for an offense which, if
committed by an adult would constitute a violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504,
46.61.520, or 46.61.522, the court shall assess the one hundred dollar fine
under (a) of this subsection.

(2)
The fine assessed in this section shall be collected by the clerk of the court
and forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in the brain injury trust
fund.

(3)
The brain injury trust fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from fines under subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited
into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only to provide services
to persons disabled by traumatic brain injuries. The fund is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

(4)
The governor's committee on disability issues and employment is responsible for
oversight over the brain injury trust fund. Only the governor's committee on
disability issues and employment may authorize expenditures from the fund.

(5) The governor's committee on disability issues and employment
may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to establish eligibility
for benefits and amounts under this section.

---
END ---