BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
By September 15, 1999, the department of labor and industries shall develop a
plan for implementing the recommendations contained in the joint legislative
audit and review committee's report on the workers' compensation system
performance audit mandated under chapter 330, Laws of 1997. The department
shall report on the plan by December 1, 1999, to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, including at a minimum:

(a)
A review of the recommendations that the department has implemented or plans to
implement, with timelines for implementation;

(b)
A review of the recommendations that the department does not plan to implement,
if any, with the reasons for such decisions; and

(c)
Recommendations for legislation that may be required to implement the
recommendations.

(2)
By December 1, 1999, the department of labor and industries shall report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature on a plan for improving the
industrial insurance vocational rehabilitation system and recommendations for
legislation, if any.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. It is
the intent of the legislature that sections 3 through 5 of this act implement
recommendation two contained in the joint legislative audit and review
committee's report on the workers' compensation system performance review audit
mandated under chapter 330, Laws of 1997.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) Within
seven days after the employer has notice or knowledge of the occurrence of an
injury or occupational disease sustained by a worker that requires treatment
from a health services provider, constitutes a permanent impairment, renders
the worker unable to perform a regularly established job at the worker's place
of employment during any portion of his or her regular shift, or causes death,
the employer shall file with the department a written report that sets forth:

(a)
The name, address, and business of the employer;

(b)
The name, address, and occupation of the employee;

(c)
The date, time, and cause of the injury or occupational disease;

(d)
Whether the injury or occupational disease arose in the course of the injured
worker's employment;

(e)
All available information pertaining to the nature of the injury or
occupational disease including but not limited to any visible signs, any
complaints of the worker, any time lost from work, the wages paid to the worker
including the reasonable value of board, housing, fuel, or other consideration
of like nature; and the other observable effect on the worker's bodily
functions, so far as known;

(f)
Work site location of injury; and

(g)
Other pertinent information as required by department rules.

(2)
Failure or refusal to submit the report required by subsection (1) of this
section shall subject the offending employer to a penalty determined by the
director, or his or her designee, in an amount not to exceed five hundred
dollars for each offense. Any penalty received under this subsection shall be
paid into the supplemental pension reserve fund.

(3)
The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to implement this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
worker claiming benefits under this title must file a written application for
benefits with the department or the employer. The application for benefits
must contain sufficient information to provide the department or employer with
notice that the worker sustained an industrial injury or contracted an
occupational disease, and that benefits are claimed under this title. An
employer, except a self-insured employer, receiving an application for benefits
under this title shall forward the application to the department within seven
days after its receipt. On receiving the application for benefits, the
employer or department, as the case may be, shall immediately forward to the
worker or the worker's beneficiary notification, in nontechnical language, of
his or her rights under this title. The department may develop forms to assist
workers and employers in the application process.

(2)
In addition to the application for benefits, the worker shall file with the
department or employer a certificate from his or her attending doctor, and it
is the duty of the doctor to inform the injured worker of his or her rights
under this title and to provide such additional information as required by
department rules without charge to the worker. The department shall provide
attending doctors with a manual that outlines procedures to be followed in
applications for benefits involving occupational diseases, and that describes
worker's rights and responsibilities related to occupational disease claims.

(3)
An employer, other than a self-insured employer, that fails to forward an
application for benefits to the department within seven days from the date of
its receipt is subject to a penalty determined by the director, or his or her
designee, but not to exceed five thousand dollars for each offense. Any
penalty received under this subsection shall be paid to the supplemental
pension reserve fund.

(4)
An employer that has notice or knowledge of the occurrence of an injury or
occupational disease sustained by a worker that requires medical treatment from
a health services provider, constitutes a permanent impairment, or renders the
worker unable to perform a regularly established job at the worker's place of
employment during any portion of his or her regular shift, shall provide the
worker with written notice, in nontechnical language, of the worker's rights
under this title. The notice shall also inform the worker how to apply for
benefits under this title.

(5)
The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to implement this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A
worker shall give his or her employer notice of an injury or occupational disease
sustained in the course of his or her employment and requiring treatment by a
health services provider within thirty days after the injury, or within thirty
days after the worker knows the nature of the injury or occupational disease
and its relationship to the employment.

(2)
The notice shall be in writing, shall contain the name and address of the
worker, and a statement of time, place, nature, and cause of the accident, and
shall be signed by the worker or by some person on the worker's behalf.

(3)
Notice shall be given to the employer by delivering it or sending it by mail
addressed to the employer's last known place of business. The notice may be
given to the employer, partner, supervisor, agent, or officer of the employer.

(4)
The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to implement this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
51.28.010 (Notice of accident--Notification of worker's rights)
and 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 32, 1975 1st ex.s. c 224 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 5,
& 1961 c 23 s 51.28.010;

(2) RCW
51.28.020 (Worker's application for compensation--Physician to aid
in) and 1984 c 159 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c 350 s 33, 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 38, &
1961 c 23 s 51.28.020; and

(3) RCW
51.28.025 (Duty of employer to report injury or
disease--Contents--Penalty) and 1987 c 185 s 32, 1985 c 347 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s.
c 224 s 5, & 1971 ex.s. c 289 s 39.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 51.28 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 3 through 5 of this act take effect September 15, 1999.

---
END ---