BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that dissolution of marriage contributes to children living
in poverty. Studies have shown that one parent families have lower income
levels when compared to two parent families. After dissolution, poverty has a
significant influence on a child's welfare including his or her opportunities.
Therefore, it is a reasonable function of the legislature to help children in
poverty by allowing men and women to enter agreements that increase their
commitment to one another.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 26.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A marriage preservation contract is a contract entered into by one man and one
woman or married couples who understand and agree that the marriage between
them is for life. The parties contract to make the grounds, terms, and
conditions for dissolution of their marriage more restrictive than alleging
that their marriage is irretrievably broken. The parties contract to make
restrictive grounds, terms, and conditions for legal separation. The parties
agree to take all reasonable efforts to preserve their marriage. Only when
there has been a complete and total breach of the marital commitment may the
parties seek a declaration that the marriage is no longer legally recognized.

(2)
A man and a woman or married couples may enter into a written marriage
preservation contract.

(a)
Both parties must sign the contract and the contract must be notarized.

(b)
If one or both parties are minors, the written consent or authorization of a
superior court judge is required as in RCW 26.04.010.

(3)
Either a husband or a wife may file a petition for dissolution of marriage or a
petition for legal separation.

(4)
For good cause, the court may enter temporary orders at any time after a
petition for dissolution or a petition for legal separation has been filed.

Sec.
3. RCW
26.04.080 and Code 1881 s 2384 are each amended to read as follows:

The
person solemnizing a marriage shall give to each of the parties ((thereto)),
if required, a certificate ((thereof)), specifying ((therein))
the names and residence of the parties, and of at least two witnesses present,
the time and place of such marriage, and the date of the license ((thereof)),
and by whom issued. If applicable, the person solemnizing the marriage
shall include a designation on the face of the certificate that the parties
entered into a marriage preservation contract.

Sec.
4. RCW
26.04.090 and 1967 c 26 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person solemnizing a marriage shall, within thirty days thereafter, make and
deliver to the county auditor of the county wherein the license was issued a
certificate for the files of the county auditor, and a certificate for the
files of the state registrar of vital statistics. The certificate for the
files of the county auditor shall be substantially as follows:

STATE OF WASHINGTON B

C

COUNTY
OF............... D

This
is to certify that the undersigned, a . . . . . ., by
authority of a license bearing date the . . . . day of
. . . . . . A.D., 19. . ., and issued by the
County auditor of the county of . . . . . ., did, on
the . . . . day of . . . . . . A.D.,
19. . ., at . . . . . . in this county and
state, join in lawful wedlock A.B. of the county of
. . . . . ., state of
. . . . . . and C.D. of the county of
. . . . . ., state of
. . . . . ., with their mutual assent, in the presence
of F H and E G, witnesses.

In
Testimony Whereof, witness the signatures of the parties to said ceremony, the
witnesses and myself, this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., A.D., 19. . .

((The certificate for the files of the state registrar of vital
statistics shall be in accordance with RCW 70.58.200.)) If applicable,
the person solemnizing the marriage shall include a designation on the face of
the certificate that the parties entered into a marriage preservation contract.
The certificate forms for the files of the county auditor and for the files of
the state registrar of vital statistics shall be provided by the state
registrar of vital statistics.

Sec.
5. RCW
26.04.160 and 1997 c 58 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Application for a marriage license must be made and filed with the appropriate
county auditor upon blanks to be provided by the county auditor for that
purpose, which application shall be under the oath of each of the applicants,
and each application shall state the name, address at the time of execution of
application, age, social security number, birthplace, whether single, widowed
or divorced, and whether under control of a guardian, residence during the past
six months: PROVIDED, That each county may require such other and further
information on said application as it shall deem necessary. In cases where
the parties intend to enter into a preservation of marriage contract, they must
declare their intent to do so on their application for a marriage license.

(2)
The county legislative authority may impose an additional fee up to fifteen
dollars on a marriage license for the purpose of funding family services such
as family support centers.

Sec.
6. RCW
26.09.030 and 1996 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
in the case of a marriage preservation contract, when a party who (((1)))
is a resident of this state, ((or (2) is)) a member of the armed forces
and is stationed in this state, or (((3) is)) married to a party who is
a resident of this state or who is a member of the armed forces and is
stationed in this state, petitions for a dissolution of marriage, and alleges
that the marriage is irretrievably broken and when ninety days have elapsed
since the petition was filed and from the date when service of summons was made
upon the respondent or the first publication of summons was made, the court
shall proceed as follows:

(1)
If the other party joins in the petition or does not deny that the marriage is
irretrievably broken, the court shall enter a decree of dissolution.

(2)
If the other party alleges that the petitioner was induced to file the petition
by fraud, or coercion, the court shall make a finding as to that allegation
and, if it so finds shall dismiss the petition.

(3)
If the other party denies that the marriage is irretrievably broken the court
shall consider all relevant factors, including the circumstances that gave rise
to the filing of the petition and the prospects for reconciliation and shall:

(a)
Make a finding that the marriage is irretrievably broken and enter a decree of
dissolution of the marriage; or

(b)
At the request of either party or on its own motion, transfer the cause to the
family court, refer them to another counseling service of their choice, and
request a report back from the counseling service within sixty days, or
continue the matter for not more than sixty days for hearing. If the cause is
returned from the family court or at the adjourned hearing, the court shall:

(i)
Find that the parties have agreed to reconciliation and dismiss the petition;
or

(ii)
Find that the parties have not been reconciled, and that either party continues
to allege that the marriage is irretrievably broken. When such facts are
found, the court shall enter a decree of dissolution of the marriage.

(4)
If the petitioner requests the court to decree legal separation in lieu of
dissolution, the court shall enter the decree in that form unless the other
party objects and petitions for a decree of dissolution or declaration of
invalidity.

Sec.
7. RCW
26.09.150 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 205 and 1989 c 375 s 30 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:

A
decree of dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of
invalidity is final when entered, subject to the right of appeal. An appeal
which does not challenge the finding that the marriage is irretrievably broken
((or)), the marriage was invalid, or the grounds, terms, or
conditions agreed to in the marriage preservation contract where breached
does not delay the finality of the dissolution or declaration of invalidity and
either party may remarry pending such an appeal.

No
earlier than six months after entry of a decree of legal separation, on motion
of either party, the court shall convert the decree of legal separation to a
decree of dissolution of marriage. ((The clerk of court shall complete the
certificate as provided for in RCW 70.58.200 on the form provided by the
department of health.)) On or before the tenth day of each month, the
clerk of the court shall forward to the state registrar of vital statistics the
certificate of each decree of divorce, dissolution of marriage, annulment, or
separate maintenance granted during the preceding month.

Upon request of a party whose marriage is dissolved or declared
invalid, the court shall order a former name restored or the court may, in its
discretion, order a change to another name.

---
END ---