BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14B RCW to read as follows:

A
state enhanced 911 wireless excise tax is imposed on the use of radio access
lines located within the state in the amount of forty-five cents per month for
each radio access line. The amount of tax shall be uniform for each radio
access line. The state shall provide notice of such tax to all radio
communication service companies serving in the state at least sixty days in
advance of the date on which the first payment is due. Tax proceeds shall be
deposited by the treasurer in the enhanced 911 wireless account created under
section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The enhanced 911 wireless account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from the state enhanced 911 wireless excise tax imposed by section 1
of this act shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be
used only for the purposes described in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section.

(2)
Thirty cents of the forty-five cent excise tax shall be used to reimburse
wireless carriers for their nonrecurring and recurring costs associated with
the design, provision, operation, administration, and maintenance of wireless
E911 service. For purposes of this subsection, "E911 service" means
phase I service, as described in federal communications commission order Docket
No. 94-102.

(3) Fifteen cents of the forty-five cent excise tax shall be
distributed to the county from which the tax originated for operational costs
of providing E911 service as long as the county has requested phase I service.

---
END ---