BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that increasing numbers of businesses are selling service
contracts for repair, replacement, and maintenance of appliances, computers,
electronic equipment, and other consumer products. There are risks that
contract obligors will close or otherwise be unable to fulfill their contract
obligations that could result in unnecessary and preventable losses to citizens
of this state. The legislature declares that it is necessary to establish
standards that will safeguard the public from possible losses arising from the
cessation of business of service contract obligors or the mismanagement of
funds paid for service contracts. The purpose of this chapter is to create a
legal framework within which service contracts may be sold in this state and
set forth requirements for conducting a service contract business.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The following are exempt from this title:

(a)
Warranties;

(b)
Maintenance agreements; and

(c)
Service contracts:

(i)
Paid for with separate and additional consideration;

(ii)
Issued at the point of sale, or within sixty days of the original purchase date
of the property; and

(iii)
On tangible property when the tangible property for which the service contract
is sold has a purchase price of fifty dollars or less, exclusive of sales tax.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to:

(a)
Vehicle service contracts which are governed under chapter 48.96 RCW; and

(b)
Vehicle mechanical breakdown insurance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the person who is responsible for the
administration of the service contracts or the service contracts plan.

(2)
"Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner of this state.

(3)
"Consumer" means a person who buys any tangible personal property
that is distributed in commerce.

(4)
"Maintenance agreement" means a contract of limited duration that
provides for scheduled maintenance only.

(5)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, incorporated
or unincorporated association, joint stock company, reciprocal insurer,
syndicate, or any similar entity or combination of entities acting in concert.

(6)
"Premium" means the consideration paid to an insurer for a
reimbursement insurance policy.

(7)
"Provider fee" means the consideration paid by a consumer for a
service contract.

(8)
"Reimbursement insurance policy" means a policy of insurance that is
issued to a service contract provider to provide reimbursement to the service
contract provider or to pay on behalf of the service contract provider all
contractual obligations incurred by the service contract provider under the
terms of the insured service contracts issued or sold by the service contract
provider.

(9)
"Service contract" means a contract or agreement for a separately
stated consideration for a specific duration to perform the repair,
replacement, or maintenance of property or the indemnification for repair,
replacement, or maintenance for operational or structural failure due to a
defect in materials or workmanship, or normal wear and tear. Service contracts
may provide for the repair, replacement, or maintenance of property for damage
resulting from power surges and accidental damage from handling, with or
without additional provision for indemnity payments for incidental damages to
other property directly caused by the failure of the property which is the
subject of the service contract, provided the indemnity payment per incident
does not exceed the purchase price of the property that is the subject of the
service contract.

(10)
"Service contract holder" or "contract holder" means a
person who is the purchaser or holder of a service contract.

(11)
"Service contract provider" means a person who is contractually
obligated to the service contract holder under the terms of the service
contract.

(12)
"Service contract seller" means the person who sells the service
contract to the consumer.

(13)
"Warranty" means a warranty made solely by the manufacturer,
importer, or seller of property or services without consideration; that is not
negotiated or separated from the sale of the product and is incidental to the
sale of the product; and that guarantees indemnity for defective parts,
mechanical or electrical breakdown, labor, or other remedial measures, such as
repair or replacement of the property or repetition of services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person shall not act as, or offer to act as, or hold himself or herself out to
be a service contract provider in this state, nor may a service contract be
sold to a consumer in this state, unless the service contract provider has a
valid registration as a service contract provider issued by the commissioner.

(2)
Applicants to be a service contract provider shall make an application to the
commissioner upon a form to be furnished by the commissioner. The application
shall include or be accompanied by the following information and documents:

(a)
All basic organizational documents of the service contract provider, including
any articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership agreement,
trade name certificate, trust agreement, shareholder agreement, bylaws, and
other applicable documents, and all amendments to those documents;

(b)
The identities of the service contract provider's executive officer or officers
directly responsible for the service contract provider's service contract
business, and, if more than fifty percent of the service contract provider's
gross revenue is derived from the sale of service contracts, the identities of
the service contract provider's directors and stockholders having beneficial
ownership of ten percent or more of any class of securities;

(c)
Audited annual financial statements or other financial reports acceptable to
the commissioner for the two most recent years which prove that the applicant
is solvent and any information the commissioner may require in order to review
the current financial condition of the applicant. If the service contract
provider is relying on section 6(2) (a) or (c) of this act to assure the
faithful performance of its obligations to service contract holders, then the
audited financial statements of the service contract provider's parent company
may be substituted for the audited financial statements of the service contract
provider;

(d)
An application fee of two hundred fifty dollars, which shall be deposited into
the insurance commissioner's regulatory account under RCW 48.02.190; and

(e)
Any other pertinent information required by the commissioner.

(3)
The applicant shall appoint the commissioner as its attorney to receive service
of legal process in any action, suit, or proceeding in any court. This
appointment is irrevocable and shall bind the service contract provider or any
successor in interest, shall remain in effect as long as there is in force in
this state any contract or any obligation arising therefrom related to
residents of this state, and shall be processed in accordance with RCW
48.05.210.

(4)
The commissioner may refuse to issue a registration if the commissioner
determines that the service contract provider, or any individual responsible
for the conduct of the affairs of the service contract provider under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, is not competent, trustworthy, financially
responsible, or has had a license as a service contract provider or similar
license denied or revoked for cause by any state.

(5)
A registration issued under this section is valid, unless surrendered,
suspended, or revoked by the commissioner, or not renewed for so long as the
service contract provider continues in business in this state and remains in
compliance with this chapter. A registration is subject to renewal annually on
the first day of July upon application of the service contract provider and
payment of a fee of two hundred dollars, which shall be deposited into the
insurance commissioner's regulatory account under RCW 48.02.190. If not so
renewed, the registration expires on the June 30th next preceding.

(6)
A service contract provider shall keep current the information required to be
disclosed in its registration under this section by reporting all material
changes or additions within thirty days after the end of the month in which the
change or addition occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Every registered service contract provider that is assuring its faithful
performance of its obligations to its service contract holders by complying
with section 6(2)(b) of this act shall file an annual report for the preceding
calendar year with the commissioner on or before March 1st of each year, or
within any extension of time the commissioner for good cause may grant. The
report shall be in the form and contain those matters as the commissioner
prescribes and shall be verified by at least two officers of the service
contract provider.

(2)
At the time of filing the report, the service contract provider shall pay a
filing fee of twenty dollars which shall be deposited into the insurance
commissioner's regulatory account under RCW 48.02.190.

(3)
As part of any investigation by the commissioner, the commissioner may require
a service contract provider to file monthly financial reports whenever, in the
commissioner's discretion, there is a need to more closely monitor the
financial activities of the service contract provider. Monthly financial
statements shall be filed in the commissioner's office no later than the
twenty-fifth day of the month following the month for which the financial
report is being filed. These monthly financial reports shall be the internal
financial statements of the service contract provider. The monthly financial
reports that are filed with the commissioner constitute information that might
be damaging to the service contract provider if made available to its
competitors, and therefore shall be kept confidential by the commissioner.
This information shall not be made public or be subject to subpoena, other than
by the commissioner and then only for the purpose of enforcement actions taken
by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Service contracts shall not be issued, sold, or offered for sale in this state
or sold to consumers in this state unless the service contract provider has:

(a)
Provided a receipt for, or other written evidence of, the purchase of the
service contract to the contract holder; and

(b)
Provided a copy of the service contract to the service contract holder within a
reasonable period of time from the date of purchase.

(2)
In order to assure the faithful performance of a service contract provider's
obligations to its service contract holders, every service contract provider
shall be responsible for complying with the requirements of one of the
following:

(a)
Insure all service contracts under a reimbursement insurance policy issued by
an insurer holding a certificate of authority from the commissioner;

(b)(i)
Maintain a funded reserve account for its obligations under its service contracts
issued and outstanding in this state. The reserves shall not be less than
forty percent of the gross consideration received, less claims paid, on the
sale of the service contract for all in-force contracts. The reserve account
shall be subject to examination and review by the commissioner; and

(ii)
Place in trust with the commissioner a financial security deposit, having a
value of not less than five percent of the gross consideration received, less
claims paid, on the sale of the service contract for all service contracts
issued and in force, but not less than twenty-five thousand dollars, consisting
of one of the following:

(A)
A surety bond issued by an insurer holding a certificate of authority from the
commissioner;

(B)
Securities of the type eligible for deposit by authorized insurers in this
state;

(C)
Cash;

(D)
An evergreen letter of credit issued by a qualified financial institution; or

(E)
Another form of security prescribed by rule by the commissioner; or

(c)(i)
Maintain, or its parent company maintain, a net worth or stockholder's equity
of at least one hundred million dollars; and

(ii)
Upon request, provide the commissioner with a copy of the service contract
provider's or the service contract provider's parent company's most recent form
10-K or form 20-F filed with the securities and exchange commission within the
last calendar year, or if the company does not file with the securities and
exchange commission, a copy of the service contract provider's or the service
contract provider's parent company's audited financial statements, which shows
a net worth of the service contract provider or its parent company of at least
one hundred million dollars. If the service contract provider's parent
company's form 10-K, form 20-F, or audited financial statements are filed with
the commissioner to meet the service contract provider's financial stability
requirement, then the parent company shall agree to guarantee the obligations
of the service contract provider relating to service contracts sold by the
service contract provider in this state. A copy of the guarantee shall be
filed with the commissioner. The guarantee shall be irrevocable as long as
there is in force in this state any contract or any obligation arising from
service contracts guaranteed, unless the parent company has made arrangements
approved by the commissioner to satisfy its obligations under the guarantee.

(3)
Service contracts shall require the service contract provider to permit the
service contract holder to return the service contract within twenty days of
the date the service contract was mailed to the service contract holder or
within ten days of delivery if the service contract is delivered to the service
contract holder at the time of sale, or within a longer time period permitted
under the service contract. Upon return of the service contract to the service
contract provider within the applicable period, if no claim has been made under
the service contract prior to the return to the service contract provider, the
service contract is void and the service contract provider shall refund to the
service contract holder, or credit the account of the service contract holder
with the full purchase price of the service contract. The right to void the
service contract provided in this subsection is not transferable and shall
apply only to the original service contract purchaser. A ten percent penalty
per month shall be added to a refund of the purchase price that is not paid or
credited within thirty days after return of the service contract to the service
contract provider.

(4)
Except for service contract providers, persons marketing, selling, or offering
to sell service contracts for providers are exempt from the registration
requirements of section 4 of this act.

(5)
The marketing, sale, offering for sale, issuance, making, proposing to make,
and administration of service contracts by service contract providers and
related service contract sellers, administrators, and other persons complying
with this chapter are exempt from the other provisions of this title, except
chapter 48.04 RCW and as otherwise provided in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Reimbursement insurance policies insuring service contracts issued, sold, or
offered for sale in this state or sold to consumers in this state shall state
that the insurer that issued the reimbursement insurance policy shall reimburse
or pay on behalf of the service contract provider all sums the service contract
provider is legally obligated to pay, including but not limited to the refund
of the full purchase price of the service contract to the service contract
holder or shall provide the service which the service contract provider is
legally obligated to perform according to the service contract provider's
contractual obligations under the service contracts issued or sold by the
service contract provider.

(2)
The reimbursement insurance policy shall fully insure the obligations of the
service contract provider, rather than partially insure, or insure only in the
event of service contract provider default.

(3)
The reimbursement insurance policy shall state that the service contract holder
is entitled to apply directly to the reimbursement insurance company.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
Service contracts marketed, sold, offered for sale, issued, made, proposed to
be made, or administered in this state or sold to residents of this state shall
be written, printed, or typed in clear, understandable language that is easy to
read, and disclose the requirements set forth in this section, as applicable.

(2)
Service contracts insured under a reimbursement insurance policy under sections
6(2)(a) and 7 of this act shall not be issued, sold, or offered for sale in
this state or sold to residents of this state unless the service contract
conspicuously contains a statement in substantially the following form:
"Obligations of the service contract provider under this service contract
are insured under a service contract reimbursement insurance policy." The
service contract shall also conspicuously state the name and address of the
issuer of the reimbursement policy and state that the service contract holder
is entitled to apply directly to the reimbursement insurance company.

(3)
Service contracts not insured under a reimbursement insurance policy under
sections 6(2)(a) and 7 of this act shall contain a statement in substantially
the following form: "Obligations of the service contract provider under
this contract are backed by the full faith and credit of the service contract
provider."

(4)
Service contracts shall state the name and address of the service contract
provider and shall identify any administrator if different from the service
contract provider, the service contract seller, and the service contract holder
to the extent that the name of the service contract holder has been furnished
by the service contract holder. The identities of such parties are not
required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be added to the
service contract at the time of sale.

(5)
Service contracts shall state the purchase price of the service contract and
the terms under which the service contract is sold. The purchase price is not
required to be preprinted on the service contract and may be negotiated at the
time of sale.

(6)
Service contracts shall state the procedure to obtain service or to file a
claim, including but not limited to the procedures for obtaining prior approval
for repair work, the toll-free telephone number if prior approval is necessary
for service, and the procedure for obtaining emergency repairs performed
outside of normal business hours or provide for twenty-four-hour telephone
assistance.

(7)
Service contracts shall state the existence of any deductible amount, if
applicable.

(8)
Service contracts shall specify the merchandise and services to be provided and
any limitations, exceptions, or exclusions.

(9)
Service contracts shall state any restrictions governing the transferability of
the service contract, if applicable.

(10)
Service contracts shall state the terms, restrictions, or conditions governing
cancellation of the service contract prior to the termination or expiration
date of the service contract by either the service contract provider or by the
service contract holder, which rights can be no more restrictive than provided
in section 6(3) of this act. The service contract provider of the service
contract shall mail a written notice to the service contract holder at the last
known address of the service contract holder contained in the records of the
service contract provider at least twenty-one days prior to cancellation by the
service contract provider. The notice shall state the effective date of the
cancellation and the true and actual reason for the cancellation.

(11)
Service contracts shall set forth the obligations and duties of the service
contract holder, including but not limited to the duty to protect against any
further damage and any requirement to follow owner's manual instructions.

(12)
Service contracts shall state whether or not the service contract provides for
or excludes consequential damages or preexisting conditions.

(13)
Service contracts shall not contain a provision which requires that any civil
action brought in connection with the service contract must be brought in the
courts of a jurisdiction other than this state. Service contracts that
authorize binding arbitration to resolve claims or disputes may allow for
arbitration proceedings to be held at a location in closest proximity to the
service contract holder's permanent residence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) A
service contract provider shall not use in its name the words insurance,
casualty, guaranty, surety, mutual, or any other words descriptive of the
insurance, casualty, guaranty, or surety business; or a name deceptively
similar to the name or description of any insurance or surety corporation, or
to the name of any other service contract provider. This subsection does not
apply to a company that was using any of the prohibited language in its name
prior to January 1, 1999. However, a company using the prohibited language in
its name shall conspicuously disclose in its service contracts the following
statement: "This agreement is not an insurance contract."

(2)
Every service contract provider shall conduct its business in its own legal
name, unless the commissioner has approved the use of another name.

(3)
A service contract provider or its representative shall not in its service
contracts or literature make, permit, or cause to be made any false or
misleading statement, or deliberately omit any material statement that would be
considered misleading if omitted.

(4)
A person, such as a bank, savings and loan association, lending institution,
manufacturer, or seller shall not require the purchase of a service contract as
a condition of a loan or a condition for the sale of any property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The service contract provider shall keep accurate accounts, books, and records
concerning transactions regulated under this chapter.

(2)
The service contract provider's accounts, books, and records shall include the
following:

(a)
Copies of each type of service contract sold;

(b)
The name and address of each service contract holder, to the extent that the
name and address have been furnished by the service contract holder;

(c)
A list of the locations where the service contracts are marketed, sold, or
offered for sale; and

(d)
Written claim files that contain at least the dates, amounts, and descriptions
of claims related to the service contracts.

(3)
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the service contract
provider shall retain all records required to be maintained by subsection (1)
of this section for at least six years after the specified coverage has
expired.

(4)
The records required under this chapter may be, but are not required to be,
maintained on a computer disk or other recordkeeping technology. If the
records are maintained in other than hard copy, the records shall be capable of
duplication to legible hard copy.

(5)
A service contract provider discontinuing business in this state shall maintain
its records until it furnishes the commissioner satisfactory proof that it has
discharged all obligations to service contract holders in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. As
applicable, an insurer that issued a reimbursement insurance policy shall not
terminate the policy until a notice of termination in accordance with RCW
48.18.290 has been given to the service contract provider and has been
delivered to the commissioner. The termination of a reimbursement insurance
policy does not reduce the issuer's responsibility for service contracts issued
by service contract providers prior to the effective date of the termination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
Service contract providers are considered to be the agent of the insurer which
issued the reimbursement insurance policy for purposes of obligating the
insurer to service contract holders in accordance with the service contract and
this chapter. Payment of the provider fee by the consumer to the service
contract seller, service contract provider, or administrator constitutes
payment by the consumer to the service contract provider and to the insurer
which issued the reimbursement insurance policy. In cases where a service
contract provider is acting as an administrator and enlists other service
contract providers, the service contract provider acting as the administrator
shall notify the insurer of the existence and identities of the other service
contract providers.

(2)
This act does not prevent or limit the right of an insurer which issued a
reimbursement insurance policy to seek indemnification or subrogation against a
service contract provider if the issuer pays or is obligated to pay the service
contract holder sums that the service contract provider was obligated to pay
under the provisions of the service contract.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. (1)
The commissioner may conduct investigations of service contract providers,
administrators, service contract sellers, insurers, and other persons to
enforce this chapter and protect service contract holders in this state. Upon
request of the commissioner, the service contract provider shall make all
accounts, books, and records concerning service contracts sold by the service
contract provider available to the commissioner which are necessary to enable
the commissioner to determine compliance or noncompliance with this chapter.

(2)
The commissioner may take actions under RCW 48.02.080 or 48.04.050 which are
necessary or appropriate to enforce this chapter and the commissioner's rules
and orders, and to protect service contract holders in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. (1)
The commissioner may, subject to chapter 48.04 RCW, deny, suspend, or revoke
the registration of a service contract provider if the commissioner finds that
the service contract provider:

(a)
Has violated this chapter or the commissioner's rules and orders;

(b)
Has refused to be investigated or to produce its accounts, records, and files
for investigation, or if any of its officers have refused to give information
with respect to its affairs or refused to perform any other legal obligation as
to an investigation, when required by the commissioner;

(c)
Has, without just cause, refused to pay proper claims or perform services
arising under its contracts or has, without just cause, caused service contract
holders to accept less than the amount due them or caused service contract
holders to employ attorneys or bring suit against the service contract provider
to secure full payment or settlement of claims;

(d)
Is affiliated with or under the same general management or interlocking
directorate or ownership as another service contract provider which unlawfully
transacts business in this state without having a registration;

(e)
At any time fails to meet any qualification for which issuance of the
registration could have been refused had such failure then existed and been
known to the commissioner;

(f)
Has been convicted of, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a
felony;

(g)
Is under suspension or revocation in another state with respect to its service
contract business;

(h)
Has made a material misstatement in its application for registration;

(i)
Has obtained or attempted to obtain a registration through misrepresentation or
fraud;

(j)
Has, in the transaction of business under its registration, used fraudulent,
coercive, or dishonest practices; or

(k)
Has failed to pay any judgment rendered against it in this state regarding a
service contract within sixty days after the judgment has become final.

(2)
The commissioner may, without advance notice or hearing thereon, immediately
suspend the registration of a service contract provider if the commissioner
finds that any of the following circumstances exist:

(a)
The provider is insolvent;

(b)
A proceeding for receivership, conservatorship, rehabilitation, or other
delinquency proceeding regarding the service contract provider has been
commenced in any state; or

(c)
The financial condition or business practices of the service contract provider
otherwise pose an imminent threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of
the residents of this state.

(3)
If the commissioner finds that grounds exist for the suspension or revocation
of a registration issued under this chapter, the commissioner may, in lieu of
suspension or revocation, impose a fine upon the service contract provider in
an amount not more than two thousand dollars per violation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of this chapter are not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A
violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the
conduct of trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition, as
specifically contemplated by RCW 19.86.020, and is a violation of the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Any service contract holder injured as a
result of a violation of a provision of this chapter shall be entitled to
maintain an action pursuant to chapter 19.86 RCW against the service contract
provider and the insurer issuing the applicable service contract reimbursement
policy and shall be entitled to all of the rights and remedies afforded by that
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. The
commissioner may adopt rules to implement and administer this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. This
chapter applies to all service contracts sold or offered for sale ninety or more
days after the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Information
provided to the insurance commissioner under section 5(3) of this act is exempt
from disclosure under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20.
Sections 1 through 17 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

---
END ---