BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.01 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may adopt necessary rules and procedures to allow use of credit and
debit cards for payment of fees and excise taxes to the department and its
agents or subagents related to vehicle and vessel titling and registration.
The department may establish a convenience fee to be paid by the credit or
debit card user whenever a credit or debit card is chosen as the payment
method. The fee must be sufficient to offset the charges imposed on the
department and its agents and subagents by credit and debit card companies.

The use of a personal credit card does not rely upon the credit of
the state as prohibited by Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution.

---
END ---