BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that access to a higher education will give children who are
in foster care hope for the future. The legislature further finds that such
assistance will help these children become successful, productive, contributing
citizens and avoid the cycles of abuse, poverty, violence, and delinquency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The foster care scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is
to help students who were in foster care attend an institution of higher
education in the state of Washington.

(2)
To the extent funds are appropriated, the higher education coordinating board
shall award grants to eligible recipients to help cover the costs of receiving
a higher education at an institution of higher education. The grant shall be
in an amount not to exceed the costs of obtaining a higher education, excluding
tuition. The higher education coordinating board shall establish procedures,
by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to students.

(3)
To qualify for the grant, recipients shall be between the ages of sixteen and
twenty-three and have been in foster care in the state of Washington for a
minimum of six months since their fifteenth birthday. Recipients must be
eligible for financial aid under the state student financial aid program.
Recipients shall enter an institution of higher education or a vocational
program in Washington state within three years of high school graduation or
have successfully passed the general educational development test. Recipients
shall maintain satisfactory academic and attendance progress as defined by the
particular educational institution. Students are eligible to receive a maximum
of eight semesters or twelve quarters of grants for undergraduate study if they
meet the age requirements under this section. Students may transfer among
in-state public and independent colleges and universities in this state and
continue to receive the grant.

(4)
No grant may be awarded to any student who is pursuing a degree in theology.

(5)
Grants under this section shall not affect eligibility for the state student
financial aid program.

(6)
The higher education coordinating board shall work with the department of
social and health services and the superintendent of public instruction to
provide information about this program to children in foster care in high
schools in the state of Washington and to persons over the age of eighteen who
would be eligible for the program.

(7)
As used in this section, "public college or university" means an
institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(8)
As used in this section, "independent college or university" means a
private, nonprofit educational institution, the main campus of which is
permanently situated in the state, open to residents of the state, providing
programs of education beyond the high school level leading at least to the
baccalaureate degree, and accredited by the Northwest association of schools
and colleges as of the effective date of this section, and other institutions
as may be developed that are approved by the higher education coordinating
board as meeting equivalent standards as those institutions accredited under
this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the higher education coordinating board to carry out the
purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the higher education coordinating board to carry out
the purposes of this act.

---
END ---