BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Population increases, more rapid means of transportation, and other factors
have contributed to a dramatic increase in the accidental introduction of
nonnative species throughout the world. The indiscriminate introduction of new
species can have unpredictable and often negative impacts on native species.
Aquatic species that are especially destructive when introduced into new
ecosystems are referred to as aquatic nuisance species.

The
legislature finds that aquatic nuisance species are a serious problem that
threaten the ecological integrity of the state's marine and freshwater
resources. Aquatic nuisance species also have a significant impact on economic,
social, and public health conditions within our state. These species have few
natural controls in their new habitat and can spread rapidly, destroying native
plant and animal habitat, reducing recreational opportunities, lowering
property values, clogging waterways, and impacting irrigation and power
generation.

The
large number of governmental entities that now fund and regulate programs to
manage aquatic nuisance species have diverse interests and limited
jurisdictions that cannot adequately address the wide ranging impacts of
aquatic nuisance species in Washington.

The
legislature intends to minimize the environmental and economic risks from
aquatic nuisance species by improving cooperation between the various state and
federal agencies responsible for controlling aquatic nuisance species, and by
authorizing specific programs that either prevent the introduction of these
species or aid in eliminating infestations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Committee" means the aquatic nuisance species coordination
committee.

(2)
"Aquatic nuisance species" means a nonnative aquatic plant or animal
species that threatens the diversity or abundance of native species, the
ecological stability of infested waters, or commercial, agricultural, or
recreational activities dependent on such waters, and consists of those:

(a)
Aquatic plants listed by the state noxious weed control board as noxious weeds
as provided in RCW 17.10.080; and

(b)
Aquatic animals classified as aquatic nuisance species by the commission as
provided in RCW 77.12.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The aquatic nuisance species coordination committee is created for the purpose
of fostering state, federal, tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic
nuisance species issues. The committee shall strive to minimize the accidental
introduction of nonnative aquatic species and give special emphasis to
preventing the introduction and spread of aquatic nuisance species.

(2)
The committee shall consist of representatives from each of the following state
agencies: Department of fish and wildlife, department of ecology, department
of agriculture, department of natural resources, state patrol, state noxious
weed control board, and Washington sea grant program. United States fish and
wildlife service, United States environmental protection agency, and one person
representing federally recognized tribes of Washington will also be invited to
participate in the committee. The representative from the department of fish
and wildlife shall chair the committee. The committee chair may invite the
participation of other state, federal, tribal, or private organizations on
either an ad hoc or continuing basis, if it will better accomplish the purposes
of the committee.

(3)
The committee has the following duties:

(a)
Periodically revise the state of Washington aquatic nuisance species management
plan, originally published in June 1998;

(b)
Prepare a zebra mussel containment plan for quickly detecting and responding to
an introduction of zebra mussels in a manner that will eradicate the mussels or
control their spread if eradication is not possible;

(c)
Prepare a programmatic environmental impact statement for the zebra mussel
containment plan and for other aquatic nuisance species as needed;

(d)
Design a monitoring program for early detection of zebra mussel introductions
into Washington waters;

(e)
Design early response plans for other aquatic nuisance species, as necessary;

(f)
Design an on-site inspection program of aquatic plant dealers;

(g)
Facilitate solutions for preventing the introduction of nonnative aquatic
species from the ballast water of ships;

(h)
Design a zebra mussel inspection program for large boats being hauled by
commercial carriers into the state;

(i)
Design a voluntary inspection program for small boats entering Washington;

(j)
Design an aquatic species education program, including educational materials;

(k)
Establish a list of advisors and seek their recommendations regarding these
duties;

(l)
Advise member agencies on the use of funds available for aquatic nuisance
species activities;

(m)
Prepare a report to the legislature making recommendations for better
accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and listing the committee's
accomplishments by December 1, 2001;

(n)
Investigate and make recommendations regarding methods for better integrating
the management of terrestrial and aquatic nuisance species.

(4)
The committee shall accomplish its duties through the authority and cooperation
of its member agencies. Implementation of all plans and programs developed by
the committee shall be through the member agencies and other cooperating
organizations. Funding requests for aquatic nuisance species activities shall
be submitted through the member agencies as a part of their individual budget
requests.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department of ecology shall investigate the risk of introductions of nonnative
aquatic species through the discharge of ballast water from ships and recommend
state actions to respond to this risk. In conducting this investigation, the
director of ecology shall seek the cooperation and participation of
organizations representing the maritime community for both Puget Sound and the
Columbia river. The recommendations shall be submitted in a report to the
aquatic nuisance species coordination committee and to the appropriate
legislative committees no later than December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of ecology may inspect vessels and sample ballast water to determine
whether the vessel's ballast water poses a measurable risk of introducing
nonnative aquatic species into the waters of the state. Ballast water sampling
and determinations of measurable risk shall be based on accepted scientific
practice and parameters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department of agriculture may inspect licensed nurseries dealing in aquatic
plants for the purpose of detecting aquatic nuisance species and preventing the
introduction of these species into Washington waters. If aquatic nuisance
species are detected, the department of agriculture may quarantine the infested
aquatic plants, and require the nursery to decontaminate or dispose of the
plants in a manner that will prevent their introduction into Washington waters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
state patrol may inspect boats entering the state at a port of entry for the
purpose of detecting zebra mussels and preventing the introduction of this
species into Washington waters. If zebra mussels are detected, the state
patrol may prohibit the further movement of the boat until the carrier agrees
to an approved method of decontaminating the boat. The department of fish and
wildlife shall adopt rules defining approved decontamination methods.

Sec.
8. RCW
77.12.020 and 1994 c 264 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall investigate the habits and distribution of the various
species of wildlife native to or adaptable to the habitats of the state. The
commission shall determine whether a species should be managed by the
department and, if so, classify it under this section.

(2)
The commission may classify by rule wild animals as game animals and game
animals as fur-bearing animals.

(3)
The commission may classify by rule wild birds as game birds or predatory
birds. All wild birds not otherwise classified are protected wildlife.

(4)
In addition to those species listed in RCW 77.08.020, the commission may
classify by rule as game fish other species of the class Osteichthyes that are
commonly found in fresh water except those classified as food fish by the
director.

(5)
The director may recommend to the commission that a species of wildlife should
not be hunted or fished. The commission may designate species of wildlife as
protected.

(6)
If the director determines that a species of wildlife is seriously threatened
with extinction in the state of Washington, the director may request its
designation as an endangered species. The commission may designate an
endangered species.

(7)
If the director determines that a species of the animal kingdom, not native to
Washington, is dangerous to the environment or wildlife of the state, the
director may request its designation as deleterious exotic wildlife. The
commission may designate deleterious exotic wildlife.

(8)
If the director determines that an aquatic animal species, not native to
Washington, threatens the diversity or abundance of native species, the
ecological stability of infested waters, or commercial, agricultural, or recreational
activities dependent on such waters, the director may request its designation
as an aquatic nuisance species. The commission may designate aquatic nuisance
species.

Sec.
9. RCW
77.15.250 and 1998 c 190 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A person is guilty of unlawfully releasing, planting, or placing fish or
wildlife if the person knowingly releases, plants, or places live ((fish,))
wildlife((, or aquatic plants)) within the state, or the person
knowingly releases, plants, or places live fish, shellfish, or aquatic plants
into waters of the state, except ((for)) that this subsection
does not apply to (i) a release of game fish into private waters for which
a game fish stocking permit has been obtained; (ii) the planting of native
aquatic plants in waters where they are naturally found, or any habitat
restoration or protection project using native aquatic plants; or (iii)
the planting of food fish or shellfish by permit or rule of the
commission or that are private sector cultured aquatic products otherwise
allowed by law.

(b)
A violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor. In addition, the
department ((shall)) may order the person to pay all costs the department
incurred in capturing, killing, or controlling the fish or wildlife released or
its progeny. Any such order may be reviewed and enforced as provided in
Title 34 RCW. This does not affect the existing authority of the
department to bring a separate civil action to recover costs of capturing,
killing, controlling the fish or wildlife released or their progeny, or
restoration of habitat necessitated by the unlawful release.

(2)(a)
A person is guilty of unlawful release of deleterious exotic wildlife or
aquatic nuisance species if the person knowingly releases, plants, or
places live fish or wildlife within the state and such fish or wildlife has
been classified as deleterious exotic wildlife or as an aquatic nuisance
species by rule of the commission.

(b)
A violation of this subsection is a class C felony. In addition, the
department ((shall also)) may order the person to pay all costs
the department incurred in capturing, killing, or controlling the fish or
wildlife released or its progeny. Any such order may be reviewed and
enforced as provided in Title 34 RCW. This does not affect the existing
authority of the department to bring a separate civil action to recover costs
of capturing, killing, controlling the fish or wildlife released or their progeny,
or restoration of habitat necessitated by the unlawful release.

(3)(a)
A person is guilty of unlawful use or possession of deleterious exotic wildlife
or aquatic nuisance species if the person knowingly violates any rule of the
commission regarding the possession, transportation, holding, reporting, or any
other action or restriction regarding a species classified as deleterious
exotic wildlife or as an aquatic nuisance species.

(b)
A violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor. This does not affect
the existing authority of the department to bring a separate civil action to
compel compliance with any rule concerning deleterious exotic wildlife or
aquatic nuisance species.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 2, 3, and 5 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 77
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 4 of this act, referencing
section 4 of this act by section number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in
the omnibus appropriations act, then section 4 of this act is null and void.

(2)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 5 of this act, referencing
section 5 of this act by section number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in
the omnibus appropriations act, then section 5 of this act is null and void.

(3)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 6 of this act, referencing
section 6 of this act by section number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in
the omnibus appropriations act, then section 6 of this act is null and void.

(4) If specific funding for the purposes of section 7 of this act,
referencing section 7 of this act by section number, is not provided by June
30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, then section 7 of this act is null
and void.

---
END ---