BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.34.100 and 1996 c 249 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is the subject of
an action under this chapter((, unless a court for good cause finds the
appointment unnecessary)). The requirement of a guardian ad litem may be
deemed satisfied if the child is represented by independent counsel in the
proceedings.

(2)
If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem program with a
sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint a suitable person to act
as guardian ad litem for the child under this chapter. Another party to the
proceeding or the party's employee or representative shall not be so appointed.

(3)
Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background information record
for each guardian ad litem in the program. The background file shall include,
but is not limited to, the following information:

(a)
Level of formal education;

(b)
Training related to the guardian's duties;

(c)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(d)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or counties of
appointment; and

(e)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

The
background information report shall be updated annually. As a condition of
appointment, the guardian ad litem's background information record shall be
made available to the court. If the appointed guardian ad litem is not a
member of a guardian ad litem program the person shall provide the background
information to the court.

Upon
appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem program, shall provide
the parties or their attorneys with a statement containing his or her training
relating to the duties as a guardian ad litem and criminal history as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment.
The background statement shall not include identifying information that may be
used to harm a guardian ad litem, such as home addresses and home telephone
numbers, and for volunteer guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of
maiden names or pseudonyms as necessary for their safety.

(4)
The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect until the court
discharges the appointment or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever comes
first. The guardian ad litem may also be discharged upon entry of an order of
guardianship.

(5)
A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized by the court,
shall have the right to present evidence, examine and cross-examine witnesses,
and to be present at all hearings. A guardian ad litem shall receive copies of
all pleadings and other documents filed or submitted to the court, and notice
of all hearings according to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive
all notice contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under
this chapter.

(6)
If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older, or if the
guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child needs to be
independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint an attorney to
represent the child's position.

(7)
For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act (42 U.S.C. Secs.
5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247, or any related state or
federal legislation, a person appointed pursuant to RCW 13.34.100 shall be
deemed a guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the minor in
proceedings before the court.

(8) When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian
ad litem is requested on a case, the program shall give the court the name of
the person it recommends and the appointment shall be effective immediately.
The court shall appoint the person recommended by the program. If a party in a
case reasonably believes the court-appointed special advocate or volunteer is
inappropriate or unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment
by the program. The program must complete the review within five judicial days
and remove any appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the review is
not satisfied with the outcome of the review, the party may file a motion with
the court for the removal of the court-appointed special advocate on the
grounds the advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

---
END ---