BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Cable television service" means the one-way transmission to
subscribers of video programming and other programming service and subscriber
interaction, if any, that is required for the selection or use of the video
programming or other programming service.

(2)
"Facilities" means all of the plant, equipment, fixtures,
appurtenances, antennas, and other facilities necessary to furnish and deliver
telecommunications services and cable television services, including but not
limited to poles with crossarms, poles without crossarms, wires, lines,
conduits, cables, communication and signal lines and equipment, braces, guys,
anchors, vaults, and all attachments, appurtenances, and appliances necessary
or incidental to the distribution and use of telecommunications services and
cable television services.

(3)
"Master permit" means the agreement in whatever form whereby a city
or town may grant general permission to a service provider to enter, use, and
occupy the right of way for the purpose of locating facilities. This
definition is not intended to limit, alter, or change the extent of the
existing authority of a city or town to require a franchise nor does it change
the status of a service provider with an existing state-wide grant to occupy
the right of way. For the purposes of this subsection, a franchise, except for
a cable television franchise, is a master permit. Master permit does not
include cable television franchises.

(4)
"Personal wireless services" means commercial mobile services,
unlicensed wireless services, and common carrier wireless exchange access
services, as defined by federal laws and regulations.

(5)
"Right of way" means land acquired or dedicated for public roads and
streets, but does not include:

(a)
State highways;

(b)
Land dedicated for roads, streets, and highways not opened and not improved for
motor vehicle use by the public;

(c)
Structures located within the right of way;

(d)
Federally granted trust lands or forest board trust lands;

(e)
Lands owned or managed by the state parks and recreation commission; or

(f)
Federally granted railroad rights of way acquired under 43 U.S.C. Sec. 912 and
related provisions of federal law that are not open for motor vehicle use.

(6)
"Service provider" means every corporation, company, association,
joint stock association, firm, partnership, person, city, or town owning,
operating, or managing any facilities used to provide and providing
telecommunications or cable television service for hire, sale, or resale to the
general public. Service provider includes the legal successor to any such
corporation, company, association, joint stock association, firm, partnership,
person, city, or town.

(7)
"Telecommunications service" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means for hire,
sale, or resale to the general public. For the purpose of this subsection,
"information" means knowledge or intelligence represented by any form
of writing, signs, signals, pictures, sounds, or any other symbols. For the
purpose of this chapter, telecommunications service excludes the over-the-air
transmission of broadcast television or broadcast radio signals.

(8)
"Use permit" means the authorization in whatever form whereby a city
or town may grant permission to a service provider to enter and use the
specified right of way for the purpose of installing, maintaining, repairing,
or removing identified facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
city or town may issue or deny permits for the use of the right of way by a
service provider for installing, maintaining, repairing, or removing facilities
for telecommunications services or cable television services pursuant to
ordinances, consistent with this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Cities and towns may require a service provider to obtain a master permit. A
city or town may request, but not require, that a service provider with an
existing state-wide grant to occupy the right of way obtain a master permit for
wireline facilities.

(a)
The procedures for the approval of a master permit and the requirements for a
complete application for a master permit shall be available in written form.

(b)
Where a city or town requires a master permit, the city or town shall act upon
a complete application within one hundred twenty days from the date a service
provider files the complete application for the master permit to use the right
of way, except:

(i)
With the agreement of the applicant; or

(ii)
Where the master permit requires action of the legislative body of the city or
town and such action cannot reasonably be obtained within the one hundred
twenty day period.

(2)
A city or town may require that a service provider obtain a use permit. A city
or town must act on a request for a use permit by a service provider within
thirty days of receipt of a completed application, unless a service provider
consents to a different time period or the service provider has not obtained a
master permit requested by the city or town.

(a)
For the purpose of this section, "act" means that the city makes the
decision to grant, condition, or deny the use permit, which may be subject to
administrative appeal, or notifies the applicant in writing of the amount of
time that will be required to make the decision and the reasons for this time
period.

(b)
Requirements otherwise applicable to holders of master permits shall be deemed
satisfied by a holder of a cable franchise in good standing.

(c)
Where the master permit does not contain procedures to expedite approvals and
the service provider requires action in less than thirty days, the service provider
shall advise the city or town in writing of the reasons why a shortened time
period is necessary and the time period within which action by the city or town
is requested. The city or town shall reasonably cooperate to meet the request
where practicable.

(d)
A city or town may not deny a use permit to a service provider with an existing
state-wide grant to occupy the right of way for wireline facilities on the
basis of failure to obtain a master permit.

(3)
The reasons for a denial of a master permit shall be supported by substantial
evidence contained in a written record. A service provider adversely affected
by the final action denying a master permit, or by an unreasonable failure to
act on a master permit as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, may
commence an action within thirty days to seek relief, which shall be limited to
injunctive relief.

(4)
A service provider adversely affected by the final action denying a use permit
may commence an action within thirty days to seek relief, which shall be
limited to injunctive relief. In any appeal of the final action denying a use
permit, the standard for review and burden of proof shall be as set forth in
RCW 36.70C.130.

(5)
A city or town shall:

(a)
In order to facilitate the scheduling and coordination of work in the right of
way, provide as much advance notice as reasonable of plans to open the right of
way to those service providers who are current users of the right of way or who
have filed notice with the clerk of the city or town within the past twelve
months of their intent to place facilities in the city or town. A city is not
liable for damages for failure to provide this notice. Where the city has
failed to provide notice of plans to open the right of way consistent with this
subsection, a city may not deny a use permit to a service provider on the basis
that the service provider failed to coordinate with another project.

(b)
Have the authority to require that facilities are installed and maintained
within the right of way in such a manner and at such points so as not to
inconvenience the public use of the right of way or to adversely affect the
public, health, safety, and welfare.

(c)
Use any proprietary information provided by a service provider under this
subsection solely for the purposes that qualify the information as exempt from
disclosure under this section and chapter 42.17 RCW. Proprietary information
regarding existing or planned facilities that is provided by a service provider
to a city or town for the purpose of obtaining a master permit or planning for,
scheduling, and coordinating work in the right of way, shall not be deemed a
public record under chapter 42.17 RCW and is exempt under RCW 42.17.310 from
public inspection and copying.

(6)
A service provider shall:

(a)
Obtain all permits required by the city or town for the installation,
maintenance, repair, or removal of facilities in the right of way;

(b)
Comply with applicable ordinances, construction codes, regulations, and
standards subject to verification by the city or town of such compliance;

(c)
Cooperate with the city or town in ensuring that facilities are installed,
maintained, repaired, and removed within the right of way in such a manner and
at such points so as not to inconvenience the public use of the right of way or
to adversely affect the public health, safety, and welfare;

(d)
Provide information and plans as reasonably necessary to enable a city or town
to comply with subsection (5) of this section;

(e)
Obtain the written approval of the facility or structure owner, if the service
provider does not own it, prior to attaching to or otherwise using a facility
or structure in the right of way;

(f)
Construct, install, operate, and maintain its facilities at its expense; and

(g)
Comply with applicable federal and state safety laws and standards.

(7)
Nothing in this section shall be construed as:

(a)
Creating a new duty upon city or towns to be responsible for construction of
facilities for service providers or to modify the right of way to accommodate
such facilities;

(b)
Creating, expanding, or extending any liability of a city or town to any
third-party user of facilities or third-party beneficiary; or

(c)
Limiting the right of a city or town to require an indemnification agreement as
a condition of a service provider's facilities occupying the right of way.

(8)
Nothing in this section creates, modifies, expands, or diminishes a priority of
use of the right of way by a service provider or other utility, either in
relation to other service providers or in relation to other users of the right
of way for other purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
city or town shall not adopt or enforce regulations or ordinances specifically
relating to use of the right of way by a service provider that:

(a)
Impose requirements that regulate the services or business operations of the
service provider, except where otherwise authorized in state or federal law;

(b)
Conflict with federal or state laws, rules, or regulations that specifically
apply to the design, construction, and operation of facilities or with federal
or state worker safety or public safety laws, rules, or regulations;

(c)
Regulate the services provided based upon the content or kind of signals that
are carried or are capable of being carried over the facilities, except where
otherwise authorized in state or federal law; or

(d)
Unreasonably deny the use of the right of way by a service provider for
installing, maintaining, repairing, or removing facilities for
telecommunications services or cable television services.

(2)
Nothing in this section, including but not limited to the provisions of
subsection (1)(d) of this section, limits the authority of a city or town to
regulate the placement of facilities through its local zoning or police power,
if the regulations do not otherwise:

(a)
Prohibit the placement of all wireless or of all wireline facilities within the
city or town, or prohibit the placement of all wireless or of all wireline
facilities within city or town rights of way; or

(b)
Violate section 253 of the telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110
Stat. 56).

(3)
This section does not amend, limit, repeal, or otherwise modify the authority
of cities or towns to regulate cable television services pursuant to federal
law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) A
city or town shall not place or extend a moratorium on the acceptance and
processing of applications, permitting, construction, maintenance, repair,
replacement, extension, operation, or use of any facilities for personal
wireless services, except as consistent with the guidelines for facilities
siting implementation, as agreed to on August 5, 1998, by the federal
communications commission's local and state government advisory committee, the
cellular telecommunications industry association, the personal communications
industry association, and the American mobile telecommunications association.
Any city or town implementing such a moratorium shall, at the request of a
service provider impacted by the moratorium, participate with the service provider
in the informal dispute resolution process included with the guidelines for
facilities siting implementation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Cities and towns may require service providers to relocate authorized
facilities within the right of way when reasonably necessary for construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement of the right of way for purposes of public
welfare, health, or safety.

(2)
Cities shall notify service providers as soon as practicable of the need for
relocation and the date by which relocation shall be completed. In calculating
the date that relocation must be completed, cities shall consult with affected
service providers and consider the extent of the facilities to be relocated,
the services requirements, and the construction sequence required to safely
complete the relocation. Service providers shall relocate facilities as soon
as practicable using all best efforts, subject to safety and service
obligations.

(3)
Service providers may not seek reimbursement for their relocation expenses from
the city or town requesting relocation under subsection (1) of this section
except:

(a)
Where the service provider had paid for the relocation cost of the same
facilities at the request of the city or town within the past five years, the
service provider's share of the cost of relocation will be paid by the city or
town requesting relocation;

(b)
Where aerial to underground relocation of authorized facilities is required by
the city or town under subsection (1) of this section, for service providers
with an ownership share of the aerial supporting structures, the additional
incremental cost of underground compared to aerial relocation, or as provided
for in the approved tariff if less, will be paid by the city or town requiring
relocation; and

(c)
Where the city or town requests relocation under subsection (1) of this section
solely for aesthetic purposes, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.

(4)
Where a project in subsection (1) of this section is primarily for private
benefit, the private party or parties shall reimburse the cost of relocation in
the same proportion to their contribution to the costs of the project. Service
providers will not be precluded from recovering their costs associated with
relocation required under subsection (1) of this section, provided that the
recovery is consistent with subsection (3) of this section and other applicable
laws.

(5)
A city or town may require the relocation of facilities at the service
provider's expense in the event of an unforeseen emergency that creates an
immediate threat to the public safety, health, or welfare.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
city or town may require that a service provider that is constructing,
relocating, or placing ducts or conduits in public rights of way provide the
city or town with additional duct or conduit and related structures necessary
to access the conduit, provided that:

(1)
The city or town enters into a contract with the service provider consistent
with RCW 80.36.150. The contract rates to be charged should recover the
incremental costs of the service provider. If the city or town makes the
additional duct or conduit and related access structures available to any other
entity for the purposes of providing telecommunications or cable television
service for hire, sale, or resale to the general public, the rates to be
charged, as set forth in the contract with the entity that constructed the
conduit or duct, shall recover at least the fully allocated costs of the
service provider. The service provider shall state both contract rates in the
contract. The city or town shall inform the service provider of the use, and
any change in use, of the requested duct or conduit and related access
structures to determine the applicable rate to be paid by the city or town.

(2)
Except as otherwise agreed by the service provider and the city or town, the
city or town shall agree that the requested additional duct or conduit space
and related access structures will not be used by the city or town to provide
telecommunications or cable television service for hire, sale, or resale to the
general public.

(3)
The city or town shall not require that the additional duct or conduit space be
connected to the access structures and vaults of the service provider.

(4)
The value of the additional duct or conduit requested by a city or town shall
not be considered a public works construction contract.

(5)
This section shall not affect the provision of an institutional network by a cable
television provider under federal law.

Sec.
8. RCW
35.21.860 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or charge of
whatever nature or description upon the light and power, or gas distribution
businesses, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, or telephone business, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, or service provider for use of the right of way, except
((that)):

(a)
A tax authorized by RCW 35.21.865 may be imposed ((and)) on a
light and power or gas distribution business;

(b)
A fee may be charged to such businesses or service providers that
recovers actual administrative expenses incurred by a city or town that are
directly related to receiving and approving a permit, license, and franchise,
to inspecting plans and construction, or to the preparation of a detailed
statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW;

(c)
Taxes permitted by state law on service providers;

(d)
Franchise requirements and fees for cable television services as allowed by
federal law; and

(e)
A site-specific charge pursuant to an agreement between the city or town and a
service provider of personal wireless services acceptable to the parties for
either:

(i)
The placement of new or replacement structures in the right of way necessary
for the provision of personal wireless services, where the structure exceeds
fifty feet or fifteen feet above the height of the existing structure,
whichever is greater; or

(ii)
The placement of personal wireless facilities on structures owned by the city
or town located in the right of way.

A
city or town is not required to approve the use permit for the placement of a
facility for personal wireless services that meets one of the criteria in this
subsection absent such an agreement.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees imposed on an
electrical energy, natural gas, or telephone business, by contract existing on
April 20, 1982, with a city or town, for the duration of the contract, but the
franchise fees shall be considered taxes for the purposes of the limitations
established in RCW 35.21.865 and 35.21.870 to the extent the fees exceed the
costs allowable under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act shall not preempt specific provisions in existing franchises or contracts
between cities or towns and service providers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 35A.21 RCW to read as follows:

Each
code city is subject to the requirements and restrictions regarding facilities
and rights of way under sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act and RCW
35.21.860.

Sec.
11. RCW
42.17.310 and 1999 c 326 s 3, 1999 c 290 s 1, and 1999 c 215 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
The following are exempt from public inspection and copying:

(a)
Personal information in any files maintained for students in public schools,
patients or clients of public institutions or public health agencies, or
welfare recipients.

(b)
Personal information in files maintained for employees, appointees, or elected
officials of any public agency to the extent that disclosure would violate
their right to privacy.

(c)
Information required of any taxpayer in connection with the assessment or
collection of any tax if the disclosure of the information to other persons
would (i) be prohibited to such persons by RCW 84.08.210, 82.32.330, 84.40.020,
or 84.40.340 or (ii) violate the taxpayer's right to privacy or result in
unfair competitive disadvantage to the taxpayer.

(d)
Specific intelligence information and specific investigative records compiled
by investigative, law enforcement, and penology agencies, and state agencies
vested with the responsibility to discipline members of any profession, the
nondisclosure of which is essential to effective law enforcement or for the
protection of any person's right to privacy.

(e)
Information revealing the identity of persons who are witnesses to or victims
of crime or who file complaints with investigative, law enforcement, or
penology agencies, other than the public disclosure commission, if disclosure
would endanger any person's life, physical safety, or property. If at the time
a complaint is filed the complainant, victim or witness indicates a desire for
disclosure or nondisclosure, such desire shall govern. However, all complaints
filed with the public disclosure commission about any elected official or
candidate for public office must be made in writing and signed by the
complainant under oath.

(f)
Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a
license, employment, or academic examination.

(g)
Except as provided by chapter 8.26 RCW, the contents of real estate appraisals,
made for or by any agency relative to the acquisition or sale of property,
until the project or prospective sale is abandoned or until such time as all of
the property has been acquired or the property to which the sale appraisal
relates is sold, but in no event shall disclosure be denied for more than three
years after the appraisal.

(h)
Valuable formulae, designs, drawings, computer source code or object code, and
research data obtained by any agency within five years of the request for
disclosure when disclosure would produce private gain and public loss.

(i)
Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, and intra-agency memorandums in
which opinions are expressed or policies formulated or recommended except that
a specific record shall not be exempt when publicly cited by an agency in connection
with any agency action.

(j)
Records which are relevant to a controversy to which an agency is a party but
which records would not be available to another party under the rules of
pretrial discovery for causes pending in the superior courts.

(k)
Records, maps, or other information identifying the location of archaeological
sites in order to avoid the looting or depredation of such sites.

(l)
Any library record, the primary purpose of which is to maintain control of
library materials, or to gain access to information, which discloses or could
be used to disclose the identity of a library user.

(m)
Financial information supplied by or on behalf of a person, firm, or
corporation for the purpose of qualifying to submit a bid or proposal for (i) a
ferry system construction or repair contract as required by RCW 47.60.680
through 47.60.750 or (ii) highway construction or improvement as required by
RCW 47.28.070.

(n)
Railroad company contracts filed prior to July 28, 1991, with the utilities and
transportation commission under RCW 81.34.070, except that the summaries of the
contracts are open to public inspection and copying as otherwise provided by
this chapter.

(o)
Financial and commercial information and records supplied by private persons
pertaining to export services provided pursuant to chapter 43.163 RCW and
chapter 53.31 RCW, and by persons pertaining to export projects pursuant to RCW
43.23.035.

(p)
Financial disclosures filed by private vocational schools under chapters 28B.85
and 28C.10 RCW.

(q)
Records filed with the utilities and transportation commission or attorney
general under RCW 80.04.095 that a court has determined are confidential under
RCW 80.04.095.

(r)
Financial and commercial information and records supplied by businesses or
individuals during application for loans or program services provided by
chapters 43.163, 43.160, 43.330, and 43.168 RCW, or during application for
economic development loans or program services provided by any local agency.

(s)
Membership lists or lists of members or owners of interests of units in
timeshare projects, subdivisions, camping resorts, condominiums, land
developments, or common-interest communities affiliated with such projects,
regulated by the department of licensing, in the files or possession of the
department.

(t)
All applications for public employment, including the names of applicants,
resumes, and other related materials submitted with respect to an applicant.

(u)
The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of employees or
volunteers of a public agency which are held by the agency in personnel
records, employment or volunteer rosters, or mailing lists of employees or
volunteers.

(v)
The residential addresses and residential telephone numbers of the customers of
a public utility contained in the records or lists held by the public utility
of which they are customers, except that this information may be released to
the division of child support or the agency or firm providing child support
enforcement for another state under Title IV-D of the federal social security
act, for the establishment, enforcement, or modification of a support order.

(w)(i)
The federal social security number of individuals governed under chapter 18.130
RCW maintained in the files of the department of health, except this exemption
does not apply to requests made directly to the department from federal, state,
and local agencies of government, and national and state licensing,
credentialing, investigatory, disciplinary, and examination organizations; (ii)
the current residential address and current residential telephone number of a
health care provider governed under chapter 18.130 RCW maintained in the files
of the department, if the provider requests that this information be withheld
from public inspection and copying, and provides to the department an accurate
alternate or business address and business telephone number. On or after
January 1, 1995, the current residential address and residential telephone
number of a health care provider governed under RCW ((18.130.140)) 18.130.040
maintained in the files of the department shall automatically be withheld from
public inspection and copying unless the provider specifically requests the
information be released, and except as provided for under RCW 42.17.260(9).

(x)
Information obtained by the board of pharmacy as provided in RCW 69.45.090.

(y)
Information obtained by the board of pharmacy or the department of health and
its representatives as provided in RCW 69.41.044, 69.41.280, and 18.64.420.

(z)
Financial information, business plans, examination reports, and any information
produced or obtained in evaluating or examining a business and industrial
development corporation organized or seeking certification under chapter 31.24
RCW.

(aa)
Financial and commercial information supplied to the state investment board by
any person when the information relates to the investment of public trust or
retirement funds and when disclosure would result in loss to such funds or in
private loss to the providers of this information.

(bb)
Financial and valuable trade information under RCW 51.36.120.

(cc)
Client records maintained by an agency that is a domestic violence program as
defined in RCW 70.123.020 or 70.123.075 or a rape crisis center as defined in
RCW 70.125.030.

(dd)
Information that identifies a person who, while an agency employee: (i) Seeks
advice, under an informal process established by the employing agency, in order
to ascertain his or her rights in connection with a possible unfair practice
under chapter 49.60 RCW against the person; and (ii) requests his or her
identity or any identifying information not be disclosed.

(ee)
Investigative records compiled by an employing agency conducting a current
investigation of a possible unfair practice under chapter 49.60 RCW or of a
possible violation of other federal, state, or local laws prohibiting
discrimination in employment.

(ff)
Business related information protected from public inspection and copying under
RCW 15.86.110.

(gg)
Financial, commercial, operations, and technical and research information and
data submitted to or obtained by the clean Washington center in applications
for, or delivery of, program services under chapter 70.95H RCW.

(hh)
Information and documents created specifically for, and collected and
maintained by a quality improvement committee pursuant to RCW 43.70.510,
regardless of which agency is in possession of the information and documents.

(ii)
Personal information in files maintained in a data base created under RCW
43.07.360.

(jj)
Financial and commercial information requested by the public stadium authority
from any person or organization that leases or uses the stadium and exhibition
center as defined in RCW 36.102.010.

(kk)
Names of individuals residing in emergency or transitional housing that are
furnished to the department of revenue or a county assessor in order to
substantiate a claim for property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.043.

(ll)
The names, residential addresses, residential telephone numbers, and other
individually identifiable records held by an agency in relation to a vanpool,
carpool, or other ride-sharing program or service. However, these records may
be disclosed to other persons who apply for ride-matching services and who need
that information in order to identify potential riders or drivers with whom to
share rides.

(mm)
The personally identifying information of current or former participants or
applicants in a paratransit or other transit service operated for the benefit
of persons with disabilities or elderly persons.

(nn)
The personally identifying information of persons who acquire and use transit
passes and other fare payment media including, but not limited to, stored value
smart cards and magnetic strip cards, except that an agency may disclose this
information to a person, employer, educational institution, or other entity
that is responsible, in whole or in part, for payment of the cost of acquiring
or using a transit pass or other fare payment media, or to the news media when
reporting on public transportation or public safety. This information may also
be disclosed at the agency's discretion to governmental agencies or groups
concerned with public transportation or public safety.

(oo)
Proprietary financial and commercial information that the submitting entity,
with review by the department of health, specifically identifies at the time it
is submitted and that is provided to or obtained by the department of health in
connection with an application for, or the supervision of, an antitrust
exemption sought by the submitting entity under RCW 43.72.310. If a request
for such information is received, the submitting entity must be notified of the
request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice, the submitting
entity shall provide a written statement of the continuing need for
confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt of
such notice, the department of health shall continue to treat information
designated under this section as exempt from disclosure. If the requester
initiates an action to compel disclosure under this chapter, the submitting
entity must be joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality.

(pp)
Records maintained by the board of industrial insurance appeals that are
related to appeals of crime victims' compensation claims filed with the board
under RCW 7.68.110.

(qq)
Financial and commercial information supplied by or on behalf of a person,
firm, corporation, or entity under chapter 28B.95 RCW relating to the purchase
or sale of tuition units and contracts for the purchase of multiple tuition
units.

(rr)
Any records of investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal,
or other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenses contained in chapter
9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020, which have
been transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs
for permanent electronic retention and retrieval pursuant to RCW
40.14.070(2)(b).

(ss)
Proprietary designs, proprietary drawings, proprietary maps, and other
proprietary information regarding existing or planned facilities that are
provided by a service provider to a city, town, or code city that the service
provider specifically identifies at the time it is submitted and that is
provided to the city or town in connection with an application for a master
permit or for purposes of planning for, scheduling, and coordinating work in
the right of way under chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this
act). If a request for such information is received, the service provider must
be notified of the request. Within ten business days of receipt of the notice,
the service provider shall provide a written statement of the continuing need
for confidentiality, which shall be provided to the requester. Upon receipt of
such a notice, the city or town shall continue to treat information designated
under this section as exempt from disclosure. If the requester initiates an
action to compel disclosure under this chapter, the service provider must be
joined as a party to demonstrate the continuing need for confidentiality and
the city or town is exempt from any liability under RCW 42.17.340 for failure
to disclose proprietary information.

(2)
Except for information described in subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section and
confidential income data exempted from public inspection pursuant to RCW
84.40.020, the exemptions of this section are inapplicable to the extent that
information, the disclosure of which would violate personal privacy or vital
governmental interests, can be deleted from the specific records sought. No
exemption may be construed to permit the nondisclosure of statistical
information not descriptive of any readily identifiable person or persons.

(3)
Inspection or copying of any specific records exempt under the provisions of
this section may be permitted if the superior court in the county in which the
record is maintained finds, after a hearing with notice thereof to every person
in interest and the agency, that the exemption of such records is clearly
unnecessary to protect any individual's right of privacy or any vital
governmental function.

(4)
Agency responses refusing, in whole or in part, inspection of any public record
shall include a statement of the specific exemption authorizing the withholding
of the record (or part) and a brief explanation of how the exemption applies to
the record withheld.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 7 and 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35
RCW.

---
END ---