BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that certain tuition policies may have an adverse impact
on the unique role of community colleges.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to eliminate impediments to the ability of
community colleges to meet the diverse needs of students and business
interests.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.100 and 1998 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall charge to and collect
from each of the students registering at the particular institution for any
quarter or semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and
other fees as such board shall in its discretion determine. The total of all
fees shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such
tuition fees for other than the summer term shall be in the amounts for the
respective institutions as otherwise set forth in RCW 28B.15.067.

(2)
Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees
proportionate to full-time student rates established for residents and
nonresidents: PROVIDED, That except for students registered at community
colleges, students registered for fewer than two credit hours shall be
charged tuition and services and activities fees at the rate established for
two credit hours: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, subject to the limitations of RCW
28B.15.910, residents of Idaho or Oregon who are enrolled in community college
district number twenty for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester
may be exempted from payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition
fees differential upon a declaration by the higher education coordinating board
that it finds Washington residents from the community college district are
afforded substantially equivalent treatment by such other states.

(3) Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit
hours shall be charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour in
excess of eighteen hours at the applicable established per credit hour tuition
fee rate for part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of
RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the
community colleges may exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for
students who are registered exclusively in first professional programs in
medicine, dental medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or
who are registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory
programs.

---
END ---