BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.28 RCW to read as follows:

It
is unlawful to fish for or possess shrimp taken for commercial purposes from
Puget Sound except under the provisions of a limited entry license under this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department of fish and wildlife and the Puget Sound shrimp fishing industry
shall work cooperatively to define the limited entry management regime for
Puget Sound shrimp and shall report to the legislature by December 31, 1999.
The report shall include, but not be limited to:

(1)
License transfers;

(2)
Number of fishers; and

(3) Gear limitations.

---
END ---