BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.02.050 and 1994 c 257 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature:

(a)
To ensure that adequate facilities are available to serve new growth and
development;

(b)
To promote orderly growth and development by establishing standards by which
counties, cities, and towns may require, by ordinance, that new growth and
development pay a proportionate share of the cost of the administration of
criminal justice and new facilities needed to serve new growth and
development; and

(c)
To ensure that impact fees are imposed through established procedures and
criteria so that specific developments do not pay arbitrary fees or duplicative
fees for the same impact.

(2)
Counties, cities, and towns that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 are authorized to impose impact fees on development activity as part
of the financing for public facilities and the administration of criminal
justice, provided that the financing for system improvements to serve new
development must provide for a balance between impact fees and other sources of
public funds and cannot rely solely on impact fees.

(3)
The impact fees:

(a)
Shall only be imposed for system improvements that are reasonably related to
the new development;

(b)
Shall not exceed a proportionate share of the costs of system improvements that
are reasonably related to the new development; and

(c)
Shall be used for system improvements that will reasonably benefit the new
development.

(4)
Impact fees may be collected and spent only for the public facilities defined
in RCW 82.02.090 which are addressed by a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive land use plan adopted pursuant to the provisions of RCW
36.70A.070 or the provisions for comprehensive plan adoption contained in
chapter 36.70, 35.63, or 35A.63 RCW and for the administration of criminal
justice. After the date a county, city, or town is required to adopt its
development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, continued authorization to
collect and expend impact fees shall be contingent on the county, city, or town
adopting or revising a comprehensive plan in compliance with RCW 36.70A.070,
and on the capital facilities plan identifying:

(a)
Deficiencies in public facilities serving existing development and the means by
which existing deficiencies will be eliminated within a reasonable period of
time;

(b)
Additional demands placed on existing public facilities by new development; and

(c)
Additional public facility improvements required to serve new development.

If
the capital facilities plan of the county, city, or town is complete other than
for the inclusion of those elements which are the responsibility of a special
district, the county, city, or town may impose impact fees to address those
public facility needs for which the county, city, or town is responsible.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.02.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

The
local ordinance by which impact fees are imposed:

(1)
Shall include a schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted for each type of
development activity that is subject to impact fees, specifying the amount of
the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement. The schedule
shall be based upon a formula or other method of calculating such impact fees.
In determining proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating
impact fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:

(a)
The cost of public facilities and the administration of criminal justice
necessitated by new development;

(b)
An adjustment to the cost of the public facilities and the administration of
criminal justice for past or future payments made or reasonably anticipated
to be made by new development to pay for particular system improvements in the
form of user fees, debt service payments, taxes, or other payments earmarked
for or proratable to the particular system improvement;

(c)
The availability of other means of funding the administration of criminal
justice and public facility improvements;

(d)
The cost of existing public facilities improvements and the administration
of criminal justice; and

(e)
The methods by which public facilities improvements and the administration
of criminal justice were financed;

(2)
May provide an exemption for low-income housing, and other development
activities with broad public purposes, from these impact fees, provided that
the impact fees for such development activity shall be paid from public funds
other than impact fee accounts;

(3)
Shall provide a credit for the value of any dedication of land for, improvement
to, or new construction of any system improvements provided by the developer,
to facilities that are identified in the capital facilities plan and that are
required by the county, city, or town as a condition of approving the
development activity;

(4)
Shall allow the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees to adjust the
standard impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual
circumstances in specific cases to ensure that impact fees are imposed fairly;

(5)
Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee to be imposed
on a particular development that permits consideration of studies and data
submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee;

(6)
Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within which it shall
calculate and impose impact fees for various land use categories per unit of
development;

(7)
May provide for the imposition of an impact fee for system improvement costs
previously incurred by a county, city, or town to the extent that new growth
and development will be served by the previously constructed improvements
provided such fee shall not be imposed to make up for any system improvement
deficiencies.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.02.070 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Impact fee receipts shall be earmarked specifically and retained in special
interest-bearing accounts. Separate accounts shall be established for each
type of public facility and for the administration of criminal justice
for which impact fees are collected. All interest shall be retained in the
account and expended for the purpose or purposes for which the impact fees were
imposed. Annually, each county, city, or town imposing impact fees shall
provide a report on each impact fee account showing the source and amount of
all moneys collected, earned, or received and system improvements that were
financed in whole or in part by impact fees.

(2)
Impact fees for system improvements shall be expended only in conformance with
the capital facilities plan element of the comprehensive plan.

(3)
Impact fees shall be expended or encumbered for a permissible use within six
years of receipt, unless there exists an extraordinary and compelling reason
for fees to be held longer than six years. Such extraordinary or compelling
reasons shall be identified in written findings by the governing body of the
county, city, or town.

(4)
Impact fees may be paid under protest in order to obtain a permit or other
approval of development activity.

(5)
Each county, city, or town that imposes impact fees shall provide for an
administrative appeals process for the appeal of an impact fee; the process may
follow the appeal process for the underlying development approval or the
county, city, or town may establish a separate appeals process. The impact fee
may be modified upon a determination that it is proper to do so based on
principles of fairness. The county, city, or town may provide for the
resolution of disputes regarding impact fees by arbitration.

Sec.
4. RCW
82.02.080 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The current owner of property on which an impact fee has been paid may receive
a refund of such fees if the county, city, or town fails to expend or encumber
the impact fees within six years of when the fees were paid or other such
period of time established pursuant to RCW 82.02.070(3) on public facilities and
the administration of criminal justice intended to benefit the development
activity for which the impact fees were paid. In determining whether impact
fees have been encumbered, impact fees shall be considered encumbered on a
first in, first out basis. The county, city, or town shall notify potential
claimants by first class mail deposited with the United States postal service
at the last known address of claimants.

The
request for a refund must be submitted to the county, city, or town governing
body in writing within one year of the date the right to claim the refund
arises or the date that notice is given, whichever is later. Any impact fees
that are not expended within these time limitations, and for which no
application for a refund has been made within this one-year period, shall be
retained and expended on the indicated capital facilities and the
administration of criminal justice. Refunds of impact fees under this
subsection shall include interest earned on the impact fees.

(2)
When a county, city, or town seeks to terminate any or all impact fee
requirements, all unexpended or unencumbered funds, including interest earned,
shall be refunded pursuant to this section. Upon the finding that any or all
fee requirements are to be terminated, the county, city, or town shall place
notice of such termination and the availability of refunds in a newspaper of
general circulation at least two times and shall notify all potential claimants
by first class mail to the last known address of claimants. All funds
available for refund shall be retained for a period of one year. At the end of
one year, any remaining funds shall be retained by the local government, but
must be expended for the indicated public facilities and on the
administration of criminal justice. This notice requirement shall not
apply if there are no unexpended or unencumbered balances within an account or
accounts being terminated.

(3)
A developer may request and shall receive a refund, including interest earned
on the impact fees, when the developer does not proceed with the development
activity and no impact has resulted.

Sec.
5. RCW
82.02.090 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply
in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090:

(1)
"The administration of criminal justice" means performance of any
of the following activities: Detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial
release, posttrial release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional
supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders, both
adult and juvenile. The term also includes criminal identification activities
and the collection, storage, dissemination of criminal history record
information, and the compensation of victims of crime.

(2)
"Development activity" means any construction or expansion of a
building, structure, or use, any change in use of a building or structure, or
any changes in the use of land, that creates additional demand and need for
public facilities.

(((2)))
(3) "Development approval" means any written authorization
from a county, city, or town which authorizes the commencement of development
activity.

(((3)))
(4) "Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed upon
development as a condition of development approval to pay for public facilities
and the administration of criminal justice needed to serve new growth
and development, and that is reasonably related to the new development that
creates additional demand and need for public facilities and the
administration of criminal justice, that is a proportionate share of the
cost of the public facilities and the administration of criminal justice,
and that is used for facilities and the administration of criminal justice
that reasonably benefit the new development. "Impact fee" does not
include a reasonable permit or application fee.

(((4)))
(5) "Owner" means the owner of record of real property,
although when real property is being purchased under a real estate contract,
the purchaser shall be considered the owner of the real property if the
contract is recorded.

(((5)))
(6) "Proportionate share" means that portion of the cost of
public facility improvements that are reasonably related to the service demands
and needs of new development.

(((6)))
(7) "Project improvements" mean site improvements and
facilities that are planned and designed to provide service for a particular
development project and that are necessary for the use and convenience of the
occupants or users of the project, and are not system improvements. No
improvement or facility included in a capital facilities plan approved by the
governing body of the county, city, or town shall be considered a project
improvement.

(((7)))
(8) "Public facilities" means the following capital facilities
owned or operated by government entities: (a) Public streets and roads; (b)
publicly owned parks, open space, and recreation facilities; (c) school
facilities; and (d) fire protection facilities in jurisdictions that are not
part of a fire district.

(((8)))
(9) "Service area" means a geographic area defined by a
county, city, town, or intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of
public facilities provide service to development within the area. Service
areas shall be designated on the basis of sound planning or engineering
principles.

(((9))) (10) "System improvements" mean
public facilities that are included in the capital facilities plan and are
designed to provide service to service areas within the community at large, in
contrast to project improvements.

---
END ---