BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.070 and 1998 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text
covering objectives, principles, and standards used to develop the
comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an internally consistent document and
all elements shall be consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive
plan shall be adopted and amended with public participation as provided in RCW
36.70A.140.

Each
comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the
following:

(1)
A land use element designating the proposed general distribution and general
location and extent of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture,
timber production, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces,
general aviation airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land
uses. The land use element shall include population densities, building intensities,
and estimates of future population growth. The land use element shall provide
for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used for public
water supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review drainage,
flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby jurisdictions and
provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or cleanse those discharges
that pollute waters of the state, including Puget Sound or waters entering
Puget Sound.

(2)
A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of established
residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of
existing and projected housing needs; (b) includes a statement of goals,
policies, objectives, and mandatory provisions for the preservation,
improvement, and development of housing, including single-family residences;
(c) identifies sufficient land for housing, including, but not limited to,
government-assisted housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured
housing, multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and
(d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all economic
segments of the community.

(3)
A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing
capital facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and
capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for
such capital facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded
or new capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such
capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess
the land use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs
and to ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and
financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and
consistent.

(4)
A utilities element consisting of the general location, proposed location, and
capacity of all existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to,
electrical lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5)
Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are
not designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources.
The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a)
Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances
vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and
uses, a county may consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written
record explaining how the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW
36.70A.020 and meets the requirements of this chapter.

(b)
Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry,
and agriculture in rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety
of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental
services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve
a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering,
density transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other
innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and
uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with
rural character.

(c)
Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall include measures
that apply to rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as
established by the county, by:

(i)
Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii)
Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural
area;

(iii)
Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development in the rural area;

(iv)
Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and
ground water resources; and

(v)
Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral
resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d)
Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements
of this subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this
subsection (5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more
intensive rural development, including necessary public facilities and public
services to serve the limited area as follows:

(i)
Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of
existing commercial, industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether
characterized as shoreline development, villages, hamlets, rural activity
centers, or crossroads developments. A commercial, industrial, residential,
shoreline, or mixed-use area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of
this subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii)
The intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale
recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or
tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;

(iii)
The intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential
uses or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Public services and public facilities shall
be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use and
shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iv)
A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or
uses of more intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this
subsection. Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend
beyond the logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing
a new pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v)
For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one
that was in existence:

(A)
On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to plan under all of
the provisions of this chapter;

(B)
On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a
county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW
36.70A.040(2); or

(C)
On the date the office of financial management certifies the county's population
as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under all of the
provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e)
Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural
area a major industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise
specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6)
A transportation element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use
element.

(a)
The transportation element shall include the following subelements:

(i)
Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii)
Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting
from land use assumptions to assist the department of transportation in
monitoring the performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the
facilities, ((and)) to assess the impact of land-use decisions on
state-owned transportation facilities, and to assist cities and counties in
determining the proper impact fee to be imposed for impacts to state facilities;

(iii)
Facilities and services needs, including:

(A)
An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services,
including transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define
existing capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning.
This inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the
city or county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B)
Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes
to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should
be regionally coordinated;

(C)
For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service standards for
highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the performance
of the system. The purposes of reflecting level of service standards for state
highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the performance of the
system, to evaluate improvement strategies, ((and)) to facilitate
coordination between the county's or city's six-year street, road, or transit
program and the department of transportation's six-year investment program,
and to provide a means of measuring the appropriate impact fee to be levied by
cities and counties on the state's behalf. The concurrency requirements of
(b) of this subsection do not apply to transportation facilities and services
of state-wide significance except for counties consisting of islands whose only
connection to the mainland are state highways or ferry routes. In these island
counties, state highways and ferry route capacity must be a factor in meeting
the concurrency requirements in (b) of this subsection;

(D)
Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned
transportation facilities or services that are below an established level of
service standard;

(E)
Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan
to provide information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future
growth;

(F)
Identification of state and local system needs to meet current and future
demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be
consistent with the state-wide multimodal transportation plan required under
chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv)
Finance, including:

(A)
An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against probable funding
resources;

(B)
A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive
plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year
street, road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems.
The multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year
improvement program developed by the department of transportation as required
by RCW 47.05.030;

(C)
If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of
how additional funding will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be
reassessed to ensure that level of service standards will be met;

(v)
Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts
of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation
systems of adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi)
Demand-management strategies.

(b)
After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or
who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and
enforce ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development
causes the level of service on a state or locally owned transportation
facility to decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element
of the comprehensive plan, not including those exempt under subsection
(6)(a)(iii)(C) of this section, unless transportation improvements or
strategies to accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with
the development. These strategies may include impact fees under chapter
82.02 RCW, increased public transportation service, ride sharing programs,
demand management, and other transportation systems management strategies. If
a development application is approved, impact fees may only be assessed for
those transportation impacts reasonably related to service needs created by
that development. For the purposes of this subsection (6) "concurrent
with the development" shall mean that improvements or strategies are in
place at the time of development, or that a financial commitment is in place to
complete the improvements or strategies within six years.

(c)
The transportation element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year
plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW
35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state,
must be consistent.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.280 and 1996 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A growth management hearings board shall hear and determine only those
petitions alleging either:

(a)
That a state agency, county, or city planning under this chapter is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it
relates to the adoption of shoreline master programs or amendments thereto, or
chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to plans, development regulations, or
amendments, adopted under RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; ((or))

(b)
That the twenty-year growth management planning population projections adopted
by the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 should be
adjusted;

(c)
That the level of service standard adopted for state-owned or operated
transportation facilities under RCW 36.70A.070 should be amended; or

(d)
That an impact fee assessed for impacts to a state-owned or operated transportation
facility violates RCW 82.02.050.

(2)
A petition may be filed only by: (a) The state, or a county or city that plans
under this chapter; (b) a person who has participated orally or in writing
before the county or city regarding the matter on which a review is being
requested; (c) a person who is certified by the governor within sixty days of
filing the request with the board; or (d) a person qualified pursuant to RCW
34.05.530.

(3)
For purposes of this section "person" means any individual, partnership,
corporation, association, state agency, governmental subdivision or unit
thereof, or public or private organization or entity of any character.

(4)
When considering a possible adjustment to a growth management planning
population projection prepared by the office of financial management, a board
shall consider the implications of any such adjustment to the population
forecast for the entire state.

The
rationale for any adjustment that is adopted by a board must be documented and
filed with the office of financial management within ten working days after
adoption.

If
adjusted by a board, a county growth management planning population projection
shall only be used for the planning purposes set forth in this chapter and
shall be known as a "board adjusted population projection". None of
these changes shall affect the official state and county population forecasts
prepared by the office of financial management, which shall continue to be used
for state budget and planning purposes.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.02.050 and 1994 c 257 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature:

(a)
To ensure that adequate facilities are available to serve new growth and
development;

(b)
To promote orderly growth and development by establishing standards by which
counties, cities, and towns may require, by ordinance, that new growth and
development pay a proportionate share of the cost of new facilities or
improvements to existing facilities, including state-owned or operated
transportation facilities needed to serve new growth and development; and

(c)
To ensure that impact fees are imposed through established procedures and
criteria so that specific developments do not pay arbitrary fees or duplicative
fees for the same impact.

(2)
Counties, cities, and towns that are required or choose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 are authorized to impose impact fees on development activity as part
of the financing for public facilities, provided that the financing for system
improvements to serve new development must provide for a balance between impact
fees and other sources of public funds and cannot rely solely on impact fees.

(3)
The impact fees:

(a)
Shall only be imposed for system improvements that are reasonably related to the
new development;

(b)
Shall not exceed a proportionate share of the costs of system improvements that
are reasonably related to the new development; and

(c)
Shall be used for system improvements that will reasonably benefit the new
development.

(4)
Impact fees may be collected and spent only for traffic management, traffic
mitigation programs, and the public facilities defined in RCW 82.02.090
which are addressed by a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive
land use plan adopted pursuant to the provisions of RCW 36.70A.070 or the
provisions for comprehensive plan adoption contained in chapter 36.70, 35.63,
or 35A.63 RCW. After the date a county, city, or town is required to adopt its
development regulations under chapter 36.70A RCW, continued authorization to
collect and expend impact fees shall be contingent on the county, city, or town
adopting or revising a comprehensive plan in compliance with RCW 36.70A.070,
and on the capital facilities plan identifying:

(a)
Deficiencies in public facilities serving existing development and the means by
which existing deficiencies will be eliminated within a reasonable period of
time;

(b)
Additional demands placed on existing public facilities by new development; and

(c)
Additional public facility improvements required to serve new development.

If
the capital facilities plan of the county, city, or town is complete other than
for the inclusion of those elements which are the responsibility of a special
district, the county, city, or town may impose impact fees to address those
public facility needs for which the county, city, or town is responsible, or
on behalf of the state department of transportation to mitigate impacts to
state-owned or operated transportation facilities.

Sec.
4. RCW
82.02.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

The
local ordinance by which impact fees are imposed:

(1)
Shall include a schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted for each type of
development activity that is subject to impact fees, specifying the amount of
the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement. The schedule
shall be based upon a formula or other method of calculating such impact fees.
In determining proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating
impact fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:

(a)
The cost of public facilities necessitated by new development;

(b)
An adjustment to the cost of the public facilities for past or future payments
made or reasonably anticipated to be made by new development to pay for
particular system improvements in the form of user fees, debt service payments,
taxes, or other payments earmarked for or proratable to the particular system
improvement;

(c)
The availability of other means of funding public facility improvements;

(d)
The cost of existing public facilities improvements; and

(e)
The methods by which public facilities improvements were financed;

(2)
May provide an exemption for low-income housing, and other development
activities with broad public purposes, from these impact fees, provided that
the impact fees for such development activity shall be paid from public funds
other than impact fee accounts;

(3)
Shall provide a credit for the value of any dedication of land for, improvement
to, or new construction of any system improvements provided by the developer,
to facilities that are identified in the capital facilities plan and that are
required by the county, city, or town as a condition of approving the
development activity;

(4)
Shall allow the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees to adjust the
standard impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual
circumstances in specific cases to ensure that impact fees are imposed fairly,
if the state department of transportation concurs insofar as state-owned or
operated transportation facilities are impacted;

(5)
Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee to be imposed
on a particular development that permits consideration of studies and data
submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee;

(6)
Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within which it shall
calculate and impose impact fees for various land use categories per unit of
development;

(7)
May provide for the imposition of an impact fee for system improvement costs
previously incurred by a county, city, or town to the extent that new growth
and development will be served by the previously constructed improvements
provided such fee shall not be imposed to make up for any system improvement
deficiencies.

Sec.
5. RCW
82.02.070 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Impact fee receipts shall be earmarked specifically and retained in special
interest-bearing accounts. Separate accounts shall be established for each
type of public facility for which impact fees are collected. All interest
shall be retained in the account and expended for the purpose or purposes for
which the impact fees were imposed. Annually, each county, city, or town
imposing impact fees shall provide a report on each impact fee account showing
the source and amount of all moneys collected, earned, or received and system
improvements that were financed in whole or in part by impact fees.

(2)
Impact fees for system improvements shall be expended only in conformance with
the capital facilities plan element of the comprehensive plan.

(3)
Impact fees shall be expended or encumbered for a permissible use within six
years of receipt, unless there exists an extraordinary and compelling reason
for fees to be held longer than six years. Such extraordinary or compelling
reasons shall be identified in written findings by the governing body of the
county, city, or town, or when the impact fee is for a state-owned or
operated transportation facility, the state.

(4)
Impact fees may be paid under protest in order to obtain a permit or other
approval of development activity.

(5)
Each county, city, or town that imposes impact fees shall provide for an
administrative appeals process for the appeal of an impact fee; the process may
follow the appeal process for the underlying development approval or the
county, city, or town may establish a separate appeals process. However,
the growth management hearings board within which the state-owned or operated
facility is located shall review appeals of impact fees assessed for impacts to
state-owned or operated transportation facilities. The impact fee may be
modified upon a determination that it is proper to do so based on principles of
fairness. The county, city, or town may provide for the resolution of disputes
regarding impact fees by arbitration.

Sec.
6. RCW
82.02.090 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions shall apply
in RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090:

(1)
"Development activity" means any construction or expansion of a
building, structure, or use, any change in use of a building or structure, or
any changes in the use of land, that creates additional demand and need for
public facilities.

(2)
"Development approval" means any written authorization from a county,
city, or town which authorizes the commencement of development activity.

(3)
"Impact fee" means a payment of money imposed upon development as a
condition of development approval to pay for public facilities needed to serve
new growth and development, and that is reasonably related to the new
development that creates additional demand and need for public facilities, that
is a proportionate share of the cost of the public facilities, and that is used
for facilities that reasonably benefit the new development. "Impact
fee" does not include a reasonable permit or application fee.

(4)
"Owner" means the owner of record of real property, although when
real property is being purchased under a real estate contract, the purchaser
shall be considered the owner of the real property if the contract is recorded.

(5)
"Proportionate share" means that portion of the cost of public
facility improvements that are reasonably related to the service demands and
needs of new development.

(6)
"Project improvements" mean site improvements and facilities that are
planned and designed to provide service for a particular development project
and that are necessary for the use and convenience of the occupants or users of
the project, and are not system improvements. No improvement or facility
included in a capital facilities plan approved by the governing body of the
county, city, or town shall be considered a project improvement.

(7)
"Public facilities" means the following capital facilities owned or
operated by government entities: (a) Public streets ((and)),
roads, and highways, including state-owned or operated transportation
facilities; (b) publicly owned parks, open space, and recreation
facilities; (c) school facilities; and (d) fire protection facilities in
jurisdictions that are not part of a fire district.

(8)
"Service area" means a geographic area defined by a county, city,
town, or intergovernmental agreement in which a defined set of public
facilities provide service to development within the area. Service areas shall
be designated on the basis of sound planning or engineering principles.

(9) "System improvements" mean public facilities that are
included in the capital facilities plan and are designed to provide service to
service areas within the community at large, in contrast to project
improvements.

---
END ---