BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
86.16.041 and 1989 c 64 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning July 26, 1987, every county and ((incorporated)) city and town
shall submit to the department of ecology any new flood plain management
ordinance or amendment to any existing flood plain management ordinance. Such
ordinance or amendment shall take effect thirty days from filing with the
department unless the department disapproves such ordinance or amendment within
that time period.

(2)
The department may disapprove any ordinance or amendment submitted to it under
subsection (1) of this section if it finds that an ordinance or amendment does
not comply with any of the following:

(a)
Restriction of land uses within designated floodways including the prohibition
of construction or reconstruction of residential structures except as
provided under subsection (3) of this section or except for: (i) Repairs,
reconstruction, or improvements to a structure which do not increase the ground
floor area; and (ii) repairs, reconstruction, or improvements to a structure
the cost of which does not exceed fifty percent of the market value of the
structure either, (A) before the repair, reconstruction, or repair is started,
or (B) if the structure has been damaged, and is being restored, before the
damage occurred. Work done on structures to comply with existing health,
sanitary, or safety codes or to structures identified as historic places shall
not be included in the fifty percent determination;

(b)
The minimum requirements of the national flood insurance program; and

(c)
The minimum state requirements adopted pursuant to RCW 86.16.031(8) that are
applicable to the particular county, city, or town.

(3)
A residence located in a floodway, that has lost at least fifty percent of its
market value by being damaged or destroyed, may be reconstructed or replaced on
the floodway with expenditures exceeding fifty percent of the residence's prior
market value if, in addition to complying with the conditions of subsection
(2)(b) and (c) of this section, the following conditions are met:

(a)
The residence is the principal residence of a farmer who owns the residence;

(b)
The principal livelihood of the farmer is to engage in commercially viable
agriculture activities on land immediately adjacent to the residence that the
farmer also owns;

(c)
The adjacent land that is owned and farmed by the farmer has been designated as
agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170;

(d)
The reconstructed or replaced residence is located on the same site as the
damaged or destroyed residence, has a total square footage that is not in
excess of the square footage of the damaged or destroyed residence, and does
not increase the total square footage of the encroachment of the damaged or
destroyed residence into the floodway;

(e)
There is no other potential building site on the adjacent land owned by the
farmer that is outside of the floodway;

(f)
The elevation of the lowest floor, including a basement, of the reconstructed
or replaced residence is at least one foot above the base flood elevation;

(g)
A new or replacement water system is designed to eliminate or minimize
infiltration of flood waters into the system;

(h)
A new or replacement sanitary sewerage system is designed and located to
eliminate or minimize infiltration of flood waters into the system and
discharge from the system into the flood waters; and

(i) All other utilities and connections to public utilities are
designed, constructed, and located to eliminate or minimize flood damage.

---
END ---