BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. On
November 3, 1998, over fifty-eight percent of Washington voters approved
Initiative 200. With the passage of the initiative, "... public agencies
are prohibited from discriminating against or granting preferential treatment
to individuals or groups based on race, sex, color, ethnicity, or national
origin in public employment, public education, or public contracting."

During
the public debate, public officials made statements that displayed confusion
regarding the intent and effect of the new law. One high-ranking opponent
declared "... the passage of I-200 would abolish affirmative
action." But a chief proponent affirmed that I-200 will not ban
affirmative action, and that "... recruitment and outreach are one thing;
preferences based on skin color are another." Other public officials
declared that policies under their control will continue "no matter what
the people of Washington may decide on Initiative 200."

The
purpose of this act is to ensure that chapter 3, Laws of 1999 (Initiative 200),
is implemented in a manner consistent with the will of the voters, the
Washington state Constitution, and the Constitution of the United States.

The
legislature finds that while banning discrimination and preferential treatment,
Initiative 200 does not prohibit all affirmative action measures, such as those
that serve to reach out to individuals or groups for the purpose of providing
equal opportunity for access to public benefits.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to create the civil rights oversight
council to examine the implementation of Initiative 200.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The civil rights oversight council is created consisting of: Two members of
the house of representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
appointed by the co-speakers; two members of the senate, one from each of the
two largest caucuses, appointed by the president of the senate; two members
appointed by the governor; and one member, appointed by the attorney general,
who will serve as the chair. The chair shall call meetings of the council,
with at least one meeting each month from July 1999 through December 1999.

(2)
The council shall:

(a)
Examine the Revised Code of Washington to identify statutes impeding
implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 1999;

(b)
Receive reports from public agencies affected by chapter 3, Laws of 1999, to
evaluate their efforts to implement chapter 3, Laws of 1999;

(c)
Review the number and type of grievances that have been filed against public
agencies by persons seeking remedy under chapter 3, Laws of 1999;

(d)
Compile findings that summarize implementation status, grievance filings, and
statutory impediments to judicious implementation of chapter 3, Laws of 1999;

(e)
Report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
February 1, 2000.

(3)
Each nonlegislative member of the council shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The council shall use
legislative facilities and staff from senate committee services and the office
of program research.

(4)
The council expires July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act expires July 1, 2001.

---
END ---