BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.60.222 and 1997 c 400 s 3 and 1997 c 271 s 14 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
It is an unfair practice for any person, whether acting for himself, herself,
or another, because of sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national
origin, families with children status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person:

(a)
To refuse to engage in a real estate transaction with a person;

(b)
To discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a
real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in
connection therewith;

(c)
To refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer to engage in a real
estate transaction from a person;

(d)
To refuse to negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person;

(e)
To represent to a person that real property is not available for inspection,
sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring a
property listing to his or her attention, or to refuse to permit the person to
inspect real property;

(f)
To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny
a dwelling, to any person; or to a person residing in or intending to reside in
that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or to any person
associated with the person buying or renting;

(g)
To make, print, circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so made or published a
statement, advertisement, or sign, or to use a form of application for a real
estate transaction, or to make a record or inquiry in connection with a
prospective real estate transaction, which indicates, directly or indirectly,
an intent to make a limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect
thereto;

(h)
To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the
understanding that a person may be discriminated against in a real estate
transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection
therewith;

(i)
To expel a person from occupancy of real property;

(j)
To discriminate in the course of negotiating, executing, or financing a real
estate transaction whether by mortgage, deed of trust, contract, or other
instrument imposing a lien or other security in real property, or in
negotiating or executing any item or service related thereto including issuance
of title insurance, mortgage insurance, loan guarantee, or other aspect of the
transaction. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176
relating to unfair practices in credit transactions; or

(k)
To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2)
For the purposes of this chapter discrimination based on the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled person includes:

(a)
A refusal to permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable
modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if
such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the
dwelling, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is
reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter
agreeing to restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed
before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;

(b)
To refuse to make reasonable accommodation in rules, policies, practices, or
services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a person with the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled
person equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

(c)
To fail to design and construct covered multifamily dwellings and premises in
conformance with the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C.
Sec. 3601 et seq.) and all other applicable laws or regulations pertaining to
access by persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or use of a
trained dog guide or service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable
laws or regulations differ, the requirements which require greater
accessibility for persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability
shall govern.

Nothing
in (a) or (b) of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A single-family house
rented or leased by the owner if the owner does not own or have an interest in
the proceeds of the rental or lease of more than three such single-family
houses at one time, the rental or lease occurred without the use of a real
estate broker or salesperson, as defined in RCW 18.85.010, and the rental or
lease occurred without the publication, posting, or mailing of any advertisement,
sign, or statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this section; or (ii)
rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to
be occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other if
the owner maintains and occupies one of the rooms or units as his or her
residence.

(3)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair
practice or a denial of civil rights for any public or private educational
institution to separate the sexes or give preference to or limit use of
dormitories, residence halls, or other student housing to persons of one sex or
to make distinctions on the basis of marital or families with children status.

(4)
Except pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, this section shall not be
construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make
facilities accessible to a disabled person except as otherwise required by
law. Nothing in this section affects the rights, responsibilities, and
remedies of landlords and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW,
including the right to post and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety
for all tenants and their guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW
are only affected to the extent they are inconsistent with the
nondiscrimination requirements of this chapter. Nothing in this section limits
the applicability of any reasonable federal, state, or local restrictions
regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling.

(5)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair
practice for any public establishment providing for accommodations offered for
the full enjoyment of transient guests as defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make
distinctions on the basis of families with children status. Nothing in this
section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in
places of public accommodation.

(6)
Nothing in this chapter prohibiting discrimination based on families with
children status applies to housing for older persons as defined by the federal
fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as
amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted
on December 28, 1995. Nothing in this chapter authorizes requirements for
housing for older persons different than the requirements in the federal fair
housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1) through (3), as
amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L. 104-76, as enacted
on December 28, 1995.

(7)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it is not an unfair
practice for any person to consistently apply a written credit policy, if the
written policy does not on its face violate any provision of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.60.230 and 1993 c 510 s 21 and 1993 c 69 s 11 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Who may file a complaint:

(a)
Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an alleged unfair practice may,
personally or by his or her attorney, make, sign, and file with the commission
a complaint in writing under oath or by declaration. The complaint shall state
the name of the person alleged to have committed the unfair practice and the
particulars thereof, and contain such other information as may be required by
the commission.

(b)
Whenever it has reason to believe that any person has been engaged or is
engaging in an unfair practice, the commission may issue a complaint.

(c)
Any employer or principal whose employees, or agents, or any of them, refuse or
threaten to refuse to comply with the provisions of this chapter may file with
the commission a written complaint under oath or by declaration asking for
assistance by conciliation or other remedial action.

(2)
Any complaint filed pursuant to this section must be so filed within six months
after the alleged act of discrimination except that complaints alleging an
unfair practice in a real estate transaction pursuant to RCW 49.60.222 through
49.60.225 must be so filed within one year after the alleged unfair practice in
a real estate transaction has occurred or terminated.

(3)
Each allegation of discrimination in a complaint shall be simple, concise,
direct, and stated with particularity. If an allegation is so vague or
ambiguous that a party cannot reasonably frame a response, or if more
particularity in that allegation will further the efficient and economical
disposition of the allegation, the responding party may request a more definite
statement before responding to the compliant.

(4)
Before bringing a complaint under this section, the complainant must file an
application for tenancy. The complainant may not bring a complaint if an
application for tenancy has not been filed, unless the complainant was
prevented from filing the application due to the alleged act of discrimination.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.60.240 and 1995 c 259 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After the filing of any complaint, the chairperson of the commission shall
refer it to the appropriate section of the commission's staff for prompt
investigation and ascertainment of the facts alleged in the complaint. The
investigation shall be limited to the alleged facts contained in the
complaint. The results of the investigation shall be reduced to written
findings of fact, and a finding shall be made that there is or that there is
not reasonable cause for believing that an unfair practice has been or is being
committed. A copy of said findings shall be provided to the complainant and to
the person named in such complaint, hereinafter referred to as the respondent.

(2)
If the finding is made that there is reasonable cause for believing that an
unfair practice has been or is being committed, the commission's staff shall
immediately endeavor to eliminate the unfair practice by conference,
conciliation, and persuasion.

(3)(a)
If an agreement is reached for the elimination of such unfair practice as a
result of such conference, conciliation, and persuasion, the agreement shall be
reduced to writing and signed by the respondent, and an order shall be entered
by the commission setting forth the terms of said agreement. No order shall be
entered by the commission at this stage of the proceedings except upon such
written agreement, except that during the period beginning with the filing of
complaints alleging an unfair practice with respect to real estate transactions
pursuant to RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.225, and ending with the filing of a
finding of reasonable cause or a dismissal by the commission, the commission
staff shall, to the extent feasible, engage in conciliation with respect to
such complaint. Any conciliation agreement arising out of conciliation efforts
by the commission shall be an agreement between the respondent and the
complainant and shall be subject to the approval of the commission. Each
conciliation agreement shall be made public unless the complainant and
respondent otherwise agree and the commission determines that disclosure is not
required to further the purposes of this chapter.

(b)
If no such agreement can be reached, a finding to that effect shall be made and
reduced to writing, with a copy thereof provided to the complainant and the
respondent.

(4)
The commission may adopt rules, including procedural time requirements, for
processing complaints alleging an unfair practice with respect to real estate
transactions pursuant to RCW 49.60.222 through 49.60.225 and which may be
consistent with the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
3601 et seq.), but which in no case shall exceed or be more restrictive than
the requirements or standards of such act.

(5) When a complaint is filed under RCW 49.60.230, a respondent
may elect to have the claims asserted in that complaint decided in a civil
action in superior court. This election must be made within thirty days of
service on the person making the election. The person making the election
shall give notice of doing so to the commission and to all other complainants
and respondents to whom the complaint relates.

---
END ---