BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.09.045 and 1995 c 301 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, the state auditor
may contract with public accountants certified in Washington to carry out those
portions of the duties of auditing state agencies and local governments as the
state auditor may determine.

(2)
The state auditor shall establish a program by which school districts, cities,
and towns may, at their option, contract with private public accountants
certified in Washington to conduct their periodic fiscal audits, subject to the
following:

(a)
Prior to having its fiscal audit conducted by a private certified public
accountant, a school district must contact the state auditor and indicate this
choice. However, no more than twenty percent of the school districts may have
their fiscal audits conducted by private certified public accountants in any
calendar year. If more than twenty percent of the school districts indicate
that they want to have private certified public accountants conduct their
fiscal audits in any year, only the first twenty percent of the school
districts that indicate that to the state auditor may actually have their
fiscal audits conducted by private certified public accountants.

(b) Prior to having its fiscal audit conducted by a private
certified public accountant, a city or town must contact the state auditor and
indicate this choice. However, no more than twenty percent of the cities and
towns may have their fiscal audits conducted by private certified public
accountants in any calendar year. If more than twenty percent of the cities
and towns indicate that they want to have private certified public accountants
conduct their fiscal audits in any year, only the first twenty percent of the
cities and towns that indicate that to the state auditor may actually have
their fiscal audits conducted by private certified public accountants.

---
END ---