BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

Unless
the context requires otherwise, "inflation" means the percentage
change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for
the United States as published for the most recent twelve-month period by the
bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September
of the year before a June 30th determination.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.20.120 and 1993 c 483 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits shall be payable to any
eligible individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount
equal to the lesser of thirty times the weekly benefit amount (determined
hereinafter) or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title: PROVIDED, That as to any week beginning on and after March 31, 1981,
which falls in an extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), as
now or hereafter amended, an individual's eligibility for maximum benefits in
excess of twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount will be subject to
the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020, as now or hereafter
amended.

(2)(a)
An individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages
during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages
were highest.

(b)
The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be determined as of each
June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in the twelve-month period
immediately following such June 30th((.)) as follows:

(i)
Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, the maximum amount
payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the "average weekly wage"
for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. The minimum amount payable
weekly shall be fifteen percent of the "average weekly wage" for the
calendar year preceding such June 30th.

(ii)
Beginning with claims filed in benefit years beginning after June 30, 1999, the
maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be the amounts determined by
adjusting the maximum and minimum amounts applicable during the previous
twelve-month period to account for inflation.

(c)
If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit amount computed
herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be reduced to the next lower
multiple of one dollar.

Sec.
3. RCW
50.24.010 and 1984 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Contributions shall accrue and become payable by each employer (except
employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 who have properly elected to make
payments in lieu of contributions and those employers who are required to make
payments in lieu of contributions) for each calendar year in which the employer
is subject to this title at the rate established pursuant to chapter 50.29 RCW.

((In
each)) (b)(i) Through rate year 1999, the amount of wages
subject to tax for each individual shall be one hundred fifteen percent of the
amount of wages subject to tax for the previous year rounded to the next lower
one hundred dollars: PROVIDED, That the amount of wages subject to tax under
this subsection (1)(b)(i) in any rate year shall not exceed eighty percent
of the "average annual wage for contributions purposes" for the
second preceding calendar year rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars((:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the amount subject to tax shall be twelve thousand
dollars for rate year 1984 and ten thousand dollars for rate year 1985)).

(ii)
Beginning with rate year 2000 and thereafter, the amount of wages subject to
tax shall be the amount determined by adjusting the amount of wages subject to
tax for the previous year to account for inflation, rounded to the next lower
one hundred dollars.

(2)
In making computations under this section and RCW 50.29.010, wages paid based
on services for employers making payments in lieu of contributions shall not be
considered remuneration. Moneys paid from the fund, based on services
performed for employers who make payments in lieu of contributions, which have
not been reimbursed to the fund as of any June 30 shall be deemed an asset of
the unemployment compensation fund, to the extent that such moneys exceed the
amount of payments in lieu of contributions which the commissioner has
previously determined to be uncollectible: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the amount
attributable to employment with the state shall also include interest as
provided for in RCW 50.44.020.

(3)(a)
Contributions shall become due and be paid by each employer to the treasurer
for the unemployment compensation fund in accordance with such regulations as
the commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part,
from the remuneration of individuals in employment of the employer. Any
deduction in violation of the provisions of this section shall be unlawful.

(b)
In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be
disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall
be increased to one cent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 51.08 RCW to read as follows:

Unless
the context requires otherwise, "inflation" means the percentage
change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for
the United States as published for the most recent twelve-month period by the
bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce in September
of the year before a June 30th determination.

Sec.
5. RCW
51.32.050 and 1995 c 199 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occurred before July 1, 1999, where
death results from the injury, the expenses of burial not to exceed two
hundred percent of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW
51.08.018 shall be paid.

(b)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
where death results from the injury, the expenses of burial shall be paid, not
to exceed an amount determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each
June 30th thereafter, and applicable to claims filed with respect to injuries
occurring in the twelve-month period following the June 30th determination.
The amount is determined by adjusting the amount applicable during the previous
twelve-month period to account for inflation.

(2)(a)
Where death results from the injury, a surviving spouse of a deceased worker
eligible for benefits under this title shall receive monthly for life or until
remarriage payments according to the following schedule:

(i)
If there are no children of the deceased worker, sixty percent of the wages of
the deceased worker but not less than one hundred eighty-five dollars;

(ii)
If there is one child of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of such
spouse, sixty-two percent of the wages of the deceased worker but not less than
two hundred twenty-two dollars;

(iii)
If there are two children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of
such spouse, sixty-four percent of the wages of the deceased worker but not
less than two hundred fifty-three dollars;

(iv)
If there are three children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of
such spouse, sixty-six percent of the wages of the deceased worker but not less
than two hundred seventy-six dollars;

(v)
If there are four children of the deceased worker and in the legal custody of
such spouse, sixty-eight percent of the wages of the deceased worker but not
less than two hundred ninety-nine dollars; or

(vi)
If there are five or more children of the deceased worker and in the legal
custody of such spouse, seventy percent of the wages of the deceased worker but
not less than three hundred twenty-two dollars.

(b)
Where the surviving spouse does not have legal custody of any child or children
of the deceased worker or where after the death of the worker legal custody of
such child or children passes from such surviving spouse to another, any payment
on account of such child or children not in the legal custody of the surviving
spouse shall be made to the person or persons having legal custody of such
child or children. The amount of such payments shall be five percent of the
monthly benefits payable as a result of the worker's death for each such child
but such payments shall not exceed twenty-five percent. Such payments on
account of such child or children shall be subtracted from the amount to which
such surviving spouse would have been entitled had such surviving spouse had
legal custody of all of the children and the surviving spouse shall receive the
remainder after such payments on account of such child or children have been
subtracted. Such payments on account of a child or children not in the legal
custody of such surviving spouse shall be apportioned equally among such
children.

(c)
Payments to the surviving spouse of the deceased worker shall cease at the end
of the month in which remarriage occurs: PROVIDED, That a monthly payment shall
be made to the child or children of the deceased worker from the month
following such remarriage in a sum equal to five percent of the wages of the
deceased worker for one child and a sum equal to five percent for each
additional child up to a maximum of five such children. Payments to such child
or children shall be apportioned equally among such children. Such sum shall
be in place of any payments theretofore made for the benefit of or on account
of any such child or children. If the surviving spouse does not have legal
custody of any child or children of the deceased worker, or if after the death
of the worker, legal custody of such child or children passes from such
surviving spouse to another, any payment on account of such child or children not
in the legal custody of the surviving spouse shall be made to the person or
persons having legal custody of such child or children.

(d)
((In no event shall)) (i) For claims filed with respect to injuries
that occurred before July 1, 1999, the monthly payments provided in
subsection (2) of this section may not exceed the applicable percentage
of the average monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 as
follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June
30, 1993 105%

June
30, 1994 110%

June
30, 1995 115%

June
30, 1996 120%

(ii)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
the monthly payments provided in this subsection may not exceed an amount
determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June 30th thereafter,
and applicable to claims filed with respect to injuries occurring in the
twelve-month period following the June 30th determination. The amount is
determined by adjusting the amount applicable during the previous twelve-month
period to account for inflation.

(e)
In addition to the monthly payments provided for in subsection (2)(a) through
(c) of this section, a surviving spouse or child or children of such worker if
there is no surviving spouse, or dependent parent or parents, if there is no
surviving spouse or child or children of any such deceased worker shall be
forthwith paid a sum equal to one hundred percent of the average monthly wage
in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, any such children, or parents to share
and share alike in said sum.

(f)
Upon remarriage of a surviving spouse the monthly payments for the child or
children shall continue as provided in this section, but the monthly payments
to such surviving spouse shall cease at the end of the month during which
remarriage occurs. However, after September 8, 1975, an otherwise eligible
surviving spouse of a worker who died at any time prior to or after September
8, 1975, shall have an option of:

(i)
Receiving, once and for all, a lump sum of twenty-four times the monthly
compensation rate in effect on the date of remarriage allocable to the spouse
for himself or herself pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section and
subject to any modifications specified under subsection (2)(d) of this section
and RCW 51.32.075(3) or fifty percent of the then remaining annuity value of
his or her pension, whichever is the lesser: PROVIDED, That if the injury
occurred prior to July 28, 1991, the remarriage benefit lump sum available
shall be as provided in the remarriage benefit schedules then in effect; or

(ii)
If a surviving spouse does not choose the option specified in subsection
(2)(f)(i) of this section to accept the lump sum payment, the remarriage of the
surviving spouse of a worker shall not bar him or her from claiming the lump
sum payment authorized in subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section during the life
of the remarriage, or shall not prevent subsequent monthly payments to him or
to her if the remarriage has been terminated by death or has been dissolved or
annulled by valid court decree provided he or she has not previously accepted
the lump sum payment.

(g)
If the surviving spouse during the remarriage should die without having
previously received the lump sum payment provided in subsection (2)(f)(i) of
this section, his or her estate shall be entitled to receive the sum specified
under subsection (2)(f)(i) of this section or fifty percent of the then
remaining annuity value of his or her pension whichever is the lesser.

(h)
The effective date of resumption of payments under subsection (2)(f)(ii) of
this section to a surviving spouse based upon termination of a remarriage by
death, annulment, or dissolution shall be the date of the death or the date the
judicial decree of annulment or dissolution becomes final and when application
for the payments has been received.

(i)
If it should be necessary to increase the reserves in the reserve fund or to
create a new pension reserve fund as a result of the amendments in chapter 45,
Laws of 1975‑'76 2nd ex. sess., the amount of such increase in pension
reserve in any such case shall be transferred to the reserve fund from the
supplemental pension fund.

(3)
If there is a child or children and no surviving spouse of the deceased worker
or the surviving spouse is not eligible for benefits under this title, a sum
equal to thirty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker shall be paid
monthly for one child and a sum equivalent to fifteen percent of such wage
shall be paid monthly for each additional child, the total of such sum to be
divided among such children, share and share alike((: PROVIDED, That)),
subject to the following:

(a)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occurred before July 1, 1999,
benefits under this subsection or subsection (4) of this section shall not
exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of the wages of the deceased worker at
the time of his or her death or the applicable percentage of the average
monthly wage in the state as defined in RCW 51.08.018, as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June
30, 1993 105%

June
30, 1994 110%

June
30, 1995 115%

June
30, 1996 120%

(b)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
benefits under this subsection or subsection (4) of this section may not exceed
an amount determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June 30th
thereafter, and applicable to claims filed with respect to injuries occurring
in the twelve-month period following the June 30th determination. The amount
is determined by adjusting the amount applicable during the previous
twelve-month period to account for inflation.

(4)
In the event a surviving spouse receiving monthly payments dies, the child or
children of the deceased worker shall receive the same payment as provided in
subsection (3) of this section.

(5)(a)
If the worker leaves no surviving spouse or child, but leaves a dependent or
dependents, a monthly payment shall be made to each dependent, as follows:

(i)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occurred before July 1, 1999,
the monthly payment shall be equal to fifty percent of the average monthly
support actually received by such dependent from the worker during the twelve
months next preceding the occurrence of the injury, but the total payment to
all dependents in any case shall not exceed the lesser of sixty-five percent of
the wages of the deceased worker at the time of his or her death or the
applicable percentage of the average monthly wage in the state as defined in
RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June
30, 1993 105%

June
30, 1994 110%

June
30, 1995 115%

June
30, 1996 120%

(ii)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
the monthly payments provided in this section may not exceed an amount
determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June 30th thereafter,
and applicable to claims filed with respect to injuries occurring in the
twelve-month period following the June 30th determination. The amount is
determined by adjusting the amount applicable during the previous twelve-month
period to account for inflation.

(b)
If any dependent is under the age of eighteen years at the time of the
occurrence of the injury, the payment to such dependent shall cease when such
dependent reaches the age of eighteen years except such payments shall continue
until the dependent reaches age twenty-three while permanently enrolled at a
full time course in an accredited school. The payment to any dependent shall
cease if and when, under the same circumstances, the necessity creating the
dependency would have ceased if the injury had not happened.

(6)
For claims filed prior to July 1, 1986, if the injured worker dies during the
period of permanent total disability, whatever the cause of death, leaving a
surviving spouse, or child, or children, the surviving spouse or child or
children shall receive benefits as if death resulted from the injury as
provided in subsections (2) through (4) of this section. Upon remarriage or
death of such surviving spouse, the payments to such child or children shall be
made as provided in subsection (2) of this section when the surviving spouse of
a deceased worker remarries.

(7)
For claims filed on or after July 1, 1986, every worker who becomes eligible
for permanent total disability benefits shall elect an option as provided in
RCW 51.32.067.

Sec.
6. RCW
51.32.060 and 1993 c 521 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When the supervisor of industrial insurance shall determine that permanent
total disability results from the injury, the worker shall receive monthly
during the period of such disability:

(a)
If married at the time of injury, sixty‑five percent of his or her wages
but not less than two hundred fifteen dollars per month.

(b)
If married with one child at the time of injury, sixty‑seven percent of
his or her wages but not less than two hundred fifty‑two dollars per
month.

(c)
If married with two children at the time of injury, sixty‑nine percent of
his or her wages but not less than two hundred eighty‑three dollars.

(d)
If married with three children at the time of injury, seventy‑one percent
of his or her wages but not less than three hundred six dollars per month.

(e)
If married with four children at the time of injury, seventy‑three
percent of his or her wages but not less than three hundred twenty‑nine
dollars per month.

(f)
If married with five or more children at the time of injury, seventy-five
percent of his or her wages but not less than three hundred fifty‑two
dollars per month.

(g)
If unmarried at the time of the injury, sixty percent of his or her wages but
not less than one hundred eighty‑five dollars per month.

(h)
If unmarried with one child at the time of injury, sixty‑two percent of
his or her wages but not less than two hundred twenty‑two dollars per
month.

(i)
If unmarried with two children at the time of injury, sixty‑four percent
of his or her wages but not less than two hundred fifty‑three dollars per
month.

(j)
If unmarried with three children at the time of injury, sixty‑six percent
of his or her wages but not less than two hundred seventy‑six dollars per
month.

(k)
If unmarried with four children at the time of injury, sixty‑eight
percent of his or her wages but not less than two hundred ninety‑nine
dollars per month.

(l)
If unmarried with five or more children at the time of injury, seventy percent
of his or her wages but not less than three hundred twenty‑two dollars
per month.

(2)
For any period of time where both husband and wife are entitled to compensation
as temporarily or totally disabled workers, only that spouse having the higher
wages of the two shall be entitled to claim their child or children for
compensation purposes.

(3)
In case of permanent total disability, if the character of the injury is such
as to render the worker so physically helpless as to require the hiring of the
services of an attendant, the department shall make monthly payments to such
attendant for such services as long as such requirement continues, but such
payments shall not obtain or be operative while the worker is receiving care
under or pursuant to the provisions of chapter 51.36 RCW and RCW 51.04.105.

(4)
Should any further accident result in the permanent total disability of an
injured worker, he or she shall receive the pension to which he or she would be
entitled, notwithstanding the payment of a lump sum for his or her prior
injury.

(5)
((In no event shall)) (a)(i) For claims filed with respect to
injuries that occurred before July 1, 1999, the monthly payments provided
in this section may not exceed the applicable percentage of the average
monthly wage in the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as
follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June
30, 1993 105%

June
30, 1994 110%

June
30, 1995 115%

June
30, 1996 120%

(ii)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
the monthly payments provided in this section may not exceed an amount
determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June 30th thereafter,
and applicable to claims filed with respect to injuries occurring in the
twelve-month period following the June 30th determination. The amount is
determined by adjusting the amount applicable during the previous twelve-month
period to account for inflation.

(b)
The limitations under this subsection shall not apply to the payments provided
for in subsection (3) of this section.

(6)
In the case of new or reopened claims, if the supervisor of industrial
insurance determines that, at the time of filing or reopening, the worker is
voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the work force, benefits shall
not be paid under this section.

(7)
The benefits provided by this section are subject to modification under RCW
51.32.067.

Sec.
7. RCW
51.32.072 and 1987 c 185 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every surviving spouse and every
permanently totally disabled worker or temporarily totally disabled worker, if
such worker was unmarried at the time of the worker's injury or was then
married but the marriage was later terminated by judicial action, receiving a
pension or compensation for temporary total disability under this title
pursuant to compensation schedules in effect prior to July 1, 1971, shall after
July 1, 1975, and until July 1, 1999, be paid fifty percent of the
average monthly wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018 per month and
an amount equal to five percent of such average monthly wage per month to such
totally disabled worker if married at the time of the worker's injury and the
marriage was not later terminated by judicial action, and an additional two
percent of such average monthly wage for each child of such totally disabled
worker at the time of injury in the legal custody of such totally disabled
worker or such surviving spouse up to a maximum of five such children. The
monthly payments such surviving spouse or totally disabled worker are receiving
pursuant to compensation schedules in effect prior to July 1, 1971 shall be
deducted from the monthly payments above specified.

(b)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, where such a surviving spouse
has remarried, or where any such child of such worker, whether living or
deceased, is not in the legal custody of such worker or such surviving spouse
there shall be paid for the benefit of and on account of each such child a sum
equal to two percent of such average monthly wage up to a maximum of five such
children in addition to any payments theretofore paid under compensation
schedules in effect prior to July 1, 1971 for the benefit of and on account of
each such child. In the case of any child or children of a deceased worker not
leaving a surviving spouse or where the surviving spouse has later died, there
shall be paid for the benefit of and on account of each such child a sum equal
to two percent of such average monthly wage up to a maximum of five such
children in addition to any payments theretofore paid under such schedules for
the benefit of and on account of each such child.

(2)
Beginning July 1, 1999, the monthly payments and the additional payments for
the injured worker's spouse or children provided in this section may not exceed
an amount determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June 30th
thereafter, and applicable to payments made during the twelve-month period
following the June 30th determination. The amount is determined by adjusting
the amount applicable during the previous twelve-month period to account for
inflation.

(3)
If the character of the injury or occupational disease is such as to render the
worker so physically helpless as to require the hiring of the services of an
attendant, the department shall make monthly payments to such attendant for
such services as long as such requirement continues but such payments shall not
obtain or be operative while the worker is receiving care under or pursuant to
the provisions of this title except for care granted at the discretion of the
supervisor pursuant to RCW 51.36.010: PROVIDED, That such payments shall not
be considered compensation nor shall they be subject to any limitation upon
total compensation payments.

No
part of such additional payments shall be payable from the accident fund.

(4)
The director shall pay monthly from the supplemental pension fund such an
amount as will, when added to the compensation theretofore paid under
compensation schedules in effect prior to July 1, 1971, equal the amounts
hereinabove specified.

(5)
In cases where money has been or shall be advanced to any such person from the
pension reserve, the additional amount to be paid under this section shall be
reduced by the amount of monthly pension which was or is predicated upon such
advanced portion of the pension reserve.

Sec.
8. RCW
51.32.075 and 1988 c 161 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the compensation or death
benefits payable pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for temporary total
disability, permanent total disability, or death arising out of injuries or
occupational diseases shall be adjusted as follows:

(((1)))
(a) On July 1, 1982, there shall be an adjustment for those whose right
to compensation was established on or after July 1, 1971, and before July 1,
1982. The adjustment shall be determined by multiplying the amount of
compensation to which they are entitled by a fraction, the denominator of which
shall be the average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 for the
fiscal year in which such person's right to compensation was established, and
the numerator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state under RCW
51.08.018 on July 1, 1982.

(((2)))
(b) In addition to the adjustment established by ((subsection (1)))
(a) of this ((section)) subsection, there shall be another
adjustment on July 1, 1983, for those whose right to compensation was
established on or after July 1, 1971, and before July 1983, which shall be
determined by multiplying the amount of compensation to which they are entitled
by a fraction, the denominator of which shall be the average monthly wage in
the state under RCW 51.08.018 for the fiscal year in which such person's right
to compensation was established, and the numerator of which shall be the
average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 on July 1, 1983.

(((3)))
(c) In addition to the adjustments under ((subsections (1) and (2)))
(a) and (b) of this ((section)) subsection, further
adjustments shall be made beginning on July 1, 1984, and on each July 1st thereafter
for those whose right to compensation was established on or after July 1,
1971. The adjustment shall be determined by multiplying the amount of
compensation to which they are entitled by a fraction, the denominator of which
shall be the average monthly wage in the state under RCW 51.08.018 for the
fiscal year in which such person's right to compensation was established, and
the numerator of which shall be the average monthly wage in the state under RCW
51.08.018 on July 1st of the year in which the adjustment is being made. The
department or self-insurer shall adjust the resulting compensation rate to the
nearest whole cent, not to exceed the average monthly wage in the state as
computed under RCW 51.08.018.

(2)
Beginning July 1, 1999, the annual adjustments provided for in this section
shall be an amount determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June
30th thereafter, and applicable to payments made during the twelve-month period
following the June 30th determination. The amount is determined by adjusting
the amount applicable during the previous twelve-month period to account for
inflation.

Sec.
9. RCW
51.32.080 and 1993 c 520 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Until July 1, 1993, for the permanent partial disabilities here specifically
described, the injured worker shall receive compensation as follows:

LOSS BY AMPUTATION

Of leg above the knee joint with short thigh stump
(3" or less below the tuberosity of ischium)................................. $54,000.00

Of leg at or above knee joint with functional stump.......
48,600.00

Of leg below knee joint.........................
43,200.00

Of leg at ankle (Syme)..........................
37,800.00

Of foot at mid-metatarsals......................
18,900.00

Of great toe with resection of metatarsal bone..
11,340.00

Of great toe at metatarsophalangeal joint.......
6,804.00

Of great toe at interphalangeal joint...........
3,600.00

Of lesser toe (2nd to 5th) with resection of metatarsal
bone............................. 4,140.00

Of lesser toe at metatarsophalangeal joint......
2,016.00

Of lesser toe at proximal interphalangeal joint.
1,494.00

Of lesser toe at distal interphalangeal joint...
378.00

Of arm at or above the deltoid insertion or by
disarticulation at the shoulder.. 54,000.00

Of arm at any point from below the deltoid insertion to
below the elbow joint at the insertion of the biceps tendon................
51,300.00

Of arm at any point from below the elbow joint distal to
the insertion of the biceps tendon to and including mid-metacarpal amputation
of the hand............................. 48,600.00

Of all fingers except the thumb at metacarpophalangeal
joints........................... 29,160.00

Of thumb at metacarpophalangeal joint or with resection
of carpometacarpal bone............. 19,440.00

Of thumb at interphalangeal joint...............
9,720.00

Of index finger at metacarpophalangeal joint or with
resection of metacarpal bone..... 12,150.00

Of index finger at proximal interphalangeal joint
9,720.00

Of index finger at distal interphalangeal joint.
5,346.00

Of middle finger at metacarpophalangeal joint or with
resection of metacarpal bone..... 9,720.00

Of middle finger at proximal interphalangeal joint........
7,776.00

Of middle finger at distal interphalangeal joint
4,374.00

Of ring finger at metacarpophalangeal joint or with
resection of metacarpal bone..... 4,860.00

Of ring finger at proximal interphalangeal joint
3,888.00

Of ring finger at distal interphalangeal joint..
2,430.00

Of little finger at metacarpophalangeal joint or with
resection of metacarpal bone..... 2,430.00

Of little finger at proximal
interphalangeal joint........ 1,944.00

Of little finger at distal interphalangeal joint
972.00

MISCELLANEOUS

Loss of
one eye by enucleation......................... 21,600.00

Loss of
central visual acuity in one eye............... 18,000.00

Complete loss of hearing in both ears.................. 43,200.00

Complete
loss of hearing in one ear.................... 7,200.00

(b)
Beginning on July 1, 1993, compensation under this subsection shall be computed
as follows:

(i)
Beginning on July 1, 1993, the compensation amounts for the specified
disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection shall be increased by thirty-two
percent; and

(ii)
Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the compensation amounts
for the specified disabilities listed in (a) of this subsection, as adjusted
under (b)(i) of this subsection, shall be readjusted to ((reflect the
percentage change in the consumer price index, calculated as follows: The
index for the calendar year preceding the year in which the July calculation is
made, to be known as "calendar year A," is divided by the index for
the calendar year preceding calendar year A, and the resulting ratio is
multiplied by the compensation amount in effect on June 30 immediately
preceding the July 1st on which the respective calculation is made. For the
purposes of this subsection, "index" means the same as the definition
in RCW 2.12.037(1))) account for inflation.

(2)
Compensation for amputation of a member or part thereof at a site other than
those specified in subsection (1) of this section, and for loss of central
visual acuity and loss of hearing other than complete, shall be in proportion
to that which such other amputation or partial loss of visual acuity or hearing
most closely resembles and approximates. Compensation shall be calculated
based on the adjusted schedule of compensation in effect for the respective
time period as prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)(a)
Compensation for any other permanent partial disability not involving
amputation shall be in the proportion which the extent of such other
disability, called unspecified disability, shall bear to the disabilities
specified in subsection (1) of this section, which most closely resembles and
approximates in degree of disability such other disability, and compensation
for any other unspecified permanent partial disability shall be in an amount as
measured and compared to total bodily impairment. To reduce litigation and
establish more certainty and uniformity in the rating of unspecified permanent
partial disabilities, the department shall enact rules having the force of law
classifying such disabilities in the proportion which the department shall
determine such disabilities reasonably bear to total bodily impairment. In
enacting such rules, the department shall give consideration to, but need not
necessarily adopt, any nationally recognized medical standards or guides for
determining various bodily impairments.

(b)
Until July 1, 1993, for purposes of calculating monetary benefits under (a) of
this subsection, the amount payable for total bodily impairment shall be deemed
to be ninety thousand dollars. Beginning on July 1, 1993, for purposes of
calculating monetary benefits under (a) of this subsection, the amount payable
for total bodily impairment shall be adjusted as follows:

(i)
Beginning on July 1, 1993, the amount payable for total bodily impairment under
this section shall be increased to one hundred eighteen thousand eight hundred
dollars; and

(ii)
Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the amount payable for
total bodily impairment prescribed in (b)(i) of this subsection shall be adjusted
as provided in subsection (1)(b)(ii) of this section.

(c)
Until July 1, 1993, the total compensation for all unspecified permanent
partial disabilities resulting from the same injury shall not exceed the sum of
ninety thousand dollars. Beginning on July 1, 1993, total compensation for all
unspecified permanent partial disabilities resulting from the same injury shall
not exceed a sum calculated as follows:

(i)
Beginning on July 1, 1993, the sum shall be increased to one hundred eighteen
thousand eight hundred dollars; and

(ii)
Beginning on July 1, 1994, and each July 1 thereafter, the sum prescribed in
(b)(i) of this subsection shall be adjusted as provided in subsection
(1)(b)(ii) of this section.

(4)
If permanent partial disability compensation is followed by permanent total
disability compensation, any portion of the permanent partial disability
compensation which exceeds the amount that would have been paid the injured
worker if permanent total disability compensation had been paid in the first
instance, shall be deducted from the pension reserve of such injured worker and
his or her monthly compensation payments shall be reduced accordingly.

(5)
Should a worker receive an injury to a member or part of his or her body
already, from whatever cause, permanently partially disabled, resulting in the
amputation thereof or in an aggravation or increase in such permanent partial
disability but not resulting in the permanent total disability of such worker,
his or her compensation for such partial disability shall be adjudged with
regard to the previous disability of the injured member or part and the degree
or extent of the aggravation or increase of disability thereof.

(6)
When the compensation provided for in subsections (1) through (3) of this
section exceeds three times the average monthly wage in the state as computed
under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018, payment shall be made in monthly
payments in accordance with the schedule of temporary total disability payments
set forth in RCW 51.32.090 until such compensation is paid to the injured
worker in full, except that the first monthly payment shall be in an amount
equal to three times the average monthly wage in the state as computed under
the provisions of RCW 51.08.018, and interest shall be paid at the rate of
eight percent on the unpaid balance of such compensation commencing with the
second monthly payment. However, upon application of the injured worker or
survivor the monthly payment may be converted, in whole or in part, into a lump
sum payment, in which event the monthly payment shall cease in whole or in
part. Such conversion may be made only upon written application of the injured
worker or survivor to the department and shall rest in the discretion of the
department depending upon the merits of each individual application. Upon the
death of a worker all unpaid installments accrued shall be paid according to
the payment schedule established prior to the death of the worker to the widow
or widower, or if there is no widow or widower surviving, to the dependent
children of such claimant, and if there are no such dependent children, then to
such other dependents as defined by this title.

(7)
Awards payable under this section are governed by the schedule in effect on the
date of injury.

Sec.
10. RCW
51.32.090 and 1993 c 521 s 3, 1993 c 299 s 1, and 1993 c 271 s 1 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
When the total disability is only temporary, the schedule of payments contained
in RCW 51.32.060 (1) and (2) shall apply, so long as the total disability
continues.

(2)
Any compensation payable under this section for children not in the custody of
the injured worker as of the date of injury shall be payable only to such
person as actually is providing the support for such child or children pursuant
to the order of a court of record providing for support of such child or
children.

(3)(a)
As soon as recovery is so complete that the present earning power of the
worker, at any kind of work, is restored to that existing at the time of the
occurrence of the injury, the payments shall cease. If and so long as the
present earning power is only partially restored, the payments shall:

(i)
For claims for injuries that occurred before May 7, 1993, continue in the
proportion which the new earning power shall bear to the old; or

(ii)
For claims for injuries occurring on or after May 7, 1993, equal eighty percent
of the actual difference between the worker's present wages and earning power
at the time of injury, but: (A) The total of these payments and the worker's
present wages may not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the average monthly
wage in the state as computed under RCW 51.08.018; (B) the payments may not
exceed one hundred percent of the entitlement as computed under subsection (1)
of this section; and (C) the payments may not be less than the worker would
have received if (a)(i) of this subsection had been applicable to the worker's
claim.

(b)
No compensation shall be payable under this subsection (3) unless the loss of
earning power shall exceed five percent.

(4)(a)
Whenever the employer of injury requests that a worker who is entitled to
temporary total disability under this chapter be certified by a physician as
able to perform available work other than his or her usual work, the employer
shall furnish to the physician, with a copy to the worker, a statement
describing the work available with the employer of injury in terms that will
enable the physician to relate the physical activities of the job to the
worker's disability. The physician shall then determine whether the worker is
physically able to perform the work described. The worker's temporary total
disability payments shall continue until the worker is released by his or her
physician for the work, and begins the work with the employer of injury. If
the work thereafter comes to an end before the worker's recovery is sufficient
in the judgment of his or her physician to permit him or her to return to his
or her usual job, or to perform other available work offered by the employer of
injury, the worker's temporary total disability payments shall be resumed.
Should the available work described, once undertaken by the worker, impede his
or her recovery to the extent that in the judgment of his or her physician he
or she should not continue to work, the worker's temporary total disability
payments shall be resumed when the worker ceases such work.

(b)
Once the worker returns to work under the terms of this subsection (4), he or
she shall not be assigned by the employer to work other than the available work
described without the worker's written consent, or without prior review and
approval by the worker's physician.

(c)
If the worker returns to work under this subsection (4), any employee health
and welfare benefits that the worker was receiving at the time of injury shall
continue or be resumed at the level provided at the time of injury. Such benefits
shall not be continued or resumed if to do so is inconsistent with the terms of
the benefit program, or with the terms of the collective bargaining agreement
currently in force.

(d)
In the event of any dispute as to the worker's ability to perform the available
work offered by the employer, the department shall make the final
determination.

(5)
No worker shall receive compensation for or during the day on which injury was
received or the three days following the same, unless his or her disability
shall continue for a period of fourteen consecutive calendar days from date of
injury: PROVIDED, That attempts to return to work in the first fourteen days
following the injury shall not serve to break the continuity of the period of
disability if the disability continues fourteen days after the injury occurs.

(6)
Should a worker suffer a temporary total disability and should his or her
employer at the time of the injury continue to pay him or her the wages which
he or she was earning at the time of such injury, such injured worker shall not
receive any payment provided in subsection (1) of this section during the
period his or her employer shall so pay such wages.

(7)
((In no event shall)) (a) For claims filed with respect to injuries
that occurred before July 1, 1999, the monthly payments provided in this
section may not exceed the applicable percentage of the average monthly
wage in the state as computed under the provisions of RCW 51.08.018 as follows:

AFTER PERCENTAGE

June
30, 1993 105%

June
30, 1994 110%

June
30, 1995 115%

June
30, 1996 120%

(b)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
the monthly payments provided in this section may not exceed an amount
determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June 30th thereafter,
and applicable to claims filed with respect to injuries occurring in the
twelve-month period following the June 30th determination. The amount is
determined by adjusting the amount applicable during the previous twelve-month
period to account for inflation.

(8)
If the supervisor of industrial insurance determines that the worker is
voluntarily retired and is no longer attached to the work force, benefits shall
not be paid under this section.

Sec.
11. RCW
51.36.020 and 1982 c 63 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When the injury to any worker is so serious as to require his or her being
taken from the place of injury to a place of treatment, his or her employer
shall, at the expense of the medical aid fund, or self-insurer, as the case may
be, furnish transportation to the nearest place of proper treatment.

(2)
Every worker whose injury results in the loss of one or more limbs or eyes
shall be provided with proper artificial substitutes and every worker, who
suffers an injury to an eye producing an error of refraction, shall be once
provided proper and properly equipped lenses to correct such error of
refraction and his or her disability rating shall be based upon the loss of
sight before correction.

(3)
Every worker whose accident results in damage to or destruction of an
artificial limb, eye, or tooth, shall have same repaired or replaced.

(4)
Every worker whose hearing aid or eyeglasses or lenses are damaged, destroyed,
or lost as a result of an industrial accident shall have the same restored or
replaced. The department or self-insurer shall be liable only for the cost of
restoring damaged hearing aids or eyeglasses to their condition at the time of
the accident.

(5)
All mechanical appliances necessary in the treatment of an injured worker, such
as braces, belts, casts, and crutches, shall be provided and all mechanical
appliances required as permanent equipment after treatment has been completed
shall continue to be provided or replaced without regard to the date of injury
or date treatment was completed, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

(6)
A worker, whose injury is of such short duration as to bring him or her within
the time limit provisions of RCW 51.32.090, shall nevertheless receive during
the omitted period medical, surgical, and hospital care and service and
transportation under the provisions of this chapter.

(7)
Whenever in the sole discretion of the supervisor it is reasonable and necessary
to provide residence modifications necessary to meet the needs and requirements
of the worker who has sustained catastrophic injury, the department or
self-insurer may be ordered to pay an amount determined as follows:

(a)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occurred before July 1, 1999,
the amount may not ((to)) exceed the state's average annual wage for
one year as determined under RCW 50.04.355, as now existing or hereafter
amended, toward the cost of such modifications or construction. ((Such))

(b)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
the amount may not exceed an amount determined by the department on June 30,
1999, and each June 30th thereafter, and applicable to claims filed with
respect to injuries occurring in the twelve-month period following the June
30th determination. The amount is determined by adjusting the amount
applicable during the previous twelve-month period to account for inflation. Payment
shall ((only)) be made under this subsection only for the
construction or modification of a residence in which the injured worker
resides. Only one residence of any worker may be modified or constructed under
this subsection, although the supervisor may order more than one payment for any
one home, up to the maximum amount permitted by this section.

(8)
Whenever in the sole discretion of the supervisor it is reasonable and
necessary to modify a motor vehicle owned by a worker who has become an amputee
or becomes paralyzed because of an industrial injury, the supervisor may pay
or order a self-insurer to pay as follows:

(a)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occurred before July 1, 1999,
up to fifty percent of the state's average annual wage for one year, as
determined under RCW 50.04.355, ((as now existing or hereafter amended, to
be paid by the department or self-insurer)) toward the costs thereof.

(b)
For claims filed with respect to injuries that occur on or after July 1, 1999,
up to an amount determined by the department on June 30, 1999, and each June
30th thereafter, and applicable to claims filed with respect to injuries
occurring in the twelve-month period following the June 30th determination.
The amount is determined by adjusting the amount applicable during the previous
twelve-month period to account for inflation.

(9)
The benefits provided by subsections (7) and (8) of this section are available
to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of the date of industrial injury.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---