BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.20.050 and 1993 c 483 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning with the first day
of the calendar week in which he or she has left work voluntarily without good
cause and thereafter for five calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained
bona fide work and earned wages equal to five times his or her weekly benefit
amount.

The
disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere sham to qualify
for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining whether work is of a
bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider factors including but not
limited to the following:

(a)
The duration of the work;

(b)
The extent of direction and control by the employer over the work; and

(c)
The level of skill required for the work in light of the individual's training
and experience.

(2)
An individual shall not be considered to have left work voluntarily without
good cause when:

(a)
He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona fide work as
described in subsection (1) of this section;

(b)
The separation was because of the illness or disability of the claimant or the
death, illness, or disability of a member of the claimant's immediate family if
the claimant took all reasonable precautions, in accordance with any
regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, to protect his or her
employment status by having promptly notified the employer of the reason for
the absence and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to
assume employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management dispatch
system; ((or))

(c)
The separation was to allow the claimant to care for the claimant's newborn
child under the age of one month, if the claimant gave notice to the employer at
least thirty days before leave to care for the newborn child was expected to
begin and promptly requested reemployment at the end of the leave. No
otherwise eligible individual may be denied benefits for any week during the
month in which the individual is on leave for the purpose described in this
subsection because of RCW 50.20.010(3), 50.20.080, or 50.22.020(1) relating to
availability for work and active search for work, or failure to apply for or
refusal to accept suitable work; or

(d)
He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's employment that is outside
the existing labor market area if the claimant remained employed as long as was
reasonable prior to the move.

(3)
In determining under this section whether an individual has left work voluntarily
without good cause, the commissioner shall only consider work-connected factors
such as the degree of risk involved to the individual's health, safety, and
morals, the individual's physical fitness for the work, the individual's
ability to perform the work, and such other work connected factors as the
commissioner may deem pertinent, including state and national emergencies.
Good cause shall not be established for voluntarily leaving work because of its
distance from an individual's residence where the distance was known to the
individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and where, in the
judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled by workers in
the individual's job classification and labor market, nor because of any other
significant work factor which was generally known and present at the time he or
she accepted employment, unless the related circumstances have so changed as to
amount to a substantial involuntary deterioration of the work factor or unless
the commissioner determines that other related circumstances would work an
unreasonable hardship on the individual were he or she required to continue in
the employment.

(4)
Subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall not apply to an individual whose
marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him or her to leave
employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible for unemployment
insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which
he or she left work and thereafter for five calendar weeks and until he or she
has requalified, either by obtaining bona fide work and earning wages equal to
five times his or her weekly benefit amount or by reporting in person to the
department during ten different calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion
that he or she is ready, able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable
work which may be offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement services
as are available through the department. This subsection does not apply to
individuals covered by subsection (2) (b) or (((c))) (d) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

---
END ---