BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the safe, prompt, and thorough inspection of electrical
installations is in the best interest of the citizens of the state. Counties
should be given the same authority to perform electrical inspections as cities
currently exercise. Authorizing electrical inspections to be done locally will
make local officials responsible for safe, timely, and professional inspections
as is now the case with all other areas of the building inspections. Builders
in counties that do their own inspections will be able to address complaints to
local officials rather than to a state agency, consistent with other aspects of
regulatory reform now underway. To facilitate this transition, the legislature
intends that counties that choose to conduct electrical inspections provide
employment opportunities to seasoned, experienced state inspectors.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.28.010 and 1993 c 275 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All wires and equipment, and installations thereof, that convey electric
current and installations of equipment to be operated by electric current, in,
on, or about buildings or structures, except for telephone, telegraph, radio,
and television wires and equipment, and television antenna installations,
signal strength amplifiers, and coaxial installations pertaining thereto shall
be in strict conformity with this chapter, the statutes of the state of
Washington, and the rules issued by the department, and shall be in conformity
with approved methods of construction for safety to life and property. All
wires and equipment that fall within section 90.2(b)(5) of the National Electrical
Code, 1981 edition, are exempt from the requirements of this chapter. The
regulations and articles in the National Electrical Code, the national
electrical safety code, and other installation and safety regulations approved
by the national fire protection association, as modified or supplemented by
rules issued by the department in furtherance of safety to life and property
under authority hereby granted, shall be prima facie evidence of the approved
methods of construction. All materials, devices, appliances, and equipment
used in such installations shall be of a type that conforms to applicable
standards or be indicated as acceptable by the established standards of any
electrical product testing laboratory which is accredited by the department.
Industrial control panels, utilization equipment, and their components do not
need to be listed, labeled, or otherwise indicated as acceptable by an
accredited electrical product testing laboratory unless specifically required
by the National Electrical Code, 1993 edition.

(2)
Residential buildings or structures moved into or within a county, city, or
town are not required to comply with all of the requirements of this chapter,
if the original occupancy classification of the building or structure is not
changed as a result of the move. This subsection shall not apply to
residential buildings or structures that are substantially remodeled or
rehabilitated.

(3)
This chapter shall not limit the authority or power of ((any)) a
county, city, or town to enact and enforce under authority given by
law, any ordinance, rule, or regulation requiring an equal, higher, or better
standard of construction and an equal, higher, or better standard of materials,
devices, appliances, and equipment than that required by this chapter. A county,
city, or town shall require that its electrical inspectors meet the
qualifications provided for state electrical inspectors in accordance with RCW
19.28.070. In a county, city, or town having an equal, higher,
or better standard the installations, materials, devices, appliances, and
equipment shall be in accordance with the ordinance, rule, or regulation of the
county, city, or town. Electrical equipment associated with
spas, hot tubs, swimming pools, and hydromassage bathtubs shall not be offered
for sale or exchange unless the electrical equipment is certified as being in
compliance with the applicable product safety standard by bearing the
certification mark of an approved electrical products testing laboratory.

(4)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed as permitting the connection of any
conductor of any electric circuit with a pipe that is connected with or
designed to be connected with a waterworks piping system, without the consent
of the person or persons legally responsible for the operation and maintenance
of the waterworks piping system.

Sec.
3. RCW
19.28.015 and 1988 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Disputes
arising under RCW 19.28.010(((2))) (3) regarding whether the county,
city, or town's electrical rules, regulations, or ordinances are equal
to the rules adopted by the department shall be resolved by arbitration. The
department shall appoint two members of the board to serve on the arbitration
panel, and the county, city, or town shall appoint two persons to
serve on the arbitration panel. These four persons shall choose a fifth person
to serve. If the four persons cannot agree on a fifth person, the presiding
judge of the superior court of the county, or county in which the city or
town is located, shall choose a fifth person. A decision of the
arbitration panel may be appealed to the superior court of the county, or
county in which the city or town is located, within thirty days
after the date the panel issues its final decision.

Sec.
4. RCW
19.28.070 and 1997 c 309 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of labor and industries of the state of Washington and the officials
of all counties and incorporated cities and towns where electrical
inspections are required by local ordinances shall have power and it shall be
their duty to enforce the provisions of this chapter in their respective
jurisdictions. The director of labor and industries shall appoint a chief
electrical inspector and may appoint other electrical inspectors as the
director deems necessary to assist the director in the performance of the
director's duties. The chief electrical inspector, subject to the review of
the director, shall be responsible for providing the final interpretation of
adopted state electrical standards, rules, and policies for the department and
its inspectors, assistant inspectors, electrical plan examiners, and other
individuals supervising electrical program personnel. If a dispute arises
within the department regarding the interpretation of adopted state electrical
standards, rules, or policies, the chief electrical inspector, subject to the
review of the director, shall provide the final interpretation of the disputed
standard, rule, or policy. All electrical inspectors appointed by the director
of labor and industries shall have not less than: Four years experience as
journeyman electricians in the electrical construction trade installing and
maintaining electrical wiring and equipment, or two years electrical training
in a college of electrical engineering of recognized standing and four years
continuous practical electrical experience in installation work, or four years
of electrical training in a college of electrical engineering of recognized
standing and two years continuous practical electrical experience in electrical
installation work; or four years experience as a journeyman electrician
performing the duties of an electrical inspector employed by the department or
a city or town with an approved inspection program under RCW 19.28.360, except
that for work performed in accordance with the national electrical safety code
and covered by this chapter, such inspections may be performed by a person
certified as an outside journeyman lineman, under RCW 19.28.610(2), with four
years experience or a person with four years experience as a certified outside
journeyman lineman performing the duties of an electrical inspector employed by
an electrical utility. Such state inspectors shall be paid such salary as the
director of labor and industries shall determine, together with their travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or
hereafter amended. As a condition of employment, inspectors hired exclusively
to perform inspections in accordance with the national electrical safety code
must possess and maintain certification as an outside journeyman lineman. The
expenses of the director of labor and industries and the salaries and expenses
of state inspectors incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter
shall be paid entirely out of the electrical license fund, upon vouchers
approved by the director of labor and industries.

Sec.
5. RCW
19.28.120 and 1998 c 279 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or maintaining
wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing or maintaining equipment
to be operated by electric current as it pertains to the electrical industry,
without having an unrevoked, unsuspended, and unexpired electrical contractor
license, issued by the department in accordance with this chapter. All
electrical contractor licenses expire twenty-four calendar months following the
day of their issue. The department may issue an electrical contractors license
for a period of less than twenty-four months only for the purpose of equalizing
the number of electrical contractor licenses that expire each month.
Application for an electrical contractor license shall be made in writing to
the department, accompanied by the required fee. The application shall state:

(a)
The name and address of the applicant; in case of firms or partnerships, the
names of the individuals composing the firm or partnership; in case of
corporations, the names of the managing officials thereof;

(b)
The location of the place of business of the applicant and the name under which
the business is conducted;

(c)
Employer social security number;

(d)
Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees
working in Washington, as follows:

(i)
The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii)
The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii)
For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an
agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement,
filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile
certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation law;

(e)
Employment security department number;

(f)
State excise tax registration number;

(g)
Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the
information required by (d) of this subsection if the applicant will not employ
employees in Washington, and by (e) and (f) of this subsection; and

(h)
Whether a general or specialty electrical contractor license is sought and, if
the latter, the type of specialty. Electrical contractor specialties include,
but are not limited to: Residential, domestic appliances, pump and irrigation,
limited energy system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, and a combination
specialty. A general electrical contractor license shall grant to the holder
the right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of installing or
maintaining wires or equipment to carry electric current, and installing or
maintaining equipment, or installing or maintaining material to fasten or
insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current, in the
state of Washington. A specialty electrical contractor license shall grant to the
holder a limited right to engage in, conduct, or carry on the business of
installing or maintaining wires or equipment to carry electrical current, and
installing or maintaining equipment; or installing or maintaining material to
fasten or insulate such wires or equipment to be operated by electric current
in the state of Washington as expressly allowed by the license.

(2)
The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information
provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(d) of this section, including
but not limited to information regarding the coverage of an individual employee
of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the
department may notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees
in Washington.

(3)
The application for a contractor license shall be accompanied by a bond in the
sum of four thousand dollars with the state of Washington named as obligee in
the bond, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the department. The
bond shall at all times be kept in full force and effect, and any cancellation
or revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom, suspends the
license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed and approved as
provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the department shall on the
next business day deposit the fee accompanying the application in the
electrical license fund and shall file the bond in the office. The department
shall upon request furnish to any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or
other entity a certified copy of the bond upon the payment of a fee that the
department shall set by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of
furnishing the certified copy. The bond shall be conditioned that in any
installation or maintenance of wires or equipment to convey electrical current,
and equipment to be operated by electrical current, the principal will comply
with the provisions of this chapter and with any electrical ordinance, building
code, or regulation of a county, city, or town adopted pursuant
to RCW 19.28.010(3) that is in effect at the time of entering into a contract.
The bond shall be conditioned further that the principal will pay for all
labor, including employee benefits, and material furnished or used upon the
work, taxes and contributions to the state of Washington, and all damages that
may be sustained by any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
due to a failure of the principal to make the installation or maintenance in
accordance with this chapter or any applicable ordinance, building code, or
regulation of a county, city, or town adopted pursuant to RCW
19.28.010(3). In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the license
applicant may file with the department a cash deposit or other negotiable
security acceptable to the department. If the license applicant has filed a
cash deposit, the department shall deposit the funds in a special trust savings
account in a commercial bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan
association and shall pay annually to the depositor the interest derived from
the account.

(4)
The department shall issue general or specialty electrical contractor licenses
to applicants meeting all of the requirements of this chapter. The provisions
of this chapter relating to the licensing of any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity including the requirement of a bond with the state
of Washington named as obligee therein and the collection of a fee therefor,
are exclusive, and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may
require or issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a
similar purpose. No person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
holding more than one specialty contractor license under this chapter may be
required to pay an annual fee for more than one such license or to post more
than one four thousand dollar bond, equivalent cash deposit, or other
negotiable security.

(5)
To obtain a general or specialty electrical contractor license the applicant
must designate an individual who currently possesses an administrator's
certificate as a general electrical contractor administrator or as a specialty
electrical contractor administrator in the specialty for which application has
been made. Administrator certificate specialties include but are not limited
to: Residential, domestic, appliance, pump and irrigation, limited energy
system, signs, nonresidential maintenance, and combination specialty. To
obtain an administrator's certificate an individual must pass an examination as
set forth in RCW 19.28.123 unless the applicant was a licensed electrical
contractor at any time during 1974. Applicants who were electrical contractors
licensed by the state of Washington at any time during 1974 are entitled to
receive a general electrical contractor administrator's certificate without
examination if the applicants apply prior to January 1, 1984. The board of
electrical examiners shall certify to the department the names of all persons
who are entitled to either a general or specialty electrical contractor
administrator's certificate.

Sec.
6. RCW
19.28.190 and 1986 c 156 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person, firm or corporation engaging in, conducting or carrying on the business
of installing wires or equipment to convey electric current, or installing
apparatus to be operated by said current, shall be entitled to commence or
maintain any suit or action in any court of this state pertaining to any such
work or business, without alleging and proving that such person, firm or
corporation held, at the time of commencing and performing such work, an
unexpired, unrevoked and unsuspended license issued under the provisions of
this chapter; and no county, city, or town requiring by ordinance
or regulation a permit for inspection or installation of such electrical work,
shall issue such permit to any person, firm or corporation not holding such
license.

Sec.
7. RCW
19.28.210 and 1996 c 241 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall cause an inspector to inspect all wiring, appliances,
devices, and equipment to which this chapter applies. Nothing contained in
this chapter may be construed as providing any authority for any subdivision of
government to adopt by ordinance any provisions contained or provided for in
this chapter except those pertaining to counties, cities, and
towns pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3).

(2)
Upon request, electrical inspections will be made by the department within
forty-eight hours, excluding holidays, Saturdays, and Sundays. If, upon
written request, the electrical inspector fails to make an electrical
inspection within twenty-four hours, the serving utility may immediately
connect electrical power to the installation if the necessary electrical work
permit is displayed((: PROVIDED, That)). If the request is for
an electrical inspection that relates to a mobile home installation, the
applicant shall provide proof of a current building permit issued by the local
government agency authorized to issue such permits as a prerequisite for
inspection approval or connection of electrical power to the mobile home.

(3)
Whenever the installation of any wiring, device, appliance, or equipment is not
in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a condition as to be dangerous
to life or property, the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other
entity owning, using, or operating it shall be notified by the department and shall
within fifteen days, or such further reasonable time as may upon request be
granted, make such repairs and changes as are required to remove the danger to
life or property and to make it conform to this chapter. The director, through
the inspector, is hereby empowered to disconnect or order the discontinuance of
electrical service to conductors or equipment that are found to be in a
dangerous or unsafe condition and not in accordance with this chapter. Upon
making a disconnection the inspector shall attach a notice stating that the
conductors have been found dangerous to life or property and are not in
accordance with this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such
defective conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and
until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and secure
condition, and in a condition that complies with this chapter.

(4)
The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right during reasonable
hours to enter into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of his
or her official duties for the purpose of making any inspection or test of the
installation of new construction or altered electrical wiring, electrical
devices, equipment, or material contained in or on the buildings or premises.
No electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter may be concealed
until it has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time
of the inspection, electrical wiring or equipment subject to this chapter must
be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to employ any testing
methods that will verify conformance with the national electrical code and any
other requirements of this chapter.

(5)
Persons, firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities making electrical
installations shall obtain inspection and approval from an authorized
representative of the department as required by this chapter before requesting
the electric utility to connect to the installations. Electric utilities may
connect to the installations if approval is clearly indicated by certification
of the electrical work permit required to be affixed to each installation or by
equivalent means, except that increased or relocated services may be
reconnected immediately at the discretion of the utility before approval if an
electrical work permit is displayed. The permits shall be furnished upon
payment of the fee to the department.

(6)
The director, subject to the recommendations and approval of the board, shall
set by rule a schedule of license and electrical work permit fees that will
cover the costs of administration and enforcement of this chapter. The rules
shall be adopted in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW. No fee may be charged for plug-in mobile homes, recreational
vehicles, or portable appliances.

(7)
Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the inspection of any wiring,
appliance, device, or equipment, or installations thereof, by any utility or by
any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed by a
utility in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines,
wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of the utility.
All work covered by the national electric code not exempted by the 1981 edition
of the national electric code 90-2(B)(5) shall be inspected by the department.

Sec.
8. RCW
19.28.360 and 1986 c 156 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of RCW 19.28.210 shall not apply:

(1)
Within a county or the corporate limits of any incorporated city or town
which has heretofore adopted and enforced or subsequently adopts and enforces
an ordinance requiring an equal, higher or better standard of construction and
of materials, devices, appliances and equipment than is required by this
chapter.

(2)
Within the service area of an electricity supply agency owned and operated by a
city or town which is supplying electricity and enforcing a standard of
construction and materials outside its corporate limits at the time this act
takes effect((: PROVIDED, That such)). A city, town, or
agency shall henceforth enforce by inspection within its service area outside
its corporate limits the same standards of construction and of materials,
devices, appliances and equipment as is enforced by the department of labor and
industries under the authority of this chapter((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Fees charged henceforth in connection with such enforcement shall not
exceed those established in RCW 19.28.210.

(3)
Within the rights of way of state highways, provided the state department of
transportation maintains and enforces an equal, higher or better standard of
construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment than is
required by RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.360.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 19.28 RCW to read as follows:

Counties opting to perform their own electrical inspections shall
give, to the greatest extent possible, first consideration for employment to
the trained persons currently employed by the department of labor and
industries performing electrical inspections at the time of the transition.

---
END ---