BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.78.030 and 1994 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
public printer shall print and bind the session laws, the journals of the two
houses of the legislature, all bills, resolutions, documents, and other
printing and binding of either the senate or house, as the same may be ordered
by the legislature((; and such forms, blanks, record books, and printing and
binding of every description as may be ordered by all state officers, boards,
commissions, and institutions, and the supreme court, and the court of appeals
and officers thereof, as the same may be ordered on requisition, from time to
time, by the proper authorities. This section shall not apply to the printing
of the supreme court and the court of appeals reports, to the printing of bond
certificates or bond offering disclosure documents, to the printing of
educational publications of the state historical societies, or to any printing
done or contracted for by institutions of higher education: PROVIDED, That)).
Institutions of higher education and other state agencies, in
consultation with the public printer, ((develop)) may contract with
the state printer or any private company for printing and binding work after
vendor selection procedures comparable to those used by the public printer for
contracted printing jobs. ((Where any institution or institution of higher
learning of the state is or may become equipped with facilities for doing such
work, it may do any printing: (1) For itself, or (2) for any other state
institution when such printing is done as part of a course of study relative to
the profession of printer. Any printing and binding of whatever description as
may be needed by any institution or agency of the state department of social
and health services not at Olympia, or the supreme court or the court of
appeals or any officer thereof, the estimated cost of which shall not exceed
one thousand dollars, may be done by any private printing company in the
general vicinity within the state of Washington so ordering, if in the judgment
of the officer of the agency so ordering, the saving in time and processing
justifies the award to such local private printing concern.

Beginning
on July 1, 1989, and on July 1 of each succeeding odd-numbered year, the dollar
limit specified in this section shall be adjusted as follows: The office of
financial management shall calculate such limit by adjusting the previous
biennium's limit by an appropriate federal inflationary index reflecting the
rate of inflation for the previous biennium. Such amounts shall be rounded to
the nearest fifty dollars.))

Sec.
2. RCW
43.78.040 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.040 are each amended to read as follows:

All
printing and binding done by the state printer shall be done under the
general superintendence of the authorities ordering it, and when completed
shall be delivered to such authorities, who shall sign receipts therefor.

((Before))
All printing and binding ordered from the public printer ((shall
execute any printing or binding for any office, board, commission, or
institution, the proper officer thereof shall apply therefor)) must be
by requisition.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.78.050 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.050 are each amended to read as follows:

((Upon
delivering a printing or binding job and receiving a receipt therefor)) The
public printer shall make out((,)) and deliver an itemized statement
of charges to the requesting agency ((an itemized statement of charges)).

Sec.
4. RCW
43.78.070 and 1979 c 151 s 134 are each amended to read as follows:

The
public printer shall use the state printing plant ((upon the following
conditions, to wit:

(1)
He shall)) to do the public printing((,)) that
is ordered and charge ((therefor the)) fees ((as provided by
law. He)) for this work. The public printer may print the
Washington Reports for the publishers thereof under a contract approved in
writing by the governor.

(((2)))
The gross income of the public printer shall be deposited in an account
designated "state printing plant revolving fund" in depositaries
approved by the state treasurer, and shall be disbursed by the public printer
by check and only as follows:

First,
in payment of the actual cost of labor, material, supplies, replacements,
repairs, water, light, heat, telephone, rent, and all other expenses necessary
in the operation of the plant: PROVIDED, That no machinery shall be purchased
except on written approval of the governor;

Second,
in payment of the cost of reasonable insurance upon the printing plant, payable
to the state and of all fidelity bonds required by law of the public printer;

Third,
in payment to the public printer of a salary which shall be fixed by the
governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040;

Fourth,
in remitting the balance to the state treasurer for the general fund:
PROVIDED, That a reasonable sum to be determined by the governor, the public
printer, and the director of financial management shall be retained in the fund
for working capital for the public printer.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.78.080 and 1972 ex.s. c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All
printing, ruling, binding, and other work done ((or supplies furnished by
the state printing plant for the various state departments, commissions,
institutions, boards, and officers shall)) must be paid for on an
actual cost basis as determined from a standard cost finding system to be
maintained by the state printing plant. In no event shall the price charged ((the
various state departments, commissions, institutions, boards, and officers))
exceed those established by the Porte Publishing Company's Franklin Printing
Catalogue for similar and comparable work. All bills for printing, ruling,
binding, and other work done ((or for supplies furnished)) by the state
printing plant shall be certified and sworn to by the public printer.

The
public printing shall be divided into the following classes:

FIRST
CLASS. The bills, resolutions, and other matters that may be ordered by the
legislature, or either branch thereof, in bill form, shall constitute the first
class, and shall be printed in such form as the legislature shall provide.

SECOND
CLASS. The second class shall consist of printing and binding of journals of
the senate and house of representatives, ((and the annual and biennial
reports of the several state officers, state commissions, boards, and
institutions, with the exception of the reports of the attorney general and the
governor's message to the legislature, which shall be printed and bound in the
same style as heretofore. Said journals and reports shall)) which must
be printed in such form as the senate and house of representatives ((and the
various state officers, commissions, boards, and institutions shall
respectively)) provide.

THIRD
CLASS. The third class shall consist of all reports, communications, and all
other documents that may be ordered printed in book form by the legislature ((or
either branch thereof, and all reports, books, pamphlets, and other like matter
printed in book form required by all state officers, boards, commissions, and
institutions shall be printed in such form and style, and set in such size
type, and printed on such grade of paper as may be desired by the state
officer, board, commission, or institution ordering them, and which they think
will best serve the purpose for which intended)).

FOURTH
CLASS. The fourth class shall consist of the session laws, and shall be
printed and bound in such form as the statute law committee shall provide.

FIFTH
CLASS. The fifth class ((shall)) consists of ((the printing
of all stationery blanks, record books, and circulars, and all printing and
binding required by the respective state officers, boards, commissions, and
institutions not covered by classes one, two, three, and four)) any work
that may be ordered by any other state agency.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.78.090 and 1965 c 8 s 43.78.090 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
required by law or by the legislature ((or by any state officer, board,
commission, or institution)), the public printer shall keep the type
used in printing any matter forming a part of the first, second, third, and fourth
classes standing for a period not exceeding sixty days for use in reprinting
such matter.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.78.110 and 1993 c 379 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
in the judgment of the public printer certain printing, ruling, binding, or
supplies that are ordered by the legislature or may be ordered by another
state agency can be secured from private sources more economically than by
doing the work or preparing the supplies in the state printing plant, the
public printer may obtain such work or supplies from such private sources.

In
event any work or supplies are secured on behalf of the state under this
section the state printing plant shall be entitled to add up to five percent to
the cost thereof to cover the handling of the orders which shall be added to
the bills and charged to the respective authorities ordering the work or
supplies. The five percent handling charge shall not apply to contracts ((with
institutions of higher education)) that a state agency makes on its own
with a private printing company.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 43.78.100 (Stock
to be furnished) and 1993 c 379 s 106 & 1965 c 8 s 43.78.100; and

(2) RCW
43.78.105 (Printing for institutions of higher
education--Interlocal agreements) and 1993 c 379 s 105.

---
END ---