BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.155.010 and 1993 c 507 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in RCW 82.24.010 shall apply to RCW 70.155.020 through
70.155.130. In addition, for the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise
required by the context:

(1)
"Board" means the Washington state liquor control board.

(2)
"Minor" refers to an individual who is less than eighteen years old.

(3)
"Package" or "container" means a package or container
that holds twenty or more cigarettes.

(4)
"Public place" means a public street, sidewalk, or park, or any area
open to the public in a publicly owned and operated building.

(((4)))
(5) "Sample" means a tobacco product distributed to members of
the general public at no cost or at nominal cost for product promotion
purposes.

(((5)))
(6) "Sampler" means a person engaged in the business of
sampling other than a retailer.

(((6)))
(7) "Sampling" means the distribution of samples to members of
the general public in a public place.

(((7)))
(8) "Tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco
and is intended for human ((consumption)) use.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.155.020 and 1993 c 507 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person who holds a license issued under RCW ((82.24.520)) 82.24.510(1)(b)
or 82.24.530 shall:

(1)
Display the license or a copy in a prominent location at the outlet for which
the license is issued; and

(2)
Display a sign concerning the prohibition of tobacco sales to minors.

Such
sign shall:

(a)
Be posted so that it is clearly visible to anyone purchasing tobacco products
from the licensee;

(b)
Be designed and produced by the department of health to read: "THE SALE
OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS TO PERSONS UNDER AGE 18 IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED BY STATE
LAW. IF YOU ARE UNDER 18, YOU COULD BE PENALIZED FOR PURCHASING OR
POSSESSING A TOBACCO PRODUCT; PHOTO ID REQUIRED"; and

(c)
Be provided free of charge by the liquor control board.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.155.030 and 1994 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall sell or permit to be sold any tobacco product through any
device that mechanically dispenses tobacco products unless the device is
located fully within premises from which minors are prohibited or in industrial
worksites where minors are not employed and not less than ten feet from all
entrance or exit ways to and from each premise. The board shall adopt rules
that allow an exception to the requirement that a device be located not less
than ten feet from all entrance or exit ways to and from a premise if it is
architecturally impractical for the device to be located not less than ten feet
from all entrance and exit ways.

(2)
Beginning July 1, 2000, self-service displays of tobacco products are
prohibited. All in-store tobacco products must be sold from behind the counter
or from within locked display units. This section does not apply to retailers
who sell tobacco products exclusively.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.155.040 and 1993 c 507 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall sell or permit to be sold ((cigarettes not)) a
package or container of fewer than twenty cigarettes. All cigarettes must be
sold in ((the)) original unopened packages or containers
to which the stamps required by RCW 82.24.060 have been affixed.

(2)
This section does not apply to the sale of loose leaf tobacco by a retail
business that generates a minimum of sixty percent of annual gross sales from
the sale of tobacco products.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.155.050 and 1993 c 507 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may engage in the business of sampling tobacco products within
the state unless licensed to do so by the board. If a firm contracts with a
manufacturer to distribute samples of the manufacturer's products, that firm is
deemed to be the person engaged in the business of sampling.

(2)
The board shall issue a license to a sampler not otherwise disqualified by RCW
70.155.100 upon application and payment of the fee.

(3)
A sampler's license expires on the thirtieth day of June of each year and must
be renewed annually upon payment of the appropriate fee.

(4)
The board shall annually determine the fee for a sampler's license and each
renewal. However, the fee for a manufacturer whose employees distribute
samples within the state is five hundred dollars per annum, and the fee for all
other samplers must be not less than fifty dollars per annum.

(5)
A sampler's license entitles the licensee, and employees or agents of the
licensee, to distribute samples at any lawful location in the state during the
term of the license. A person engaged in sampling under the license shall carry
the license or a copy at all times.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.155.100 and 1998 c 133 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The liquor control board may suspend or revoke a retailer's license held by a
business at any location, or may impose a monetary penalty as set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, if the liquor control board finds that the
licensee has violated RCW 26.28.080, 70.155.020, 70.155.030, 70.155.040,
70.155.050, 70.155.060, 70.155.070, or 70.155.090.

(2)
The sanctions that the liquor control board may impose against a person
licensed under RCW 82.24.530 and 70.155.050 and 70.155.060 based upon one or
more findings under subsection (1) of this section may not exceed the
following:

(a)
For violation of RCW 26.28.080 or 70.155.020:

(i)
A monetary penalty of one hundred dollars for the first violation within any
two-year period;

(ii)
A monetary penalty of three hundred dollars for the second violation within any
two-year period;

(iii)
A monetary penalty of one thousand dollars and suspension of the license for a
period of six months for the third violation within any two-year period;

(iv)
A monetary penalty of one thousand five hundred dollars and suspension of the
license for a period of twelve months for the fourth violation within any
two-year period;

(v)
Revocation of the license with no possibility of reinstatement for a period of
five years for the fifth or more violation within any two-year period;

(b)
For violations of RCW 70.155.030, a monetary penalty in the amount of one
hundred dollars for each day upon which such violation occurred;

(c)
For violations of RCW 70.155.040 occurring on the licensed premises:

(i)
A monetary penalty of one hundred dollars for the first violation within any
two-year period;

(ii)
A monetary penalty of three hundred dollars for the second violation within any
two-year period;

(iii)
A monetary penalty of one thousand dollars and suspension of the license for a
period of six months for the third violation within any two-year period;

(iv)
A monetary penalty of one thousand five hundred dollars and suspension of the
license for a period of twelve months for the fourth violation within any
two-year period;

(v)
Revocation of the license with no possibility of reinstatement for a period of
five years for the fifth or more violation within any two-year period;

(d)
For violations of RCW 70.155.050 and 70.155.060, a monetary penalty in the
amount of three hundred dollars for each violation;

(e)
For violations of RCW 70.155.070, a monetary penalty in the amount of one
thousand dollars for each violation.

(3)
The liquor control board may impose a monetary penalty upon any person other
than a licensed cigarette retailer or licensed sampler if the liquor control
board finds that the person has violated RCW 26.28.080, 70.155.020, 70.155.030,
70.155.040, 70.155.050, 70.155.060, 70.155.070, or 70.155.090.

(4)
The monetary penalty that the liquor control board may impose based upon one or
more findings under subsection (3) of this section may not exceed the
following:

(a)
For violation of RCW 26.28.080 or 70.155.020, fifty dollars for the first
violation and one hundred dollars for each subsequent violation;

(b)
For violations of RCW 70.155.030, one hundred dollars for each day upon which
such violation occurred;

(c)
For violations of RCW 70.155.040, one hundred dollars for each violation;

(d)
For violations of RCW 70.155.050 and 70.155.060, three hundred dollars for each
violation;

(e)
For violations of RCW 70.155.070, one thousand dollars for each violation.

(5)
The liquor control board may impose sanctions against a person licensed under
RCW 82.24.510(1)(b) or 82.24.530 for violations of rules under this chapter and
for which a statutory penalty is not proscribed.

(6)
The liquor control board may develop and offer a class for retail clerks and
use this class in lieu of a monetary penalty for the clerk's first violation.

(((6)))
(7) The liquor control board may issue a cease and desist order to any
person who is found by the liquor control board to have violated or intending
to violate the provisions of this chapter, RCW 26.28.080 or 82.24.500,
requiring such person to cease specified conduct that is in violation. The
issuance of a cease and desist order shall not preclude the imposition of other
sanctions authorized by this statute or any other provision of law.

(((7)))
(8) The liquor control board may seek injunctive relief to enforce the
provisions of RCW 26.28.080 or 82.24.500 or this chapter. The liquor control
board may initiate legal action to collect civil penalties imposed under this
chapter if the same have not been paid within thirty days after imposition of
such penalties. In any action filed by the liquor control board under this
chapter, the court may, in addition to any other relief, award the liquor
control board reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(((8)))
(9) All proceedings under subsections (1) through (((6))) (5)
and (7) of this section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.

(((9)))
(10) The liquor control board may reduce or waive either the penalties
or the suspension or revocation of a license, or both, as set forth in this
chapter where the elements of proof are inadequate or where there are
mitigating circumstances. Mitigating circumstances may include, but are not
limited to, an exercise of due diligence by a retailer. Further, the board may
exceed penalties set forth in this chapter based on aggravating circumstances.

Sec.
7. RCW
70.155.110 and 1993 c 507 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The liquor control board shall, in addition to the board's other powers and
authorities, have the authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter and
RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500. The liquor control board shall have
full power to revoke or suspend the license of any retailer or wholesaler in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 70.155.100.

(2)
The liquor control board and the board's authorized agents or employees shall
have full power and authority to enter any place of business where tobacco
products are sold for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(3)
For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and RCW 26.28.080(((4)))
and 82.24.500, a peace officer or enforcement officer of the liquor control
board who has reasonable grounds to believe a person observed by the officer
purchasing, attempting to purchase, or in possession of tobacco products is
under the age of eighteen years of age, may detain such person for a reasonable
period of time and in such a reasonable manner as is necessary to determine the
person's true identity and date of birth. Further, tobacco products possessed
by persons under the age of eighteen years of age are considered contraband and
may be seized by a peace officer or enforcement officer of the liquor control
board.

(4)
The liquor control board may work with local county health departments or
districts and local law enforcement agencies to conduct random, unannounced,
inspections to assure compliance.

(5)
The liquor control board is authorized under chapter ..., Laws of 1999 (this
act) to adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter and RCW 26.28.080
relating to the enforcement of provisions regarding distribution of tobacco
products, especially relating to minors.

(6)
No person may knowingly or willfully resist or oppose any state, county, or
municipal peace officer, or liquor enforcement officer, in the discharge of his
or her duties under this chapter, or aid and abet such resistance or
opposition. A violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
8. RCW
70.155.130 and 1993 c 507 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

((This
chapter preempts political subdivisions from adopting or enforcing requirements
for the licensure and regulation of tobacco product promotions and sales within
retail stores, except that political subdivisions that have adopted ordinances
prohibiting sampling by January 1, 1993, may continue to enforce these
ordinances. No political subdivision may: (1) Impose fees or license
requirements on retail businesses for possessing or selling cigarettes or
tobacco products, other than general business taxes or license fees not
primarily levied on tobacco products; or (2) regulate or prohibit activities
covered by RCW 70.155.020 through 70.155.080.)) Except as provided in
this section, this chapter does not ((otherwise preempt political
subdivisions from adopting ordinances regulating the sale, purchase, use, or
promotion of tobacco products not inconsistent with chapter 507, Laws of 1993))
supersede or preempt any local laws or ordinances regarding the same subject
matter. No political subdivision may: (1) Adopt or enforce license
requirements for retail businesses that sell tobacco products; or (2) impose
fees or license requirements on retail businesses for possessing or selling
tobacco products, other than general business taxes or license fees not
primarily levied on tobacco products.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 70.155 RCW to read as follows:

No
tobacco manufacturer, wholesaler, or agent thereof, may pay the monetary
penalty of a tobacco retailer licensed under Title 82 RCW, nor may a tobacco
retailer licensed under Title 82 RCW accept moneys for payment of a monetary
penalty from a tobacco manufacturer, wholesaler, or agent thereof. A violation
of this section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by a minimum fine of two
thousand five hundred dollars for the first offense and five thousand dollars
for each offense thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---