BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

TITLE
75

Amendments

Sec.
1. RCW
75.08.012 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Wildlife,
fish, and shellfish are the property of the state. The commission, director,
and the department shall preserve, protect, perpetuate and manage the ((food))
fish and shellfish in state waters and offshore waters.

The
department shall conserve the ((food)) fish and shellfish resources in a
manner that does not impair the resource. In a manner consistent with this
goal, the department shall seek to maintain the economic well-being and
stability of the fishing industry in the state. The department shall promote
orderly fisheries and shall enhance and improve recreational and commercial
fishing in this state.

The
commission may authorize the taking of wildlife, fish, and shellfish only at
times or places, or in manners or quantities as in the judgment of the
commission maximizes public recreational opportunities without impairing the
supply of these resources. The commission shall attempt to maximize the public
recreational fishing and hunting opportunities of all citizens, including
juvenile, handicapped, and senior citizens.

Recognizing
that the management of our state fish, wildlife, and shellfish resources depends
heavily on the assistance of volunteers, the department shall work
cooperatively with volunteer groups and individuals to achieve the goals of
this title to the greatest extent possible.

Nothing
in this title shall be construed to infringe on the right of a private property
owner to control the owner's private property.

Sec.
2. RCW
75.08.020 and 1988 c 36 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall investigate the habits, supply, and economic use of food
fish and shellfish in state and offshore waters.

(2)
The director shall make an annual report to the governor on the operation of
the department and the statistics of the fishing industry.

(3)
Subject to RCW 40.07.040, the director shall provide a comprehensive biennial
report of all departmental operations to the chairs of the committees on
natural resources ((and ways and means)) of the senate and house of
representatives, the senate ways and means committee, and the house of
representatives appropriations committee, including one copy to the staff
of each of the committees, to reflect the previous fiscal period. The format
of the report shall be similar to reports issued by the department from
1964-1970 and the report shall include, but not be limited to, descriptions of
all department activities including: Revenues generated, program costs,
capital expenditures, personnel, special projects, new and ongoing research,
environmental controls, cooperative projects, intergovernmental agreements, and
outlines of ongoing litigation, recent court decisions and orders on major
issues with the potential for state liability. The report shall describe the
status of the resource and its recreational, commercial, and tribal
utilization. The report ((shall be given to the house and senate committees
on ways and means and the house and senate committees on natural resources and))
shall be made available to the public.

Sec.
3. RCW
75.08.045 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((commission)) director may accept money or real property from
persons under conditions requiring the use of the property or money for the
protection, rehabilitation, preservation, or conservation of the state wildlife,
food fish, and shellfish resources, or in settlement of claims for
damages to wildlife, food fish, and shellfish resources. The ((commission))
director shall only accept real property useful for the protection,
rehabilitation, preservation, or conservation of these fisheries resources.

Sec.
4. RCW
75.08.055 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may enter into agreements with and receive funds from the United
States for the construction, maintenance, and operation of fish cultural
stations, laboratories, and devices in the Columbia River basin for improvement
of feeding and spawning conditions for fish, for the protection of migratory
fish from irrigation projects and for facilitating free migration of fish over
obstructions.

(2)
The ((commission)) director and the department may acquire by
gift, purchase, lease, easement, or condemnation the use of lands where the
construction or improvement is to be carried on by the United States.

Sec.
5. RCW
75.08.080 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may adopt, amend, or repeal rules as follows:

(a)
Specifying the times when the taking of wildlife, food fish, or
shellfish is lawful or unlawful.

(b)
Specifying the areas and waters in which the taking and possession of wildlife,
food fish, or shellfish is lawful or unlawful.

(c)
Specifying and defining the gear, appliances, or other equipment and methods
that may be used to take wildlife, food fish, or shellfish, and
specifying the times, places, and manner in which the equipment may be used or
possessed.

(d)
Regulating the possession, disposal, landing, and sale of wildlife, food
fish, or shellfish within the state, whether acquired within or without
the state.

(e)
Regulating the prevention and suppression of diseases and pests affecting wildlife,
food fish, or shellfish.

(f)
Regulating the size, sex, species, and quantities of wildlife, food fish,
or shellfish that may be taken, possessed, sold, or disposed of.

(g)
Specifying the statistical and biological reports required from fishermen,
dealers, boathouses, or processors of wildlife, food fish, or
shellfish.

(h)
Classifying species of marine and freshwater life as wildlife, food fish,
or shellfish.

(i)
Classifying the species of wildlife, food fish, and shellfish
that may be used for purposes other than human consumption.

(j)
Other rules necessary to carry out this title and the purposes and duties of
the department.

(2)
Subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this section do not apply to
private tideland owners and lessees and the immediate family members of the
owners or lessees of state tidelands, when they take or possess oysters, clams,
cockles, borers, or mussels, excluding razor clams, produced on their own
private tidelands or their leased state tidelands for personal use.

"Immediate
family member" for the purposes of this section means a spouse, brother,
sister, grandparent, parent, child, or grandchild.

(3)
Except for subsection (1)(g) of this section, this section does not apply to
private sector cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.
Subsection (1)(g) of this section does apply to such products.

Sec.
6. RCW
75.08.206 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall provide compensation insurance for fisheries patrol officers,
insuring these employees against injury or death in the performance of
enforcement duties not covered under the workers' compensation act of the
state. The beneficiaries and the compensation and benefits under the
compensation insurance shall be the same as provided in chapter 51.32 RCW, and
the compensation insurance also shall provide for medical aid and
hospitalization to the extent and amount as provided in RCW 51.36.010 and
51.36.020.

The
recodification of this section into Title 77 RCW does not make any current or
former employees eligible for compensation or benefits under this section who
were not otherwise eligible under this section before the recodification.

Sec.
7. RCW
75.08.208 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall relieve from active duty fisheries patrol officers who are
injured in the performance of their official duties to such an extent as to be
incapable of active service. While relieved from active duty, the employees
shall receive one-half of their salary less any compensation received through
the provisions of RCW 41.40.200, 41.40.220, and 75.08.206.

The
recodification of this section into Title 77 RCW does not make any current or
former employees eligible for compensation or benefits under this section who
were not otherwise eligible under this section before the recodification.

Sec.
8. RCW
75.08.230 and 1996 c 267 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in this ((section)) title, state and county
officers receiving the following moneys shall deposit them in the state general
fund:

(a)
The sale of commercial licenses required under this title, except for
licenses issued under chapter 77.32 RCW; and

(b)
((The sale of property seized or confiscated under this title;

(c)
Fines and forfeitures collected under this title;

(d)
The sale of real or personal property held for department purposes;

(e)
Rentals or concessions of the department;

(f)))
Moneys received for damages to food fish, shellfish or department property((;
and

(g)
Gifts)).

(2)
The director shall make weekly remittances to the state treasurer of moneys
collected by the department.

(3)
All fines and forfeitures collected or assessed by a district court for a
violation of this title or rule of the department shall be remitted as provided
in chapter 3.62 RCW.

(4)
Proceeds from the sale of food fish or shellfish taken in test fishing conducted
by the department, to the extent that these proceeds exceed the estimates in
the budget approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated
receipts under RCW 43.79.270 to reimburse the department for unanticipated
costs for test fishing operations in excess of the allowance in the budget
approved by the legislature.

(5)
Proceeds from the sale of salmon carcasses and salmon eggs from state general
funded hatcheries by the department of general administration shall be
deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement group account established in
RCW 75.50.100 (as recodified by this act).

(6)
Moneys received by the commission under RCW 75.08.045 (as recodified by this
act), to the extent these moneys exceed estimates in the budget approved by
the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under RCW
43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for the
specific purpose for which the moneys were received, unless the moneys were
received in settlement of a claim for damages to food fish or shellfish, in
which case the moneys may be expended for the conservation of these resources.

(7)
Proceeds from the sale of herring spawn on kelp fishery licenses by the
department, to the extent those proceeds exceed estimates in the budget
approved by the legislature, may be allocated as unanticipated receipts under
RCW 43.79.270. Allocations under this subsection shall be made only for
herring management, enhancement, and enforcement.

Sec.
9. RCW
75.08.245 and 1988 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may supply, at a reasonable charge, surplus salmon eggs to a person
for use in the cultivation of salmon. The department shall not intentionally
create a surplus of salmon to provide eggs for sale. The department shall only
sell salmon eggs from stocks that are not suitable for salmon population
rehabilitation or enhancement in state waters in Washington. All sales or
transfers shall be consistent with the department's egg transfer and
aquaculture disease control regulations as now existing or hereafter amended.
Prior to department determination that eggs of a salmon stock are surplus and
available for sale, the department shall assess the productivity of each
watershed that is suitable for receiving eggs.

((The
salmon enhancement advisory council, created in RCW 75.48.120, shall consider
egg sales at each meeting.))

Sec.
10. RCW
75.10.150 and 1996 c 267 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Since
violation of the rules of the department relating to the accounting of the
commercial harvest of food fish and shellfish result in damage to the resources
of the state, liability for damage to food fish and shellfish resources is
imposed on a wholesale fish dealer for violation of a provision in chapter
75.28 RCW (as recodified by this act) or a rule of the department
related to the accounting of the commercial harvest of food fish and shellfish
and shall be for the actual damages or for damages imposed as follows:

(1)
For violation of rules requiring the timely presentation to the department of
documents relating to the accounting of commercial harvest, fifty dollars for
each of the first fifteen documents in a series and ten dollars for each
subsequent document in the same series. If documents relating to the
accounting of commercial harvest of food fish and shellfish are lost or
destroyed and the wholesale dealer notifies the department in writing within
seven days of the loss or destruction, the director shall waive the requirement
for timely presentation of the documents.

(2)
For violation of rules requiring accurate and legible information relating to
species, value, harvest area, or amount of harvest, twenty-five dollars for
each of the first five violations of this subsection following July 28, 1985,
and fifty dollars for each violation after the first five violations.

(3)
For violations of rules requiring certain signatures, fifty dollars for each of
the first two violations and one hundred dollars for each subsequent
violation. For the purposes of this subsection, each signature is a separate
requirement.

(4)
For other violations of rules relating to the accounting of the commercial
harvest, fifty dollars for each separate violation.

Sec.
11. RCW
75.12.230 and 1998 c 190 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

Within the waters described in RCW 75.12.210 (as recodified by
this act), a person shall not transport or possess salmon on board a vessel
carrying fishing gear of a type other than troll lines or angling gear, unless
accompanied by a certificate issued by a state or country showing that the
salmon have been lawfully taken within the territorial waters of the state or
country.

Sec.
12. RCW
75.20.040 and 1998 c 190 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

A
diversion device used for conducting water from a lake, river, or stream for
any purpose shall be equipped at or near its intake with a fish guard
approved by the director to prevent the passage of fish into the diversion
device. A person shall not divert water from a lake, river, or stream
unless the diversion device is equipped with the fish guard. The fish
guard shall be maintained at all times when water is taken into the diversion
device. The fish guards shall be installed at places and times prescribed by
the director upon thirty days' notice to the owner of the diversion device.

((Each
day the diversion device is not equipped with an approved fish guard is a
separate offense.)) If within thirty days after notice to equip a
diversion device the owner fails to do so, the director may take possession of
the diversion device and close the device until it is properly equipped.
Expenses incurred by the department constitute the value of a lien upon the
diversion device and upon the real and personal property of the owner. Notice
of the lien shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county auditor of
the county in which the action is taken.

Sec.
13. RCW
75.20.061 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the director determines that a fishway or fish guard described in RCW 75.20.040
and 75.20.060 (as recodified by this act) and in existence on September
1, 1963, is inadequate, in addition to other authority granted in this chapter,
the director may remove, relocate, reconstruct, or modify the device, without
cost to the owner. The director shall not materially modify the amount of flow
of water through the device. After the department has completed the
improvements, the fishways and fish guards shall be operated and maintained at
the expense of the owner in accordance with RCW 75.20.040 and 75.20.060 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec.
14. RCW
75.20.098 and 1997 c 424 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

When
reviewing a mitigation plan under RCW 75.20.100 or 75.20.103 (as recodified
by this act), the department shall, at the request of the project
proponent, follow the guidance contained in RCW 90.74.005 through 90.74.030.

Sec.
15. RCW
75.20.100 and 1998 c 190 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the event that any person or government agency desires to construct any form
of hydraulic project or perform other work that will use, divert, obstruct, or
change the natural flow or bed of any of the salt or fresh waters of the state,
such person or government agency shall, before commencing construction or work
thereon and to ensure the proper protection of fish life, secure the approval
of the department as to the adequacy of the means proposed for the protection
of fish life. This approval shall not be unreasonably withheld.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in RCW 75.20.1001 (as recodified by this act), the
department shall grant or deny approval of a standard permit within forty-five
calendar days of the receipt of a complete application and notice of compliance
with any applicable requirements of the state environmental policy act, made in
the manner prescribed in this section.

(b)
The applicant may document receipt of application by filing in person or by
registered mail. A complete application for approval shall contain general
plans for the overall project, complete plans and specifications of the
proposed construction or work within the mean higher high water line in salt
water or within the ordinary high water line in fresh water, and complete plans
and specifications for the proper protection of fish life.

(c)
The forty-five day requirement shall be suspended if:

(i)
After ten working days of receipt of the application, the applicant remains
unavailable or unable to arrange for a timely field evaluation of the proposed
project;

(ii)
The site is physically inaccessible for inspection; or

(iii)
The applicant requests delay. Immediately upon determination that the
forty-five day period is suspended, the department shall notify the applicant
in writing of the reasons for the delay.

(d)
For purposes of this section, "standard permit" means a written
permit issued by the department when the conditions under subsections (3) and
(5)(b) of this section are not met.

(3)(a)
The department may issue an expedited written permit in those instances where
normal permit processing would result in significant hardship for the applicant
or unacceptable damage to the environment. In cases of imminent danger, the
department shall issue an expedited written permit, upon request, for work to
repair existing structures, move obstructions, restore banks, protect property,
or protect fish resources. Expedited permit requests require a complete
written application as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section and shall
be issued within fifteen calendar days of the receipt of a complete written
application. Approval of an expedited permit is valid for up to sixty days
from the date of issuance.

(b)
For the purposes of this subsection, "imminent danger" means a threat
by weather, water flow, or other natural conditions that is likely to occur
within sixty days of a request for a permit application.

(c)
The department may not require the provisions of the state environmental policy
act, chapter 43.21C RCW, to be met as a condition of issuing a permit under
this subsection.

(d)
The department or the county legislative authority may determine if an imminent
danger exists. The county legislative authority shall notify the department,
in writing, if it determines that an imminent danger exists.

(4)
Approval of a standard permit is valid for a period of up to five years from
date of issuance. The permittee must demonstrate substantial progress on
construction of that portion of the project relating to the approval within two
years of the date of issuance. If the department denies approval, the
department shall provide the applicant, in writing, a statement of the specific
reasons why and how the proposed project would adversely affect fish life.
Protection of fish life shall be the only ground upon which approval may be
denied or conditioned. Chapter 34.05 RCW applies to any denial of project
approval, conditional approval, or requirements for project modification upon
which approval may be contingent.

(5)(a)
In case of an emergency arising from weather or stream flow conditions or other
natural conditions, the department, through its authorized representatives,
shall issue immediately, upon request, oral approval for removing any
obstructions, repairing existing structures, restoring stream banks, or to
protect property threatened by the stream or a change in the stream flow
without the necessity of obtaining a written approval prior to commencing
work. Conditions of an oral approval to protect fish life shall be established
by the department and reduced to writing within thirty days and complied with
as provided for in this section. Oral approval shall be granted immediately,
upon request, for a stream crossing during an emergency situation.

(b)
For purposes of this section and RCW 75.20.103 (as recodified by this act),
"emergency" means an immediate threat to life, the public, property,
or of environmental degradation.

(c)
The department or the county legislative authority may declare and continue an
emergency when one or more of the criteria under (b) of this subsection are
met. The county legislative authority shall immediately notify the department
if it declares an emergency under this subsection.

(6)
The department shall, at the request of a county, develop five-year maintenance
approval agreements, consistent with comprehensive flood control management plans
adopted under the authority of RCW 86.12.200, or other watershed plan approved
by a county legislative authority, to allow for work on public and private
property for bank stabilization, bridge repair, removal of sand bars and
debris, channel maintenance, and other flood damage repair and reduction
activity under agreed-upon conditions and times without obtaining permits for
specific projects.

(7)
This section shall not apply to the construction of any form of hydraulic
project or other work which diverts water for agricultural irrigation or stock
watering purposes authorized under or recognized as being valid by the state's
water codes, or when such hydraulic project or other work is associated with
streambank stabilization to protect farm and agricultural land as defined in
RCW 84.34.020. These irrigation or stock watering diversion and streambank
stabilization projects shall be governed by RCW 75.20.103 (as recodified by
this act).

A
landscape management plan approved by the department and the department of
natural resources under RCW 76.09.350(2), shall serve as a hydraulic project
approval for the life of the plan if fish are selected as one of the public
resources for coverage under such a plan.

(8)
For the purposes of this section and RCW 75.20.103 (as recodified by this
act), "bed" means the land below the ordinary high water lines of
state waters. This definition does not include irrigation ditches, canals,
storm water run-off devices, or other artificial watercourses except where they
exist in a natural watercourse that has been altered by man.

(9)
The phrase "to construct any form of hydraulic project or perform other
work" does not include the act of driving across an established ford.
Driving across streams or on wetted stream beds at areas other than established
fords requires approval. Work within the ordinary high water line of state
waters to construct or repair a ford or crossing requires approval.

Sec.
16. RCW
75.20.1001 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall process hydraulic project applications submitted under RCW
75.20.100 or 75.20.103 (as recodified by this act) within thirty days of
receipt of the application. This requirement is only applicable for the repair
and reconstruction of legally constructed dikes, seawalls, and other flood
control structures damaged as a result of flooding or windstorms that occurred
in November and December 1990.

Sec.
17. RCW
75.20.104 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the placement of woody debris is required as a condition of a hydraulic permit
approval issued pursuant to RCW 75.20.100 or 75.20.103 (as recodified by
this act), the department, upon request, shall invite comment regarding
that placement from the local governmental authority, affected tribes, affected
federal and state agencies, and the project applicant.

Sec.
18. RCW
75.20.1041 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department and the department of ecology will work cooperatively with the
United States army corps of engineers to develop a memorandum of agreement
outlining dike vegetation management guidelines so that dike owners are
eligible for coverage under P.L. 84‑99, and state requirements
established pursuant to RCW 75.20.100 and 75.20.103 (as recodified by this
act) are met.

Sec.
19. RCW
75.20.106 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may levy civil penalties of up to one hundred dollars per day for
violation of any provisions of RCW 75.20.100 or 75.20.103 (as recodified by
this act). The penalty provided shall be imposed by notice in writing,
either by certified mail or personal service to the person incurring the
penalty, from the director or the director's designee describing the
violation. Any person incurring any penalty under this chapter may appeal the
same under chapter 34.05 RCW to the director. Appeals shall be filed within
thirty days of receipt of notice imposing any penalty. The penalty imposed
shall become due and payable thirty days after receipt of a notice imposing the
penalty unless an appeal is filed. Whenever an appeal of any penalty incurred
under this chapter is filed, the penalty shall become due and payable only upon
completion of all review proceedings and the issuance of a final order
confirming the penalty in whole or in part.

If
the amount of any penalty is not paid within thirty days after it becomes due
and payable the attorney general, upon the request of the director shall bring
an action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of
Thurston county or of any county in which such violator may do business, to
recover such penalty. In all such actions the procedure and rules of evidence
shall be the same as an ordinary civil action. All penalties recovered under
this section shall be paid into the state's general fund.

Sec.
20. RCW
75.20.130 and 1996 c 276 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created within the environmental hearings office under RCW
43.21B.005 the hydraulic appeals board of the state of Washington.

(2)
The hydraulic appeals board shall consist of three members: The director of
the department of ecology or the director's designee, the director of the
department of agriculture or the director's designee, and the director or the
director's designee of the department whose action is appealed under subsection
(6) of this section. A decision must be agreed to by at least two members of
the board to be final.

(3)
The board may adopt rules necessary for the conduct of its powers and duties or
for transacting other official business.

(4)
The board shall make findings of fact and prepare a written decision in each
case decided by it, and that finding and decision shall be effective upon being
signed by two or more board members and upon being filed at the hydraulic
appeals board's principal office, and shall be open to public inspection at all
reasonable times.

(5)
The board has exclusive jurisdiction to hear appeals arising from the approval,
denial, conditioning, or modification of a hydraulic approval issued by the
department: (a) Under the authority granted in RCW 75.20.103 (as recodified
by this act) for the diversion of water for agricultural irrigation or
stock watering purposes or when associated with streambank stabilization to
protect farm and agricultural land as defined in RCW 84.34.020; or (b) under
the authority granted in RCW 75.20.190 (as recodified by this act) for
off-site mitigation proposals.

(6)(a)
Any person aggrieved by the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of
a hydraulic approval pursuant to RCW 75.20.103 (as recodified by this act)
may seek review from the board by filing a request for the same within thirty
days of notice of the approval, denial, conditioning, or modification of such
approval.

(b)
The review proceedings authorized in (a) of this subsection are subject to the
provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures in adjudicative
proceedings.

Sec.
21. RCW
75.20.320 and 1995 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may not require mitigation for adverse impacts on fish life or
habitat that occurred at the time a wetland was filled, if the wetland was
filled under the provisions of RCW 75.20.300 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
22. RCW
75.24.060 and 1998 c 245 s 152 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the policy of the state to improve state oyster reserves so that they are
productive and yield a revenue sufficient for their maintenance. In fixing the
price of oysters and other shellfish sold from the reserves, the director shall
take into consideration this policy. It is also the policy of the state to
maintain the oyster reserves to furnish shellfish to growers and processors and
to stock public beaches.

Shellfish
may be harvested from state oyster reserves for personal use as prescribed by
rule of the director.

The
((department)) director shall periodically inventory the state
oyster reserves and assign the reserve lands into management categories:

(1)
Native Olympia oyster broodstock reserves;

(2)
Commercial shellfish harvesting zones;

(3)
Commercial shellfish propagation zones designated for long-term leasing to
private aquaculturists;

(4)
Public recreational shellfish harvesting zones;

(5)
Unproductive land.

The
((department)) director shall manage each category of oyster
reserve land to maximize the sustained yield production of shellfish consistent
with the purpose for establishment of each management category.

The
((department)) commission shall develop an oyster reserve
management plan, to include recommendations for leasing reserve lands, in
coordination with the shellfish industry, by January 1, 1986.

The
director shall protect, reseed, improve the habitat of, and replant state
oyster reserves ((and)). The director shall also issue cultch
permits and oyster reserve fishery licenses.

Sec.
23. RCW
75.24.065 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that current environmental and economic conditions warrant a
renewal of the state's historical practice of actively cultivating and managing
its oyster reserves in Puget Sound to produce the state's native oyster, the
Olympia oyster. The ((department)) director shall reestablish
dike cultivated production of Olympia oysters on such reserves on a trial basis
as a tool for planning more comprehensive cultivation by the state.

Sec.
24. RCW
75.24.070 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall determine the time, place, and method of sale of oysters and
other shellfish from state oyster reserves. Any person who commercially
takes shellfish from state oyster reserves must possess an oyster reserve
fishery license issued by the director pursuant to RCW 75.28.290 (as recodified
by this act). Any person engaged in the commercial cultching of oysters on
state oyster reserves must possess an oyster cultch permit issued by the
director pursuant to RCW 75.28.295 (as recodified by this act).

To
maintain local communities and industries and to restrain the formation of
monopolies in the industry, the director shall determine the number of bushels
which shall be sold to a person. When the shellfish are sold at public
auction, the director may reject any and all bids.

Sec.
25. RCW
75.24.100 and 1998 c 190 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((department)) director may not authorize a person to take
geoduck clams for commercial purposes outside the harvest area designated in a
current department of natural resources geoduck harvesting agreement issued
under RCW 79.96.080. The ((department)) director may not authorize
commercial harvest of geoduck clams from bottoms that are shallower than
eighteen feet below mean lower low water (0.0. ft.), or that lie in an area
bounded by the line of ordinary high tide (mean high tide) and a line two
hundred yards seaward from and parallel to the line of ordinary high tide.
This section does not apply to the harvest of private sector cultured aquatic
products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.

(2)
Commercial geoduck harvesting shall be done with a hand-held, manually operated
water jet or suction device guided and controlled from under water by a diver.
Periodically, the ((commission)) director shall determine the
effect of each type or unit of gear upon the geoduck population or the
substrate they inhabit. The ((commission)) director may require
modification of the gear or stop its use if it is being operated in a wasteful
or destructive manner or if its operation may cause permanent damage to the
bottom or adjacent shellfish populations.

Sec.
26. RCW
75.24.130 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may examine the clam, mussel, and oyster beds located on aquatic
lands belonging to the state and request the commissioner of public lands to
withdraw these lands from sale and lease for the purpose of establishing
reserves or public beaches. The ((commission)) director shall
conserve, protect, and develop these reserves and the oyster, shrimp, clam, and
mussel beds on state lands.

Sec.
27. RCW
75.25.092 and 1998 c 191 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for all persons other
than residents or nonresidents under fifteen years of age to fish for, take,
dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish for personal use from state waters or
offshore waters including national park beaches.

(2)
The fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses are:

(a)
For a resident fifteen years of age or older, seven dollars;

(b)
For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty dollars; and

(c)
For a senior, five dollars.

(3)
The personal use shellfish and seaweed license shall be visible on the licensee
while harvesting shellfish or seaweed.

Sec.
28. RCW
75.28.011 and 1997 c 418 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless otherwise provided in this title, a license issued under this chapter is
not transferable from the license holder to any other person.

(2)
The following restrictions apply to transfers of commercial fishery licenses,
salmon delivery licenses, and salmon charter licenses that are transferable
between license holders:

(a)
The license holder shall surrender the previously issued license to the
department.

(b)
The department shall complete no more than one transfer of the license in any
seven-day period.

(c)
The fee to transfer a license from one license holder to another is:

(i)
The same as the resident license renewal fee if the license is not limited
under chapter 75.30 RCW (as recodified by this act);

(ii)
Three and one-half times the resident renewal fee if the license is not a
commercial salmon license and the license is limited under chapter 75.30 RCW (as
recodified by this act);

(iii)
Fifty dollars if the license is a commercial salmon license and is limited
under chapter 75.30 RCW (as recodified by this act);

(iv)
Five hundred dollars if the license is a Dungeness crab-coastal fishery
license; or

(v)
If a license is transferred from a resident to a nonresident, an additional fee
is assessed that is equal to the difference between the resident and
nonresident license fees at the time of transfer, to be paid by the transferee.

(3)
A commercial license that is transferable under this title survives the death
of the holder. Though such licenses are not personal property, they shall be
treated as analogous to personal property for purposes of inheritance and
intestacy. Such licenses are subject to state laws governing wills, trusts,
estates, intestate succession, and community property, except that such
licenses are exempt from claims of creditors of the estate and tax liens. The
surviving spouse, estate, or beneficiary of the estate may apply for a renewal
of the license. There is no fee for transfer of a license from a license
holder to the license holder's surviving spouse or estate, or to a beneficiary
of the estate.

Sec.
29. RCW
75.28.020 and 1994 c 244 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person ((as defined in RCW
75.08.011)) may hold a commercial license established by this chapter.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in this title, an individual may hold a commercial
license only if the individual is sixteen years of age or older and a bona fide
resident of the United States.

(3)
A corporation may hold a commercial license only if it is authorized to do
business in this state.

(4)
No person may hold a limited-entry license unless the person meets the
qualifications that this title establishes for the license.

(5)
The residency requirements in subsection (2) of this section do not apply to
holders of nonsalmon delivery licenses.

Sec.
30. RCW
75.28.034 and 1995 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If,
for any reason, the department does not allow any opportunity for a commercial
fishery during a calendar year, the ((department)) director shall
either: (1) Waive the requirement to obtain a license for that commercial
fishery for that year; or (2) refund applicable license fees upon return of the
license.

Sec.
31. RCW
75.28.042 and 1997 c 58 s 882 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order or a
residential or visitation order.

(2)
A listing on the department of licensing's data base that an individual's
license is currently suspended pursuant to RCW 46.20.291(((7))) (8)
shall be prima facie evidence that the individual is in noncompliance with a
support order ((or residential or visitation order)). Presentation of a
written release issued by the department of social and health services or a
court stating that the person is in compliance with an order shall serve as
proof of compliance.

Sec.
32. RCW
75.28.046 and 1998 c 267 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

This
section applies to all commercial fishery licenses and delivery licenses,
except for whiting‑-Puget Sound fishery licenses and emergency salmon
delivery licenses.

(1)
The license holder may engage in the activity authorized by a license subject
to this section. With the exception of Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery
class B licensees licensed under RCW 75.30.350(4) (as recodified by this
act), the holder of a license subject to this section may also designate up
to two alternate operators for the license. Dungeness crab‑-coastal
fishery class B licensees may not designate alternate operators. A person
designated as an alternate operator must possess an alternate operator license
issued under RCW 75.28.048 (as recodified by this act).

(2)
The fee to change the alternate operator designation is twenty-two dollars.

Sec.
33. RCW
75.28.047 and 1998 c 267 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Only the license holder and any alternate operators designated on the license
may sell or deliver food fish or shellfish under a commercial fishery license
or delivery license. A commercial fishery license or delivery license
authorizes no taking or delivery of food fish or shellfish unless the license
holder or an alternate operator designated on the license is present or aboard
the vessel.

(2)
Notwithstanding RCW 75.28.010(1)(c) (as recodified by this act), an
alternate operator license is not required for an individual to operate a
vessel as a charter boat.

Sec.
34. RCW
75.28.048 and 1998 c 267 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who holds a commercial fishery license or a delivery license may
operate the vessel designated on the license. A person who is not the license
holder may operate the vessel designated on the license only if:

(a)
The person holds an alternate operator license issued by the director; and

(b)
The person is designated as an alternate operator on the underlying commercial
fishery license or delivery license under RCW 75.28.046 (as recodified by
this act).

(2)
Only an individual at least sixteen years of age may hold an alternate operator
license.

(3)
No individual may hold more than one alternate operator license. An individual
who holds an alternate operator license may be designated as an alternate
operator on an unlimited number of commercial fishery licenses or delivery
licenses under RCW 75.28.046 (as recodified by this act).

(4)
An individual who holds two Dungeness crab‑-Puget Sound fishery licenses
may operate the licenses on one vessel if the vessel owner or alternate
operator is on the vessel. The department shall allow a license holder to
operate up to one hundred crab pots for each license.

(5)
As used in this section, to "operate" means to control the deployment
or removal of fishing gear from state waters while aboard a vessel or to
operate a vessel delivering food fish or shellfish taken in offshore waters to
a port within the state.

Sec.
35. RCW
75.28.055 and 1997 c 421 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((fish and wildlife commission)) director may, by rule, increase
the number of alternate operators beyond the level authorized by RCW 75.28.030
and 75.28.046 (as recodified by this act) for a commercial fishery
license, delivery license, or charter license.

Sec.
36. RCW
75.28.095 and 1998 c 190 s 95 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall issue the charter licenses and angler permits listed in this
section according to the requirements of this title. The licenses and permits
and their annual fees and surcharges are:

License
or Permit Annual Fee Governing

(RCW
75.50.100 Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(a) Nonsalmon charter $225 $375

(b) Salmon charter $380 $685 RCW 75.30.065

(as recodified by this act)

(plus $100) (plus $100)

(c) Salmon angler $ 0 $ 0 RCW 75.30.070

(as recodified by this act)

(d) Salmon roe $ 95 $ 95 RCW 75.28.690

(as recodified by this act)

(2)
A salmon charter license designating a vessel is required to operate a charter
boat to take salmon, other food fish, and shellfish. The director may issue a
salmon charter license only to a person who meets the qualifications of RCW
75.30.065 (as recodified by this act).

(3)
A nonsalmon charter license designating a vessel is required to operate a
charter boat to take food fish other than salmon and shellfish. As used in
this subsection, "food fish" does not include salmon.

(4)
"Charter boat" means a vessel from which persons may, for a fee, fish
for food fish or shellfish for personal use, and that brings food fish or
shellfish into state ports or brings food fish or shellfish taken from state
waters into United States ports. The director may specify by rule when a
vessel is a "charter boat" within this definition. "Charter
boat" does not mean a vessel used by a guide for clients fishing for food
fish for personal use in freshwater rivers, streams, and lakes, other than Lake
Washington or that part of the Columbia River below the bridge at Longview.

(5)
A charter boat licensed in Oregon may fish without a Washington charter license
under the same rules as Washington charter boat operators in ocean waters
within the jurisdiction of Washington state from the southern border of the
state of Washington to Leadbetter Point, as long as the Oregon vessel does not
land at any Washington port with the purpose of taking on or discharging
passengers. The provisions of this subsection shall be in effect as long as
the state of Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.

(6)
A salmon charter license under subsection (1)(b) of this section may be renewed
if the license holder notifies the department by May 1st of that year that he
or she will not participate in the fishery during that calendar year. The
license holder must pay the one hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge, plus a
fifteen-dollar handling charge, in order to be considered a valid renewal and
eligible to renew the license the following year.

Sec.
37. RCW
75.28.110 and 1997 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The following commercial salmon fishery licenses are required for the license
holder to use the specified gear to fish for salmon in state waters. Only a
person who meets the qualifications of RCW 75.30.120 (as recodified by this
act) may hold a license listed in this subsection. The licenses and their
annual fees and surcharges under RCW 75.50.100 (as recodified by this act)
are:

Fishery Resident Nonresident Surcharge

License Fee Fee

(a) Salmon Gill Net‑-Grays $380 $685 plus
$100

Harbor-Columbia river

(b) Salmon Gill Net‑-Puget $380 $685 plus $100

Sound

(c) Salmon Gill Net‑-Willapa $380 $685 plus $100

Bay-Columbia river

(d) Salmon purse seine $530 $985 plus $100

(e) Salmon reef net $380 $685 plus $100

(f) Salmon troll $380 $685 plus $100

(2)
A license issued under this section authorizes no taking or delivery of salmon
or other food fish unless a vessel is designated under RCW 75.28.045 (as recodified
by this act).

(3)
Holders of commercial salmon fishery licenses may retain incidentally caught
food fish other than salmon, subject to rules of the department.

(4)
A salmon troll license includes a salmon delivery license.

(5)
A salmon gill net license authorizes the taking of salmon only in the
geographical area for which the license is issued. The geographical
designations in subsection (1) of this section have the following meanings:

(a)
"Puget Sound" includes waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, Georgia
Strait, Puget Sound and all bays, inlets, canals, coves, sounds, and estuaries
lying easterly and southerly of the international boundary line and a line at
the entrance to the Strait of Juan de Fuca projected northerly from Cape
Flattery to the lighthouse on Tatoosh Island and then to Bonilla Point on
Vancouver Island.

(b)
"Grays Harbor-Columbia river" includes waters of Grays Harbor and
tributary estuaries lying easterly of a line projected northerly from Point
Chehalis Light to Point Brown and those waters of the Columbia river and
tributary sloughs and estuaries easterly of a line at the entrance to the
Columbia river projected southerly from the most westerly point of the North
jetty to the most westerly point of the South jetty.

(c)
"Willapa Bay-Columbia river" includes waters of Willapa Bay and
tributary estuaries and easterly of a line projected northerly from Leadbetter
Point to the Cape Shoalwater tower and those waters of the Columbia river and
tributary sloughs described in (b) of this subsection.

(6)
A commercial salmon troll fishery license may be renewed under this section if
the license holder notifies the department by May 1st of that year that he or
she will not participate in the fishery during that calendar year. A
commercial salmon gill net, reef net, or seine fishery license may be renewed
under this section if the license holder notifies the department by August 1st
of that year that he or she will not participate in the fishery during that
calendar year. The license holder must pay the one hundred-dollar enhancement
surcharge, plus a fifteen-dollar handling charge, in order to be considered a
valid renewal and eligible to renew the license the following year.

Sec.
38. RCW
75.28.113 and 1998 c 190 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A salmon delivery license is required to deliver salmon taken in offshore
waters to a place or port in the state. The annual fee for a salmon delivery
license is three hundred eighty dollars for residents and six hundred
eighty-five dollars for nonresidents. The annual surcharge under RCW 75.50.100
(as recodified by this act) is one hundred dollars for each license.
Holders of nonlimited entry delivery licenses issued under RCW 75.28.125 (as
recodified by this act) may apply the nonlimited entry delivery license fee
against the salmon delivery license fee.

(2)
Only a person who meets the qualifications established in RCW 75.30.120 (as
recodified by this act) may hold a salmon delivery license issued under
this section.

(3)
A salmon delivery license authorizes no taking of salmon or other food fish or
shellfish from the waters of the state.

(4)
If the director determines that the operation of a vessel under a salmon
delivery license results in the depletion or destruction of the state's salmon
resource or the delivery into this state of salmon products prohibited by law,
the director may revoke the license under the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
39. RCW
75.28.116 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person who does not qualify for a license under RCW 75.30.120 (as recodified
by this act) shall obtain a nontransferable emergency salmon delivery
license to make one delivery of salmon taken in offshore waters. The director
shall not issue an emergency salmon delivery license unless, as determined by
the director, a bona fide emergency exists. The license fee is two hundred
twenty-five dollars for residents and four hundred seventy-five dollars for
nonresidents. An applicant for an emergency salmon delivery license shall
designate no more than one vessel that will be used with the license.
Alternate operator licenses are not required of persons delivering salmon under
an emergency salmon delivery license. Emergency salmon delivery licenses are
not renewable.

Sec.
40. RCW
75.28.120 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required for food fish
fisheries and the annual fees for those licenses. As used in this section,
"food fish" does not include salmon. The director may issue a
limited-entry commercial fishery license only to a person who meets the
qualifications established in applicable governing sections of this title.

Fishery Annual
Fee Vessel Limited

(Governing
section(s)) Resident Nonresident Required? Entry?

(a)
Baitfish Lampara $185 $295 Yes No

(b) Baitfish purse seine $530 $985 Yes No

(c) Bottom fish jig $130 $185 Yes No

(d) Bottom fish pot $130 $185 Yes No

(e) Bottom fish troll $130 $185 Yes No

(f) Carp $130 $185 No No

(g) Columbia river smelt $380 $685 No No

(h) Dog fish set net $130 $185 Yes No

(i)
Emerging commercial $185 $295 Determined Determined

fishery
(RCW 75.30.220 by rule by rule

and
75.28.740 (as recodified

by this act))

(j) Food fish drag seine $130 $185 Yes No

(k) Food fish set line $130 $185 Yes No

(l)
Food fish trawl- $240 $405 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(m)
Food fish trawl- $185 $295 Yes No

Puget Sound

(n)
Herring dip bag net $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.140 (as

recodified by this act))

(o)
Herring drag seine $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.140 (as

recodified by this act))

(p)
Herring gill net $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.140 (as

recodified by this act))

(q)
Herring Lampara $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.140 (as

recodified by this act))

(r)
Herring purse seine $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.140 (as

recodified by this act))

(s)
Herring spawn-on-kelp N/A N/A Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.270 (as

recodified by this act))

(t)
Smelt dip bag net $130 $185 No No

(u)
Smelt gill net $380 $685 Yes No

(v)
Whiting-Puget Sound $295 $520 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.170 (as

recodified by this act))

(2)
The director may by rule determine the species of food fish that may be taken
with the commercial fishery licenses established in this section, the gear that
may be used with the licenses, and the areas or waters in which the licenses
may be used. Where a fishery license has been established for a particular
species, gear, geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general
fishery license may not be used to take food fish in that fishery.

Sec.
41. RCW
75.28.125 and 1998 c 190 s 97 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person may not use a
commercial fishing vessel to deliver food fish or shellfish taken in offshore
waters to a port in the state without a nonlimited entry delivery license. As
used in this section, "food fish" does not include salmon. As used
in this section, "shellfish" does not include ocean pink shrimp or
coastal crab. The annual license fee for a nonlimited entry delivery license
is one hundred ten dollars for residents and two hundred dollars for
nonresidents.

(2)
Holders of salmon troll fishery licenses issued under RCW 75.28.110 (as
recodified by this act), salmon delivery licenses issued under RCW
75.28.113 (as recodified by this act), crab pot fishery licenses issued
under RCW 75.28.130 (as recodified by this act), food fish trawl‑-Non-Puget
Sound fishery licenses issued under RCW 75.28.120 (as recodified by this
act), Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery licenses, ocean pink shrimp
delivery licenses, and shrimp trawl‑-Non-Puget Sound fishery licenses
issued under RCW 75.28.130 (as recodified by this act) may deliver food
fish or shellfish taken in offshore waters without a nonlimited entry delivery
license.

(3)
A nonlimited entry delivery license authorizes no taking of food fish or
shellfish from state waters.

Sec.
42. RCW
75.28.130 and 1994 c 260 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required for shellfish
fisheries and the annual fees for those licenses. The director may issue a
limited-entry commercial fishery license only to a person who meets the
qualifications established in applicable governing sections of this title.

Fishery Annual Fee Vessel Limited

(Governing section(s)) Resident Nonresident Required? Entry?

(a) Burrowing shrimp $185 $295 Yes No

(b)
Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(c)
Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Puget Sound

(d)
Dungeness crab- $295 $520 Yes Yes

coastal
(RCW 75.30.350

(as
recodified by this act))

(e)
Dungeness crab- $295 $520 Yes Yes

coastal,
class B

(RCW 75.30.350

(as
recodified by this act))

(f)
Dungeness crab- $130 $185 Yes Yes

Puget
Sound

(RCW
75.30.130

(as recodified by this act))

(g)
Emerging commercial $185 $295 Determined Determined

fishery
(RCW 75.30.220 by rule by rule

and
75.28.740 (as recodified

by this act))

(h)
Geoduck (RCW $ 0 $ 0 Yes Yes

75.30.280
(as recodified

by this act))

(i)
Hardshell clam $530 $985 Yes No

mechanical
harvester

(RCW
75.28.280 (as

recodified by this act))

(j)
Oyster reserve $130 $185 No No

(RCW
75.28.290

(as recodified by this act))

(k) Razor clam $130 $185 No No

(l)
Sea cucumber dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.250

(as recodified by this act))

(m)
Sea urchin dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW
75.30.210

(as recodified by this act))

(n) Shellfish dive $130 $185 Yes No

(o) Shellfish pot $130 $185 Yes No

(p)
Shrimp pot- $325 $575 Yes No

Hood Canal

(q)
Shrimp trawl- $240 $405 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(r)
Shrimp trawl- $185 $295 Yes No

Puget
Sound

(s) Squid $185 $295 Yes No

(2)
The director may by rule determine the species of shellfish that may be taken
with the commercial fishery licenses established in this section, the gear that
may be used with the licenses, and the areas or waters in which the licenses
may be used. Where a fishery license has been established for a particular
species, gear, geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general
fishery license may not be used to take shellfish in that fishery.

Sec.
43. RCW
75.28.132 and 1994 c 260 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

A
surcharge of fifty dollars shall be collected with each Dungeness crab-coastal
fishery license issued under RCW 75.28.130 (as recodified by this act)
until June 30, 2000, and with each Dungeness crab-coastal class B fishery
license issued under RCW 75.28.130 (as recodified by this act) until
December 31, 1997. Moneys collected under this section shall be placed in the
Dungeness crab appeals account hereby created in the state treasury. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for expenditures. Expenditures from the account
shall only be used for processing appeals related to the issuance of Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery licenses.

Sec.
44. RCW
75.28.133 and 1997 c 418 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A
surcharge of one hundred twenty dollars shall be collected with each Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery license and with each Dungeness crab-coastal class B
fishery license issued under RCW 75.28.130 (as recodified by this act).
Moneys collected under this section shall be placed in the coastal crab account
created under RCW 75.30.390 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
45. RCW
75.28.280 and 1993 c 340 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

A
hardshell clam mechanical harvester fishery license is required to operate a
mechanical or hydraulic device for commercially harvesting clams, other than
geoduck clams, unless the requirements of RCW 75.20.100 (as recodified by
this act) are fulfilled for the proposed activity.

Sec.
46. RCW
75.28.290 and 1993 c 340 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person who commercially takes shellfish from state oyster reserves under RCW
75.24.070 (as recodified by this act) must have an oyster reserve
fishery license.

Sec.
47. RCW
75.28.300 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

A
wholesale fish dealer's license is required for:

(1)
A business in the state to engage in the commercial processing of food fish or
shellfish, including custom canning or processing of personal use food fish or
shellfish.

(2)
A business in the state to engage in the wholesale selling, buying, or
brokering of food fish or shellfish. A wholesale fish dealer's license is not
required of those businesses which buy exclusively from Washington licensed
wholesale dealers and sell solely at retail.

(3)
Fishermen who land and sell their catch or harvest in the state to anyone other
than a licensed wholesale dealer within or outside the state.

(4)
A business to engage in the commercial manufacture or preparation of
fertilizer, oil, meal, caviar, fish bait, or other byproducts from food fish or
shellfish.

(5)
A business employing a fish buyer as defined under RCW 75.28.340 (as
recodified by this act).

The
annual license fee for a wholesale dealer is two hundred fifty dollars. A
wholesale fish dealer's license is not required for persons engaged in the
processing, wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of private sector cultured
aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020. However, if a means of
identifying such products is required by rules adopted under RCW 15.85.060, the
exemption from licensing requirements established by this subsection applies
only if the aquatic products are identified in conformance with those rules.

Sec.
48. RCW
75.28.323 and 1996 c 267 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A wholesale fish dealer shall not take possession of food fish or shellfish
until the dealer has deposited with the department an acceptable performance
bond on forms prescribed and furnished by the department. This performance
bond shall be a corporate surety bond executed in favor of the department by a
corporation authorized to do business in the state of Washington under chapter
48.28 RCW and approved by the department. The bond shall be filed and
maintained in an amount equal to one thousand dollars for each buyer engaged by
the wholesale dealer. In no case shall the bond be less than two thousand
dollars nor more than fifty thousand dollars.

(2)
A wholesale dealer shall, within seven days of engaging additional fish buyers,
notify the department and increase the amount of the bonding required in
subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The director may suspend and refuse to reissue a wholesale fish dealer's
license of a dealer who has taken possession of food fish or shellfish without
an acceptable performance bond on deposit with the department.

(4)
The bond shall be conditioned upon the compliance with the requirements of this
chapter and rules of the department relating to the payment of fines for
violations of rules for the accounting of the commercial harvest of food fish
or shellfish. In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the
wholesale fish dealer may file with the department a cash deposit, negotiable
securities acceptable to the department, or an assignment of a savings account
or of a savings certificate in a Washington bank on an assignment form
prescribed by the department.

(5) Liability under the bond shall be maintained as long as the
wholesale fish dealer engages in activities under RCW 75.28.300 (as
recodified by this act) unless released. Liability under the bond may be
released only upon written notification from the department. Notification
shall be given upon acceptance by the department of a substitute bond or
forty-five days after the expiration of the wholesale fish dealer's annual
license. In no event shall the liability of the surety exceed the amount of
the surety bond required under this chapter.

Sec.
49. RCW
75.28.340 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A fish buyer's license is required of and shall be carried by each individual
engaged by a wholesale fish dealer to purchase food fish or shellfish from a
licensed commercial fisherman. A fish buyer may represent only one wholesale
fish dealer.

(2)
((Unless adjusted by the director pursuant to the director's authority
granted in RCW 75.28.065,)) The annual fee for a fish buyer's
license is ninety-five dollars.

Sec.
50. RCW
75.28.730 and 1993 c 376 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

An
ocean pink shrimp delivery license is required to deliver ocean pink shrimp
taken in offshore waters and delivered to a port in the state. ((Unless
adjusted by the director pursuant to the director's authority granted in RCW
75.28.065,)) The annual license fee is one hundred fifty dollars for
residents and three hundred dollars for nonresidents. Ocean pink shrimp
delivery licenses are transferable.

Sec.
51. RCW
75.28.740 and 1998 c 190 s 99 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director may by rule designate a fishery as an emerging commercial
fishery. The director shall include in the designation whether the fishery is
one that requires a vessel.

(2)
"Emerging commercial fishery" means the commercial taking of a newly
classified species of food fish or shellfish, the commercial taking of a
classified species with gear not previously used for that species, or the
commercial taking of a classified species in an area from which that species
has not previously been commercially taken. Any species of food fish or
shellfish commercially harvested in Washington state as of June 7, 1990, may be
designated as a species in an emerging commercial fishery, except that no
fishery subject to a license limitation program in chapter 75.30 RCW (as
recodified by this act) may be designated as an emerging commercial
fishery.

(3)
A person shall not take food fish or shellfish in a fishery designated as an
emerging commercial fishery without an emerging commercial fishery license and
a permit from the director. The director shall issue two types of permits to
accompany emerging commercial fishery licenses: Trial fishery permits and
experimental fishery permits. Trial fishery permits are governed by subsection
(4) of this section. Experimental fishery permits are governed by RCW
75.30.220 (as recodified by this act).

(4)
The director shall issue trial fishery permits for a fishery designated as an
emerging commercial fishery unless the director determines there is a need to
limit the number of participants under RCW 75.30.220 (as recodified by this
act). A person who meets the qualifications of RCW 75.28.020 (as
recodified by this act) may hold a trial fishery permit. The holder of a
trial fishery permit shall comply with the terms of the permit. Trial fishery
permits are not transferable from the permit holder to any other person.

Sec.
52. RCW
75.28.760 and 1993 sp.s. c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

By
July 1, 1994, the ((departments of fisheries and wildlife)) commission
jointly with the appropriate Indian tribes, shall each establish a wild
salmonid policy. The policy shall ensure that department actions and programs
are consistent with the goals of rebuilding wild stock populations to levels
that permit commercial and recreational fishing opportunities.

Sec.
53. RCW
75.28.770 and 1998 c 245 s 153 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) director shall evaluate and
recommend, in consultation with the Indian tribes, salmon fishery management
strategies and gear types, as well as a schedule for implementation, that will
minimize the impact of commercial and recreational fishing in the mixed stock
fishery on critical and depressed wild stocks of salmonids. As part of this
evaluation, the ((department)) director, in conjunction with the
commercial and recreational fishing industries, shall evaluate commercial and
recreational salmon fishing gear types developed by these industries.

Sec.
54. RCW
75.28.780 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall issue the personal licenses listed in this section according to
the requirements of this title. The licenses and their annual fees are:

Personal License Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 75.50.100 (as
recodified

by this act)
Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(1) Alternate Operator $ 35 $ 35 RCW 75.28.048

(as recodified by this act)

(2) Geoduck Diver $185 $295 RCW 75.28.750

(as recodified by this act)

(3) Salmon Guide $130 $630 RCW 75.28.710

(as recodified by this act)

(plus $20) (plus $100)

Sec.
55. RCW
75.30.021 and 1995 c 227 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((department)) director shall waive license requirements,
including landing or poundage requirements, if, during the calendar year that a
license issued pursuant to chapter 75.28 RCW (as recodified by this act)
is valid, no harvest opportunity occurs in the fishery corresponding to the
license.

(2)
For each license limitation program, where the person failed to hold the
license and failed to make landing or poundage requirements because of a
license waiver by the ((department)) director during the previous
year, the person shall qualify for a license by establishing that the person
held the license during the last year in which the license was not waived.

Sec.
56. RCW
75.30.050 and 1995 c 269 s 3101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall appoint three-member advisory review boards to hear cases as
provided in RCW 75.30.060 (as recodified by this act). Members shall be
from:

(a)
The commercial crab fishing industry in cases involving Dungeness crab-Puget
Sound fishery licenses;

(b)
The commercial herring fishery in cases involving herring fishery licenses;

(c)
The commercial sea urchin and sea cucumber fishery in cases involving sea
urchin and sea cucumber dive fishery licenses;

(d)
The commercial ocean pink shrimp industry (Pandalus jordani) in cases involving
ocean pink shrimp delivery licenses; and

(e)
The commercial coastal crab fishery in cases involving Dungeness crab-coastal
fishery licenses and Dungeness crab-coastal class B fishery licenses. The
members shall include one person from the commercial crab processors, one
Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license holder, and one citizen representative
of a coastal community.

(2)
Members shall serve at the discretion of the director and shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050, 43.03.060, and 43.03.065.

Sec.
57. RCW
75.30.060 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person aggrieved by a decision of the department under this chapter may request
administrative review under the informal procedure established by this section.

In
an informal hearing before a review board, the rules of evidence do not apply.
A record of the proceeding shall be kept as provided by chapter 34.05 RCW.
After hearing the case the review board shall notify in writing the ((commission))
director and the initiating party whether the review board agrees or
disagrees with the department's decision and the reasons for the review
board's findings. Upon receipt of the review board's findings the ((commission))
director may order such relief as the ((commission)) director
deems appropriate under the circumstances.

Nothing
in this section: (1) Impairs an aggrieved person's right to proceed under
chapter 34.05 RCW; or (2) imposes a liability on members of a review board for
their actions under this section.

Sec.
58. RCW
75.30.065 and 1993 c 340 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After May 28, 1977, the director shall issue no new salmon charter licenses. A
person may renew an existing salmon charter license only if the person held the
license sought to be renewed during the previous year or acquired the license
by transfer from someone who held it during the previous year, and if the
person has not subsequently transferred the license to another person.

(2)
Salmon charter licenses may be renewed each year. A salmon charter license
which is not renewed each year shall not be renewed further.

(3)
Subject to the restrictions in ((section 11 of this act)) RCW
75.28.011 (as recodified by this act), salmon charter licenses are
transferrable from one license holder to another.

Sec.
59. RCW
75.30.070 and 1998 c 190 s 100 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person shall not
operate a vessel as a charter boat from which salmon are taken in salt water
without an angler permit. The angler permit shall specify the maximum number
of persons that may fish from the charter boat per trip. The angler permit
expires if the salmon charter license is not renewed.

(2)
Only a person who holds a salmon charter license issued under RCW 75.28.095 and
75.30.065 (as recodified by this act) may hold an angler permit.

(3)
An angler permit shall not be required for charter boats licensed in Oregon and
fishing in ocean waters within the jurisdiction of Washington state from the
southern border of the state of Washington to Leadbetter Point under the same
regulations as Washington charter boat operators, as long as the Oregon vessel
does not land at any Washington port with the purpose of taking on or
discharging passengers. The provisions of this subsection shall be in effect
as long as the state of Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.

Sec.
60. RCW
75.30.090 and 1993 c 340 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

A
salmon charter boat may not carry more anglers than the number specified in the
angler permit issued under RCW 75.30.070 (as recodified by this act).
Members of the crew may fish from the boat only to the extent that the number
of anglers specified in the angler permit exceeds the number of noncrew
passengers on the boat at that time.

Sec.
61. RCW
75.30.100 and 1993 c 340 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The total number of anglers authorized by the ((department)) director
shall not exceed the total number authorized for 1980.

(2)
Angler permits issued under RCW 75.30.070 (as recodified by this act)
are transferable. All or a portion of the permit may be transferred to another
salmon charter license holder.

(3)
The angler permit holder and proposed transferee shall notify the department
when transferring an angler permit, and the ((department)) director
shall issue a new angler permit certificate. If the original permit holder
retains a portion of the permit, the ((department)) director
shall issue a new angler permit certificate reflecting the decrease in angler
capacity.

(4)
The department shall collect a fee of ten dollars for each certificate issued
under subsection (3) of this section.

Sec.
62. RCW
75.30.120 and 1995 c 135 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, after May 6, 1974, the
director shall issue no new commercial salmon fishery licenses or salmon
delivery licenses. A person may renew an existing license only if the person
held the license sought to be renewed during the previous year or acquired the
license by transfer from someone who held it during the previous year, and if
the person has not subsequently transferred the license to another person.

(2)
Where the person failed to obtain the license during the previous year because
of a license suspension, the person may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the license
was not suspended.

(3)
Subject to the restrictions in RCW 75.28.011 (as recodified by this act),
commercial salmon fishery licenses and salmon delivery licenses are
transferable from one license holder to another.

Sec.
63. RCW
75.30.125 and 1993 c 340 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
commercial salmon fishery license issued under RCW 75.28.110 (as recodified
by this act) or salmon delivery license issued under RCW 75.28.113 (as
recodified by this act) shall revert to the department when any government
confiscates and sells the vessel designated on the license. Upon application
of the person named on the license as license holder and the approval of the
director, the department shall transfer the license to the applicant.
Application for transfer of the license must be made within the calendar year
for which the license was issued.

Sec.
64. RCW
75.30.130 and 1998 c 190 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not commercially take Dungeness crab (Cancer magister) in Puget
Sound without first obtaining a Dungeness crab‑-Puget Sound fishery
license. As used in this section, "Puget Sound" has the meaning
given in RCW 75.28.110(5)(a)(as recodified by this act). A Dungeness
crab‑-Puget Sound fishery license is not required to take other species
of crab, including red rock crab (Cancer productus).

(2)
Except as provided in subsections (3) and (6) of this section, after January 1,
1982, the director shall issue no new Dungeness crab‑-Puget Sound fishery
licenses. Only a person who meets the following qualification may renew an
existing license: The person shall have held the Dungeness crab‑-Puget
Sound fishery license sought to be renewed during the previous year or acquired
the license by transfer from someone who held it during the previous year, and
shall not have subsequently transferred the license to another person.

(3)
Where the person failed to obtain the license during the previous year because
of a license suspension, the person may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the license
was not suspended.

(4)
This section does not restrict the issuance of commercial crab licenses for
areas other than Puget Sound or for species other than Dungeness crab.

(5)
Dungeness crab‑-Puget Sound fishery licenses are transferable from one
license holder to another.

(6)
If fewer than one hundred twenty-five persons are eligible for Dungeness crab‑-Puget
Sound fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for new licenses.
The director shall determine by random selection the successful applicants for
the additional licenses. The number of additional licenses issued shall be
sufficient to maintain one hundred twenty-five licenses in the Puget Sound
Dungeness crab fishery. The director shall adopt rules governing the
application, selection, and issuance procedures for new Dungeness crab‑-Puget
Sound fishery licenses, based upon recommendations of ((a board of)) an
advisory review board established under RCW 75.30.050 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec.
65. RCW
75.30.140 and 1998 c 190 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not fish commercially for herring in state waters without a
herring fishery license. As used in this section, "herring fishery
license" means any of the following commercial fishery licenses issued
under RCW 75.28.120 (as recodified by this act): Herring dip bag net;
herring drag seine; herring gill net; herring lampara; herring purse seine.

(2)
Except as provided in this section, a herring fishery license may be issued
only to a person who held the license sought to be renewed during the previous
year or acquired the license by transfer from someone who held it during the
previous year, and if the person has not subsequently transferred the license
to another person.

(3)
Herring fishery licenses may be renewed each year. A herring fishery license
that is not renewed each year shall not be renewed further.

(4)
The ((department)) director may issue additional herring fishery
licenses if the stocks of herring will not be jeopardized by granting
additional licenses.

(5)
Subject to the restrictions of RCW 75.28.011 (as recodified by this act),
herring fishery licenses are transferable from one license holder to another.

Sec.
66. RCW
75.30.170 and 1993 c 340 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not commercially take whiting from areas that the department
designates within the waters described in RCW 75.28.110(5)(a) (as recodified by
this act) without a whiting-Puget Sound fishery license.

(2)
A whiting-Puget Sound fishery license may be issued only to an individual who:

(a)
Delivered at least fifty thousand pounds of whiting during the period from
January 1, 1981, through February 22, 1985, as verified by fish delivery
tickets;

(b)
Possessed, on January 1, 1986, all equipment necessary to fish for whiting; and

(c)
Held a whiting-Puget Sound fishery license during the previous year or acquired
such a license by transfer from someone who held it during the previous year.

(((2)))
(3) After January 1, 1995, the director shall issue no new whiting-Puget
Sound fishery licenses. After January 1, 1995, only an individual who meets
the following qualifications may renew an existing license: The individual
shall have held the license sought to be renewed during the previous year or
acquired the license by transfer from someone who held it during the previous
year, and shall not have subsequently transferred the license to another
person.

(((3)))
(4) Whiting-Puget Sound fishery licenses may be renewed each year. A
whiting-Puget Sound fishery license that is not renewed each year shall not be
renewed further.

Sec.
67. RCW
75.30.180 and 1993 c 340 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

A
whiting-Puget Sound fishery license may be transferred through gift, devise,
bequest, or descent to members of the license holder's immediate family which
shall be limited to spouse, children, or stepchildren. The holder of a
whiting-Puget Sound fishery license shall be present on any vessel taking
whiting under the license. In no instance may temporary permits be issued.

The
director may adopt rules necessary to implement RCW ((75.30.160 through))
75.30.170 and 75.30.180 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
68. RCW
75.30.210 and 1998 c 190 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not commercially take any species of sea urchin using shellfish
diver gear without first obtaining a sea urchin dive fishery license.

(2)
Except as provided in subsections (3) and (6) of this section, after December
31, 1991, the director shall issue no new sea urchin dive fishery licenses.
Only a person who meets the following qualifications may renew an existing
license:

(a)
The person shall have held the sea urchin dive fishery license sought to be
renewed during the previous year or acquired the license by transfer from
someone who held it during the previous year; and

(b)
The person shall document, by valid shellfish receiving tickets issued by the
department, that twenty thousand pounds of sea urchins were caught and sold
under the license sought to be renewed during the two-year period ending March
31 of the most recent odd-numbered year.

(3)
Where the person failed to obtain the license during the previous year because
of a license suspension or revocation by the ((department)) director
or the court, the person may qualify for a license by establishing that the
person held such a license during the last year in which the person was
eligible.

(4)
The director may reduce or waive the poundage requirement of subsection (2)(b)
of this section upon the recommendation of ((a board of)) an advisory
review board established under RCW 75.30.050 (as recodified by this
act). The review board ((of review)) may recommend a
reduction or waiver of the poundage requirement in individual cases if, in the review
board's judgment, extenuating circumstances prevent achievement of the poundage
requirement. The director shall adopt rules governing the operation of the ((board
of)) review board and defining "extenuating
circumstances."

(5)
Sea urchin dive fishery licenses are not transferable from one license holder
to another, except from parent to child, or from spouse to spouse during
marriage or as a result of marriage dissolution, or upon the death of the
license holder.

(6)
If fewer than forty-five persons are eligible for sea urchin dive fishery
licenses, the director may accept applications for new licenses. The director
shall determine by random selection the successful applicants for the
additional licenses. The number of additional licenses issued shall be
sufficient to maintain up to forty-five licenses in the sea urchin dive
fishery. The director shall adopt rules governing the application, selection,
and issuance procedure for new sea urchin dive fishery licenses, based upon
recommendations of ((a board of)) an advisory review board
established under RCW 75.30.050 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
69. RCW
75.30.220 and 1993 c 340 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director may issue experimental fishery permits for commercial harvest in
an emerging commercial fishery for which the director has determined there is a
need to limit the number of participants. The director shall determine by rule
the number and qualifications of participants for such experimental fishery
permits. Only a person who holds an emerging commercial fishery license issued
under RCW 75.28.740 (as recodified by this act) and who meets the
qualifications established in those rules may hold an experimental fishery
permit. The director shall limit the number of these permits to prevent
habitat damage, ensure conservation of the resource, and prevent
overharvesting. In developing rules for limiting participation in an emerging
or expanding commercial fishery, the director shall appoint a five-person
advisory board representative of the affected fishery industry. The advisory
board shall review and make recommendations to the director on rules relating
to the number and qualifications of the participants for such experimental
fishery permits.

(2)
RCW 34.05.422(3) does not apply to applications for new experimental fishery
permits.

(3)
Experimental fishery permits are not transferable from the permit holder to any
other person.

Sec.
70. RCW
75.30.250 and 1998 c 190 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not commercially take while using shellfish diver gear any
species of sea cucumber without first obtaining a sea cucumber dive fishery
license.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, after December 31, 1991,
the director shall issue no new sea cucumber dive fishery licenses. Only a
person who meets the following qualifications may renew an existing license:

(a)
The person shall have held the sea cucumber dive fishery license sought to be
renewed during the previous two years or acquired the license by transfer from
someone who held it during the previous year; and

(b)
The person shall establish, by means of dated shellfish receiving documents
issued by the department, that thirty landings of sea cucumbers totaling at
least ten thousand pounds were made under the license during the previous
two-year period ending December 31 of the odd-numbered year.

(3)
Where the person failed to obtain the license during either of the previous two
years because of a license suspension by the ((department)) director
or the court, the person may qualify for a license by establishing that the
person held such a license during the last year in which the person was
eligible.

(4)
The director may reduce or waive any landing or poundage requirement
established under this section upon the recommendation of ((a board of))
an advisory review board established under RCW 75.30.050 (as
recodified by this act). The ((board of)) review board may
recommend a reduction or waiver of any landing or poundage requirement in
individual cases if, in the review board's judgment, extenuating
circumstances prevent achievement of the landing or poundage requirement. The
director shall adopt rules governing the operation of the ((board of))
review board and defining "extenuating circumstances."

(5)
Sea cucumber dive fishery licenses are not transferable from one license holder
to another except from parent to child, from spouse to spouse during marriage
or as a result of marriage dissolution, or upon death of the license holder.

(6)
If fewer than fifty persons are eligible for sea cucumber dive fishery licenses,
the director may accept applications for new licenses from those persons who
can demonstrate two years' experience in the Washington state sea cucumber dive
fishery. The director shall determine by random selection the successful
applicants for the additional licenses. The number of additional licenses
issued shall be sufficient to maintain up to fifty licenses in the sea cucumber
dive fishery. The director shall adopt rules governing the application,
selection, and issuance procedure for new sea cucumber dive fishery licenses,
based upon recommendations of ((a board of)) an advisory review board
established under RCW 75.30.050 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
71. RCW
75.30.270 and 1993 c 340 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A herring spawn on kelp fishery license is required to commercially take
herring eggs which have been deposited on vegetation of any type.

(2)
A herring spawn on kelp fishery license may be issued only to a person who:

(a)
Holds a herring fishery license issued under RCW 75.28.120 and 75.30.140 (as
recodified by this act); and

(b)
Is the highest bidder in an auction conducted under subsection (3) of this
section.

(3)
The department shall sell herring spawn on kelp commercial fishery licenses at
auction to the highest bidder. Bidders shall identify their sources of kelp.
Kelp harvested from state-owned aquatic lands as defined in RCW 79.90.465
requires the written consent of the department of natural resources. The
department shall give all holders of herring fishery licenses thirty days'
notice of the auction.

Sec.
72. RCW
75.30.280 and 1998 c 190 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not harvest geoduck clams commercially without a geoduck fishery
license. This section does not apply to the harvest of private sector cultured
aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020.

(2)
Only a person who has entered into a geoduck harvesting agreement with the
department of natural resources under RCW 79.96.080 may hold a geoduck fishery
license.

(3)
A geoduck fishery license authorizes no taking of geoducks outside the
boundaries of the public lands designated in the underlying harvesting
agreement, or beyond the harvest ceiling set in the underlying harvesting
agreement.

(4)
A geoduck fishery license expires when the underlying geoduck harvesting
agreement terminates.

(5)
The director shall determine the number of geoduck fishery licenses that may be
issued for each geoduck harvesting agreement, the number of units of gear whose
use the license authorizes, and the type of gear that may be used, subject to
RCW 75.24.100 (as recodified by this act). In making those
determinations, the director shall seek to conserve the geoduck resource and
prevent damage to its habitat.

(6)
The holder of a geoduck fishery license and the holder's agents and
representatives shall comply with all applicable commercial diving safety
regulations adopted by the federal occupational safety and health administration
established under the federal occupational safety and health act of 1970 as
such law exists on May 8, 1979, 84 Stat. 1590 et seq.; 29 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et
seq. A violation of those regulations is a violation of this subsection. For
the purposes of this section, persons who dive for geoducks are
"employees" as defined by the federal occupational safety and health
act. A violation of this subsection is grounds for suspension or revocation of
a geoduck fishery license following a hearing under the procedures of chapter
34.05 RCW. The ((department)) director shall not suspend or
revoke a geoduck fishery license if the violation has been corrected within ten
days of the date the license holder receives written notice of the violation.
If there is a substantial probability that a violation of the commercial diving
standards could result in death or serious physical harm to a person engaged in
harvesting geoduck clams, the ((department)) director shall
suspend the license immediately until the violation has been corrected. If the
license holder is not the operator of the harvest vessel and has contracted
with another person for the harvesting of geoducks, the ((department)) director
shall not suspend or revoke the license if the license holder terminates its
business relationship with that person until compliance with this subsection is
secured.

Sec.
73. RCW
75.30.290 and 1998 c 190 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall not commercially deliver into any Washington state port ocean pink
shrimp caught in offshore waters without an ocean pink shrimp delivery license
issued under RCW 75.28.730 (as recodified by this act), or an ocean pink
shrimp single delivery license issued under RCW 75.30.320 (as recodified by
this act). An ocean pink shrimp delivery license shall be issued to a
vessel that:

(1)
Landed a total of at least five thousand pounds of ocean pink shrimp in
Washington in any single calendar year between January 1, 1983, and December
31, 1992, as documented by a valid shellfish receiving ticket; and

(2)
Can show continuous participation in the Washington, Oregon, or California ocean
pink shrimp fishery by being eligible to land ocean pink shrimp in either
Washington, Oregon, or California each year since the landing made under
subsection (1) of this section. Evidence of such eligibility shall be a
certified statement from the relevant state licensing agency that the applicant
for a Washington ocean pink shrimp delivery license held at least one of the
following permits:

(a)
For Washington: Possession of a delivery permit or delivery license issued
under RCW 75.28.125 ((or a trawl license (other than Puget Sound) issued
under RCW 75.28.140)) (as recodified by this act);

(b)
For Oregon: Possession of a vessel permit issued under Oregon Revised Statute
508.880; or

(c)
For California: A trawl permit issued under California Fish and Game Code sec.
8842.

Sec.
74. RCW
75.30.300 and 1993 c 376 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

An
applicant who can show historical participation under RCW 75.30.290(1) (as
recodified by this act) but does not satisfy the continuous participation
requirement of RCW 75.30.290(2) (as recodified by this act) shall be
issued an ocean pink shrimp delivery license if:

(1)
The owner can prove that the owner was in the process on December 31, 1992, of
constructing a vessel for the purpose of ocean pink shrimp harvest. For
purposes of this section, "construction" means having the keel laid,
and "for the purpose of ocean pink shrimp harvest" means the vessel
is designed as a trawl vessel. An ocean pink shrimp delivery license issued to
a vessel under construction is not renewable after December 31, 1994, unless
the vessel lands a total of at least five thousand pounds of ocean pink shrimp
into a Washington state port before December 31, 1994; or

(2)
The applicant's vessel is a replacement for a vessel that is otherwise eligible
for an ocean pink shrimp delivery license.

Sec.
75. RCW
75.30.320 and 1993 c 376 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
owner of an ocean pink shrimp fishing vessel that does not qualify for an ocean
pink shrimp delivery license issued under RCW 75.28.730 (as recodified by
this act) shall obtain an ocean pink shrimp single delivery license in
order to make a landing into a state port of ocean pink shrimp taken in
offshore waters. The director shall not issue an ocean pink shrimp single
delivery license unless, as determined by the director, a bona fide emergency
exists. A maximum of six ocean pink shrimp single delivery licenses may be
issued annually to any vessel. ((Unless adjusted by the director pursuant
to the director's authority granted in RCW 75.28.065,)) The fee for
an ocean pink shrimp single delivery license is one hundred dollars.

Sec.
76. RCW
75.30.330 and 1993 c 376 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director may reduce the landing requirements established under RCW 75.30.290 (as
recodified by this act) upon the recommendation of an advisory review board
established under RCW 75.30.050 (as recodified by this act), but the
director may not entirely waive the landing requirement. The advisory review
board may recommend a reduction of the landing requirement in individual cases
if in the advisory review board's judgment, extenuating circumstances
prevented achievement of the landing requirement. The director shall adopt
rules governing the operation of the advisory review board and defining
"extenuating circumstances."

Sec.
77. RCW
75.30.350 and 1998 c 190 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not commercially fish for coastal crab in Washington state
waters without a Dungeness crab‑-coastal or a Dungeness crab‑-coastal
class B fishery license. Gear used must consist of one buoy attached to each
crab pot. Each crab pot must be fished individually.

(2)
A Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery license is transferable. Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, such a license shall only be issued
to a person who proved active historical participation in the coastal crab
fishery by having designated, after December 31, 1993, a vessel or a
replacement vessel on the qualifying license that singly or in combination
meets the following criteria:

(a)
Made a minimum of eight coastal crab landings totaling a minimum of five
thousand pounds per season in at least two of the four qualifying seasons
identified in subsection (5) of this section, as documented by valid Washington
state shellfish receiving tickets; and showed historical and continuous
participation in the coastal crab fishery by having held one of the following
licenses or their equivalents each calendar year beginning 1990 through 1993,
and was designated on the qualifying license of the person who held one of the
following licenses in 1994:

(i)
Crab pot‑-Non-Puget Sound license, issued under RCW 75.28.130(1)(b) (as
recodified by this act);

(ii)
Nonsalmon delivery license, issued under RCW 75.28.125 (as recodified by
this act);

(iii)
Salmon troll license, issued under RCW 75.28.110 (as recodified by this act);

(iv)
Salmon delivery license, issued under RCW 75.28.113 (as recodified by this
act);

(v)
Food fish trawl license, issued under RCW 75.28.120 (as recodified by this
act); or

(vi)
Shrimp trawl license, issued under RCW 75.28.130 (as recodified by this act);
or

(b)
Made a minimum of four Washington landings of coastal crab totaling two
thousand pounds during the period from December 1, 1991, to March 20, 1992, and
made a minimum of eight crab landings totaling a minimum of five thousand
pounds of coastal crab during each of the following periods: December 1, 1991,
to September 15, 1992; December 1, 1992, to September 15, 1993; and December 1,
1993, to September 15, 1994. For landings made after December 31, 1993, the
vessel shall have been designated on the qualifying license of the person
making the landings; or

(c)
Made any number of coastal crab landings totaling a minimum of twenty thousand
pounds per season in at least two of the four qualifying seasons identified in
subsection (5) of this section, as documented by valid Washington state
shellfish receiving tickets, showed historical and continuous participation in
the coastal crab fishery by having held one of the qualifying licenses each
calendar year beginning 1990 through 1993, and the vessel was designated on the
qualifying license of the person who held that license in 1994.

(3)
A Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license shall be issued to a person who had a
new vessel under construction between December 1, 1988, and September 15, 1992,
if the vessel made coastal crab landings totaling a minimum of five thousand
pounds by September 15, 1993, and the new vessel was designated on the
qualifying license of the person who held that license in 1994. All landings
shall be documented by valid Washington state shellfish receiving tickets.
License applications under this subsection may be subject to review by the
advisory review board in accordance with RCW 75.30.050 (as recodified by
this act). For purposes of this subsection, "under construction"
means either:

(a)(i)
A contract for any part of the work was signed before September 15, 1992; and

(ii)
The contract for the vessel under construction was not transferred or otherwise
alienated from the contract holder between the date of the contract and the
issuance of the Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license; and

(iii)
Construction had not been completed before December 1, 1988; or

(b)(i)
The keel was laid before September 15, 1992; and

(ii)
Vessel ownership was not transferred or otherwise alienated from the owner
between the time the keel was laid and the issuance of the Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery license; and

(iii)
Construction had not been completed before December 1, 1988.

(4)
A Dungeness crab‑-coastal class B fishery license is not transferable.
Such a license shall be issued to persons who do not meet the qualification
criteria for a Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery license, if the person has
designated on a qualifying license after December 31, 1993, a vessel or
replacement vessel that, singly or in combination, made a minimum of four
landings totaling a minimum of two thousand pounds of coastal crab, documented
by valid Washington state shellfish receiving tickets, during at least one of
the four qualifying seasons, and if the person has participated continuously in
the coastal crab fishery by having held or by having owned a vessel that held
one or more of the licenses listed in subsection (2) of this section in each
calendar year subsequent to the qualifying season in which qualifying landings
were made through 1994. Dungeness crab‑-coastal class B fishery licenses
cease to exist after December 31, 1999, and the continuing license provisions
of RCW 34.05.422(3) are not applicable.

(5)
The four qualifying seasons for purposes of this section are:

(a)
December 1, 1988, through September 15, 1989;

(b)
December 1, 1989, through September 15, 1990;

(c)
December 1, 1990, through September 15, 1991; and

(d)
December 1, 1991, through September 15, 1992.

(6)
For purposes of this section and RCW 75.30.420 (as recodified by this act),
"coastal crab" means Dungeness crab (cancer magister) taken in all
Washington territorial and offshore waters south of the United States-Canada
boundary and west of the Bonilla-Tatoosh line (a line from the western end of Cape
Flattery to Tatoosh Island lighthouse, then to the buoy adjacent to Duntz Rock,
then in a straight line to Bonilla Point of Vancouver island), Grays Harbor,
Willapa Bay, and the Columbia river.

(7)
For purposes of this section, "replacement vessel" means a vessel
used in the coastal crab fishery in 1994, and that replaces a vessel used in
the coastal crab fishery during any period from 1988 through 1993, and which
vessel's licensing and catch history, together with the licensing and catch
history of the vessel it replaces, qualifies a single applicant for a Dungeness
crab‑-coastal or Dungeness crab‑-coastal class B fishery license.
A Dungeness crab‑-coastal or Dungeness crab‑-coastal class B
fishery license may only be issued to a person who designated a vessel in the
1994 coastal crab fishery and who designated the same vessel in 1995.

Sec.
78. RCW
75.30.370 and 1994 c 260 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person commercially fishing for Dungeness crab in offshore waters outside of
Washington state jurisdiction shall obtain a Dungeness crab offshore delivery
license from the director if the person does not possess a valid Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery license or a valid Dungeness crab-coastal class B fishery
license and the person wishes to land Dungeness crab into a place or a port in
the state. The annual fee for a Dungeness crab offshore delivery license is
two hundred fifty dollars. The director may specify restrictions on landings
of offshore Dungeness crab in Washington state as authorized in RCW 75.30.360 (as
recodified by this act).

Fees
from the offshore Dungeness crab delivery license shall be placed in the ((costal
[coastal])) coastal crab account created in RCW 75.30.390 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec.
79. RCW
75.30.380 and 1997 c 418 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery licenses are freely transferable on a willing seller-willing
buyer basis after paying the transfer fee in RCW 75.28.011 (as recodified by
this act).

Sec.
80. RCW
75.30.390 and 1997 c 418 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
coastal crab account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The
account shall consist of revenues from fees from the transfer of each Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery license assessed under RCW 75.28.011 (as recodified by
this act), delivery fees assessed under RCW 75.30.370 (as recodified by
this act), and the license surcharge under RCW 75.28.133 (as recodified
by this act). Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation is required for expenditures.
Funds may be used for coastal crab management activities as provided in RCW
75.30.410 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
81. RCW
75.30.420 and 1994 c 260 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An Oregon resident who can show historical and continuous participation in the
Washington state coastal crab fishery by having held a nonresident non-Puget
Sound crab pot license issued under RCW 75.28.130 (as recodified by this
act) each year from 1990 through 1994, and who has delivered a minimum of
eight landings totaling five thousand pounds of crab into Oregon during any two
of the four qualifying seasons as provided in RCW 75.30.350(((4))) (5)
(as recodified by this act) as evidenced by valid Oregon fish receiving
tickets, shall be issued a nonresident Dungeness crab-coastal fishery license
valid for fishing in Washington state waters north from the Oregon-Washington
boundary to United States latitude forty-six degrees thirty minutes north.
Such license shall be issued upon application and submission of proof of
delivery.

(2)
This section shall become effective contingent upon reciprocal statutory
authority in the state of Oregon providing for equal access for Washington
state coastal crab fishers to Oregon territorial coastal waters north of United
States latitude forty-five degrees fifty-eight minutes north, and Oregon waters
of the Columbia river.

Sec.
82. RCW
75.30.440 and 1994 c 260 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided under RCW 75.30.460 (as recodified by this act), the
director shall issue no new Dungeness crab-coastal fishery licenses after
December 31, 1995. A person may renew an existing license only if the person
held the license sought to be renewed during the previous year or acquired the
license by transfer from someone who held it during the previous year, and if
the person has not subsequently transferred the license to another person.
Where the person failed to obtain the license during the previous year because
of a license suspension, the person may qualify for a license by establishing
that the person held such a license during the last year in which the license
was not suspended.

Sec.
83. RCW
75.30.460 and 1994 c 260 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

If
fewer than one hundred seventy-five persons are eligible for Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery licenses, the director may accept applications for new
licenses. Additional licenses issued may maintain a maximum of one hundred
seventy-five licenses in the Washington coastal crab fishery. If additional
licenses are to be issued, the director shall adopt rules governing the notification,
application, selection, and issuance procedures for new Dungeness crab-coastal
fishery licenses, based on recommendations of the advisory review board
established under RCW 75.30.050 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
84. RCW
75.30.470 and 1994 c 260 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director may reduce the landing requirements established under RCW 75.30.350 (as
recodified by this act) upon the recommendation of an advisory review board
established under RCW 75.30.050 (as recodified by this act), but the
director may not entirely waive the landing requirement. The advisory review
board may recommend a reduction of the landing requirement in individual cases
if in the advisory review board's judgment, extenuating circumstances
prevented achievement of the landing requirement. The director shall adopt
rules governing the operation of the advisory review board and defining
"extenuating circumstances." Extenuating circumstances may include
situations in which a person had a vessel under construction such that
qualifying landings could not be made. In defining extenuating circumstances,
special consideration shall be given to individuals who can provide evidence of
lack of access to capital based on past discrimination due to race, creed,
color, sex, national origin, or disability.

Sec.
85. RCW
75.40.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may give to the state of Oregon such consent and approbation of the
state of Washington as is necessary under the compact set out in RCW 75.40.010 (as
recodified by this act). For the purposes of RCW 75.40.010 (as
recodified by this act), the states of Washington and Oregon have
concurrent jurisdiction in the concurrent waters of the Columbia river ((as
defined in RCW 75.08.011)).

Sec.
86. RCW
75.40.110 and 1994 c 148 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Until
such time as the agencies in California, Idaho, Oregon, and Washington present
a final proposed interstate compact for enactment by their respective
legislative bodies, the governor may establish cooperative agreements with the
states of California, Idaho, and Oregon that allow the states to coordinate
their individual efforts in developing state programs that further the
region-wide goals set forth under RCW 75.40.100 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
87. RCW
75.44.100 and 1985 c 7 s 150 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Case areas" means those areas of the Western district of Washington
and in the adjacent offshore waters which are within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington, as defined in United States of America et al. v. State
of Washington et al., Civil No. 9213, United States District Court for
Western District of Washington, February 12, 1974, and in Sohappy v. Smith,
302 F. Supp. 899 (D. Oregon, 1969), as amended, affirmed, and remanded 529 F.
2d 570 (9th Cir., 1976), or an area in which fishing rights are affected by
court decision in a manner consistent with the above-mentioned decisions;

(2)
"Program" means the program established under RCW 75.44.100 through
75.44.150 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
88. RCW
75.44.120 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 157 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purchase price of a vessel and appurtenant gear shall be based on a survey
conducted by a qualified marine surveyor. A license or delivery permit shall
be valued separately.

The
director may specify a maximum price to be paid for a vessel, gear, license, or
delivery permit purchased under RCW 75.44.110 (as recodified by this act).
A license or delivery permit purchased under RCW 75.44.110 (as recodified by
this act) shall be permanently retired by the department.

Sec.
89. RCW
75.44.130 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 158 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may arrange for the insurance, storage, and resale or other
disposition of vessels and gear purchased under RCW 75.44.110 (as recodified
by this act). Vessels shall not be resold by the department to the seller
or the seller's immediate family. The vessels shall not be used by any owner
or operator: (1) As a commercial fishing or charter vessel in state waters; or
(2) to deliver fish to a place or port in the state. The department shall
require that the purchasers and other users of vessels sold by the department
execute suitable instruments to insure compliance with the requirements of this
section. The director may commence suit or be sued on such an instrument in a
state court of record or United States district court having jurisdiction.

Sec.
90. RCW
75.44.150 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 160 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director is responsible for the administration and disbursement of all funds,
goods, commodities, and services received by the state under the program.

There
is created within the state treasury a fund to be known as the "vessel,
gear, license, and permit reduction fund". This fund shall be used for
purchases under RCW 75.44.110 (as recodified by this act) and for the
administration of the program. This fund shall be credited with federal or
other funds received to carry out the purposes of the program and the proceeds
from the sale or other disposition of property purchased under RCW 75.44.110 (as
recodified by this act).

Sec.
91. RCW
75.46.010 and 1998 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to test
the results of actions taken so that the management and related policy can be
changed promptly and appropriately.

(2)
"Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects and
salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring positive benefits
from habitat projects.

(3)
"Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from the
critical pathways methodology under RCW 75.46.070(2) (as recodified by this
act). Each project on the list must have a written agreement from the
landowner on whose land the project will be implemented. Projects include
habitat restoration projects, habitat protection projects, habitat projects
that improve water quality, habitat projects that protect water quality,
habitat-related mitigation projects, and habitat project maintenance and
monitoring activities.

(4)
"Habitat work schedule" means those projects from the habitat project
list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle. The schedule
shall also include a list of the entities and individuals implementing
projects, the start date, duration, estimated date of completion, estimated
cost, and funding sources for the projects.

(5)
"Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of habitat
to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are primarily fish
passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian corridors, stream
channels, and wetlands.

(6)
"Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, a combination of such governments through interlocal agreements
provided under chapter 39.34 RCW, a nonprofit organization, or one or more
private citizens.

(7)
"Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae which are
capable of self-sustaining, natural production.

(8)
"Salmon recovery plan" means a state plan developed in response to a
proposed or actual listing under the federal endangered species act that
addresses limiting factors including, but not limited to harvest, hatchery,
hydropower, habitat, and other factors of decline.

(9)
"Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian
tribes.

(10)
"WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in chapter
173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

(11)
"Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the person
under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal owner's property.

Sec.
92. RCW
75.46.040 and 1998 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The salmon recovery office is created within the office of the governor to
coordinate state strategy to allow for salmon recovery to healthy sustainable
population levels with productive commercial and recreational fisheries. The
primary purpose of the office is to coordinate and assist in the development of
salmon recovery plans for evolutionarily significant units, and submit those
plans to the appropriate tribal governments and federal agencies in response to
the federal endangered species act. The governor's salmon recovery office may
also:

(a)
Act as liaison to local governments, the state congressional delegation, the
United States congress, federally recognized tribes, and the federal executive
branch agencies for issues related to the state's endangered species act salmon
recovery plans; and

(b)
Provide the biennial state of the salmon report to the legislature pursuant to
RCW 75.46.030 (as recodified by this act).

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2006.

Sec.
93. RCW
75.46.050 and 1998 c 246 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governor shall request the national academy of sciences, the American
fisheries society, or a comparable institution to screen candidates to serve as
members on the independent science panel. The institution that conducts the
screening of the candidates shall submit a list of the nine most qualified
candidates to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
the majority leader of the senate. The candidates shall reflect expertise in
habitat requirements of salmon, protection and restoration of salmon
populations, artificial propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.

(2)
The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority leader in the
senate shall each remove one name from the nomination list. The governor shall
consult with tribal representatives and the governor shall appoint five
scientists from the remaining names on the nomination list.

(3)
The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. The
independent science panel members shall elect the chair of the panel among
themselves every two years. The members of the independent science panel shall
be compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
The independent science panel shall be governed by generally accepted
guidelines and practices governing the activities of independent science boards
such as the national academy of sciences. The purpose of the independent
science panel is to help ensure that sound science is used in salmon recovery
efforts. The governor's salmon recovery office shall request review of salmon
recovery plans by the science review panel. The science review panel does not
have the authority to review individual projects or project lists developed
under RCW 75.46.060, 75.46.070, and 75.46.080 (as recodified by this act)
or to make policy decisions.

(5)
The independent science panel shall submit its findings to the legislature and
the governor.

Sec.
94. RCW
75.46.070 and 1998 c 246 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Critical pathways methodology shall be used to develop a habitat project list
and a habitat work schedule that ensures salmon restoration activities will be
prioritized and implemented in a logical sequential manner that produces
habitat capable of sustaining healthy populations of salmon.

(2)
The critical pathways methodology shall:

(a)
Include a limiting factors analysis for salmon in streams, rivers, tributaries,
estuaries, and subbasins in the region. The technical advisory group shall have
responsibility for the limiting factors analysis;

(b)
Identify local habitat projects that sponsors are willing to undertake. The
projects identified must have a written agreement from the landowner on which
the project is to be implemented. Project sponsors shall have the lead
responsibility for this task;

(c)
Identify how projects will be monitored and evaluated. The project sponsor, in
consultation with the technical advisory group and the appropriate landowner,
shall have responsibility for this task; and

(d)
Describe the adaptive management strategy that will be used. The committee
established under RCW 75.46.060 (as recodified by this act) shall have
responsibility for this task. If a committee has not been formed, the
technical advisory group shall have the responsibility for this task.

(3)
The habitat work list shall include all projects developed pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section as well as any other salmon habitat restoration
project implemented in the region. The work list shall also include the start
date, duration, estimated date of completion, estimated cost, and, if
appropriate, the affected salmonid species of each project. Each schedule
shall be updated on an annual basis to depict new activities.

Sec.
95. RCW
75.46.080 and 1998 c 246 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Representatives from the conservation commission, the department of
transportation, and the department of fish and wildlife shall establish an
interagency review team. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section,
habitat restoration project lists shall be submitted to the interagency review
team by January 1st and July 1st of each year beginning in 1999.

(2)
If no lead entity has been formed under RCW 75.46.060 (as recodified by this
act), the interagency review team shall rank, prioritize, and dispense
funds for habitat restoration projects by giving preference to the projects
that:

(a)
Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery;

(b)
Will be implemented in a more critical area;

(c)
Are the most cost-effective;

(d)
Have the greatest matched, or in-kind funding; and

(e)
Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of project
implementation.

(3)
If a lead entity established under RCW 75.46.060 (as recodified by this act)
has been formed, the interagency review team shall evaluate project lists and
may remove, but not add, projects from a habitat project list.

(4)
The interagency review team shall provide a summary of funding for habitat
restoration project lists to the governor and to the legislature by December
1st of each year.

(5)
The interagency review team may annually establish a maximum amount of funding
available for any individual project, subject to available funding. The
interagency review team shall attempt to assure a geographical balance in
assigning priorities to projects.

(6)
For fiscal year 1998, the department of fish and wildlife, the conservation
commission, and the department of transportation may authorize, subject to
appropriations, expenditures for projects that have been developed to restore
salmon habitat before completion of the project lists required in RCW
75.46.060(2) (as recodified by this act).

(7)
Where a lead entity has been established pursuant to RCW 75.46.060 (as
recodified by this act), the interagency review team may provide block
grants to the lead entity, subject to available funding.

Sec.
96. RCW
75.46.090 and 1998 c 246 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The conservation commission, in consultation with local government and the
tribes, shall invite private, federal, state, tribal, and local government
personnel with appropriate expertise to act as a technical advisory group.

(2)
For state personnel, involvement on the technical advisory group shall be at
the discretion of the particular agency. Unless specifically provided for in
the budget, technical assistance participants shall be provided from existing
full-time equivalent employees.

(3)
The technical advisory group shall identify the limiting factors for salmonids
to respond to the limiting factors relating to habitat pursuant to RCW
75.46.070(2) (as recodified by this act).

(4)
Where appropriate, the conservation district within the area implementing this
chapter shall take the lead in developing and maintaining relationships between
the technical advisory group and the private landowners under RCW 75.46.080 (as
recodified by this act). The conservation districts may assist landowners
to organize around river, tributary, estuary, or subbasins of a watershed.

(5)
Fishery enhancement groups and other volunteer organizations may participate in
the activities under this section.

Sec.
97. RCW
75.46.100 and 1998 c 246 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
sea grant program at the University of Washington is authorized to provide
technical assistance to volunteer groups and other project sponsors in
designing and performing habitat ((restoration)) projects that address
the limiting factors analysis of regional habitat work plans. The cost for
such assistance may be covered on a fee-for-service basis.

Sec.
98. RCW
75.46.110 and 1998 c 246 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
southwest Washington salmon recovery region, whose boundaries are provided in
chapter 60, Laws of 1998, is created. ((If chapter 60, Laws of 1998 is not
enacted by July 1, 1998, this section is null and void.))

Sec.
99. RCW
75.46.120 and 1998 c 246 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The departments of transportation, fish and wildlife, and ecology, and tribes
shall convene a work group to develop policy guidance to evaluate mitigation
alternatives. The policy guidance shall be designed to enable committees
established under RCW 75.46.060 (as recodified by this act) to develop
and implement habitat project lists that maximize environmental benefits from
project mitigation while reducing project design and permitting costs. The
work group shall seek technical assistance to ensure that federal, state,
treaty right, and local environmental laws and ordinances are met. The purpose
of this section is not to increase regulatory requirements or expand
departmental authority.

(2)
The work group shall develop guidance for determining alternative mitigation
opportunities. Such guidance shall include criteria and procedures for
identifying and evaluating mitigation opportunities within a watershed. Such
guidance shall create procedures that provide alternative mitigation that has a
low risk to the environment, yet has high net environmental, social, and
economic benefits compared to status quo options.

(3)
The evaluation shall include:

(a)
All elements of mitigation, including but not limited to data requirements,
decision making, state and tribal agency coordination, and permitting; and

(b)
Criteria and procedures for identifying and evaluating mitigation
opportunities, including but not limited to the criteria in chapter 90.74 RCW.

(4)
Committees established under RCW 75.46.060 (as recodified by this act)
shall coordinate voluntary collaborative efforts between habitat project
proponents and mitigation project proponents. Mitigation funds may be used to
implement projects identified by a work plan to mitigate for the impacts of a
transportation or other development proposal or project.

(5)
For the purposes of this section, "mitigation" has the same meaning
as provided in RCW 90.74.010.

Sec.
100. RCW
75.46.130 and 1998 c 246 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Only
those funds appropriated for the habitat restoration projects under this
chapter are subject to the requirements of RCW 75.46.080 (as recodified by
this act).

Sec.
101. RCW
75.48.100 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 170 are each amended to read as follows:

The
bonds authorized by this chapter shall be issued only after the director has
certified, based upon reasonable estimates and data provided to the department,
that sufficient revenues will be available from sport and commercial salmon
license sales and from salmon fees and taxes to meet the requirements of RCW
75.48.080 (as recodified by this act) during the life of the bonds.

Sec.
102. RCW
75.50.080 and 1997 c 389 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Regional
fisheries enhancement groups, consistent with the long-term regional policy
statements developed under RCW 75.50.020 (as recodified by this act),
shall seek to:

(1)
Enhance the salmon and steelhead resources of the state;

(2)
Maximize volunteer efforts and private donations to improve the salmon and
steelhead resources for all citizens;

(3)
Assist the department in achieving the goal to double the state-wide salmon and
steelhead catch by the year 2000; and

(4)
Develop projects designed to supplement the fishery enhancement capability of
the department.

Sec.
103. RCW
75.50.100 and 1998 c 245 s 155 and 1998 c 191 s 27 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

The
dedicated regional fisheries enhancement group account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Only the commission or the commission's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures.

A
portion of each recreational fishing license fee shall be used as provided in
RCW 77.32.440. A surcharge of one hundred dollars shall be collected on each
commercial salmon fishery license, each salmon delivery license, and each
salmon charter license sold in the state. All receipts shall be placed in the
regional fisheries enhancement group account and shall be used exclusively for
regional fisheries enhancement group projects for the purposes of RCW 75.50.110
(as recodified by this act). Funds from the regional fisheries
enhancement group account shall not serve as replacement funding for department
operated salmon projects that exist on January 1, 1991.

All
revenue from the department's sale of salmon carcasses and eggs that return to
group facilities shall be deposited in the regional fisheries enhancement group
account for use by the regional fisheries enhancement group that produced the
surplus. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
104. RCW
75.50.105 and 1997 c 389 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may provide start-up funds to regional fisheries enhancement groups
for costs associated with any enhancement project. The regional fisheries
enhancement group advisory board and the ((department)) commission
shall develop guidelines for providing funds to the regional fisheries
enhancement groups.

Sec.
105. RCW
75.50.110 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 40 and 1995 c 367 s 5 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
A regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board is established to make
recommendations to the commission. The members shall be appointed by the
commission and consist of two commercial fishing representatives, two recreational
fishing representatives, and three at-large positions. At least two of the
advisory board members shall be members of a regional fisheries enhancement
group. Advisory board members shall serve three-year terms. The advisory
board membership shall include two members serving ex officio to be nominated,
one through the Northwest Indian fisheries commission, and one through the
Columbia river intertribal fish commission. The chair of the regional
fisheries enhancement group advisory board shall be elected annually by members
of the regional fisheries enhancement (([group])) group advisory
board. The advisory board shall meet at least quarterly. All meetings of the
advisory board shall be open to the public under the open public meetings act,
chapter 42.30 RCW.

The
department shall invite the advisory board to comment and provide input into
all relevant policy initiatives, including, but not limited to, wild stock,
hatcheries, and habitat restoration efforts.

(2)
Members shall not be compensated but shall receive reimbursement for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)
The department may use account funds to provide agency assistance to the
groups, to provide professional, administrative or clerical services to the
advisory board, or to implement the training and technical (([assistance]))
assistance services plan as developed by the advisory board pursuant to
RCW 75.50.115 (as recodified by this act). The level of account funds
used by the department shall be determined by the commission after review of
recommendation by the regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board and
shall not exceed twenty percent of annual contributions to the account.

Sec.
106. RCW
75.50.115 and 1998 c 96 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board shall:

(a)
Assess the training and technical assistance needs of the regional fisheries
enhancement groups;

(b)
Develop a training and technical assistance services plan in order to provide
timely, topical technical assistance and training services to regional
fisheries enhancement groups. The plan shall be provided to the director and
to the senate and house of representatives natural resources committees no
later than October 1, 1995, and shall be updated not less than every year. The
advisory board shall provide ample opportunity for the public and interested
parties to participate in the development of the plan. The plan shall include
but is not limited to:

(i)
Establishment of an information clearinghouse service that is readily available
to regional fisheries enhancement groups. The information clearinghouse shall
collect, collate, and make available a broad range of information on subjects
that affect the development, implementation, and operation of diverse fisheries
and habitat enhancement projects. The information clearinghouse service may
include periodical news and informational bulletins;

(ii)
An ongoing program in order to provide direct, on-site technical assistance and
services to regional fisheries enhancement groups. The advisory board shall
assist regional fisheries enhancement groups in soliciting federal, state, and
local agencies, tribal governments, institutions of higher education, and
private business for the purpose of providing technical assistance and services
to regional fisheries enhancement group projects; and

(iii)
A cost estimate for implementing the plan;

(c)
Propose a budget to the director for operation of the advisory board and
implementation of the technical assistance plan;

(d)
Make recommendations to the director regarding regional enhancement group
project proposals and funding of those proposals; and

(e)
Establish criteria for the redistribution of unspent project funds for any
regional enhancement group that has a year ending balance exceeding one hundred
thousand dollars.

(2)
The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board may:

(a)
Facilitate resolution of disputes between regional fisheries enhancement groups
and the department;

(b)
Promote community and governmental partnerships that enhance the salmon
resource and habitat;

(c)
Promote environmental ethics and watershed stewardship;

(d)
Advocate for watershed management and restoration;

(e)
Coordinate regional fisheries enhancement group workshops and training;

(f)
Monitor and evaluate regional fisheries enhancement projects;

(g)
Provide guidance to regional fisheries enhancement groups; and

(h)
Develop recommendations to the director to address identified impediments to
the success of regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(3)(a)
The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board shall develop
recommendations for limitations on the amount of overhead that a regional
fisheries enhancement group may charge from each of the following categories of
funding provided to the group:

(i)
Federal funds;

(ii)
State funds;

(iii)
Local funds; and

(iv)
Private donations.

(b)
The advisory board shall develop recommendations for limitations on the number
and salary of paid employees that are employed by a regional fisheries
enhancement group. The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board
shall adhere to the founding principles for regional groups that emphasize the
volunteer nature of the groups, maximization of field-related fishery resource
benefits, and minimization of overhead.

(c)
The advisory board shall evaluate and make recommendations for the limitation
or elimination of commissions, finders fees, or other reimbursements to
regional fisheries enhancement group employees.

(((d)
The regional fisheries enhancement group advisory board shall report to the
appropriate legislative committees by January 1, 1999, on the board
recommendations for overhead limitations, paid employee limitations, and
commission limitations for regional fisheries enhancement groups.))

Sec.
107. RCW
75.50.160 and 1997 c 389 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department and the department of transportation shall convene a fish passage
barrier removal task force. The task force shall consist of one representative
each from the department, the department of transportation, the department of
ecology, tribes, cities, counties, a business organization, an environmental
organization, regional fisheries enhancement groups, and other interested
entities as deemed appropriate by the cochairs. The persons representing the
department and the department of transportation shall serve as cochairs of the
task force and shall appoint members to the task force. The task force shall
make recommendations to expand the program in RCW 75.50.170 (as recodified
by this act) to identify and expedite the removal of human-made or caused
impediments to anadromous fish passage in the most efficient manner practical.
Program recommendations shall include a funding mechanism and other necessary
mechanisms to coordinate and prioritize state, tribal, local, and volunteer
efforts within each water resource inventory area. A priority shall be given
to projects that immediately increase access to available and improved spawning
and rearing habitat for depressed, threatened, and endangered stocks. The
department or the department of transportation may contract with cities and
counties to assist in the identification and removal of impediments to
anadromous fish passage.

((A
report on the recommendations to develop a program to identify and remove fish
passage barriers and any additional legislative action needed to implement the
program shall be submitted to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature no later than December 1, 1997.))

Sec.
108. RCW
75.52.020 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Volunteer group" means any person or group of persons interested in
or party to an agreement with the department relating to a cooperative fish or
wildlife project.

(2)
"Cooperative project" means a project conducted by a volunteer group
that will benefit the fish, shellfish, game bird, nongame wildlife, or game
animal resources of the state and for which the benefits of the project,
including fish and wildlife reared and released, are available to all citizens
of the state. Indian tribes may elect to participate in cooperative fish and
wildlife projects with the department.

(((3)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.))

Sec.
109. RCW
75.52.050 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall establish by rule:

(1)
The procedure for entering a cooperative agreement and the application forms
for a permit to release fish or wildlife required by RCW 75.08.295 ((or
77.16.150)) (as recodified by this act). The procedure shall
indicate the information required from the volunteer group as well as the
process of review by the department. The process of review shall include the
means to coordinate with other agencies and Indian tribes when appropriate and
to coordinate the review of any necessary hydraulic permit approval
applications.

(2)
The procedure for providing within forty-five days of receipt of a proposal a
written response to the volunteer group indicating the date by which an
acceptance or rejection of the proposal can be expected, the reason why the
date was selected, and a written summary of the process of review. The
response should also include any suggested modifications to the proposal which
would increase its likelihood of approval and the date by which such modified
proposal could be expected to be accepted. If the proposal is rejected, the
department must provide in writing the reasons for rejection. The volunteer
group may request the director or the director's designee to review information
provided in the response.

(3)
The priority of the uses to which eggs, seed, juveniles, or brood stock are
put. Use by cooperative projects shall be second in priority only to the needs
of programs of the department or of other public agencies within the
territorial boundaries of the state. Sales of eggs, seed, juveniles, or brood
stock have a lower priority than use for cooperative projects.

(4)
The procedure for ((notice in writing to a volunteer group of cause to
revoke)) the director to notify a volunteer group that the agreement
for the project is being revoked for cause and the procedure for
revocation. Revocation shall be documented in writing to the volunteer group.
Cause for revocation may include: (a) The unavailability of adequate
biological or financial resources; (b) the development of unacceptable
biological or resource management conflicts; or (c) a violation of agreement
provisions. Notice of cause to revoke for a violation of agreement provisions
may specify a reasonable period of time within which the volunteer group must
comply with any violated provisions of the agreement.

(5)
An appropriate method of distributing among volunteer groups fish, bird, or
animal food or other supplies available for the program.

Sec.
110. RCW
75.52.070 and 1984 c 72 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The volunteer group shall:

(a)
Provide care and diligence in conducting the cooperative project; and

(b)
Maintain accurately the required records of the project on forms provided by
the department.

(2)
The volunteer group shall acknowledge that fish and game reared in cooperative
projects are public property and must be handled and released for the benefit
of all citizens of the state. The fish and game are to remain public property
until reduced to private ownership under rules of the ((department)) commission.

Sec.
111. RCW
75.52.100 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

A
salmon spawning channel shall be constructed on the Cedar river with the
assistance and cooperation of the department. The department shall use
existing personnel and the volunteer fisheries enhancement program outlined
under chapter 75.52 RCW (as recodified by this act) to assist in the
planning, construction, and operation of the spawning channel.

Sec.
112. RCW
75.52.110 and 1998 c 245 s 156 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall chair a technical committee, which shall review the
preparation of enhancement plans and construction designs for a Cedar river
sockeye spawning channel. The technical committee shall consist of not more
than eight members: One representative each from the department, national
marine fisheries service, United States fish and wildlife service, and
Muckleshoot Indian tribe; and four representatives from the public utility
described in RCW 75.52.130 (as recodified by this act). The technical
committee will be guided by a policy committee, also to be chaired by the
department, which shall consist of not more than six members: One
representative from the department, one from the Muckleshoot Indian tribe, and
one from either the national marine fisheries service or the United States fish
and wildlife service; and three representatives from the public utility
described in RCW 75.52.130 (as recodified by this act). The policy
committee shall oversee the operation and evaluation of the spawning channel.
The policy committee will continue its oversight until the policy committee
concludes that the channel is meeting the production goals specified in RCW
75.52.120 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
113. RCW
75.52.130 and 1989 c 85 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that, if funding for planning, design, evaluation,
construction, and operating expenses is provided by a public utility that
diverts water for beneficial public use, and if the performance of the spawning
channel meets the production goals described in RCW 75.52.120 (as recodified
by this act), the spawning channel project will serve, at a minimum, as
compensation for lost sockeye salmon spawning habitat upstream of the Landsburg
diversion. The amount of funding to be supplied by ((said)) the
utility will fully fund the total cost of planning, design, evaluation, and
construction of the spawning channel.

Sec.
114. RCW
75.52.140 and 1989 c 85 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to provide operation and maintenance funds for the facility authorized by
RCW 75.52.100 through 75.52.160 (as recodified by this act), the utility
shall place two million five hundred thousand dollars in the state general fund
Cedar river channel construction and operation account herein created. The
interest from the fund shall be used for operation and maintenance of the
spawning channel and any unused interest shall be added to the fund to increase
the principal to cover possible future operation cost increases. The state
treasurer may invest funds from the account as provided by law.

Sec.
115. RCW
75.52.160 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

Should
the requirements of RCW 75.52.100 through 75.52.160 (as recodified by this
act) not be met, the department shall seek immediate legal clarification of
the steps which must be taken to fully mitigate water diversion projects on the
Cedar river.

Sec.
116. RCW
75.54.140 and 1998 c 191 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

As provided in RCW 77.32.440, a portion of each saltwater and
combination fishing license fee shall be deposited in the recreational
fisheries enhancement account created in RCW 75.54.150 (as recodified by
this act).

Sec.
117. RCW
75.54.150 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

The
recreational fisheries enhancement account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from RCW 75.54.140 (as recodified by this act) shall be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for recreational
fisheries enhancement programs.

Sec.
118. RCW
75.56.050 and 1998 c 60 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A pilot program for steelhead recovery is established in Clark, Cowlitz, Lewis,
Skamania, and Wahkiakum counties within the habitat area classified as
evolutionarily significant unit 4 by the federal national marine fisheries
service. The management board created under subsection (2) of this section is
responsible for implementing the habitat portion of the approved steelhead
recovery initiative and is empowered to receive and disburse funds for the
approved steelhead recovery initiative. The management board created pursuant
to this section shall constitute the ((regional council for this area
responsible for fulfilling the requirements and exercising the powers of a
regional council under chapter 246, Laws of 1998)) lead entity and the
committee established under RCW 75.46.060 (as recodified by this act)
responsible for fulfilling the requirements and exercising powers under this
chapter.

(2)
A management board consisting of fifteen voting members is created within
evolutionarily significant unit 4. The members shall consist of one county
commissioner or designee from each of the five participating counties selected
by each county legislative authority; one member representing the cities
contained within evolutionarily significant unit 4 as a voting member selected
by the cities in evolutionarily significant unit 4; a representative of the
Cowlitz Tribe appointed by the tribe; one state legislator elected from one of
the legislative districts contained within evolutionarily significant unit 4
selected by that group of state legislators representing the area; five
representatives to include at least one member who represents private property
interests appointed by the five county commissioners or designees; one hydro
utility representative nominated by hydro utilities and appointed by the five
county commissioners or designees; and one representative nominated from the
environmental community who resides in evolutionarily significant unit 4
appointed by the five county commissioners or designees. The board shall
appoint and consult a technical advisory committee, which shall include four
representatives of state agencies one each appointed by the directors of the
departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, and transportation, and the
commissioner of public lands. The board may also appoint additional persons to
the technical advisory committee as needed. The chair of the board shall be selected
from among the five county commissioners or designees and the legislator on the
board. In making appointments under this subsection, the county commissioners
shall consider recommendations of interested parties. Vacancies shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointments were selected. No
action may be brought or maintained against any management board member, the
management board, or any of its agents, officers, or employees for any
noncontractual acts or omissions in carrying out the purposes of this section.

(3)(a)
The management board shall participate in the development of a recovery plan to
implement its responsibilities under (b) of this subsection. The management
board shall consider local watershed efforts and activities as well as habitat
conservation plans in the implementation of the recovery plan. Any of the
participating counties may continue its own efforts for restoring steelhead
habitat. Nothing in this section limits the authority of units of local
government to enter into interlocal agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW or any
other provision of law.

(b)
The management board is responsible for implementing the habitat portions of
the local government responsibilities of the lower Columbia steelhead
conservation initiative approved by the state and the national marine fisheries
service. The management board may work in cooperation with the state and the
national marine fisheries service to modify the initiative, or to address
habitat for other aquatic species that may be subsequently listed under the
federal endangered species act. The management board may not exercise
authority over land or water within the individual counties or otherwise
preempt the authority of any units of local government.

(c)
The management board shall prioritize as appropriate and approve projects and
programs related to the recovery of lower Columbia river steelhead runs,
including the funding of those projects and programs, and coordinate local
government efforts as prescribed in the recovery plan. The management board
shall establish criteria for funding projects and programs based upon their
likely value in steelhead recovery. The management board may consider local
economic impact among the criteria, but jurisdictional boundaries and factors
related to jurisdictional population may not be considered as part of the
criteria.

(d)
The management board shall assess the factors for decline along each
prioritized stream as listed in the lower Columbia steelhead conservation
initiative. The management board is encouraged to take a stream-by-stream
approach in conducting the assessment which utilizes state and local expertise,
including volunteer groups, interest groups, and affected units of local
government.

(4)
The management board has the authority to hire and fire staff, including an
executive director, enter into contracts, accept grants and other moneys,
disburse funds, make recommendations to cities and counties about potential
code changes and the development of programs and incentives upon request, pay
all necessary expenses, and may choose a fiduciary agent. The management board
shall report on its progress on a quarterly basis to the legislative bodies of
the five participating counties and the state natural resource-related
agencies. The management board shall prepare a final report at the
conclusion of the pilot program describing its efforts and successes in
implementing the habitat portion of the lower Columbia steelhead conservation
initiative. The final report shall be transmitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature, the legislative bodies of the participating
counties, and the state natural resource-related agencies.

(5)
The pilot program terminates on July 1, 2002.

(6) For purposes of this section, "evolutionarily significant
unit" means the habitat area identified for an evolutionarily significant unit
of an aquatic species listed or proposed for listing as a threatened or
endangered species under the federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec.
1531 et seq.).

Sec.
119. RCW
75.58.010 and 1998 c 190 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of agriculture and the director shall jointly develop a program of
disease inspection and control for aquatic farmers as defined in RCW
15.85.020. The program shall be administered by the department under rules established
under this section. The purpose of the program is to protect the aquaculture
industry and wildstock fisheries from a loss of productivity due to aquatic
diseases or maladies. As used in this section "diseases" means, in
addition to its ordinary meaning, infestations of parasites or pests. The
disease program may include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(a)
Disease diagnosis;

(b)
Import and transfer requirements;

(c)
Provision for certification of stocks;

(d)
Classification of diseases by severity;

(e)
Provision for treatment of selected high-risk diseases;

(f)
Provision for containment and eradication of high-risk diseases;

(g)
Provision for destruction of diseased cultured aquatic products;

(h)
Provision for quarantine of diseased cultured aquatic products;

(i)
Provision for coordination with state and federal agencies;

(j)
Provision for development of preventative or control measures;

(k)
Provision for cooperative consultation service to aquatic farmers; and

(l)
Provision for disease history records.

(2)
The commission shall adopt rules implementing this section. However, such
rules shall have the prior approval of the director of agriculture and shall
provide therein that the director of agriculture has provided such approval.
The director of agriculture or the director's designee shall attend the
rule-making hearings conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW and shall assist in
conducting those hearings. The authorities granted the department by these
rules and by RCW ((75.08.080(1)(g),)) 75.24.080, 75.24.110, 75.28.125,
75.58.020, 75.58.030, and 75.58.040 (as recodified by this act)
constitute the only authorities of the department to regulate private sector
cultured aquatic products and aquatic farmers as defined in RCW 15.85.020.
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no action may be taken
against any person to enforce these rules unless the department has first
provided the person an opportunity for a hearing. In such a case, if the
hearing is requested, no enforcement action may be taken before the conclusion
of that hearing.

(3)
The rules adopted under this section shall specify the emergency enforcement
actions that may be taken by the department, and the circumstances under which
they may be taken, without first providing the affected party with an
opportunity for a hearing. Neither the provisions of this subsection nor the
provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall preclude the department from
requesting the initiation of criminal proceedings for violations of the disease
inspection and control rules.

(4)
A person shall not violate the rules adopted under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section or violate RCW 75.58.040 (as recodified by this act).

(5)
In administering the program established under this section, the department
shall use the services of a pathologist licensed to practice veterinary
medicine.

(6)
The director in administering the program shall not place constraints on or
take enforcement actions in respect to the aquaculture industry that are more
rigorous than those placed on the department or other fish-rearing entities.

Sec.
120. RCW
75.58.020 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

The
directors of agriculture and fish and wildlife shall jointly adopt by rule, in
the manner prescribed in RCW 75.58.010(2) (as recodified by this act), a
schedule of user fees for the disease inspection and control program
established under RCW 75.58.010 (as recodified by this act). The fees
shall be established such that the program shall be entirely funded by revenues
derived from the user fees by the beginning of the 1987-89 biennium.

There
is established in the state treasury an account known as the aquaculture
disease control account which is subject to appropriation. Proceeds of fees
charged under this section shall be deposited in the account. Moneys from the
account shall be used solely for administering the disease inspection and
control program established under RCW 75.58.010 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
121. RCW
75.58.030 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall consult regarding the disease inspection and control program
established under RCW 75.58.010 (as recodified by this act) with federal
agencies and Indian tribes to assure protection of state, federal, and tribal
aquatic resources and to protect private sector cultured aquatic products from
disease that could originate from waters or facilities managed by those
agencies.

(2)
With regard to the program, the director may enter into contracts or
interagency agreements for diagnostic field services with government agencies
and institutions of higher education and private industry.

(3)
The director shall provide for the creation and distribution of a roster of
biologists having a ((speciality [specialty])) specialty in the
diagnosis or treatment of diseases of fish or shellfish. The director shall
adopt rules specifying the qualifications which a person must have in order to
be placed on the roster.

Repealed
Sections

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 122. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
75.08.010 (Fisheries Code) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 2 & 1955
c 12 s 75.08.010;

(2) RCW
75.08.011 (Definitions) and 1998 c 190 s 70, 1996 c 267 s 2, 1995
1st sp.s. c 2 s 6, & 1994 c 255 s 2;

(3) RCW 75.08.014
(Authority of director to administer department--Qualifications of director)
and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 22, 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 21, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 6,
& 1953 c 207 s 10;

(4) RCW
75.08.035 (Senior environmental corps--Department powers and
duties) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 22 & 1992 c 63 s 11;

(5) RCW
75.08.040 (Acquisition, use, and management of lands, water
rights, rights of way, and personal property) and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 23, 1983
1st ex.s. c 46 s 9, 1955 c 212 s 1, & 1955 c 12 s 75.08.040;

(6) RCW
75.08.274 (Taking food fish for propagation or scientific
purposes--Permit required) and 1998 c 190 s 72, 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 15, 1983
1st ex.s. c 46 s 28, 1971 c 35 s 1, & 1955 c 12 s 75.16.010;

(7) RCW
75.10.070 (Service of summons and forfeiture if unable to
prosecute violator) and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 38 & 1955 c 12 s 75.36.030;

(8) RCW
75.10.160 (Enforcement of watercraft registration and boating
safety education) and 1989 c 393 s 16;

(9) RCW
75.25.090 (Personal use fishing licenses--Fees) and 1993 c 215 s
1, 1989 c 305 s 5, & 1987 c 87 s 1;

(10) RCW
75.25.160 (Recreational licenses--Penalties) and 1989 c 305 s 15,
1987 c 87 s 8, 1984 c 80 s 10, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 100, & 1977 ex.s. c
327 s 16;

(11) RCW
75.25.210 (Duplicate licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and catch
record cards--Fees) and 1994 c 255 s 9;

(12) RCW
75.28.012 (Licensing districts--Created) and 1993 c 20 s 3, 1983
1st ex.s. c 46 s 102, 1971 ex.s. c 283 s 2, & 1957 c 171 s 1;

(13) RCW
75.28.335 (Wholesale fish dealers--Additional penalties) and 1985
c 248 s 8; and

(14) RCW
75.30.160 (Whiting license required in designated areas) and 1998
c 190 s 103, 1993 c 340 s 38, & 1986 c 198 s 6.

Recodified
Sections

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 123. RCW
75.08.012, 75.08.013, 75.08.020, 75.08.090, and 75.08.110 are each recodified
as sections in chapter 77.04 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 124. RCW
75.08.025, 75.08.045, 75.08.055, 75.08.058, 75.08.065, 75.08.070, 75.08.080,
75.08.120, 75.08.160, 75.08.206, 75.08.208, 75.08.230, 75.08.235, 75.08.255,
75.08.265, 75.08.285, 75.08.295, and 75.08.300 are each recodified as sections
in chapter 77.12 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 125. RCW
75.12.010, 75.12.015, 75.12.040, 75.12.132, 75.12.140, 75.12.155, 75.12.210,
75.12.230, 75.12.390, 75.12.440, and 75.12.650 are each recodified as sections
in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 126. RCW
75.20.005, 75.20.015, 75.20.025, 75.20.040, 75.20.050, 75.20.060, 75.20.061,
75.20.090, 75.20.098, 75.20.100, 75.20.1001, 75.20.103, 75.20.104, 75.20.1041,
75.20.106, 75.20.108, 75.20.110, 75.20.130, 75.20.140, 75.20.150, 75.20.160,
75.20.170, 75.20.180, 75.20.190, 75.20.310, 75.20.320, 75.20.325, 75.20.330,
75.20.340, 75.20.350, and 77.12.830 are each recodified as sections in a new
chapter added to Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 127. RCW
75.24.010, 75.24.030, 75.24.060, 75.24.065, 75.24.070, 75.24.080, 75.24.100,
75.24.110, 75.24.120, 75.24.130, 75.24.140, and 75.24.150 are each recodified
as sections in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 128. RCW
75.28.010, 75.28.011, 75.28.014, 75.28.020, 75.28.030, 75.28.034, 75.28.040,
75.28.042, 75.28.044, 75.28.045, 75.28.046, 75.28.047, 75.28.048, 75.28.055,
75.28.095, 75.28.110, 75.28.113, 75.28.116, 75.28.120, 75.28.125, 75.28.130,
75.28.132, 75.28.133, 75.28.280, 75.28.290, 75.28.295, 75.28.300, 75.28.302,
75.28.305, 75.28.315, 75.28.323, 75.28.328, 75.28.340, 75.28.690, 75.28.700,
75.28.710, 75.28.720, 75.28.730, 75.28.740, 75.28.750, 75.28.760, 75.28.770,
75.28.780, 75.28.900, 77.32.191, 77.32.197, 77.32.199, and 77.32.211 are each
recodified as sections in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 129. RCW
75.30.015, 75.30.021, 75.30.050, 75.30.060, 75.30.065, 75.30.070, 75.30.090,
75.30.100, 75.30.120, 75.30.125, 75.30.130, 75.30.140, 75.30.170, 75.30.180,
75.30.210, 75.30.220, 75.30.230, 75.30.240, 75.30.250, 75.30.260, 75.30.270,
75.30.280, 75.30.290, 75.30.300, 75.30.310, 75.30.320, 75.30.330, 75.30.350,
75.30.360, 75.30.370, 75.30.380, 75.30.390, 75.30.410, 75.30.420, 75.30.430,
75.30.440, 75.30.450, 75.30.460, 75.30.470, and 75.30.480 are each recodified
as sections in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 130. A new
chapter is added to Title 77 RCW and is named "Compacts and other
agreements." The following sections are recodified under the following
subchapter headings:

(1)
"Columbia river compact" as follows:

RCW
75.40.010; and

RCW
75.40.020.

(2)
"Pacific marine fisheries compact" as follows:

RCW
75.40.030; and

RCW
75.40.040.

(3)
"Coastal ecosystems compact" as follows:

RCW
75.40.100; and

RCW
75.40.110.

(4)
"Wildlife violator compact" as follows:

RCW
77.17.010;

RCW
77.17.020; and

RCW
77.17.030.

(5)
"Snake river boundary" as follows:

RCW
77.12.450;

RCW
77.12.470;

RCW
77.12.480; and

RCW
77.12.490.

(6)
"Miscellaneous" as follows:

RCW
75.40.060;

RCW
77.12.430; and

RCW
77.12.440.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 131. RCW
75.44.100, 75.44.110, 75.44.120, 75.44.130, 75.44.140, and 75.44.150 are each
recodified as sections in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 132. RCW
75.46.005, 75.46.010, 75.46.020, 75.46.030, 75.46.040, 75.46.050, 75.46.060,
75.46.070, 75.46.080, 75.46.090, 75.46.100, 75.46.110, 75.46.120, 75.46.130,
75.56.050, and 75.46.900 are each recodified as sections in a new chapter in
Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 133. RCW
75.48.020, 75.48.040, 75.48.050, 75.48.060, 75.48.070, 75.48.080, 75.48.100,
and 75.48.110 are each recodified as sections in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 134. RCW
75.50.010, 75.50.020, 75.50.030, 75.50.040, 75.50.060, 75.50.070, 75.50.080,
75.50.090, 75.50.100, 75.50.105, 75.50.110, 75.50.115, 75.50.125, 75.50.130,
75.50.150, 75.50.160, 75.50.165, 75.50.170, 75.50.180, 75.50.190, 75.08.245,
75.08.400, 75.08.410, 75.08.420, 75.08.430, 75.08.440, 75.08.450, 75.08.500,
75.08.510, 75.08.520, 75.08.530, and 75.50.900 are each recodified as sections
in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 135. RCW
75.52.010, 75.52.020, 75.52.030, 75.52.035, 75.52.040, 75.52.050, 75.52.060,
75.52.070, 75.08.047, 75.52.080, 75.52.100, 75.52.110, 75.52.120, 75.52.130,
75.52.140, 75.52.150, 75.52.160, and 75.52.900 are each recodified as sections
in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 136. RCW
75.54.005, 75.54.010, 75.54.020, 75.54.030, 75.54.040, 75.54.050, 75.54.060,
75.54.070, 75.54.080, 75.54.090, 75.54.100, 75.54.110, 75.54.120, 75.54.130,
75.54.140, 75.54.150, 75.54.900, and 75.54.901 are each recodified as sections
in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 137. RCW
75.56.010, 75.56.020, 75.56.030, 75.56.040, 75.56.900, and 75.56.905 are each
recodified as sections in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 138. RCW
75.58.010, 75.58.020, 75.58.030, and 75.58.040 are each recodified as sections
in a new chapter in Title 77 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 139. RCW
75.25.092 is recodified as a new section in chapter 77.32 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 140. RCW
75.10.150 is recodified as a new section in chapter 77.15 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 141. RCW
75.25.901, 75.25.902, 75.30.055, 75.98.005, 75.98.006, 75.98.007, and 75.98.030
are each decodified.

PART
II

TITLE
77

Amendments

Sec.
201. RCW
77.04.010 and 1990 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
title is known and may be cited as "Fish and Wildlife Code of the
State of Washington."

Sec.
202. RCW
77.04.020 and 1996 c 267 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department consists of the state fish and wildlife commission and the
director. ((The director is responsible for the administration and
operation of the department, subject to the provisions of this title.))
The commission may delegate to the director any of the powers and duties vested
in the commission. ((The director shall perform the duties prescribed by
law and shall carry out the basic goals and objectives prescribed under RCW
77.04.055.))

Sec.
203. RCW
77.04.030 and 1994 c 264 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

The
fish and wildlife commission consists of nine registered voters of the state.
In January of each odd-numbered year, the governor shall appoint with the
advice and consent of the senate two registered voters to the commission to
serve for terms of six years from that January or until their successors are
appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs on the commission prior to the
expiration of a term, the governor shall appoint a registered voter within
sixty days to complete the term. Three members shall be residents of that
portion of the state lying east of the summit of the Cascade mountains, and
three shall be residents of that portion of the state lying west of the summit
of the Cascade mountains. Three additional members shall be appointed at-large
((effective July 1, 1993; one of whom shall serve a one and one-half year
term to end December 31, 1994; one of whom shall serve a three and one-half
year term to end December 31, 1996; and one of whom shall serve a five and
one-half year term to end December 31, 1998. Thereafter all members are to
serve a six-year term)). No two members may be residents of the same
county. The legal office of the commission is at the administrative office of
the department in Olympia.

Sec.
204. RCW
77.04.055 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish,
and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the governor
to:

(a)
Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b)
Review the performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife
policies.

The
commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational
opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife
populations.

(2)
The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and
prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or
enjoy game fish and wildlife.

(3)
The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as
provided in RCW 75.08.080 (as recodified by this act).

(4)
The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal, interstate,
international, and any other department agreements relating to fish and
wildlife.

(5)
The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife
laws.

(6)
The commission shall have final approval authority for the department's budget
proposals.

(7)
The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the director of the
department. The director and commission staff shall serve at the pleasure of
the commission.

Sec.
205. RCW
77.04.080 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((Persons
eligible for appointment as director shall have practical knowledge of the
habits and distribution of fish and wildlife.)) The director shall
supervise the administration and operation of the department and perform the
duties prescribed by law and delegated by the commission. The director shall
carry out the basic goals and objectives prescribed under RCW 77.04.055. The
director may appoint and employ necessary personnel. The director may
delegate, in writing, to department personnel the duties and powers necessary
for efficient operation and administration of the department.

Only
persons having general knowledge of the fisheries and wildlife resources and of
the commercial and recreational fishing industry in this state are eligible for
appointment as director. The director shall not have a financial interest in
the fishing industry or a directly related industry. The director shall
receive the salary fixed by the governor under RCW 43.03.040.

The
director is the ex officio secretary of the commission and shall attend its
meetings and keep a record of its business.

((The
director may appoint and employ necessary departmental personnel. The director
may delegate to department personnel the duties and powers necessary for
efficient operation and administration of the department.))

Sec.
206. RCW
77.04.100 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall develop proposals to reinstate the natural salmon and steelhead
trout fish runs in the Tilton and upper Cowlitz rivers in accordance with RCW
75.08.020(3) (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
207. RCW
77.08.010 and 1998 c 190 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this title ((or Title 75 RCW)) or rules adopted ((pursuant to
those)) under this title((s)), unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:

(1)
"Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.

(2)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(3)
"Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.

(4)
"Person" means and includes an individual((,)); a
corporation((,)); a public or private entity or organization; a
local, state, or federal agency; all business organizations, including
corporations and partnerships; or a group of two or more individuals acting
with a common purpose whether acting in an individual, representative, or
official capacity.

(5)
"Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and commissioned
by the director, with authority to enforce ((laws)) this title
and rules adopted pursuant to this title, and other statutes as prescribed by
the legislature. Fish and wildlife officer includes a person commissioned
before June 11, 1998, as a wildlife agent or a fisheries patrol officer.

(6)
"Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned officer
of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its primary function
the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the officer is in the
appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish and wildlife
officer" includes special agents of the national marine fisheries service,
state parks commissioned officers, United States fish and wildlife special
agents, department of natural resources enforcement officers, and United States
forest service officers, while the agents and officers are within their
respective jurisdictions.

(7)
"To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.

(8)
"To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using devices
to capture wild animals or wild birds.

(9)
"To fish," "to harvest," and "to take,"
and ((its)) their derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
harass, or catch a fish or shellfish.

(10)
"Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places or
waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, ((or)) game fish, food
fish, or shellfish that conform to the special restrictions or physical
descriptions established by rule of the commission or that have otherwise been
deemed legal to hunt, fish, take, or possess by rule of the commission.
"Open season" includes the first and last days of the established
time.

(11)
"Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places or
waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an open
season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, taking,
or possession of game animals, game birds, or game fish that do not conform to
the special restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the commission
as an open season or that have not otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, take,
or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.

(12)
"Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some species of wild
animals or wild birds is prohibited.

(13)
"Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or other
body of water, where fishing for game fish is prohibited.

(14)
"Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild animals
and wild birds is prohibited.

(15)
"Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game birds, or
game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by a person, as
specified by rule of the commission for a particular period of time, or as to
size, sex, or species.

(16)
"Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose members
exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not limited to
mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and invertebrates. The term
"wildlife" does not include feral domestic mammals, the family
Muridae of the order Rodentia (old world rats and mice), or those fish,
shellfish, and marine invertebrates classified as food fish or shellfish by the
director. The term "wildlife" includes all stages of development and
the bodily parts of wildlife members.

(17)
"Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana catesbeiana
(bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral domestic
mammals or the family Muridae of the order Rodentia (old world rats and mice).

(18)
"Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose members
exist in Washington in a wild state.

(19)
"Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the commission that
shall not be hunted or fished.

(20)
"Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the commission as
seriously threatened with extinction.

(21)
"Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted except as
authorized by the commission.

(22)
"Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be trapped
except as authorized by the commission.

(23)
"Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except as
authorized by the commission.

(24)
"Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted throughout the
year as authorized by the commission.

(25)
"Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal kingdom not
native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the environment or wildlife
of the state.

(26)
"Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised for
commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.

(27)
"Person of disability" means a permanently disabled person who is not
ambulatory without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or similar
devices.

(28)
"Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food fish by
statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently classified as food fish
or game fish if such species exist in state waters. The term "fish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of fish species.

(29)
"Raffle" means an activity in which tickets bearing an individual
number are sold for not more than twenty-five dollars each and in which a
permit or permits are awarded to hunt or for access to hunt big game animals or
wild turkeys on the basis of a drawing from the tickets by the person or
persons conducting the raffle.

(30)
"Youth" means a person fifteen years old for fishing and under
sixteen years old for hunting.

(31)
"Senior" means a person seventy years old or older.

(32)
"License year" means the period of time for which a recreational
license is valid. The license year begins April 1st, and ends March 31st.

(33)
"Saltwater" means those marine waters seaward of river mouths.

(34)
"Freshwater" means all waters not defined as saltwater including, but
not limited to, rivers upstream of the river mouth, lakes, ponds, and
reservoirs.

(35)
"State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the state.

(36)
"Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean outside
the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine waters of other
states and countries.

(37)
"Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters of the
Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state boundary.

(38)
"Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place of
abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an
application for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to
continue residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as
a resident in another state.

(39)
"Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the qualifications
of a resident.

(40)
"Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken except as
authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish" includes
all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish species.

(41)
"Commercial" means related to or connected with buying, selling, or
bartering. Fishing for food fish or shellfish with gear unlawful for fishing
for personal use, or possessing food fish or shellfish in excess of the limits
permitted for personal use are commercial activities.

(42)
"To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving food
fish or shellfish.

(43)
"Personal use" means for the private use of the individual taking the
food fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.

(44)
"Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable of
being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line operated without
rod or reel.

(45)
"Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species of food
fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical area.

(46)
"Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 75.30 RCW (as recodified by this
act).

(47)
"Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are dependent upon
the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in either an attached or
free floating form, and includes but is not limited to marine aquatic plants in
the classes Chlorophyta, Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.

(48)
"Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or engaging in
sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or deleterious exotic
wildlife.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. A
new section is added to chapter 77.08 RCW to read as follows:

"Food
fish" means those species of the classes Osteichthyes, Agnatha, and
Chondrichthyes that have been classified and that shall not be fished for
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "food fish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of food fish species.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. A
new section is added to chapter 77.08 RCW to read as follows:

"Salmon"
means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except those classified as game
fish in RCW 77.08.020, and includes:

Scientific
Name Common Name

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye salmon

Sec.
210. RCW
77.12.010 and 1985 c 438 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Wildlife
is the property of the state. The department shall preserve, protect, and
perpetuate wildlife. Game animals, game birds, and game fish may be taken only
at times or places, or in manners or quantities as in the judgment of the
commission maximizes public recreational opportunities without impairing the
supply of wildlife.))

The
commission shall not adopt rules that categorically prohibit fishing with bait
or artificial lures in streams, rivers, beaver ponds, and lakes except that the
commission may adopt rules and regulations restricting fishing methods upon a
determination by the director that an individual body of water or part thereof
clearly requires a fishing method prohibition to conserve or enhance the
fisheries resource or to provide selected fishing alternatives. ((The
commission shall attempt to maximize the public recreational fishing
opportunities of all citizens, particularly juvenile, handicapped, and senior
citizens.

Nothing
contained herein shall be construed to infringe on the right of a private
property owner to control the owner's private property.))

Sec.
211. RCW
77.12.035 and 1995 c 370 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((department)) commission shall protect grizzly bears and develop
management programs on publicly owned lands that will encourage the natural
regeneration of grizzly bears in areas with suitable habitat. Grizzly bears
shall not be transplanted or introduced into the state. Only grizzly bears
that are native to Washington state may be utilized by the department for
management programs. The department is directed to fully participate in all
discussions and negotiations with federal and state agencies relating to
grizzly bear management and shall fully communicate, support, and implement the
policies of this section.

Sec.
212. RCW
77.12.055 and 1998 c 190 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers shall
enforce this title, ((Title 75 RCW,)) rules of the department, and other
statutes as prescribed by the legislature. However, when acting within the
scope of these duties and when an offense occurs in the presence of the fish
and wildlife officer who is not an ex officio fish and wildlife officer, the
fish and wildlife officer may enforce all criminal laws of the state. The fish
and wildlife officer must have successfully completed the basic law enforcement
academy course sponsored by the criminal justice training commission, or a
course approved by the department and the criminal justice training commission
and provided by the department or the criminal justice training commission,
prior to enforcing the criminal laws of the state.

(2)
Fish and wildlife officers are peace officers.

(3)
Any liability or claim of liability under chapter 4.92 RCW that arises out of
the exercise or alleged exercise of authority by a fish and wildlife officer
rests with the department unless the fish and wildlife officer acts under the
direction and control of another agency or unless the liability is otherwise
assumed under an agreement between the department and another agency.

(4)
Fish and wildlife officers may serve and execute warrants and processes issued
by the courts.

(5)
Fish and wildlife officers may enforce RCW 79.01.805 and 79.01.810.

(6)
Fish and wildlife officers are authorized to enforce all provisions of
chapter 88.02 RCW and any rules adopted under that chapter, and the provisions
of RCW 43.51.400 and any rules adopted under that section.

(7)
To enforce the laws of this title ((and Title 75 RCW)), fish and
wildlife officers may call to their aid any ex officio fish and wildlife officer
or citizen and that person shall render aid.

Sec.
213. RCW
77.12.080 and 1998 c 190 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

Fish
and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers may arrest
without warrant persons found violating the law or rules adopted pursuant to
this title ((and Title 75 RCW)).

Sec.
214. RCW
77.12.090 and 1998 c 190 s 115 are each amended to read as follows:

Fish
and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers may make a
reasonable search without warrant of a vessel, ((container, or))
conveyances, vehicles, containers, packages, ((game baskets, game
coats,)) or other receptacles for fish and wildlife((, or tents, camps,
or similar places)) which they have reason to believe contain evidence of a
violation of law or rules adopted pursuant to this title ((or Title 75 RCW))
and seize evidence as needed for law enforcement. This authority does not extend
to quarters in a boat, building, or other property used exclusively as a
private domicile, does not extend to transitory residences in which a person
has a reasonable expectation of privacy, and does not allow search and seizure
without a warrant if the thing or place is protected from search without
warrant within the meaning of Article I, section 7, of the state Constitution.
Seizure of property as evidence of a crime does not preclude seizure of the
property ((if authorized)) for forfeiture as authorized by law.

Sec.
215. RCW
77.12.103 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((The burden of proof of any exemption or exception to seizure or forfeiture
of personal property involved with wildlife offenses is upon the person
claiming it.

(2))) An
authorized state, county, or municipal officer may be subject to civil
liability under RCW ((77.12.101)) 77.15.070 for willful
misconduct or gross negligence in the performance of his or her duties.

(((3)))
(2) The director, the fish and wildlife commission, or the department
may be subject to civil liability for their willful or reckless misconduct in
matters involving the seizure and forfeiture of personal property involved with
fish or wildlife offenses.

Sec.
216. RCW
77.12.200 and 1987 c 506 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may authorize the director to acquire by gift, purchase, lease, or
condemnation lands, buildings, waters, water rights, rights of way, or
other necessary property for purposes consistent with this title, together with
rights of way for access to the property so acquired. Except to clear title
and acquire access rights of way, the power of condemnation may be exercised by
the director only when an appropriation has been made by the legislature for
the acquisition of a specific property.

Sec.
217. RCW
77.12.204 and 1993 sp.s. c 4 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of fish and wildlife shall implement practices necessary to
meet the standards developed under RCW 79.01.295 on agency-owned and managed
agricultural and grazing lands. The standards may be modified on a
site-specific basis as necessary and as determined by the department of ((fisheries
or)) fish and wildlife, for species that these agencies respectively
manage, to achieve the goals established under RCW 79.01.295(1). Existing
lessees shall be provided an opportunity to participate in any site-specific
field review. Department agricultural and grazing leases issued after December
31, 1994, shall be subject to practices to achieve the standards that meet
those developed pursuant to RCW 79.01.295.

This
section shall in no way prevent the department of fish and wildlife from
managing its lands to accomplish its statutory mandate pursuant to RCW
77.12.010, nor shall it prevent the department from managing its lands
according to the provisions of RCW 77.12.210 or rules adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

Sec.
218. RCW
77.12.210 and 1987 c 506 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall maintain and manage real or personal property owned, leased, or
held by the department and shall control the construction of buildings, structures,
and improvements in or on the property. The director may adopt rules for the
operation and maintenance of the property.

The
commission may authorize the director to sell, lease, convey, or grant
concessions upon real or personal property under the control of the
department. This includes the authority to sell timber, gravel, sand, and
other materials or products from real property held by the department ((and
may authorize the director)), and to sell or lease the department's
real or personal property or grant concessions or rights of way for roads or
utilities in the property. Oil and gas resources owned by the state which lie
below lands owned, leased, or held by the department shall be offered for lease
by the commissioner of public lands pursuant to chapter 79.14 RCW with the
proceeds being deposited in the state wildlife fund: PROVIDED, That the
commissioner of public lands shall condition such leases at the request of the
department to protect wildlife and its habitat.

If
the commission determines that real or personal property held by the department
cannot be used advantageously by the department, the director may dispose of
that property if it is in the public interest.

If
the state acquired real property with use limited to specific purposes, the
director may negotiate terms for the return of the property to the donor or
grantor. Other real property shall be sold to the highest bidder at public
auction. After appraisal, notice of the auction shall be published at least
once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
within the county where the property is located at least twenty days prior to
sale.

Proceeds
from the sales shall be deposited in the state wildlife fund.

Sec.
219. RCW 77.12.220
and 1987 c 506 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this title, the commission may make agreements to obtain real or
personal property or to transfer or convey property held by the state to the
United States or its agencies or instrumentalities, ((political subdivisions))
units of local government of this state, public service companies, or
other persons, if in the judgment of the commission and the attorney general
the transfer and conveyance is consistent with public interest. For
purposes of this section, "local government" means any city, town,
county, special district, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation.

If
the commission agrees to a transfer or conveyance under this section or to a
sale or return of real property under RCW 77.12.210, the director shall
certify, with the attorney general, to the governor that the agreement has been
made. The certification shall describe the real property. The governor then
may execute and the secretary of state attest and deliver to the appropriate
entity or person the instrument necessary to fulfill the agreement.

Sec.
220. RCW
77.12.250 and 1980 c 78 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, ((wildlife agents)) fish and wildlife officers, ex
officio ((wildlife agents)) fish and wildlife officers, and
department employees may enter upon lands or waters and remain there while
performing their duties without liability for trespass. It is lawful for
aircraft operated by the department to land and take off from beaches or waters
of the state.

Sec.
221. RCW
77.12.315 and 1987 c 506 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the director determines that a severe problem exists in an area of the state
because deer and elk are being pursued, harassed, attacked or killed by dogs,
the director may declare by emergency rule that an emergency exists and specify
the area where it is lawful for fish and wildlife ((agents)) officers
to take into custody or destroy the dogs if necessary. Fish and wildlife
((agents)) officers who take into custody or destroy a dog
pursuant to this section are immune from civil or criminal liability arising
from their actions.

Sec.
222. RCW
77.12.470 and 1980 c 78 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

To
enforce RCW 77.12.480 and 77.12.490 (as recodified by this act), courts
in the counties contiguous to the boundary waters, fish and wildlife ((agents))
officers, and ex officio fish and wildlife ((agents)) officers
have jurisdiction over the boundary waters to the furthermost shoreline. This
jurisdiction is concurrent with the courts and law enforcement officers of
Idaho.

Sec.
223. RCW
77.12.480 and 1980 c 78 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

The
taking of wildlife from the boundary waters or islands of the Snake river shall
be in accordance with the wildlife laws of the respective states. Fish and
wildlife ((agents)) officers and ex officio fish and
wildlife ((agents)) officers shall honor the license of either
state and the right of the holder to take wildlife from the boundary waters and
islands in accordance with the laws of the state issuing the license.

Sec.
224. RCW
77.12.490 and 1980 c 78 s 65 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of RCW 77.12.450 through 77.12.490 (as recodified by this act)
is to avoid the conflict, confusion, and difficulty of locating the state
boundary in or on the boundary waters and islands of the Snake river. These
sections do not allow the holder of a Washington license to fish or hunt on the
shoreline, sloughs, or tributaries on the Idaho side, nor allow the holder of
an Idaho license to fish or hunt on the shoreline, sloughs, or tributaries on
the Washington side.

Sec.
225. RCW
77.12.610 and 1982 c 155 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The purposes of RCW 77.12.610 through 77.12.630 ((and 77.16.610))
are to facilitate the department's gathering of biological data for managing
wildlife, fish, and shellfish resources of this state and to protect ((wildlife))
these resources by assuring compliance with Title 77 RCW, and rules
adopted thereunder, in a manner designed to minimize inconvenience to the
public.

Sec.
226. RCW
77.12.620 and 1982 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to require hunters and fishermen occupying a motor
vehicle approaching or entering a check station to stop and produce for
inspection: (1) Any wildlife, fish, shellfish, or seaweed in their
possession; (2) licenses, permits, tags, stamps, or ((punchcards)) catch
record cards, required under Title 77 RCW, or rules adopted thereunder.
For these purposes, the department is authorized to operate check stations
which shall be plainly marked by signs, operated by at least one uniformed fish
and wildlife ((agent)) officer, and operated in a safe
manner.

Sec.
227. RCW
77.12.630 and 1982 c 155 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
powers conferred by RCW 77.12.610 through 77.12.630 ((and 77.16.610))
are in addition to all other powers conferred by law upon the department.
Nothing in RCW 77.12.610 through 77.12.630 ((and 77.16.610)) shall be
construed to prohibit the department from operating wildlife information
stations at which persons shall not be required to stop and report, or from
executing arrests, searches, or seizures otherwise authorized by law.

Sec.
228. RCW
77.12.655 and 1990 c 84 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, shall adopt
and enforce necessary rules defining the extent and boundaries of habitat
buffer zones for bald eagles. Rules shall take into account the need for
variation of the extent of the zone from case to case, and the need for
protection of bald eagles. The rules shall also establish guidelines and
priorities for purchase or trade and establishment of conservation easements
and/or leases to protect such designated properties. The department shall also
adopt rules to provide adequate notice to property owners of their options
under RCW 77.12.650 ((through 77.12.655)).

Sec.
229. RCW
77.12.830 and 1997 c 425 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning in January 1998, the department of fish and wildlife and the
department of natural resources shall implement a habitat incentives program
based on the recommendations of federally recognized Indian tribes, landowners,
the regional fisheries enhancement groups, the timber, fish, and wildlife
cooperators, and other interested parties. The program shall allow a private
landowner to enter into an agreement with the departments to enhance habitat on
the landowner's property for food fish, game fish, or other wildlife species. In
exchange, the landowner shall receive state regulatory certainty with regard to
future applications for hydraulic project approval or a forest practices permit
on the property covered by the agreement. The overall goal of the program is
to provide a mechanism that facilitates habitat development on private property
while avoiding an adverse state regulatory impact to the landowner at some
future date. A single agreement between the departments and a landowner may
encompass up to one thousand acres. A landowner may enter into multiple
agreements with the departments, provided that the total acreage covered by
such agreements with a single landowner does not exceed ten thousand acres.
The departments are not obligated to enter into an agreement unless the
departments find that the agreement is in the best interest of protecting fish
or wildlife species or their habitat.

(2)
A habitat incentives agreement shall be in writing and shall contain at least
the following: A description of the property covered by the agreement, an
expiration date, a description of the condition of the property prior to the
implementation of the agreement, and other information needed by the landowner
and the departments for future reference and decisions.

(3)
As part of the agreement, the department of fish and wildlife may stipulate the
factors that will be considered when the department evaluates a landowner's
application for hydraulic project approval under RCW 75.20.100 or 75.20.103 (as
recodified by this act) on property covered by the agreement. The
department's identification of these evaluation factors shall be in concurrence
with the department of natural resources and affected federally recognized
Indian tribes. In general, future decisions related to the issuance, conditioning,
or denial of hydraulic project approval shall be based on the conditions
present on the landowner's property at the time of the agreement, unless all
parties agree otherwise.

(4)
As part of the agreement, the department of natural resources may stipulate the
factors that will be considered when the department evaluates a landowner's
application for a forest practices permit under chapter 76.09 RCW on property
covered by the agreement. The department's identification of these evaluation
factors shall be in concurrence with the department of fish and wildlife and
affected federally recognized Indian tribes. In general, future decisions
related to the issuance, conditioning, or denial of forest practices permits
shall be based on the conditions present on the landowner's property at the
time of the agreement, unless all parties agree otherwise.

(5)
The agreement is binding on and may be used by only the landowner who entered
into the agreement with the department. The agreement shall not be appurtenant
with the land. However, if a new landowner chooses to maintain the habitat
enhancement efforts on the property, the new landowner and the departments may
jointly choose to retain the agreement on the property.

(6)
If the departments receive multiple requests for agreements with private
landowners under the habitat incentives program, the departments shall
prioritize these requests and shall enter into as many agreements as possible
within available budgetary resources.

Sec.
230. RCW
77.15.070 and 1998 c 190 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers may seize
without warrant boats, airplanes, vehicles, motorized implements,
conveyances, gear, appliances, or other articles they have probable cause
to believe have been held with intent to violate or used in violation of
this ((chapter)) title or rule of the commission or director.
However, fish and wildlife officers or ex officio fish and wildlife officers
may not seize any item or article, other than for evidence, if under the
circumstances, it is reasonable to conclude that the violation was
inadvertent. The property seized is subject to forfeiture to the state under
this section regardless of ownership. Property seized may be recovered by its
owner by depositing into court a cash bond equal to the value of the seized
property but not more than twenty‑five thousand dollars. Such cash bond
is subject to forfeiture in lieu of the property. Forfeiture of property
seized under this section is a civil forfeiture ((against property)) and
is intended to be a remedial civil sanction.

(2)
In the event of a seizure of property under this section, jurisdiction to begin
the forfeiture proceedings shall commence upon seizure. Within fifteen days
following the seizure, the seizing authority shall serve a written notice of
intent to forfeit property on the owner of the property seized and on any
person having any known right or interest in the property seized. Notice may
be served by any method authorized by law or court rule, including service by
certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is deemed
complete upon mailing within the fifteen‑day period following the
seizure.

(3)
Persons claiming a right of ownership or right to possession of property are
entitled to a hearing to contest forfeiture. Such a claim shall specify the
claim of ownership or possession and shall be made in writing and served on the
director within forty‑five days of the seizure. If the seizing authority
has complied with notice requirements and there is no claim made within
forty-five days, then the property shall be forfeited to the state.

(4)
If any person timely serves the director with a claim to property, the person
shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard as to the person's claim or
right. The hearing shall be before the director or director's designee, or
before an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except
that a person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of
competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the property seized is more
than five thousand dollars.

(5)
The hearing to contest forfeiture and any subsequent appeal shall be as
provided for in ((Title 34 RCW)) chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act. The seizing authority has the burden to
demonstrate that it had reason to believe the property was held with intent to
violate or was used in violation of this title or rule of the commission or
director. The person contesting forfeiture has the burden of production and
proof by a preponderance of evidence that the person owns or has a right to
possess the property and:

(a)
That the property was not held with intent to violate or used in violation of
this title ((or Title 75 RCW)); or

(b)
If the property is a boat, airplane, or vehicle, that the illegal use or
planned illegal use of the boat, airplane, or vehicle occurred without the
owner's knowledge or consent, and that the owner acted reasonably to prevent
illegal uses of such boat, airplane, or vehicle.

(6)
A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a perfected security interest is
subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had
knowledge (([of])) of nor consented to the act or omission. No
security interest in seized property may be perfected after seizure.

(7)
If seized property is forfeited under this section the department may retain it
for official use unless the property is required to be destroyed, or upon
application by any law enforcement agency of the state, release such property
to the agency for the use of enforcing this title, or sell such property, and
deposit the proceeds to the wildlife fund, as provided for in RCW 77.12.170.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 231. A
new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW to read as follows:

Fish
and wildlife officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers may seize
without a warrant wildlife, fish, and shellfish they have probable cause to
believe have been taken, transported, or possessed in violation of this title
or rule of the commission or director.

Sec.
232. RCW
77.15.080 and 1998 c 190 s 113 are each amended to read as follows:

Based
upon articulable facts that a person is actively engaged in fishing or
hunting activities, fish and wildlife officers have the authority to
temporarily stop the person and check for valid licenses, tags, permits,
stamps, or catch record cards, and to inspect all fish and wildlife in
possession as well as the equipment being used to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this title ((and Title 75 RCW)). For purposes of
this section, "actively engaged in fishing or hunting activities"
means to make an effort to hunt or fish, and includes a reasonable time period
after a person has returned to camp or dock-side in order to check any creel or
container for numbers and types of fish, shellfish, or wildlife.

Sec.
233. RCW
77.15.090 and 1998 c 190 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

On
a showing of probable cause that there has been a violation of any fish or
wildlife law of the state of Washington, or upon a showing of probable cause to
believe that evidence of such violation may be found at a place, a court shall
issue a search warrant or arrest warrant. Fish and wildlife officers may
execute any such arrest or search warrant reasonably necessary to their duties
under this title ((or Title 75 RCW)) and may seize fish and wildlife or
any evidence of a crime and the fruits or instrumentalities of a crime as
provided by warrant. The court may have a building, enclosure, vehicle,
vessel, container, or receptacle opened or entered and the contents examined.

Sec.
234. RCW
77.15.100 and 1998 c 190 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless otherwise provided in this title ((or Title 75 RCW)), fish,
shellfish, or wildlife unlawfully taken or possessed, or involved in a
violation shall be forfeited to the state upon conviction. Unless already held
by, sold, destroyed, or disposed of by the department, the court shall order
such fish or wildlife to be delivered to the department. Where delay will
cause loss to the value of the property and a ready wholesale buying market
exists, the department may sell property to a wholesale buyer at a fair market
value.

(2)
((The department may use, sell, or destroy any other)) When seized
property is forfeited ((by the court or)) to the
department, the department may retain it for official use unless the
property is required to be destroyed, or upon application by any law
enforcement agency of the state, release the property to the agency for the use
of enforcing this title, or sell such property and deposit the proceeds into
the state wildlife fund established under RCW 77.12.170. Any sale of other
property shall be at public auction or after public advertisement reasonably
designed to obtain the highest price. The time, place, and manner of holding
the sale shall be determined by the director. The director may contract for
the sale to be through the department of general administration as state
surplus property, or, except where not justifiable by the value of the
property, the director shall publish notice of the sale once a week for at
least two consecutive weeks before the sale in at least one newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the sale is to be held. ((Proceeds
of the sale shall be deposited in the state treasury to be credited to the state
wildlife fund.))

Sec.
235. RCW
77.15.120 and 1998 c 190 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the
second degree if the person hunts, fishes, possesses, maliciously harasses or
kills fish or wildlife, or maliciously destroys the nests or eggs of fish or
wildlife and the fish or wildlife is designated by the commission as
endangered, and the taking has not been authorized by rule of the commission.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the
first degree if the person has been:

(a)
Convicted under subsection (1) of this section or convicted of any crime under
this title involving the killing, possessing, harassing, or harming of
endangered fish or wildlife; and

(b)
Within five years of the date of the prior conviction the person commits the
act described by subsection (1) of this section.

(3)(a)
Unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

(b)
Unlawful taking of endangered fish or wildlife in the first degree is a class C
felony. The department shall revoke any licenses or tags used in connection
with the crime and order the person's privileges to hunt, fish, trap, or obtain
licenses under this title ((and Title 75 RCW)) to be suspended for two
years.

Sec.
236. RCW
77.15.160 and 1998 c 190 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person is guilty of an infraction, which shall be cited and punished as
provided under chapter 7.84 RCW, if the person:

(1)
Fails to immediately record a catch of fish or shellfish on a catch record card
required by RCW ((75.25.190 or 77.32.050)) 77.32.430, or required
by rule of the commission under this title ((or Title 75 RCW)); or

(2)
Fishes for personal use using barbed hooks in violation of any rule; or

(3)
Violates any other rule of the commission or director that is designated by
rule as an infraction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 237. A
new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW to read as follows:

Any
person who is damaged by any act prohibited in RCW 77.15.210 may bring a civil
action to enjoin further violations, and recover damages sustained, including a
reasonable attorneys' fee. The trial court may increase the award of damages
to an amount not to exceed three times the damages sustained. A party seeking
civil damages under this section may recover upon proof of a violation by a
preponderance of the evidence. The state of Washington may bring a civil
action to enjoin violations of this section.

Sec.
238. RCW
77.15.300 and 1998 c 190 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities if
the person constructs any form of hydraulic project or performs other work on a
hydraulic project and:

(a)
Fails to have a hydraulic project approval required under chapter 75.20 RCW (as
recodified by this act) for such construction or work; or

(b)
Violates any requirements or conditions of the hydraulic project approval for
such construction or work.

(2)
Unlawfully undertaking hydraulic project activities is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
239. RCW
77.15.310 and 1998 c 190 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful failure to use or maintain an approved fish
guard on a diversion device if the person owns, controls, or operates a device
used for diverting or conducting water from a lake, river, or stream and:

(a)
The device is not equipped with a fish guard, screen, or bypass approved by the
director as required by RCW 75.20.040 ((or 77.16.220)) (as recodified
by this act); or

(b)
The person knowingly fails to maintain or operate an approved fish guard,
screen, or bypass so as to effectively screen or prevent fish from entering the
intake.

(2)
Unlawful failure to use or maintain an approved fish guard, screen, or bypass
on a diversion device is a gross misdemeanor. Following written notification
to the person from the department that there is a violation, each day that a
diversion device is operated without an approved or maintained fish guard,
screen, or bypass is a separate offense.

Sec.
240. RCW
77.15.320 and 1998 c 190 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful failure to provide, maintain, or operate a
fishway for dam or other obstruction if the person owns, operates, or controls
a dam or other obstruction to fish passage on a river or stream and:

(a)
The dam or obstruction is not provided with a durable and efficient fishway
approved by the director as required by RCW 75.20.060 (as recodified by this
act);

(b)
Fails to maintain a fishway in efficient operating condition; or

(c)
Fails to continuously supply a fishway with a sufficient supply of water to
allow the free passage of fish.

(2)
Unlawful failure to provide, maintain, or operate a fishway for dam or other
obstruction is a gross misdemeanor. Following written notification to the
person from the department that there is a violation, each day of unlawful
failure to provide, maintain, or operate a fishway is a separate offense.

Sec.
241. RCW
77.15.350 and 1998 c 190 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of violating a rule regarding inspection and disease control
of aquatic farms if the person:

(a)
Violates any rule adopted under chapter 75.58 RCW (as recodified by this
act) regarding the inspection and disease control program for an aquatic
farm; or

(b)
Fails to register or report production from an aquatic farm as required by
chapter 75.58 RCW (as recodified by this act).

(2)
A violation of a rule regarding inspection and disease control of aquatic farms
is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
242. RCW
77.15.360 and 1998 c 190 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful interfering in department operations if the
person prevents department employees from carrying out duties authorized by
this title ((or Title 75 RCW)), including but not limited to interfering
in the operation of department vehicles, vessels, or aircraft.

(2)
Unlawful interfering in department operations is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
243. RCW
77.15.380 and 1998 c 190 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful recreational fishing in the second degree if the
person fishes for, takes, possesses, or harvests fish or shellfish and:

(a)
The person does not have and possess the license or the catch record card
required by chapter 75.25 (as recodified by this act) or 77.32 RCW for
such activity; or

(b)
The action violates any rule of the commission or the director regarding
seasons, bag or possession limits but less than two times the bag or possession
limit, closed areas, closed times, or any other rule addressing the manner or
method of fishing or possession of fish, except for use of a net to take fish
as provided for in RCW 77.15.580.

(2)
Unlawful recreational fishing in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
244. RCW
77.15.390 and 1998 c 190 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful taking of seaweed if the person takes,
possesses, or harvests seaweed and:

(a)
The person does not have and possess the license required by chapter 75.25 RCW (as
recodified by this act) for taking seaweed; or

(b)
The action violates any rule of the department or the department of natural
resources regarding seasons, possession limits, closed areas, closed times, or
any other rule addressing the manner or method of taking, possessing, or
harvesting of seaweed.

(2)
Unlawful taking of seaweed is a misdemeanor. This does not affect rights of
the state to recover civilly for trespass, conversion, or theft of state-owned
valuable materials.

Sec.
245. RCW
77.15.470 and 1998 c 190 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawfully avoiding wildlife check stations or field
inspections if the person fails to:

(a)
Obey check station signs;

(b)
Stop and report at a check station if directed to do so by a uniformed fish and
wildlife officer; or

(c)
Produce for inspection upon request by a fish and wildlife officer: (i)
Hunting or fishing equipment; (ii) seaweed, fish, shellfish, or wildlife; or
(iii) licenses, permits, tags, stamps, or catch record cards required by this
title ((or Title 75 RCW)).

(2)
Unlawfully avoiding wildlife check stations or field inspections is a gross
misdemeanor.

(3)
Wildlife check stations may not be established upon interstate highways or
state routes.

Sec.
246. RCW
77.15.480 and 1980 c 78 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

Articles
or devices unlawfully used, possessed, or maintained for catching, taking,
killing, attracting, or decoying wildlife are public nuisances. If necessary, fish
and wildlife ((agents)) officers and ex officio fish and
wildlife ((agents)) officers may seize, abate, or destroy these
public nuisances without warrant or process.

Sec.
247. RCW
77.15.500 and 1998 c 190 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of commercial fishing without a license in the second degree
if the person fishes for, takes, or delivers food fish, shellfish, or game fish
while acting for commercial purposes and:

(a)
The person does not hold a fishery license or delivery license under chapter
75.28 RCW (as recodified by this act) for the food fish or shellfish; or

(b)
The person is not a licensed operator designated as an alternate operator on a
fishery or delivery license under chapter 75.28 RCW (as recodified by this
act) for the food fish or shellfish.

(2)
A person is guilty of commercial fishing without a license in the first degree
if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section and:

(a)
The violation involves taking, delivery, or possession of food fish or
shellfish with a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more; or

(b)
The violation involves taking, delivery, or possession of food fish or
shellfish from an area that was closed to the taking of such food fish or
shellfish by any statute or rule.

(3)(a)
Commercial fishing without a license in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

(b)
Commercial fishing without a license in the first degree is a class C felony.

Sec.
248. RCW
77.15.530 and 1998 c 190 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who holds a fishery license required by chapter 75.28 RCW (as
recodified by this act), or who holds an operator's license and is
designated as an alternate operator on a fishery license required by chapter
75.28 RCW (as recodified by this act), is guilty of unlawful use of a
nondesignated vessel if the person takes, fishes for, or delivers from that
fishery using a vessel not designated on the person's license, when vessel
designation is required by chapter 75.28 RCW (as recodified by this act).

(2)
Unlawful use of a nondesignated vessel is a gross misdemeanor.

(3)
A nondesignated vessel may be used, subject to appropriate notification to the
department and in accordance with rules established by the commission, when a
designated vessel is inoperative because of accidental damage or mechanical
breakdown.

(4)
If the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section and
the vessel designated on the person's fishery license was used by any person in
the fishery on the same day, then the violation for using a nondesignated
vessel is a class C felony. Upon conviction the department shall order
revocation and suspension of all commercial fishing privileges under chapter
75.28 RCW (as recodified by this act) for a period of one year.

Sec.
249. RCW
77.15.540 and 1998 c 190 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who holds a fishery license required by chapter 75.28 RCW (as
recodified by this act), or who holds an operator's license and is
designated as an alternate operator on a fishery license required by chapter
75.28 RCW (as recodified by this act), is guilty of unlawful use of a
commercial fishery license if the person:

(a)
Does not have the commercial fishery license or operator's license in
possession during fishing or delivery; or

(b)
Violates any rule of the department regarding the use, possession, display, or
presentation of the person's license, decals, or vessel numbers.

(2)
Unlawful use of a commercial fishery license is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
250. RCW
77.15.570 and 1998 c 190 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, it is unlawful for a
person who is not a treaty Indian fisherman to participate in the taking of
fish or shellfish in a treaty Indian fishery, or to be on board a vessel, or
associated equipment, operating in a treaty Indian fishery. A violation of
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

(2)
A person who violates subsection (1) of this section with the intent of acting
for commercial purposes, including any sale of catch, control of catch, profit
from catch, or payment for fishing assistance, is guilty of a class C felony.
Upon conviction, the department shall order revocation of any license and a
one-year suspension of all commercial fishing privileges requiring a license
under chapter 75.28 or 75.30 RCW (as recodified by this act).

(3)(a)
The spouse, forebears, siblings, children, and grandchildren of a treaty Indian
fisherman may assist the fisherman in exercising treaty Indian fishing rights
when the treaty Indian fisherman is present at the fishing site.

(b)
Other treaty Indian fishermen with off-reservation treaty fishing rights in the
same usual and accustomed places, whether or not the fishermen are members of
the same tribe or another treaty tribe, may assist a treaty Indian fisherman in
exercising treaty Indian fishing rights when the treaty Indian fisherman is
present at the fishing site.

(c)
Biologists approved by the department may be on board a vessel operating in a
treaty Indian fishery.

(4)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Treaty Indian fisherman" means a person who may exercise treaty
Indian fishing rights as determined under United States v. Washington, 384 F.
Supp. 312 (W.D. Wash. 1974), or Sohappy v. Smith, 302 F. Supp. 899 (D. Oregon
1969), and post-trial orders of those courts;

(b)
"Treaty Indian fishery" means a fishery open to only treaty Indian
fishermen by tribal or federal regulation;

(c)
"To participate" and its derivatives mean an effort to operate a
vessel or fishing equipment, provide immediate supervision in the operation of
a vessel or fishing equipment, or otherwise assist in the fishing operation, to
claim possession of a share of the catch, or to represent that the catch was
lawfully taken in an Indian fishery.

(5)
A violation of this section constitutes illegal fishing and is subject to the
suspensions provided for commercial fishing violations.

Sec.
251. RCW
77.15.580 and 1998 c 190 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful use of a net to take fish in the second degree
if the person:

(a)
Lays, sets, uses, or controls a net or other device or equipment capable of
taking fish from the waters of this state, except if the person has a valid
license for such fishing gear from the director under this title and is acting
in accordance with all rules of the commission and director; or

(b)
Fails to return unauthorized fish to the water immediately while otherwise lawfully
operating a net under a valid license.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful use of a net to take fish in the first degree if
the person:

(a)
Commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section; and

(b)
The violation occurs within five years of entry of a prior conviction for a
gross misdemeanor or felony under this title ((or Title 75 RCW))
involving fish, other than a recreational fishing violation, or involving
unlawful use of nets.

(3)(a)
Unlawful use of a net to take fish in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke any license held
under this title ((or Title 75 RCW)) allowing commercial net fishing
used in connection with the crime.

(b)
Unlawful use of a net to take fish in the first degree is a class C felony.
Upon conviction, the department shall order a one-year suspension of all
commercial fishing privileges requiring a license under this title ((or
Title 75 RCW)).

(4)
Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, it is lawful to use a
landing net to land fish otherwise legally hooked.

Sec.
252. RCW
77.15.620 and 1998 c 190 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in
the second degree if the person:

(a)
Engages in the commercial processing of fish or shellfish, including custom
canning or processing of personal use fish or shellfish and does not hold a
wholesale dealer's license required by RCW 75.28.300(1) or 77.32.211 (as
recodified by this act) for anadromous game fish;

(b)
Engages in the wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of food fish or
shellfish and does not hold a wholesale dealer's or buying license required by
RCW 75.28.300(2) or 77.32.211 (as recodified by this act) for anadromous
game fish;

(c)
Is a fisher who lands and sells his or her catch or harvest in the state to
anyone other than a licensed wholesale dealer within or outside the state and does
not hold a wholesale dealer's license required by RCW 75.28.300(3) or 77.32.211
(as recodified by this act) for anadromous game fish; or

(d)
Engages in the commercial manufacture or preparation of fertilizer, oil, meal,
caviar, fish bait, or other byproducts from food fish or shellfish and does not
hold a wholesale dealer's license required by RCW 75.28.300(4) or 77.32.211 (as
recodified by this act) for anadromous game fish.

(2)
Engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in the second degree is a
gross misdemeanor.

(3)
A person is guilty of engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in
the first degree if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of
this section and the violation involves fish or shellfish worth two hundred
fifty dollars or more. Engaging in fish dealing activity without a license in
the first degree is a class C felony.

Sec.
253. RCW
77.15.630 and 1998 c 190 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who holds a fish dealer's license required by RCW 75.28.300 (as
recodified by this act), an anadromous game fish buyer's license required
by RCW 77.32.211 (as recodified by this act), or a fish buyer's license
required by RCW 75.28.340 (as recodified by this act) is guilty of
unlawful use of fish buying and dealing licenses in the second degree if the
person:

(a)
Possesses or receives fish or shellfish for commercial purposes worth less than
two hundred fifty dollars; and

(b)
Fails to document such fish or shellfish with a fish-receiving ticket required
by statute or rule of the department.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful use of fish buying and dealing licenses in the
first degree if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section and:

(a)
The violation involves fish or shellfish worth two hundred fifty dollars or
more;

(b)
The person acted with knowledge that the fish or shellfish were taken from a
closed area, at a closed time, or by a person not licensed to take such fish or
shellfish for commercial purposes; or

(c)
The person acted with knowledge that the fish or shellfish were taken in
violation of any tribal law.

(3)(a)
Unlawful use of fish buying and dealing licenses in the second degree is a
gross misdemeanor.

(b)
Unlawful use of fish buying and dealing licenses in the first degree is a class
C felony. Upon conviction, the department shall suspend all privileges to
engage in fish buying or dealing for two years.

Sec.
254. RCW
77.15.640 and 1998 c 190 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who holds a wholesale fish dealer's license required by RCW 75.28.300 (as
recodified by this act), an anadromous game fish buyer's license required
by RCW 77.32.211 (as recodified by this act), or a fish buyer's license
required by RCW 75.28.340 (as recodified by this act) is guilty of
violating rules governing wholesale fish buying and dealing if the person:

(a)
Fails to possess or display his or her license when engaged in any act
requiring the license;

(b)
Fails to display or uses the license in violation of any rule of the
department;

(c)
Files a signed fish-receiving ticket but fails to provide all information
required by rule of the department; or

(d)
Violates any other rule of the department regarding wholesale fish buying and
dealing.

(2)
Violating rules governing wholesale fish buying and dealing is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec.
255. RCW
77.15.650 and 1998 c 190 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful purchase or use of a license in the second
degree if the person buys, holds, uses, displays, transfers, or obtains any
license, tag, permit, or approval required by this title ((or Title 75 RCW))
and the person:

(a)
Uses false information to buy, hold, use, display, or obtain a license, permit,
tag, or approval;

(b)
Acquires, holds, or buys in excess of one license, permit, or tag for a license
year if only one license, permit, or tag is allowed per license year;

(c)
Uses or displays a license, permit, tag, or approval that was issued to another
person;

(d)
Permits or allows a license, permit, tag, or approval to be used or displayed
by another person not named on the license, permit, tag, or approval;

(e)
Acquires or holds a license while privileges for the license are revoked or
suspended.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful purchase or use of a license in the first degree
if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this section and
the person was acting with intent that the license, permit, tag, or approval be
used for any commercial purpose. A person is presumed to be acting with such
intent if the violation involved obtaining, holding, displaying, or using a
license or permit for participation in any commercial fishery issued under this
title ((or Title 75 RCW)) or a license authorizing fish or wildlife
buying, trafficking, or wholesaling.

(3)(a)
Unlawful purchase or use of a license in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall revoke any unlawfully used
or held licenses and order a two-year suspension of participation in the
activities for which the person unlawfully obtained, held, or used a license.

(b)
Unlawful purchase or use of a license in the first degree is a class C felony.
Upon conviction, the department shall revoke any unlawfully used or held
licenses and order a five-year suspension of participation in any activities
for which the person unlawfully obtained, held, or used a license.

(4)
For purposes of this section, a person "uses" a license, permit, tag,
or approval if the person engages in any activity authorized by the license,
permit, tag, or approval held or possessed by the person. Such uses include
but are not limited to fishing, hunting, taking, trapping, delivery or landing
fish or wildlife, and selling, buying, or wholesaling of fish or wildlife.

(5)
Any license obtained in violation of this section is void upon issuance and is
of no legal effect.

Sec.
256. RCW
77.15.710 and 1998 c 190 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall revoke all hunting, fishing, or other licenses issued
under this title and order a ten-year suspension of all privileges extended
under the authority of the department of a person convicted of assault on a
fish and wildlife officer ((or other law enforcement officer provided that:

(a)
The fish and wildlife officer or other law enforcement officer was on duty at
the time of the assault; and

(b)
The fish and wildlife officer or other law enforcement officer was enforcing
the provisions of this title)), ex officio officer,
employee, agent, or personnel acting for the department, if the employee
assaulted was on duty at the time of the assault and carrying out the
provisions of this title. The suspension shall be continued beyond this period
if any damages to the victim have not been paid by the suspended person.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the definition of assault includes:

(a)
RCW 9A.32.030; murder in the first degree;

(b)
RCW 9A.32.050; murder in the second degree;

(c)
RCW 9A.32.060; manslaughter in the first degree;

(d)
RCW 9A.32.070; manslaughter in the second degree;

(e)
RCW 9A.36.011; assault in the first degree;

(f)
RCW 9A.36.021; assault in the second degree; and

(g)
RCW 9A.36.031; assault in the third degree.

Sec.
257. RCW
77.15.720 and 1998 c 190 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a person shoots another person or domestic livestock while hunting, the
director shall revoke all hunting licenses and suspend all hunting
privileges for three years. If the shooting of another person or livestock is
the result of criminal negligence or reckless or intentional conduct, then the
person's privileges shall be suspended for ten years. The suspension ((may))
shall be continued beyond these periods if damages owed to the victim or
livestock owner have not been paid by the suspended person. A hunting
license shall not be reissued to the suspended person unless authorized by the
director.

(2)
((If a person commits any assault upon employees, agents, or personnel
acting for the department, the director shall suspend hunting or fishing
privileges for ten years.

(3)))
Within twenty days of service of an order suspending privileges or imposing
conditions under this section or RCW 77.15.710, a person may petition
for administrative review under chapter 34.05 RCW by serving the director with
a petition for review. The order is final and unappealable if there is no
timely petition for administrative review.

(((4)))
(3) The commission may by rule authorize petitions for reinstatement of
administrative suspensions and define circumstances under which reinstatement
will be allowed.

Sec.
258. RCW
77.16.020 and 1998 c 190 s 119 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purposes of establishing a season or bag limit restriction
on Canada goose hunting, the ((department)) commission shall not
consider leg length or bill length of dusky Canada geese (Branta canadensis
occidentalis).

Sec.
259. RCW
77.16.360 and 1997 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 77.12.240 ((and 77.12.265)) or
other provisions of law, it is unlawful to take, hunt, or attract black bear
with the aid of bait.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear with the aid of bait by employees or agents of county, state, or federal
agencies while acting in their official capacities for the purpose of
protecting livestock, domestic animals, private property, or the public safety.

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the establishment and
operation of feeding stations for black bear in order to prevent damage to
commercial timberland.

(c)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of bait to attract black
bear for scientific purposes.

(d)
As used in this subsection, "bait" means a substance placed, exposed,
deposited, distributed, scattered, or otherwise used for the purpose of
attracting black bears to an area where one or more persons hunt or intend to
hunt them.

(2)
Notwithstanding RCW 77.12.240 or any other provisions of law, it is unlawful to
hunt or pursue black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs by employees or
agents of county, state, or federal agencies while acting in their official
capacities for the purpose of protecting livestock, domestic animals, private
property, or the public safety. A dog or dogs may be used by the owner or
tenant of real property consistent with a permit issued and conditioned by the
director ((under RCW 77.12.265)).

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of a dog or dogs for the
pursuit of black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx for scientific purposes.

(3)
A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the director
shall revoke the hunting license of a person who violates subsection (1) or (2)
of this section and a hunting license shall not be issued for a period of five
years following the revocation. Following a subsequent violation of subsection
(1) or (2) of this section by the same person, a hunting license shall not be
issued to the person at any time.

Sec.
260. RCW
77.17.020 and 1994 c 264 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of Article VII of RCW 77.17.010 (as recodified by this act),
the term "licensing authority," with reference to this state, means
the department. The director is authorized to appoint a compact administrator.

Sec.
261. RCW
77.18.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
(("Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(2)))
"Contract" means an agreement setting at a minimum, price, quantity
of fish to be delivered, time of delivery, and fish health requirements.

(((3)))
(2) "Fish health requirements" means those site specific fish
health and genetic requirements actually used by the department of fish and
wildlife in fish stocking.

(((4)))
(3) "Aquatic farmer" means a private sector person who
commercially farms and manages private sector cultured aquatic products on the
person's own land or on land in which the person has a present right of
possession.

(((5)
"Person" means a natural person, corporation, trust, or other legal
entity.))

(4)
"Warm water game fish" includes the following species: Bass, channel
catfish, walleye, crappie, and other species as defined by the department.

Sec.
262. RCW
77.21.090 and 1993 c 82 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receipt of a report of failure to comply with the terms of a citation from
the licensing authority of a state that is a party to the wildlife violator
compact under RCW 77.17.010 (as recodified by this act), the department
shall suspend the violator's license privileges under this title until
satisfactory evidence of compliance with the terms of the wildlife citation has
been furnished by the issuing state to the department. The department shall
adopt by rule procedures for the timely notification and administrative review
of such suspension of licensing privileges.

(2)
Upon receipt of a report of a conviction from the licensing authority of a
state that is a party to the wildlife violator compact under RCW 77.17.010 (as
recodified by this act), the department shall enter such conviction in its
records and shall treat such conviction as if it occurred in the state of
Washington for the purposes of suspension, revocation, or forfeiture of license
privileges.

Sec.
263. RCW
77.32.014 and 1998 c 191 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Licenses, tags, and stamps issued pursuant to this chapter shall be invalid for
any period in which a person is certified by the department of social and
health services or a court of competent jurisdiction as a person in
noncompliance with a support order. Fish and wildlife officers and ex officio
fish and wildlife officers shall enforce this section through checks of the
department of licensing's computer data base. A listing on the department of
licensing's data base that an individual's license is currently suspended
pursuant to RCW 46.20.291(((7))) (8) shall be prima facie
evidence that the individual is in noncompliance with a support order.
Presentation of a written release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with an order shall serve as
prima facie proof of compliance with a support order.

(2)
It is unlawful to purchase, obtain, or possess a license required by this
chapter during any period in which a license is suspended.

Sec.
264. RCW
77.32.090 and 1998 c 191 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may adopt rules pertaining to the form, period of validity, use,
possession, and display of licenses, permits, tags, ((and)) stamps,
and raffle tickets required by this chapter ((and raffle tickets
authorized under chapter 77.12 RCW)).

Sec.
265. RCW
77.32.199 and 1987 c 372 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((commission)) director may revoke the trapper's license of a
person placing unauthorized traps on private property and may remove those
traps.

Sec.
266. RCW
77.32.250 and 1998 c 191 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Licenses,
permits, tags, and stamps required by this chapter and raffle tickets
authorized under this chapter ((77.12 RCW)) shall not be
transferred.

Upon
request of a fish and wildlife officer or ex officio fish and wildlife officer,
persons licensed, operating under a permit, or possessing wildlife under the
authority of this chapter shall produce required licenses, permits, tags,
stamps, ((or)) raffle tickets, or catch record cards for
inspection and write their signatures for comparison and in addition display
their wildlife. Failure to comply with the request is prima facie evidence
that the person has no license or is not the person named.

Sec.
267. RCW
77.32.350 and 1998 c 191 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to a small game hunting license, a supplemental permit or stamp is
required to hunt for western Washington pheasant or migratory birds.

(1)
A western Washington pheasant permit is required to hunt for pheasant in
western Washington. Western Washington pheasant permits must contain numbered
spaces for recording the location and date of harvest of each western
Washington pheasant. ((It is unlawful to harvest a western Washington
pheasant without immediately recording this information on the permit.))

(2)
The permit shall be available as a season option, a youth full season option,
or a three-day option. The fee for this permit is:

(a)
For the resident and nonresident full season option, thirty-six dollars;

(b)
For the youth full season option, eighteen dollars;

(c)
For the three-day option, twenty dollars.

(3)
A migratory bird stamp affixed to a hunting license designated by rule of the
commission is required for all persons sixteen years of age or older to hunt
migratory birds. The fee for the stamp for hunters is six dollars for
residents and nonresidents. The fee for the stamp for collectors is six
dollars.

(4)
The migratory bird stamp shall be validated by the signature of the licensee
written across the face of the stamp.

Sec.
268. RCW
77.32.380 and 1998 c 87 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Persons who enter upon or use clearly identified department improved access
facilities with a motor vehicle may be required to display a current annual
fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit on the motor vehicle while within or
while using an improved access facility. An "improved access
facility" is a clearly identified area specifically created for motor
vehicle parking, and includes any boat launch or boat ramp associated with the
parking area, but does not include the department parking facilities at the
Gorge Concert Center near George, Washington. The vehicle use permit is issued
in the form of a decal. One decal shall be issued at no charge with each
annual saltwater, freshwater, combination, small game hunting, big game
hunting, and trapping license issued by the department. The annual fee for a
fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit, if purchased separately, is ten
dollars. A person to whom the department has issued a decal or who has
purchased a vehicle use permit separately may purchase a decal from the department
for each additional vehicle owned by the person at a cost of five dollars per
decal upon a showing of proof to the department that the person owns the
additional vehicle or vehicles. Revenue derived from the sale of fish and
wildlife lands vehicle use permits shall be used solely for the stewardship and
maintenance of department improved access facilities. ((Revenue derived
from the sale of fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permits shall be used
solely for the stewardship and maintenance of department improved access
facilities.))

Youth
groups may use department improved access facilities without possessing a
vehicle use permit when accompanied by a vehicle use permit holder.

The
department may accept contributions into the state wildlife fund for the sound
stewardship of fish and wildlife. Contributors shall be known as
"conservation patrons" and, for contributions of twenty dollars or
more, shall receive a fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit free of
charge.

(2)
The decal must be affixed in a permanent manner to the motor vehicle before
entering upon or using the motor vehicle on a department improved access
facility, and must be displayed on the rear window of the motor vehicle, or, if
the motor vehicle does not have a rear window, on the rear of the motor
vehicle.

(3)
Failure to display the fish and wildlife lands vehicle use permit if required
by this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW, and department
employees are authorized to issue a notice of infraction to the registered owner
of any motor vehicle entering upon or using a department improved access
facility without such a decal. The penalty for failure to display or improper
display of the decal is sixty-six dollars.

Sec.
269. RCW
77.32.420 and 1998 c 191 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Recreational licenses are not transferable. Upon request of a fish and
wildlife officer, ex officio fish and wildlife officer, or authorized fish and
wildlife employee, a person digging for, fishing for, or possessing shellfish,
or seaweed or fishing for or possessing food fish or game fish for personal use
shall exhibit the required recreational license and write his or her signature
for comparison with the signature on the license. Failure to comply with the
request is prima facie evidence that the person does not have a license or is
not the person named on the license.

(((2)
The personal use shellfish and seaweed license shall be visible on the licensee
while harvesting shellfish or seaweed.))

Repealed
Sections

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 270. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
77.08.070 ("Raffle" defined) and 1996 c 101 s 4;

(2) RCW
77.12.101 (Seizure of contraband wildlife and
devices--Forfeiture) and 1989 c 314 s 2;

(3) RCW
77.16.210 (Fishways to be provided and maintained) and 1980 c 78
s 88 & 1955 c 36 s 77.16.210;

(4) RCW 77.16.220
(Diversion of water--Screen, bypass required) and 1998 c 190 s 122, 1980 c 78 s
89, & 1955 c 36 s 77.16.220;

(5) RCW
77.16.290 (Law enforcement officers, exemption) and 1994 sp.s. c
7 s 444, 1980 c 78 s 95, & 1955 c 36 s 77.16.290;

(6) RCW
77.16.340 (Obstructing the taking of fish or
wildlife--Penalty--Defenses) and 1988 c 265 s 1;

(7) RCW
77.16.350 (Obstructing the taking of fish or wildlife--Civil
action) and 1988 c 265 s 2;

(8) RCW
77.21.020 (Revocation of hunting license for big game
violation--Subsequent issuance--Appeal) and 1998 c 191 s 35, 1987 c 506 s 70,
1980 c 78 s 124, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 6 s 1;

(9) RCW
77.21.030 (Revocation for shooting person or
livestock--Subsequent issuance) and 1998 c 191 s 36, 1987 c 506 s 71, 1980 c 78
s 123, & 1955 c 36 s 77.32.280;

(10) RCW
77.21.070 (Illegal killing or possession of wildlife--Restitution
to state--Amounts--Bail--License revoked) and 1997 c 226 s 2, 1989 c 11 s 28,
1987 c 506 s 74, 1986 c 318 s 1, 1984 c 258 s 336, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 8 s
3;

(11) RCW
77.32.005 (Definitions) and 1998 c 191 s 6, 1989 c 305 s 17, 1980
c 78 s 102, 1961 c 94 s 1, & 1957 c 176 s 14;

(12) RCW
77.32.060 (Licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle
tickets--Amount of fees to be retained by license dealers) and 1998 c 245 s
160, 1996 c 101 s 9, 1995 c 116 s 2, 1987 c 506 s 78, 1985 c 464 s 1, 1981 c
310 s 17, 1980 c 78 s 107, 1979 ex.s. c 3 s 3, 1970 ex.s. c 29 s 2, 1957 c 176
s 2, & 1955 c 36 s 77.32.060; and

(13) RCW
77.44.020 (Species included in term "warm water game
fish") and 1996 c 222 s 2.

Recodified
Sections

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 271. RCW
77.04.100, 77.16.020, 77.16.095, and 77.21.080 are each recodified as sections
in chapter 77.12 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 272. RCW
77.12.080, 77.12.090, 77.12.095, 77.12.103, 77.16.070, 77.16.360, and 77.21.090
are each recodified as sections in chapter 77.15 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 273. RCW
77.12.530, 77.12.770, 77.12.780, 77.16.010, and 77.16.170 are each recodified
as sections in chapter 77.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 274. RCW
77.18.005, 77.18.010, 77.18.020, and 77.18.030 are recodified as sections in
chapter 77.44 RCW.

---
END ---