BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that it is important to monitor the overall health of the
salmon resource to determine if recovery efforts are providing expected
returns. It is also important to monitor the effectiveness of the state's
overall salmon recovery efforts to secure federal acceptance of the state's
approach to salmon recovery. In addition, it is important to monitor salmon
restoration projects to determine their effectiveness. Adaptive management
cannot exist without monitoring. For these reasons, the legislature believes
that a coordinated and integrated monitoring process should be developed in the
salmon recovery office for use by local recovery efforts. The role of the
salmon recovery office should be to develop and provide to entities involved in
salmon recovery data quality objectives, a range of acceptable parameters to
monitor, acceptable data formats, data calibration and coordination, a method
of storing and retrieving data, and analysis and interpretation of data. The
role of local recovery efforts should be to collect monitoring data in
compliance with the recommended data quality objectives, parameters, and
formats, and to provide such data to the state salmon recovery office for
storage.

Sec.
2. RCW
75.46.010 and 1998 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to test
the results of actions taken so that the management and related policy can be
changed promptly and appropriately.

(2)
"Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects and
salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring positive benefits
from habitat projects.

(3)
"Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from the
critical pathways methodology under RCW 75.46.070(2). Each project on the list
must have a written agreement from the landowner on whose land the project will
be implemented. Projects include habitat restoration projects, habitat
protection projects, habitat projects that improve water quality, habitat
projects that protect water quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, fish
passage projects, fish screening projects, and habitat project corrective
maintenance and monitoring activities.

(4)
"Habitat work schedule" means those projects from the habitat project
list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle. The schedule
shall also include a list of the entities and individuals implementing
projects, the start date, duration, estimated date of completion, estimated
cost, and funding sources for the projects.

(5)
"Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of habitat
to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are primarily fish
passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian corridors, stream
channels, and wetlands.

(6)
"Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, a combination of such governments through interlocal agreements
provided under chapter 39.34 RCW, a nonprofit organization, or one or more
private citizens.

(7)
"Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae which are
capable of self-sustaining, natural production.

(8)
"Salmon recovery plan" means a state plan developed in response to a
proposed or actual listing under the federal endangered species act that
addresses limiting factors including, but not limited to harvest, hatchery,
hydropower, habitat, and other factors of decline.

(9)
"Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized Indian
tribes.

(10)
"WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in chapter
173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

(11)
"Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the person
under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal owner's property.

Sec.
3. RCW
75.46.050 and 1998 c 246 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governor shall request the national academy of sciences, the American
fisheries society, or a comparable institution to screen candidates to serve as
members on the independent science panel. The institution that conducts the
screening of the candidates shall submit a list of the nine most qualified
candidates to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
the majority leader of the senate. The candidates shall reflect expertise in
habitat requirements of salmon, protection and restoration of salmon
populations, artificial propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.

(2)
The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority leader in the
senate shall each remove one name from the nomination list. The governor shall
consult with tribal representatives and the governor shall appoint five
scientists from the remaining names on the nomination list.

(3)
The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. Vacant
positions on the panel shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointments. Members shall serve no more than two full terms. The
independent science panel members shall elect the chair of the panel among
themselves every two years. ((The members of the independent science panel
shall be compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.)) Based upon
available funding, the governor's salmon recovery office may contract for
services with members of the independent science panel for compensation under
chapter 39.29 RCW.

(4)
The independent science panel shall be governed by generally accepted
guidelines and practices governing the activities of independent science boards
such as the national academy of sciences. The purpose of the independent
science panel is to help ensure that sound science is used in salmon recovery
efforts. The governor's salmon recovery office shall request review of salmon
recovery plans by the science review panel. The science review panel does not
have the authority to review individual projects or project lists developed
under RCW 75.46.060, 75.46.070, and 75.46.080 or to make policy decisions.

(5)
The independent science panel, in conjunction with the salmon recovery
office, shall recommend standardized monitoring indicators and data quality
guidelines for use by entities involved in salmon recovery activities across
the state. The panel shall also recommend electronic formats that will allow
data to be provided to the state salmon recovery office for storage and to be
shared across the state in a salmon monitoring network.

(6)
State salmon monitoring data provided by lead entities, regional fisheries
enhancement groups, and others, shall be included in the salmon and steelhead inventory
and assessment project.

(7)
The independent science panel, in conjunction with the salmon recovery office,
shall also recommend criteria for the systematic and periodic evaluation of
monitoring data in order for the state to be able to answer critical questions
about the effectiveness of the state's salmon recovery efforts.

(8)
The recommendations on monitoring as required in this section shall be provided
in a report to the governor and to the legislature by the independent science
panel, in conjunction with the salmon recovery office, no later than December
31, 2000. The report shall also include recommendations on the level of effort
needed to sustain monitoring of salmon projects and other recovery efforts, and
any other recommendations on monitoring deemed important by the independent
science panel, in conjunction with the salmon recovery office.

(9)
The independent science panel shall submit its findings to the legislature and
the governor.

Sec.
4. RCW
75.46.060 and 1998 c 246 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Counties, cities, and tribal governments must jointly designate, by ((official))
resolution or by letters of support, the area for which a habitat ((restoration))
project list is to be developed and the lead entity that is to be responsible
for submitting the habitat ((restoration)) project list. No project
included on a habitat ((restoration)) project list shall be considered
mandatory in nature and no private landowner may be forced or coerced into
participation in any respect. The lead entity may be a county, city,
conservation district, special district, tribal government, or other entity.

(b)
The lead entity shall establish a committee that consists of representative
interests of counties, cities, conservation districts, tribes, environmental
groups, business interests, landowners, citizens, volunteer groups, regional
fish enhancement groups, and other ((restoration)) habitat
interests. The purpose of the committee is to provide a citizen-based
evaluation of the projects proposed to promote salmon habitat ((restoration)).
The interagency review team may provide the lead entity with organizational
models that may be used in establishing the committees.

(c)
The committee shall compile a list of habitat ((restoration)) projects,
establish priorities for individual projects, define the sequence for project
implementation, and submit these activities as the habitat ((restoration))
project list. The committee shall also identify potential federal, state,
local, and private funding sources.

(2)
The area covered by the habitat project list must be based, at a minimum, on a
WRIA, combination of WRIAs, ((an evolutionarily significant unit,)) or
any other area as agreed to by the counties, cities, and tribes in
resolutions or in letters of support meeting the requirements of this
subsection. Preference will be given to projects in an area that contain a
salmon species that is listed or proposed for listing under the federal
endangered species act.

Sec.
5. RCW
75.46.070 and 1998 c 246 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Critical pathways methodology shall be used to develop a habitat project list
and a habitat work schedule that ensures salmon ((restoration)) recovery
activities will be prioritized and implemented in a logical sequential manner
that produces habitat capable of sustaining healthy populations of salmon.

(2)
The critical pathways methodology shall:

(a)
Include a limiting factors analysis for salmon in streams, rivers, tributaries,
estuaries, and subbasins in the region. The technical advisory group shall have
responsibility for the limiting factors analysis;

(b)
Identify local habitat projects that sponsors are willing to undertake. The
projects identified must have a written agreement from the landowner on which
the project is to be implemented. Project sponsors shall have the lead
responsibility for this task;

(c)
Identify how projects will be monitored and evaluated. The project sponsor, in
consultation with the technical advisory group and the appropriate landowner,
shall have responsibility for this task; ((and))

(d)
Include a review of monitoring data, evaluate project performance, and make
recommendations to the committee established under RCW 75.46.060 and to the
interagency review team. The technical advisory group has responsibility for
this task; and

(e)
Describe the adaptive management strategy that will be used. The committee
established under RCW 75.46.060 shall have responsibility for this task. If a
committee has not been formed, the technical advisory group shall have the
responsibility for this task.

(3)
The habitat work ((list)) schedule shall include all projects
developed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section as well as any other
salmon habitat ((restoration)) project implemented in the region,
including habitat preservation projects funded through the Washington wildlife
and recreation program, the conservation reserve enhancement program, and other
conservancy programs. The habitat work ((list)) schedule
shall also include the start date, duration, estimated date of completion,
estimated cost, and, if appropriate, the affected salmonid species of each
project. Each schedule shall be updated on an annual basis to depict new
activities.

Sec.
6. RCW
75.46.080 and 1998 c 246 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Representatives from the conservation commission, the department of
transportation, the interagency committee on outdoor recreation, the
department of ecology, the department of natural resources, and the
department of fish and wildlife shall establish an interagency review team.
Except as provided in subsection (((6))) (7) of this section,
habitat ((restoration)) project lists shall be submitted to the
interagency review team by January 1st ((and July 1st)) of each year
beginning in 1999.

(2)
If no lead entity has been formed under RCW 75.46.060, the interagency review
team shall rank, prioritize, and dispense funds for habitat ((restoration))
projects by giving preference to the projects that:

(a)
Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under RCW 75.46.070;

(b)
Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the information
contained in the department of fish and wildlife salmonid stock inventory and
any comparable science-based assessment;

(((b)))
(c) Will be implemented in a more critical area based upon the stock
status information contained in the department of fish and wildlife salmonid
stock inventory and any comparable science-based assessment;

(((c)))
(d) Are the most cost-effective;

(((d)))
(e) Have the greatest matched, or in-kind funding; and

(((e)))
(f) Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of project
implementation.

(3)
If a lead entity established under RCW 75.46.060 has been formed, the
interagency review team shall evaluate the habitat project list((s
and)) for funding based upon the criteria contained in subsection (2) of
this section. The interagency review team may remove, but not add,
projects from a habitat project list. The interagency review team shall
give preference to projects that are on a project list submitted by a lead
entity. The interagency review team may also provide block grants to the lead
entity subject to available funding.

(4)
The interagency review team shall apply the criteria established in
subsection (2) of this section in a manner that results in the highest priority
being given to critical fish stocks. The criteria shall be applied in this
manner in areas where there is a lead entity established and in areas where no
lead entity has been established.

(5)
The interagency review team shall provide a summary of funding for ((habitat))
restoration project lists to the governor and to the legislature by December
1st of each year.

(((5)))
(6) The interagency review team may annually establish a maximum amount
of funding available for any individual project, subject to available funding.
The interagency review team shall attempt to assure a geographical balance in
assigning priorities to projects.

(((6)))
(7) For fiscal year 1998, the department of fish and wildlife, the
conservation commission, and the department of transportation may authorize,
subject to appropriations, expenditures for projects that have been developed to
restore salmon habitat before completion of the project lists required in RCW
75.46.060(2).

(((7)
Where a lead entity has been established pursuant to RCW 75.46.060, the
interagency review team may provide block grants to the lead entity, subject to
available funding.))

Sec.
7. RCW
75.46.100 and 1998 c 246 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
sea grant program at the University of Washington is authorized to provide
technical assistance to volunteer groups and other project sponsors in
designing and ((performing)) implementing habitat ((restoration))
projects that address the limiting factors analysis ((of regional habitat
work plans)) required under RCW 75.46.070. The cost for such
assistance may be covered on a fee-for-service basis.

Sec.
8. RCW
75.46.130 and 1998 c 246 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Only
those funds appropriated for the habitat ((restoration)) projects under
this chapter are subject to the requirements of RCW 75.46.080.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this chapter, the system operations advisory committee that was
formed in 1981 as a result of a court decision to protect spring chinook redds,
and whose responsibilities were broadened to protect all species in the Yakima
basin adjudication proceedings of Department of Ecology v. Acquavella,
shall add nine representatives to its membership as provided in this subsection
and serve as the lead entity for the Yakima river basin. The county
legislative authorities from Yakima, Kittitas, and Benton counties shall each
appoint a member from their respective county legislative authority to serve on
the lead entity. Each of these three county legislative authorities shall also
appoint a general citizen representative of their respective county as a
representative on the lead entity. The cities within Yakima, Kittitas, and
Benton counties shall jointly designate a single city representative on the
lead entity. The water supply utilities, as defined in RCW 90.82.020, within
Yakima, Kittitas, and Benton counties shall jointly designate a single utility
representative on the lead entity. After the members of the lead entity have
been appointed, the members of the lead entity shall choose an environmental
representative on the lead entity. Any vacancies on the lead entity shall be
filled in the manner as the initial appointment.

(2)
The lead entity established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is
responsible for establishing a committee under RCW 75.46.060 to compile the
habitat project list and to designate the area to be covered by the list, and
to forward the habitat project list to the interagency review team for review
pursuant to RCW 75.46.080. Before the habitat project list is transmitted to
the interagency review team, the lead entity may re-rank the priorities for
individual projects established by the committee under RCW 75.46.060.

(3)
The lead entity established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is
responsible for all duties and responsibilities assigned to lead entities under
this chapter or otherwise.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10.
Section 9 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---