BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

A
gambling licensee shall include the following statement in any advertising or
promotion of gambling activity conducted by the licensee:

"CAUTION: Participation in gambling activity may
result in pathological gambling behavior causing emotional and financial harm.
For help, call 1-800-547-6133."

For
purposes of this section, advertising includes print media, point-of-sale
advertising, electronic media, billboards, and radio advertising.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 67.70 RCW to read as follows:

The
lottery commission shall ensure that the following statement is made in any
advertising or promotion of any lottery game conducted under the direction of
the commission:

"CAUTION: Participation in gambling activity may
result in pathological gambling behavior causing emotional and financial harm.
For help, call 1-800-547-6133."

For purposes of this section, advertising includes print media,
point-of-sale advertising, electronic media, billboards, and radio advertising.

---
END ---