BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 50.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A state reserve trust account is established as a separate account,
identifiable and apart from all public moneys or funds of this state.
Contributions to this account shall accrue and become payable by each employer
described under RCW 50.04.080 for any calendar quarter beginning on or after
January 1, 2000, except employers described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who
have properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local
government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, employers who are required
to make payments in lieu of contributions, and those qualified employers
assigned rate class 20 under RCW 50.29.025, at a basic rate of four-tenths of
one percent. The amount of wages subject to tax shall be determined under RCW
50.24.010.

(2)(a)
Contributions under this section are due and must be paid by each employer
under rules that the commissioner may prescribe, and may not be deducted, in
whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the
employer. A deduction in violation of this section is unlawful.

(b)
In the payment of a contribution under this section, a fractional part of a
cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which
case it shall be increased to one cent.

(3)
Money deposited in the state reserve trust account may be used only for loans
to the unemployment trust fund, as security for loans from the federal
unemployment insurance trust fund, and to pay the administrative costs related
to collection of contributions under this section and administration of the
state reserve trust account and the state reserve interest account. An
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(4)(a)
Interest earned from investment of the state reserve trust account shall be
deposited in the state reserve interest account, established as a separate
account, identifiable and apart from all public moneys or funds of this state.
Moneys in the state reserve interest account may be used only for addressing
the costs of programs specifically listed in this subsection and for refunds to
eligible employers as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b)
The commissioner shall make employer refunds under rules adopted by the
commissioner. The commissioner shall determine refund amounts for rate year
2001 by December 31, 2000, and for each rate year thereafter by December 31st
of the year preceding the rate year. The amount of the refund shall be
calculated as a pro rata share of the amount in the state reserve interest
account as of June 30th of the year of calculation and shall be based on the
employer's taxable wages in the fiscal year ending in the year of calculation
multiplied by a factor representing the ratio of the difference between the
employer's benefit ratio and contribution rate under RCW 50.29.025.

(c)
An appropriation is not required for expenditures under this section.

(d)
As used in this subsection, "eligible employer" means an employer
whose contribution rate for a rate year under RCW 50.29.025 is higher than the
socialized cost rate for that rate year, as determined by the commissioner, and
is higher by twenty percent or more than the employer's benefit ratio
calculated under RCW 50.29.027 for a rate year, expressed as a percentage.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.04.070 and 1985 ex.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

"Contributions"
means the money payments due to the state unemployment compensation fund as
provided in RCW 50.24.010, to the federal interest payment fund under RCW 50.16.070,
to the state reserve trust account under section 1 of this act, or to
the special account in the administrative contingency fund under RCW 50.24.014.

Sec.
3. RCW
50.04.072 and 1985 ex.s. c 5 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
terms "contributions" and "payments in lieu of
contributions" used in this title, whether singular or plural, designate
the money payments to be made to the state unemployment compensation fund, to
the federal interest payment fund under RCW 50.16.070, to the state reserve
trust account under section 1 of this act, or to the special account in the
administrative contingency fund under RCW 50.24.014 and are deemed to be taxes
due to the state of Washington.

Sec.
4. RCW
50.16.010 and 1993 c 483 s 7 and 1993 c 226 s 10 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be maintained as special funds, separate and apart from all public
moneys or funds of this state an unemployment compensation fund, an
administrative contingency fund, a state reserve trust account, a state
reserve interest account, and a federal interest payment fund, which shall
be administered by the commissioner exclusively for the purposes of this title,
and to which RCW 43.01.050 shall not be applicable.

(2)
The unemployment compensation fund shall consist of

(((1)))
(a) all contributions and payments in lieu of contributions collected
pursuant to the provisions of this title,

(((2)))
(b) any property or securities acquired through the use of moneys
belonging to the fund,

(((3)))
(c) all earnings of such property or securities,

(((4)))
(d) any moneys received from the federal unemployment account in the
unemployment trust fund in accordance with Title XII of the social security
act, as amended,

(((5)))
(e) all money recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by the
fund,

(((6)))
(f) all money credited to this state's account in the unemployment trust
fund pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as amended,

(((7)))
(g) all money received from the federal government as reimbursement
pursuant to section 204 of the federal-state extended compensation act of 1970
(84 Stat. 708‑712; 26 U.S.C. Sec. 3304), and

(((8)))
(h) all moneys received for the fund from any other source.

(3)(a)
All moneys in the unemployment compensation fund shall be commingled and
undivided.

The
administrative contingency fund shall consist of all interest on delinquent
contributions collected pursuant to this title, all fines and penalties
collected pursuant to the provisions of this title, all sums recovered on
official bonds for losses sustained by the fund, and revenue received under RCW
50.24.014: PROVIDED, That all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected
or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall
be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

(b)
Moneys available in the administrative contingency fund, other than money in
the special account created under RCW 50.24.014, shall be expended upon the
direction of the commissioner, with the approval of the governor, whenever it
appears to him or her that such expenditure is necessary for:

(((a)))
(i) The proper administration of this title and no federal funds are
available for the specific purpose to which such expenditure is to be made,
provided, the moneys are not substituted for appropriations from federal funds
which, in the absence of such moneys, would be made available.

(((b)))
(ii) The proper administration of this title for which purpose
appropriations from federal funds have been requested but not yet received,
provided, the administrative contingency fund will be reimbursed upon receipt
of the requested federal appropriation.

(((c)))
(iii) The proper administration of this title for which compliance and
audit issues have been identified that establish federal claims requiring the
expenditure of state resources in resolution. Claims must be resolved in the
following priority: First priority is to provide services to eligible
participants within the state; second priority is to provide substitute
services or program support; and last priority is the direct payment of funds
to the federal government.

(c)
Money in the special account created under RCW 50.24.014 may only be expended,
after appropriation, for the purposes specified in RCW 50.62.010, 50.62.020,
50.62.030, 50.04.070, 50.04.072, 50.16.010, 50.29.025, 50.24.014, 50.44.053,
and 50.22.010.

(4)
The state reserve trust account shall consist of contributions collected under
section 1 of this act and may be expended only for the purposes specified in
section 1 of this act. The state reserve interest account shall consist of the
interest earned on investment of the state reserve trust account and may be
expended only for the purposes specified in section 1 of this act.

Sec.
5. RCW
50.16.020 and 1993 c 226 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commissioner shall designate a treasurer and custodian of the unemployment
compensation fund, the state reserve trust account, the state reserve
interest account, and ((of)) the administrative contingency fund,
who shall administer such funds in accordance with the directions of the
commissioner and shall issue his or her warrants upon them in accordance with
such regulations as the commissioner shall prescribe. The treasurer and custodian
shall maintain within the unemployment compensation fund three separate
accounts as follows:

(1)
a clearing account,

(2)
an unemployment trust fund account, and

(3)
a benefit account.

All
moneys payable to the unemployment compensation fund, upon receipt thereof by
the commissioner, shall be forwarded to the treasurer, who shall immediately
deposit them in the clearing account. Refunds payable pursuant to the
provisions of this title from the unemployment compensation fund may be paid
from the clearing account upon warrants issued by the treasurer under the
direction of the commissioner: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That refunds of interest or
penalties on delinquent contributions shall be paid from the administrative
contingency fund upon warrants issued by the treasurer under the direction of
the commissioner.

After
clearance thereof, all other moneys in the clearing account shall be
immediately deposited with the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States
to the credit of the account of this state in the unemployment trust fund,
established and maintained pursuant to section 904 of the social security act,
as amended, any provisions of law in this state relating to the deposit,
administration, release, or disbursement of moneys in the possession or custody
of this state to the contrary notwithstanding.

The
benefit account shall consist of all moneys requisitioned from this state's
account in the unemployment trust fund. Moneys in the clearing and benefit
accounts and in the administrative contingency fund shall not be commingled
with other state funds, but shall be deposited by the treasurer, under the
direction of the commissioner, in any bank or public depository in which
general funds of the state may be deposited, but no public deposit insurance
charge or premium shall be paid out of the fund.

Such
moneys shall be secured by said bank or public depository to the same extent
and in the same manner as required by the general depository law of the state
and collateral pledged shall be maintained in a separate custody account.

The
treasurer shall give a bond conditioned upon the faithful performance of his or
her duties as a custodian of the funds in an amount fixed by the director of
the department of general administration and in a form prescribed by law or
approved by the attorney general. Premiums for said bond shall be paid from
the administration fund. All sums recovered on official bonds for losses
sustained by the unemployment compensation fund shall be deposited in such
fund. All sums recovered on official bonds for losses sustained by the
administrative contingency fund shall be deposited in such fund.

Sec.
6. RCW
50.29.025 and 1995 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
contribution rate for each employer shall be determined under this section.

(1)
A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the
unemployment compensation fund as of the June 30th immediately preceding the
rate year by the total remuneration paid by all employers subject to
contributions during the second calendar year preceding the rate year and
reported to the department by the following March 31st and, beginning with
the determination preceding rate year 2001, multiplied by 1.25. The ((division))
calculation shall be carried to the fourth decimal place with the
remaining fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance ratio shall be
expressed as a percentage.

(2)
The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall
determine which tax schedule in subsection (5) of this section shall be in
effect for assigning tax rates for the rate year. The intervals for
determining the effective tax schedule shall be:

Interval of the

Fund Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.50
to 2.89 A

2.10
to 2.49 B

1.70
to 2.09 C

1.30 to 1.69 D

1.00 to 1.29 E

Less
than 1.00 F

(3)
An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order
of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer:
(a) Identification number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four
calendar quarters immediately preceding the computation date and reported to
the department by the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls
consisting of the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all
other employers preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4)
Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes
according to the percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth
in subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable
payroll falls within two or more rate classes, the employer and any other
employer with the same benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class
which includes any portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5)
The contribution rate for each employer in the array shall be the rate
specified in the following tables for the rate class to which he or she has
been assigned, as determined under subsection (4) of this section, within the
tax schedule which is to be in effect during the rate year:

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 ((0.48 0.48 0.58 0.98 1.48 1.88 2.48))

.08 .08 .18 .58 1.08 1.48 2.08

5.01 10.00 2 ((0.48 0.48 0.78 1.18 1.68 2.08 2.68))

.08 .08 .38 .88 1.28 1.68 2.28

10.01 15.00 3 ((0.58 0.58 0.98 1.38 1.78 2.28 2.88))

.18 .18 .58 .98 1.38 1.88 2.48

15.01 20.00 4 ((0.58 0.78 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.48 3.08))

.18 .38 .78 1.18 1.58 2.08 2.68

20.01 25.00 5 ((0.78 0.98 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.68 3.18))

.38 .58 .98 1.38 1.78 2.28 2.78

25.01 30.00 6 ((0.98 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.28))

.58 .78 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.88

30.01 35.00 7 ((1.08 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38))

.68 .98 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98

35.01 40.00 8 ((1.28 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58))

.88 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18

40.01 45.00 9 ((1.48 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.78))

1.08 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38

45.01 50.00 10 ((1.68 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.98))

1.28 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58

50.01 55.00 11 ((1.98 2.28 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.08))

1.58 1.88 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.68

55.01 60.00 12 ((2.18 2.48 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.28))

1.78 2.08 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.88

60.01 65.00 13 ((2.38 2.68 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.48))

1.98 2.28 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.08

65.01 70.00 14 ((2.58 2.88 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.38 4.68))

2.18 2.48 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.28

70.01 75.00 15 ((2.88 3.08 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.58 4.78))

2.48 2.68 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.38

75.01 80.00 16 ((3.08 3.28 3.58 3.98 4.38 4.68 4.88))

2.68 2.88 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.28 4.48

80.01 85.00 17 ((3.28 3.48 3.78 4.18 4.58 4.88 4.98))

2.88 3.08 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.48 4.58

85.01 90.00 18 ((3.68 3.88 4.18 4.58 4.88 4.98 5.18))

3.28 3.48 3.78 4.18 4.48 4.58 4.78

90.01 95.00 19 ((4.08 4.28 4.58 4.98 5.08 5.18 5.38))

3.68 3.88 4.18 4.58 4.68 4.78 4.98

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(6)
The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in the array shall
be as follows:

(a)
Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by
reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be assigned ((the))
a contribution rate ((of five and six-tenths percent)) that is
two-tenths percent higher than the maximum rate in effect in the applicable
rate year, except employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment
contract by September 30 of the previous rate year. If any employer with an
approved agency-deferred payment contract fails to make any one of the
succeeding deferred payments or fails to submit any succeeding tax report and
payment in a timely manner, the employer's tax rate shall immediately revert ((to
five and six-tenths percent)) for the current rate year to a rate that
is two-tenths percent higher than the maximum rate in effect in the applicable
rate year;

(b)
The contribution rate for employers exempt as of December 31, 1989, who are
newly covered under the section 78, chapter 380, Laws of 1989 amendment to RCW
50.04.150 and not yet qualified to be in the array shall be 2.5 percent for
employers whose standard industrial code is "013", "016",
"017", "018", "019", "021", or
"081"; and

(c)
For all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate
shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the
commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than one percent. Assignment
of employers by the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of
this subsection, shall be in accordance with established classification practices
found in the "Standard Industrial Classification Manual" issued by
the federal office of management and budget to the third digit provided in the
Standard Industrial Classification code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 50.29 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purpose of simplification of employer reports, the "combined
contribution rate" shall be used in the calculation of employer taxes.
The combined contribution rate shall include the regular contribution rate as
determined under RCW 50.29.025, and the special contribution rates required
under RCW 50.24.014 and section 1 of this act. A mention of the "combined
contribution rate" may not be made on a tax form or publication unless the
form or publication specifically identifies the specific contributions. The
combined contribution rate may not be quoted on a form unless the specific
component rates are also quoted. The sole purpose of the combined contribution
rate is to allow an employer to perform a single calculation on a tax return
rather than several separate calculations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1, 6, and 7 of this act apply to tax rate years beginning on or after
January 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---