BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. The legislature finds that the adoption of state-wide
academic standards requires that school districts carefully analyze the use of
funds intended to assist low-performing students and that schools should be
using research-based instructional practices and programs. The legislature
further finds that additional state funds should be allocated to school
districts that would be used to provide assistance and extended learning
opportunities for students before and after school, on Saturdays, during the
summer, during other vacation periods, and during the school day. The
legislature further finds that schools and districts should be given more
flexibility in how funds are used, and that state-level monitoring should be
based primarily on how effective schools are at helping students achieve the
state-wide standards.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.165.012 and 1987 c 478 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created a state-wide program designed to enhance educational
opportunities for public school students who ((are deficient in basic skills
achievement)), without additional assistance, are not likely to meet the
state-wide academic standards, or who did not meet the standards, as measured
by the Washington assessment of student learning. This program shall be
known as the learning assistance program.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.165.030 and 1990 c 33 s 148 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 28A.165.010 through 28A.165.090.

(1)
(("Basic skills" means reading, mathematics, and language arts as
well as readiness activities associated with such skills.

(2)
"Placement testing" means the administration of objective measures by
a school district for the purposes of diagnosing the basic skills achievement
levels, determining the basic skills areas of greatest need, and establishing
the learning assistance needs of individual students in conformance with
instructions established by the superintendent of public instruction for such
purposes.

(3)
"Approved program" means a program conducted pursuant to a plan
submitted by a district and approved by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.165.040.

(4)))
"Participating student" means a low-performing student in
kindergarten through grade nine who ((scores below grade level in basic skills,
as determined by placement testing, and who)) is identified ((under RCW
28A.165.050)) to receive additional services or support ((under an
approved program.

(5)
"Basic skills tests" means state-wide tests at the fourth and eighth
grade levels established pursuant to RCW 28A.230.190)). Identification
of participating students shall be determined in each participating school
through a selection process that may include classroom performance, teacher
referrals, placement testing, and other appropriate educational criteria as may
be determined by the school district. In schools that are determined to be a
school-wide program, all children are eligible to receive services depending on
their needs.

(2)
"Low-performing student" means a student who, without additional
assistance, is not likely to meet the state-wide academic standards, or who did
not meet the standards, as measured by the Washington assessment of student
learning.

(3)
"State-wide academic standards" means the standards established under
RCW 28A.630.885 in reading, writing, communications, and mathematics as
measured by the Washington assessment of student learning.

(4)
"School-wide program" means a school where all children are eligible
to receive services depending on their needs. Schools with a high percentage
of low-performing students or students from low-income households are eligible
to be designated school-wide programs. The criteria for designating
school-wide programs shall be determined by the superintendent of public
instruction.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.165.040 and 1990 c 33 s 149 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
school district which applies for state funds distributed pursuant to RCW
28A.165.070 shall conduct a needs assessment and, on the basis of its findings,
shall develop a plan for the use of these funds. The district plan ((may))
shall incorporate plans developed by each ((eligible)) school that
receives learning assistance funds. Districts are encouraged to place
special emphasis on addressing the needs of students in the early grades. The
needs assessment and plan shall be updated at least biennially, and shall be
determined in consultation with an advisory committee including but not limited
to members of the following groups: Parents, including parents of students
served by the program; teachers; principals; administrators; and school
directors. ((The district shall submit a biennial application specifying
this plan to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for
approval.)) Plans shall include:

(1)
The means which the district will use to identify participating students to
receive additional services or support under the proposed program;

(2)
The specific services or activities which the funds will be used to support,
and their estimated costs. Services and activities must have been
demonstrated to be effective with the types of students being served;

(3)
A plan for annual evaluation of the program by the district, based on
performance objectives related to ((basic skills achievement of participating
students, and a plan for reporting the results of this evaluation to the
superintendent of public instruction)) the attainment of the state-wide
academic standards;

(4)
Procedures for involving families and community members in the education of
participating students;

(5)
Procedures for recordkeeping or other program documentation as may be required
by the superintendent of public instruction; and

(((5)))
(6) The approval of the local school district board of directors.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.165.050 and 1987 c 478 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((Identification
of participating students for an approved program of learning assistance shall
be determined in each district through the implementation of the findings of
the district's needs assessment and through placement testing.)) School
districts are encouraged to coordinate the use of funds from federal, state,
and local sources in serving low-performing students ((who are below
grade level in basic skills,)) and to make efficient use of these resources
in meeting the needs of students ((with the greatest academic deficits))
who are not achieving the state-wide academic standards.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.165.060 and 1989 c 233 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Services or activities which may be supported under ((an approved)) a
program of learning assistance ((shall)) may include, but
not be limited to:

(((1)))
(a) Extended learning opportunities, including assistance provided before
and after school, on Saturdays, and during summer and vacation periods. This
assistance may be provided by teachers, instructional support staff, classified
staff, and paid and volunteer tutors;

(b)
Consultant teachers to assist classroom teachers in meeting the needs of
participating students;

(((2)))
(c) Instructional support staff and instructional assistants to assist
classroom teachers in meeting the needs of participating students;

(((3)))
(d) In-service training for classroom teachers, instructional support
staff, and instructional assistants in multicultural differences ((and)),
in the identification of learning problems ((or)), and in
instructional methods for teaching students with learning problems;

(((4)))
(e) Special instructional programs ((for participating students, of
sufficient size, scope, and quality to address the needs of these students and
to give reasonable promise of substantial progress toward meeting their
educational objectives)), such as nationally validated comprehensive models
that are based on effective learning practices and address the needs of the
participating students;

(((5)
Tutoring assistance during or after school or on Saturday provided by
instructional support staff, a student tutor, teacher, or instructional
assistant;

(6))) (f)
In-service training for parents of participating students; ((and

(7))) (g)
Full-day kindergarten;

(h)
Volunteer coordinators; and

(i)
Counseling, with an emphasis on services for elementary students who are in
need of learning assistance, provided by instructional support staff such as
school counselors, school psychologists, school nurses, and school social
workers. ((Pursuant to the provisions of section 4(2) of this act,)) Learning
assistance funds may be used to provide counseling for students who in the
absence of counseling would likely become in need of such learning assistance.

(2)
School districts are strongly encouraged to maximize extended learning
opportunities for students before school, after school, on Saturdays, and
during vacation periods in using learning assistance program funds. School
districts are encouraged to minimize the use of learning assistance program
funds for pull-out instructional programs that occur during regular school
hours on regular school days and which require removing students from the
regular classroom in order to take advantage of any special instructional
program supported by learning assistance program funds.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.165.070 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
school district ((which has established an approved program)) shall be
eligible, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, for state
funds made available for the purposes of ((such)) the learning
assistance program((s)).

(1)
((For the 1995-96 school year and thereafter,)) The
superintendent of public instruction shall distribute funds appropriated for
the learning assistance program in accordance with the biennial appropriations
act. The distribution formula shall be based upon an assessment of students
and a poverty factor.

(2)
The distribution of state funds to school districts is for
allocation purposes only. School districts shall determine the allocation
of funds to schools within the school district based on the needs of students.

(((3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall recommend to the legislature a
new allocation formula that uses additional elements consistent with
performance-based education and the new assessment system developed by the
commission on student learning. The superintendent of public instruction shall
develop the recommendations for a new allocation formula not later than the
1997-98 school year, based upon the initial implementation of the assessment
system for reading, writing, communication, and mathematics.))

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.165.080 and 1990 c 33 s 151 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to ((insure)) ensure that school districts are ((meeting
the requirements of an approved program)) using learning assistance
program funds effectively to improve the academic achievement of low-performing
students, the superintendent of public instruction shall ((monitor))
annually evaluate the effectiveness of such programs ((no less than
once every three years. The results of the evaluations required by RCW
28A.165.040 shall be transmitted to the superintendent of public instruction
annually)). The effectiveness review shall be based on the results of
state-mandated assessments, including both the state-wide norm-referenced tests
and the Washington assessment of student learning and other appropriate data,
as determined by the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)
Individual student records shall be maintained at the school district for a
period of time as determined by the superintendent of public instruction.

Sec.
9. RCW
28A.165.095 and 1997 c 431 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Schools and school districts may obtain((, in accordance with RCW
28A.320.017,)) waivers from the statutory requirements in this chapter that
pertain to the instructional program, operation, and management of schools,
except provisions pertaining to the monitoring of program effectiveness.
Waivers also may be obtained((, in accordance with RCW 28A.320.017,))
from any rules of the ((state board of education and)) superintendent of
public instruction adopted to implement the statutory requirements. The
superintendent of public instruction shall establish a process for obtaining
waivers.

(((2)
This section expires June 30, 1999.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. RCW
28A.165.010 (Intent) and 1989 c 233 s 1 & 1987 c 478 s 1 are
each repealed.

---
END ---