BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
1

INTENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that disruptive students can significantly impede effective
teaching and learning in the classroom. When disruptive behavior forces teachers
to devote a significant amount of time and energy on classroom management
rather than teaching, the learning of all students suffers, including the
learning of the student engaging in the disruptive behavior.

The
legislature finds that the short-term removal from the classroom of a
disruptive student may not be sufficient in every case to ensure an orderly
classroom environment that is conducive to teaching and learning. Teachers,
principals, and other school staff require training in effective strategies for
handling disruptive students. Schools and school districts should be
encouraged to provide staff with the training necessary to respond to
disruptions effectively and should have opportunities to seek support for
implementing plans to assist disruptive students more effectively in
alternative learning programs and settings when appropriate.

PART
2

PROFESSIONAL
DEVELOPMENT WORKSHOPS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.415 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to available funding, the superintendent of public instruction shall conduct
professional development institutes to provide opportunities for teachers,
principals, and other school staff to learn effective research-based strategies
for handling disruptive students. The training institutes shall emphasize
methods for handling disruptions in regular classrooms and how to design and
implement alternative learning settings and programs that have been proven to
be effective in providing for the educational needs of students who exhibit
frequent and prolonged disruptive behavior when placed in a regular classroom
setting. The institutes shall be intensive training programs at least two full
days in length.

The
superintendent of public instruction shall conduct at least one institute in
each of the nine educational service districts by March 1, 2000, subject to
available funding. The superintendent may enter into contracts with public or
private entities that provide training in effective research-based methods for
dealing with disruptive students. The institutes shall be open to teams of
teachers, principals, and other school staff from each school district choosing
to participate. However, as a condition of participating in the institutes,
school district teams shall be required to develop during or immediately
following the institute a district plan for carrying out the purposes of this
section. Individual participants in the institutes shall agree to provide
assistance as needed to other school staff in their school building or school
district, consistent with their other normal duties.

Elementary
schools and junior high and middle schools in districts that send teams to
participate in institutes conducted under this section are encouraged to formulate
school building-level plans for addressing the educational needs of disruptive
students and the needs of students and teachers in the regular classrooms for
an orderly and disciplined environment that is optimally conducive to learning.

PART
3

GRANT
PROGRAM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

A
grant program to assist schools in providing alternative learning programs and
settings for disruptive students in elementary school and middle or junior high
school is created.

The
purpose of the grant program is to assist schools and districts in implementing
plans for addressing the needs of disruptive students in elementary school and
middle or junior high school while improving the learning environment for
students and teachers in regular classrooms. Grants are intended to support
implementation of plans and programs that may include, but are not limited to,
the creation or expansion of appropriate alternative educational programs and
settings that are separate from the regular classroom environment and that are
designed to meet the educational needs of students who are frequently and
significantly disruptive when placed in the regular classroom setting.

The
superintendent of public instruction shall administer the grant program.
Schools, school districts, and consortia of schools or school districts may
apply for funds under the program in this section by submitting an application
to the superintendent of public instruction. A school, school district, or
consortium of schools or school districts receiving funds in accordance with
this section shall certify and provide documentation to the superintendent of
public instruction that funds received were expended for professional
development and related program implementation in accordance with the purposes
of this section.

Applications
must include a description of the school's or school district's plans for the
use of these funds and how the funds will assist in improving regular classroom
environments by providing for the removal of disruptive students and how the
funds will assist in the placement of disruptive students in alternative
learning programs and settings.

In
order to be eligible for funding, applicants' plans must provide for the use of
research-based strategies that have been demonstrated to be effective in
dealing with the kinds of students intended to be served through this program.

Applications
must also certify that at any program funded through the grant has the support
of at least a majority of the instructional staff in any school with students
who will be served through the program. However, in any school that has
adopted policies requiring that more than a majority of certificated staff
approve a proposal before beginning new programs or policies, the application
must indicate the level of support required by the school's policies.

In
distributing funds for this program, the superintendent shall give priority to
applications that demonstrate the highest proportion of students who exhibit
frequent and significant disruptive behavior or the highest proportion of
disciplinary incidents such as removals from regular classrooms, suspensions,
and expulsions. Priority shall also be assigned on the basis of an applicant's
lack of trained personnel and absence of programs related to addressing the
educational needs of disruptive students. Applicants may also be given priority
on the basis of other information which the superintendent determines may be
indicative of significant levels of disruptive behavior.

The
superintendent of public instruction shall consult with representatives of
principals' organizations in determining which applicants shall receive grants.

Grants
shall be continued for a minimum period of three years, subject to available
funding.

No
funds made available through this grant program may be distributed before July
1, 2000.

PART
4

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 2 of this act, referencing
section 2 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by
June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 2 of this act is null
and void.

(2)
If specific funding for the purposes of section 3 of this act, referencing
section 3 of this act by bill or chapter and section number, is not provided by
June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations act, section 3 of this act is null
and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---