BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that lasers are becoming both less expensive and more
accessible in our technologically advanced society. Laser devices are being
used by individuals in a manner so as to intimidate and harass. This creates
an especially serious problem for law enforcement officers who reasonably
believe they are the target of a laser sighting device on a firearm.
Additionally, emergency service providers, service providers, and others who
operate aircraft or motor vehicles may be negatively affected to the point of
jeopardizing their safety as well as the safety of others. In order to address
the misuse of lasers, the legislature hereby finds it necessary to criminalize
the discharge of lasers under certain circumstances.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Aircraft" means any contrivance known or hereafter invented, used,
or designed for navigation of or flight in air.

(2)
"Laser" means any device designed or used to amplify electromagnetic
radiation by simulated emission which is visible to the human eye.

(3)
"Laser sighting system or device" means any system or device which is
integrated with or affixed to a firearm and which emits a laser light beam that
is used by the shooter to assist in the sight alignment of that firearm.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
person is guilty of unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree if he or
she knowingly and maliciously discharges a laser, under circumstances not
amounting to malicious mischief in the first degree:

(a)
At a law enforcement officer or other employee of a law enforcement agency who
is performing his or her official duties in uniform or exhibiting evidence of
his or her authority, and in a manner that would support that officer's or
employee's reasonable belief that he or she is targeted with a laser sighting
device or system; or

(b)
At a law enforcement officer or other employee of a law enforcement agency who
is performing his or her official duties, causing an impairment of the safety
or operation of a law enforcement vehicle or causing an interruption or
impairment of service rendered to the public by negatively affecting the
officer or employee; or

(c)
At a pilot, causing an impairment of the safety or operation of an aircraft or
causing an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public by
negatively affecting the pilot; or

(d)
At a fire fighter or other employee of a fire department, county fire marshal's
office, county fire prevention bureau, or fire protection district who is
performing his or her official duties, causing an impairment of the safety or
operation of an emergency vehicle or causing an interruption or impairment of
service rendered to the public by negatively affecting the fire fighter or
employee; or

(e)
At a transit operator or driver of a public or private transit company while
that person is performing his or her official duties, causing an impairment of
the safety or operation of a transit vehicle or causing an interruption or
impairment of service rendered to the public by negatively affecting the
operator or driver; or

(f)
At a school bus driver employed by a school district or private company while
the driver is performing his or her official duties, causing an impairment of
the safety or operation of a school bus or causing an interruption or
impairment of service by negatively affecting the bus driver.

(2)
Except as provided in section 5 of this act, unlawful discharge of a laser in
the first degree is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person is guilty of unlawful discharge of a laser in the second degree if he or
she knowingly and maliciously discharges a laser, under circumstances not
amounting to unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree or malicious
mischief in the first or second degree:

(a)
At a person, not described in section 3(1) (a) through (f) of this act, who is
operating a motor vehicle at the time, causing an impairment of the safety or
operation of a motor vehicle by negatively affecting the driver; or

(b)
At a person described in section 3(1) (b) through (f) of this act, causing a
substantial risk of an impairment or interruption as described in section 3(1)
(b) through (f) of this act; or

(c)
At a person in order to intimidate or threaten that person.

(2)
Except as provided in section 5 of this act, unlawful discharge of a laser in
the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree or second degree is a civil
infraction if committed by a juvenile who has not before committed either
offense. The monetary penalty imposed upon a juvenile may not exceed one
hundred dollars.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
chapter does not apply to the conduct of a laser development activity by or on
behalf of the United States armed forces.

Sec.
7. RCW
9A.46.060 and 1997 c 338 s 52 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, "harassment" may include but is not limited to
any of the following crimes:

(1)
Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020);

(2)
Malicious harassment (RCW 9A.36.080);

(3)
Telephone harassment (RCW 9.61.230);

(4)
Assault in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.011);

(5)
Assault of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.120);

(6)
Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021);

(7)
Assault of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.130);

(8)
Assault in the fourth degree (RCW 9A.36.041);

(9)
Reckless endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);

(10)
Extortion in the first degree (RCW 9A.56.120);

(11)
Extortion in the second degree (RCW 9A.56.130);

(12)
Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);

(13)
Burglary in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.020);

(14)
Burglary in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.030);

(15)
Criminal trespass in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.070);

(16)
Criminal trespass in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.080);

(17)
Malicious mischief in the first degree (RCW 9A.48.070);

(18)
Malicious mischief in the second degree (RCW 9A.48.080);

(19)
Malicious mischief in the third degree (RCW 9A.48.090);

(20)
Kidnapping in the first degree (RCW 9A.40.020);

(21)
Kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030);

(22)
Unlawful imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040);

(23)
Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040);

(24)
Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050);

(25)
Rape in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.060);

(26)
Indecent liberties (RCW 9A.44.100);

(27)
Rape of a child in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.073);

(28)
Rape of a child in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.076);

(29)
Rape of a child in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.079);

(30)
Child molestation in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.083);

(31)
Child molestation in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.086);

(32)
Child molestation in the third degree (RCW 9A.44.089);

(33)
Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110);

(34)
Residential burglary (RCW 9A.52.025); ((and))

(35)
Violation of a temporary or permanent protective order issued pursuant to
chapter 9A.46, 10.14, 10.99, 26.09, or 26.50 RCW;

(36)
Unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree (section 3 of this act); and

(37)
Unlawful discharge of a laser in the second degree (section 4 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 9A RCW.

---
END ---