BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that changes in the rapidly changing telecommunications
market are resulting in new consumer problems. The legislature further finds
that unauthorized changes in telecommunications service, known commonly as
slamming, and unauthorized billing for service on telecommunications bills,
known commonly as cramming, are unfair and deceptive consumer practices. The
legislature further finds that consumers should have options available to protect
themselves against unauthorized service changes and billings. In addition,
current penalties and remedies need to be increased to provide a more effective
deterrent to these practices.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Every local exchange telecommunications company must offer to its customers, as
a part of basic local service and at no additional cost, the following optional
services:

(a)
Account freeze service. If a customer has subscribed to account freeze
service, the local exchange company may not make changes to the customer's
local or long-distance service except on direct oral or written direction of
the customer and shall reject any orders for change in service that are
purported to be submitted on behalf of the customer; and

(b)
Bill block service. If a customer has subscribed to bill block service, the
local exchange company may not bill the customer for nontelecommunications
services.

(2)
Each local exchange telecommunications company must notify its customers of the
services described in this section at the time service is established and at
least once per year thereafter. The commission may prescribe the form of
notice by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. All
lists of charges for services that appear on a consumer's bill shall be clear,
separate, and distinct. At a minimum, any local exchange company that bills
for nontelecommunications services must clearly identify on the bill the actual
name of the company making the charge, the specific product or service being
billed for, and a toll-free contact number for disputing a charge. The
commission may prescribe the form of bill disclosure by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Telecommunications companies shall not offer telecommunications services in the
form of a sweepstakes entry, contest entry form, calling card service, club
membership, or combined with any other inducement where the advertisements and
details of charges for the telecommunications services are not clear, separate,
and distinct.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
customer may notify their local exchange company of an unauthorized service
change or billing by telephone to a customer service area, to a designated
customer service electronic mail address, or in writing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
In addition to any penalty imposed by other provisions of law, any person who
violates sections 2 through 7 of this act or any rule of the commission (a)
defining conditions and processes for the switching of local or long-distance
telecommunications service; or (b) limiting the authority of telecommunications
companies to bill for nontelecommunications services shall be liable for a
civil penalty in the amount of one thousand dollars per day. Each day shall be
considered a separate violation. For subsequent violations the amount of the
civil penalty shall be increased to five thousand dollars per day.

(2)
Penalties imposed under this section shall be imposed in the manner as
penalties in RCW 80.04.405.

(3)
If the commission finds a company has violated any rule of the commission
defining conditions and processes for the switching of local or long-distance
telecommunications service, it may require that all future service changes
submitted by the company be in writing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) A
customer who has had their local or long-distance telecommunications service
switched without proper authorization, as defined by the commission, is not
liable for any payments to the unauthorized carrier and shall not be charged
for having their service restored to their authorized carrier. The customer
may be charged for service at a rate no greater than what would have been
charged by his or her authorized telecommunications company.

(2)
If a customer disputes a charge for nontelecommunications service, the local
exchange company shall remove the charge from the bill. This provision does
not affect the ability of the charging company to independently collect
legitimate charges.

(3)
The commission may adopt rules to enforce this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by sections 2 through 7 of this
act are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of
sections 2 through 7 of this act is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in
trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. In any action under
chapter 19.86 RCW, a person has a presumption of injury and statutory damages
in the amount of two thousand five hundred dollars. For purposes of this
section, a person bringing the action must prove:

(1)
A violation of sections 2 through 7 of this act;

(2)
A violation of any rule of the commission that: (a) Defines conditions and
processes for the switching of local or long-distance telecommunications
service; or (b) limits the authority of telecommunications companies to bill
for services; or

(3)
That the switching of local or long-distance telecommunications service or
wrongful inclusion on a bill is an unfair or deceptive act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
Washington utilities and transportation commission and the attorney general
shall assess and report to the legislature by June 2000 whether the practices
of unauthorized service changes and billing have been deterred by this
legislation and may make recommendations to the legislature with regard to
enforcement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each added to chapter 80.36 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---