BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Collateral challenges to convictions impose trauma on victims of crime,
interfere with rehabilitation, and place a continuing burden on courts and
public officials. It is therefore the intent of the legislature to allow such
challenges only when the conviction constitutes a clear miscarriage of justice.

(2)
Multiple petitions challenging the same conviction are both especially
burdensome and unlikely to raise valid issues. It is the intent of the
legislature that such petitions will be allowed only under rare and carefully
defined circumstances.

(3)
A judgment that was upheld on direct appeal or that was not appealed is
presumed valid. The right to challenge such a judgment arises only from
statute. A person who has been convicted of a crime, which was upheld on
appeal, has no constitutional right to challenge a facially valid judgment.

Sec.
2. RCW
2.32.070 and 1992 c 140 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
clerk of the supreme court and the clerks of the court of appeals shall collect
the following fees for their official services:

Upon
filing his or her first paper or record and making an appearance, the appellant
or petitioner shall pay to the clerk of said court a docket fee of two hundred
fifty dollars. The supreme court and the court of appeals cannot waive the
fee for any second or subsequent collateral attack of a judgment and sentence
in a criminal case.

For
copies of opinions, twenty cents per folio: PROVIDED, That counsel of record
and criminal defendants shall be supplied a copy without charge.

For
certificates showing admission of an attorney to practice law five dollars,
except that there shall be no fee for an original certificate to be issued at
the time of his or her admission.

For
filing a petition for review of a court of appeals decision terminating review,
two hundred dollars.

The
foregoing fees shall be all the fees connected with the appeal or special
proceeding.

No
fees shall be required to be advanced by the state or any municipal
corporation, or any public officer prosecuting or defending on behalf of such
state or municipal corporation.

Sec.
3. RCW
7.36.130 and 1989 c 395 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No
court or judge shall inquire into the legality of any judgment or process
whereby the party is in custody, or discharge the party when the term of
commitment has not expired, in either of the cases following:

(1)
Upon any process issued on any final judgment of a court of competent
jurisdiction except where it is alleged in the petition that rights guaranteed
the petitioner by the Constitution of the state of Washington or of the United
States have been violated and the petition is filed within the time allowed by
RCW 10.73.090 and 10.73.100 and, if a second or subsequent petition
challenging a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction, the petition
satisfies the requirements of RCW 10.73.140.

(2)
For any contempt of any court, officer or body having authority in the premises
to commit; but an order of commitment, as for a contempt upon proceedings to
enforce the remedy of a party, is not included in any of the foregoing
specifications.

(3)
Upon a warrant issued from the superior court upon an indictment or
information.

Sec.
4. RCW
7.36.250 and 1947 c 256 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person entitled to prosecute a writ of habeas corpus who, by reason of poverty
is unable to pay the costs of such proceeding or give security therefor, may
file in the court having original jurisdiction of the proceeding an affidavit
setting forth such facts and that he believes himself to be entitled to the
redress sought. Upon the filing of such an affidavit the court may, if
satisfied that the proceeding or appeal is instituted or taken in good faith,
order that such proceeding, including appeal, may be prosecuted without
prepayment of fees or costs or the giving of security therefor. However, a
petitioner filing a second or subsequent collateral attack of a judgment and
sentence in a criminal case must pay the filing fees whether or not the
petitioner is considered indigent.

Sec.
5. RCW
10.73.090 and 1989 c 395 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No petition or motion for collateral attack on a judgment and sentence in a
criminal case may be filed more than one year after the judgment becomes final
if the judgment and sentence is valid on its face and was rendered by a court
of competent jurisdiction. No petition or motion for collateral attack on a
judgment and sentence in a criminal case that has been filed within one year
after the judgment becomes final may be amended to add new claims more than one
year after the judgment became final.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "collateral attack" means any form
of postconviction relief other than a direct appeal. "Collateral
attack" includes, but is not limited to, a personal restraint petition, a
habeas corpus petition, a motion to vacate judgment, a motion to withdraw
guilty plea, a motion for a new trial, and a motion to arrest judgment.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, a judgment becomes final on the last of the
following dates:

(a)
The date it is filed with the clerk of the trial court;

(b)
The date that an appellate court issues its mandate disposing of a timely
direct appeal from the conviction; or

(c)
The date that the United States Supreme Court denies a timely petition for
certiorari to review a decision affirming the conviction on direct appeal. The
filing of a motion to reconsider denial of certiorari does not prevent a
judgment from becoming final.

(4)
The time for filing a petition is jurisdictional and may not be extended except
as provided for in RCW 10.73.100.

Sec.
6. RCW
10.73.100 and 1989 c 395 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
time limit specified in RCW 10.73.090 does not apply to a petition or motion that
is based solely on one or more of the following grounds:

(1)
Newly discovered evidence that, if proven and viewed in light of the
evidence as a whole, would be sufficient to establish by clear and convincing
evidence that no reasonable fact-finder would have found the defendant guilty
of the offense, if the defendant acted with reasonable diligence in
discovering the evidence and filing the petition or motion;

(2)
The statute that the defendant was convicted of violating was unconstitutional
on its face or as applied to the defendant's conduct;

(3)
The conviction was barred by double jeopardy under Amendment V of the United
States Constitution or Article I, section 9 of the state Constitution;

(4)
The defendant pled not guilty and the evidence introduced at trial was
insufficient to support the conviction;

(5)
The sentence imposed was in excess of the court's jurisdiction; or

(6)
There has been a significant change in the law, whether substantive or
procedural, which is material to the conviction, sentence, or other order
entered in a criminal or civil proceeding instituted by the state or local
government, and either the legislature has expressly provided that the change
in the law is to be applied retroactively, or a court, in interpreting a change
in the law that lacks express legislative intent regarding retroactive
application, determines that sufficient reasons exist to require retroactive
application of the changed legal standard.

Sec.
7. RCW
10.73.140 and 1989 c 395 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person filing a collateral attack on a judgment in a criminal case shall
include a list of all prior collateral attacks upon the same final judgment
that the person has filed and the grounds for relief raised in each prior
collateral attack. A person's failure to provide an accurate list of prior
collateral attacks may be grounds for dismissing the collateral attack.

(2)
If a person has previously filed a ((petition for personal restraint, the
court of appeals will)) collateral attack, the court may not
consider ((the petition)) a new collateral attack unless the
person certifies that he or she has not filed a previous ((petition)) collateral
attack on similar grounds, and shows good cause why the petitioner did not
raise the new grounds in ((the)) any previous ((petition))
collateral attack, and obtains permission from the supreme court to file the
new collateral attack. Upon receipt of a ((personal restraint petition))
motion for permission to file a second or subsequent collateral attack,
the supreme court ((of appeals)) shall review the ((petition))
collateral attack and determine whether the person has ((previously
filed a petition or petitions and if so, compare them. If upon review, the
court of appeals finds that the petitioner has)) previously raised the same
grounds for review, or ((that)) whether the petitioner has failed
to show good cause why the ground was not raised earlier((, the court of
appeals shall dismiss the petition on its own motion without requiring the
state to respond to the petition)). If the supreme court determines
that the petitioner has demonstrated good cause, the supreme court shall enter
an order allowing the appropriate court of appeals to consider the merits of
the issues. A second or subsequent collateral attack is not properly filed
until the supreme court enters an order authorizing the court of appeals to
consider the merits of the claim.

(3)
Good cause exists when:

(a)
The petitioner shows that the claim relies on a new rule of constitutional law
made retroactive to cases on collateral review by either the United States
supreme court or the Washington supreme court; or

(b)(i)
The factual predicate for the claim could not have been discovered previously
through the exercise of due diligence; and

(ii)
The facts underlying the claim if proven and viewed in light of the evidence as
a whole, would be sufficient to establish by clear and convincing evidence
that, but for the constitutional error, no reasonable fact-finder would have
found the petitioner guilty of the underlying offense.

(4)
Upon receipt of a first or subsequent ((petition)) collateral attack,
the court ((of appeals)) shall, whenever possible, review the ((petition))
collateral attack and determine if the ((petition)) collateral
attack is based on frivolous grounds. If frivolous, the court ((of
appeals)) shall dismiss the ((petition)) collateral attack on
its own motion without first requiring the state to respond to the ((petition))
collateral attack.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 10.73 RCW to read as follows:

No
court may grant relief to any person who files a petition or motion for
collateral attack on a judgment and sentence in a criminal case unless it
appears that the petitioner has proven by clear and convincing evidence that a
right guaranteed the petitioner by the Constitution of the state of Washington
or of the United States has been violated and that the constitutional error had
substantial and injurious effect or influence in determining the jury's
verdict.

No
court may require the state to respond to a collateral attack on a judgment and
sentence in a criminal case until the person filing the collateral attack
establishes that the collateral attack is not frivolous, is timely under RCW
10.73.090, and is not barred by RCW 10.73.140.

If the judgment and sentence has been upheld on direct appeal or
not appealed, the ineffectiveness or incompetence of counsel during later
collateral postconviction proceedings shall not be grounds for relief.

---
END ---