BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who is authorized to take or hunt any marine mammal in the waters of the
state or of the United States for subsistence reasons may not act for
commercial purposes as defined in RCW 77.15.110, and may not sell or attempt to
sell any such marine mammal in whole or in part.

Sec.
2. RCW
77.15.260 and 1998 c 190 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful trafficking in fish or wildlife in the second
degree if the person traffics in fish or wildlife with a wholesale value of
less than two hundred fifty dollars and:

(a)
The fish or wildlife is classified as game, food fish, shellfish, game fish, or
protected wildlife and the trafficking is not authorized by statute or rule of
the department; or

(b)
The fish or wildlife is unclassified and the trafficking violates any rule of
the department.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful trafficking in fish or wildlife in the first
degree if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section and:

(a)
The fish or wildlife has a value of two hundred fifty dollars or more; ((or))

(b)
The fish or wildlife is designated as endangered or deleterious exotic wildlife
and such trafficking is not authorized by any statute or rule of the department;
or

(c)
The fish or wildlife belongs to a species of marine mammal that may be taken or
hunted only for subsistence purposes.

(3)(a)
Unlawful trafficking in fish or wildlife in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

(b) Unlawful trafficking in fish or wildlife in the first degree is
a class C felony.

---
END ---