BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Certain persons who submitted a water right claim form with the department
between September 1, 1997, and June 30, 1998, and whose claim was rejected by
the department because the department deemed the claim to be incomplete
and thus not in compliance with RCW 90.14.051 may submit additional information
as provided in subsection (2) of this section in support of the claim between
July 1, 1999, and December 31, 1999. The persons eligible to submit additional
information under this section and to receive further consideration for the
registering of their claims are those who meet the following qualifications:

(a)
The person checked the box labeled "other" on the water right claim
form in part 12 where it asks the claimant to state the legal doctrine under
which the person is claiming a water right;

(b)
The premise of the person's claim of a water right for ground water is that a
right to ground water was inherent in and appurtenant to the original land
patent issued by the federal government at the time the person's land was
severed from federal ownership. The original water right claim form submitted
to the department need not have asserted this premise for the person to be
qualified to receive further consideration under this section.

(2)
Persons meeting the qualifications in subsection (1) of this section may submit
to the department a statement that their claim to a ground water right is based
on the assertion that such right accompanied the federally issued land patent
for lands they now own or occupy. The claimant must also submit with his or
her statement a bona fide copy of the original land patent document issued by
the United States. The water right claim of a person meeting the
qualifications established in this section and submitting the statement and
bona fide copy of his or her land patent as required by this subsection is
deemed sufficient in lieu of compliance with RCW 90.14.051 and 90.14.068 and
shall be accepted for filing in the water rights claims registry by the
department.

(3) This section does not apply to other claims the department
rejected as ineligible for filing under RCW 90.14.068(5) or (6), for failure to
submit a substantially complete statement of claim as required in RCW
90.14.051, for failure to remit the filing fee required by RCW 90.14.061, or
for submitting a claim for a purpose that is exempt from the requirement to
submit a claim under RCW 90.14.041. The registering of claims under this
section as directed by the legislature confers upon those claims no special
status or recognition and is subject to chapter 90.14 RCW as is any other claim
submitted in a timely manner.

---
END ---