BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
15.54.325 and 1998 c 36 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may distribute in this state a commercial fertilizer until it has
been registered with the department by the producer, importer, or packager of
that product. A bulk fertilizer does not require registration if all
commercial fertilizer products contained in the final product are registered.

(2)
An application for registration shall be made biennially on a form
furnished by the department and shall be accompanied by a fee of ((twenty-five))
fifty dollars for each product. Labels for each product shall accompany
the application. All companies planning to mix customer-formula fertilizers
shall include the statement "customer-formula grade mixes" under the
column headed "product name" on the product registration application
form. All customer-formula fertilizers sold under one brand name shall be
considered one product.

(3)
An application for registration shall include the following:

(a)
The product name;

(b)
The brand and grade;

(c)
The guaranteed analysis;

(d)
Name, address, and phone number of the registrant;

(e)
Labels for each product being registered;

(f)
Identification of those products that are (i) waste-derived fertilizers, (ii)
micronutrient fertilizers, or (iii) fertilizer materials containing phosphate;

(g)
Identification of the fertilizer components in the commercial fertilizer
product and verification that all the components are registered. If any of the
components are not registered, then the application must include the concentration
of each metal in each fertilizer component, for which standards are established
under RCW 15.54.800;

(h)
Waste-derived fertilizers and micronutrient fertilizers shall include at a
minimum, information to ensure the product complies with chapter 70.105 RCW and
the resource conservation and recovery act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6901 et seq.; and

(i)
Any other information required by the department by rule.

(4) A registration expires on June 30th of the second year
following registration. If an application for renewal of the product
registration provided for in this section is not filed prior to ((July 1st
of any one year)) the day following the expiration of the registration,
a penalty of ten dollars per product shall be assessed and added to the
original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal registration
shall be issued. The assessment of this late collection fee shall not prevent
the department from taking any other action as provided for in this chapter.
The penalty shall not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit that he or
she has not distributed this commercial fertilizer subsequent to the expiration
of his or her prior registration.

Sec.
2. RCW
15.54.330 and 1998 c 36 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall examine the commercial fertilizer product registration
application form and labels for conformance with the requirements of this
chapter. If the application and appropriate labels are in proper form and
contain the required information, the particular commercial fertilizer products
shall be registered by the department and a certificate of registration shall
be issued to the applicant. ((All registrations expire June 30th of each
year.))

(2)
In reviewing the commercial fertilizer product registration application, the
department may consider experimental data, manufacturers' evaluations, data
from agricultural experiment stations, product review evaluations, or other
authoritative sources to substantiate labeling claims. The data shall be from
statistically designed and analyzed trials representative of the soil, crops,
and climatic conditions found in the northwestern area of the United States.

(3)
In determining whether approval of a labeling statement or guarantee of an
ingredient is appropriate, the department may require the submission of a
written statement describing the methodology of laboratory analysis utilized,
the source of the ingredient material, and any reference material relied upon
to support the label statement or guarantee of ingredient.

(4) Before registering a waste-derived fertilizer or micronutrient
fertilizer, the department shall obtain written approval from the department of
ecology as provided in RCW ((15.54.800)) 15.54.820. Once a
waste-derived fertilizer or micronutrient fertilizer has been approved by the
department of ecology, its subsequent use in another product during that
registration cycle shall not require department of ecology review. This
subsection shall apply to new and renewal registration applications for periods
beginning July 1, 1999, and thereafter.

---
END ---