BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services may implement a moratorium on the
issuance of new adult family home licences if the number of licensed adult
family homes exceeds the department's capacity to monitor for safety and
quality of care standards. The department's monitoring capacity shall be
determined by measuring the number of licensed adult family homes per adult
family home licensor. If the average number of licensed adult family homes per
adult family home licensor exceeds the ratio allocated in the department's
operating budget, the department may implement a moratorium.

(2)
When a moratorium is in place, the department shall have the discretion on a
case-by-case basis to issue an adult family home license based upon an
applicant's ability to accommodate the resident needs of a particular
geographic area, ethnic community, or the needs of residents with unique or
special care needs.

(3)
The department of social and health services is authorized to adopt rules for
implementing the provisions of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
70.128.061 and 1997 c 392 s 402; and

(2) RCW
70.128.062 and 1997 c 392 s 403.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---