BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
(1)(a) The legislature finds that the common schools of Washington began to
implement comprehensive performance-based education reforms in 1993 as provided
in House Bill No. 1209 and subsequent legislation. The principal features of
the present system for funding the operation of the common schools were enacted
in 1977. The more fully schools and school districts implement
performance-based educational programs, the less well aligned Washington's
school funding and school program delivery systems become. The governor's
council on education reform and funding, created by executive order in 1991,
did not adopt recommendations on how to redesign the funding system to align
with the performance-based instructional program model.

(b)
The legislature further finds that many schools and school districts in
Washington have developed creative approaches to helping students achieve the
essential academic learning requirements and the goals of the basic education
act as codified in RCW 28A.150.210. The successes already achieved by schools
and school districts on the Washington assessment of student learning
constitute evidence that the experiences of schools and school districts in
Washington may suggest viable strategies for designing performance-based
funding programs.

(c)
The legislature recognizes that as state-wide accountability systems are
developed and implemented to hold students, schools, and school districts
accountable for improving student performance, it is appropriate and necessary
to concurrently conduct a fundamental reexamination of the educational funding
system and explore possible education finance system reform.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "commission" means the commission
on school funding review.

(3)
The commission on school funding review is created.

(4)(a)
The commission shall consist of thirteen citizen members, appointed by the
governor, each of whom shall apply for membership and demonstrate his or her
concern and interest in education financing, one member appointed by each
co-speaker of the house of representatives, and one member from each major
political party appointed by the president of the senate. In appointing
members of the commission, the governor shall consider the expertise in
educational finance of applicants, and attempt to include parents, business and
community leaders, and individuals with experience as principals,
superintendents, school business managers, school auditors, teachers, and
school directors, and with experience in postsecondary education.

(b)
The governor shall appoint a representative of the office of the governor or
the office of financial management. The commission membership shall include
members with expertise in special education and expertise in programs designed
to meet the need of students with limited English proficiency. The co-speakers
of the house of representatives shall each appoint one member of their
respective caucuses. The president of the senate shall appoint one member of
the senate from each major political party. The governor shall appoint the
chair of the commission.

(5)(a)
The commission shall identify at least fifteen but not more than twenty-five
successful comprehensive school or school district program models from within
the school districts of Washington. In identifying successful comprehensive
program models, the commission shall place special emphasis on results on the
Washington assessment of student learning.

(b)
After reviewing the structure and operation of the successful comprehensive
school or school district program models, the commission shall approve pilot
performance-based funding programs that could be used in these schools and
school districts. The pilot performance-based funding programs shall be
designed to implement either school-based or district-wide performance-based
education funding systems.

(c)
Pilot performance-based funding programs may include, but are not limited to,
weighted student formulas and systems allowing for more flexible expenditure of
funding formula allocations, and categorical program appropriations from state
and federal sources.

(d)
In designing pilot performance-based funding programs, the commission shall
consider the actual cost of providing for both the immediate and future needs
of students to be served by the school or school district.

(6)
The commission shall report its findings and recommendations to the governor
and the legislature by January 1, 2001. In its final report, the commission
shall recommend steps for implementing state-wide a system of performance-based
common school financing.

(7)
Schools and school districts choosing to participate with the commission in
developing pilot performance-based funding program designs shall receive
compensation for expenses incurred through such participation. The amount of
compensation shall be determined by the commission, subject to available
funding.

(8)
The commission shall employ such staff as may be necessary to fulfill its
duties under this section. The commission is authorized to enter into
contracts for services which may be necessary to fulfill its duties under this
section. The commission shall create technical advisory committees as needed
in order to fulfill its duties under this section.

(9) The commission shall expire on January 1, 2001.

---
END ---