BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.21.860 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or charge of
whatever nature or description upon the light and power, or gas distribution
businesses, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, or telephone business, as defined in
RCW 82.04.065, except that (a) a tax authorized by RCW 35.21.865 may be imposed
and (b) a fee may be charged to such businesses that recovers actual
administrative expenses incurred by a city or town that are directly related to
receiving and approving a permit, license, and franchise, to inspecting plans
and construction, or to the preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to
chapter 43.21C RCW.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees imposed on an
electrical energy, natural gas, or telephone business, by contract existing on
April 20, 1982, with a city or town, for the duration of the contract, but the
franchise fees shall be considered taxes for the purposes of the limitations
established in RCW 35.21.865 and 35.21.870 to the extent the fees exceed the
costs allowable under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Any franchise fee imposed upon solid waste collection or transportation
businesses or services shall be limited to the amount necessary to recover
actual administrative expenses incurred by a city or town that are directly
related to receiving and approving a permit, contract, license, and franchise
to a solid waste collection or transportation business or service, to
inspecting plans and construction, or to the preparation of a detailed
statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.58 RCW to read as follows:

Any franchise fee imposed upon solid waste collection or
transportation businesses or services shall be limited to the amount necessary
to recover actual administrative expenses incurred by a county that are
directly related to receiving and approving a permit, contract, license, and
franchise to a solid waste collection or transportation business or service, to
inspecting plans and construction, or to the preparation of a detailed
statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW.

---
END ---