BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
44.05.020 and 1983 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the
context requires otherwise.

(1)
"Chief election officer" means the secretary of state.

(2)
"Federal census" means the decennial census required by federal law
to be prepared by the United States bureau of the census in each year ending in
zero.

(3)
"Lobbyist" means an individual required to register with the
Washington public disclosure commission pursuant to RCW 42.17.150.

(4)
"Plan" means a plan for legislative and congressional redistricting
mandated by Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution, where each
legislative district is divided into two subdistricts, denoted as subdistricts
A and B, with a single member of the house of representatives being elected
from each subdistrict.

Sec.
2. RCW
44.05.080 and 1983 c 16 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to other duties prescribed by law, the commission shall:

(1)
Adopt rules pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to
carry out the provisions of Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution
and of this chapter, which rules shall provide that three voting members of the
commission constitute a quorum to do business, and that the votes of three of
the voting members are required for any official action of the commission;

(2)
Act as the legislature's recipient of the final redistricting data and maps
from the United States Bureau of the Census;

(3)
Comply with requirements to disclose and preserve public records as specified
in chapters 40.14 and 42.17 RCW;

(4)
Hold open meetings pursuant to the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW;

(5)
Prepare and disclose its minutes pursuant to RCW 42.32.030;

(6)
Be subject to the provisions of RCW 42.17.240;

(7)
Prepare and publish a report with the plan; the report will be made available
to the public at the time the plan is published. The report will include but
will not be limited to: (a) The population and percentage deviation from the
average district population for every district, as well as the population
and percentage deviation from the average subdistrict population for every
subdistrict of a legislative district; (b) an explanation of the criteria
used in developing the plan with a justification of any deviation in a district
from the average district population, as well as a justification of any
deviation in a subdistrict of a legislative district from the average
subdistrict population; (c) a map of all the districts that includes the
two subdistricts of each legislative district; and (d) the estimated cost
incurred by the counties for adjusting precinct boundaries.

Sec.
3. RCW
44.05.090 and 1990 c 126 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the redistricting plan:

(1)
Districts shall have a population as nearly equal as is practicable, excluding
nonresident military personnel, based on the population reported in the federal
decennial census. The two subdistricts of each legislative district must
have a population as nearly equal as is practicable, excluding nonresident
military personnel, based on the population reported in the federal decennial
census.

(2)
To the extent consistent with subsection (1) of this section the commission
plan should, insofar as practical, accomplish the following:

(a)
District lines, and the lines of the two subdistricts of each legislative
district, should be drawn so as to coincide with the boundaries of local
political subdivisions and areas recognized as communities of interest. The
number of counties and municipalities divided among more than one district or
subdistrict of a legislative district should be as small as possible;

(b)
Districts and the two subdistricts of each legislative district should
be composed of convenient, contiguous, and compact territory. Land areas may
be deemed contiguous if they share a common land border or are connected by a
ferry, highway, bridge, or tunnel. Areas separated by geographical boundaries
or artificial barriers that prevent transportation within a district or
subdistrict of a legislative district should not be deemed contiguous; ((and))

(c)
Whenever practicable, a precinct shall be wholly within a single legislative
district and a single subdistrict of a legislative district; and

(d)
The two subdistricts of each new legislative district must be drawn to include
the residence of no more than one incumbent member of the house of
representatives, based upon their residences designated in their voter
registration as of the first day of July in the year when the redistricting
plan is required to be prepared by the commission. However, if more than two
incumbent members of the house of representatives so reside in a single new
legislative district, the commission shall by lot draw the names of two of
these legislators, each of whose residence must be located in a different
subdistrict of that new legislative district.

(3)
The commission's plan and any plan adopted by the supreme court under RCW
44.05.100(4) shall provide for forty-nine legislative districts.

(4)
The house of representatives shall consist of ninety-eight members, ((two))
one of whom shall be elected from and run ((at large)) from a
separate subdistrict within each legislative district. The senate shall
consist of forty-nine members, one of whom shall be elected from each
legislative district.

(5)
The commission shall exercise its powers to provide fair and effective
representation and to encourage electoral competition. The commission's plan
shall not be drawn purposely to favor or discriminate against any political
party or group.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---