BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.28 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that it is in the public interest to convert the Puget Sound
shrimp fishery from the status of an emerging fishery to that of a limited
entry fishery. The purpose of this act is to initiate this conversion,
recognizing that additional details associated with the shrimp fishery limited
entry program will need to be developed. The legislature intends to complete
the development of the laws associated with this limited entry fishery program
during the next regular session and will complete the development of laws
associated with this limited entry fishery program during the next regular
session and will consider recommendations from the industry and the department
during this program.

Sec.
2. RCW
75.28.130 and 1994 c 260 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required for shellfish
fisheries and the annual fees for those licenses. The director may issue a
limited-entry commercial fishery license only to a person who meets the
qualifications established in applicable governing sections of this title.

Fishery Annual Fee Vessel Limited

(Governing section(s)) Resident Nonresident Required? Entry?

(a) Burrowing shrimp $185 $295 Yes No

(b)
Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(c)
Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Puget Sound

(d)
Dungeness crab- $295 $520 Yes Yes

coastal
(RCW 75.30.350)

(e)
Dungeness crab- $295 $520 Yes Yes

coastal,
class B

(RCW 75.30.350)

(f)
Dungeness crab- $130 $185 Yes Yes

Puget
Sound

(RCW 75.30.130)

(g)
Emerging commercial $185 $295 Determined Determined

fishery
(RCW 75.30.220 by rule by rule

and 75.28.740)

(h)
Geoduck (RCW $ 0 $ 0 Yes Yes

75.30.280)

(i)
Hardshell clam $530 $985 Yes No

mechanical
harvester

(RCW 75.28.280)

(j)
Oyster reserve $130 $185 No No

(RCW 75.28.290)

(k) Razor clam $130 $185 No No

(l)
Sea cucumber dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.250)

(m)
Sea urchin dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.210)

(n) Shellfish dive $130 $185 Yes No

(o) Shellfish pot $130 $185 Yes No

(p)
Shrimp pot- (($325 $575)) Yes ((No))

((Hood
Canal)) $185 $295 Yes

Puget
Sound

(section 3 of this act)

(q)
Shrimp trawl- $240 $405 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(r)
Shrimp trawl- $185 $295 Yes ((No))

Yes

Puget
Sound

(section
4 of this act)

(s) Squid $185 $295 Yes No

(2)
The director may by rule determine the species of shellfish that may be taken
with the commercial fishery licenses established in this section, the gear that
may be used with the licenses, and the areas or waters in which the licenses
may be used. Where a fishery license has been established for a particular
species, gear, geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general
fishery license may not be used to take shellfish in that fishery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Puget Sound shrimp emerging fishery management regime is converted from an
emerging fishery status to a limited entry fishery status effective January 1,
2000.

(2)
Effective January 1, 2000, a person shall not fish for shrimp taken from Puget
Sound for commercial purposes with shrimp pot gear except under the provisions
of a shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery license issued under RCW 75.28.130.

(3)
Effective January 1, 2000, a shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery license shall only
be issued to a natural person who held an emerging commercial fishery license
and Puget Sound shrimp pot experimental fishery permit during 1999. Beginning
January 1, 2001, a shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery license shall only be issued
to a natural person who held a shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery license during
the previous year.

(4)
Shrimp pot-Puget Sound fishery licenses are nontransferable.

(5)
The department, by rule, may set licensee participation requirements for Puget
Sound shellfish trawl shrimp harvest.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 75.30 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Puget Sound shrimp emerging fishery management regime is converted from an
emerging fishery status to a limited entry fishery status effective January 1,
2000.

(2)
Effective January 1, 2000, a person shall not fish for shrimp taken from Puget
Sound for commercial purposes with shrimp trawl gear except under the
provisions of a shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery license issued under RCW
75.28.130.

(3)
Effective January 1, 2000, a shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery license shall
only be issued to a natural person who held an emerging commercial fishery
license and Puget Sound shrimp trawl experimental fishery permit during 1999.
Beginning January 1, 2001, a shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery license shall
only be issued to a natural person who held a shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery
license during the previous licensing year.

(4)
The department, by rule, may set licensee participation requirements for Puget
Sound shellfish trawl shrimp harvest.

(5)
Shrimp trawl-Puget Sound fishery licenses are nontransferable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of fish and wildlife and the Puget Sound shrimp fishing industry
shall work cooperatively to refine the limited entry management program for the
Puget Sound shrimp fishery. The department shall make recommendations to the
natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the natural
resources committee of the senate by December 31, 1999, on the details of the
limited entry program, including a plan for converting from nontransferable to
transferable licenses.

---
END ---