BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a severe shortage of affordable housing within
metropolitan areas of the state of Washington. The legislature further finds
that a dual strategy is needed that encourages both the development of
additional units of affordable housing and the preservation of the existing
supply of affordable housing. The legislature further finds that preservation
is a cost-effective alternative to displacement caused by rising rental costs
in metropolitan areas.

It
is the intent of this act to assist in the development and preservation of
multifamily rental housing that serves primarily households earning between
fifty percent and eighty percent of the county median income, adjusted for
household size, and to minimize the involuntary displacement of tenants.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.185A.030 and 1994 c 160 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Using moneys specifically appropriated for such purpose, the department shall
finance in whole or in part projects that will provide housing for low-income
households.

(2)
Activities eligible for assistance include, but are not limited to:

(a)
New construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of housing for low-income
households;

(b)
Rent subsidies in new construction or rehabilitated multifamily units;

(c)
Down payment or closing costs assistance for first-time home buyers;

(d)
Mortgage subsidies for new construction or rehabilitation of eligible
multifamily units; ((and))

(e)
Mortgage insurance guarantee or payments for eligible projects; and

(f)
Technical assistance, design and finance services and consultation, and
administrative costs for eligible nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations.

(3)
Legislative appropriations from capital bond proceeds may be used only for the
costs of projects authorized under subsection (2) (a), (c), (d), ((and))
(e), and (f) of this section, and not for the administrative costs of
the department.

(4)
Moneys from repayment of loans from appropriations from capital bond proceeds
may be used for all activities necessary for the proper functioning of the
affordable housing program except for activities authorized under subsection
(2)(b) of this section.

(5)
Administrative costs of the department shall not exceed four percent of the
annual funds available for the affordable housing program.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.185A.040 and 1994 c 160 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Organizations
that may receive assistance from the department under this chapter are local
governments, local housing authorities, nonprofit community or
neighborhood-based organizations, federally recognized Indian tribes in the
state of Washington, ((and)) regional or state-wide nonprofit housing
assistance organizations, and limited partnerships established for the
provision of low-income housing, where the nonprofit or a public corporation or
other entity identified in this section is a general partner, or a limited
liability company, established for the provision of low-income housing, where
the eligible nonprofit entity is a managing member.

Eligibility
for assistance from the department under this chapter also requires compliance
with the revenue and taxation laws, as applicable to the recipient, at the time
the grant is made.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.185A RCW to read as follows:

The
department in awarding funds for activities eligible under RCW 43.185A.030
shall:

(1)
Give priority to eligible nonprofit community or neighborhood-based
organizations that will operate the housing as housing for households with
incomes between fifty percent and eighty percent of the county median income,
adjusted for household size, for a period of at least fifty years and will
agree to a written covenant agreeing to keep rents affordable to the
households;

(2)
Give priority to multifamily rental housing projects that are located in
metropolitan areas that have experienced sharp increases in rents; and

(3)
Give priority to those multifamily rental housing projects that encourage economically
integrated housing that includes units occupied by households with income at or
below fifty percent of the median family income for the county where the
housing development is located.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.185A.050 and 1991 c 356 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
During each calendar year in which funds are available for use by the
department for the affordable housing program, the department shall announce to
all known interested parties, and through major media throughout the state, a
grant and loan application period of at least ninety days' duration. This
announcement shall be made as often as the director deems appropriate for
proper utilization of resources. The department shall then promptly grant as
many applications as will utilize available funds less appropriate
administrative costs of the department, not to exceed five percent of moneys
appropriated to the affordable housing program.

(2)
The department shall develop, with advice and input from the ((low-income
[housing] assistance advisory committee established in RCW 43.185.110)) affordable
housing advisory board established in RCW 43.185B.020, criteria to evaluate
applications for assistance under this chapter, subject to at least one
public hearing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.185A RCW to read as follows:

The
affordable housing equity trust fund is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from appropriations by the legislature, private contributions,
repayment of loans made from this fund, and all other sources must be deposited
into this fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the fund must be used for the purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department may provide technical assistance to organizations eligible for
assistance under chapter 43.185A RCW to encourage the development or
preservation of multifamily housing developments as housing for moderate-income
households, including assistance to nonprofit tenant organizations who wish to
convert the multifamily housing development in which they reside to tenant
ownership. Technical assistance does not include details connected with the
sale or conversion of a multifamily housing development which would require the
department to act in a representative capacity.

(2)
The department shall give priority for technical assistance under this section
to those projects that encourage economically integrated housing that includes
units occupied by households with incomes at or below fifty percent of the
median family income for the county where the housing development is located.

(3) The department shall work with the Washington state housing
finance commission to leverage moneys from the affordable housing equity trust
fund created in section 6 of this act, with financing available through the
Washington state housing finance commission and other public and private
financing sources.

---
END ---