BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.26.030 and 1996 c 178 s 11 and 1996 c 38 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(2)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any
city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal
corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter, any
authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of
RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents
the fire fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over
20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which
is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or fire fighters
as defined in this chapter.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 members, means the following entities to the
extent that the entity employs ((any law enforcement officer and/or fire
fighter)) a person who is eligible to be a member under subsection (8)
of this section:

(i)
The legislative authority of any city, town, county, ((or)) district,
or municipal corporation;

(ii)
((The elected officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii))) The
governing body of any ((other)) general authority law enforcement
agency; or

(((iv)))
(iii) A four-year institution of higher education having a fully
operational fire department as of January 1, 1996.

(3)
"Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person
who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully compensated
basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington generally, with
the following qualifications:

(a)
No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or
secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law
enforcement officer;

(b)
Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title
pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service
examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different
title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized
by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement
officers;

(c)
Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been
appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have
been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by
city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the
city shall be considered city police officers;

(d)
The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer
under RCW 41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years previous membership
in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of
this subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members; and

(e)
The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on
or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public
safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or
fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population
of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not
apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is
receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(4)
"Fire fighter" means:

(a)
Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member
of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which
requires passing a civil service examination for fire fighter, and who is
actively employed as such;

(b)
Anyone who is actively employed as a full time fire fighter where the fire
department does not have a civil service examination;

(c)
Supervisory fire fighter personnel;

(d)
Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection
districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection
(4)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(e)
The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is
an employer under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or hereafter amended), if such
individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system
established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection
(4)(e) shall not apply to plan 2 members;

(f)
Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an
employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a
dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for fire
fighter; and

(g)
Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated
basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement
contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW.

(5)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(6)
"Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member.
"Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member
except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.

(7)(a)
"Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is
under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full time care of a state
institution, who is:

(i)
A natural born child;

(ii)
A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits
are payable under this chapter;

(iii)
A posthumous child;

(iv)
A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date
benefits are payable under this chapter; or

(v)
An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable
under this chapter.

(b)
A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of
twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or
vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved
by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and
all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational
institution after which the child returns to school.

(8)
"Member" or "employee" means ((any)):

(a)
A fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or other person ((as would
apply)) qualified under subsection((s)) (3) or (4) of this
section whose membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970((,
and every));

(b)
Law enforcement officers and fire fighters who ((is)) are
employed in that capacity on or after ((such date)) March 1, 1970;
and

(c)
A trained airport fire fighter whose employment in that capacity began after
January 1, 1999, or a trained airport fire fighter who elects to become a
member in accordance with section 2 of this act. A trained airport fire
fighter means any person who has specific fire fighter training and serves as a
fire fighter at an international airport.

(9)
"Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system fund" as provided for
herein.

(10)
(("Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(11)))(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit
described herein.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by another person.

(((12)))
(11)(a) "Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i)
for a member holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months
preceding the date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same
position or rank at time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a
civil service member who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same
position or rank preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest
basic salaries payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month
period within such member's last ten years of service for which service credit
is allowed, computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such
member during the selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in
the case of disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member
at the time of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who
hereafter vests pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such
member at the time of vesting.

(b)
"Final average salary" for plan 2 members, means the monthly average
of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive sixty service credit
months of service prior to such member's retirement, termination, or death.
Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves of absence may not be used in the
calculation of final average salary.

(((13)))
(12)(a) "Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic
monthly rate of salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including
overtime earnings or special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement
benefits will be computed and upon which employer contributions and salary
deductions will be based.

(b)
"Basic salary" for plan 2 members, means salaries or wages earned by
a member during a payroll period for personal services, including overtime
payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred under provisions
established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of the United States
Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments for deferred annual
sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or
any form of severance pay. In any year in which a member serves in the
legislature the member shall have the option of having such member's basic
salary be the greater of:

(i)
The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in
the legislature; or

(ii)
Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment
and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the
retirement system required because basic salary under (b)(i) of this subsection
is greater than basic salary under (b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by
the member for both member and employer contributions.

(((14)))
(13)(a) "Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of
employment for an employer as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, for
which compensation is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding
thirty days in duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also
include service in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW
41.26.190. Credit shall be allowed for all service credit months of service
rendered by a member from and after the member's initial commencement of
employment as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, during which the
member worked for seventy or more hours, or was on disability leave or
disability retirement. Only service credit months of service shall be counted
in the computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in
this chapter.

(i)
For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of
a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also
include (A) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to
the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension
act, and (B) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a
particular member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160 or
41.20.170. However, in no event shall credit be allowed for any service
rendered prior to March 1, 1970, where the member at the time of rendition of
such service was employed in a position covered by a prior pension act, unless
such service, at the time credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under
the provisions of such prior act.

(ii)
A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be
credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the
member rendered such dual service.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 members, means periods of employment by a member
for one or more employers for which basic salary is earned for ninety or more
hours per calendar month which shall constitute a service credit month.
Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic
salary is earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours per
calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month. Periods of
employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is
earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a one-quarter service
credit month.

Members
of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective
position may elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service
credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the total number of
service credit months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit
year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation
of such retirement allowance or benefits.

If
a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar
month, the individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit
during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is
rendered; or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar
month in which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety
hours is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(((15)))
(14) "Accumulated contributions" means the employee's
contributions made by a member, including any amount paid under RCW
41.50.165(2), plus accrued interest credited thereon.

(((16)))
(15) "Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension
or retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for
benefit payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available
on the date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits
during the period of retirement.

(((17)))
(16) "Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination
of the financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation
of the present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the
present monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving
effect to mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of
disability, retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on
investments.

(((18)))
(17) "Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the
county disability board or the city disability board established in RCW
41.26.110.

(((19)))
(18) "Disability leave" means the period of six months or any
portion thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the
member's full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The
definition contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(((20)))
(19) "Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the
period following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the
member is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.

(((21)))
(20) "Position" means the employment held at any particular
time, which may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(((22)))
(21) "Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the
following as minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these
services shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a)
Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own
behalf, for

(i)
Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is
required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii)
Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the
hospital.

(b)
Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other
medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered as
"hospital expenses".

(i)
The fees of the following:

(A)
A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B)
An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter
18.57 RCW;

(C)
A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii)
The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily
resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member
or the member's spouse.

(iii)
The charges for the following medical services and supplies:

(A)
Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B)
Diagnostic x-ray and laboratory examinations;

(C)
X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D)
Anesthesia and oxygen;

(E)
Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F)
Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G)
Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a
hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H)
Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or
her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within
ninety days after the accident;

(I)
Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J)
Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;

(K)
Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced
by voluntary donors;

(L)
An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(((23)))
(22) "Regular interest" means such rate as the director may
determine.

(((24)))
(23) "Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the
retirement system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a
retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from
service rendered to an employer by such member.

(((25)))
(24) "Director" means the director of the department.

(((26)))
(25)"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person
appointed pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(((27)))
(26) "State elective position" means any position held by any
person elected or appointed to state-wide office or elected or appointed as a
member of the legislature.

(((28)))
(27) "Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding
provisions covering persons who first became members of the system prior to
October 1, 1977.

(((29)))
(28) "Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding
provisions covering persons who first became members of the system on and after
October 1, 1977.

(((30)))
(29) "Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(((31)))
(30) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month
or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(((32)))
(31) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any
agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency,
department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the
detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the
traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state
patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a
limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the
apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the
traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not
limited to, the state departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and
social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery
commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and
transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and the state
department of corrections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An employee who was a member of the retirement system on or before January 1, 1999,
and on the effective date of this act, is employed as a trained airport fire
fighter has the following options:

(a)
The employee may remain a member of the retirement system; or

(b)
The employee may make an election, filed in writing with the department of
retirement systems no later than January 1, 2000, to transfer to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as defined in
RCW 41.26.030.

(2)(a)
An employee who transferred membership under subsection (1)(b) of this section
may choose to transfer service credit as a trained airport fire fighter
previously earned under the retirement system, to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, by filing a written election with
the department no later than January 1, 2000, and making the payments required
by this subsection.

(b)
A trained airport fire fighter who chooses to transfer service credit under
this subsection shall pay, for the applicable period of service, the difference
between the contributions the employee paid to the retirement system, and the
contributions which would have been paid by the employee had the employee been
a member of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system,
plus interest as determined by the director. This payment must be made no
later than five years from the date in subsection (1)(b) of this section or the
date of retirement, whichever comes first.

(c)
Upon completion of the payment required in (b) of this subsection, the employee
shall transfer from the retirement system to the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2: (i) All of the employee's applicable
accumulated contributions and employer contributions attributed to such
employee; and (ii) all applicable months of service, as defined in RCW
41.26.030(13)(b), credited to the employee under this chapter for service as a
trained airport fire fighter, as though such service was rendered as a member
of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

(d)
Upon transfer of service credit and contributions under this subsection, the
employee is permanently excluded from membership in the retirement system for
all service as a trained airport fire fighter.

(e)
Upon a member's submission of a written election under (a) of this subsection,
the employer shall pay, for the applicable period of service:

(i)
The difference between the employer contributions paid to the public employees'
retirement system, and the combined employer and state contributions which
would have been payable to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system; and

(ii)
An amount sufficient to ensure that the contribution level of current members
of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system will not
increase due to this transfer.

For
the purpose of this subsection, the state contribution shall not include the
contribution related to the amortization of the costs of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 as required by chapter
41.45 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.40.094 and 1996 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An employee who was a member of the public employees' retirement system on or
before January 1, 1996, and, on June 6, 1996, is employed by an institution of
higher education as a fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030, has the
following options:

(a)
Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or

(b)
Make an irrevocable choice, filed in writing with the department of retirement
systems no later than January 1, 1997, to transfer to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW
41.26.030. An employee transferring membership under this subsection (1)(b)
shall be a dual member as provided in RCW 41.54.010 unless the employee
exercises the option to transfer service credit under subsection (2) of this
section.

(2)(a)
An employee who transferred membership under subsection (1)(b) of this section
may choose to transfer service credit as a fire fighter previously earned under
the public employees' retirement system, to the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2, by making an irrevocable choice filed
in writing with the department of retirement systems within one year of the
department's announcement of the ability to make such a transfer.

(b)
Any fire fighter choosing to transfer under this subsection shall have
transferred from the retirement system to the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2: (i) All the employee's applicable
accumulated contributions and employer contributions attributed to such
employee; and (ii) all applicable months of service, as defined in RCW
41.26.030(14)(b), credited to the employee under chapter 41.40 RCW, as though
such service was rendered as a member of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system.

(c)
For the applicable period of service, the employee shall pay the difference
between the contributions such employee paid to the retirement system, and the
contributions which would have been paid by the employee had the employee been
a member of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system,
plus interest as determined by the director. This payment shall be made no
later than December 31, ((1998)) 2001, or the date of retirement,
whichever comes first. If the payment required by this subsection is not paid
in full by the deadline, the transferred service credit shall not be used to
determine eligibility for benefits nor to calculate benefits under the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system. In such case, the
additional employee contributions transferred under this subsection, and any
payments made under this subsection, shall be refunded to the employee and the
employer shall be entitled to a credit for the payments made under (d) of this
subsection.

(d)
For the applicable period of service, the employer shall pay:

(i)
The difference between the employer contributions paid to the public employees'
retirement system, and the combined employer and state contributions which
would have been payable to the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system; and

(ii)
An amount sufficient to ensure that the contribution level of current members
of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system will not
increase due to this transfer.

For
the purpose of this subsection (2)(d), the state contribution shall not include
the contribution related to the amortization of the costs of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 as required
by chapter 41.45 RCW.

(e) An individual who transfers service credit and contributions
under this subsection shall be permanently excluded from the public employees'
retirement system for all service as a fire fighter.

---
END ---