BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.312 and 1992 c 38 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A landlord may, upon the execution of a writ of restitution by the sheriff,
enter and take possession of any property of the tenant found on the premises
and store the property in any reasonably secure place. ((If, however, the tenant
or the tenant's representative objects to the storage of the property, the
property shall be deposited upon the nearest public property and may not be
moved and stored by the landlord.)) The tenant or tenant's
representative may object to the storage of the property, but as a condition of
objection, must also provide some reasonable means for removal and storage of
the property prior to the execution of the writ. If the tenant is not
present at the time the writ of restitution is executed, it shall be presumed
that the tenant does not object to the storage of the property as provided in
this section. This provision likewise applies if, although objecting, the
tenant does not provide some reasonable means for removal and storage of the
property prior to the execution of the writ. RCW 59.18.310 shall apply to
the moving and storage of a tenant's property when the premises are abandoned
by the tenant.

(2)
Property moved and stored under this section shall be returned to the tenant
after the tenant has paid the actual or reasonable drayage and storage costs,
whichever is less, or until it is sold or disposed of by the landlord in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
Prior to the sale or disposal of property stored pursuant to this section with
a cumulative value of over fifty dollars, the landlord shall notify the tenant
of the pending sale or disposal. After forty-five days from the date the
notice of the sale or disposal is mailed or personally delivered to the tenant,
the landlord may sell or dispose of the property, including personal papers,
family pictures, and keepsakes.

If
the property that is being stored has a cumulative value of fifty dollars or
less, then the landlord may sell or dispose of the property in the manner
provided in this section, except for personal papers, family pictures, and
keepsakes. Prior to the sale or disposal of property stored pursuant to this
section with a cumulative value of fifty dollars or less, the landlord shall
notify the tenant of the pending sale or disposal. The notice shall either be
mailed or personally delivered to the tenant. After seven days from the date
the notice is mailed or delivered to the tenant, the landlord may sell or
dispose of the property.

The
landlord may apply any income derived from the sale of the tenant's property
against moneys due the landlord for drayage and storage of the property. The
amount of sale proceeds that the landlord may apply towards such costs may not
exceed the actual or reasonable costs for drayage and storage of the property,
whichever is less. Any excess income derived from the sale of such property
shall be held by the landlord for the benefit of the tenant for a period of one
year from the date of the sale. If no claim is made or action commenced by the
tenant for the recovery of the excess income prior to the expiration of that
period of time, then the balance shall be treated as abandoned property and
deposited by the landlord with the department of revenue pursuant to chapter
63.29 RCW.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed as creating a right of distress for
rent.

(5) When serving a tenant with a writ of restitution pursuant to
RCW 59.12.100 and 59.18.410, the sheriff shall provide written notice to the
tenant that: (a) Upon execution of the writ, the landlord may store the
tenant's property; (b) if the property is stored, it may not be returned to the
tenant unless the tenant pays the actual or reasonable costs of drayage and
storage, whichever is less; (c) if the tenant objects to storage of the
property, it will not be stored ((but will be placed on the nearest public
property)) unless the tenant provides some reasonable alternative means
of removal and storage prior to the execution of the writ; and (d) if the
tenant is not present at the time of the execution of the writ, it shall be
presumed the tenant does not object to storage of the property.

---
END ---