BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.79.030 and 1987 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The hearing on such petition may be held before the legislative
authority, or before a committee thereof, or before a hearing examiner,
upon the date fixed by resolution or at the time said hearing may be adjourned
to. If the hearing is before such a committee the same shall, following the
hearing, report its recommendation on the petition to the legislative authority
which may adopt or reject the recommendation. If such hearing be held before
such a committee it shall not be necessary to hold a hearing on the petition
before such legislative authority. If the legislative authority determines to
grant said petition or any part thereof, such city or town shall be authorized
and have authority by ordinance to vacate such street, or alley, or any part
thereof, and the ordinance may provide that it shall not become effective until
the owners of property abutting upon the street or alley, or part thereof so
vacated, shall compensate such city or town in an amount which does not exceed
one-half the appraised value of the area so vacated, except in the event the
subject property or portions thereof were acquired at public expense,
compensation may be required in an amount equal to the full appraised value of
the vacation: PROVIDED, That such ordinance may provide that the city retain
an easement or the right to exercise and grant easements in respect to the
vacated land for the construction, repair, and maintenance of public utilities
and services. A certified copy of such ordinance shall be recorded by the clerk
of the legislative authority and in the office of the auditor of the county in
which the vacated land is located.

---
END ---