BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 16.49A RCW to read as follows:

Every
retail meat dealer is required to place or have placed on the packaging of all
meat food products grown or processed outside this state a label advising the
consumer, in clear and concise terms, that the product was not grown or
processed in Washington state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 16.74 RCW to read as follows:

Every person who sells poultry products directly to consumers is
required to place or have placed on the packaging of all poultry products grown
or processed outside this state a label advising the consumer, in clear and
concise terms, that the product was not grown or processed in Washington state.

---
END ---