BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the Washington commission for the humanities'
educational, cultural, and literacy projects and programs are highly popular
and proven effective in communities throughout the state because of their creative
approaches, assertive outreach, and excellent cooperation with local
organizations.

The
legislature further finds that there are unmet needs for the following
commission programs:

(1)
The inquiring mind public discussion series;

(2)
The clemente course, a college level humanities course for adults living in
poverty;

(3)
The motheread/fatheread family literacy program which works through schools,
headstart/ECEAP, and local literacy programs; and

(4)
The traveling exhibit program.

The
legislature further finds that the public purposes of the Washington commission
for the humanities' programs are underscored by the fact that the governor
appoints five of its trustees; that it receives funding from the national
endowment for the humanities; and that in thirty-seven states, its counterpart
agency receives state funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. It is
the legislature's intent that the state partnership with the Washington
commission for the humanities be strengthened in order to better meet
state-wide demand for these vital educational, literacy, and cultural programs
by providing a state match.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated
for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to the secretary
of state for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---