BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

When
required to enter upon private property to obtain a sample of surface water,
ground water, soil, or air for laboratory analysis, the department shall
receive permission from the property owner to enter the property, and shall
also offer to divide the sample and provide half to the property owner so he or
she may have a separate analysis conducted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

When
required to enter upon private property to obtain a sample of surface water,
ground water, soil, or air for laboratory analysis, the department shall
receive permission from the property owner to enter the property, and shall
also offer to divide the sample and provide half to the property owner so he or
she may have a separate analysis conducted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.23 RCW to read as follows:

When
required to enter upon private property to obtain a sample of surface water,
ground water, soil, or air for laboratory analysis, the department shall
receive permission from the property owner to enter the property, and shall
also offer to divide the sample and provide half to the property owner so he or
she may have a separate analysis conducted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW to read as follows:

When
required to enter upon private property to obtain a sample of surface water,
ground water, soil, or air for laboratory analysis, the department shall
receive permission from the property owner to enter the property, and shall
also offer to divide the sample and provide half to the property owner so he or
she may have a separate analysis conducted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 69.30 RCW to read as follows:

When required to enter upon private property to obtain a sample of
surface water, ground water, soil, or air for laboratory analysis, the
department shall receive permission from the property owner to enter the
property, and shall also offer to divide the sample and provide half to the
property owner so he or she may have a separate analysis conducted.

---
END ---