BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.57A.050 and 1998 c 121 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
sixty days of the establishment of the boundaries of the public transportation
benefit area the members of the county legislative authority and the elected
representative of each city within the area shall provide for the selection of
the governing body of such area, the public transportation benefit area
authority, which shall consist of elected officials selected by and serving at
the pleasure of the governing bodies of component cities within the area and
the county legislative authority of each county within the area. Evidence
of appropriate action by ordinance, resolution, or otherwise, pursuant to the
law of the legislative bodies of the component county, or counties if the area
includes portions of more than one county, or cities must be submitted to the
public transportation benefit area authority before the selected representative
or elected official may serve. If at the time a public transportation
benefit area authority assumes the public transportation functions previously
provided under the Interlocal Cooperation Act (chapter 39.34 RCW) there are
citizen positions on the governing board of the transit system, those positions
may be retained as positions on the governing board of the public
transportation benefit area authority.

Within
such sixty-day period, any city may by resolution of its legislative body
withdraw from participation in the public transportation benefit area. The
county legislative authority and each city remaining in the public
transportation benefit area may disapprove and prevent the establishment of any
governing body of a public transportation benefit area if the composition
thereof does not meet its approval.

In
no case shall the governing body of a single county public transportation
benefit area be greater than nine members and in the case of a multicounty
area, fifteen members. Those cities within the transportation benefit area and
excluded from direct membership on the authority are hereby authorized to
designate a member of the authority who shall be entitled to represent the
interests of such city which is excluded from direct membership on the
authority. The legislative body of such city shall notify the authority as to
the determination of its authorized representative on the authority.

Each
member of the authority is eligible to be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and to receive compensation, as set
by the authority, in an amount not to exceed forty-four dollars for each day
during which the member attends official meetings of the authority or performs
prescribed duties approved by the chairman of the authority. Except that the
authority may, by resolution, increase the payment of per diem compensation to
each member from forty-four dollars up to seventy dollars per day or portion of
a day for attendance at board meetings and for performance of other services on
behalf of the authority. In no event may a member be compensated in any year
for more than seventy-five days, except the chairman who may be paid
compensation for not more than one hundred days: PROVIDED, That compensation
shall not be paid to an elected official or employee of federal, state, or
local government who is receiving regular full-time compensation from such
government for attending meetings and performing prescribed duties of the
authority.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.57A.055 and 1991 c 318 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

After
a public transportation benefit area has been in existence for four years,
members of the county legislative authority and the elected representative of
each city within the boundaries of the public transportation benefit area shall
review the composition of the governing body of the benefit area and change the
composition of the governing body if the change is deemed appropriate. The
votes of the designated representatives of the component county, or counties if
the area includes portions of more than one county, and each of the cities are
to be weighted, based upon the determination of population filed with the
secretary of state by the office of financial management the July 1st before
the review meeting. The population of only the unincorporated portion of the county
is to be considered for purposes of weighting the voting of the county
representatives. Evidence of appropriate action by ordinance, resolution, or
otherwise, pursuant to the law of the legislative bodies of the component
county, or counties if the area includes portions of more than one county, or
cities must be submitted to the public transportation benefit area authority
before the designated representative or elected official may serve. The
review shall be at a meeting of the designated representatives of the component
county and cities, and the majority of those present shall constitute a quorum
at such meeting. Twenty days notice of the meeting shall be given by the chief
administrative officer of the public transportation benefit area authority.
After the initial review, a review shall be held every four years.

If an area having a population greater than fifteen percent, or
areas with a combined population of greater than twenty-five percent of the
population of the existing public transportation benefit area as constituted at
the last review meeting, annex to the public transportation benefit area, or if
an area is added under RCW 36.57A.140(2), the representatives of the component
county and cities shall meet within ninety days to review and change the
composition of the governing body, if the change is deemed appropriate. This
meeting is in addition to the regular four-year review meeting and shall be
conducted pursuant to the same notice requirement and quorum provisions of the
regular review.

---
END ---