BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.315.490 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.318 are each amended to read as
follows:

Directors of school districts shall be elected at regular school
elections. No person shall be eligible to be elected to the office of
school director who is not a citizen of the United States and the state of
Washington and a registered voter of either the school district or director
district, as the case may be. If a school board director remains a citizen
of the United States and the state of Washington and a registered voter in the
school district, but no longer resides in the correct director district, the
director remains eligible for the office of school director until the next
regular school district election, at which time a successor shall be elected
for the unexpired term or a new term, as the case may be.

---
END ---