BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.330.240 and 1989 c 263 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of directors of each ((second class)) school district shall adopt
a written policy governing procedures for the letting of any employment
contract authorized under RCW 42.23.030. This policy shall include provisions
to ensure fairness and the appearance of fairness in all matters pertaining to
employment contracts so authorized.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
28A.330.240 is recodified as a new section in chapter 28A.320 RCW.

---
END ---