BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.010 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that uncoordinated and unplanned growth, together with a lack
of common goals expressing the public's interest in the conservation and the
wise use of our lands, pose a threat to the environment, sustainable economic
development, and the health, safety, and high quality of life enjoyed by
residents of this state. It is in the public interest that citizens,
communities, local governments, and the private sector cooperate and coordinate
with one another in comprehensive land use planning. It is in the public
interest to direct growth to urban areas and accommodate housing for all
economic segments of the population. To achieve these goals, the legislature
finds that communities must plan for the density necessary to accommodate the
population growth projected, implement measures to provide the necessary
infrastructure, and encourage an adequate supply of housing in urban areas,
particularly on lands in proximity to frequent transit service. Further,
the legislature finds that it is in the public interest that economic
development programs be shared with communities experiencing insufficient
economic growth.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.070 and 1998 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text
covering objectives, principles, and standards used to develop the
comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an internally consistent document and
all elements shall be consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive
plan shall be adopted and amended with public participation as provided in RCW
36.70A.140.

Each
comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the
following:

(1)
A land use element designating the proposed general distribution and general
location and extent of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture,
timber production, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces,
general aviation airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land
uses. The land use element shall include population densities, building
intensities, and estimates of future population growth. The land use element
shall provide for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used
for public water supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or
cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including Puget
Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.

(2)
A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of established
residential neighborhoods that:

(a)
Includes an inventory and analysis of existing and projected housing needs;

(b)
Includes a statement of goals, policies, objectives, and mandatory
provisions for the preservation, improvement, and development of housing,
including single-family residences;

(c)
Specifies goals for net new housing units to be produced at five-year
intervals as provided by the county-wide planning policy;

(d)
Identifies sufficient land ((for)) with applicable development
regulations which allows for moderate to high-density development to
accommodate housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing, multifamily
housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and

(((d)))
(e) Makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community.

(3)
A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing
capital facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and
capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for
such capital facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded
or new capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such
capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess
the land use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs
and to ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and
financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and
consistent.

(4)
A utilities element consisting of the general location, proposed location, and
capacity of all existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to,
electrical lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5)
Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are
not designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources.
The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a)
Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances
vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and
uses, a county may consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written
record explaining how the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW
36.70A.020 and meets the requirements of this chapter.

(b)
Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry,
and agriculture in rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety
of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental
services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve
a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering,
density transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other
innovative techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and
uses that are not characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with
rural character.

(c)
Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall include measures
that apply to rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as
established by the county, by:

(i)
Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii)
Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural
area;

(iii)
Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development in the rural area;

(iv)
Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and
ground water resources; and

(v)
Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral
resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d)
Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements
of this subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this
subsection (5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more
intensive rural development, including necessary public facilities and public
services to serve the limited area as follows:

(i)
Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of
existing commercial, industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether
characterized as shoreline development, villages, hamlets, rural activity
centers, or crossroads developments. A commercial, industrial, residential,
shoreline, or mixed-use area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of
this subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii)
The intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale
recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or
tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;

(iii)
The intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential
uses or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Public services and public facilities shall
be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use and
shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iv)
A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or
uses of more intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this
subsection. Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend
beyond the logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing
a new pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v)
For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one
that was in existence:

(A)
On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to plan under all of
the provisions of this chapter;

(B)
On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a
county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW
36.70A.040(2); or

(C)
On the date the office of financial management certifies the county's
population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under
all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e)
Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural
area a major industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise
specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6)
A transportation element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use
element.

(a)
The transportation element shall include the following subelements:

(i)
Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii)
Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting
from land use assumptions to assist the department of transportation in
monitoring the performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the
facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned
transportation facilities;

(iii)
Facilities and services needs, including:

(A)
An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services,
including transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define
existing capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning.
This inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the
city or county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B)
Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes
to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should
be regionally coordinated;

(C)
For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service standards for
highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the
performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting level of service
standards for state highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the
performance of the system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to
facilitate coordination between the county's or city's six-year street, road,
or transit program and the department of transportation's six-year investment
program. The concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply
to transportation facilities and services of state-wide significance except for
counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry
route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b)
of this subsection;

(D)
Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned
transportation facilities or services that are below an established level of
service standard;

(E)
Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan
to provide information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future
growth;

(F)
Identification of state and local system needs to meet current and future
demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be
consistent with the state-wide multimodal transportation plan required under
chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv)
Finance, including:

(A)
An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against probable funding
resources;

(B)
A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive
plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year
street, road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems.
The multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year
improvement program developed by the department of transportation as required
by RCW 47.05.030;

(C)
If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of
how additional funding will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be
reassessed to ensure that level of service standards will be met;

(v)
Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts
of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation
systems of adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi)
Demand-management strategies.

(b)
After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or
who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and
enforce ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development
causes the level of service on a locally owned transportation facility to
decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the
comprehensive plan, unless transportation improvements or strategies to
accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with the
development. These strategies may include increased public transportation
service, ride sharing programs, demand management, and other transportation
systems management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6)
"concurrent with the development" shall mean that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six
years.

(c)
The transportation element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year
plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW
35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state,
must be consistent.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that counties are regional governments within their
boundaries, and cities are primary providers of urban governmental services
within urban growth areas. For the purposes of this section, a
"county-wide planning policy" is a written policy statement or
statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which
county and city comprehensive plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this
chapter. This framework shall ensure that city and county comprehensive plans
are consistent as required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to alter the land-use powers of cities.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in
whole or in part within the county as follows:

(a)
No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority
of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with representatives of each city located
within the county for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that
will provide a framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In
other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county
adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial
management.

(b)
The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide planning policy
specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner in which the
county and the cities agree to all procedures and provisions including but not
limited to desired planning policies, deadlines, ratification of final
agreements and demonstration thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities
associated therewith.

(c)
If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of
cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately
impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d)
If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no
agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management
in any other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or
reasons for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it
appropriate, the governor may immediately request the assistance of the
department of community, trade, and economic development to mediate any
disputes that preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving
all disputes that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate
sanctions from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section. The
governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of any
sanction.

(e)
No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later
than fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management the county
legislative authority of any other county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to
the process provided under this section and that is consistent with the
agreement pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public
hearing or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.

(3)
A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a)
Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of
urban services to such development;

(c)
Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide or state-wide
nature, including transportation facilities of state-wide significance as
defined in RCW 47.06.140;

(d)
Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e)
Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all
economic segments of the population and parameters for its distribution to
the urban, unincorporated areas of the county and each of the cities within the
county. By December 31, 1999, county-wide planning policies shall incorporate
goals for housing production for the county and each city, in five-year
intervals, sufficient to accommodate housing needs based upon twenty-year
population growth projected by the office of financial management. New goals
shall be established when the office of financial management issues new
population projections;

(f)
Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g)
Policies for county-wide economic development and employment; and

(h)
An analysis of the fiscal impact.

(4)
Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the
county-wide planning policy adoption process. Adopted county-wide planning
policies shall be adhered to by state agencies.

(5)
Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the requirements of
this section may result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a
county or city within the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing
a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to
adopt a county-wide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or
sanctions are fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a
county-wide planning policy.

(6)
Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide planning policy to
the growth management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the
county-wide planning policy.

(7)
Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each
with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban
areas and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process
established under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties
and cities within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in subsection (((7))) (12) of this
section, a county shall adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide
planning policies to establish a review and evaluation program. This program
shall be in addition to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and
36.70A.210. In developing and implementing the review and evaluation program
required by this section, the county and its cities shall consider information
from other appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review
and evaluation program shall be to:

(a)
Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban densities within
urban growth areas by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets,
and objectives contained in the county-wide planning policies and the county
and city comprehensive plans and development regulations with actual
growth and development that has occurred in the county and its cities; ((and))

(b)
Determine whether a county and each of its cities are achieving goals
established for net new housing units to be produced in five-year intervals to
meet twenty-year household projections, as provided by the county-wide planning
policy and comprehensive plan, and are making adequate provision for existing
and projected housing needs of all economic segments of the community; and

(c)
Identify reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that
will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The review and evaluation program shall:

(a)
Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of urban growth
areas and provide for annual collection and reporting of data to the
department on urban and rural land uses, development, critical areas, and
capital facilities to the extent necessary to determine the quantity and type
of land suitable for development, both for residential and employment-based
activities;

(b)
Development data collected shall, at a minimum, include:

(i)
The number of applications made for residential development, and the number of
residential units;

(ii)
The number of applications approved, the number of residential units, and
density of residential units compared to maximum density allowed on the site;

(iii)
The net number of new residential dwelling units;

(iv)
The number of applications made for commercial and industrial development;

(v)
The number of applications approved for commercial and industrial development,
including the square footage and estimated number of employees;

(vi)
The estimated net number of new jobs created;

(vii)
An assessment of market factors; and

(viii)
An assessment of the availability of public services and facilities to serve
the population growth.

(c)
Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every
five years as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The first evaluation
shall be completed not later than September 1, 2002. The county and its cities
may establish in the county-wide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and
other similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(((c)))
(d) Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating
to the county-wide planning policies required by this section and procedures to
resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of data; and

(((d)))
(e) Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and county and
city comprehensive plans and development regulations as needed to remedy
an inconsistency identified through the evaluation required by this section, or
to bring these policies into compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required by subsection
(1) of this section shall:

(a)
Require a joint report from each county and its cities regarding regional
growth patterns, trends, comparing employment, housing growth, and market conditions;
and compiling data on new development;

(b)
Determine whether there is sufficient land suitable ((land)) for
development to accommodate the county-wide population projection
established for the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent
population allocations within the county and between the county and its cities
and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(((b)))
(c) Determine the actual density of housing that has been constructed ((and)),
the actual amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses within
the urban growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this
chapter or since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of
this section, and the amount of known environmentally sensitive land and
public open space that cannot be built upon; and

(((c)))
(d) Based on the actual density of development as determined under (((b)))
(c) of this subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs
by type and density range to determine the amount of land needed for
commercial, industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of the
twenty-year planning period used in the most recently adopted comprehensive
plan.

(4)
If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an
inconsistency between what has occurred since the adoption of the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section((,
the county and its cities)); or demonstrates that the county or any city
has fallen short of its five-year goal for new residential construction by more
than fifteen percent, or is not developing per the land use designations and
densities planned for the jurisdiction in its comprehensive plan based on the
evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section, the county or
city shall revise its comprehensive land use plan and development or other
regulations as necessary. The county or city not meeting the criteria
shall adopt and implement measures within one year or within the next cycle
to revise local planning documents that ((are reasonably likely to))
will increase consistency during the subsequent five-year period and
ensure that the jurisdiction can accommodate the residential units necessary
for population growth and density projected for the jurisdiction in the
county-wide planning policy and its comprehensive plan. If necessary, a
county, in consultation with its cities as required by RCW 36.70A.210, shall
adopt amendments to county-wide planning policies to increase consistency. Failure
to make appropriate changes in the period specified shall make the jurisdiction
subject to petition to the growth management hearings board for noncompliance.
The county and its cities shall annually monitor the measures adopted under
this subsection to determine their effect and may revise or rescind them as
appropriate. Measures to accommodate growth include, but are not limited
to, the following:

(a)
Upzoning or revising zoning designations for land within the boundaries of the
jurisdiction in a manner that encourages development to occur at densities
sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for
twenty years; and

(b)
Amending the jurisdiction's comprehensive plan or development regulations to
include incentive-based measures that encourage development to occur at
densities sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial
needs for twenty years. Incentive-based measures may include, but are not
limited to:

(i)
Financial incentives and regulatory flexibility for higher density housing;

(ii)
Redevelopment and infill strategies;

(iii)
Authorization of housing types not previously allowed by the comprehensive plan
or development regulations;

(iv)
Allowing for subdivisions to achieve lot size reductions;

(v)
Encouraging mixed use development through zoning and incentives; and

(vi)
Subsidizing fees or taxes for housing accommodating low-income and
moderate-income households.

(5)
In establishing that actions and measures adopted under subsection (4) of
this section encourage development to occur at densities sufficient to
accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years, the
county or city shall, at a minimum, demonstrate to the department that all
urban land designated for housing and commercial and industrial uses is zoned
at density ranges that are demonstrably more likely than not to be achieved by
the market.

(6)
Amendments to comprehensive plans and development regulations by the county and
its cities must comply with this chapter.

(7)
If three years after making the changes identified in subsection (4) of this
section a county or city is still failing to achieve housing production within
fifteen percent of its five-year housing goals, the county or city shall be
subject to petition to the growth management hearings board for review of
compliance and may be subject to sanctions as provided in RCW 36.70A.345. In
determining compliance with achieving the housing goals, the growth management
hearings board shall consider:

(a)
Whether or not the jurisdiction's failure is a result of the lack of housing
demand in the local housing market;

(b)
A comparison of jobs created and number of residential units built;

(c)
Whether or not the jurisdiction and state has funded the infrastructure
necessary to accommodate projected residential units within the five-year
interval;

(d)
Whether or not the jurisdiction's failure is a result of the lack of
development applications that comply with the jurisdiction's development
regulations adopted under this chapter; and

(e)
Whether or not the jurisdiction has adopted a financially feasible
infrastructure phasing plan that demonstrates how infrastructure improvements
and housing growth are planned to be phased in over the twenty-year planning
period.

(8)
On and after the effective date of this act, jurisdictions participating in the
review and evaluation program established by this chapter, and whose zoning is
consistent with its comprehensive plan, shall be entitled to incentive
provisions to help accommodate growth and achieve goals, including:

(a)
Authorization to dedicate one-tenth of one cent of the state sales tax to
capital costs of local infrastructure for jurisdictions accommodating
residential, commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years, as prescribed
by RCW 82.08.020;

(b)
Authorization to use their portion of the local option real estate excise tax
for capital costs of low-income housing as prescribed by RCW 82.46.010;

(c)
Authorization to utilize state funding for "transfer of development
rights" banks and amenities to accommodate growth as provided for in the
state general fund budget;

(d)
Eligibility for property tax abatement for multifamily housing, as prescribed
by chapter 84.14 RCW;

(e)
Upon achieving growth within fifteen percent of projected goals, granting of
priority funding status for state grants as prescribed by RCW 43.17.250,
43.160.060, and 70.146.070; and

(f)
Upon achieving growth within fifteen percent of projected goals, further
prioritization for allocation of transit and transportation funding to
jurisdictions accommodating growth, as prescribed by RCW 47.80.050.

(9)
County-wide planning policies may contain additional incentive provisions and
enforcement measures to accommodate growth and achieve housing goals.

(10)(a)
Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods
used by counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by
this section. The department shall provide this information and appropriate
technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply
with the provisions of this section.

(b)
By December 31, ((2007)) 2003 and 2008, the department shall
submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature a report analyzing the
effectiveness of the activities described and measures taken by the counties
and cities in this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the
county-wide planning policies and the comprehensive plans and development
regulations of the counties and cities.

(((6)))
(11) From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the
department shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning
organizations required under subsection (((7))) (12) of this
section to conduct the review and perform the evaluation required by this
section.

(((7)))
(12) The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the
cities within those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand
in population in 1995 as determined by office of financial management
population estimates and that are located west of the crest of the Cascade
mountain range. Any other county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out
the review, evaluation, and amendment programs and procedures as provided in
this section.

(13)
For the purposes of this section, "land suitable for development"
means all vacant, partially used, redevelopable, or underutilized land that,
after taking into account the protection of critical areas, is: (a) Designated
for commercial, industrial, or residential use; and (b) not intended for public
use.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.70A.345 and 1994 c 249 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governor may impose a sanction or sanctions specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on:

(1)
A county or city that fails to designate critical areas, agricultural lands,
forest lands, or mineral resource lands under RCW 36.70A.170 by the date such
action was required to have been taken;

(2)
A county or city that fails to adopt development regulations under RCW
36.70A.060 protecting critical areas or conserving agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands by the date such action was required to have
been taken;

(3)
A county that fails to designate urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110
by the date such action was required to have been taken; ((and))

(4)
A county or city that fails to adopt its comprehensive plan or
development regulations when such actions are required to be taken;

(5)
A county or city that fails to provide sufficient land suitable for development
to accommodate its share of a county-wide population projection established for
the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent population allocations
within the county and between the county and its cities and the requirements of
RCW 36.70A.110;

(6)
A county or city that fails to sufficiently plan to accommodate growth, or
provide incentive measures as necessary to encourage development to accommodate
residential, commercial, and industrial needs, as prescribed in RCW 36.70A.215;

(7)
A county or city that fails to achieve housing goals, or make significant
progress toward eliminating housing production obstacles and deficiencies
within three years, as prescribed in RCW 36.70A.215.

Imposition
of a sanction or sanctions under this section shall be preceded by written
findings by the governor, that either the county or city is not proceeding in
good faith to meet the requirements of the act; or that the county or city has
unreasonably delayed taking the required action. The governor shall consult
with and communicate his or her findings to the appropriate growth management
hearings board prior to imposing the sanction or sanctions. For those counties
or cities that are not required to plan or have not opted in, the governor in
imposing sanctions shall consider the size of the jurisdiction relative to the
requirements of this chapter and the degree of technical and financial
assistance provided.

Sec.
6. RCW
47.80.050 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

Biennial
appropriations to the department of transportation to carry out the regional
transportation planning program shall set forth the amounts to be allocated as
follows:

(1)
A base amount per county for each county within each regional transportation
planning organization, to be distributed to the lead planning agency;

(2)
An amount to be distributed to each lead planning agency on a per capita basis;
((and))

(3)
An amount to be administered by the department of transportation as a
discretionary grant program for special regional planning projects, including
grants to allow counties which have significant transportation interests in
common with an adjoining region to also participate in that region's planning
efforts; and

(4)
An amount to be administered by the department of transportation for grants to
counties and cities that are accommodating growth as determined pursuant to RCW
36.70A.215.

Sec.
7. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2)
There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal
to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected
under this subsection shall be deposited and distributed in the same manner as
motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1).

(3)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(4)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

(5)
Of the taxes collected under subsection (1) of this section, an amount equal to
one-tenth of one percent of the selling price of each retail sale shall be
dedicated to capital costs of local infrastructure within jurisdictions
participating in the review and evaluation program pursuant to RCW 36.70A.215.

Sec.
8. RCW
82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted
budget the capital projects and low-income housing activities funded in
whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and
shall indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that
may be reasonably available for such capital projects and low-income housing
activities.

(2)
The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on
each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the
county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate
not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues
from this tax shall be used by any city or county with a population of five
thousand or less and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040
for any capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local
capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.

((After
April 30, 1992,)) Revenues generated from the tax imposed under this
subsection in counties over five thousand population and cities over five
thousand population that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
shall be used solely for financing capital projects specified in a capital
facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan and housing relocation
assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450. ((However, revenues (a)
pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April 30, 1992,
may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the revenues
were pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by such
counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until
the project is completed.))

(3)
In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative
authority of any county or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each
sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county
tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.

(4)
Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from persons who are
taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate
limits of the city, as the case may be. (5) Taxes imposed under this section
shall comply with all applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions
regarding real estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45
RCW.

(6)
As used in this section((,)):

(a)
"City" means any city or town ((and));

(b)
"Capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways;
sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic
water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems; parks; recreational
facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails;
libraries; administrative and/or judicial facilities; river and/or waterway
flood control projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992,
have expended funds derived from the tax authorized by this section for such purposes;
((and, until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those jurisdictions
that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to expend funds
derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax authorized by RCW
82.46.035 for such purposes))

(c)
"Low-income housing activities" include the capital costs for
planning, acquisition, building, improving, or restoring publicly owned
low-income housing, granting funds to nonprofit organizations for low-income
housing, and other financial aid or grants to individuals or organizations,
provided the amounts are dedicated solely to the capital costs for planning,
building, improvement, restoration, or provision of low-income housing, from a
local government participating in the review and evaluation program, pursuant
to RCW 36.70A.215. A plan for the expenditure of the excise tax proceeds for
this purpose shall be prepared by the legislative authority prior to the
adoption of this plan, and a public hearing shall be held to obtain public
input;

(d)
"Low-income housing" means housing provided for low-income
households; and

(e)
"Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated
persons living together whose income is at or below fifty percent of the median
income, adjusted for household size, in the county where the low-income housing
is located.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.17.250 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a state agency is considering awarding grants or loans for a county, city, or
town to finance public facilities, it shall consider whether the county, city,
or town that is requesting the grant or loan is a party to a county-wide
planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210 relating to the type of public facility
for which the grant or loan is sought((, and)); shall accord
additional preference to the county, city, or town if such county-wide planning
policy exists; and shall grant priority status to any county, city, or town
accommodating growth as determined pursuant to RCW 36.70A.215. Whenever a
state agency is considering awarding grants or loans to a special district for
public facilities, it shall consider whether the county, city, or town in whose
planning jurisdiction the proposed facility is located is a party to a county-wide
planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210 relating to the type of public facility
for which the grant or loan is sought.

Sec.
10. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion,
or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes
designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is
not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision and the finding by the board that unique circumstances exist. The
board shall not obligate more than twenty percent of its biennial appropriation
as grants.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion
that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable
materials or for facilities that support recycling, including processes not
currently provided in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking
facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste
processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on
recyclable materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste
paper; (iv) which support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban
areas to distressed rural areas; or (v) which substantially support the trading
of goods or services outside of the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)
When the application includes convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public
facility improvement is made.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to the relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located. As long as there is more demand for financial assistance than there
are funds available, the board is instructed to fund projects in order of their
priority.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(5)
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the political
subdivision seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the ((community
economic revitalization)) board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the ((community
economic revitalization)) board.

(6)
The board shall give priority to projects within political subdivisions that
are accommodating growth as determined pursuant to RCW 36.70A.215.

Sec.
11. RCW
70.146.070 and 1997 c 429 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

When
making grants or loans for water pollution control facilities, the department
shall consider the following:

(1)
The protection of water quality and public health;

(2)
The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water pollution
control facilities without state assistance;

(3)
Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance orders;

(4)
The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers since 1972 in
financing water pollution control facilities;

(5)
The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the applicant is
another public body, the extent to which the county or city in which the
applicant public body is located, has established programs to mitigate nonpoint
pollution of the surface or subterranean water sought to be protected by the
water pollution control facility named in the application for state assistance;
and

(6)
The recommendations of the Puget Sound action team and any other board,
council, commission, or group established by the legislature or a state agency
to study water pollution control issues in the state.

Except
where necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental
degradation, a county, city, or town that is required or chooses to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water pollution control
facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan in conformance with the
requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, after it is required that the comprehensive
plan be adopted, or unless it has adopted development regulations in
conformance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, after it is required
that development regulations be adopted; and the applicant county or city is
accommodating growth as determined pursuant to RCW 36.70A.215.

Sec.
12. RCW
84.14.010 and 1997 c 429 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"City" means either:

(a)
A city or town with a population of at least one hundred thousand ((or));

(b)
The largest city or town, if there is no city or town with a population
of at least one hundred thousand, located in a county planning under the growth
management act; or

(c)
Any city or town participating in the review and evaluation program under RCW
36.70A.215 and implementing urban densities sufficient to accommodate
residential, commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years.

(2)
"Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of a city
having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may be applied for
under this chapter.

(3)
"Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.

(4)
"Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more dwelling
units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not including hotels
and motels. Multifamily units may result from new construction or
rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized, or substandard buildings
to multifamily housing.

(5)
"Owner" means the property owner of record.

(6)
"Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis. This
includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for a period of
at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer
rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.

(7)
"Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made to
achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building codes or
modification to existing occupied structures which increase the number of
multifamily housing units.

(8)
"Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban center that
has been designated by the governing authority as a residential targeted area
in accordance with this chapter.

(9)
"Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building or
housing code requirements that are typically required for rehabilitation as
opposed to new construction.

(10)
"Urban center" means a compact identifiable district where urban
residents may obtain a variety of products and services. An urban center must
contain:

(a)
Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments that may include
but are not limited to shops, offices, banks, restaurants, governmental
agencies;

(b)
Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks, lighting, transit,
domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and

(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either commercial or
office, or both, use.

---
END ---