BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that Washington state is moving forward in implementing a
bold education agenda: Teaching every student to achieve high academic
standards. The legislature further finds that school districts and schools
need to have the flexibility to meet this challenge in exchange for greater
accountability. Thus, the legislature intends to authorize school districts to
be pilot opportunity school districts. These pilots should evaluate how
deregulation and increased flexibility assist in moving schools to a
performance-based education system. Opportunity school districts should have
the opportunity to advance an educational agenda that is centered on student
performance and holds their schools accountable for that performance, without
the restrictions of rules that divert attention to unnecessary paperwork and
labeling of students. Opportunity school districts should afford their schools
flexibility over instructional programming and how they achieve district and
state educational goals, including control over their most important management
tool, their budgets. Schools need to be supported as the place where the
majority of teaching and learning takes place.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
opportunity schools program is established. The purpose of the program is to
provide opportunities for innovative teaching strategies and proven educational
practices, shared decision making, and increased parental and community
involvement in public schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through 7 of this act.

(1)
"Actual schools budget" means the funding for individual schools. It
is the remainder of the potential schools budget minus district determined
functions.

(2)
"Budgetary framework" is the district plan for delineating the total
district budget, potential schools budget, and actual schools budget.

(3)
"Core district functions" includes those functions in (a) through (j)
of this subsection and may include those functions in (k) through (m) of this
subsection relating to:

(a)
The superintendent's office;

(b)
The board of directors;

(c)
Information services;

(d)
Legal services;

(e)
The business office, including financial, accounting, payroll services,
insurance, and workers' compensation;

(f)
An accountability/testing system;

(g)
Monitoring state and federal categorical programs;

(h)
Conducting individual education plans for special education students;

(i)
Technology infrastructure;

(j)
Transportation;

(k)
Food services;

(l)
School facilities; and

(m)
Federal program services carried out by the district and not individual school
buildings.

(4)
"District determined functions" are centrally retained functions
within the potential schools budget. They are limited to no more than
twenty-five percent of the potential schools budget and may be used for
district determined expenditures, including but not limited to extracurricular
activities, community services, instructional support for curriculum
development and supervision, and professional development for administrators
and teachers.

(5)
"Formula funding" is the district plan for allocating the actual
schools budget to individual schools. The majority, at least seventy-five
percent, of the formula should be weighted by student need, including grade
level, special education, bilingual education, and additional learning needs.
Formula funding is intended to ensure an equitable distribution of resources
within the district based on objectively measured student needs. Thus, within
any district, schools with similar students in characteristics and numbers
should receive the same level of resources under district formula funding.
Formula funding should result in lump-sum funding, rather than staffing units,
for individual school buildings. Once funding is provided to the school, the
school has full discretion on allocating resources, regardless of the specifics
of the district formula.

(6)
"Potential schools budget" means the potential amount available for
school funding. The potential schools budget is the amount remaining in the
school district's budget after subtracting funds for core district functions
from the total district budget.

(7)
"Total district budget" means the total budget for the school
district, including all state, federal, and local operating revenues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) By
simple majority, a school board may vote to become an opportunity school
district.

(2)
Each school board that has voted to become an opportunity school district is
provided greater flexibility for education policy to meet the needs of all its
students. Opportunity school districts shall file a plan with the
superintendent of public instruction. The plan shall contain the following
elements:

(a)
An accountability plan for schools in the district, including provisions for:

(i)
Meeting state and district accountability goals; and

(ii)
Serving struggling students and limited-English proficient students;

(b)
A description of the role and composition of school-based councils, including,
but not limited to:

(i)
Representation by principals, parents, teachers, other school staff, and
members of the community; and

(ii)
The decision-making authority of the school-based councils, especially with
regard to the instructional program and budget; and

(c)
A description of the district's budgetary framework and formula funding for all
schools within the district.

(3)
Each school must file with its district a comprehensive school improvement plan
discussing how its budget is aligned with its school improvement plan. This
plan replaces all other plans currently required by rule or law and must
address at the least the following areas:

(a)
The use of innovative strategies and proven methods of student learning,
teaching, and school management based on reliable research, effective
practices, and with evidence of replication across schools with diverse
characteristics;

(b)
A comprehensive design for school functioning including instruction,
assessment, classroom management, professional development, parental
involvement, and school management aligned with the school's curriculum,
technology, and professional development into a school-wide reform plan
designed to enable all students to meet challenging state standards and
addresses needs identified through a school needs assessment;

(c)
The provision of high quality and continuous professional development for
teachers and staff;

(d)
Measurable goals for student performance and benchmarks for meeting them,
including the diverse learning needs of all students in the building;

(e)
The involvement of parents and the local community in planning and implementing
school improvement activities;

(f)
A plan for evaluation of school reforms and student achievement; and

(g)
Support by school faculty, administrators, staff, and the school site council
on the school improvement plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Opportunity school districts are automatically granted waivers from state laws
and rules as specified in this title, except for those relating to:

(a)
Health and safety;

(b)
Civil rights;

(c)
Special education;

(d)
Collective bargaining; and

(e)
The following education reform provisions:

(i)
Education goals in RCW 28A.150.210;

(ii)
Values and character traits in RCW 28A.150.211;

(iii)
Student assessments in RCW 28A.300.320, 28A.230.190, 28A.230.220, 28A.230.230,
and 28A.230.240;

(iv)
Accountability provisions in RCW 28A.630.887 and 28A.630.885 and chapter
. . ., Laws of 1999 (Z-0499/99);

(v)
Reporting of school and district assessments of student learning in RCW
28A.630.889;

(vi)
Curricular adjustments and parental notification of student achievement on
tests in RCW 28A.230.195; and

(vii)
Basic education program requirements and allocation in RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.260.

(2)
Opportunity school districts and schools are subject to generally accepted
accounting principles. The office of the superintendent of public instruction,
in cooperation with the office of financial management and the state auditor,
shall establish performance and financial accountability requirements for
opportunity school districts and schools that are consistent with moving to a
performance-based education system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. After
three years of implementation, the institute for public policy shall study
opportunity school districts to determine their effectiveness in improving
student achievement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
program in sections 2 through 6 of this act shall be available commencing with
the 1999-2000 school year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act expire June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 2 through 7 of this act are each added to chapter 28A.630 RCW.

---
END ---