BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that maintaining a sufficient amount of land
designated as suitable for urban development within the comprehensive plans of
counties and cities planning under RCW 36.70A.040 is essential if the purposes
of this act are to be achieved. The legislature therefore finds that a
reduction in the amount of such land in a county, through the expansion of designated
critical areas, the revision of development regulations on existing designated
critical areas, or new regulation of existing developable lands under state or
federal environmental laws, should be offset by the addition of other land
suitable for urban development to a county's urban growth areas. In other
words, when adoption of new standards of environmental protection for urban
lands is necessary in the public interest, the purposes of this act are best
achieved if the total amount of land available for productive human activities
within the designated urban growth areas of counties is not thereby diminished.

(2)
If, after January 1, 1998, a county or city planning under RCW 36.70A.040
either amends its comprehensive plan to redesignate as critical areas land
located within an urban growth area and previously designated otherwise in its
comprehensive plan land use element under RCW 36.70A.070(1) or amends its
development regulations or other standards to the effect of reducing the
development potential of land within its urban growth area and designated for
development in its comprehensive plan:

(a)
That county or city shall determine the acreage and qualitative reduction in
land suitable for development within its urban growth area and shall docket
that amount as a deficiency to the planning director of the county in which the
land is located;

(b)
Not later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter,
each county, in consultation with its cities as required by RCW 36.70A.110 and
36.70A.210, shall increase the total land area within its urban growth areas by
the full docketed acreage deficiency, with comparable qualitative land
characteristics, through amendment of the county's comprehensive plan; and

(c)
The county within which the increased land suitable for urban development is
located shall review its comprehensive plan elements under RCW 36.70A.070 and
its development regulations under RCW 36.70A.060 and shall adopt any amendments
necessary to assure that the comprehensive plan elements and development
regulations are consistent with the changes required by (b) of this subsection.

(3)
The revision required by this section may be combined with the review required
by RCW 36.70A.130(3) or with the review and evaluation required by RCW
36.70A.215.

(4)
For purposes of this section, docketing refers to compiling and maintaining a
detailed list of land deficiencies resulting from the actions specified in
subsection (2) of this section in a manner that will ensure that such
deficiencies will be presented for the required periodic action by counties and
will be available for review by the public.

(5) For purposes of this section, qualitative land characteristics
refers to the designated use of the land in deficiency, the general location of
that land within the county, its physical characteristics, and the availability
of urban governmental services for the land.

---
END ---