BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds the following:

(a)
Alopecia areata and its variants, alopecia totalis and alopecia universalis,
are common, noncontagious diseases that affect an estimated two million
Americans. They are diseases of the hair follicle with results ranging from
large patches of baldness to the total loss of all body hair. This hair loss
can be acute and short-lived, occurring in just days or weeks, or chronic with
years of regrowth in some sites and progression to new sites.

(b)
Alopecia areata and its variants are associated with an alteration in the
immunological system, but their cause is unknown.

(c)
Treatments for alopecia areata, totalis, and universalis using immunomodulating
agents can stimulate new hair growth, but none prevent new patches from
developing. These treatments must be continued to maintain their effect, but
treatment for alopecia areata may stop when the disease goes into spontaneous
remission. There are concerns surrounding the long-term use and side effects of
some of the treatments.

(d)
Patients with alopecia areata, totalis, and universalis may suffer a profound
alteration in their functional status, particularly women and children. There
are documented cases of adults who have lost their jobs, have been harassed,
and have been accused of belonging to extremist cults because of their
appearance due to hair loss. Children with alopecia areata, totalis, or
universalis have been removed from mainstream classes and placed in special
education classes and ostracized by their peers.

(e)
Alopecia areata, totalis, and universalis are recognized medical disease
processes, which cause severe hair loss that can alter a patient's functional
status. The use of cranial hair protheses returns patients to their previous
functional status.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature to clarify that policies that provide
benefits for prostheses must provide benefits for cranial hair prostheses for
alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

All
state-purchased health care that provides coverage for prostheses shall include
coverage for cranial hair prostheses for patients suffering from alopecia
areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent that benefits are provided for
alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, provided that such services are
delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced
registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality
assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant
pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This
section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment
provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other limited
benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW to read as follows:

An
insurer that offers to any individual a health benefit plan that provides
coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for cranial hair prostheses for
patients suffering from alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent
that benefits are provided for alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis,
provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by
the nursing care quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or
physician assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This
section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment
provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other
limited benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

A
group insurance contract or blanket disability insurance contract that provides
coverage for prostheses shall include coverage for cranial hair prostheses for
patients suffering from alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent
that benefits are provided for alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis,
provided that such services are delivered upon the recommendation of the
patient's physician or advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by
the nursing care quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or
physician assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This
section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment
provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other
limited benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

A
health service contractor that provides coverage for prostheses shall include
coverage for cranial hair prostheses for patients suffering from alopecia
areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent that benefits are provided for
alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, provided that such services are
delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or advanced
registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care quality
assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician assistant
pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This
section shall not be construed to prevent the application of standard health
plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible or copayment
provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the state health care
authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific providers for the
delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to medicare supplement
policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified disease or other
limited benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

A
health maintenance organization that provides coverage for prostheses shall
include coverage for cranial hair prostheses for patients suffering from
alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, to the extent that benefits are
provided for alopecia areata, totalis, or universalis, provided that such
services are delivered upon the recommendation of the patient's physician or
advanced registered nurse practitioner as authorized by the nursing care
quality assurance commission pursuant to chapter 18.79 RCW or physician
assistant pursuant to chapter 18.71A RCW.

This section shall not be construed to prevent the application of
standard health plan provisions applicable to other benefits such as deductible
or copayment provisions. This section does not limit the authority of the
state health care authority to negotiate rates and contract with specific
providers for the delivery of prostheses. This section does not apply to
medicare supplement policies or supplemental contracts covering a specified
disease or other limited benefits.

---
END ---