BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that several species of salmon and steelhead are listed or
proposed to be listed as threatened or endangered under federal law. The
legislature further finds that salmon recovery is a high priority for the
economic, cultural, and environmental future of the state, and that recovery
can be accomplished only through close and cooperative relationships between
state, local, federal, and tribal governments. Salmon recovery must be
addressed within a broad context of economic development needs, growth
management to accommodate population, and other acute and unique problems
already facing communities across the state. Efforts undertaken to develop a
cooperative intergovernmental relationship show promise but would benefit from
a clearer mandate and purpose. It is the intent of the legislature to
establish an intergovernmental body to share information, to coordinate policy
direction, to ensure that all levels of government are involved in developing a
salmon recovery response, and to assist the legislative and executive branches
in allocating resources for salmon recovery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
council of governments on natural resources is established. The council shall
consist of the following members:

(a)
Four representatives of county government, appointed by the Washington state
association of counties;

(b)
Four representatives of city government, appointed by the association of
Washington cities;

(c)
Four representatives of tribes, selected by the tribes;

(d)
One member representing ports, appointed by the Washington public port
association;

(e)
One representative of water and sewer districts, appointed by the Washington
association of sewer and water districts;

(f)
One representative of public utility districts, appointed by the Washington
public utility districts association;

(g)
One representative of irrigation districts, appointed by the Washington state
water resources association;

(h)
Two members of the senate, selected by the president of the senate, with one
member from each major caucus;

(i)
Two members of the house of representatives, selected by the speaker of the
house of representatives, with one member from each major caucus; and

(j)
One representative from the governor's salmon recovery office.

(2)
In addition to the members described in subsection (1) of this section, the
following persons shall attend and support the council's efforts:

(a)
The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee;

(b)
The director of the department of ecology;

(c)
The director of the department of fish and wildlife;

(d)
The director of the department of agriculture;

(e)
The director of the department of community, trade, and economic development;

(f)
The chair of the Puget Sound action team;

(g)
The director of the conservation commission;

(h)
The secretary of the department of transportation;

(i)
The director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation;

(j)
The director of the park and recreation commission;

(k)
The secretary of the department of health; and

(l)
A member of the Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, appointed by the governor.

(3)
The regional director of the national marine fisheries service, the regional
supervisor of the United States fish and wildlife service, the regional
director of the United States environmental protection agency, and the regional
supervisor of the United States forest service shall be invited to join the
council as ex officio nonvoting members.

(4)
The council shall:

(a)
In concert with the legislature, the joint cabinet on natural resources, and
the salmon recovery office, coordinate state-wide policy on salmon recovery
with local, tribal, and federal recovery efforts based within one or more
watersheds or ecologically significant units, and develop, submit, and
subsequently amend a recovery strategy or recovery strategies;

(b)
Develop a process and criteria for allocation of state and federal funds for
salmon recovery; and

(c)
Develop a citizen information and outreach strategy for salmon recovery.

(5)
The council shall meet at least once every other month and shall choose a chair
and a vice-chair from among its members.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
council of governments on natural resources terminates when all species of
salmon and steelhead are removed by federal agencies from lists as threatened
or endangered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each added to chapter 75.46 RCW.

---
END ---