BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

ABSENTEE VOTING

Sec.
1. RCW
29.36.010 and 1991 c 81 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

ABSENTEE BALLOT VOTING. Any registered voter of the
state or any out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter may vote by
absentee ballot in any general election, special election, or primary in the
manner provided in this chapter. Out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and
service voters are authorized to cast the same ballots, including those for
special elections, as a registered voter of the state would receive under this
chapter.

(((1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, in RCW
29.36.013, and in RCW 29.36.170, a registered voter or elector desiring to cast
an absentee ballot must request the absentee ballot from his or her county
auditor no earlier than forty-five days nor later than the day before any
election or primary. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and
in RCW 29.36.170, the request may be made orally in person, by telephone, or in
writing. An application or request for an absentee ballot made under the
authority of any federal statute or regulation shall be considered and given
the same effect as a request for an absentee ballot under this chapter.

(2)
For any registered voter, a request for an absentee ballot for a primary shall
be honored as a request for an absentee ballot for the following general
election if the voter so indicates in his or her request. For any out-of-state
voter, overseas voter, or service voter, a request for an absentee ballot for a
primary election shall also be honored as a request for an absentee ballot for
the following general election.

(3)
A voter admitted to a hospital no earlier than five days before a primary or
election and confined to the hospital on election day may apply by messenger
for an absentee ballot on the day of the primary or election if a signed
statement from the hospital administrator, or designee, verifying the voter's
date of admission and status as a patient in the hospital on the day of the
primary or election is attached to the voter's written application for an
absentee ballot.

(4)
In a voter's request for an absentee ballot, the voter shall state the address
to which the absentee ballot should be sent. A request for an absentee ballot
from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter shall state the
address of that elector's last residence for voting purposes in the state of
Washington and either a written application or the oath on the return envelope
shall include a declaration of the other qualifications of the applicant as an
elector of this state. A request for an absentee ballot from any other voter
shall state the address at which that voter is currently registered to vote in
the state of Washington or the county auditor shall verify such information
from the voter registration records of the county.

(5)
A request for an absentee ballot from a registered voter who is within this
state shall be made directly to the auditor of the county in which the voter is
registered. An absentee ballot request from a registered voter who is
temporarily outside this state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter,
or service voter may be made either to the appropriate county auditor or to the
secretary of state, who shall promptly forward the request to the appropriate
county auditor. No person, organization, or association may distribute
absentee ballot applications within this state that contain any return address
other than that of the appropriate county auditor.

(6)
A person may request an absentee ballot for use by the person as a registered
voter and may request an absentee ballot on behalf of any member of that
person's immediate family who is a registered voter for use by the family
member. As a means of ensuring that a person who requests an absentee ballot
is requesting the ballot for only that person or a member of the person's
immediate family, the secretary of state shall adopt rules prescribing the
circumstances under which an auditor: May require a person who requests an
absentee ballot to identify the date of birth of the voter for whom the ballot
is requested; and may deny a request which is not accompanied by this
information.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

REQUEST
FOR SINGLE ABSENTEE BALLOT. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, a
registered voter or out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter
desiring to cast an absentee ballot at a single election or primary must
request the absentee ballot from his or her county auditor no earlier than
ninety days nor later than the day of the election or primary at which the
person seeks to vote. Except as otherwise provided by law, the request may be
made orally in person, by telephone, electronically, or in writing. An
application or request for an absentee ballot made under the authority of a
federal statute or regulation will be considered and given the same effect as a
request for an absentee ballot under this chapter.

(2)
A voter requesting an absentee ballot for a primary may also request an
absentee ballot for the following general election. A request by an
out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter for an absentee ballot for
a primary election will be considered as a request for an absentee ballot for
the following general election.

(3)
In requesting an absentee ballot, the voter shall state the address to which
the absentee ballot should be sent. A request for an absentee ballot from an
out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter must include the address
of the last residence for voting purposes in the state of Washington and either
a written application or the oath on the return envelope must include a
declaration of the other qualifications of the applicant as an elector of this
state. A request for an absentee ballot from any other voter must state the
address at which that voter is currently registered to vote in the state of
Washington or the county auditor shall verify that information from the voter
registration records of the county.

(4)
A request for an absentee ballot from a registered voter who is within this
state must be made directly to the auditor of the county in which the voter is
registered. An absentee ballot request from a registered voter who is
temporarily outside this state or from an out-of-state voter, overseas voter,
or service voter may be made either to the appropriate county auditor or to the
secretary of state, who shall promptly forward the request to the appropriate
county auditor. No person, organization, or association may distribute
absentee ballot applications within this state that contain a return address
other than that of the appropriate county auditor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A new
section is added to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

REQUESTING
ABSENTEE BALLOT FOR FAMILY MEMBER. A registered voter may request an absentee
ballot on behalf of and for use by a member of his or her immediate family who
is also a registered voter. As a means of ensuring that a person who requests
an absentee ballot is requesting the ballot for only that person or a member of
the person's immediate family, the secretary of state shall adopt rules
prescribing the circumstances under which an auditor may require a person who
requests an absentee ballot to identify the date of birth of the voter for whom
the ballot is requested and under what circumstances the auditor may deny a
request that is not accompanied by this information.

Sec.
4. RCW
29.36.013 and 1993 c 418 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

REQUEST
FOR ONGOING ABSENTEE VOTER STATUS. Any registered voter may apply, in
writing, for status as an ongoing absentee voter. Each qualified applicant
shall automatically receive an absentee ballot for each ensuing election or
primary for which ((he or she)) the voter is entitled to vote
and need not submit a separate request for each election. Ballots received
from ongoing absentee voters shall be validated, processed, and tabulated in
the same manner as other absentee ballots.

Status
as an ongoing absentee voter shall be terminated upon any of the following
events:

(1)
The written request of the voter;

(2)
The death or disqualification of the voter;

(3)
The cancellation of the voter's registration record; ((or))

(4)
The return of an ongoing absentee ballot as undeliverable; or

(5)
A voter being placed on inactive status.

Sec.
5. RCW
29.36.170 and 1991 c 81 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

SPECIAL
ABSENTEE BALLOT. (1) As provided in this section, county auditors shall
provide special absentee ballots to be used for state primary or state general
elections. An auditor shall provide a special absentee ballot ((shall))
only ((be provided)) to a registered voter who completes an
application stating that((:

(a)
The voter believes that she or he will be residing or stationed or working
outside the continental United States; and

(b)
The voter believes that)) she or he will be unable
to vote and return a regular absentee ballot by normal mail delivery within the
period provided for regular absentee ballots.

The
application for a special absentee ballot may not be filed earlier than ninety
days before the applicable state primary or general election. The special
absentee ballot ((shall)) will list the offices and measures, if
known, scheduled to appear on the state primary or general election ballot.
The voter may use the special absentee ballot to write in the name of any eligible
candidate for each office and vote on any measure.

(2)
With any special absentee ballot issued under this section, the county auditor
shall include a listing of any candidates who have filed before the time of the
application for offices that will appear on the ballot at that primary or
election and a list of any issues that have been referred to the ballot before
the time of the application.

(3)
Write-in votes on special absentee ballots ((shall)) must be
counted in the same manner provided by law for the counting of other write-in
votes. The county auditor shall process and canvass the special absentee
ballots provided under this section in the same manner as other absentee
ballots under chapters 29.36 and 29.62 RCW.

(4)
A voter who requests a special absentee ballot under this section may also
request an absentee ballot under ((RCW 29.36.010)) section 2(4) of
this act. If the regular absentee ballot is properly voted and returned,
the special absentee ballot ((shall be deemed)) is void,
and the county auditor shall reject it in whole when special absentee ballots
are canvassed.

Sec.
6. RCW
29.36.030 and 1991 c 81 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

ISSUANCE
OF ABSENTEE BALLOT. (1) The county auditor shall issue an absentee ballot
for the primary or election for which it was requested, or for the next
occurring primary or election when ongoing absentee status has been requested if
the information contained in a request for an absentee ballot or ongoing
absentee status received by the county auditor is complete and correct and
the applicant is qualified to vote under federal or state law((, the county
auditor shall issue an absentee ballot for the primary or election for which
the absentee ballot was requested)). Otherwise, the county auditor shall
notify the applicant of the reason or reasons why the request cannot be
accepted. Whenever two or more candidates have filed for the position of
precinct committee officer for the same party in the same precinct at a general
election held in an even-numbered year, the contest for that position must be
presented to absentee voters from that precinct by either including the contest
on the regular absentee ballot or a separate absentee ballot.

((At
each general election in an even-numbered year, each absentee voter shall also
be given a separate ballot containing the names of the candidates that have
filed for the office of precinct committee officer unless fewer than two
candidates have filed for the same political party in the absentee voter's
precinct. The ballot shall provide space for writing in the name of additional
candidates.

When
mailing an absentee ballot to a registered voter temporarily outside the state
or to an out-of-state voter, overseas voter, or service voter, the county
auditor shall send a)) (2) A registered voter
may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or
not received by the voter. The voter may obtain the ballot by telephone
request, by mail, electronically, or in person. The county auditor shall keep
a record of each replacement ballot provided under this subsection.

(3)
A copy of the state voters' and candidates' pamphlet must be sent to
registered voters temporarily outside the state, out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters along with the absentee ballot if such a
pamphlet has been prepared for the primary or election. The county auditor
shall mail all absentee ballots and related material to voters outside the
territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia under 39
U.S.C. 3406.

Sec.
7. RCW
29.36.035 and 1984 c 27 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

DELIVERY
OF ABSENTEE BALLOT. The delivery of an absentee ballot for any primary or
election shall be subject to the following qualifications:

(1)
Only the registered voter((, himself)) personally, or a
member of ((his)) the registered voter's immediate family may
pick up an absentee ballot for the voter at the office of the issuing
officer unless the voter is ((hospitalized)) a resident of a health
care facility, as defined by RCW 70.37.020(3), on election day and applies
by messenger ((in accordance with RCW 29.36.010)) for an absentee ballot
((on the day of the primary or election)). In this latter case, the
messenger may pick up the ((hospitalized)) voter's absentee ballot.

(2)
Except as noted in subsection (1) ((above)) of this section, the
issuing officer shall mail or deliver the absentee ballot directly to
each applicant.

(((3)
No absentee ballot shall be issued on the day of the primary or election
concerned, except as provided by RCW 29.36.010, for a voter confined to a
hospital on the day of a primary or election.))

Sec.
8. RCW
29.36.045 and 1987 c 346 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

ENVELOPES
AND INSTRUCTIONS. The county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot,
a security envelope in which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope
in which to return the security envelope, and instructions on how to mark the
ballot and how to return it to the county auditor. The larger return envelope
((shall)) must contain a declaration by the absentee voter
reciting his or her qualifications and stating that he or she has not voted in
any other jurisdiction at this election, together with a summary of the
penalties for any violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The
return envelope ((shall)) must provide space for the voter to
indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter to sign the
oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this chapter ((shall))
must be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the space
for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the return envelope
((shall)) must affirm and attest to the statements regarding the
qualifications of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, the signed
declaration on the return envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter
registration for the election or primary for which the ballot has been issued.
The voter ((shall)) must be instructed to either return the
ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach sufficient first
class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the appropriate county
auditor no later than the day of the election or primary for which the ballot
was issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS.
For purposes of canvassing and counting absentee ballots:

(1)
"Initial processing" means all steps taken to prepare absentee
ballots for tabulation, except for the reading of ballots by an electronic vote
tallying system. Initial processing includes, but is not limited to,
verification of signatures on return envelopes; removal of security envelopes
from the return envelopes; removal of ballots from the security envelopes;
manual inspection for damage, for write‑in votes, and for incorrect or
incomplete marks; duplication of damaged and write‑in ballots; and other
preparation of ballots for final processing.

(2)
"Final processing" means the reading of ballots by an electronic vote
tallying system, but does not include tabulation.

(3)
"Tabulation" means the production of returns of votes cast regarding
candidates or measures in a form that can be read by a person, whether as
precinct totals, partial cumulative totals, or final cumulative totals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 29.36 RCW to read as follows:

OBSERVERS.
(1) Before initial processing of absentee ballots, the county auditor shall
notify the county chair of each major political party of the time and date on
which absentee processing will begin, and shall request that each major
political party appoint official observers to observe the processing and
tabulation of absentee ballots. If a major political party has appointed
observers, the observers may be present for initial processing, final
processing, or tabulation, if they so choose, but failure to appoint or attend
does not preclude the processing or tabulation of absentee ballots.

(2)
The auditor shall adopt administrative procedures for the initial and final
processing of absentee ballots. Copies of these administrative procedures must
be made available to the political party observers, and to the public upon
request.

Sec.
11. RCW
29.36.060 and 1991 c 81 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

PROCESSING
ABSENTEE BALLOTS. ((The opening and subsequent processing of return
envelopes for any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day prior
to such primary or election. The opening of the security envelopes and
tabulation of absentee ballots shall not commence until after 8:00 o'clock p.m.
on the day of the primary or election.

After
opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board shall place all of
the ballot envelopes in containers that can be secured with numbered seals. These
sealed containers shall be stored in a secure location until after 8:00 o'clock
p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee ballots that are to be
tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be taken from the inner
envelopes and all the normal procedural steps may be performed to prepare these
ballots for tabulation before sealing the containers.))

(1)
Before opening a returned absentee ballot, the canvassing board, or its
designated representatives, shall examine the postmark, statement, and
signature on ((each)) the return envelope ((containing)) that
contains the security envelope and absentee ballot. They shall verify that
the voter's signature on the return envelope is the same as the
signature of that voter in the registration files ((for that
voter)) of the county. For ((absentee)) registered
voters ((other than out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service
voters, if the postmark is illegible)) casting absentee ballots, the
date on the return envelope to which the voter ((attests shall)) has
attested determines the validity, as to the time of voting((, of))
for that absentee ballot ((under this chapter)) if the
postmark is missing or is illegible. For out-of-state voters, overseas
voters, and service voters, the date on the return envelope to which the voter
has attested determines the validity as to the time of voting for that absentee
ballot. For any absentee ((voter)) ballot, a variation
between the signature of the voter on the return envelope and the signature
of that voter in the registration files due to the substitution of
initials or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and
handwriting are clearly the same.

(2)
Absentee ballot return envelopes for a primary or election may be opened for
initial processing on or after the tenth day before that primary or election.

(3)
After opening the return envelopes, the county canvassing board shall either:

(a)
Place all of the security envelopes containing the absentee ballots in
containers, and secure the containers with numbered seals; or

(b)
In the case of absentee ballots that will be tabulated on an electronic vote
tallying system, open the security envelopes, perform the initial processing,
place the absentee ballots in containers, and keep the containers in secure
storage until the ballots are ready for final processing.

(4)
The canvassing board, or its designated representatives, shall establish audit
procedures that insure that the absentee ballots are kept in secure storage
during the initial processing period.

(5)
The absentee ballots must not be removed from secure storage until final
processing begins. Final processing may not begin before 7:00 a.m. on the day
of the primary or election. In counties using electronic vote tallying
systems, the absentee ballots must be tabulated under continuous observation of
representatives of the major political parties, and all other security
provisions required by the secretary of state under RCW 29.04.210 and
29.36.150. No results from tabulation of absentee ballots may be produced or
distributed until after 8:00 p.m. on the day of the primary or election.

Sec.
12. RCW
29.36.070 and 1990 c 262 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

COUNTING
ABSENTEE BALLOTS. The absentee ballots ((shall be grouped and counted by))
must be reported at a minimum on a congressional and legislative
district ((without regard to)) basis. Absentee ballots may be
counted by congressional or legislative basis or by individual precinct,
except as required under RCW 29.62.090(2).

These
returns ((shall)) must be added to the total of the votes cast at
the polling places.

Sec.
13. RCW
29.36.075 and 1988 c 181 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

PROCESSING
DETAILS. ((In counties that do not tabulate absentee ballots on electronic
vote tallying systems, canvassing boards may not tabulate or record votes cast
by absentee ballots on any uncontested office except write-in votes for
candidates for the office of precinct committeeperson who have filed valid
declarations of candidacy under RCW 29.04.180. "Uncontested office"
means an office where only one candidate has filed a valid declaration of
candidacy either during the regular filing period or as a write-in candidate
under RCW 29.04.180.))

Each
registered voter casting an absentee ballot ((shall)) will be
credited with voting on his or her voter registration record. Absentee
ballots ((shall)) must be retained for the same length of time
and in the same manner as ballots cast at the precinct polling places.

Sec.
14. RCW
29.36.097 and 1991 c 81 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

ABSENTEE
BALLOT RECORDS. Each county auditor shall maintain in his or her office, open
for public inspection and copying, a record of the requests he or she
has received for absentee ballots ((under this chapter)), a listing
of all ongoing absentee voters, and a daily cumulative listing of the names of
voters whose absentee ballots have been returned before each primary and
election.

The
information from the requests ((shall)) must be recorded and
lists of this information ((shall)) must be available no later
than ((twenty-four hours)) the next business day after their
receipt. Lists of ongoing absentee voters must be available at all times.

This
information about absentee voters ((shall)) requesting ballots will
be available according to the date of the requests and by legislative
district. It ((shall)) must include the name of each applicant,
the address and precinct in which the voter maintains a voting residence, the
date on which an absentee ballot was issued to this voter, if applicable, the
type of absentee ballot, and the address to which the ballot was or is to be
mailed, if applicable, and the names of the voters whose absentee ballots
have been returned.

The
auditor shall make copies of these records available to the public in either
paper or electronic format for the actual cost of production or copying.

Sec.
15. RCW
29.36.100 and 1987 c 346 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

CHALLENGED
ABSENTEE BALLOTS. The qualifications of any absentee voter may be challenged
at the time the signature on the return envelope is verified and the ballot is
processed by the canvassing board. The board has the authority to determine
the legality of any absentee ballot challenged under this section. Challenged
ballots must be handled in accordance with chapter 29.10 RCW.

Sec.
16. RCW
29.36.150 and 1993 c 417 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of state shall adopt rules implementing this chapter, including
rules to:

(1)
Establish standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate the
accurate processing and canvassing of absentee ballots ((and mail ballots));

(2)
Establish standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of absentee ballots
((and mail ballots));

(3)
Provide uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of absentee
voting ((and mail ballot elections)); ((and))

(4)
Facilitate the operation of the provisions of this chapter regarding
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters;

(5)
Provide flexible requirements for persons confined in health care facilities to
apply for and receive absentee ballots; and

(6)
Provide standards for electronic requests for absentee ballots.

The
secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and instructions for
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters to the county
auditors.

Sec.
17. RCW
29.36.160 and 1994 c 269 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter regarding the
assertion or declaration of qualifications to receive or cast an absentee
ballot((,)) or unlawfully casts a vote by absentee ballot((,
or willfully violates any provision regarding the conduct of mail ballot primaries
or elections under RCW 29.36.120 through 29.36.139)) is guilty of a class C
felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021. Except as provided in chapter 29.85 RCW
a person who willfully violates any other provision of this chapter is guilty
of a misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 29.54 RCW to read as follows:

The
secretary of state shall adopt rules providing for posters summarizing election
crimes and maximum penalties to be displayed prominently in all locations where
absentee ballots and ballots picked up from precincts are processed and
tabulated.

PART
II

MAIL
BALLOTS

Sec.
19. RCW
29.36.120 and 1994 c 269 s 1 and 1994 c 57 s 48 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

MAIL
BALLOT PRECINCTS. (((1) At any primary or election, general or special,))
The county auditor may((, in)) designate any precinct
having fewer than two hundred active registered voters at the time of closing
of voter registration as provided in RCW 29.07.160((, conduct the voting in
that precinct by)) as a mail ballot precinct. ((For any
precinct having fewer than two hundred active registered voters where voting at
a primary or a general election is conducted by mail ballot, the county auditor
shall, not less than fifteen days prior to the date of that primary or general
election, mail or deliver to each active and inactive registered voter within
that precinct a notice that the voting in that precinct will be by mail ballot,
an application form for a mail ballot, and a postage prepaid envelope,
preaddressed to the issuing officer. A mail ballot shall be issued to each
voter who returns a properly executed application to the county auditor no
later than the day of that primary or general election. For all subsequent
mail ballot elections in that precinct the application is valid so long as the
voter remains active and qualified to vote.)) The county auditor shall
notify each registered voter by mail that for all future primaries and
elections the voting in his or her precinct will be by mail ballot only.
In determining the number of registered voters in a precinct for the purposes
of this section, persons who are ongoing absentee voters under RCW 29.36.013 (as
recodified by this act) shall not be counted. Nothing in this section may
be construed as altering the vote tallying requirements of RCW 29.62.090.

((At
any nonpartisan special election not being held in conjunction with a state
primary or general election, the county, city, town, or district requesting the
election pursuant to RCW 29.13.010 or 29.13.020 may also request that the
election be conducted by mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request
or may determine that the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The
decision of the county auditor in this regard is final.

In
no instance shall any special election be conducted by mail ballot in any
precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters if candidates for
partisan office are to be voted upon.

For
all special elections not being held in conjunction with a state primary or
state general election where voting is conducted by mail ballot, the county
auditor shall, not less than fifteen days prior to the date of such election,
mail or deliver to each active registered voter a mail ballot and an envelope,
preaddressed to the issuing officer.)) As soon as ballots are
available, the county auditor shall mail or deliver a ballot and an envelope,
preaddressed to the issuing officer, to each active registered voter. The
auditor shall send each inactive voter either a ballot or an application to receive
a ballot. The auditor shall determine which of the two is to be sent. If the
inactive voter returns a voted ballot, the ballot shall be counted and the
voter's status restored to active. If the inactive voter completes and returns
an application, a ballot shall be sent and the voter's status restored to
active.

(((2)
For a two-year period beginning on June 9, 1994, and ending two years after
June 9, 1994, the county auditor may conduct the voting in any precinct by mail
for any primary or election, partisan or nonpartisan, using the procedures set
forth in RCW 29.36.120 through 29.36.139.))

If
the precinct exceeds two hundred registered voters, or the auditor determines
to return to a polling place election environment, the auditor shall notify each
registered voter, by mail, of this and shall provide the address of the polling
place to be used.

Sec.
20. RCW
29.36.121 and 1994 c 57 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

MAIL
BALLOT SPECIAL ELECTIONS. (((1))) At any nonpartisan special election
not being held in conjunction with a state primary or general election, the
county, city, town, or district requesting the election pursuant to RCW
29.13.010 or 29.13.020 may also request that the special election be
conducted by mail ballot. The county auditor may honor the request or may
determine that the election is not to be conducted by mail ballot. The
decision of the county auditor in this regard is final.

(((2)
In an odd-numbered year, the county auditor may conduct by mail ballot a
primary or a special election concurrently with the primary:

(a)
For any office or ballot measure of a special purpose district which is
entirely within the county;

(b)
For any office or ballot measure of a special purpose district which lies in
the county and one or more other counties if the auditor first secures the
concurrence of the county auditors of those other counties to conduct the
primary in this manner district-wide; and

(c)
For any ballot measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city, or town if the
auditor first secures the concurrence of the legislative authority of the
county, city, or town involved.

A
primary in an odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail ballot in any
precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters if a partisan office
or state office or state ballot measure is to be voted upon at that primary in
the precinct.

(3))) For
all special elections not being held in conjunction with a state primary or
state general election where voting is conducted by mail ballot, the county
auditor shall, not less than fifteen days before the date of such election,
mail or deliver to each registered voter a mail ballot ((and an envelope,
preaddressed to the issuing officer. The county auditor shall notify an
election jurisdiction for which a primary is to be held that the primary will
be conducted by mail ballot)). The auditor shall handle inactive voters
in the same manner as inactive voters in mail ballot precincts.

(((4)
To the extent they are not inconsistent with subsections (1) through (3) of
this section, the laws governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections
apply to nonpartisan primaries conducted by mail ballot.))

For
a special election conducted by mail ballot, the county auditor shall include
with the ballot a clear explanation of the qualifications necessary to vote in
that election and shall also advise a voter with questions about his or her
eligibility to contact the county auditor. This explanation may be provided on
the ballot envelope, provided on an enclosed insert, or printed directly on the
ballot itself. If this information is included, vote by mail special election
ballots may be forwarded to voters in the same manner as absentee ballots. If
the information is not included in the instructions, the envelope must clearly
indicate that the ballot is not to be forwarded and that return postage is
guaranteed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
ODD-YEAR PRIMARIES BY MAIL. In an odd-numbered year, the county auditor may
conduct a primary or a special election by mail ballot concurrently with the
primary:

(1)
For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district that is entirely
within the county;

(2)
For an office or ballot measure of a special purpose district that lies in the
county and one or more other counties if the auditor first secures the
concurrence of the county auditors of those other counties to conduct the
primary in this manner district-wide; and

(3)
For a ballot measure or nonpartisan office of a county, city, or town if the
auditor first secures the concurrence of the legislative authority of the
county, city, or town involved.

The
county auditor shall notify an election jurisdiction for which a primary is to
be held that the primary will be conducted by mail ballot.

A
primary in an odd-numbered year may not be conducted by mail ballot in a
precinct with two hundred or more active registered voters if a partisan office
or state office or state ballot measure is to be voted upon at that primary in
the precinct.

To
the extent they are not inconsistent with other provisions of law, the laws
governing the conduct of mail ballot special elections apply to nonpartisan
primaries conducted by mail ballot.

Sec.
22. RCW
29.36.124 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

DEPOSITING
BALLOTS FOR MAIL BALLOT ELECTIONS. (((1))) If a county auditor conducts
an election by mail, the county auditor shall designate the county auditor's
office ((or a central location in the district in which the election is
conducted)) as the single place to obtain a replacement ballot. The county
auditor also shall designate one or more places for the deposit of ballots not
returned by mail. The places designated under this section shall be open on
the date of the election for a period of at least thirteen hours,
beginning at 7:00 a.m. and ending at 8:00 p.m., and at any other times
designated by the county auditor.

(((2)
A registered voter may obtain a replacement ballot as provided in this subsection
if the ballot is destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received by the voter. A
registered voter seeking a replacement ballot shall sign a sworn statement that
the ballot was destroyed, spoiled, lost, or not received and shall present the
statement to the county auditor no later than the day of the election. Each
spoiled ballot must be returned to the county auditor before a new one is
issued. The county auditor shall keep a record of each replacement ballot
provided under this subsection.))

Sec.
23. RCW
29.36.126 and 1993 c 417 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

RETURN
OF VOTED BALLOT BY VOTER. ((Upon receipt of the mail ballot, the voter
shall mark it, sign the return identification envelope supplied with the ballot,
and comply with the instructions provided with the ballot. The voter may
return the marked ballot to the county auditor. The ballot must be returned))
The voter shall return the ballot to the county auditor in the return
identification envelope. If mailed, a ballot must be postmarked not later than
the date of the primary or election. Otherwise, the ballot must be
deposited at the office of the county auditor or the designated place of
deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on the date of the primary or election.

Sec.
24. RCW
29.36.130 and 1993 c 417 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

BALLOT
CONTENTS‑-COUNTING. All mail ballots authorized by RCW 29.36.120 or
29.36.121 ((shall)) (as recodified by this act) or section 21 of this
act must contain the same offices, names of nominees or candidates,
and propositions to be voted upon, including precinct offices, as if the ballot
had been voted in person at the polling place. Except as otherwise provided ((in
this chapter)) by law, mail ballots ((shall)) must be
((issued and canvassed)) treated in the same manner as absentee
ballots issued ((pursuant to)) at the request of the voter. ((The
county canvassing board, at the request of the county auditor, may direct that
mail ballots be counted on the day of the election. If such count is made, it
must be done in secrecy in the presence of the canvassing board or their
authorized representatives and the results not revealed to any unauthorized
person until 8:00 p.m. or later if the auditor so directs.)) If electronic
vote tallying devices are used, political party observers ((shall be
afforded)) must be given the opportunity to be present, and a test
of the equipment must be performed as required by RCW 29.33.350 ((prior to
the count of)) before tabulating ballots. Political party observers
may select at random ballots to be counted manually as provided by RCW
29.54.025. Any violation of the secrecy of ((such)) the count ((shall
be)) is subject to the same penalties as provided for in RCW
29.85.225.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25.
RULES. The secretary of state shall adopt rules to:

(1)
Establish standards and procedures to prevent fraud and to facilitate the
accurate processing and canvassing of mail ballots;

(2)
Establish standards and procedures to guarantee the secrecy of mail ballots;

(3)
Provide uniformity among the counties of the state in the conduct of mail
ballot elections; and

(4)
Provide for requests for a replacement ballot at a mail ballot election to be
made electronically.

The
secretary of state shall produce and furnish envelopes and instructions for
mail ballot elections for all out-of-state, overseas voters, and service
voters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26.
PENALTY. A person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter
regarding the conduct of mail ballot primaries or elections is guilty of a
class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

PART
III

POLLING
PLACE REGULATIONS

Sec.
27. RCW
29.36.050 and 1987 c 346 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

A
registered voter shall not be allowed to vote a regular ballot in the
precinct in which he or she is registered at any election or primary for which
that voter has ((cast)) requested an absentee ballot or if the
voter is an ongoing absentee voter. A registered voter who has requested
an absentee ballot for a primary or special or general election or who is an
ongoing absentee voter but chooses to vote at the voter's precinct polling
place in that primary or election ((shall cast a ballot in the manner
prescribed by RCW 29.10.127 for challenged ballots)) must be issued and
allowed to cast a special ballot. The canvassing board shall not count the
ballot if it finds that the voter has also voted by absentee ballot in that
primary or election.

Sec.
28. RCW
29.54.085 and 1990 c 59 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ballots picked up from the precincts during the polling hours may be ((counted))
initially and finally processed, but not tabulated, before the polls
have closed. ((Election returns from the count of these ballots)) Results
of paper ballots that were tabulated at precinct polling sites before the close
of polls under RCW 29.54.018 must be held in secrecy until the polls have
been closed ((as provided by RCW 29.54.018)).

(2)
Upon breaking the seals and opening the ballot containers from the precincts or
opening the inner security envelopes for absentee ballots, all voted
ballots shall be manually inspected for damage, write-in votes, and incorrect
or incomplete marks. If it is found that any ballot is damaged or has incorrect
or incomplete marks so that it cannot properly be counted by the vote
tallying system, a true duplicate copy shall be made of the ((damaged)) original
ballot in the presence of witnesses and substituted for the ((damaged)) original
ballot. All ((damaged)) original ballots for which a true
duplicate copy has been made shall be kept by the county auditor until
sixty days after the primary or election. Ballots may not be enhanced,
except that where a voter makes a write-in vote but fails to otherwise mark a
ballot indicating that a write-in vote has been made, the ballot may be
enhanced by making the mark indicating that a write-in vote has been made.

Notice
of the making of true duplicate copies of original ballots or enhancing
ballots, as authorized in this subsection, shall be made in the same manner as
notice of a special meeting is made under RCW 42.30.080 and shall also be made
to the chair of the county central committee of each major political party in
the county.

(3)
The returns produced by the vote tallying system, to which have been added the
counts of questioned ballots, write-in votes, and absentee votes, constitute
the official returns of the primary or election in that county.

PART
IV

TECHNICAL

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
29.36.122 (Special election by mail--Sending ballots to voters)
and 1994 c 57 s 50, 1993 c 417 s 3, & 1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 2; and

(2) RCW
29.36.139 (Mail ballots--Counting requirements--Challenge) and
1993 c 417 s 6 & 1983 1st ex.s. c 71 s 6.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30. (1)
RCW 29.36.010, 29.36.013, 29.36.170, 29.36.030, 29.36.035, 29.36.045,
29.36.060, 29.36.070, 29.36.075, 29.36.097, 29.36.100, 29.36.150, and 29.36.160
are each recodified within chapter 29.36 RCW, in the order shown in this act,
along with sections 2, 3, 9, and 10 of this act.

(2)
RCW 29.36.120, 29.36.121, 29.36.124, 29.36.126, and 29.36.130 are each
recodified, and, along with sections 21, 25, and 26 of this act, constitute a
new chapter in Title 29 RCW.

(3)
RCW 29.36.050 is recodified as a new section in chapter 29.51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 31.
Section captions and part headings used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---