BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.155 and 1995 c 397 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
lobbyist shall, at the time he or she registers with the public
disclosure commission, submit to the ((commission)) chief clerk
of the house of representatives or to the secretary of the senate a recent
photograph of himself or herself of a size and format as determined by ((rule
of the commission)) action of the chief clerk or secretary of the senate,
together with the name of the lobbyist's employer, the length of his or her
employment as a lobbyist before the legislature, a brief biographical
description, and any other information he or she may wish to submit not to
exceed fifty words in length. ((Such photograph and information shall be
published))

At
least biennially ((in)) the chief clerk and secretary of the senate
shall publish a lobbyist booklet ((form by the commission)) listing
lobbyists and their employers, the photographs of lobbyists, and other relevant
information for distribution to legislators and the public.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
42.17.155, as amended by this act, is recodified as a section in chapter 44.04
RCW.

---
END ---