BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.160.010 and 1996 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state of Washington
to direct financial resources toward the fostering of economic development
through the stimulation of investment and job opportunities and the retention
of sustainable existing employment for the general welfare of the inhabitants
of the state. Reducing unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain
jobless is important for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means
of fostering economic development is the construction of public facilities
which contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
Strengthening the economic base through issuance of industrial development
bonds, whether single or umbrella, further serves to reduce unemployment.
Consolidating issues of industrial development bonds when feasible to reduce
costs additionally advances the state's purpose to improve economic vitality.
Expenditures made for these purposes as authorized in this chapter are declared
to be in the public interest, and constitute a proper use of public funds.

Economic
development is also increasingly dependent upon the existence of an advanced
telecommunications and information infrastructure. For a healthy economy,
businesses located in rural locations need access to advanced
telecommunications and information services at rates and standards of quality
that are reasonably comparable to rates and standards of quality that are
offered in urban areas. Public policy should provide incentives to encourage
private investment in advanced telecommunications and information
infrastructure so that the benefits of competition in telecommunications,
advanced telecommunications, and information services reach not only urban
areas but also other areas of the state on a reasonably comparable and timely
basis.

A
community economic revitalization board is needed which shall aid the
development of economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board should
include:

(a)
Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have experienced or are
expected to experience chronically high unemployment rates or below average
growth in their economies;

(b)
Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state and regions
within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and cyclical stability of
income and employment;

(c)
Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large and small
industrial development projects;

(d)
Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize employment;

(e)
Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and employment; ((and))

(f)
Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities for groups of
state residents that have been less successful relative to other groups in
efforts to gain permanent employment; and

(g)
Encouraging private investment through tax incentives to facilitate the
construction of an advanced telecommunications and information infrastructure
in rural locations.

(2)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by, in certain instances, providing funds to improve state highways in
the vicinity of new industries considering locating in this state or existing
industries that are considering significant expansion.

(a)
The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby the need for
diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned economic development
can be addressed in a timely fashion and with coordination among all
responsible governmental entities.

(b)
It is the intent of the legislature to create an economic development account
within the motor vehicle fund from which expenditures can be made by the
department of transportation for state highway improvements necessitated by
planned economic development. All such improvements must first be approved by
the state transportation commission and the community economic revitalization
board in accordance with the procedures established by RCW 43.160.074 and
47.01.280. It is further the intent of the legislature that such improvements
not jeopardize any other planned highway construction projects. The
improvements are intended to be of limited size and cost, and to include such
items as additional turn lanes, signalization, illumination, and safety
improvements.

(3)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by providing funds to improve markets for those recyclable materials
representing a large fraction of the waste stream. The legislature finds that
public facilities which result in private construction of processing or
remanufacturing facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for
consideration from the board.

(4)
The legislature finds that sharing economic growth state-wide is important to
the welfare of the state. Rural natural resource impact areas do not share in
the economic vitality of the Puget Sound region. Infrastructure is one of several
ingredients that are critical for economic development. Rural natural resource
impact areas generally lack the infrastructure necessary to diversify and
revitalize their economies. It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to
increase the availability of funds to help provide infrastructure to rural
natural resource impact areas.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.160.020 and 1997 c 367 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Advanced telecommunications provider" means any person,
corporation, partnership, or association that operates equipment and facilities
capable of distributing digital communications signals for the transmission of
voice, data, image, and other video over distance for either self use or the
provision of such services to others.

(2)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(((2)))
(3) "Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim
certificate, or other evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board
pursuant to this chapter.

(((3)))
(4) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

(((4)))
(5) "Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan
association, credit union, development credit corporation, insurance company,
investment company, trust company, savings institution, or other financial
institution approved by the board and maintaining an office in the state.

(((5)))
(6) "Incumbent local exchange carrier" as defined in 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 251(h)(1), means, with respect to an area, the local exchange carrier
that:

(a)
On February 8, 1996, provided telephone exchange service in such area; and

(b)(i)
On February 8, 1996, was deemed to be a member of the exchange carrier
association pursuant to section 69.601(b) of the federal communications
commission's regulations (47 C.F.R. 69.601(b)); or

(ii)
Is a person or entity that, on or after February 8, 1996, became a successor or
assign of a member described in (b)(i) of this subsection.

(7)
"Incumbent local exchange carrier's service area" means those
telephone exchange areas for which the incumbent local exchange carrier had
rate tariffs in effect and maps on file with the utilities and transportation
commission on January 1, 1999.

(8)
"Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(((6)))
(9) "Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt
revenue bonds used to fund industrial development facilities.

(((7)))
(10) "Local government" or "political subdivision"
means any port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any
other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state
providing for public facilities under this chapter.

(((8)))
(11) "Rural location" means a telephone exchange area with ten
thousand or fewer access lines.

(12)
"Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and are
approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings bank,
investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan association,
building and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or any other
financial institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any entity
specified in this subsection.

(((9)))
(13) "Telecommunications infrastructure improvement" means the
construction or upgrade of real property or tangible personal property used to
distribute digital communications signals for the transmission of voice, data,
image, and video over distance. It includes, but is not limited to, activities
such as the laying of fiber optic cable, the construction of terrestrial
facilities to support digital communications by satellite, and the construction
of towers and other facilities to support digital communications through
nonwireline technologies.

(14)
"Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds from
which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made available to two
or more users under this chapter.

(((10)))
(15) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee,
purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.

(((11)))
(16) "Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, buildings or structures, and port facilities.

(((12)))
(17) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (((13))) (18)
of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (((13))) (18) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (((13))) (18) of this section.

(((13)))
(18) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip
code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services
under this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.160.050 and 1996 c 51 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board may:

(1)
Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

(2)
Adopt an official seal and alter the seal at its pleasure.

(3)
Utilize the services of other governmental agencies.

(4)
Accept from any federal agency loans or grants for the planning or financing of
any project and enter into an agreement with the agency respecting the loans or
grants.

(5)
Conduct examinations and investigations and take testimony at public hearings of
any matter material for its information that will assist in determinations
related to the exercise of the board's lawful powers.

(6)
Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial or other
aid in any form from any other source on any terms and conditions which are not
in conflict with this chapter.

(7)
Exercise all the powers of a public corporation under chapter 39.84 RCW.

(8)
Invest any funds received in connection with industrial development revenue
bond financing not required for immediate use, as the board considers
appropriate, subject to any agreements with owners of bonds.

(9)
Arrange for lines of credit for industrial development revenue bonds from and
enter into participation agreements with any financial institution.

(10)
Issue industrial development revenue bonds in one or more series for the
purpose of defraying the cost of acquiring or improving any industrial
development facility or facilities and securing the payment of the bonds as
provided in this chapter.

(11)
Enter into agreements or other transactions with and accept grants and the
cooperation of any governmental agency in furtherance of this chapter.

(12)
Sell, purchase, or insure loans to finance the costs of industrial development
facilities.

(13)
Service, contract, and pay for the servicing of loans for industrial
development facilities.

(14)
Provide financial analysis and technical assistance for industrial development
facilities when the board reasonably considers it appropriate.

(15)
Collect, with respect to industrial development revenue bonds, reasonable
interest, fees, and charges for making and servicing its lease agreements, loan
agreements, mortgage loans, notes, bonds, commitments, and other evidences of
indebtedness. Interest, fees, and charges are limited to the amounts required
to pay the costs of the board, including operating and administrative expenses
and reasonable allowances for losses that may be incurred.

(16)
Procure insurance or guarantees from any party as allowable under law, including
a governmental agency, against any loss in connection with its lease
agreements, loan agreements, mortgage loans, and other assets or property.

(17)
Provide guidance and direction in facilitating the development of an
advanced telecommunications and information infrastructure in rural locations
by reviewing and ranking tax credit applications and recommending certain
applications for approval to the department of revenue.

(18)
Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter.

(((18)))
(19) Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the
powers expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The community economic revitalization board shall establish and administer a
telecommunications infrastructure tax credits program in coordination with the
department of revenue.

(2)
Under this telecommunications infrastructure tax credits program, the board
shall review applications for business and occupation and public utility tax
credits on a competitive basis, in accordance with criteria in subsection (5)
of this section.

(3)
The board shall recommend to the department of revenue which tax credit
applications should be approved, provided that each year the total amount of
tax credits recommended for approval does not exceed the available amount of
tax credits computed under section 5 of this act. Each year the board shall
forward to the department of revenue a list of the telecommunications
infrastructure tax credits recommended for approval.

(4)
The department of revenue shall approve applications for these
telecommunications infrastructure tax credits as provided in section 5 of this
act.

(5)
Criteria for evaluating and ranking tax credit applications is as follows:

(a)
The number of jobs to be created or retained as a result of a
telecommunications infrastructure improvement in a rural location;

(b)
Comparability between rates generally charged for advanced telecommunications
and information services in urban and other low-cost locations of the state to
the rates that that tax credit applicant indicates it will charge customers in
the rural location where the infrastructure improvement is to be made, if the
applicant will provide advanced telecommunications and information services to
others;

(c)
The size of the telecommunications bandwidth that will be made available to
consumers in a rural location as a result of the telecommunications
infrastructure improvement;

(d)
The amount of money that an applicant will spend from its own funds, in excess
of the expenditure amount for which a tax credit application is made, to make a
telecommunications infrastructure improvement in a rural location; and

(e)
The geographical distribution of the tax credits to be recommended for
approval.

(6)
The board shall take steps to inform business and residential consumers located
in rural locations and advanced telecommunications providers will be informed
about the business and occupation tax credits available on a competitive basis
for telecommunications infrastructure improvements made in rural locations.

(7)
The board shall allow a joint tax credit application to be submitted under this
section when two or more advanced telecommunications providers intend to
jointly construct a telecommunications infrastructure improvement.

(8)
A tax credit applicant must attach to the application a list of the businesses
that have requested advanced telecommunications and information services which
cannot be supported by the existing telecommunications infrastructure located
in the area where the telecommunications infrastructure improvement is to be
made. The list shall indicate for each business the number of jobs expected to
be created or retained as a result of the telecommunications infrastructure
improvement.

(9)
No more than fifteen percent of tax credits recommended for approval in any one
year shall be for telecommunications infrastructure projects located in the
same county.

(10)
No more than fifteen percent of the tax credits recommended for approval in any
one year shall be for telecommunications infrastructure projects to be
constructed by the same advanced telecommunications provider or its affiliates.

(11)
The board may recommend for approval a tax credit application submitted by an
incumbent local exchange carrier if the application proposes to construct a
telecommunications infrastructure improvement in a rural location that is
located outside of an incumbent local exchange carrier's service area. The
board may not recommend approval for any tax credit application submitted by an
incumbent local exchange carrier if the application proposes to construct a
telecommunications infrastructure improvement in a rural location that is
located inside of an incumbent local exchange carrier's service area.

(12)
This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

For
purposes of the telecommunications infrastructure tax credits program
established in section 4 of this act, each calendar year the available amount
of tax credits shall be determined as follows:

(1)
In Washington the average rate of growth in gross revenues for telephone
businesses during calendar years 1992 through 1996 was seven percent. For
purposes of this section, seven percent shall be the base growth rate.

(2)
Every October the department of revenue shall:

(a)
Compute total tax paid under this chapter by businesses in North American
industry classification system code 5133 for the last two calendar years. If
at any time the United States office of management and budget or a successor
agency should change or replace the present North American industry
classification code system, the department of revenue shall use the code system
issued by the office of management and budget or its successor agency to
determine the code corresponding to the one listed in this definition;

(b)
Compute the rate of growth that occurred in taxes paid under this chapter by
telecommunications businesses by subtracting total taxes paid from two calendar
years ago from last calendar year's total taxes paid and then dividing this
amount by total taxes paid from two calendar years ago;

(c)
Compare the growth rate computed under (b) of this subsection to the base
growth rate. If the rate of growth computed under (b) of this subsection
exceeds the base growth rate, then the department of revenue shall subtract the
base growth rate from the growth rate computed under (b) of this subsection and
multiply this amount against total taxes paid by telecommunications businesses
for the last calendar year. The product of this calculation or thirty million
dollars, whichever is less, shall be the amount of tax credits available for
the calendar year beginning on January 1st for the telecommunications
infrastructure tax credits program;

(d)
If the rate of growth computed under (b) of this subsection is less than the
base growth rate, then no moneys shall be available for tax credits; and

(e)
By October 15th of each year the department of revenue shall inform the
community economic revitalization board of the amount of tax credits available
for the telecommunications infrastructure tax credits program.

(3)
This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
An advanced telecommunications provider is allowed a credit against tax due
under this chapter for expenses incurred in constructing telecommunications
infrastructure improvements in rural locations if the credit has been approved
by the department. A credit approved by the department under subsection (2) of
this section may be claimed over a three-year period but may not exceed the
amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter during the
three-year period. A credit unused at the end of the three-year period shall
expire. Refunds may not be claimed in place of credits. If a person has used
a credit approved under this section for tax under chapter 82.16 RCW, that same
credit cannot be used against tax under this chapter.

(b)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(i)
"Advanced telecommunications provider" is as defined in RCW
43.160.020(1).

(ii)
"Expenses" means amounts spent for materials that become part of the
telecommunications infrastructure improvement being constructed and charges for
labor and services rendered in constructing the telecommunications
infrastructure improvement.

(iii)
"Rural location" is as defined in RCW 43.160.020(11).

(iv)
"Telecommunications infrastructure improvement" is as defined in RCW
43.160.020(13).

(2)
The department shall approve a tax credit application if the community economic
revitalization board has forwarded and recommended the tax credit application
for approval to the department as provided in section 4 of this act.

(3)(a)
A person who fails to meet the following requirements must repay a tax credit
and is subject to interest assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise
taxes, retroactively to the date of the tax credit, which shall accrue until
the tax for which the credit has been used is repaid:

(i)
Construct a telecommunications infrastructure improvement in accordance with
the specifications for bandwidth, rates, and other criteria that the person
stated the improvement would meet in the tax credit application; or

(ii)
Complete the telecommunications infrastructure improvement within three years
of the tax credit application being approved by the department.

(b)
The community economic revitalization board shall inform the department of
revenue in writing when tax credit recipient has failed to comply with (a) of
this subsection.

(4)
This section expires December 31, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An advanced telecommunications provider is allowed a credit against tax due
under this chapter for expenses incurred in constructing telecommunications
infrastructure improvements in rural locations if the credit has been approved
by the department. A credit shall be claimed in the same manner as provided
for credits under section 6 of this act. Credits under this section are
subject to the same conditions and limitations as credits under section 6 of
this act.

(2) This section expires December 31, 2005.

---
END ---