BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that salmon recovery in Washington state requires a
state-wide strategy and actions that are tailored to the unique characteristics
of each major watershed in the state.

(2)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
The health and economic prosperity of the region depends on a high quality
environment;

(b)
Several species of salmon in the state are, or are expected to be, listed as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act; and

(c)
One or more additional listings under the federal endangered species act have
the potential to adversely affect nearly all aspects of the state's economy,
and a comprehensive solution will require significant involvement of the
private and public sectors.

(3)
The legislature recognizes that a critical pathways mechanism was established
in 1998 to fund salmon habitat restoration. The legislature also recognizes
that there is an extensive network of federal, state, local, and tribal rules
and regulations to protect salmon habitat. In 1998, the legislature also
established a comprehensive approach to setting priorities for individual
watersheds through water resource inventory area planning.

(4)
The legislature further finds that:

(a)
While there are a number of public, nonprofit, and business entities involved
in acquiring land or easements to preserve habitat, the lack of dedicated
funding and a coordinated approach cause this effort to occur on a piecemeal
basis; and

(b)
A private nongovernmental approach to preservation and restoration is necessary
to increase business and landowner participation, garner public support, and
increase the efficiency and effectiveness of habitat investments.

(5)
The legislature also declares that it is in the public interest to create a
nonprofit foundation to actively seek funding for projects to preserve and
restore critical salmon habitat in the state of Washington.

(6)
The 1998 legislature requested that a community foundation or other funding
mechanisms be investigated for the purpose of assisting in financing salmon
recovery efforts. It was found that a community foundation would best serve
that purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Foundation" means the salmon recovery foundation created in section
3 of this act.

(2)
"Eligible grant recipients" includes local governments, state
agencies, nonprofit organizations, and tribes.

(3)
"Eligible projects" means any project or action that serves to
preserve, restore, or steward critical salmon habitat and that has been
selected by the interagency review team created in RCW 75.46.080.

(4)
"Restore" means an action to reestablish ecological conditions of
critical salmon habitat, including but not limited to actions that restore key
processes, functions, or structures that support salmon habitat.

(5)
"Preserve" means a nonregulatory action that facilitates protection
of critical salmon habitat and may include the purchase of development or
timber rights, conservation easements, or fee simple title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
By September 1, 1999, the governor shall file articles of incorporation in
accordance with the Washington nonprofit corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to
establish the salmon recovery foundation. The foundation shall not be an
agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state.

(2)
The foundation shall have a board of directors consisting of nineteen members.
The members shall consist of one person representing counties, and residing in
a county, from western Washington and one person representing counties, and
residing in a county, from eastern Washington appointed by the Washington
association of counties; one person representing cities from western Washington
and one person representing cities from eastern Washington appointed by the
association of Washington cities; one tribal representative appointed by the
Northwest Washington Indian fisheries commission; one tribal representative
appointed by the Columbia river intertribal fish commission; one person
appointed by the director of the state department of fish and wildlife; one
person appointed by the director of the state department of ecology; one person
appointed by the secretary of transportation; one person appointed by the
conservation commission; one person appointed by the regional fisheries
enhancement group advisory board; two persons residing in eastern Washington
with experience in fishery restoration, fund raising, or volunteer coordination
appointed by the governor; two persons residing in western Washington with
experience in fishery restoration, fund raising, or volunteer coordination
appointed by the governor; one representative from each of the two largest
caucuses of the house of representatives appointed by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives; and one member from each of the two largest caucuses
of the senate, selected by the president of the senate.

(3)
Members other than legislative members serve three-year terms, except for the
initial terms, which shall be staggered by the governor to achieve a balanced
mix of terms on the board. Members may serve up to a maximum of three terms.
At the end of a term, a member may continue to serve until a successor has been
appointed. Terms for legislative members are two years.

(4)
The board shall develop bylaws as required under RCW 24.03.070.

(5)
The foundation shall meet at least four times per year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
foundation shall actively seek funding and contributions from federal, state,
and private sources to fund the preservation and restoration of the state's
critical salmon habitat as provided in this chapter and in accordance with the
applicable laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
interagency review team created under RCW 75.46.080 shall submit a list of
unfunded salmon recovery projects to the foundation at least once a year that
have met all the criteria outlined in chapter 75.46 RCW. Based upon available
funding, the foundation shall award grants to those projects submitted by the
interagency review team that have not already been funded in total by other
programs. Where possible, the foundation shall seek to leverage federal funds,
and state funds other than those in the salmon and stream conservation account
created in section 7 of this act, and local, private, and in-kind funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
awarding grants over the ten-year period of the foundation, the foundation
shall ensure to the maximum extent practicable that each water resource
inventory area in the state with a salmon species listed as threatened or
endangered under the federal endangered species act receives grant funding for
important preservation and restoration actions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
salmon and stream conservation account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from funding and contributions from federal, state, and private
sources specified for this purpose must be deposited into the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for reasonable foundation expenses, the preservation
and restoration of the state's critical salmon habitat, and other purposes
consistent with this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act expire June 30, 2009.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 75 RCW.

---
END ---