BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of natural resources manages approximately three million acres of
state trust land for the benefit of: Public common schools; Washington State
University; the University of Washington; Western, Central, and Eastern
Washington Universities; The Evergreen State College; community colleges;
county governments; various state institutions; and the state capitol campus.

Revenues
generated from uses of the trust lands, most importantly timber sales, but also
agricultural, commercial, and mineral leases, provide an important source of
income for the construction and maintenance of the state's public schools.

Over
the past decade, the revenue from the trust lands has provided a continually
diminishing percentage of the funds used to construct this state's public
schools. The legislature must review all options to increase revenues produced
by state trust lands and must find more efficient methods of managing trust
lands.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
joint legislative task force is created. The task force shall consist of: One
representative from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the co-chairs; and one member from each of the
two largest caucuses of the senate, selected by the president of the senate.
The task force shall be staffed by the office of program research and senate
committee services.

(2)
The joint legislative task force shall direct a financial audit of the
department of natural resources and shall ensure that the audit focuses upon
the department's management of state trust lands.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the senate for the purpose of preparing the audit report of the
department of natural resources.

(2)
The sum of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the house of representatives for the purpose of preparing the
audit report of the department of natural resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
task force shall prepare and submit to the legislature, by January 15, 2000, a
report of its findings and recommendations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---