BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the rapidly changing telecommunication market has
resulted in new consumer problems. The legislature finds that consumers of
prepaid calling services are often subject to misleading or deceptive
advertising of these calling services. Changes in remedies and penalties are
needed to provide a more effective deterrent to these practices.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, "prepaid calling services" means a
transaction where a consumer pays for calling services prior to use and the
prepaid account is depleted as a consumer uses the service. It includes
prepaid calling services that require the use of an access number or
authorization code, or services that are acquired by the purchase of a
wallet-sized card known as a prepaid calling card.

(2)
Advertising and visual displays for prepaid calling services must be clear and
accurate. They may not be misleading and must include at least the following:

(a)
Billing increments must be clearly defined. If a company offering prepaid
calling services bills for prepaid calling service usage in unit measurement, a
unit must be defined using both equivalent dollar amounts and time
measurement. Unit billing measurements shall not exceed the equivalent
one-minute rate;

(b)
All applicable rates for intrastate, interstate, and international calls must
be provided on the advertising and visual display. The rates displayed shall
be no more than those approved by the commission in the tariff or price list of
the company at the time of retail purchase; and

(c)
An expiration date for the applicable rates shall be disclosed on the
advertising and visual display.

(3)
If a prepaid calling card is advertised as renewable or rechargeable,
applicable terms and limitations of recharging a card shall be defined legibly
on the prepaid calling card packaging, the prepaid calling card, and the
visible display at the point of sale.

(4)
Companies providing prepaid calling services are subject to and must comply
with all other laws and commission rules relating to the provision of
telecommunication services unless the company has filed for and received a
waiver from the commission.

(5)(a)
The legislature finds that the practices covered by this section are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

(b)
A violation of this section shall result in a civil penalty of not less than
five hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---