BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
1

FINDINGS AND INTENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that state regulation of the telecommunications industry
should focus less on price regulation and more on the promotion of competition.

(2)
The legislature intends that modification of state telecommunications
regulation shall accelerate innovation and promotion of telecommunications
competition by providing a new alternative to rate-based, rate-of-return
regulation and by strengthening enforcement of interconnection agreements and
removing other barriers to competitive entry.

PART
2

NEW PRICE CAP REGULATORY
OPTION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 80.36.135, an incumbent local exchange
carrier may elect to have the rates, terms, and conditions for its basic and
noncompetitive telecommunications services determined under the provisions of
this section.

(b)
Basic telecommunications services are as defined in RCW 80.36.600(7)(b).

(c)
Noncompetitive telecommunications services are telecommunications services
that:

(i)
Are not basic telecommunications services;

(ii)
Have not been determined to be competitive telecommunications services under
RCW 80.36.330; and

(iii)
Have not been presumed to be competitive under subsection (6) of this section.

(d)
For the purposes of this section, an "incumbent local exchange
carrier" as defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 251(h)(1), means, with respect to an
area, the local exchange carrier that:

(i)
On February 8, 1996, provided telephone exchange service in such area; and

(ii)(A)
On February 8, 1996, was deemed to be a member of the exchange carrier
association under section 69.601(b) of the federal communication commission's
regulations (47 C.F.R. 69.601(b)); or

(B)
Is a person or entity that, on or after February 8, 1996, became a successor or
assign of a member described in (d)(ii)(A) of this subsection.

(2)(a)
An incumbent local exchange carrier shall file a notice of its intent with the
commission to be an electing company and to be regulated under this section.

(b)
Upon such a filing, all rates, terms, and conditions for basic and
noncompetitive telecommunications services provided by the incumbent local
exchange carrier that were contained in the tariffs and end-user contracts that
were in effect on January 1, 1999, shall be deemed fair, just, and reasonable.

(c)
An electing company's election to be regulated under this section is permanent
and a return to rate-of-return, rate-based regulation is not permitted. All
liability associated with electing regulation under this section is the
responsibility of the electing company.

(3)
Nothing in this section restricts any customer's right to enforce any quality
of service rules and standards. Not later than one hundred eighty days from
the effective date of this act, the commission shall complete a proceeding to
ensure that all such rules and standards are applied equally to all
telecommunications providers.

(4)
Nothing in this section restricts any telecommunications company's right to
enforce wholesale rules and standards, including, but not limited to, those
contained in carrier-to-carrier contracts regarding pricing of unbundled
network elements and discounts for resold services.

(5)(a)
The monthly rates for basic telecommunications services that were in effect on
January 1, 1999, shall be the maximum amount that an electing company may
charge for basic services.

(b)
The monthly rates for noncompetitive telecommunications services that were in
effect on January 1, 1999, shall be the maximum amount that an electing company
may charge for noncompetitive services for a three-year period following the
date that the electing company filed an election to be regulated under this
section. After this three-year period, the monthly rates for noncompetitive
telecommunications services provided to:

(i)
Residential customers may not be increased by more than fifty cents in any one
year and may not be increased by more than one dollar over any consecutive
three-year period; and

(ii)
Business customers may not be increased by more than one dollar in any one year
and may not be increased by more than two dollars over any consecutive
three-year period.

(c)
An electing company may adjust prices subject to this subsection effective on
ten days' notice, without commission approval, so long as no price exceeds the
maximum amount set by this subsection.

(d)
Monthly rates do not include government-mandated charges, including, but not
limited to, charges imposed for excise or gross receipts taxes, E911 or 911
service, the Washington telephone assistance program, or universal service.

(6)(a)
Whenever an electing company offers a service that was not available in a given
exchange or wire center on the date that the company elected to be regulated
under this section, the subsequent introduction of the service in the exchange
or wire center shall be presumed to be an offering of a competitive
telecommunications service if it is a new service. A new service is a service
that provides a significant difference in transmission speed, capability, or
functionality in comparison to the services that existed in the exchange or
wire center on the date that a company elected to be regulated under this
section.

(b)
The provisions of (a) of this subsection shall not apply if the service
introduced into an exchange or wire center area after the date that a company
elected to be regulated under this section is a basic telecommunications
service.

(7)
Price cap regulation shall replace the current rate-base, rate-of-return form
of regulation by the commission of an electing company. An electing company
shall not be subject to rate-of-return, rate-based regulation, or earnings
review, and the commission shall have no authority in such matters over an
electing company.

(8)
An electing company under this section shall not be subject to the provisions
of the following: RCW 80.04.130 (1) and (2), RCW 80.04.300 through 80.04.360,
chapter 80.16 RCW, RCW 80.36.110, 80.36.140, and 80.36.150 (1) through (4).

Sec.
3. RCW
80.36.330 and 1998 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may classify a telecommunications service provided by a
telecommunications company as a competitive telecommunications service if the
service is subject to effective competition. Effective competition means that
customers of the service have reasonably available alternatives and that the
service is not provided to a significant captive customer base. In determining
whether a service is competitive, factors the commission shall consider include
but are not limited to:

(a)
The number and size of alternative providers of services;

(b)
The extent to which services are available from alternative providers in the
relevant market;

(c)
The ability of alternative providers to make functionally equivalent or
substitute services readily available at competitive rates, terms, and
conditions; and

(d)
Other indicators of market power, which may include market share, growth in
market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of providers of services.

(2)
When the commission finds that a telecommunications company has demonstrated
that a telecommunications service is competitive, the commission may permit the
service to be provided under a price list effective on ten days notice to the
commission and customers. The commission shall prescribe the form of notice.
The commission may adopt procedural rules necessary to implement this section.

(3)
Prices or rates charged for competitive telecommunications services shall cover
their cost. The commission shall determine proper cost standards to implement
this section, provided that in making any assignment of costs or allocating any
revenue requirement, the commission shall act to preserve affordable universal
telecommunications service.

(4)
The commission may investigate prices for competitive telecommunications
services upon complaint. In any complaint proceeding initiated by the
commission, the telecommunications company providing the service shall bear the
burden of proving that the prices charged cover cost, and are fair, just, and
reasonable.

(5)
Telecommunications companies shall provide the commission with all data it
deems necessary to implement this section.

(6)
No losses incurred by a telecommunications company in the provision of
competitive services may be recovered through rates for noncompetitive
services. The commission may order refunds or credits to any class of
subscribers to a noncompetitive telecommunications service which has paid
excessive rates because of below cost pricing of competitive telecommunications
services.

(7)
((The commission may reclassify any competitive telecommunications service
if reclassification would protect the public interest.)) (a) Not sooner
than one year after a service has been classified as competitive, the
commission may, on its own motion or in response to a customer's petition,
reclassify any competitive telecommunications service if:

(i)
The commission finds, after de novo review, that the service in question is no
longer subject to effective competition; and

(ii)
Reclassification would protect the public interest.

(b)
The commission may not reclassify a service that is presumed to be competitive
under section 2(6) of this act.

(c)
If a reclassification is for a service provided by a company that has elected
to be regulated under section 2 of this act, the company may not charge a price
for the reclassified service exceeding the following:

(i)
The amount charged for the service on January 1, 1999, if the reclassification
occurs before January 1, 2002;

(ii)
The amount charged for the service on January 1, 1999, plus an additional one
dollar for each consecutive three-year period following January 1, 2002, if the
reclassification is for a residential service and the reclassification occurs
on or after January 1, 2002; and

(iii)
The amount charged for the service on January 1, 1999, plus an additional two
dollars for each consecutive three-year period following January 1, 2002, if
the reclassification is for a business service and the reclassification occurs
on or after January 1, 2002.

(8)
The commission may waive the requirements of RCW 80.36.170 and 80.36.180 in
whole or in part for a service classified as competitive if it finds that
competition will serve the same purpose and protect the public interest.

(9)
In designating telecommunications services as competitive telecommunications
services for a company that has elected to be regulated under section 2 of this
act:

(a)
The commission may make classifications apply to a particular telephone
exchange or wire center area and to a specific customer class.

(b)
In determining whether a service should be designated as a competitive
telecommunications service for a given telephone exchange or wire center area,
the commission shall give great weight to evidence showing that other
telecommunications companies are offering like or similar services to a
majority of customers located within the relevant customer class and telephone
exchange or wire center area.

(c)
The commission shall enter a final order with respect to any motion or petition
for classification or reclassification of a service within ninety days from the
date of filing.

PART
3

INTERCONNECTION
ENFORCEMENT AND PREVENTING OTHER

ANTICOMPETITIVE
PRACTICES OR ACTS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may handle on an expedited basis, as provided in this section,
any complaint that a telecommunications company has:

(a)
Violated an agreement approved by the commission under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 252(e);
or

(b)
Committed an act or practice which the commission may identify by rule as
serving as a barrier to competitive entry in the telecommunications market.

(2)
A person may file a complaint alleging a violation under subsection (1) of this
section and an application for expedited review with the commission and serve
the respondent with the same.

(3)
The respondent telecommunications company shall have five working days to
answer the complaint and shall file its answer and any other responsive
pleadings with the commission and serve the complainant with the same.

(4)
Within five working days after a complaint and application for expedited review
is filed with the commission, all parties shall serve on each other any
discovery requests for the production of data. Each party shall have fifteen
days to respond to the other party's requests. Any objections to the discovery
requests shall be served on the other party and filed with the commission
within five working days after receipt of the discovery request.

(5)(a)
Once the respondent files an answer to the complaint, the commission or its
designee shall determine within three working days whether to:

(i)
Approve the application for expedited review and begin an expedited
adjudicative proceeding under this section;

(ii)
Deny the application and proceed with a regular adjudicative proceeding under
RCW 80.04.110; or

(iii)
Dismiss the application as frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause.

(b)
If the commission or its designee dismisses the complaint as frivolous and
advanced without reasonable cause, the commission or its designee shall require
the complainant to reimburse the commission and the respondent for costs,
including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred to the date of dismissal in
responding to the complaint.

(6)
In determining whether to approve an application for expedited review, the
commission or its designee shall consider whether the complainant is likely to
suffer irreparable harm in its ability to serve customers if the alleged
violation under subsection (1) of this section continues unabated.

(7)
If an application for expedited review is approved:

(a)
The commission shall designate a commissioner or other person to preside over
the expedited adjudicative proceeding;

(b)
Within fourteen days of approving the application for expedited review, the
presiding officer shall schedule a prehearing conference which may be conducted
by telephone. During the prehearing conference the presiding officer shall:

(i)
Resolve all outstanding discovery disputes and establish a schedule for
completion of any additional discovery; and

(ii)
Confirm that an attempt to resolve the dispute through nonbinding mediation
under section 5 of this act has been or is being conducted;

(c)
The presiding officer shall schedule a hearing to commence within thirty-five
days of the complaint being filed. During the hearing evidence may be
presented by the parties and commission staff both orally and in written form.
Any individual who testifies either orally or in written form must be available
for cross-examination;

(d)
The presiding officer shall issue a recommended decision in written form within
sixty days of the complaint being filed. The presiding officer's recommended
decision shall be based on the facts and no finding of an intent to impede
market entry by a competitor shall be necessary in order to determine that a
violation has occurred. The recommended decision shall set forth the reasoning
for the decision and, if the recommended decision finds that a violation under
subsection (1) of this section has occurred, directions and a deadline for
correcting the violation. The recommended decision shall state the amount of
any penalties imposed under section 6 of this act;

(e)
The commission shall hear the arguments or comments of the parties regarding
the recommended decision at a regular or special open public meeting. The
parties may submit written comments to the commission prior to the meeting
under the schedule established in the recommended decision. The commission shall
conduct this session within ten days after the date of the recommended
decision;

(f)
The commission shall serve a final decision on the parties, in the form of a
commission order, resolving the issues within ten days of the hearing conducted
under (e) of this subsection. The order shall be based on the facts and no
finding of an intent to impede market entry by a competitor shall be necessary
in order to determine that a violation has occurred. The order shall set forth
the reasoning for the final decision and, if the final decision finds that a
violation under subsection (1) of this section has occurred, directions and a
deadline for correcting the violation. The final decision shall state the
amount of any penalties imposed under section 6 of this act;

(g)
Within ten days after the commission serves its order under (f) of this
subsection, the parties may petition for reconsideration. A petition for
reconsideration is denied unless the commission by separate decision grants the
petition within ten days after it is filed, or such longer time established by
the commission secretary. If a party files a petition for reconsideration, the
commission may, in its discretion, request that an answer be filed or call for
additional comments, briefing, evidence, or argument from the parties. Filing
a petition for reconsideration of the order does not stay the effect of the
order.

(8)(a)
In conducting an expedited review of a complaint under this section, the
commission may at any time issue an order granting emergency relief for the
complainant if the commission finds that:

(i)
The respondent has failed to file a timely answer to a complaint, has not met
discovery deadlines, has failed to attend the required mediation session under
section 5 of this act, has failed to attend required hearings, or has otherwise
failed to comply with a request made by the presiding officer or by the
commission;

(ii)
The complainant is likely to suffer irreparable harm in its ability to serve
customers if emergency relief is not granted;

(iii)
The emergency relief sought is technically feasible; and

(iv)
An order granting emergency relief is in the public interest.

(b)
An order for emergency relief shall direct the respondent telecommunications
company to act or refrain from acting as the commission finds necessary to
avoid, prevent, or mitigate the complained of harm. An order for emergency
relief shall set a deadline for the respondent telecommunications company to
comply with the order before penalties are imposed under section 6 of this
act. The order granting emergency relief shall remain in effect until the
commission issues a final order deciding the complaint filed under subsection
(2) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the commission or its designee approves an application for expedited
review of a complaint under section 4 of this act, the commission or its
designee shall conduct at least one mediation session with the parties.

(2)
The mediation session shall be held no later than the date scheduled for a
prehearing conference under section 4(7) of this act. An individual with
authority to negotiate and settle the matter shall be present from each party.

(3)
The mediation session shall be confidential and any verbal statements made
during the session shall not be disclosed.

(4)
Any agreement of the parties resolving any disputed issue shall be submitted to
the mediator for approval. Approval shall be granted unless the mediator finds
that the agreement is based upon a mistake in material fact or that the
agreement is not in the public interest. The approved agreement shall be
deemed to constitute a final order of the commission, unless the commission enters
its own order within six working days following the mediator's approval of the
agreement.

(5)
Any agreement or order resolving a dispute through mediation shall be
considered part of the public record and shall be made available by the
commission upon request.

(6)
Willful or negligent failure to attend the mediation conference or to comply
with the mediator's directions shall be reported to the mediator or the
commission in writing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the commission or its designee finds that a violation under section 4(1) of
this act has occurred, the commission may impose a penalty. Additionally, the
commission or its designee may impose a penalty for each day that a violation
continues beyond the deadline set in the final decision issued under section
4(7) of this act.

(2)
If parties are able to resolve a dispute through mediation, as provided in
section 5 of this act, there shall be no initial assessment of penalties.
However, if a violation is not corrected by the date specified in any mediation
agreement, the commission or its designee may impose a penalty for each day
beyond the specified date that a violation continues.

(3)
If the commission issues an order granting emergency relief under section 4(8)
of this act and the respondent telecommunications company fails to comply with
the deadline set in that order, then the commission or its designee may impose
a penalty for each day beyond the deadline that noncompliance continues.

(4)
In determining the amount of any penalties imposed under subsections (1)
through (3) of this section, the commission or its designee shall take into
account the appropriateness of the penalties with respect to the gravity of the
violation, the size of the respondent telecommunications company's Washington
operations, and the respondent telecommunications company's history of previous
violations. In no case shall penalties imposed per violation exceed one-half
of one percent of a respondent telecommunications company's gross revenues from
its Washington operations during the previous year. If a respondent Washington
telecommunications company had no Washington operations during the previous year,
then penalties imposed per violation under this section shall not exceed five
thousand dollars. For purposes of this section, "violation" means
all related matters alleged in a complaint filed under section 4 of this act.

(5)
Any imposition of penalties shall be by order of the commission, after
providing for notice and a hearing.

(6)
Penalties imposed under this section are in lieu of penalties available under
RCW 80.04.380 but in addition to any monetary payments ordered by the
commission under an interconnection agreement and shall not restrict a
complainant's ability to recover damages under any other remedy that may be
available under any other provision of state or federal law.

(7)
Payment of penalties imposed under this section shall be paid into the treasury
of the state and credited to the state general fund within thirty days of
issuance by the commission of an order imposing penalties. The commission may
petition a court of competent jurisdiction for enforcement of its order
requiring payment of penalties imposed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To the extent that the provisions of this section and sections 4 through 6 of this
act may differ with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, the provisions of this section and sections 4 through 6 of this
act shall govern.

(2)
In implementing the provisions of this section and sections 4 through 6 of this
act, the commission may:

(a)
Adopt rules as needed; and

(b)
Obtain external resources and contract for outside persons to serve as
presiding officers, mediators, or consultants for the purposes of facilitating
the prompt disposition of expedited proceedings authorized under section 4 of
this act.

PART
4

MISCELLANEOUS
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---