BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that services to people with developmental disabilities
should reflect the principle of personal choice in selecting appropriate
community residential services.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall conduct a pilot project to
test an alternative service delivery model for services to persons with
autism. The department shall select a pilot site using the request for
proposal process. The department shall evaluate the project and report its
findings and conclusions by December 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of two hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of social
and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to carry out the
purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of three hundred seventy thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of social
and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act expires January 1, 2002.

---
END ---