BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.325.030 and 1990 c 33 s 340 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created a fund on deposit with each county treasurer for each
school district of the county having an associated student body as defined in
RCW 28A.325.020. Such fund shall be known as the associated student body
program fund. Rules and regulations promulgated by the superintendent of
public instruction under RCW 28A.325.020 shall require separate accounting for
each associated student body's transactions in the school district's associated
student body program fund.

(2)
All moneys generated through the programs and activities of any associated
student body shall be deposited in the associated student body program fund.
Such funds may be invested for the sole benefit of the associated student body
program fund in items enumerated in RCW 28A.320.320 and the county treasurer
may assess a fee as provided therein. Disbursements from such fund shall be
under the control and supervision, and with the approval, of the board of
directors of the school district, and shall be by warrant as provided in
chapter 28A.350 RCW: PROVIDED, That in no case shall such warrants be issued
in an amount greater than the funds on deposit with the county treasurer in the
associated student body program fund. To facilitate the payment of
obligations, an imprest bank account or accounts may be created and replenished
from the associated student body program fund.

(3)
The associated student body program fund shall be budgeted by the associated
student body, subject to approval by the board of directors of the school
district. All disbursements from the associated student body program fund or
any imprest bank account established thereunder shall have the prior approval
of the appropriate governing body representing the associated student body.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 43.09.210, it shall not be mandatory that
expenditures from the district's general fund in support of associated student
body programs and activities be reimbursed by payments from the associated
student body program fund.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall prevent those portions of student-generated
moneys in the associated student body program fund, budgeted or otherwise,
which constitute bona fide voluntary donations and are identified as donations
at the time of collection from being used for such scholarship, student
exchange and charitable purposes as the appropriate governing body representing
the associated student body shall determine, and for such purposes, said moneys
shall not be deemed public moneys under section 7, Article VIII, of the state
Constitution.

(5)
Nonassociated student body program fund moneys generated and received by
students for private purposes, including but not limited to use for scholarship
and/or charitable purposes, may, in the discretion of the board of directors of
any school district, be held in trust in one or more separate accounts within
an associated student body program fund and be disbursed for such purposes:
PROVIDED, That the school district shall either withhold an amount from such moneys
as will pay the district for its cost in providing the service or otherwise be
compensated for its cost for such service.

(6) Nothing in this section precludes the school board from
authorizing associated student body activities to generate moneys for support
of the poor and infirm, including assisting students who experience tragedies
that cause a financial burden, or who face serious illness.

---
END ---