BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
lottery game is created to fund teacher training, professional staff
development, and continuing education, and designed to improve the ability of
teachers to assist students in meeting essential academic requirements,
designed to achieve state and local accountability in education goals, and
consistent with school or district improvement plans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
To receive funds from the account created under this act, districts and schools
must certify through a superintendent or principal that the funds will be
applied to accomplish the purposes of this act.

(2)
To be eligible for continued funding, districts and schools must certify having
analyzed the use of the lottery funds for professional development and effective
teacher improvement.

(3)
School districts receiving lottery funds under this act shall develop, update
as necessary, and retain on file a teacher training plan that:

(a)
Achieves the stated goals of this act;

(b)
Implements an assessment system for measuring the effectiveness of the plan;
and

(c)
Delineates how the lottery funds will be used to accomplish the requirements of
this section.

(4)
Funding under this act shall not become a part of the state's basic program of
education obligation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
teacher training account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from
the lottery game created under this act must be deposited into this account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for teacher training, and teacher training plans,
as described in this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added to chapter 67.70 RCW.

---
END ---