BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.20.020 and 1991 c 3 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Aged person" means a person of the age sixty-five years or more, or
a person of less than sixty-five years who by reason of infirmity requires
domiciliary care.

(2)
"Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however named,
which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or implied
purpose of providing board and domiciliary care to three or more aged persons
not related by blood or marriage to the operator. It shall not include
facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor
any home, institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and
regulated under the provisions of state law providing specifically for the
licensing and regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor
shall it include any independent senior housing, independent living units in
continuing care retirement communities, or other similar living situations
including those subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.
Nor shall it include any unit occupied by an independent resident not
receiving domiciliary care, regardless of whether that unit is otherwise
included in the licensed room capacity of the facility.

(3)
"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of health.

(6)
"Authorized department" means any city, county, city-county health
department or health district authorized by the secretary of health to carry
out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.20.020 and 1998 c 272 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Aged person" means a person of the age sixty-five years or more, or
a person of less than sixty-five years who by reason of infirmity requires
domiciliary care.

(2)
"Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however named,
which is advertised, announced, or maintained for the express or implied
purpose of providing board and domiciliary care to three or more aged persons
not related by blood or marriage to the operator. It shall not include
facilities certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor
any home, institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and
regulated under the provisions of state law providing specifically for the
licensing and regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor
shall it include any independent senior housing, independent living units in
continuing care retirement communities, or other similar living situations
including those subsidized by the department of housing and urban development.
Nor shall it include any unit occupied by an independent resident not
receiving domiciliary care, regardless of whether that unit is otherwise
included in the licensed room capacity of the facility.

(3)
"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(6)
"Authorized department" means any city, county, city-county health
department or health district authorized by the secretary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2000, unless extended by the legislature.

---
END ---