BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

HOUSING

Sec.
101. RCW
19.85.011 and 1994 c 249 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that administrative rules adopted by state agencies can have
a disproportionate impact on the state's small businesses, particularly
those providing housing, because of the size of those businesses and the
regulations imposed upon them. This disproportionate impact reduces
competition, innovation, employment, and new employment opportunities, and
threatens the very existence of some small businesses. Further, because
most providers of housing are small businesses, this disproportionate impact
upon them significantly reduces the availability of housing to Washington
residents, particularly those with lower incomes and middle incomes. The
legislature therefore enacts the Regulatory Fairness Act with the intent of
reducing the disproportionate impact of state administrative rules on small
business and housing.

Sec.
102. RCW
19.85.020 and 1994 c 249 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
through this chapter.

(1)
"Small business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that is owned
and operated independently from all other businesses, that has the purpose of
making a profit, and that has fifty or fewer employees.

(2)
"Small business economic impact statement" means a statement meeting
the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state agency pursuant to RCW
19.85.030.

(3)
"Industry" means all of the businesses in this state in any one
four-digit standard industrial classification as published by the United States
department of commerce. However, if the use of a four-digit standard
industrial classification would result in the release of data that would
violate state confidentiality laws, "industry" means all businesses
in a three-digit standard industrial classification.

(4)
"Housing" means residential housing that is rented or owned by a
person or household.

(5)
"Housing impact statement" means a statement meeting the requirements
of RCW 19.85.040 prepared by a state agency pursuant to RCW 19.85.030.

(6)
"Provider of housing" means a business that engages, in whole or in
any part, in the development and building of housing.

(7)
"Significant adverse impact on housing" means causing an increase of
five percent or more on the cost on housing, or on the cost of a component of
housing.

Sec.
103. RCW
19.85.025 and 1997 c 409 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless an agency receives a written objection to the expedited repeal of a
rule, this chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited repeal
pursuant to RCW 34.05.354. If an agency receives a written objection to
expedited repeal of the rule, this chapter applies to the rule-making
proceeding.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to a rule proposed for expedited adoption under RCW
34.05.230 (1) through (8), unless a written objection is timely filed with the
agency and the objection is not withdrawn.

(3)
This chapter does not apply to the adoption of a rule described in RCW
34.05.310(4).

(4)
An agency is not required to prepare a separate small business economic impact
statement or a housing impact statement under RCW 19.85.040 if it
prepared an analysis under RCW 34.05.328 that meets the requirements of a small
business economic impact statement or a housing impact statement,
respectively, and if the agency reduced the costs imposed by the rule on
small business or the significant adverse impact on housing to the
extent required by RCW 19.85.030(3). The portion of the analysis that meets
the requirements of RCW 19.85.040 shall be filed with the code reviser and
provided to any person requesting it in lieu of a separate small business
economic impact statement or housing impact statement.

Sec.
104. RCW
19.85.030 and 1995 c 403 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency shall prepare:

(a)
A small business economic impact statement: (((a))) (i) If
the proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an
industry; or (((b))) (ii) if requested to do so by a majority
vote of the joint administrative rules review committee within forty-five days
of receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320; or

(b)
A housing impact statement if the proposed rule will have a significant adverse
impact on housing. However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule
process as defined by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed
rule, the agency is not required to prepare a small business economic impact
statement or a housing impact statement.

An
agency shall prepare the small business economic impact statement or housing
impact statement in accordance with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the
code reviser along with the notice required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency
shall file a statement prepared at the request of the joint administrative
rules review committee with the code reviser upon its completion before the
adoption of the rule. An agency shall provide a copy of the small business
economic impact statement or housing impact statement to any person
requesting it.

((An
agency may request assistance from the business assistance center in the
preparation of the small business economic impact statement.)) If a
housing impact statement is required to be prepared, it may be included as a
component of a small business economic impact statement.

(2)
The ((business assistance center)) department of community, trade,
and economic development, in consultation with the governor's housing advisory
board, shall develop guidelines to assist agencies in determining whether a
proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on businesses in an industry,
or create a significant adverse impact on housing, and therefore require
preparation of a small business economic impact statement or a housing
impact statement. The ((business assistance center)) department
of community, trade, and economic development may review an agency
determination that a proposed rule will not impose such costs or have such
an impact, and shall advise the joint administrative rules review committee
on disputes involving agency determinations under this section.

(3)
Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small business or the
extent of the significant adverse impact on housing identified in the
statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the agency shall, where legal and
feasible in meeting the stated objectives of the statutes upon which the rule
is based, reduce the costs imposed by the rule on small businesses or reduce
the significant adverse impact on housing. Methods to reduce the costs on
small businesses or reduce the significant adverse impact on housing may
include:

(a)
Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory requirements;

(b)
Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating record keeping and reporting
requirements;

(c)
Reducing the frequency of inspections;

(d)
Delaying compliance timetables;

(e)
Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or

(f)
Any other mitigation techniques.

Sec.
105. RCW
19.85.040 and 1995 c 403 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A small business economic impact statement and housing impact statement
must include a brief description of the reporting, record keeping, and other
compliance requirements of the proposed rule, and the kinds of professional
services that a small business or provider of housing is likely to need
in order to comply with such requirements. It shall analyze the costs of
compliance for businesses or providers of housing required to comply
with the proposed rule adopted pursuant to RCW 34.05.320, including costs of
equipment, supplies, labor, financing, and increased administrative
costs. It shall consider, based on input received, whether compliance with the
rule will cause businesses or providers of housing to lose sales or
revenue. To determine whether the proposed rule will have a disproportionate
impact on small businesses or the affordability of housing, the impact
statement must compare the cost of compliance for small business or
providers of housing with the cost of compliance for the ten percent of
businesses or providers of housing that are the largest businesses or
providers of housing required to comply with the proposed rules using one
or more of the following as a basis for comparing costs:

(a)
Cost per employee;

(b)
Cost per hour of labor; ((or))

(c)
Cost per one hundred dollars of sales; or

(d)
Cost per unit of housing.

(2)
((A small business economic)) An impact statement must also
include:

(a)
A statement of the steps taken by the agency to reduce the costs of the rule on
small businesses or providers of housing as required by RCW
19.85.030(3), or reasonable justification for not doing so, addressing the
options listed in RCW 19.85.030(3);

(b)
A description of how the agency will involve small businesses or providers
of housing in the development of the rule; and

(c)
A list of industries that will be required to comply with the rule. However,
this subsection (2)(c) shall not be construed to preclude application of the
rule to any business or industry to which it would otherwise apply.

(3)
To obtain information for purposes of this section, an agency may survey a
representative sample of affected businesses or trade associations and should,
whenever possible, appoint a committee under RCW 34.05.310(2) to assist in the
accurate assessment of the costs of a proposed rule, and the means to reduce
the costs imposed on small business or providers of housing.

Sec.
106. RCW
19.85.050 and 1989 c 175 s 74 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within one year after June 10, 1982, each agency shall publish and deliver to
the office of financial management and to all persons who make requests of the
agency for a copy of a plan to periodically review all rules then in effect and
which have been issued by the agency which have an economic impact on more than
twenty percent of all industries or ten percent of the businesses in any one
industry. Such plan may be amended by the agency at any time by publishing a
revision to the review plan and delivering such revised plan to the office of
financial management and to all persons who make requests of the agency for the
plan. The purpose of the review is to determine whether such rules should be
continued without change or should be amended or rescinded, consistent with the
stated objectives of applicable statutes, to minimize the economic impact on
small businesses and providers of housing as described by this chapter.
The plan shall provide for the review of all such agency rules in effect on
June 10, 1982, within ten years of that date.

(2)
In reviewing rules to minimize any significant economic impact of the rule on
small businesses and any significant adverse impact on housing as
described by this chapter, and in a manner consistent with the stated
objectives of applicable statutes, the agency shall consider the following
factors:

(a)
The continued need for the rule;

(b)
The nature of complaints or comments received concerning the rule from the
public;

(c)
The complexity of the rule;

(d)
The extent to which the rule overlaps, duplicates, or conflicts with other
state or federal rules, and, to the extent feasible, with local governmental
rules; and

(e)
The degree to which technology, economic conditions, or other factors have
changed in the subject area affected by the rule.

(3)
Each year each agency shall publish a list of rules which are to be reviewed
pursuant to this section during the next twelve months and deliver a copy of
the list to the office of financial management and all persons who make
requests of the agency for the list. The list shall include a brief
description of the legal basis for each rule as described by RCW 34.05.360, and
shall invite public comment upon the rule.

Sec.
107. RCW
19.85.070 and 1992 c 197 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When
any rule is proposed for which a small business economic impact statement or
a housing impact statement is required, the adopting agency shall provide
notice to small businesses or providers of housing of the proposed rule
through any of the following:

(1)
Direct notification of known interested small businesses, providers of
housing, or trade organizations affected by the proposed rule; or

(2)
Providing information of the proposed rule making to publications likely to be
obtained by small businesses or providers of housing of the types
affected by the proposed rule.

PART
II

MANUFACTURED
HOUSING

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. The
legislature finds that limiting competition for housing types, manufacturing
methods, and housing designs stifles housing choices, arbitrarily reduces
competition, and increases costs which in turn reduces housing affordability.
These restrictions on the siting of manufactured housing go beyond regulations
needed to adequately protect the life and safety of the citizens of the state.
The legislature further finds that manufactured housing built to federal
standards should not be prohibited or restrained beyond restraints or
prohibitions placed on site-built single-family residences, either through
personal or public restrictions, and that any such restrictions are contrary to
the public policy of the state that encourages housing affordability and consumer
choice absent restraint of trade by private or public entities.

The
legislature recognizes that federal standards for manufactured housing
supersedes state and local building and energy codes and that compliance with
state or local building or energy codes as a requirement for issuing a permit
for siting a manufactured housing unit may not be required as a condition for
allowing manufactured homes in the state.

Sec.
202. RCW
35.63.110 and 1965 c 7 s 35.63.110 are each amended to read as follows:

For
any or all of such purposes the council or board, on recommendation of its
commission, may divide the municipality or any portion thereof into districts
of such size, shape and area, or may establish such official maps, or development
plans for the whole or any portion of the municipality as may be deemed best
suited to carry out the purposes of this chapter and within such districts it
may regulate and restrict the erection, construction, reconstruction,
alteration, repair or use of buildings, structures, or land.

However,
in any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to
land use regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on
individual lots in such districts. This section does not prevent the adoption
of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such
regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and
designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35.63.160.

Sec.
203. RCW
35.63.160 and 1988 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Each comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of
manufactured homes on individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city
of the need and demand for such homes. The review shall be completed by
December 31, 1990.

(2)
For the purpose of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to
allow manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A
"designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home constructed
after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal requirements for manufactured
homes, which:

(a)
Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less
than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b)
Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or
shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal
3:12 pitch; and

(c)
Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on
conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(((3)))
(2) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any
manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local standards
which differ from the designated manufactured home as described in this
section, except that the term "designated manufactured home" shall
not be used except as defined in subsection (((2))) (1) of this
section.

Sec.
204. RCW
35A.63.100 and 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

After
approval of the comprehensive plan, as set forth above, the legislative body,
in developing the municipality and in regulating the use of land, may implement
or give effect to the comprehensive plan or parts thereof by ordinance or other
action to such extent as the legislative body deems necessary or appropriate.
Such ordinances or other action may provide for:

(1)
Adoption of an official map and regulations relating thereto designating
locations and requirements for one or more of the following: Streets, parks,
public buildings, and other public facilities, and protecting such sites
against encroachment by buildings and other physical structures.

(2)
Dividing the municipality, or portions thereof, into appropriate zones within
which specific standards, requirements, and conditions may be provided for
regulating the use of public and private land, buildings, and structures, and
the location, height, bulk, number of stories, and size of buildings and
structures, size of yards, courts, open spaces, density of population, ratio of
land area to the area of buildings and structures, setbacks, area required for
off-street parking, protection of access to direct sunlight for solar energy
systems, and such other standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures as
are appropriately related thereto. The ordinance encompassing the matters of
this subsection is hereinafter called the "zoning ordinance". No
zoning ordinance, or amendment thereto, shall be enacted by the legislative
body without at least one public hearing, notice of which shall be given as set
forth in RCW 35A.63.070. Such hearing may be held before the planning agency
or the board of adjustment or such other body as the legislative body shall
designate.

However,
in any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35A.63.145, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to
land use regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on
individual lots in such districts. This section does not prevent the adoption
of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such
regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and
designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35A.63.145.

(3)
Adoption of design standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures for the
subdivision of land into two or more parcels, including, but not limited to,
the approval of plats, dedications, acquisitions, improvements, and reservation
of sites for public use.

(4)
Scheduling public improvements on the basis of recommended priorities over a
period of years, subject to periodic review.

(5)
Such other matters as may be otherwise authorized by law or as the legislative
body deems necessary or appropriate to effectuate the goals and objectives of
the comprehensive plan or parts thereof and the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
205. RCW
35A.63.145 and 1988 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Each comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of
manufactured homes on individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city
of the need and demand for such homes. The review shall be completed by
December 31, 1990.

(2)
For the purpose of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to
allow manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A
"designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home constructed after
June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal requirements for
manufactured homes, which:

(a)
Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less
than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b)
Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or
shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal
3:12 pitch; and

(c)
Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on
conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(((3)))
(2) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any
manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local standards
which differ from the designated manufactured home as described in this
section, except that the term "designated manufactured home" shall
not be used except as defined in subsection (((2))) (1) of this
section.

Sec.
206. RCW
36.70.750 and 1963 c 4 s 36.70.750 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
board, by ordinance, may establish classifications, within each of which,
specific controls are identified, and which will:

(1)
Regulate the use of buildings, structures, and land as between agriculture,
industry, business, residence, and other purposes.

However,
in any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160, that are thermally equivalent
to the state energy code, shall be sited on individual lots subject only to land
use regulations applicable to all other single-family residences on individual
lots in such districts. This subsection does not prevent the adoption of home
design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility provided such
regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state building code and
designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35.63.160;

(2)
Regulate location, height, bulk, number of stories and size of buildings and
structures; the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces; the density of
population; the percentage of a lot which may be occupied by buildings and
structures; and the area required to provide off-street facilities for the
parking of motor vehicles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Any
city or county that plans or elects to plan under this chapter must allow in
any zoning district for single-family residences, single-family designated
manufactured homes as defined in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145 that
are thermally equivalent to the state energy code, to be sited on individual
lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all other single-family
residences on individual lots in such districts. This section does not prevent
the adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility
provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state
building code and designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 43.63B.010,
35.63.160, or 35A.63.145.

PART
III

GROWTH
MANAGEMENT

Sec.
301. RCW
36.70A.010 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that uncoordinated and unplanned growth, together with a lack
of common goals expressing the public's interest in the conservation and the
wise use of our lands, pose a threat to the environment, sustainable economic
development, and the health, safety, and high quality of life enjoyed by
residents of this state. The legislature also finds that private property
rights should be protected. It is in the public interest that citizens,
communities, local governments, and the private sector cooperate and coordinate
with one another in comprehensive land use planning. Further, the legislature
finds that it is in the public interest that economic development programs be
shared with communities experiencing insufficient economic growth.

Sec.
302. RCW
36.70A.020 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following goals are adopted to guide the development and adoption of
comprehensive plans and development regulations of those counties and cities
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040. The following goals
are not listed in order of priority and shall be used exclusively for the
purpose of guiding the development of comprehensive plans and development
regulations:

(1)
Urban growth. Encourage development in urban areas where adequate public
facilities and services exist or can be provided in an efficient manner.

(2)
Reduce sprawl. Reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land ((into
sprawling, low-density development)).

(3)
Transportation. Encourage efficient multimodal transportation systems that are
based on regional priorities and coordinated with county and city comprehensive
plans.

(4)
Housing. Encourage the availability of affordable housing to all economic
segments of the population of this state, promote a variety of residential
densities and housing types, and encourage preservation of existing housing
stock.

(5)
Economic development. Encourage economic development throughout the state that
is consistent with adopted comprehensive plans, promote economic opportunity
for all citizens of this state, ((especially for)) including
unemployed and ((for)) disadvantaged persons, and encourage growth in
areas experiencing insufficient economic growth((, all within the capacities
of the state's natural resources, public services, and public facilities)).

(6)
Property rights. Private property shall not be taken for public use without
just compensation having been made. The property rights of landowners shall be
protected from arbitrary and discriminatory actions.

(7)
Permits. Applications for both state and local government permits should be
processed in a timely and fair manner to ensure predictability. Counties
and cities shall issue permits for single-family residential construction
within seven business days of application. Counties and cities shall issue
permits for multifamily construction within thirty days of application.
Counties and cities shall issue permits for short-plat applications within
thirty days of application and long-subdivision applications within ninety days
of application.

(8)
Natural resource industries. Maintain ((and enhance)) natural
resource-based industries, including productive timber, agricultural, and
fisheries industries. Encourage the conservation of productive forest lands
and productive agricultural lands((, and discourage incompatible uses)).

(9)
Open space and recreation. Encourage the retention of open space and
development of recreational opportunities, conserve fish and wildlife habitat,
increase access to natural resource lands and water, and develop parks.

(10)
Environment. Protect the environment from hazards and nuisances and ((enhance))
maintain the state's high quality of life, including air and water
quality, and the availability of water.

(11)
Citizen participation and coordination. Encourage the involvement of citizens
in the planning process and ensure coordination between ((communities)) property
owners and jurisdictions to reconcile conflicts.

(12)
Public facilities and services. Ensure that those public facilities and
services necessary to support development shall be ((adequate)) planned
to ((serve)) provide services to the development at the time the
development is available for occupancy ((and use without decreasing current
service levels below locally established minimum standards)). A city
that operates public facilities and services shall serve within its service
area if service is technically feasible and in compliance with local
regulations.

A
city that provides water or sewer service outside the corporate boundaries of
the city shall not require, as a condition of providing water or sewer service,
the property owner who has requested water or sewer service to agree to:

(a)
Lot sizes different from those required by the jurisdiction with zoning
authority over the property; or

(b)
Other development or design requirements not required by the local government
with jurisdiction over the property.

(13)
Historic preservation. Identify and encourage the preservation of lands,
sites, and structures, that have historical or archaeological significance.

(14)
Equal protection of property owners' rights. Property owners have the prospective
right to those existing uses of similar adjacent properties within the same
zoning designation.

Sec.
303. RCW
36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use
plan.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial
production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary,
vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed,
Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term
commercial significance for agricultural production.

(3)
"City" means any city or town, including a code city.

(4)
"Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or
"plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of
the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(5)
"Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a)
Wetlands, limited to the United States army corps of engineers' definition
of wetlands, as now existing or subsequently amended under its authority, under
section 401 of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344; (b) areas with a documented
critical ((recharging)) recharge effect ((on)) that is necessary
for the health and sanitation of aquifers used for potable water; (c) fish
and wildlife habitat conservation areas as limited in chapter 75.20 RCW;
(d) frequently flooded areas no larger than areas within one hundred year
flood plains under Title 86 RCW; and (e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7)
"Development regulations" or "regulation" means the
controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city, ((including,
but not limited to,)) zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances,
shoreline master programs, shoreline management act provisions or
official controls, ((planned unit development ordinances, subdivision
ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any amendments
thereto)) each with their own separate approval processes. A
development regulation ((does not)) includes ((a)) the
decision to approve a project permit application, ((as defined in)) notwithstanding
RCW 36.70B.020, even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or
ordinance of the legislative body of the county or city.

(8)
"Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and
practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to
the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has
long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is primarily
devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production on land
that can be economically and practically managed for such production, the
following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to urban,
suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9)
"Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their
susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are
not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development
consistent with public health or safety concerns. The county or city has
the burden of proving geologically hazardous areas exist and cannot safely
support development. The cost of this burden shall not be borne by the
property owner.

(10)
"Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity,
productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial
production, in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas,
and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(13)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, and recreation((,
environmental protection, and other governmental services)).

(14)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a)
In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the
built environment;

(b)
That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and
opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;

(c)
That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and
communities;

(d)
That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and
wildlife habitat;

(e)
That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low‑density development;

(f)
That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g)
That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and
ground water and surface water recharge and discharge areas.

(15)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(16)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(17)
"Service area" means a specific geographic area serviced or for
which service is planned by a purveyor.

(18)
"Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for
the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to ((such a
degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of
food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral
resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as
provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread
over wide areas, urban growth)) provide for housing, business, and
commerce, which typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land ((having)) that:
(a) Has urban growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to
an area with urban growth on it ((as to be appropriate for urban growth));
or (b) is so located in relationship to facilities, infrastructure, and
services as to make urban growth on the land feasible through public or private
extensions of service.

(((18)))
(19) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a
county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19)))
(20) "Urban governmental services" or "urban
services" include those public services and public facilities at an
intensity historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning
services, fire and police protection services, public transit services, and
other public utilities associated with urban areas ((and normally not
associated with rural areas)).

(((20)))
(21) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and
duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar areas. Wetlands are
limited to wetlands under the United States army corps of engineers' definition
under section 401 of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1344, as now existing
or hereafter amended. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands
intentionally created from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to,
irrigation and drainage ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention
facilities, wastewater treatment facilities, farm ponds, and landscape
amenities, or those wetlands created after July 1, 1990, that were
unintentionally created as a result of the construction of a road, street, or
highway. Wetlands may include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland areas created to mitigate conversion of wetlands.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. The
department of ecology shall expeditiously and summarily waive the water quality
certification process of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341, as now
existing or hereafter amended.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. Land
developing under this chapter is exempt from RCW 76.09.050. For
the purposes of this section, "land developing" means the division or
platting of land in preparation for development or the actual building,
constructing, or erecting of residences or commercial buildings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306.
Critical areas shall be regulated only for the limited purpose of protecting
the public's health and safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307.
Development regulations shall only be adopted for the limited purpose of
protecting the public's health and safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. Geologically
hazardous areas are not restricted from development activities unless a city or
county meets its burden to prove that the identified geologic conditions
preclude the safe siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309.
Outside an established urban growth area, if a project applicant has an
approved water system and an approval for sewer or a septic tank system, the
city or county shall issue permits necessary for building single-family
residences.

Sec.
310. RCW
36.70A.050 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the definitions provided in RCW 36.70A.030, the department shall
adopt guidelines, under chapter 34.05 RCW, no later than September 1, 1990, and
shall amend these guidelines to conform to this chapter by December 31, 1999,
to guide the classification of: (a) Agricultural lands; (b) forest lands; (c)
mineral resource lands; and (d) critical areas. The department shall consult
with the department of agriculture regarding guidelines for agricultural lands,
the department of natural resources regarding forest lands and mineral resource
lands, and the department of ecology regarding critical areas.

(2)
In carrying out its duties under this section, the department shall consult
with interested parties, including but not limited to: (a) Representatives of
cities; (b) representatives of counties; (c) representatives of developers; (d)
representatives of builders; (e) representatives of owners of agricultural
lands, forest lands, and mining lands; (f) representatives of local economic development
officials; (g) representatives of environmental organizations; (h)
representatives of special districts; (i) representatives of the governor's
office and federal and state agencies; and (j) representatives of Indian
tribes. In addition to the consultation required under this subsection, the
department shall conduct public hearings in the various regions of the state.
The department shall consider the public input obtained at such public hearings
when adopting the guidelines.

(3)
The guidelines under subsection (1) of this section shall ((be minimum
guidelines that)) apply to all jurisdictions((, but also shall allow for
regional differences that exist in Washington state)). The intent of these
guidelines is to assist counties and cities in designating the classification
of agricultural lands, forest lands, mineral resource lands, and critical areas
under RCW 36.70A.170. Counties and cities may not designate lands as
resource lands or critical areas that do not qualify under the guidelines.

(4)
The guidelines established by the department under this section regarding
classification of forest lands shall not be inconsistent with guidelines
adopted by the department of natural resources.

Sec.
311. RCW
36.70A.060 and 1998 c 286 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, and each
city within such county, shall adopt development regulations on or before
September 1, 1991, to assure the conservation of agricultural, forest, and
mineral resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170. Regulations adopted
under this subsection may not prohibit uses legally existing on any parcel
prior to their adoption and shall remain in effect until the county or city adopts
development regulations pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040. ((Such regulations
shall assure that the use of lands adjacent to agricultural, forest, or mineral
resource lands shall not interfere with the continued use, in the accustomed
manner and in accordance with best management practices, of these designated
lands for the production of food, agricultural products, or timber, or for the
extraction of minerals.)) Counties and cities shall require that all
plats, short plats, development permits, and building permits issued for
development activities on, or within five hundred feet of, lands designated as
agricultural lands, forest lands, or mineral resource lands, contain a notice
that the subject property is within or near designated agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands on which a variety of commercial activities
may occur that are not compatible with residential development for certain
periods of limited duration. The notice for mineral resource lands shall also
inform that an application might be made for mining-related activities,
including mining, extraction, washing, crushing, stockpiling, blasting,
transporting, and recycling of minerals.

(2)
Each county and city shall adopt development regulations that protect critical
areas from hazards and health and safety risks that are required to be
designated under RCW 36.70A.170. For counties and cities that are required or
choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, such development regulations shall be
adopted on or before September 1, 1991. For the remainder of the counties and
cities, such development regulations shall be adopted on or before March 1,
1992, but cities and counties shall amend their development regulations to
conform with this chapter by December 1, 1999.

(3)
Such counties and cities shall review these designations and development
regulations when adopting their comprehensive plans under RCW 36.70A.040 and
implementing development regulations under RCW 36.70A.120 ((and may alter
such designations and development regulations to insure consistency)).

(4)
Forest land and agricultural land located within urban growth areas shall not
be designated by a county or city as forest land or agricultural land of
long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170 ((unless the city or
county has enacted a program authorizing transfer or purchase of development
rights)).

Sec.
312. RCW
36.70A.070 and 1998 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text
covering objectives, principles, and standards used to develop the
comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an internally consistent document and
all elements shall be consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive
plan shall be adopted and amended with public participation as provided in RCW
36.70A.140.

Each
comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the
following:

(1)
A land use element designating the proposed general distribution and general
location and extent of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture,
timber production, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces,
general aviation airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land
uses. ((The land use element shall include population densities, building
intensities, and estimates of future population growth. The land use element
shall provide for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used
for public water supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or
cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including Puget
Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.))

(2)
A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of established
residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of
existing and projected housing needs; (b) includes a statement of goals,
policies, objectives, and mandatory provisions for the preservation,
improvement, and development of housing, including single-family residences;
(c) identifies sufficient land for housing((, including, but not limited to,
government-assisted housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured
housing, multifamily housing, and group homes and foster care facilities));
and (d) makes adequate provisions for existing and projected needs of all
economic segments of the community, except that counties and cities shall
not require private projects to include low-income housing as a condition of
issuing a permit or granting a land-use approval.

(3)
A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing
capital facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and
capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for
such capital facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded
or new capital facilities; and (d) at least a six-year plan that will
finance such capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly
identifies sources of public money for such purposes((; and (e) a
requirement to reassess the land use element if probable funding falls short of
meeting existing needs and to ensure that the land use element, capital
facilities plan element, and financing plan within the capital facilities plan
element are coordinated and consistent)).

(4)
A utilities element consisting of the general location, proposed location, and
capacity of all existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to,
electrical lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5)
Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element ((including lands
that are not designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral
resources)). The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a)
Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances
vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and
uses, a county may consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written
record explaining how the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW
36.70A.020 and meets the requirements of this chapter.

(b)
Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry,
and agriculture in rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety
of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental
services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve
a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering,
density transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative
techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are
not characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural
character. For the purposes of this subsection, "compatible with the
rural character of such lands" means development of less than ten
single-family residential units by a property owner.

(c)
Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall include measures
that apply to rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as
established by the county, by:

(i)
Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii)
Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural
area;

(iii)
Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development in the rural area;

(iv)
Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and
ground water resources; and

(v)
Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral
resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d)
Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements
of this subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this
subsection (5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more
intensive rural development, including necessary public facilities and public
services to serve the limited area as follows:

(i)
Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of
existing commercial, industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether
characterized as shoreline development, villages, hamlets, rural activity
centers, or crossroads developments. A commercial, industrial, residential,
shoreline, or mixed-use area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of
this subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii)
The intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale
recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or
tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;

(iii)
The intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential
uses or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Public services and public facilities shall
be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated nonresidential use and
shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(iv)
A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or
uses of more intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this
subsection. Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend
beyond the logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing
a new pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v)
For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one
that was in existence:

(A)
On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to plan under all of
the provisions of this chapter;

(B)
On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a
county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW
36.70A.040(2); or

(C)
On the date the office of financial management certifies the county's
population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under
all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e)
Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural
area a major industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise
specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6)
A transportation element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use
element.

(a)
The transportation element shall include the following subelements:

(i)
Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii)
Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting
from land use assumptions to assist the department of transportation in
monitoring the performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the
facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned
transportation facilities;

(iii)
Facilities and services needs, including:

(A)
An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services,
including transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define
existing capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning.
This inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the
city or county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B)
Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes
to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should
be regionally coordinated;

(C)
For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service standards for
highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the
performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting level of service
standards for state highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the
performance of the system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to
facilitate coordination between the county's or city's six-year street, road,
or transit program and the department of transportation's six-year investment
program. The concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply
to transportation facilities and services of state-wide significance except for
counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry
route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b)
of this subsection;

(D)
Specific actions ((and requirements)), by using motor vehicle excise
tax and gas tax funds, for bringing into compliance locally owned
transportation facilities or services that are below an established level of
service standard;

(E)
Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan
to provide information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future
growth;

(F)
Identification of state and local system needs to meet current and future
demands. Identified needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be
consistent with the state-wide multimodal transportation plan required under
chapter 47.06 RCW;

(iv)
Finance, including:

(A)
An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against probable funding
resources;

(B)
A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive
plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year
street, road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems.
The multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year
improvement program developed by the department of transportation as required
by RCW 47.05.030;

(C)
If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of
how additional funding will be raised((, or how land use assumptions will be
reassessed)) to ensure that level of service standards will be met;

(v)
Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts
of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation
systems of adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi)
Demand-management strategies.

(b)
After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or
who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and
enforce ordinances ((which prohibit development approval if the development
causes the level of service on a locally owned transportation facility to
decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the
comprehensive plan, unless transportation improvements or strategies to
accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with the
development. These)) that provide strategies that may
include increased public transportation service, ride sharing programs, demand
management, and other transportation systems management strategies. ((For
the purposes of this subsection (6) "concurrent with the development"
shall mean that improvements or strategies are in place at the time of
development, or that a financial commitment is in place to complete the
improvements or strategies within six years.))

(c)
The transportation element described in this subsection (6), and the six-year
plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for counties, RCW
35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030 for the state,
must be consistent.

Sec.
313. RCW
36.70A.110 and 1997 c 429 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
designate an urban growth area or areas within which urban growth shall be
encouraged ((and outside of which growth can occur only if it is not urban
in nature)). Each city that is located in such a county shall be included
within an urban growth area. An urban growth area ((may)) shall
include more than a single city. An urban growth area may include territory
that is located outside of a city ((only if such territory already is
characterized by urban growth whether or not the urban growth area includes a
city, or is adjacent to territory already characterized by urban growth, or is
a designated new fully contained community as defined by RCW 36.70A.350)) when
a county determines the territory is necessary to provide an adequate land
supply to expand the urban growth boundaries beyond the boundaries of existing
cities. However, a county's designated urban growth areas shall be at least
large enough to accommodate all projected growth and all growth that actually
occurs. Cities and counties shall designate urban growth areas that favor
expansive delineation of these areas.

(2)
((Based upon the growth management population projection made for the county
by the office of financial management,)) The county and each city
within the county shall include areas and densities sufficient to permit the
urban growth that is projected to occur in the county or city for the
succeeding twenty-year period. The office of financial management may be a
source for which counties base their population forecasts. Counties may add
their own calculations to the office of financial management's population
projections. Each urban growth area shall permit urban densities and shall
include greenbelt and open space areas. An urban growth area determination may
include a reasonable land market supply factor and shall permit a range of
urban densities and uses. In determining this market factor, cities and
counties may consider local circumstances. Cities and counties have discretion
in their comprehensive plans to make many choices about accommodating growth.

Within
one year of July 1, 1990, each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, shall begin consulting with each city
located within its boundaries and each city shall propose the location of an
urban growth area. Within sixty days of the date the county legislative authority
of a county adopts its resolution of intention or of certification by the
office of financial management, all other counties that are required or choose
to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall begin this consultation with each city
located within its boundaries. The county shall attempt to reach agreement
with each city on the location of an urban growth area within which the city is
located. If such an agreement is not reached with each city located within the
urban growth area, the county shall justify in writing why it so designated the
area an urban growth area. A city may object formally with the department over
the designation of the urban growth area within which it is located. Where
appropriate, the department shall attempt to resolve the conflicts, including
the use of mediation services. This section is intended to establish only a
minimum standard for the size of urban growth areas. This section neither
limits the discretion of counties to include an ample land supply within urban
growth areas nor compels counties to limit or disregard existing property
rights.

(3)(a)
Urban growth should be located ((first)) in areas already characterized
by urban growth that have adequate existing public facility and service
capacities to serve such development, ((second)) in areas already
characterized by urban growth that will be served adequately by a combination
of both existing public facilities and services and any additional needed
public facilities and services that are provided by either public or private
sources, and ((third)) in the remaining portions of the urban growth
areas. Urban growth may also be located in designated new fully contained
communities as defined by RCW 36.70A.350. This chapter does not limit the
common law duty of a public utility, whether publicly or privately owned, to
make service available to all within its franchise area and within areas as to
which a public utility has held itself out as a provider of service.
"Public utility," as used in this subsection, refers to a private
entity or municipal or quasi-municipal corporation that provides electricity,
sanitary sewer, storm sewer, water, telephone, cable television, communications
services, or natural gas to the public.

(b)
In addition to (a) of this subsection, a city that provides water or sewer
service outside the corporate boundaries of the city shall not require, as a
condition of providing water or sewer service, the property owner who has
requested water or sewer service to agree to:

(i)
Lot sizes different from those required by the jurisdiction with zoning
authority over the property; or

(ii)
Other development or design requirements not required by the local government
with jurisdiction over the property.

(4)
In general, cities are the units of local government most appropriate to
provide urban governmental services. In general, it is not appropriate that
urban governmental services be extended to or expanded in rural areas except in
those limited circumstances shown to be necessary to protect basic public health
and safety and the environment and when such services are financially
supportable at rural densities and do not permit urban development.

(5)
On or before October 1, 1993, each county that was initially required to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040(1) shall adopt development regulations designating interim
urban growth areas under this chapter. Within three years and three months of
the date the county legislative authority of a county adopts its resolution of
intention or of certification by the office of financial management, all other
counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
development regulations designating interim urban growth areas under this
chapter. Adoption of the interim urban growth areas may only occur after
public notice; public hearing; and compliance with the state environmental
policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW, and RCW 36.70A.110. Such action may be
appealed to the appropriate growth management hearings board under RCW
36.70A.280. Final urban growth areas shall be adopted at the time of
comprehensive plan adoption under this chapter.

(6)
Each county shall include designations of urban growth areas in its
comprehensive plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 314. (1) A
county or city that downzones any property, in the course of planning, bears
the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that the downzone is
justified by reference to the common law standards governing downzones and is
indispensable to government achieving compliance with this chapter.

(2)
The standard set forth in subsection (1) of this section applies to a downzone
regardless of whether that downzone is quasi-judicial or legislative in nature.

(3)
A county or city proposing a downzone shall give timely notice of the
proceedings to each affected property owner and shall provide each individual
property owner with a separate quasi-judicial hearing in accordance with local
procedure. Commencement of a downzone proceeding against a property owner must
be by written petition, setting forth in full detail the facts, circumstances,
and theories upon which the entity's claim is based. The county or city shall
not prove any ground for the downzone not specifically pled.

(4)
A proceeding for a downzone shall not be commenced within five years of the
determination of another downzone proceeding relating to the same property.

(5)
A property owner who prevails in a proceeding under this section shall recover
reasonable attorneys' fees, expert witness fees, and costs.

Sec.
315. RCW
36.70A.130 and 1997 c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject
to continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them.
Not later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter, a
county or city shall take action to review and, if needed, revise its
comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure that the plan
and regulations are complying with the requirements of this chapter. The
review and evaluation required by this subsection may be combined with the
review required by subsection (3) of this section.

Any
amendment or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this
chapter, and any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(2)(a)
Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments
or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of
the county or city no more frequently than once every year except that
amendments may be considered more frequently under the following circumstances:

(i)
The initial adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii)
The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures
set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii)
The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that
occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b)
Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be
considered by the governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the
various proposals can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public
participation a county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its
comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists
or to resolve an appeal of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management
hearings board or with the court.

(3)
Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110 shall
review, at least ((every ten years)) annually, its designated urban
growth area or areas, and the densities permitted within both the incorporated
and unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with
this review by the county, each city located within an urban growth area shall
review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which
the urban growth occurring within the county has located within each city and
the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas. The county
comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted
in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each
city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year
period. The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

Sec.
316. RCW
36.70A.160 and 1992 c 227 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
county and city that is required or chooses to prepare a comprehensive land use
plan under RCW 36.70A.040 shall identify open space corridors within and
between urban growth areas. They shall include lands useful for recreation,
wildlife habitat, trails, and connection of critical areas as defined in RCW
36.70A.030. Identification of a corridor under this section by a county or
city shall not restrict the use or management of lands within the corridor for
agricultural or forest purposes. Restrictions on the use or management of such
lands for agricultural or forest purposes imposed after identification solely
to maintain or enhance the value of such lands as a corridor may occur only if
the county or city acquires sufficient interest to prevent development of the lands
or to control the resource development of the lands. The requirement for
acquisition of sufficient interest does not include those corridors regulated
by the interstate commerce commission, under provisions of 16 U.S.C. Sec.
1247(d), 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1248, or 43 U.S.C. Sec. 912. ((Nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to alter the authority of the state, or a county
or city, to regulate land use activities.)) Private property shall not
be taken for public use without just compensation having been made. The
property rights of landowners shall be protected from arbitrary and
discriminatory actions.

The
city or county may acquire by donation or purchase the fee simple or lesser
interests in these open space corridors using funds authorized by RCW 84.34.230
or other sources.

Sec.
317. RCW
36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that counties are regional governments within their
boundaries, and cities are primary providers of urban governmental services
within urban growth areas. For the purposes of this section, a
"county-wide planning policy" is a written policy statement or
statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which
county and city comprehensive plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this
chapter. This framework shall ensure that city and county comprehensive plans
are consistent as required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to alter the land-use powers of cities.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in
whole or in part within the county as follows:

(a)
No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority
of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with representatives of each city located
within the county for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that
will provide a framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In
other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county
adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial
management.

(b)
The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide planning policy
specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner in which the
county and the cities agree to all procedures and provisions including but not
limited to desired planning policies, deadlines, ratification of final
agreements and demonstration thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities
associated therewith.

(c)
If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of
cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately
impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d)
If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no
agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management
in any other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or
reasons for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it
appropriate, the governor may immediately request the assistance of the
department of community, trade, and economic development to mediate any
disputes that preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving
all disputes that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate
sanctions from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section. The
governor shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of any
sanction.

(e)
No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later
than fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management the county
legislative authority of any other county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to
the process provided under this section and that is consistent with the
agreement pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public hearing
or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.

(3)
A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a)
Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of
urban services to such development;

(c)
Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide or state-wide
nature, including transportation facilities of state-wide significance as
defined in RCW 47.06.140;

(d)
Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e)
Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all
economic segments of the population ((and parameters for its distribution));

(f)
Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g)
Policies for county-wide economic development and employment; and

(h)
An analysis of the fiscal impact.

(4)
Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the
county-wide planning policy adoption process. Adopted county-wide planning
policies shall be adhered to by state agencies.

(5)
Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the requirements of
this section may result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a
county or city within the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing
a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to
adopt a county-wide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or
sanctions are fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a
county-wide planning policy.

(6)
Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide planning policy to
the growth management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the
county-wide planning policy.

(7)
Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each
with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban
areas and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process
established under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties
and cities within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

Sec.
318. RCW
36.70A.370 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state attorney general shall establish by October 1, 1991, an orderly,
consistent process, including a checklist if appropriate, that better enables
state agencies and local governments to evaluate proposed regulatory or
administrative actions to assure that such actions do not result in an
unconstitutional taking of private property. It is not the purpose of this
section to ((expand or)) reduce the scope of private property
protections provided in the state and federal Constitutions. The attorney
general shall review and update the process at least on an annual basis to
maintain consistency with changes in case law.

(2)
Local governments that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 and
state agencies shall utilize the process established by subsection (1) of this
section to assure that proposed regulatory or administrative actions do not
result in an unconstitutional taking of private property.

(3)
The attorney general, in consultation with the Washington state bar
association, shall develop a continuing education course to implement this
section.

(((4)
The process used by government agencies shall be protected by attorney client
privilege. Nothing in this section grants a private party the right to seek
judicial relief requiring compliance with the provisions of this section.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 319. It is
necessary that the procedures established in this chapter ensure that all
applicable permit processes, approvals, and reviews are processed concurrently,
rather than consecutively. The lead environmental agency or counties and
cities shall establish by rule or ordinance an expedited appeals process by
which an applicant may appeal any failure by any permit agency, county, or city
to take timely action on the issuance or denial of a permit or land-use
approval or subdivision of land in accordance with the time limits established
under this chapter. If the decision maker finds that the time limits under
appeal have been violated without good cause, the decision maker shall
establish a date certain by which the permit agency shall act on the permit
application and provide for the full reimbursement of any filing or permit
processing fees paid by the applicant to the local government or agency for the
permit application under appeal.

Sec.
320. RCW
76.09.050 and 1997 c 173 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall establish by rule which forest practices shall be included
within each of the following classes:

Class
I: Minimal or specific forest practices that have no direct potential for
damaging a public resource and that may be conducted without submitting an
application or a notification except that when the regulating authority is
transferred to a local governmental entity, those Class I forest practices that
involve timber harvesting or road construction within "urban growth
areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, are processed as Class IV
forest practices, but are not subject to environmental review under chapter
43.21C RCW;

Class
II: Forest practices which have a less than ordinary potential for damaging a
public resource that may be conducted without submitting an application and may
begin five calendar days, or such lesser time as the department may determine,
after written notification by the operator, in the manner, content, and form as
prescribed by the department, is received by the department. However, the work
may not begin until all forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have
been received by the department. Class II shall not include forest practices:

(a)
On lands platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW or on
lands that have or are being converted to another use;

(b)
Which require approvals under the provisions of the hydraulics act, RCW
75.20.100;

(c)
Within "shorelines of the state" as defined in RCW 90.58.030;

(d)
Excluded from Class II by the board; or

(e)
Including timber harvesting or road construction within "urban growth
areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, which are Class IV;

Class
III: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I, II, or IV. A
Class III application must be approved or disapproved by the department within
thirty calendar days from the date the department receives the application.
However, the applicant may not begin work on that forest practice until all
forest practice fees required under RCW 76.09.065 have been received by the
department;

Class
IV: Forest practices other than those contained in Class I or II: (a) On lands
platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW, (b) on lands
that have or are being converted to another use, (c) on lands which, pursuant
to RCW 76.09.070 as now or hereafter amended, are not to be reforested because
of the likelihood of future conversion to urban development, (d) except on
those lands involving timber harvesting or road construction on lands that are
contained within "urban growth areas," designated pursuant to chapter
36.70A RCW, where the forest landowner provides: (i) A written statement of
intent signed by the forest landowner not to convert to a use other than
commercial forest product operations for ten years, accompanied by either a
written forest management plan acceptable to the department or documentation that
the land is enrolled under the provisions of chapter 84.33 RCW; or (ii) a
conversion option harvest plan approved by the local governmental entity and
submitted to the department as part of the application, and/or (e) which have a
potential for a substantial impact on the environment and therefore require an
evaluation by the department as to whether or not a detailed statement must be
prepared pursuant to the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW.
Such evaluation shall be made within ten days from the date the department
receives the application: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall be construed to
prevent any local or regional governmental entity from determining that a
detailed statement must be prepared for an action pursuant to a Class IV forest
practice taken by that governmental entity concerning the land on which forest
practices will be conducted. A Class IV application must be approved or
disapproved by the department within thirty calendar days from the date the
department receives the application, unless the department determines that a
detailed statement must be made, in which case the application must be approved
or disapproved by the department within sixty calendar days from the date the
department receives the application, unless the commissioner of public lands,
through the promulgation of a formal order, determines that the process cannot
be completed within such period. However, the applicant may not begin work on
that forest practice until all forest practice fees required under RCW
76.09.065 have been received by the department.

Forest
practices under Classes I, II, and III are exempt from the requirements for
preparation of a detailed statement under the state environmental policy act.

(2)
Except for those forest practices being regulated by local governmental
entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, no Class II, Class III, or
Class IV forest practice shall be commenced or continued after January 1, 1975,
unless the department has received a notification with regard to a Class II
forest practice or approved an application with regard to a Class III or Class
IV forest practice containing all information required by RCW 76.09.060 as now
or hereafter amended. However, in the event forest practices regulations
necessary for the scheduled implementation of this chapter and RCW 90.48.420
have not been adopted in time to meet such schedules, the department shall have
the authority to regulate forest practices and approve applications on such
terms and conditions consistent with this chapter and RCW 90.48.420 and the
purposes and policies of RCW 76.09.010 until applicable forest practices
regulations are in effect.

(3)
Except for those forest practices being regulated by local governmental
entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, if a notification or
application is delivered in person to the department by the operator or the
operator's agent, the department shall immediately provide a dated receipt
thereof. In all other cases, the department shall immediately mail a dated
receipt to the operator.

(4)
Except for those forest practices being regulated by local governmental
entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, forest practices shall be
conducted in accordance with the forest practices regulations, orders and directives
as authorized by this chapter or the forest practices regulations, and the
terms and conditions of any approved applications.

(5)
Except for those forest practices being regulated by local governmental
entities as provided elsewhere in this chapter, the department of natural
resources shall notify the applicant in writing of either its approval of the
application or its disapproval of the application and the specific manner in
which the application fails to comply with the provisions of this section or
with the forest practices regulations. Except as provided otherwise in this
section, if the department fails to either approve or disapprove an application
or any portion thereof within the applicable time limit, the application shall
be deemed approved and the operation may be commenced: PROVIDED, That this
provision shall not apply to applications which are neither approved nor
disapproved pursuant to the provisions of subsection (7) of this section:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if seasonal field conditions prevent the department
from being able to properly evaluate the application, the department may issue
an approval conditional upon further review within sixty days: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That the department shall have until April 1, 1975, to approve or
disapprove an application involving forest practices allowed to continue to
April 1, 1975, under the provisions of subsection (2) of this section. Upon
receipt of any notification or any satisfactorily completed application the
department shall in any event no later than two business days after such
receipt transmit a copy to the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife,
and to the county, city, or town in whose jurisdiction the forest practice is
to be commenced. Any comments by such agencies shall be directed to the
department of natural resources.

(6)
For those forest practices regulated by the board and the department, if the
county, city, or town believes that an application is inconsistent with this
chapter, the forest practices regulations, or any local authority consistent
with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended, it may so notify the department
and the applicant, specifying its objections.

(7)
For those forest practices regulated by the board and the department, the
department shall not approve portions of applications to which a county, city,
or town objects if:

(a)
The department receives written notice from the county, city, or town of such
objections within fourteen business days from the time of transmittal of the
application to the county, city, or town, or one day before the department acts
on the application, whichever is later; and

(b)
The objections relate to lands either:

(i)
Platted after January 1, 1960, as provided in chapter 58.17 RCW; or

(ii)
On lands that have or are being converted to another use.

The
department shall either disapprove those portions of such application or appeal
the county, city, or town objections to the appeals board. If the objections
related to subparagraphs (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection are based on local
authority consistent with RCW 76.09.240 as now or hereafter amended, the
department shall disapprove the application until such time as the county,
city, or town consents to its approval or such disapproval is reversed on
appeal. The applicant shall be a party to all department appeals of county,
city, or town objections. Unless the county, city, or town either consents or
has waived its rights under this subsection, the department shall not approve
portions of an application affecting such lands until the minimum time for
county, city, or town objections has expired.

(8)
For those forest practices regulated by the board and the department, in
addition to any rights under the above paragraph, the county, city, or town may
appeal any department approval of an application with respect to any lands
within its jurisdiction. The appeals board may suspend the department's
approval in whole or in part pending such appeal where there exists potential
for immediate and material damage to a public resource.

(9)
For those forest practices regulated by the board and the department, appeals
under this section shall be made to the appeals board in the manner and time
provided in RCW 76.09.220(8). In such appeals there shall be no presumption of
correctness of either the county, city, or town or the department position.

(10)
For those forest practices regulated by the board and the department, the
department shall, within four business days notify the county, city, or town of
all notifications, approvals, and disapprovals of an application affecting
lands within the county, city, or town, except to the extent the county, city,
or town has waived its right to such notice.

(11)
For those forest practices regulated by the board and the department, a county,
city, or town may waive in whole or in part its rights under this section, and
may withdraw or modify any such waiver, at any time by written notice to the
department.

(12)
This section does not apply to land development proceeding under Title 36 RCW.

(13)
For the purposes of this section, "land development" means the
division or platting of land in preparation for development or the actual
building, constructing, or erecting of residences or commercial buildings.

Sec.
321. RCW
36.70B.010 and 1995 c 347 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares the following:

(1)
As the number of environmental laws and development regulations has increased
for land uses and development, so has the number of required local land use
permits, each with its own separate approval process.

(2)
The increasing number of local and state land use permits and separate
environmental review processes required by agencies has generated continuing
potential for conflict, overlap, and duplication between the various permit and
review processes.

(3)
This regulatory burden has significantly added to the cost and time needed to
obtain local and state land use permits and has made it difficult for the
public to know how and when to provide timely comments on land use proposals
that require multiple permits and have separate environmental review processes.

(4)
The legislature therefore finds minimizing lengthy, costly, and burdensome
appeals and permit processes to be of great importance as well as to be
promoting clear vesting of property and development rights.

Sec.
322. RCW
36.70B.020 and 1995 c 347 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Closed record appeal" means an administrative appeal on the record
to a local government body or officer, including the legislative body,
following an open record hearing on a project permit application when the
appeal is on the record with no or limited new evidence or information allowed
to be submitted and only appeal argument allowed.

(2)
"Local government" means a county, city, or town.

(3)
"Open record hearing" means a hearing, conducted by a single hearing
body or officer authorized by the local government to conduct such hearings,
that creates the local government's record through testimony and submission of
evidence and information, under procedures prescribed by the local government
by ordinance or resolution. ((An open record hearing may be held prior to a
local government's decision on a project permit to be known as an "open
record predecision hearing." An open record hearing may be held on an
appeal, to be known as an "open record appeal hearing," if no open
record predecision hearing has been held on the project permit.))

(4)
"Project permit" ((or "project permit application"))
means any land use or environmental permit or license required from a local
government for a project action, including ((but not limited to))
building permits, subdivisions, binding site plans, planned unit developments,
conditional uses, shoreline substantial development permits, and site
plan review((, permits or approvals required by critical area ordinances,
site-specific rezones)) authorized by a comprehensive plan ((or subarea
plan, but excluding the adoption or amendment of a comprehensive plan, subarea
plan, or development regulations except as otherwise specifically included in
this subsection)).

(5)
"Public meeting" means an informal meeting, hearing, workshop, or
other public gathering of people to obtain comments from the public or other
agencies on a proposed project permit prior to the local government’s
decision. A public meeting ((may include, but)) is ((not))
limited to((, a design review or architectural control board meeting, a
special review district or community council meeting, or)) a scoping
meeting on a draft environmental impact statement. A public meeting does not
include an open record hearing. The proceedings at a public meeting may be
recorded and a report ((or recommendation)) may be included in the local
government’s project permit application file.

(6)
"Separate approval process" means a distinct permit or review process
required by state, local, or other agencies, including but not limited to land
use permits and environmental reviews.

Sec.
323. RCW
36.70B.040 and 1997 c 429 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A proposed project's consistency with a local government's development
regulations adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW, or, in the absence of applicable
development regulations, the appropriate elements of the comprehensive plan
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW shall be decided by the local government
during project review by consideration of:

(a)
The type of land use;

(b)
The level of development, such as units per acre or other measures of density;

(c)
Infrastructure, including public facilities and services needed to serve the
development((; and

(d)
The characteristics of the development, such as development standards.

(2)
In deciding whether a project is consistent, the determinations made pursuant
to RCW 36.70B.030(2) shall be controlling)).

(((3)))
(2) For purposes of this section, the term "consistency" shall
include all terms used in this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW to refer to
performance in accordance with this chapter and chapter 36.70A RCW((,
including but not limited to compliance, conformity, and consistency.

(4)
Nothing in this section requires documentation, dictates an agency's procedures
for considering consistency, or limits a city or county from asking more
specific or related questions with respect to any of the four main categories
listed in subsection (1)(a) through (d) of this section)).

(((5)))
(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development is
authorized to develop and adopt by rule criteria to assist local governments
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to analyze the consistency of project actions.
These criteria shall be jointly developed with the department of ecology.

Sec.
324. RCW
36.70B.060 and 1995 c 347 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

Not
later than March 31, 1996, each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040
shall establish by ordinance or resolution an integrated and consolidated
project permit process that ((may)) shall be included in its
development regulations. ((In addition to the elements required by RCW
36.70B.050,)) The process shall include the following elements:

(1)
A determination of completeness to the applicant as required by ((RCW
36.70B.070)) each separate approval process;

(2)
A notice of application to the public and agencies with jurisdiction ((as
required by RCW 36.70B.110));

(3)
Except as provided in RCW 36.70B.140, an optional consolidated project permit
review process as provided in RCW 36.70B.120. The review process shall provide
for no more than one consolidated open record hearing and one closed record
appeal((. If an open record predecision hearing is provided prior to the
decision on a project permit, the process shall not allow a subsequent open
record appeal hearing));

(4)
Provision allowing for any required public meeting or required open
record hearing to be combined with any ((public meeting or)) open record
hearing that may be held on the project by another local((,)) or
state((, regional, federal, or other)) agency, in accordance with
provisions of RCW 36.70B.090 and 36.70B.110;

(5)
((A single report stating all the decisions made as of the date of the
report on all project permits included in the consolidated permit process that
do not require an open record predecision hearing and any recommendations on
project permits that do not require an open record predecision hearing. The
report shall state any mitigation required or proposed under the development
regulations or the agency's authority under RCW 43.21C.060. The report may be
the local permit. If a threshold determination other than a determination of
significance has not been issued previously by the local government, the report
shall include or append this determination;

(6)
Except for the appeal of a determination of significance as provided in RCW
43.21C.075, if a local government elects to provide an appeal of its threshold
determinations or project permit decisions, the local government shall provide
for no more than one consolidated open record hearing on such appeal. The
local government need not provide for any further appeal and may provide an
appeal for some but not all project permit decisions. If an appeal is provided
after the open record hearing, it shall be a closed record appeal before a
single decision-making body or officer;

(7))) A
notice of decision as required by RCW 36.70B.130 and issued within the time
period provided in RCW 36.70B.080 and 36.70B.090;

(((8)))
(6) Completion of project review by the local government, including
environmental review and public review and any appeals to the local government,
within any applicable time periods under RCW 36.70B.090; and

(((9)))
(7) Any other provisions not inconsistent with the requirements of this
chapter or chapter 43.21C RCW.

Sec.
325. RCW
36.70B.070 and 1995 c 347 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within twenty-eight days after receiving a project permit application, a local
government planning pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040 shall mail or provide in person
a written determination to the applicant, stating either:

(a)
That the application is complete; or

(b)
That the application is incomplete and what is necessary to make the
application complete.

To
the extent known by the local government, the local government shall identify
other agencies of local, state, or federal governments that may have
jurisdiction over some aspect of the application.

(2)
A project permit application is complete ((for purposes of this section))
when it meets the procedural submission requirements of the local government
and is sufficient for continued processing even though additional information
may be ((required)) requested or project modifications may be
undertaken subsequently. ((The determination of completeness shall not
preclude the local government from requesting additional information or studies
either at the time of the notice of completeness or subsequently if new
information is required or substantial changes in the proposed action occur.

(3)
The determination of completeness may include the following as optional
information:

(a)
A preliminary determination of those development regulations that will be used
for project mitigation;

(b)
A preliminary determination of consistency, as provided under RCW 36.70B.040; or

(c)
Other information the local government chooses to include.

(4))) Additional
requested information shall be of a clarifying nature and based on requirements
of the underlying development regulations.

(3)(a)
An application shall be deemed complete ((under this section)) if the
local government does not provide a written determination to the applicant that
the application is incomplete as provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

(b) Within fourteen days after an applicant has submitted to a
local government additional information identified by the local government as
being necessary for a complete application, the local government shall notify
the applicant whether the application is complete or what ((additional))
information ((is necessary)) was not included under the original
written determination provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

Sec.
326. RCW
36.70B.090 and 1995 c 347 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,)) A
local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall issue its notice of final
decision on a project permit application within one hundred twenty days after
the local government notifies the applicant that the application is complete,
as provided in RCW 36.70B.070. In determining the number of days that have
elapsed after the local government has notified the applicant that the
application is complete, the following periods shall be excluded:

(a)(i)
Any period during which the applicant has been requested by the local
government to correct plans((, perform required studies,)) or provide
additional ((required)) information required in the underlying
development regulations. The period shall be calculated from the date the
local government notifies the applicant of the need for additional required
information until the earlier of the date the local government determines
whether the additional required information satisfies the original
request for information or fourteen days after the date the information has
been provided to the local government.

(ii)
If the local government determines that the information submitted by the
applicant under (a)(i) of this subsection ((is insufficient)) does
not meet requirements of the underlying development regulations, it shall
notify the applicant of the deficiencies and the procedures under (a)(i) of
this subsection shall apply ((as if a new request for studies had been made));
and

(b)
Any period during which an environmental impact statement is being prepared
following a determination of significance pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW, if
the local government by ordinance or resolution has established time periods
for completion of environmental impact statements, or if the local government
and the applicant in writing agree to a time period for completion of an
environmental impact statement((;

(c)
Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an open record appeal
hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are allowed. The local government
by ordinance or resolution shall establish a time period to consider and decide
such appeals. The time period shall not exceed: (i) Ninety days for an open
record appeal hearing; and (ii) sixty days for a closed record appeal. The
parties to an appeal may agree to extend these time periods; and

(d)
Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the local
government.

(2)
The time limits established by subsection (1) of this section do not apply if a
project permit application:

(a)
Requires an amendment to the comprehensive plan or a development regulation;

(b)
Requires approval of a new fully contained community as provided in RCW
36.70A.350, a master planned resort as provided in RCW 36.70A.360, or the
siting of an essential public facility as provided in RCW 36.70A.200; or

(c)
Is substantially revised by the applicant, in which case the time period shall
start from the date at which the revised project application is determined to
be complete under RCW 36.70B.070.

(3)
If the local government is unable to issue its final decision within the time
limits provided for in this section, it shall provide written notice of this
fact to the project applicant. The notice shall include a statement of reasons
why the time limits have not been met and an estimated date for issuance of the
notice of final decision)).

(((4)))
(2) This section shall apply to project permit applications filed on or
after April 1, 1996.

Sec.
327. RCW
36.70B.110 and 1997 c 429 s 48 and 1997 c 396 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Not later than April 1, 1996, a local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040
shall provide a notice of application to the public and the departments and
agencies with jurisdiction as provided in this section. If a local government
has made a threshold determination under chapter 43.21C RCW concurrently with
the notice of application, the notice of application may be combined with the
threshold determination and the scoping notice for a determination of
significance. Nothing in this section prevents a determination of significance
and scoping notice from being issued prior to the notice of application.
Nothing in this section or this chapter prevents a lead agency, when it is a
project proponent or is funding a project, from conducting its review under
chapter 43.21C RCW or from allowing appeals of procedural determinations prior
to submitting a project permit application.

(2)
The notice of application shall be provided within fourteen days after the
determination of completeness as provided in RCW 36.70B.070 and, except as
limited by the provisions of subsection (4)(b) of this section, shall include
the following in whatever sequence or format the local government deems
appropriate:

(a)
The date of application, the date of the notice of completion for the
application, and the date of the notice of application;

(b)
A description of the proposed project action and a list of the project permits
included in the application ((and, if applicable, a list of any studies
requested under RCW 36.70B.070 or 36.70B.090));

(c)
The identification of other permits not included in the application ((to the
extent known by the local government));

(d)
The identification of existing environmental documents that evaluate the
proposed project, and, if not otherwise stated on the document providing the
notice of application, such as a city land use bulletin, the location where the
application and any studies can be reviewed;

(e)
A statement of the public comment period, which shall be not less than fourteen
nor more than thirty days following the date of notice of application, and
statements of the right of any person to comment on the application, receive
notice of and participate in any hearings, request a copy of the decision once
made, and any appeal rights. A local government may accept public comments at
any time prior to the closing of the record of an open record predecision
hearing, if any, or, if no open record predecision hearing is provided, prior
to the decision on the project permit;

(f)
The date, time, place, and type of hearing, if applicable and scheduled at the
date of notice of the application;

(g)
A statement ((of the preliminary determination, if one has been made at the
time of notice,)) of those development regulations that will be used for
project mitigation ((and of consistency as provided in RCW 36.70B.040; and

(h)
Any other information determined appropriate by the local government.

(3)
If an open record predecision hearing is required for the requested project
permits, the notice of application shall be provided at least fifteen days
prior to the open record hearing.

(4))) required
in chapter 43.21C RCW.

(3)
A local government shall use reasonable methods to give the notice of
application to the public and agencies with jurisdiction and ((may)) shall
use its existing notice procedures. ((A local government may use different
types of notice for different categories of project permits or types of project
actions. If a local government by resolution or ordinance does not specify its
method of public notice, the local government shall use the methods provided
for in (a) and (b) of this subsection. Examples of reasonable methods to
inform the public are:

(a)
Posting the property for site-specific proposals;

(b)
Publishing notice, including at least the project location, description, type
of permit(s) required, comment period dates, and location where the complete
application may be reviewed, in the newspaper of general circulation in the
general area where the proposal is located or in a local land use newsletter
published by the local government;

(c)
Notifying public or private groups with known interest in a certain proposal or
in the type of proposal being considered;

(d)
Notifying the news media;

(e)
Placing notices in appropriate regional or neighborhood newspapers or trade
journals;

(f)
Publishing notice in agency newsletters or sending notice to agency mailing
lists, either general lists or lists for specific proposals or subject areas;
and

(g)
Mailing to neighboring property owners.

(5))) (4)
A notice of application shall not be required for project permits that are
categorically exempt under chapter 43.21C RCW((, unless a public comment
period or an open record predecision hearing is required)).

(((6)))
(5) A local government shall integrate the permit procedures in this
section with its environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW as follows:

(a)
Except for a threshold determination, the local government may not issue a
decision or a recommendation on a project permit until the expiration of the
public comment period on the notice of application.

(b)
If an open record predecision hearing is required and the local government's
threshold determination requires public notice under chapter 43.21C RCW, the local
government shall issue its threshold determination at least fifteen days prior
to the open record predecision hearing.

(c)
Comments shall be as specific as possible.

(((7)))
(6) A local government may combine any hearing on a project permit with
any hearing that may be held by another local((,)) or state((,
regional, federal, or other)) agency provided that the hearing is held
within the geographic boundary of the local government. Hearings shall be
combined if requested by an applicant, as long as the joint hearing can be held
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70B.090 or the applicant agrees to
the schedule in the event that additional time is needed in order to combine
the hearings. All agencies of the state of Washington, including municipal
corporations and counties participating in a combined hearing, are hereby authorized
to issue joint hearing notices and develop a joint format, select a mutually
acceptable hearing body or officer, and take such other actions as may be
necessary to hold joint hearings consistent with each of their respective
statutory obligations.

(((8)))
(7) All state and local agencies shall cooperate to the fullest extent
possible with the local government in holding a joint hearing if requested to
do so, as long as:

(a)
The agency is not expressly prohibited by statute from doing so;

(b)
Sufficient notice of the hearing is given to meet each of the agencies' adopted
notice requirements as set forth in statute, ordinance, or rule; and

(c)
The agency has received the necessary information about the proposed project
from the applicant to hold its hearing at the same time as the local government
hearing.

(((9)))
(8) A local government is not required to provide for administrative
appeals. If provided, an administrative appeal of the project decision,
combined with any environmental determinations, shall be filed within fourteen
days after the notice of the decision or after other notice that the decision
has been made and is appealable. The local government shall extend the appeal
period for an additional seven days, if state or local rules adopted pursuant
to chapter 43.21C RCW allow public comment on a determination of
nonsignificance issued as part of the appealable project permit decision.

(((10)))
(9) The applicant for a project permit is deemed to be a participant in
any comment period, open record hearing, or closed record appeal.

(((11)))
(10) Each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall adopt
procedures for administrative interpretation of its development regulations.

Sec.
328. RCW
36.70B.120 and 1995 c 347 s 416 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall establish a permit
review process that provides for the integrated and consolidated review and
decision on two or more project permits relating to a proposed project action,
including a single application review and approval process covering all project
permits requested by an applicant for all or part of a project action and a
designated permit coordinator. If an applicant elects the consolidated permit
review process, the determination of completeness, notice of application, and
notice of final decision must include all project permits being reviewed
through the consolidated permit review process.

(2)
Consolidated permit review may provide different procedures for different
categories of project permits, but if a project action requires project permits
from more than one category, the local government shall provide for
consolidated permit review with a single open record hearing and no more than
one closed record appeal as provided in RCW 36.70B.060. Each local government
shall determine which project permits are subject to an open record hearing and
a closed record appeal. Examples of categories of project permits include but
are not limited to:

(a)
Proposals that are categorically exempt from chapter 43.21C RCW, such as
construction permits, that do not require environmental review or public
notice;

(b)
Permits that require environmental review((, but no open record predecision
hearing)); and

(c)
Permits that require a threshold determination and an open record predecision
hearing and may provide for a closed record appeal to a hearing body or officer
or to the local government legislative body.

(3)
A local government may provide by ordinance or resolution for the same or a
different decision maker or hearing body or officer for different categories of
project permits. In the case of consolidated project permit review, the local
government shall specify which decision makers shall make the decision or
recommendation, conduct the hearing, or decide the appeal to ensure that
consolidated permit review occurs as provided in this section. The
consolidated permit review may combine an open record predecision hearing on
one or more permits with an open record appeal hearing on other permits. In
such cases, the local government by ordinance or resolution shall specify which
project permits, if any, shall be subject to a closed record appeal.

Sec.
329. RCW
36.70B.130 and 1996 c 254 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
local government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide a notice of
decision that also includes a statement of any threshold determination made
under chapter 43.21C RCW and the procedures for administrative appeal, if any.
The notice of decision may be a copy of the report or decision on the project
permit application. The notice shall be provided to the applicant and to any
person who, prior to the rendering of the decision, requested notice of the
decision or submitted substantive comments on the application. The local
government shall provide for notice of its decision as provided in RCW
36.70B.110(((4))) (3), which shall also state that affected
property owners may request a change in valuation for property tax purposes
notwithstanding any program of revaluation. The local government shall provide
notice of decision to the county assessor's office of the county or counties in
which the property is situated.

Sec.
330. RCW
36.70B.140 and 1995 c 347 s 418 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A local government by ordinance or resolution ((may)) shall
exclude the following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060
through 36.70B.090 and 36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Landmark designations,
street vacations, or other approvals relating to the use of public areas or
facilities, or other project permits, whether administrative or quasi-judicial,
that the local government by ordinance or resolution has determined present
special circumstances that warrant a review process different from that
provided in RCW 36.70B.060 through 36.70B.090 and 36.70B.110 through
36.70B.130.

(2)
A local government by ordinance or resolution also ((may)) shall
exclude the following project permits from the provisions of RCW 36.70B.060 and
36.70B.110 through 36.70B.130: Lot line or boundary adjustments and building and
other construction permits, or similar administrative approvals, categorically
exempt from environmental review under chapter 43.21C RCW, or for which
environmental review has been completed in connection with other project
permits.

Sec.
331. RCW
36.70B.160 and 1995 c 347 s 420 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each local government ((is encouraged to)) shall adopt further
project review provisions to ((provide prompt, coordinated review and))
ensure accountability to applicants and the public((, including)) and
provide expedited, coordinated review ((for project permit
applications)) for projects that are consistent with adopted development
regulations ((and within the capacity of system-wide infrastructure improvements)).

(2)
Nothing in this chapter is intended or shall be construed to prevent a local
government from ((requiring)) allowing a preapplication
conference or a public ((meeting)) hearing by rule, ordinance, or
resolution.

(3)
Each local government shall adopt procedures to monitor and enforce permit
decisions and conditions.

(4)
Nothing in this chapter modifies any independent statutory authority for a
government agency to appeal a project permit issued by a local government.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 332. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
36.70B.030 (Project review--Required elements--Limitations) and
1995 c 347 s 404;

(2) RCW
36.70B.080 (Development regulations--Requirements) and 1995 c 347
s 10, 1995 c 347 s 409, & 1994 c 257 s 3; and

(3) 1995 c
347 s 411 (uncodified).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 333.
Sections 304 through 309, 314, and 319 of this act are each added to chapter
36.70A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 334. This
act is remedial in nature and applies retroactively to July 1, 1990, and
thereafter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 335.
Section 326 of this act expires June 30, 2000.

PART
IV

BUILDABLE
LAND

Sec.
401. RCW
36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in subsection (((7))) (11) of this
section, a county shall adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide
planning policies to establish a review and evaluation program. This program
shall be in addition to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and
36.70A.210. In developing and implementing the review and evaluation program
required by this section, the county and its cities shall consider information
from other appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review
and evaluation program shall be to:

(a)
Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban densities within
urban growth areas by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets,
and objectives contained in the county-wide planning policies and the county
and city comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has
occurred in the county and its cities; and

(b)
Identify reasonable measures((, other than adjusting urban growth areas,))
that will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The review and evaluation program shall:

(a)
Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of urban growth
areas and provide for annual collection of data on urban and rural land uses,
development including the issuance of building permits and certificates of
occupancy, critical areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary
to determine the quantity and type of land suitable for development, both for
residential and employment-based activities;

(b)
Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every
((five)) two years as provided in subsection (3) of this
section. The first evaluation shall be completed not later than September 1,
2002. The county and its cities may establish in the county-wide planning
policies indicators, benchmarks, and other similar criteria to use in
conducting the evaluation;

(c)
Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the
county-wide planning policies required by this section and procedures to resolve
inconsistencies in collection and analysis of data; and

(d)
Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and county and city
comprehensive plans as needed to remedy an inconsistency identified through the
evaluation required by this section, or to bring these policies into compliance
with the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required by subsection
(1) of this section shall:

(a)
Determine whether there is sufficient land suitable ((land)) for
development to accommodate the county-wide population projection
established for the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent
population allocations within the county and between the county and its cities
and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Determine the actual density of housing that has been constructed and the
actual amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the
urban growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter
or since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this
section; and

(c)
Based on the actual density of development as determined under (b) of this
subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and
density range to determine the amount of land needed for commercial,
industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning
period used in the most recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4)
If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates ((an
inconsistency between what has occurred since the adoption of the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to)) the urban growth area does not contain sufficient land
suitable for development to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial
needs for twenty years based on the evaluation factors specified in
subsection (3) of this section, the county ((and its cities shall adopt and
implement measures that are reasonably likely to increase consistency during
the subsequent five-year period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with
its cities as required by RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to county-wide
planning policies to increase consistency. The county and its cities shall
annually monitor the measures adopted under this subsection to determine their
effect and may revise or rescind them as appropriate)) shall take one or
more of the following actions:

(a)
Amend its comprehensive plan or development regulations to include new,
incentive-based measures that demonstrably increase the likelihood that
development will occur at densities sufficient to accommodate residential,
commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years without expansion of the
urban growth area;

(b)
Amend its urban growth area to include sufficient land suitable for development
to achieve consistency with county-wide planning policies under RCW
36.70A.210(3)(a) and to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial
needs for twenty years at the actual developed density during the period since
the last periodic review or within the last five years, whichever is greater.
As part of this process, the amendment must include sufficient land reasonably
necessary to accommodate the siting of public facilities or other urban
infrastructure that is or will be needed by new development within the expanded
urban growth area; or

(c)
Any combination of actions in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(5)
A county that amends its comprehensive plan or development regulations to
include new, incentive-based measures shall annually monitor and record the
level of development activity and development density following the date of the
adoption of the new measures and may revise or rescind the measures as
appropriate. If, after five years of initial implementation of incentive-based
measures and annual monitoring, development is not occurring at densities
sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for
twenty years, the county shall amend its urban growth area as provided in
subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(6)
If the evaluation required in subsection (3) of this section demonstrates the
urban growth area does not contain sufficient land suitable for development to
accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years
based on the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the city or cities within the urban growth area shall amend their comprehensive
plans or development regulations to include new, incentive-based measures that
demonstrably increase the likelihood that development will occur at densities
sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for
twenty years without expansion of the urban growth area. A city that takes
this action shall annually monitor and record the level of development activity
and development density following the date of the adoption of the new measures
and may revise or rescind the measures as appropriate.

(7)
Amendments by the county and its cities to comprehensive plans or development
regulations must comply with this chapter.

(8)
In establishing that actions and measures adopted under subsections (4) and (5)
of this section demonstrably increase the likelihood of higher density
residential, commercial, and industrial development, the county, city, or town
shall at a minimum ensure that land zoned for needed housing and commercial and
industrial structures is in locations appropriate for such development and is
zoned at density ranges that are likely to be achieved by the market using the
analysis in subsection (3) of this section. Actions or incentive-based
measures, or both, are adopted as part of development regulations and are
available to all applicable properties within the zone, are not negotiated on a
case-by-case basis, and may include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Financial incentives for higher density housing, including, but not limited to
removal of fees associated with development;

(b)
Removal or easing of approval standards or procedures;

(c)
Redevelopment and infill strategies; and

(d)
Authorization of housing types not previously allowed by the comprehensive plan
or development regulations.

(((5)))
(9)(a) Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list
of methods used by counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities
required by this section. The department shall provide this information and
appropriate technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing
to comply with the provisions of this section.

(b)
By December 31, ((2007)) 2002, the department shall submit to the
appropriate committees of the legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness
of the activities described and measures taken by the counties and cities
in this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the county-wide planning
policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of the
counties and cities.

(((6)))
(10) From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the
department shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning
organizations required under subsection (((7))) (11) of this
section to conduct the review and perform the evaluation required by this
section.

(((7)))
(11) The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the
cities within those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand
in population in 1995 as determined by office of financial management
population estimates and that are located west of the crest of the Cascade
mountain range. Any other county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out
the review, evaluation, and amendment programs and procedures as provided in
this section.

(12)
For the purposes of this section, "land suitable for development"
means the land:

(a)
Is not within any critical area or governed by any development regulation
designed to protect critical areas adopted under RCW 36.70A.060 that makes the
land unbuildable to existing zoning;

(b)
Is not otherwise constrained by governmental regulations or physical geography
to the extent that it is unbuildable to existing zoning;

(c)
Is serviced by all public facilities necessary for development or will be
serviced by needed facilities within twenty years as provided in the capital
facilities element of the county or city's comprehensive plan adopted under RCW
36.70A.070;

(d)
May be developed without causing the level of service on a transportation
facility to decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element
of the comprehensive plan; and

(e)
Is available for development, including both vacant, partially used, and
redevelopable land. Redevelopable land is land on which development has
already occurred but on which, due to present or expected market forces, there
exists the strong likelihood that existing development will be converted to
more intensive uses during the planning period. However, land that is
developed with a building currently occupied and determined habitable by the
local jurisdiction with an assessed value greater than the assessed value of
the land on which the building is located may not be considered redevelopable
land.

PART
V

IMPACT
FEES

Sec.
501. RCW
82.02.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

The
local ordinance by which impact fees are imposed:

(1)
Shall include a schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted for each type of
development activity that is subject to impact fees, specifying the amount of
the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement. The schedule
shall be based upon a formula or other method of calculating such impact fees.
In determining proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating
impact fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:

(a)
The cost of public facilities necessitated by new development;

(b)
An adjustment to the cost of the public facilities for past or future payments
made or reasonably anticipated to be made by new development to pay for
particular system improvements in the form of user fees, debt service payments,
taxes, or other payments earmarked for or proratable to the particular system
improvement;

(c)
The availability of other means of funding public facility improvements;

(d)
The cost of existing public facilities improvements; and

(e)
The methods by which public facilities improvements were financed;

(2)
May provide an exemption for low-income housing, and other development
activities with broad public purposes, from these impact fees, provided that
the impact fees for such development activity shall be paid from public funds
other than impact fee accounts;

(3)
Shall provide a credit for the value of any dedication of land for, improvement
to, or new construction of any system improvements provided by the developer,
to facilities that are identified in the capital facilities plan and that are
required by the county, city, or town as a condition of approving the
development activity;

(4)
Shall provide that impact fees for residential construction be collected at
the time of certificate of occupancy or final inspection or twelve months after
the building permit is issued;

(5)
Shall allow the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees to adjust the
standard impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual
circumstances in specific cases to ensure that impact fees are imposed fairly;

(((5)))
(6) Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee to
be imposed on a particular development that permits consideration of studies
and data submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee;

(((6)))
(7) Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within which it
shall calculate and impose impact fees for various land use categories per unit
of development;

(((7))) (8) May provide for the imposition of an
impact fee for system improvement costs previously incurred by a county, city,
or town to the extent that new growth and development will be served by the
previously constructed improvements provided such fee shall not be imposed to
make up for any system improvement deficiencies.

---
END ---