BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.118.080 and 1998 c 245 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 19.118.160, the attorney general shall contract with
one or more ((private)) entities to conduct arbitration proceedings in
order to settle disputes between consumers and manufacturers as provided in
this chapter, and each ((private)) entity shall constitute a new motor
vehicle arbitration board for purposes of this chapter. The entities shall not
be affiliated with any manufacturer or new motor vehicle dealer and shall have
available the services of persons with automotive technical expertise to assist
in resolving disputes under this chapter. No ((private)) entity or its
officers or employees conducting board proceedings and no arbitrator presiding
at such proceedings shall be directly involved in the manufacture,
distribution, sale, or warranty service of any motor vehicle. To the extent
feasible, the identity of the bidding entity shall be excluded from the bid
review process. Payment to the entities for the arbitration services shall
be made from the new motor vehicle arbitration account.

(2)
The attorney general shall adopt rules for the uniform conduct of the
arbitrations by the boards whether conducted by ((a private)) an
entity or by the attorney general pursuant to RCW 19.118.160, which rules shall
include but not be limited to the following procedures:

(a)
At all arbitration proceedings, the parties are entitled to present oral and
written testimony, to present witnesses and evidence relevant to the dispute,
to cross-examine witnesses, and to be represented by counsel.

(b)
A dealer, manufacturer, or other persons shall produce records and documents
requested by a party which are reasonably related to the dispute. If a dealer,
manufacturer, or other person refuses to comply with such a request, a party
may present a request to the board for the attorney general to issue a subpoena
on behalf of the board.

The
subpoena shall be issued only for the production of records and documents which
the board has determined are reasonably related to the dispute, including but
not limited to documents described in RCW 19.118.031 (4) or (5).

If
a party fails to comply with the subpoena, the arbitrator may at the outset of
the arbitration hearing impose any of the following sanctions: (i) Find that
the matters which were the subject of the subpoena, or any other designated
facts, shall be taken to be established for purposes of the hearing in
accordance with the claim of the party which requested the subpoena; (ii)
refuse to allow the disobedient party to support or oppose the designated
claims or defenses, or prohibit that party from introducing designated matters
into evidence; (iii) strike claims or defenses, or parts thereof; or (iv)
render a decision by default against the disobedient party.

If
a nonparty fails to comply with a subpoena and upon an arbitrator finding that
without such compliance there is insufficient evidence to render a decision in
the dispute, the attorney general shall enforce such subpoena in superior court
and the arbitrator shall continue the arbitration hearing until such time as
the nonparty complies with the subpoena or the subpoena is quashed.

(c)
A party may obtain written affidavits from employees and agents of a dealer, a
manufacturer or other party, or from other potential witnesses, and may submit
such affidavits for consideration by the board.

(d)
Records of the board proceedings shall be open to the public. The hearings
shall be open to the public to the extent practicable.

(e)
Where the board proceedings are conducted by one or more ((private))
entities, a single arbitrator may be designated to preside at such proceedings.

(3)
A consumer shall exhaust the new motor vehicle arbitration board remedy or
informal dispute resolution settlement procedure under RCW 19.118.150 before
filing any superior court action.

(4)
The attorney general shall maintain records of each dispute submitted to the
new motor vehicle arbitration board, including an index of new motor vehicles
by year, make, and model.

(5)
The attorney general shall compile aggregate annual statistics for all disputes
submitted to, and decided by, the new motor vehicle arbitration board, as well
as annual statistics for each manufacturer that include, but shall not be
limited to, the number and percent of: (a) Replacement motor vehicle requests;
(b) purchase price refund requests; (c) replacement motor vehicles obtained in
prehearing settlements; (d) purchase price refunds obtained in prehearing
settlements; (e) replacement motor vehicles awarded in arbitration; (f)
purchase price refunds awarded in arbitration; (g) board decisions neither
complied with during the forty calendar day period nor petitioned for appeal
within the thirty calendar day period; (h) board decisions appealed categorized
by consumer or manufacturer; (i) the nature of the court decisions and who the
prevailing party was; (j) appeals that were held by the court to be brought
without good cause; and (k) appeals that were held by the court to be brought
solely for the purpose of harassment. The statistical compilations shall be
public information.

(6)
The attorney general shall adopt rules to implement this chapter. Such rules
shall include uniform standards by which the boards shall make determinations
under this chapter, including but not limited to rules which provide:

(a)
A board shall find that a nonconformity exists if it determines that the
consumer's new motor vehicle has a defect, serious safety defect, or condition
that substantially impairs the use, value, or safety of the vehicle.

(b)
A board shall find that a reasonable number of attempts to repair a
nonconformity have been undertaken if: (i) The same serious safety defect has
been subject to diagnosis or repair two or more times, at least one of which is
during the period of coverage of the applicable manufacturer's written
warranty, and the serious safety defect continues to exist; (ii) the same
nonconformity has been subject to diagnosis or repair four or more times, at
least one of which is during the period of coverage of the applicable
manufacturer's written warranty, and the nonconformity continues to exist; or
(iii) the vehicle is out of service by reason of diagnosis or repair of one or
more nonconformities for a cumulative total of thirty calendar days, at least
fifteen of them during the period of the applicable manufacturer's written
warranty. For purposes of this subsection, the manufacturer's written warranty
shall be at least one year after the date of the original delivery to the
consumer of the vehicle or the first twelve thousand miles of operation,
whichever occurs first.

(c)
A board shall find that a manufacturer has failed to comply with RCW 19.118.041
if it finds that the manufacturer, its agent, or the new motor vehicle dealer
has failed to correct a nonconformity after a reasonable number of attempts and
the manufacturer has failed, within forty days of the consumer's written
request, to repurchase the vehicle or replace the vehicle with a vehicle
identical or reasonably equivalent to the vehicle being replaced.

(7)
The attorney general shall provide consumers with information regarding the
procedures and remedies under this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.118.160 and 1989 c 347 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the attorney general is unable at any time to contract with ((private))
entities to conduct arbitrations under the procedures and standards in this
chapter, the attorney general shall establish one or more new motor vehicle
arbitration boards. Each such board shall consist of three members appointed
by the attorney general, only one of whom may be directly involved in the
manufacture, distribution, sale, or service of any motor vehicle. Board
members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and shall be compensated pursuant to RCW 43.03.240.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---