BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.56.060 and 1991 c 245 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The county treasurer ((upon receiving any tax paid in cash,
shall give to the person paying the same)) shall give a receipt to any
taxpayer who pays in cash or requests a receipt. The treasurer shall
record the payment of all taxes in the treasurer's records by parcel. The
owner or owners of property against which there are delinquent taxes, shall
have the right to pay the current tax without paying any delinquent taxes there
may be against the property.

---
END ---