BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
When an application is made by a new applicant or by an existing card room licensee
for participation in the card room pilot program or any successor licensing
program for minicasinos, the gambling commission shall notify the chief
executive officer of the city or town in which the application may be granted.

(2)
The chief executive officer of the city or town may request that the gambling
commission halt any consideration of the application and any other subsequent
application from the same or any other applicant based on the need to consider
the local impact of the granting of the application or additional
applications. The gambling commission shall grant the request and take no
action on the application prior to April 1, 2000.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.46.070 and 1993 c 344 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)
To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to bona
fide charitable or nonprofit organizations approved by the commission meeting
the requirements of this chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto permitting said organizations to conduct bingo games, raffles,
amusement games, and social card games, to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs
in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules and regulations
adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or suspend said licenses for violation
of any provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission shall not deny a license to an otherwise
qualified applicant in an effort to limit the number of licenses to be issued:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission or director shall not issue, deny,
suspend, or revoke any license because of considerations of race, sex, creed,
color, or national origin: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may
authorize the director to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to
final action by the commission;

(2)
To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any
person, association, or organization operating a business primarily engaged in
the selling of items of food or drink for consumption on the premises, approved
by the commission meeting the requirements of this chapter and any rules and
regulations adopted pursuant thereto permitting said person, association, or
organization to utilize punch boards and pull-tabs and to conduct social card
games as a commercial stimulant in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto and to revoke or
suspend said licenses for violation of any provisions of this chapter and any
rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto: PROVIDED, That the commission
shall not deny a license to an otherwise qualified applicant in an effort to limit
the number of licenses to be issued except as provided under section 1 of
this act: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may authorize the director
to temporarily issue or suspend licenses subject to final action by the
commission;

(3)
To authorize and issue licenses for a period not to exceed one year to any
person, association, or organization approved by the commission meeting the
requirements of this chapter and meeting the requirements of any rules and
regulations adopted by the commission pursuant to this chapter as now or
hereafter amended, permitting said person, association, or organization to
conduct or operate amusement games in such manner and at such locations as the
commission may determine;

(4)
To authorize, require, and issue, for a period not to exceed one year, such
licenses as the commission may by rule provide, to any person, association, or
organization to engage in the selling, distributing, or otherwise supplying or
in the manufacturing of devices for use within this state for those activities
authorized by this chapter;

(5)
To establish a schedule of annual license fees for carrying on specific
gambling activities upon the premises, and for such other activities as may be
licensed by the commission, which fees shall provide to the commission not less
than an amount of money adequate to cover all costs incurred by the commission
relative to licensing under this chapter and the enforcement by the commission
of the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted pursuant
thereto: PROVIDED, That all licensing fees shall be submitted with an
application therefor and such portion of said fee as the commission may
determine, based upon its cost of processing and investigation, shall be
retained by the commission upon the withdrawal or denial of any such license
application as its reasonable expense for processing the application and
investigation into the granting thereof: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if in a
particular case the basic license fee established by the commission for a
particular class of license is less than the commission's actual expenses to
investigate that particular application, the commission may at any time charge
to that applicant such additional fees as are necessary to pay the commission
for those costs. The commission may decline to proceed with its investigation
and no license shall be issued until the commission has been fully paid
therefor by the applicant: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may
establish fees for the furnishing by it to licensees of identification stamps
to be affixed to such devices and equipment as required by the commission and
for such other special services or programs required or offered by the
commission, the amount of each of these fees to be not less than is adequate to
offset the cost to the commission of the stamps and of administering their
dispersal to licensees or the cost of administering such other special
services, requirements or programs;

(6)
To prescribe the manner and method of payment of taxes, fees and penalties to
be paid to or collected by the commission;

(7)
To require that applications for all licenses contain such information as may
be required by the commission: PROVIDED, That all persons (a) having a
managerial or ownership interest in any gambling activity, or the building in
which any gambling activity occurs, or the equipment to be used for any
gambling activity, or (b) participating as an employee in the operation of any
gambling activity, shall be listed on the application for the license and the
applicant shall certify on the application, under oath, that the persons named
on the application are all of the persons known to have an interest in any
gambling activity, building, or equipment by the person making such
application: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the commission may require fingerprinting
and background checks on any persons seeking licenses under this chapter or of
any person holding an interest in any gambling activity, building, or equipment
to be used therefor, or of any person participating as an employee in the
operation of any gambling activity;

(8)
To require that any license holder maintain records as directed by the
commission and submit such reports as the commission may deem necessary;

(9)
To require that all income from bingo games, raffles, and amusement games be
recorded and reported as established by rule or regulation of the commission to
the extent deemed necessary by considering the scope and character of the
gambling activity in such a manner that will disclose gross income from any
gambling activity, amounts received from each player, the nature and value of
prizes, and the fact of distributions of such prizes to the winners thereof;

(10)
To regulate and establish maximum limitations on income derived from bingo. In
establishing limitations pursuant to this subsection the commission shall take
into account (i) the nature, character, and scope of the activities of the
licensee; (ii) the source of all other income of the licensee; and (iii) the
percentage or extent to which income derived from bingo is used for charitable,
as distinguished from nonprofit, purposes. However, the commission's powers
and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary and not mandatory;

(11)
To regulate and establish the type and scope of and manner of conducting the
gambling activities authorized by this chapter, including but not limited to,
the extent of wager, money, or other thing of value which may be wagered or
contributed or won by a player in any such activities;

(12)
To regulate the collection of and the accounting for the fee which may be
imposed by an organization, corporation or person licensed to conduct a social
card game on a person desiring to become a player in a social card game in
accordance with RCW ((9.46.0281(4))) 9.46.0282;

(13)
To cooperate with and secure the cooperation of county, city, and other local
or state agencies in investigating any matter within the scope of its duties
and responsibilities;

(14)
In accordance with RCW 9.46.080, to adopt such rules and regulations as are
deemed necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. All
rules and regulations shall be adopted pursuant to the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW;

(15)
To set forth for the perusal of counties, city-counties, cities and towns,
model ordinances by which any legislative authority thereof may enter into the
taxing of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter;

(16)
To establish and regulate a maximum limit on salaries or wages which may be
paid to persons employed in connection with activities conducted by bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organizations and authorized by this chapter, where
payment of such persons is allowed, and to regulate and establish maximum
limits for other expenses in connection with such authorized activities,
including but not limited to rent or lease payments. However, the
commissioner's powers and duties granted by this subsection are discretionary
and not mandatory.

In
establishing these maximum limits the commission shall take into account the
amount of income received, or expected to be received, from the class of
activities to which the limits will apply and the amount of money the games
could generate for authorized charitable or nonprofit purposes absent such
expenses. The commission may also take into account, in its discretion, other
factors, including but not limited to, the local prevailing wage scale and
whether charitable purposes are benefited by the activities;

(17)
To authorize, require, and issue for a period not to exceed one year such
licenses or permits, for which the commission may by rule provide, to any
person to work for any operator of any gambling activity authorized by this
chapter in connection with that activity, or any manufacturer, supplier, or
distributor of devices for those activities in connection with such business.
The commission shall not require that persons working solely as volunteers in
an authorized activity conducted by a bona fide charitable or bona fide
nonprofit organization, who receive no compensation of any kind for any purpose
from that organization, and who have no managerial or supervisory
responsibility in connection with that activity, be licensed to do such work.
The commission may require that licensees employing such unlicensed volunteers
submit to the commission periodically a list of the names, addresses, and dates
of birth of the volunteers. If any volunteer is not approved by the
commission, the commission may require that the licensee not allow that person
to work in connection with the licensed activity;

(18)
To publish and make available at the office of the commission or elsewhere to
anyone requesting it a list of the commission licensees, including the name,
address, type of license, and license number of each licensee;

(19)
To establish guidelines for determining what constitutes active membership in
bona fide nonprofit or charitable organizations for the purposes of this
chapter; and

(20)
To perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out the purposes and
provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---