BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.21.830 and 1981 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The imposition of controls on rent is of state-wide significance
and is preempted by the state. No city or town of any class, with a
population less than four hundred thousand, may enact, maintain, or enforce
ordinances or other provisions which regulate the amount of rent to be charged
for single family or multiple unit residential rental structures or sites other
than properties in public ownership, under public management, or properties
providing low-income rental housing under joint public-private agreements for
the financing or provision of such low-income rental housing. This section
shall not be construed as prohibiting any city or town from entering into
agreements with private persons which regulate or control the amount of rent to
be charged for rental properties.

---
END ---