BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the summer chum salmon (Onchorynchus keta)
evolutionarily significant unit of Hood Canal within the Puget Sound chinook
salmon (Onchorynchus tshawytscha) evolutionarily significant unit is in
danger of extinction, and that other wild stocks of salmon and steelhead in
Hood Canal have been drastically reduced. The legislature also finds that
other species of fish, including ling cod, black cod, perch, and smelt, have
been greatly depleted in the unique body of water known as Hood Canal. The
legislature finds that a closing of this body of water to fishing would help
restore the natural balance of all these species.

Sec.
2. RCW
75.46.010 and 1998 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to test
the results of actions taken so that the management and related policy can be
changed promptly and appropriately.

(2)
"Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects and
salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring positive benefits
from habitat projects.

(3)
"Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from the
critical pathways methodology under RCW 75.46.070(2). Each project on the list
must have a written agreement from the landowner on whose land the project will
be implemented. Projects include habitat restoration projects, habitat
protection projects, habitat projects that improve water quality, habitat
projects that protect water quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, and
habitat project maintenance and monitoring activities.

(4)
"Habitat work schedule" means those projects from the habitat project
list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle. The schedule
shall also include a list of the entities and individuals implementing
projects, the start date, duration, estimated date of completion, estimated
cost, and funding sources for the projects.

(5)
"Hood Canal coordinating council" means the council of governments
created within Kitsap, Jefferson, and Mason counties as provided under chapter
39.34 RCW.

(6)
"Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability of habitat
to fully sustain populations of salmon. These factors are primarily fish
passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian corridors, stream
channels, and wetlands.

(((6)))
(7) "Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district,
tribal government, a combination of such governments through interlocal agreements
provided under chapter 39.34 RCW, a nonprofit organization, or one or more
private citizens.

(((7)))
(8) "Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae
which are capable of self-sustaining, natural production.

(((8)))
(9) "Salmon recovery plan" means a state plan developed in
response to a proposed or actual listing under the federal endangered species
act that addresses limiting factors including, but not limited to harvest,
hatchery, hydropower, habitat, and other factors of decline.

(((9)))
(10) "Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized
Indian tribes.

(((10)))
(11) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established
in chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

(((11)))
(12) "Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the
person under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal owner's
property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Hood Canal marine sanctuary is created within the geographic area covered
by the Hood Canal summer chum salmon evolutionarily significant unit. The
sanctuary is bounded by northwest corner of Kitsap county and runs due west to
the shoreline of Jefferson county and claims all waters south of that
boundary. The sanctuary is designed to protect, preserve, and fully recover in
the following order:

(a)
Wild or naturally spawning summer chum salmon, chinook salmon, coho salmon, and
steelhead;

(b)
Herring, smelt, ling cod, perch, and black cod; and

(c)
All other species of aquatic animal and plant life indigenous to Hood Canal.

(2)
The fish and wildlife commission, in coordination with the tribal comanagers,
shall prohibit any harvest of wild or naturally spawning summer chum, fall chinook,
or coho salmon, or of steelhead, in Hood Canal and its tributaries until such
time as the runs have fully recovered and can sustain such harvest without
impairing future production.

(3)
Chum, chinook, and coho salmon and steelhead of hatchery origin in Hood Canal
may continue to be harvested commercially in a manner the fish and wildlife
commission, in coordination with the tribal comanagers, determines will
minimize the by-catch of wild or naturally spawning salmon and steelhead. Such
harvest shall be monitored to ensure that significant numbers of wild or
naturally spawning stocks of salmon and steelhead are not present in the run at
the time of harvest. If protected runs have already reached their spawning
streams or moved well beyond the harvest activities, such by-catch will not be
regarded as significant.

(4)
By June 30, 2001, the department of fish and wildlife, in coordination with the
tribal comanagers, shall develop a definition of full recovery as it is applied
to summer chum, chinook, and coho salmon and steelhead. This definition shall
be based on the most recently available scientific data and shall be based
primarily on a field inventory count of escapement in all spawning
tributaries. By September 30, 1999, the department shall provide a complete
inventory of all streams in the geographic area covered by the summer chum
salmon evolutionarily significant unit. The effort to define full recovery and
to identify all of the streams shall include the participation of the Hood
Canal coordinating council and of the Hood Canal salmon enhancement group.

(5)
The department of fish and wildlife may use remote site incubators to enhance
summer chum salmon production. The department, in coordination with the Hood
Canal salmon enhancement group, shall:

(a)
Identify sites on tributaries of Hood Canal that would be suitable for the
placement of remote site incubators; and

(b)
Place the incubators in suitable locations and manage the incubators as
necessary.

(6)
The department, in coordination with the Hood Canal coordination council and
volunteer groups, shall direct efforts toward ensuring that suitable habitat in
the watersheds covered by the summer chum evolutionarily significant unit is
used by naturally spawning summer chum salmon.

(7)
The Hood Canal coordinating council shall report to the salmon recovery office
as provided in RCW 75.46.040 on the status of summer chum runs after the
harvest prohibition has been in place for two generations of summer chum
salmon. The first report on summer chum returns shall be provided no later
than December 31, 2004, and the second report shall be provided no later than
December 31, 2008. At such time as it is determined that all species of salmon
and steelhead have reached full recovery, the department of fish and wildlife
shall submit a report to the legislature with a recommendation to change the
designation of sanctuary to a designation that would allow controlled harvest.

(8)
The department of fish and wildlife is authorized to extend the same protection
to those waters outside of the marine sanctuary as defined in subsection (1) of
this section that enter into Hood Canal as to Hood Canal or its tributaries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---