BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter, the value of
services and information relating to tip income received and reported to the
internal revenue service by a restaurant, tavern, or bar.

(2)
The credit allowed under this section is limited to an amount equal to two and
one-half percent of the value of tip income received by employees that is
reported by a restaurant, tavern, or bar to the internal revenue service.

(3) As used in this section, "restaurant" does not
include grocery stores, minimarkets, or convenience stores.

---
END ---