BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

The chief clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary
of the senate shall provide for special procedures to dispose of surplus laptop
computers that were assigned to legislators. Under these special procedures,
the legislator to whom a laptop computer was assigned may, at his or her sole
discretion, determine whether the surplus laptop computer shall be disposed of
following the normal procedures for disposing of surplus personal property
owned by the house of representatives or senate or shall be donated to a
developmentally disabled person who is confined to a wheelchair. The special
procedures shall allow the legislator to select the ddevelopmentally disabled
person who is confined to a wheelchair to whom the surplus laptop computer is
donated.

---
END ---