BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.195 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds additional safeguards are necessary to ensure safety of
school children attending approved private schools in the state of Washington.
In order to ensure this goal, by June 30, 1999, private schools approved under
this chapter shall require that all employees who have regularly scheduled
unsupervised access to children and were hired before July 1, 1999, undergo a
record check through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system
under RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.838 and 10.97.050, and through the federal
bureau of investigation. The record check shall include a fingerprint check
using a complete Washington state criminal identification card. Certified
employees who have completed a record check in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010
are not required to undergo the record check required by this section. The
superintendent of public instruction shall provide a copy of the record report
to the employee. Once an employee has a record check as required under this
section, additional record checks shall not be required of the employee unless
required by other provisions of law.

(2)
Private schools under this chapter and their employees shall not be required by
the state patrol or superintendent of public instruction to pay for the record
check required in this section.

(3)
The record checks required in this section shall be in process no later than
September 30, 1999.

(4)
This section expires March 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of
section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.195 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By June 30, 1999, private schools approved under this chapter shall require
that all employees who have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children
and were hired after June 30, 1999, undergo a record check through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830
through 43.43.838 and 10.97.050, and through the federal bureau of
investigation. The record check shall include a fingerprint check using a
complete Washington state criminal identification card. Certified employees
who have completed a record check in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010 are not
required to undergo the record check required by this section.

(2)
The approved private school or the employee or applicant shall pay the costs
associated with the record check required in this section.

(3)
The processing of record checks required in this section for employees hired
after July 1, 1999, shall begin by September 30, 1999.

(4)
When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending completion
of the investigation. If the applicant has had this record check within the
prior two years, the approved private school or contractor may waive the
requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---