BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the following principles must be adopted in order to
establish affordable health care for individuals:

(1)
Preserve access to appropriate health insurance coverage for individuals regardless
of their age, gender, or current health status;

(2)
Retain the financial viability and solvency of both public and private programs
dedicated to providing insurance coverage;

(3)
Create appropriate incentives for consumers to obtain and keep insurance;

(4)
Spread the cost of insuring those who need the most care among the broadest
community; and

(5)
Increase the diversity of benefit packages available for those purchasing
insurance in the individual market.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.41.020 and 1987 c 431 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the purpose and intent of the legislature to provide access to health
insurance coverage to all residents of Washington who have extraordinary
health care needs, or who are denied adequate health insurance for any
reason. It is the intent of the legislature that adequate levels of health
insurance coverage be made available to these residents ((of
Washington who are otherwise considered uninsurable or who are underinsured)).
It is the intent of the Washington state health insurance coverage access act
to provide a mechanism to insure the availability of comprehensive health
insurance to persons unable to obtain such insurance coverage on either an
individual or group basis directly under any health plan.

Sec.
3. RCW
48.41.030 and 1997 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meaning indicated, unless
the context requires otherwise:

(1)
"Accounting year" means a twelve-month period determined by the board
for purposes of record-keeping and accounting. The first accounting year may
be more or less than twelve months and, from time to time in subsequent years,
the board may order an accounting year of other than twelve months as may be
required for orderly management and accounting of the pool.

(2)
"Administrator" means the ((entity chosen by the board to
administer the pool under RCW 48.41.080)) administrator of the
Washington state health care authority.

(3)
"Board" means the board of directors of the pool.

(4)
"Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.

(5)
"Covered person" means any individual resident of this state who is
eligible to receive benefits from any member, or other health plan.

(6)
"Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW ((70.38.025))
48.43.005.

(7)
"Health care provider" ((means any physician, facility, or health
care professional, who is licensed in Washington state and entitled to
reimbursement for health care services)) has the same meaning as in RCW
48.43.005.

(8)
"Health care services" ((means services for the purpose of
preventing, alleviating, curing, or healing human illness or injury)) has
the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.

(9)
"Health coverage" means any group or individual disability insurance
policy, health care service contract, and health maintenance agreement, except
those contracts entered into for the provision of health care services pursuant
to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq. The
term does not include short-term care, long-term care, dental, vision,
accident, fixed indemnity, disability income contracts, civilian health and
medical program for the uniform services (CHAMPUS), 10 U.S.C. 55, limited
benefit or credit insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability
insurance, insurance arising out of the worker's compensation or similar law,
automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are
payable with or without regard to fault and which is statutorily required to be
contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(10)
"Health plan" ((means any arrangement by which persons, including
dependents or spouses, covered or making application to be covered under this
pool, have access to hospital and medical benefits or reimbursement including
any group or individual disability insurance policy; health care service
contract; health maintenance agreement; uninsured arrangements of group or
group-type contracts including employer self-insured, cost-plus, or other
benefit methodologies not involving insurance or not governed by Title 48 RCW;
coverage under group-type contracts which are not available to the general
public and can be obtained only because of connection with a particular
organization or group; and coverage by medicare or other governmental
benefits. This term includes coverage through "health coverage" as
defined under this section, and specifically excludes those types of programs
excluded under the definition of "health coverage" in subsection (9)
of this section)) has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.

(11)
"Medical assistance" means coverage under Title XIX of the federal
Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., Sec. 1396 et seq.) and chapter 74.09 RCW.

(12)
"Medicare" means coverage under Title XVIII of the Social Security
Act, (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).

(13)
"Member" means any commercial insurer which provides disability
insurance, stop loss insurance, any health care service contractor, and
any health maintenance organization licensed under Title 48 RCW.
"Member" shall also mean, as soon as authorized by federal law,
employers and other entities, including a self-funding entity and employee
welfare benefit plans that provide health plan benefits in this state on or
after May 18, 1987. "Member" does not include any insurer, health care
service contractor, or health maintenance organization whose products are
exclusively dental products or those products excluded from the definition of
"health coverage" set forth in subsection (9) of this section.

(14)
"Network provider" means a health care provider who has contracted in
writing with the pool administrator or a health carrier contracting with the
administrator to offer pool coverage to accept payment from and to look
solely to the pool or health carrier according to the terms of the pool
health plans.

(15)
"Plan of operation" means the pool, including articles, by-laws, and
operating rules, adopted by the board ((pursuant to RCW 48.41.050)) under
section 6 of this act.

(16)
"Point of service plan" means a benefit plan offered by the pool
under which a covered person may elect to receive covered services from network
providers, or nonnetwork providers at a reduced rate of benefits.

(17)
"Pool" means the Washington state health insurance pool as created in
RCW 48.41.040.

(18)
"Standardized risk assessment" means a scientifically valid tool
defined by the board that is uniformly applied by all carriers to determine
health risk thresholds for enrollment in the individual market or the pool.

(19)
"Substantially equivalent health plan" means a "health
plan" as defined in subsection (10) of this section which, in the judgment
of the ((board or the administrator)) commissioner, offers
persons including dependents or spouses covered or making application to be
covered by this pool an overall level of benefits deemed approximately
equivalent to the minimum benefits available under this pool.

Sec.
4. RCW
48.41.040 and 1989 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is ((hereby)) created ((a nonprofit entity to be known as))
the Washington state health insurance pool. All members in this state on or
after May 18, 1987, shall be members of the pool. When authorized by federal
law, all self-insured employers shall also be members of the pool.

(2)
((Pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW the commissioner shall, within ninety days
after May 18, 1987, give notice to all members of the time and place for the
initial organizational meetings of the pool.)) A board of directors shall
be established((, which shall be comprised of nine members. The
commissioner shall select three members of the board who shall represent (a)
the general public, (b) health care providers, and (c) health insurance
agents. The remaining members of the board shall be selected by election from
among the members of the pool. The elected members shall, to the extent
possible, include at least one representative of health care service
contractors, one representative of health maintenance organizations, and one
representative of commercial insurers which provides disability insurance.
When self-insured organizations become eligible for participation in the pool,
the membership of the board shall be increased to eleven and at least one
member of the board shall represent the self-insurers)) as follows: The
administrator and the insurance commissioner as ex officio nonvoting members;
three members representing health carriers; one member representing private
health care purchasers; one member representing health care providers; two
members representing consumers; and two members at large. All nonex officio
members shall have voting privileges. The governor shall appoint all nonex
officio members and designate a chair to serve at the governor's pleasure.

(3)
The original nonex officio members of the board of directors shall be
appointed for intervals of one to three years. Thereafter, all board members
shall serve a term of three years. Board members shall receive no
compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all travel expenses as provided in
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(((4)
The board shall submit to the commissioner a plan of operation for the pool and
any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable,
and equitable administration of the pool. The commissioner shall, after notice
and hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, approve the plan of operation if it
is determined to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of
the pool and provides for the sharing of pool losses on an equitable,
proportionate basis among the members of the pool. The plan of operation shall
become effective upon approval in writing by the commissioner consistent with
the date on which the coverage under this chapter must be made available. If
the board fails to submit a plan of operation within one hundred eighty days
after the appointment of the board or any time thereafter fails to submit
acceptable amendments to the plan, the commissioner shall, within ninety days
after notice and hearing pursuant to chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW, adopt such
rules as are necessary or advisable to effectuate this chapter. The rules
shall continue in force until modified by the commissioner or superseded by a
plan submitted by the board and approved by the commissioner.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
board shall submit to the administrator a plan of operation for the pool and
any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable,
and equitable administration of the pool. The administrator shall, after
notice and hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, approve the plan of operation
if it is determined to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable
administration of the pool and provides for the sharing of pool losses on an
equitable, proportionate basis among the members of the pool. The plan of
operation shall become effective upon approval in writing by the administrator
consistent with the date on which the coverage under this chapter must be made
available. If the board fails to submit acceptable amendments to the plan, the
administrator shall, within ninety days after notice and hearing pursuant to
chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW, adopt such rules as are necessary or advisable to
effectuate this chapter. The rules shall continue in force until modified by
the administrator or superseded by a plan submitted by the board and approved
by the administrator.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
board shall develop a plan of operation and submit it to the administrator as
provided in section 5 of this act. The plan of operation shall:

(1)
Establish procedures for the handling and accounting of assets and moneys of
the pool;

(2)
Establish regular times and places for meetings of the board of directors;

(3)
Establish procedures for records to be kept of all financial transactions and
for an annual fiscal reporting to the administrator;

(4)
Establish procedures for the collection of assessments from all members to
provide for claims paid under the plan and for administrative expenses incurred
or estimated to be incurred during the period for which the assessment is made;

(5)
Establish a process to determine the amount of assessment pursuant to RCW
48.41.060, which shall occur after March 1st of each calendar year, and which
shall be due and payable within thirty days of the receipt of the assessment
notice, and make advance interim assessments as may be reasonable and necessary
for interim operating expenses. Any interim assessments will be credited as
offsets against any regular assessments due following the close of the year;

(6)
Develop a program to publicize the existence of the plan, the eligibility
requirements and procedures for enrollment, and to maintain public awareness of
the plan;

(7)
Establish procedures under which applicants and participants may have
grievances reviewed by an impartial body and reported to the board;

(8)
Establish a standardized risk assessment method to determine enrollment in pool
or individual coverage;

(9)
Modify pool benefits, as necessary, and as permitted in this chapter;

(10)
Establish levels and method of provider payment;

(11)
Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as necessary to
provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool, policy, and other
contract design, and any other function within the authority of the pool;

(12)
Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the financial data
submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the pool to have an annual
audit of its operations by an independent certified public accountant;

(13)
Establish appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments, expense
allowances, agent referral fees, claim reserve formulas, and any other
actuarial functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates shall not
be unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the risk experience, and
expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and rate schedules may be adjusted
for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation in claim costs and
shall take into consideration appropriate risk factors in accordance with
established actuarial underwriting practices consistent with Washington state
small group plan rating requirements under RCW 48.44.023 and 48.46.066; and

(14)
Contain additional provisions necessary and proper for the execution of the
powers and duties of the pool.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The administrator shall have the general powers and authority granted to
members to offer or provide the health coverage defined under this title.

(2)
The administrator shall perform or enter into contracts as necessary and proper
to carry out the following duties:

(a)
All eligibility and administrative claim payment functions relating to the
pool;

(b)
Establishing a premium billing procedure for collection of premiums from
covered persons. Billings shall be made on a periodic basis as determined by
the board, which shall not be more frequent than a monthly billing;

(c)
Performing all necessary functions to assure timely payment of benefits to
covered persons under the pool including:

(i)
Making available information relating to the proper manner of submitting a
claim for benefits to the pool, distributing forms upon which submission shall
be made, and evaluating the eligibility of each claim for payment by the pool;
and

(ii)
Taking steps necessary to offer and administer managed care benefit plans;

(d)
Issuing on behalf of the pool policies of health coverage in accordance with
the requirements of RCW 48.41.110 and this chapter;

(e)
Assessing members of the pool in accordance with the provisions of this chapter
and the plan of operation;

(f)
Submit regular reports to the board regarding the operation of the pool. The
frequency, content, and form of the report shall be as determined by the board;
and

(g)
Following the close of each accounting year, make a determination of net paid
and earned premiums, the expense of administration, and the paid and incurred
losses for the year and report this information to the board.

(3)
The administrator shall be reimbursed for costs incurred through assessments
charged to members and administrative fees charged to covered persons. The
reimbursement methodology shall be determined by a formula established by the
board.

(4)
In addition thereto, the administrator may:

(a)
Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and
purposes of this chapter; and

(b)
Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary to avoid the
payment of improper claims against the pool or the coverage provided by or
through the pool.

Sec.
8. RCW
48.41.090 and 1989 c 121 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Following the close of each accounting year, the ((pool)) administrator
shall determine the net premium (premiums less administrative expense
allowances), the pool expenses of administration, and incurred losses for the
year, taking into account investment income and other appropriate gains and
losses.

(2)(a)
Each member's proportion of participation in the pool shall be determined
annually by the board based on annual statements and other reports deemed
necessary by the board and filed by the member with the commissioner; and shall
be determined by multiplying the total cost of pool operation by a fraction((,)).
The numerator of ((which)) the fraction equals that member's
total number of resident insured persons, including spouse and dependents under
the member's health plan and the number of resident insured persons covered
under stop loss policies issued to self-insured employer plans minus the number
of insured persons covered under individual policies or contracts in the
state during the preceding calendar year((, and)). The
denominator of ((which)) the fraction equals the total number of
resident insured persons including spouses and dependents insured under all
health plans, including employer purchased stop loss policies, in the
state by pool members.

(b)
Any deficit incurred by the pool shall be recouped by assessments among members
apportioned under this subsection pursuant to the formula set forth by the
board among members.

(3)
The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member
if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the
ability of the member to fulfill its contractual obligations. If an assessment
against a member is abated or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which
such assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members
in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in subsection
(2) of this section. The member receiving such abatement or deferment shall
remain liable to the pool for the deficiency.

(4)
If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the pool,
the excess shall be held at interest and used by the board to offset future
losses or to reduce pool premiums. As used in this subsection, "future
losses" includes reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

Sec.
9. RCW
48.41.100 and 1995 c 34 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Until January 1, 2000, any individual person who is a resident of this
state is eligible for coverage ((upon providing evidence of rejection for
medical reasons, a requirement of restrictive riders, an up-rated premium, or a
preexisting conditions limitation on health insurance, the effect of which is
to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a person considered a
standard risk, by at least one member within six months of the date of
application. Evidence of rejection may be waived in accordance with rules
adopted by the board)). After that date, any individual who is a
resident of the state and who meets the criteria in the standardized risk
assessment is eligible.

(2)
The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the pool:

(a)
Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i) twelve months have
lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can show continuous other
coverage which has been involuntarily terminated for any reason other than nonpayment
of premiums;

(b)
Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out ((five hundred thousand))
one million dollars in benefits;

(c)
Inmates of public institutions and persons whose benefits are duplicated under medical
assistance or other public programs.

(3)
Any person whose health insurance coverage is involuntarily terminated for any
reason other than nonpayment of premium may apply for coverage under the plan.

Sec.
10. RCW
48.41.110 and 1997 c 231 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The pool ((is authorized to)) shall offer one or more managed
care plans of coverage except in counties where adequate provider networks
cannot be established. Such plans may, but are not required to, include
point of service features that permit participants to receive in-network
benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to differential cost shares. The
board shall develop an alternative benefit design for counties where no managed
care networks are established. The design shall be similar to the managed care
plans' covered services and out-of-pocket expenses. Covered persons
enrolled in the pool on January 1, ((1997)) 2000, may continue
coverage under the pool plan in which they are enrolled on that date. However,
the pool may incorporate managed care features into such existing plans.

(2)
The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining the benefits and
exclusions of the pool policy in plain language. After approval by the board
((of directors)), such brochure shall be made reasonably available to
participants or potential participants.

(a)
The health insurance policy issued by the pool shall pay only usual, customary,
and reasonable charges for medically necessary eligible health care services
rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or treatment of illnesses, injuries,
and conditions which are not otherwise limited or excluded. Eligible expenses
are the usual, customary, and reasonable charges for the health care services
and items for which benefits are extended under the pool policy. Such benefits
shall at minimum include, but not be limited to, the following services or
related items:

(((a)))
(i) Hospital services, including charges for the most common semiprivate
room, for the most common private room if semiprivate rooms do not exist in the
health care facility, or for the private room if medically necessary, but
limited to a total of one hundred eighty inpatient days in a calendar year, and
limited to thirty days inpatient care for mental and nervous conditions, or
alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse per calendar year;

(((b)))
(ii) Professional services including surgery for the treatment of
injuries, illnesses, or conditions, other than dental, which are rendered by a
health care provider, or at the direction of a health care provider, by a staff
of registered or licensed practical nurses, or other health care providers;

(((c)))
(iii) The first twenty outpatient professional visits for the diagnosis
or treatment of one or more mental or nervous conditions or alcohol, drug, or
chemical dependency or abuse rendered during a calendar year by one or more
physicians, psychologists, or community mental health professionals, or, at the
direction of a physician, by other qualified licensed health care
practitioners, in the case of mental or nervous conditions, and rendered by a
state certified chemical dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW,
in the case of alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse;

(((d)))
(iv) Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a prescription;

(((e)))
(v) Services of a skilled nursing facility, excluding custodial and
convalescent care, for not more than one hundred days in a calendar year as
prescribed by a physician;

(((f)))
(vi) Services of a home health agency;

(((g)))
(vii) Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and nuclear medicine
therapy;

(((h)))
(viii) Oxygen;

(((i)))
(ix) Anesthesia services;

(((j)))
(x) Prostheses, other than dental;

(((k)))
(xi) Durable medical equipment which has no personal use in the absence
of the condition for which prescribed;

(((l)))
(xii) Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;

(((m)))
(xiii) Oral surgery limited to the following: Fractures of facial
bones; excisions of mandibular joints, lesions of the mouth, lip, or tongue,
tumors, or cysts excluding treatment for temporomandibular joints; incision of
accessory sinuses, mouth salivary glands or ducts; dislocations of the jaw;
plastic reconstruction or repair of traumatic injuries occurring while covered
under the pool; and excision of impacted wisdom teeth;

(((n)))
(xiv) Maternity care services, ((as provided in the managed care plan
to be designed by the pool board of directors, and)) for which no
preexisting condition waiting periods may apply;

(((o)))
(xv) Services of a physical therapist and services of a speech
therapist;

(((p)))
(xvi) Hospice services;

(((q)))
(xvii) Professional ambulance service to the nearest health care facility
qualified to treat the illness or injury; and

(((r)))
(xviii) Other medical equipment, services, or supplies required by
physician's orders and medically necessary and consistent with the diagnosis,
treatment, and condition.

(b)
The board shall design a managed care plan of coverage that provides services
similar to those contained in (a) of this subsection. The board is authorized
to deviate from this benefit design if medically appropriate, cost-effective
alternatives are or should become available. The board shall take benefit
design into consideration when establishing rates under RCW 48.41.200.

(3)
The board shall design and employ cost containment measures and requirements
such as, but not limited to, care coordination, provider network limitations,
preadmission certification, and concurrent inpatient review which may make the
pool more cost-effective. Reimbursement for network providers under the
managed care plan of coverage may include but is not limited to such
methodologies as resource based relative value fee schedules; capitation
payments; diagnostic related group fee schedules; and other similar strategies
including risk sharing arrangements.

(4)
The pool benefit policy may contain benefit limitations, exceptions, and cost
shares such as copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles that are consistent
with managed care products, except that differential cost shares may be adopted
by the board for nonnetwork providers under point of service plans. The pool
benefit policy cost shares and limitations must be consistent with those that
are generally included in health plans approved by the insurance commissioner;
however, no limitation, exception, or reduction may be used that would exclude
coverage for any disease, illness, or injury.

(5)
The pool may not reject an individual for health plan coverage based upon
preexisting conditions of the individual or deny, exclude, or otherwise limit
coverage for an individual's preexisting health conditions; except that it may
impose a three-month benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions for
which medical advice was given, or for which a health care provider recommended
or provided treatment, within three months before the effective date of
coverage. The pool may not avoid the requirements of this section through the
creation of a new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification.

Sec.
11. RCW
48.41.120 and 1989 c 121 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitation provided in subsection (3) of this section, a pool
policy offered in accordance with ((this chapter)) RCW
48.41.110(2)(a) shall impose a deductible. Deductibles of five hundred
dollars and one thousand dollars on a per person per calendar year basis shall
initially be offered. The board may authorize deductibles in other amounts.
The deductible shall be applied to the first five hundred dollars, one thousand
dollars, or other authorized amount of eligible expenses incurred by the
covered person.

(2)
Subject to the limitations provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
mandatory coinsurance requirement shall be imposed at the rate of twenty
percent of eligible expenses in excess of the mandatory deductible.

(3)
The maximum aggregate out of pocket payments for eligible expenses by the
insured in the form of deductibles and coinsurance under a pool policy
offered in accordance with RCW 48.41.110(2)(a) shall not exceed in a
calendar year:

(a)
One thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or three thousand dollars per
family, per calendar year for the five hundred dollar deductible policy;

(b)
Two thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or five thousand dollars per
family per calendar year for the one thousand dollar deductible policy; or

(c)
An amount authorized by the board for any other deductible policy.

(4)
Eligible expenses incurred by a covered person in the last three months of a
calendar year, and applied toward a deductible, shall also be applied toward
the deductible amount in the next calendar year.

(5)
A managed care plan of coverage issued in accordance with RCW 48.41.110(2)(b)
shall employ point-of-service cost-sharing copayments for covered services, the
amount to be determined by the board. In establishing the amount of cost
sharing, the board shall consider the cost-sharing amounts charged in other
managed care products offered to employer sponsored groups in this state. The
maximum annual out-of-pocket expenses shall not exceed three thousand five
hundred dollars. These amounts may be revised from time to time by the board.

(6)
The board may grant premium and cost sharing discounts of up to ten percent for
persons enrolled in the pool for more than twelve months.

Sec.
12. RCW
48.43.015 and 1995 c 265 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every health carrier issuing group coverage shall waive any preexisting
condition exclusion or limitation for persons or groups who had similar health
coverage under a different group or individual health plan at any time
during the three-month period immediately preceding the date of application for
the new health plan if such person was continuously covered under the
immediately preceding health plan. If the person was continuously covered for
at least three months under the immediately preceding group or individual
health plan, the carrier may not impose a waiting period for coverage of
preexisting conditions. If the person was continuously covered for less than
three months under the immediately preceding group or individual health
plan, the carrier must credit any waiting period under the immediately
preceding health plan toward the new health plan. For the purposes of this
subsection, a preceding health plan includes an employer provided self-funded
health plan.

(2)
Every carrier issuing individual coverage shall waive any preexisting
condition exclusion or limitation for persons who had similar health coverage
under a group health plan at any time during the three-month period immediately
preceding the date of application for the new individual health plan if the
person was continuously covered under the immediately preceding health plan.
If the person was continuously covered for less than three months under the
immediately preceding group health plan, the carrier must credit any waiting
period under the immediately preceding health plan toward the new health plan.
For the purposes of this subsection, health plan includes an employer provided
self-funded plan.

(3)
Every carrier issuing individual coverage shall waive any preexisting condition
exclusion or limitation as follows:

(a)
If the person has had individual health coverage for at least twelve months and
is seeking coverage during the month in which the person enrolled in their
existing individual health insurance coverage. In such a case, the person may
purchase any coverage without being subject to coverage for existing conditions
provisions;

(b)
If the person is seeking coverage at a time other than the month the person
enrolled in their previous individual health insurance coverage, the person may
be subject to the coverage for existing conditions provisions established in
this section but only for the benefits not covered in previous coverage; or

(c)
If the person is leaving the previous coverage for good cause, as determined by
the commissioner by rule, the person is eligible as set forth in (a) of this
subsection.

(4)
Subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, nothing contained
in this section requires a health carrier to amend a health plan to provide new
benefits in its existing health plans. In addition, nothing in this section
requires a carrier to waive benefit limitations not related to an individual or
group's preexisting conditions or health history.

Sec.
13. RCW
48.43.025 and 1995 c 265 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No carrier may reject an individual for health plan coverage based upon
preexisting conditions of the individual and no carrier may deny, exclude, or
otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting health conditions((;
except that a carrier may impose a three-month benefit waiting period for
preexisting conditions for which medical advice was given, or for which a
health care provider recommended or provided treatment within three months
before the effective date of coverage)) except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section.

(2)
Except as provided in RCW 48.43.015(3), upon application of an individual
for individual coverage, other than medicare supplemental coverage provided
under chapter 48.66 RCW, a carrier:

(a)
Must screen the applicant through the standardized risk assessment process
established under section 6 of this act, and if the individual exceeds the risk
threshold, refer the applicant to the Washington state health insurance pool
for pool coverage;

(b)
May, if the applicant does not exceed the risk threshold, but has a condition
for which medical advice was given, for which a health care provider
recommended or provided treatment, or for which a reasonable layperson would
have sought advice or treatment within six months before the effective date of
coverage, impose additional premiums for no more than twelve months in an
amount not to exceed the following:

(i)
A deductible of five hundred dollars;

(ii)
Coinsurance of forty percent of eligible expenses; and

(iii)
A maximum annual aggregate out-of-pocket expense of three thousand five hundred
dollars.

(3)
A person whose immediate prior coverage was through the Washington state health
insurance pool must be screened as set forth in subsection (2) of this section
before individual coverage eligibility.

(4)
No carrier may avoid the requirements of this section through the creation of a
new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification. A new or changed rate classification will be deemed an attempt
to avoid the provisions of this section if the new or changed classification
would substantially discourage applications for coverage from individuals or
groups who are higher than average health risks. These provisions apply only
to individuals who are Washington residents.

Sec.
14. RCW
70.47.060 and 1998 c 314 s 17 and 1998 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
administrator has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care
services, including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital
services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be
necessary for basic health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that funds are available, offer as basic health plan services chemical
dependency services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services shall
increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by more than
five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating
managed health care system under the Washington basic health plan shall be
entitled to receive covered basic health care services in return for premium
payments to the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize proven
preventive and primary health care and shall include all services necessary for
prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage
for groups of subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and
postnatal services through the medical assistance program under chapter 74.09
RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services except to the
extent that such services are necessary over not more than a one-month period
in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate
schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen years of age and
younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure
basic coverage through the plan only for their dependent children. In designing
and revising the schedule of services, the administrator shall consider the
guidelines for assessing health services under the mandated benefits act of
1984, RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as the administrator deems
appropriate.

However,
with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive
prenatal and postnatal services through the medical assistance program under
chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services
except to the extent that the services are necessary over not more than a
one-month period in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of
pregnancy by the managed care provider.

(2)(a)
To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator
from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross family income, giving
appropriate consideration to family size and the ages of all family members.
The enrollment of children shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums
shall be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.

(b)
To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized
enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the
state for the plan plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(c)
An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of a
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator.

(d)
To develop, as an offering by every health carrier subject to RCW 48.44.023,
48.46.066, or 48.21.045 providing coverage identical to the basic health
plan, as configured on January 1, 1996, a basic health plan model plan with
uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.

(3)
To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost sharing due a managed
health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure
shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but
shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.

(4)
To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an
overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the
administrator finds that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the
administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger
no longer exists.

(5)
To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as defined in RCW
70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who qualify may be based
on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the administrator.

(6)
To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery of services and
availability of the plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations
contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7)
To solicit and accept applications from managed health care systems, as defined
in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under
the plan. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health
care services are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection
of two or more participating managed health care systems. In adopting any
rules or procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make suitable
allowance for the need for health care services and the differences in local
availability of health care resources, along with other resources, within and
among the several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become
eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue to receive
services from their existing providers within the managed health care system if
such providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.

(8)
To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep
records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the
respective managed health care systems.

(9)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan,
on behalf of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for
enrollment in the Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale premiums.
Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption support
program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes
of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill the
enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of
up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define
the appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement
the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No
subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110,
who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter
74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10)
To accept applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their
employees, spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. The administrator may
require all or the substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures necessary to
facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed health
care system. The administrator may require that a business owner pay at least
an amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion of
the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee enrolled in
the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare who wish to
enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care coverage and
services from a managed care system participating in the plan. The
administrator shall adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or from
all such enrollees whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator with the
participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(11)
To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed health care
system in return for the provision of covered basic health care services to
enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of covered basic health care
services will be the same for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems. In
negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator shall consider
the characteristics of the populations served by the respective systems,
economic circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve the resources of
the basic health plan trust account, and other factors the administrator finds
relevant.

(12)
To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by participating
managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee access to good quality
basic health care, to require periodic data reports concerning the utilization
of health care services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate
information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of
participating managed health care systems to assure compliance with the
purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed
health care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care
systems and to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and
the department of health, to minimize duplication of effort.

(13)
To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care
coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal
statutes that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

(14)
To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and to integrate it
into the plan wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(15)
To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for rural residents,
underserved populations, and persons of color.

(16)
In consultation with appropriate state and local government agencies, to
establish criteria defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in
government-operated institutions.

(17)
To permit any participating managed health care system to bid and contract for
the subsidized basic health plan only.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Every
carrier that offers individual coverage shall offer and actively market to all
individuals a health plan with benefits not less than those defined in RCW
70.47.060(2)(d). However, benefits must include medical rehabilitation and
prescription drug benefits that are no less than those provided to public
employees under chapter 41.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state health pool coverage as presently constituted is opened to all
applicants until January 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing
in chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act) affects, modifies, or terminates
existing individual or group health plan coverage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. The
Washington state health insurance board shall develop a plan for feasibility
and implementation of a reinsurance mechanism to be applied to the individual
insurance market. The plan shall be submitted to the legislature by December
1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
48.20.028 (Mandatory offering to individuals providing basic
health plan benefits--Exemption from statutory requirements--Premium
rates--Definitions) and 1997 c 231 s 207 & 1995 c 265 s 13;

(2) RCW
48.41.050 (Operation plan--Contents) and 1987 c 431 s 5;

(3) RCW
48.41.060 (Board powers) and 1997 c 337 s 5, 1997 c 231 s 211,
1989 c 121 s 3, & 1987 c 431 s 6;

(4) RCW
48.41.080 (Pool administrator--Selection, term, duties, pay) and
1997 c 231 s 212, 1989 c 121 s 5, & 1987 c 431 s 8;

(5) RCW
48.44.022 (Mandatory offering to individuals providing basic
health plan benefits--Exemption from statutory requirements--Premium
rates--Definitions) and 1997 c 231 s 208 & 1995 c 265 s 15; and

(6) RCW
48.46.064 (Mandatory offering to individuals providing basic
health plan benefits--Exemption from statutory requirements--Premium
rates--Definitions) and 1997 c 231 s 209 & 1995 c 265 s 17.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20.
Section 16 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---