BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
48.22.005 (Definitions) and 1993 c 242 s 1;

(2) RCW
48.22.085 (Automobile liability insurance policy--Optional
coverage for personal injury protection--Rejection by insured) and 1993 c 242 s
2;

(3) RCW
48.22.090 (Personal injury protection coverage--Exceptions) and
1993 c 242 s 3;

(4) RCW 48.22.095
(Automobile insurance policies--Minimum personal injury protection
coverage--Maximum benefit limits) and 1993 c 242 s 4;

(5) RCW
48.22.100 (Automobile insurance policies--In lieu of minimum
personal injury protection coverage--Benefit limits) and 1993 c 242 s 5; and

(6) RCW
48.22.105 (Rule making) and 1993 c 242 s 9.

---
END ---