BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW to read as follows:

Any action brought by a Holocaust survivor or the heir or
beneficiary of a Holocaust survivor or victim, seeking proceeds of insurance
policies issued or in effect before 1945 shall not be dismissed for failure to
comply with the applicable statute of limitations, laches, or any other similar
provision of any applicable law that might prevent a claim from being heard on
its merits, or any notice requirements imposed by any insurance policy, provided
the action is commenced on or before December 31, 2010.

---
END ---