BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to amounts proceeding or accruing to a
person that engages in a travel service business and that holds a passenger
vessel surety bond, in compliance with Subpart A of Part 540 of Title 46, Code
of Federal Regulations, under a written cost-sharing agreement for allocable
reimbursement of administrative services incurred on behalf of a foreign
affiliate that also engages in a travel service business.
"Affiliate" means a person who directly or indirectly controls, or is
controlled by, or is under common control with, a person. "Foreign"
means the affiliate is organized under laws outside the United States.

---
END ---