BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that individuals receiving coverage for health care services
should have access to quality services that appropriately meet the needs of the
individuals. The legislature further finds that individuals should have choice
among the providers offering services within their coverage plan and should
have access to appropriate providers for services in need of specialized care.
The legislature also finds that disagreements regarding the course of treatment
or coverage of services recommended must be addressed in a consistent and
expedient manner to ensure the individual receives access to appropriate,
medically necessary care in a timely manner.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.43.095 and 1996 c 312 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each health carrier as defined in RCW 48.43.005, and the Washington state
health care authority, shall provide to all enrollees at a minimum the
following information:

(a)
A list of covered benefits, including prescription drugs, if any;

(b)
A list of exclusions, reductions, and limitations to covered benefits,
including policies and practices related to any drug formulary, and any
definition of medical necessity or other coverage criteria upon which they may
be based;

(c)
A statement containing the cost of premiums and enrollee point-of-service
cost-sharing requirements;

(d)
A full description of the procedures to be followed by an enrollee for
consulting a provider other than the primary care provider and whether the
enrollee's primary care provider, the carrier's medical director, or another
entity must authorize the referral;

(e)
Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for obtaining prior
authorization for health care services;

(f)
Circumstances under which the plan may retrospectively deny coverage for
emergency and nonemergency care that had prior authorization under the plan's
written policies; and

(g)
A copy of all grievance procedures for claim or service denial and for
dissatisfaction with care.

(2)
Upon the request of an enrollee or a prospective enrollee, a health carrier, as
defined in RCW 48.43.005, and the Washington state health care authority,
established by chapter 41.05 RCW, shall provide the following information:

(a)
The availability of a point-of-service plan and how the plan operates within
the coverage;

(b)
Any documents, instruments, or other information referred to in the enrollment
agreement;

(c)
((A full description of the procedures to be followed by an enrollee for
consulting a provider other than the primary care provider and whether the
enrollee's primary care provider, the carrier's medical director, or another
entity must authorize the referral;

(d)))
Whether a plan provider is restricted to prescribing drugs from a plan list or
plan formulary, what drugs are on the plan list or formulary, and the extent to
which enrollees will be reimbursed for drugs that are not on the plan's list or
formulary;

(((e)
Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for obtaining prior
authorization for health care services;

(f))) (d)
A written description of any reimbursement or payment arrangements, including,
but not limited to, capitation provisions, fee-for-service provisions, and
health care delivery efficiency provisions, between a carrier and a provider;

(((g)
Circumstances under which the plan may retrospectively deny coverage for
emergency and nonemergency care that had prior authorization under the plan's
written policies;

(h)
A copy of all grievance procedures for claim or service denial and for
dissatisfaction with care;)) and

(((i)))
(e) Descriptions and justifications for provider compensation programs,
including any incentives or penalties that are intended to encourage providers
to withhold services or minimize or avoid referrals to specialists.

(((2)))
(3) Each health carrier, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, and the Washington
state health care authority, established by chapter 41.05 RCW, shall provide to
all enrollees and prospective enrollees a list of available disclosure items.

(((3)))
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a carrier to
divulge proprietary information to an enrollee.

(((4)))
(5) The insurance commissioner is prohibited from adopting rules
regarding this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Emergency medical condition" means the sudden and, at the time,
unexpected onset of a health condition that requires immediate medical
attention, in which failure to provide medical attention would result in
serious impairment to bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a bodily organ
or part, or would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.

(2)
"Grievance" means an oral or written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of an enrollee regarding the availability, delivery, or quality of
health care services as described in section 4 of this act.

(3)
"Grievance procedure" means a procedure for health carriers to
respond to consumer complaints and conduct investigations of consumer
complaints according to the standards and rules adopted by the office of the
insurance commissioner.

(4)
"Health plan" means a policy, contract, certificate, or agreement
entered into, offered, or issued by a health carrier to provide, deliver,
arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of health care services.

(5)
"Health care provider" or "provider" includes:

(a)
A person regulated under Title 18 RCW or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health
or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this
state consistent with state law; or

(b)
An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in
the course and scope of his or her employment.

(6)
"Health care service" means that service offered or provided by
health care facilities and health care providers relating to the prevention,
cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.

(7)
"Health carrier" means a person or entity subject to the insurance
laws and rules of this state, or subject to the jurisdiction of the
commissioner, that contracts or offers to contract, or enters into an agreement
to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of
health care services, including a disability insurance company, a health care
service contractor, a health maintenance organization, and a fraternal benefit
society.

(8)
"Second opinion" means an opportunity or requirement to obtain a
clinical evaluation by a provider other than the one originally making a
recommendation for a proposed health care service to assess the necessity and
appropriateness of the initial proposed health care service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Each enrollee in a health plan must have adequate choice among qualified health
care providers. Each health plan must:

(a)
Allow each enrollee to choose a primary care provider who is accepting new
enrollees from a list of participating providers;

(b)
Provide for appropriate and timely referral of enrollees to a choice of
specialists within the plan if the primary care provider refers the enrollee to
specialty care;

(c)
Provide, upon request of an enrollee, access by the enrollee to a second
opinion from a participating provider regarding a medical diagnosis or
treatment plan;

(d)
Allow, upon termination of a participating provider for good cause, an enrollee
undergoing an active course of treatment, on either an inpatient or outpatient
basis for an illness or for a pregnancy, to continue treatment through the
provider for covered services. However: (i) Coverage is to be provided for up
to sixty days after the termination date for the condition that the enrollee is
receiving the active course of treatment; or (ii) coverage through completion
of postpartum care for an enrollee receiving coverage for a pregnancy. The
provider's relationship with the plan must be continued on the same terms and
conditions as those of the terminating contract, except for any provision
requiring that the health plan assign new enrollees to the terminated provider;
and

(e)
Communicate the plan's responsibilities under this subsection to all enrollees
and participating providers.

(2)
To meet the health care needs of enrollees for covered benefits, each health
plan must provide enrollees with appropriate access to primary care providers,
acute care hospitals, specialists and subspecialists, and specialty medical
services, including physical therapy, occupational therapy, chiropractic
services, and rehabilitation services as provided by the plan, that are within
a reasonable distance or travel time from the enrollee, including times of
inclement weather.

(3)
Each health carrier, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, is accountable for and must
oversee any activities required by this section that it delegates to any
contractor. No carrier may delegate any activity required by this section
unless the carrier has a written and fully operational delegation policy that
ensures that the contractor fulfills the requirements of this section.

(4)
No contract executed by the health carrier may relieve the health carrier of
its obligations to any enrollee for the provision of health care services or of
its responsibility for compliance with applicable statutes or rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Each health carrier, in its review of inpatient medical and surgical benefits
and outpatient medical and surgical benefits for residents of this state, shall
meet the standards set forth in this section.

(2)
Any decision to deny an admission, length of stay, extension of stay, or health
service or procedure must be made by a participating provider who has
reasonable access to board-certified specialty providers in making such
determinations. The decision shall be expeditiously transmitted to the
enrollee and the health care provider requesting the course of treatment.

(3)
Carriers shall maintain a documented utilization review program description and
written utilization review criteria based on reasonable medical evidence. The
program must include a method for reviewing and updating criteria. Carriers
shall make clinical protocols, medical management standards, and other review criteria
available upon request to participating providers.

(4)
No health carrier may preclude or discourage its providers from informing
patients of the care he or she requires, including various treatment options,
whether in the providers' view such care is consistent with the plan's health
coverage criteria, or otherwise covered by the patient's service agreement with
the health carrier. No health carrier may prohibit, discourage, or penalize a
provider otherwise practicing in compliance with the law from advocating on
behalf of a patient with a health carrier. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to authorize providers to bind health carriers to pay for any
service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Each
health maintenance organization, as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW, must provide
adequate telephone access by enrollees to facilities and providers for
sufficient time during the business and evening hours to ensure enrollee access
to health services for covered health conditions and emergent health care
needs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
legislature finds that health carrier grievance procedures should be
standardized in order to provide enrollees with a clear, consistent, and
efficient means of resolving complaints about the provision of health care.
Health carrier grievance procedures should offer consumers the opportunity to
have their complaint fairly reviewed first by the health carrier and, if
appealed, by an impartial hearing officer. Consumers should also be notified
of their right to file a complaint with the office of the insurance
commissioner throughout the grievance process. The legislature further
recognizes the authority of the office of the insurance commissioner to adopt
rules that govern health carrier managed care procedures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The insurance commissioner shall adopt by rule a standardized grievance
procedure for enrollees of all health carriers. The standard grievance
procedure must be available for all enrollees to file complaints about any
health carrier practices that impact enrollee access to, satisfaction with, or
quality of health care services, treatments, or providers. Enrollees' rights
to appeal health carrier decisions may not be limited in scope and must
include, but not be limited to:

(a)
Distance or time needed to travel to an appointment;

(b)
Access to specialists;

(c)
Cleanliness and safety of the providers' facilities;

(d)
Qualification and experience of providers;

(e)
Choice of provider;

(f)
Manner in which the patient is treated;

(g)
Access to appropriate services and treatment; and

(h)
Timeliness with which referrals, treatments, and services are approved and
provided.

(2)
The office of the insurance commissioner shall adopt rules to ensure that the
standardized grievance procedure:

(a)
Fully informs consumers about their rights, including their right to file
additional complaints with the appropriate state government agencies, and
identify the appropriate agencies for filing complaints;

(b)
Allows grievances to be filed orally or in writing;

(c)
Provides for action upon nonemergency grievances within twenty days, and
responds to emergency grievances within twenty-four hours;

(d)
Ensures grievances are reviewed by qualified personnel;

(e)
Provides consumers with rights to receive a second opinion about the course of
treatment;

(f)
Allows consumers to be represented by their provider, family member, attorney,
or other designated person, except as otherwise prohibited by law;

(g)
Gives both oral and written notification of the decision and the reasons for
the decision made;

(h)
Maintains recordkeeping on all grievances;

(i)
Provides the enrollee with access to all records concerning the enrollee's
grievance, excluding any records made confidential by any other section of law;

(j)
Involves no more than three levels of review, including the enrollee's initial
request for plan assistance or review whether orally or in writing; and

(k)
Informs the enrollee at each stage of the grievance procedure of the enrollee's
right to file additional complaints with the appropriate state government
agencies, and identifies the appropriate agencies for filing complaints.

(3)
Each health carrier shall designate qualified personnel to review grievances
who meet the standards adopted by rule by the office of the insurance
commissioner.

(4)
The health carrier shall assure that the grievance process is accessible to
enrollees who do not speak English, who have literacy problems, and who have
physical or mental disabilities that impede their access to file a grievance.
The office of the insurance commissioner shall adopt rules to ensure health
carriers make the grievance process accessible to all enrollees.

(5)
All health carriers shall file evidence of their implementation of the
standardized grievance procedure in writing to the office of the insurance
commissioner by January 1st annually. Health carriers may be excused from
resubmitting grievance procedures if there have been no changes since the
health carrier's previous submission. The filing must be available to the
general public by request to the office of the insurance commissioner.
Grievance procedures must be given in a separate brochure to each enrollee at
the time of enrollment and sent annually to all health carrier enrollees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
An enrollee's provider is not subject to liability for the negligent denial of
benefits by the health carrier, if the provider reasonably informs the enrollee
of the benefits, costs, risks, and alternatives pertaining to such treatment;
appeals the decision of the health carrier denying such benefits, in writing,
stating the reasons why such care or treatment is reasonable and necessary for
the enrollee; and cooperates and assists the enrollee with appeals of the
decision denying such treatment to the extent the provider can assist under
law. Such written appeal by the provider must be considered in grievance or
complaint investigation and any mediation proceeding.

(2)
A health carrier is liable in tort as would be a health care provider in a
medical negligence case if and when the health carrier is negligent in its
decision to refuse to pay for care to which the enrollee is entitled under the
enrollee's policy and that refusal causes personal injury or damages to the
enrollee.

Sec.
10. RCW
48.43.055 and 1995 c 265 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
health carrier as defined under RCW 48.43.005 shall file with the commissioner
its grievance procedures ((for review and adjudication of complaints
initiated by covered persons or health care providers. Procedures filed under
this section shall provide a fair review for consideration of complaints.
Every health carrier shall provide reasonable means whereby any person
aggrieved by actions of the health carrier may be heard in person or by their
authorized representative on their written request for review. If the health
carrier fails to grant or reject such request within thirty days after it is
made, the complaining person may proceed as if the complaint had been rejected))
as described in sections 3 and 7 through 9 of this act. A complaint
that has been rejected by the health carrier may be submitted to nonbinding
mediation. Mediation shall be conducted pursuant to mediation rules similar to
those of the American arbitration association, the center for public resources,
the judicial arbitration and mediation service, RCW 7.70.100, or any other
rules of mediation agreed to by the parties.

Sec.
11. RCW
48.46.020 and 1990 c 119 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated unless the context indicates otherwise.

(1)
"Health maintenance organization" means any organization receiving a
certificate of registration by the commissioner under this chapter which
provides comprehensive health care services to enrolled participants of such
organization on a group practice per capita prepayment basis or on a prepaid
individual practice plan, except for an enrolled participant's responsibility for
copayments and/or deductibles, either directly or through contractual or other
arrangements with other institutions, entities, or persons, and which qualifies
as a health maintenance organization pursuant to RCW 48.46.030 and 48.46.040.

(2)
"Comprehensive health care services" means basic consultative,
diagnostic, and therapeutic services rendered by licensed health professionals
together with emergency and preventive care, inpatient hospital, outpatient and
physician care, at a minimum, and any additional health care services offered
by the health maintenance organization.

(3)
"Enrolled participant" means a person who or group of persons which
has entered into a contractual arrangement or on whose behalf a contractual
arrangement has been entered into with a health maintenance organization to
receive health care services.

(4)
"Health professionals" means health care practitioners who are
regulated by the state of Washington.

(5)
"Health maintenance agreement" means an agreement for services
between a health maintenance organization which is registered pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and enrolled participants of such organization which
provides enrolled participants with comprehensive health services rendered to
enrolled participants by health professionals, groups, facilities, and other
personnel associated with the health maintenance organization.

(6)
"Consumer" means any member, subscriber, enrollee, beneficiary, or
other person entitled to health care services under terms of a health
maintenance agreement, but not including health professionals, employees of
health maintenance organizations, partners, or shareholders of stock
corporations licensed as health maintenance organizations.

(7)
"Meaningful role in policy making" means a procedure approved by the
commissioner which provides consumers or elected representatives of consumers a
means of submitting the views and recommendations of such consumers to the
governing board of such organization coupled with reasonable assurance that the
board will give regard to such views and recommendations.

(8)
"Meaningful grievance procedure" means a procedure for investigation
of consumer grievances ((in a timely manner aimed at mutual agreement for
settlement)) according to procedures ((approved by the commissioner)),
((and)) which may include ((arbitration)) nonbinding mediation
procedures as described in sections 3 and 7 through 9 of this act.

(9)
"Provider" means any health professional, hospital, or other
institution, organization, or person that furnishes any health care services
and is licensed or otherwise authorized to furnish such services.

(10)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(11)
"Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.

(12)
"Group practice" means a partnership, association, corporation, or
other group of health professionals:

(a)
The members of which may be individual health professionals, clinics, or both
individuals and clinics who engage in the coordinated practice of their
profession; and

(b)
The members of which are compensated by a prearranged salary, or by capitation
payment or drawing account that is based on the number of enrolled
participants.

(13)
"Individual practice health care plan" means an association of health
professionals in private practice who associate for the purpose of providing
prepaid comprehensive health care services on a fee-for-service or capitation
basis.

(14)
"Uncovered expenditures" means the costs to the health maintenance
organization of health care services that are the obligation of the health
maintenance organization for which an enrolled participant would also be liable
in the event of the health maintenance organization's insolvency and for which
no alternative arrangements have been made as provided herein. The term does
not include expenditures for covered services when a provider has agreed not to
bill the enrolled participant even though the provider is not paid by the health
maintenance organization, or for services that are guaranteed, insured, or
assumed by a person or organization other than the health maintenance
organization.

(15)
"Copayment" means an amount specified in a subscriber agreement which
is an obligation of an enrolled participant for a specific service which is not
fully prepaid.

(16)
"Deductible" means the amount an enrolled participant is responsible
to pay out-of-pocket before the health maintenance organization begins to pay
the costs associated with treatment.

(17)
"Fully subordinated debt" means those debts that meet the
requirements of RCW 48.46.235(3) and are recorded as equity.

(18)
"Net worth" means the excess of total admitted assets as defined in
RCW 48.12.010 over total liabilities but the liabilities shall not include
fully subordinated debt.

(19)
"Participating provider" means a provider as defined in subsection
(9) of this section who contracts with the health maintenance organization or
with its contractor or subcontractor and has agreed to provide health care
services to enrolled participants with an expectation of receiving payment,
other than copayment or deductible, directly or indirectly, from the health
maintenance organization.

(20)
"Carrier" means a health maintenance organization, an insurer, a
health care services contractor, or other entity responsible for the payment of
benefits or provision of services under a group or individual agreement.

(21)
"Replacement coverage" means the benefits provided by a succeeding
carrier.

(22)
"Insolvent" or "insolvency" means that the organization has
been declared insolvent and is placed under an order of liquidation by a court
of competent jurisdiction.

Sec.
12. RCW
48.46.100 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 290 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A
health maintenance organization shall establish and maintain a grievance
procedure, approved by the commissioner, ((to provide reasonable and
effective resolution of complaints initiated by enrolled participants concerning
any matter relating to the interpretation of any provision of such enrolled
participants' health maintenance contracts, including, but not limited to,
claims regarding the scope of coverage for health care services; denials,
cancellations, or nonrenewals of enrolled participants' coverage; and the
quality of the health care services rendered, and)) which may include
procedures for ((arbitration)) nonbinding mediation as described in
sections 3 and 7 through 9 of this act.

Sec.
13. RCW
48.43.093 and 1997 c 231 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When conducting a review of the necessity and appropriateness of emergency
services or making a benefit determination for emergency services:

(a)
A health carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to screen and
stabilize a covered person if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would have
believed that an emergency medical condition existed. In addition, a health
carrier shall not require prior authorization of such services provided prior
to the point of stabilization if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would
have believed that an emergency medical condition existed. With respect to
care obtained from a nonparticipating hospital emergency department, a health
carrier shall cover emergency services necessary to screen and stabilize a
covered person if a prudent layperson would have reasonably believed that use
of a participating hospital emergency department would result in a delay that
would worsen the emergency, or if a provision of federal, state, or local law
requires the use of a specific provider or facility. In addition, a health
carrier shall not require prior authorization of such services provided prior
to the point of stabilization if a prudent layperson acting reasonably would
have believed that an emergency medical condition existed and that use of a
participating hospital emergency department would result in a delay that would
worsen the emergency.

(b)
If an authorized representative of a health carrier authorizes coverage of
emergency services, the health carrier shall not subsequently retract its
authorization after the emergency services have been provided, or reduce
payment for an item or service furnished in reliance on approval, unless the approval
was based on a material misrepresentation about the covered person's health
condition made by the provider of emergency services.

(c)
Coverage of emergency services may be subject to applicable copayments,
coinsurance, and deductibles, and a health carrier may impose reasonable
differential cost-sharing arrangements for emergency services rendered by
nonparticipating providers, if such differential between cost-sharing amounts
applied to emergency services rendered by participating provider versus nonparticipating
provider does not exceed fifty dollars. Differential cost sharing for
emergency services may not be applied when a covered person is outside of
the health carrier's service area, or when the covered person presents to a
nonparticipating hospital emergency department rather than a participating
hospital emergency department when the health carrier requires preauthorization
for postevaluation or poststabilization emergency services if:

(i)
Due to circumstances beyond the covered person's control, the covered person
was unable to go to a participating hospital emergency department in a timely
fashion without serious impairment to the covered person's health; or

(ii)
A prudent layperson possessing an average knowledge of health and medicine would
have reasonably believed that he or she would be unable to go to a
participating hospital emergency department in a timely fashion without serious
impairment to the covered person's health.

(d)
If a health carrier requires preauthorization for postevaluation or
poststabilization services, the health carrier shall provide access to an
authorized representative twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week, to
facilitate review. In order for postevaluation or poststabilization services
to be covered by the health carrier, the provider or facility must make a
documented good faith effort to contact the covered person's health carrier
within thirty minutes of stabilization, if the covered person needs to be
stabilized. The health carrier's authorized representative is required to
respond to a telephone request for preauthorization from a provider or facility
within thirty minutes. Failure of the health carrier to respond within thirty
minutes constitutes authorization for the provision of immediately required
medically necessary postevaluation and poststabilization services, unless the
health carrier documents that it made a good faith effort but was unable to
reach the provider or facility within thirty minutes after receiving the
request.

(e)
A health carrier shall immediately arrange for an alternative plan of treatment
for the covered person if a nonparticipating emergency provider and health plan
cannot reach an agreement on which services are necessary beyond those
immediately necessary to stabilize the covered person consistent with state and
federal laws.

(2)
Nothing in this section is to be construed as prohibiting the health carrier
from requiring notification within the time frame specified in the contract for
inpatient admission or as soon thereafter as medically possible but no less
than twenty-four hours. Nothing in this section is to be construed as
preventing the health carrier from reserving the right to require transfer of a
hospitalized covered person upon stabilization. Follow-up care that is a
direct result of the emergency must be obtained in accordance with the health
plan's usual terms and conditions of coverage. All other terms and conditions
of coverage may be applied to emergency services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. (1)
Each health carrier shall develop and implement policies and procedures
governing the collection, use, and disclosure of enrollee health information.
These policies and procedures shall include methods for enrollees to access
information and amend incorrect information, for enrollees to restrict the
disclosure of sensitive information, and for enrollees to obtain information
about the carrier's health information policies. In addition, these policies
and procedures shall include methods for carrier oversight and enforcement of
information policies, for carrier storage and disposal of health information,
and for carrier conformance to state and federal laws governing the collection,
use, and disclosure of personally identifiable health information. Each
carrier shall provide a summary notice of its health information policies to
enrollees, including the enrollee's right to restrict the collection, use, and
disclosure of health information.

(2)
Except as otherwise required by statute or rule, a health carrier is, and all
persons acting at the direction of or on behalf of a carrier or in receipt of
an enrollee's personally identifiable health information are, prohibited from
collecting, using, or disclosing personally identifiable health information
unless authorized in writing by the person who is the subject of the
information. At a minimum, such authorization shall be valid for a limited
time and purpose, shall be specific as to purpose and type of information to be
collected, used, or disclosed, and shall identify the persons who will be
receiving the information.

(3)
Health carriers, contractors, and subcontractors are prohibited from selling or
otherwise providing health care information regarding enrollees to any private
organization for marketing purposes without the consent of the enrollment. The
enrollee must confirm their consent in writing after written disclosure from
the carrier about the purposes for which the information will be used, who will
have access to the information, and how long the information will be stored or
used for the specified purpose.

(4)
Any person who is the subject of an unauthorized collection, use, or disclosure
of personally identifiable health information is entitled to the remedies
provided under RCW 9.73.060 governing violations of the right to privacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15.
Sections 3 through 9 and 14 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48
RCW.

---
END ---