BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. There are widespread concerns among patients
throughout the state about access to appropriate medical treatment, including
opioid therapy, for addressing acute, chronic, or intractable pain. Similarly,
physicians and other health professionals express apprehensions about
challenges by state disciplinary authorities when prescribing opioid analgesics
for indicated medical treatment when serving the legitimate medical needs of
pain patients. The under-treatment of chronic pain, due to concerns about addiction
and drug diversion, affect the public health, safety, and welfare. There is a
need for professional guidelines and legal clarity to encourage appropriate
treatment for pain management and to reduce fear of injudicious discipline,
while protecting the public from inappropriate prescribing practices and
illicit drug diversion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. PAIN
GUIDELINES. (1) The secretary of health shall coordinate and assist the
regulatory boards and commissions of the health professions with prescriptive
authority in the development of uniform guidelines for the management of acute,
chronic, and intractable pain with controlled substances. These regulatory
boards and commissions shall recognize and provide for the implementation of
the pain guidelines by rule. These guidelines may be revised as necessary in
response to changes in medical science and technology.

(2)
It is not the intent of these guidelines necessarily to define the complete
standards of acceptable medical care in the treatment of pain patients, nor to
direct clinical practice parameters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINE. (1) Under generally accepted standards of medical
practice, opioids may be prescribed for the treatment of acute, chronic, or
intractable pain, including pain associated with cancer and noncancer pain
conditions when there is an indicated medical need.

(2)
The regulatory boards and commissions of the health professions with
prescriptive authority may not pursue a disciplinary action against a licensed
health professional under the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW,
upon a determination that the health professional followed accepted standards
of care for the treatment of pain with controlled substances, and provided
treatment within the parameters of the pain guidelines adopted under section 2
of this act.

(3)
No health professional following accepted standards of care for the treatment
of pain with controlled substances, and providing treatment within the
parameters of the pain guidelines, may be subject to criminal liability.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. STATE
INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE PROGRAM. The department of labor and industries shall
develop and implement guidelines for the treatment of acute, chronic, and
intractable pain for injured workers for the purposes of the industrial
insurance laws. The guidelines shall be developed in consultation with the
department of health, in accord with accepted standards of care for the
treatment of pain with controlled substances, and in harmony with the pain
guidelines adopted under section 2 of this act. The department is authorized
to adopt rules in furtherance of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. CAPTIONS
NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 69 RCW.

---
END ---