BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Elected official" means a state or local government official who is
elected to office.

(2)
"Unlawful harassment" means knowing and willful conduct directed at
an elected official that seriously alarms, harasses, or is detrimental to the
official, or the official's staff or family, and serves no legitimate or lawful
purpose. The conduct shall be such as would cause a reasonable person to suffer
substantial emotional distress or is of significant concern to law enforcement
representatives in the elected official's jurisdiction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. In
determining whether the conduct serves any legitimate or lawful purpose, the
court should consider whether:

(1)
The respondent's conduct appears designed to alarm, harass, or threaten the
elected official, the official's family, or staff members;

(2)
The respondent's conduct has the purpose or effect of unreasonably interfering
with the official's privacy or the purpose or effect of creating an
intimidating, hostile, or offensive living or working environment for the
elected official, the official's family, or staff members; and

(3)
Law enforcement representatives in either the jurisdiction where the conduct
occurs or where the elected official is located have legitimate and factually
based security concerns for the elected official, the official's family, or
staff members.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
petition for an order for protection may be brought in cases of unlawful
harassment of an elected official.

(1)
A petition for an order for protection filed by the elected official or a law
enforcement representative with jurisdiction where the official is located or
where the conduct occurs, shall allege the existence of harassment or threat
and shall be accompanied by an affidavit made under oath by either the elected
official or the elected official's law enforcement representative stating the
specific facts and circumstances from which relief is sought.

(2)
Filing fees are set in RCW 36.18.020.

(3)
A person is not required to post a bond to obtain relief in any proceeding
under this section.

(4)
Proceedings under this chapter are governed by the provisions set forth in RCW
10.14.070 through 10.14.190.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---