BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.71.030 and 1996 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is established the Puget Sound council composed of ((nine)) eleven
members. Seven members shall be appointed by the governor. In making these
appointments, the governor shall include representation from business, the
environmental community, agriculture, the shellfish industry, counties, cities,
and the tribes. ((One)) Two members shall be ((a))
members of the senate, one from each major caucus, selected by
the president of the senate and ((one)) two members shall
be ((a)) members of the house of representatives, one from
each major caucus, selected by the speaker of the house of
representatives. The legislative members shall be nonvoting members of the
council. Appointments to the council shall reflect geographical balance and
the diversity of population within the Puget Sound basin. Members shall serve
four-year terms. Of the initial members appointed to the council, two shall
serve for two years, two shall serve for three years, and two shall serve for
four years. Thereafter members shall be appointed to four-year terms.
Vacancies shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original
appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term of the position being
vacated. Nonlegislative members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members shall be
reimbursed as provided in RCW 44.04.120.

(2)
The council shall:

(a)
Recommend to the action team projects and activities for inclusion in the
biennial work plan;

(b)
Recommend to the action team coordination of work plan activities with other
relevant activities, including but not limited to, agencies' activities other
than those funded through the plan, local plan initiatives, and governmental
and nongovernmental watershed restoration and protection activities; and

(c)
Recommend to the action team proposed amendments to the Puget Sound management
plan.

(3) The chair of the action team shall convene the council at least
four times per year and shall jointly convene the council and the action team
at least two times per year.

---
END ---