BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, significantly
changed the land use planning process for many local governments in this
state. The legislature also finds growth management has imposed certain
planning requirements and responsibilities on all local governments. The
legislature further finds growth management mandates a comprehensive planning process
with numerous requirements and responsibilities for those local governments
planning under RCW 36.70A.040. Recognizing local governments have experienced
planning, implementation, litigation, and other costs as a result of growth
management, the legislature therefore intends with this act to authorize a
study to identify the growth management costs which have been experienced by
local governments and to review and evaluate the impact of those costs on local
governments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall conduct a study of the costs associated with implementing
the requirements of this chapter which have been or are being experienced by
all local governments. The purpose of the study shall be to:

(a)
Identify, in consultation with local government representatives from a variety
of jurisdictions, the categories and types of costs local governments have
experienced in implementing the requirements of this chapter. These costs
include but are not limited to costs associated with planning, technical
assistance, public outreach and education, legislative processes,
implementation, and appeals and judicial review. The categories and types
should distinguish, where applicable, the costs associated with the
requirements of this chapter imposed on all local governments from those
related to the requirements imposed on local governments planning under RCW
36.70A.040;

(b)
Obtain data from all local governments on the categories and types of costs
identified in (a) of this subsection;

(c)
Review and evaluate, in consultation with local government representatives from
a variety of jurisdictions, the impact of these costs on local governments; and

(d)
Develop, in consultation with local government representatives from a variety
of jurisdictions, recommendations to the legislature on addressing the impact
of the costs identified in (a) of this subsection on all local governments.

(2)
The department shall commence the study no later than September 1, 1999, and complete
the study no later than June 30, 2001. The department shall submit the final
report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature no later than
September 30, 2001.

(3)
During the period in which the study is being conducted, the department shall
submit progress reports to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature. The first progress report shall be submitted no later than
January 31, 2000, and the second progress report shall be submitted no later
than January 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Sections 1 through 2 of this act expire October 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---