BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that local governments are involved in implementing the
new watershed management laws. The legislature further recognizes that local
governments and others are concerned about the financial and other impacts on
local governments associated with responding to current and proposed listings of
species under the federal endangered species act. The legislature also
recognizes that the department of ecology has begun a process to adopt new
shoreline master program guidelines to be used by local governments in updating
their current shoreline master programs. The legislature intends by this act
to provide for a report by the department of ecology on its guideline adoption
process to inform the legislature about the new guidelines and to understand
any potential implications of these new guidelines.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

At
least one year before adopting guidelines under RCW 90.58.060, the department
of ecology shall submit the proposed guidelines to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature with a report on the process used by the
department of ecology related to the proposed guidelines.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1, 2001.

---
END ---