BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission on declarations of emergency is created consisting of six
members, as follows: (a) Two members from the house of representatives, one
from each major political caucus, selected by the speaker of the house of
representatives; (b) two members from the senate, one from each major political
caucus, selected by the president of the senate; (c) one member who has
knowledge of the use of emergency powers, selected by the speaker of the house
of representatives; and (d) one member who has knowledge of the use of
emergency powers, selected by the president of the senate.

(2)
On or before December 1st of each year, the commission shall prepare and
transmit a report to the legislature on the exercise of emergency powers by
state agencies, employees, and officials and shall recommend legislation
necessary to terminate these emergency powers.

(3) This section expires January 1, 2004.

---
END ---