BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.24.030 and 1988 c 129 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The procedure for the condemnation of land for a private way of necessity or
for drains, flumes or ditches under the provisions of this chapter shall be the
same as that provided for the condemnation of private property by railroad
companies, but no private property shall be taken or damaged until the
compensation to be made therefor shall have been ascertained and paid as
provided in the case of condemnation by railroad companies.

(2)
In any action brought under the provisions of this chapter for the condemnation
of land for a private way of necessity, reasonable attorneys' fees and expert
witness costs may be allowed by the court to reimburse the condemnee in the
event of any of the following:

(a)
If the condemnor fails to make any written offer in settlement to the condemnee
at least thirty days prior to commencement of the action; or

(b) If the judgment awarded as a result of the action exceeds by
ten percent or more the highest written offer in settlement submitted to those
condemnees appearing in the action by the condemnor in effect thirty days
before the trial.

---
END ---