BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a compelling need to effectively combat the
growing auto theft problems in the state of Washington. Even if vehicle theft
does not have a direct impact on all citizens, it touches every law abiding
citizen through increased insurance rates and market costs. Law enforcement
officers in Washington have achieved high rates of stolen vehicle recovery by
proactive patrol and investigation of these crimes. Therefore, the legislature
finds that it is paramount for the safety and well-being of the citizens of
Washington to demonstrate a concerted effort to resolve cases of auto theft.

Due
to the complexity of the investigations and the coordination required between
law enforcement agencies, it is the intent of the legislature to amend current
policy and direct resources to enhance auto theft investigations.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.12.030 and 1995 c 274 s 1 and 1995 c 256 s 23 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
application for (([a])) a certificate of ownership shall be upon
a form furnished or approved by the department and shall contain:

(1)
A full description of the vehicle, which shall contain the proper vehicle
identification number, the number of miles indicated on the odometer at the
time of delivery of the vehicle, and any distinguishing marks of
identification;

(2)
The name and address of the person who is to be the registered owner of the
vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security interest, the name and
address of the secured party;

(3)
Such other information as the department may require. The department may in
any instance, in addition to the information required on the application,
require additional information and a physical examination of the vehicle or of
any class of vehicles, or either. A physical examination of the vehicle is
mandatory if ((it previously was registered in any other state or country or
if)) it has been rebuilt after surrender of the certificate of ownership to
the department under RCW 46.12.070 due to the vehicle's destruction or
declaration as a total loss. The inspection must verify that the vehicle
identification number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the ((foreign))
title and registration certificate. ((If the vehicle is from a jurisdiction
that does not issue titles, the inspection must verify that the vehicle
identification number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the
registration certificate. The inspection must also confirm that the license
plates on the vehicle are those assigned to the vehicle by the jurisdiction in
which the vehicle was previously licensed.)) The inspection must be made
by a member of the Washington state patrol or other person authorized by the
department to make such inspections.

The
application shall be subscribed by the registered owner and be sworn to by that
applicant in the manner described by RCW 9A.72.085. The department shall
retain the application in either the original, computer, or photostatic form.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.12.040 and 1990 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
application accompanied by a draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash
for one dollar and twenty-five cents, together with the last preceding
certificates or other satisfactory evidence of ownership, shall be forwarded to
the director.

The
fee shall be in addition to any other fee for the license registration of the
vehicle. The certificate of ownership shall not be required to be renewed
annually, or at any other time, except as by law provided.

In
addition to the application fee and any other fee for the license registration
of a vehicle, there shall be collected from the applicant an inspection fee
whenever a physical examination of the vehicle is required as a part of the
vehicle licensing or titling process.

((For
vehicles previously registered in any other state or country, the inspection
fee shall be fifteen dollars and shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund.
For all other vehicles requiring a physical examination,)) The
inspection fee shall be twenty dollars and shall be deposited in the ((motor
vehicle fund)) state patrol highway account.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.12.060 and 1975 c 25 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
the department shall issue a certificate of ownership, or reissue such a
certificate, covering any vehicle, the identification number of which has been
altered, removed, obliterated, defaced, omitted, or is otherwise absent, the
registered owner of the vehicle shall file an application with the department,
accompanied by a fee of five dollars, upon a form provided, and containing such
facts and information as shall be required by the department for the assignment
of a special number for such vehicle. Upon receipt of such application, the
department, if satisfied the applicant is entitled to the assignment of an
identification number, shall designate a special identification number for such
vehicle, which shall be noted upon the application therefor, and likewise upon
a suitable record of the authorization of the use thereof, to be kept by the
department. This assigned identification number shall be placed or stamped in
a conspicuous position upon the vehicle in such manner and form as may be prescribed
by the department. Upon receipt by the department of ((a certificate by an
officer of the Washington state patrol, or other person authorized by the
department, that the vehicle has been inspected and that the identification
number or the special number plate, has been stamped or securely attached in a
conspicuous position upon the vehicle, accompanied by)) an application for
a certificate of ownership or application for reissue of such certificate and
the required fee therefor, the department shall use such number as the
numerical or alpha-numerical identification marks for the vehicle in any
certificate of license registration or certificate of ownership that may
thereafter be issued therefor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
Washington state patrol shall prepare a report for submission to the office of
financial management and the legislature by January 1, 2001, on the status of
the revised vehicle identification number inspection and auto theft
investigations program.

---
END ---