BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
15.30.060 and 1994 c 23 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall adopt rules:

(1)
Prescribing the maximum amount of oxygen that may be retained in a sealed
controlled atmosphere storage warehouse: PROVIDED, That such maximum amount of
oxygen retained shall not exceed five percent when apples are stored in such
controlled atmosphere storage warehouse.

(2)
Prescribing the period in which the oxygen content shall be reduced to the
amount prescribed in subsection (1) of this section: PROVIDED, That such
period shall not exceed twenty days when apples are stored in such controlled
atmosphere warehouse.

(3) The length of time and the degrees of temperature at which any
fruits or vegetables shall be retained in controlled atmosphere storage, before
they may be classified as having been stored in controlled atmosphere storage:
PROVIDED, That such period shall not be less than forty-five days for Gala and
Jonagold varieties and not less than ((ninety)) sixty days for
other apples.

---
END ---