BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
compact for education is hereby entered into with all jurisdictions joining
therein, in the form as follows:

COMPACT
FOR EDUCATION

ARTICLE
I‑-PURPOSE AND POLICY

A. It
is the purpose of this compact to:

1. Establish and maintain close cooperation and
understanding among executive, legislative, professional educational and lay
leadership on a nationwide basis at the State and local levels.

2. Provide a forum for the discussion, development,
crystallization and recommendation of public policy alternatives in the field
of education.

3. Provide a clearinghouse of information on matters
relating to educational problems and how they are being met in different places
throughout the Nation, so that the executive and legislative branches of State
Government and of local communities may have ready access to the experience and
record of the entire country, and so that both lay and professional groups in
the field of education may have additional avenues for the sharing of
experience and the interchange of ideas in the formation of public policy in
education.

4. Facilitate the improvement of State and local
educational systems so that all of them will be able to meet adequate and
desirable goals in a society which requires continuous qualitative and
quantitative advance in educational opportunities, methods and facilities.

B.It is the policy of this compact to encourage and
promote local and State initiative in the development, maintenance, improvement
and administration of educational systems and institutions in a manner which
will accord with the needs and advantages of diversity among localities and
States.

C.The party States recognize that each of them has an
interest in the quality and quantity of education furnished in each of the
other States, as well as in the excellence of its own educational systems and
institutions, because of the highly mobile character of individuals within the
Nation, and because the products and services contributing to the health, welfare
and economic advancement of each State are supplied in significant part by
persons educated in other States.

ARTICLE
II‑-STATE DEFINED

As
used in this Compact, "State" means a State, territory, or possession
of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto
Rico.

ARTICLE
III‑-THE COMMISSION

A.The Education Commission of the States, hereinafter
called "the Commission", is hereby established. The Commission shall
consist of seven members representing each party State. One of such members
shall be the Governor; two shall be members of the State legislature selected
by its respective houses and serving in such manner as the legislature may
determine; and four shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the
Governor, unless the laws of the State otherwise provide. If the laws of a
State prevent legislators from serving on the Commission, six members shall be
appointed and serve at the pleasure of the Governor, unless the laws of the
State otherwise provide. In addition to any other principles or requirements
which a State may establish for the appointment and service of its members of
the Commission, the guiding principle for the composition of the membership on
the Commission from each party State shall be that the members representing
such State, shall, by virtue of their training, experience, knowledge or
affiliations be in a position collectively to reflect broadly the interests of
the State Government, higher education, the state education system, local
education, lay and professional, public and nonpublic educational leadership.
Of those appointees, one shall be the head of a state agency or institution,
designated by the Governor, having responsibility for one or more programs of
public education. In addition to the members of the Commission representing
the party States, there may be not to exceed ten nonvoting Commissioners
selected by the steering committee for terms of one year. Such Commissioners
shall represent leading national organizations of professional educators or
persons concerned with educational administration.

B.The members of the Commission shall be entitled to one
vote each on the Commission. No action of the Commission shall be binding
unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of votes on
the Commission are cast in favor thereof. Action of the Commission shall be
only at a meeting at which a majority of the Commissioners are present. The
Commission shall meet at least once a year. In its bylaws, and subject to such
directions and limitations as may be contained therein, the Commission may delegate
the exercise of any of its powers to the steering committee or the Executive
Director, except for the power to approve budgets or requests for
appropriations, the power to make policy recommendations pursuant to Article IV
and adoption of the annual report pursuant to Article III(J).

C.The Commission shall have a seal.

D.The Commission shall elect annually, from among its
members, a chair, who shall be a Governor, a vice-chair and a treasurer. The
Commission shall provide for the appointment of an executive director. Such
executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the Commission, and together
with the treasurer and such other personnel as the Commission may deem
appropriate shall be bonded in such amount as the Commission shall determine.
The executive director shall be secretary.

E.Irrespective of the civil service, personnel or other
merit system laws of any of the party States, the executive director subject to
the approval of the steering committee shall appoint, remove or discharge such
personnel as may be necessary for the performance of the functions of the
Commission, and shall fix the duties and compensation of such personnel. The
Commission in its bylaws shall provide for the personnel policies and programs
of the Commission.

F.The Commission may borrow, accept or contract for the
services of personnel from any party jurisdiction, the United States, or any
subdivision or agency of the aforementioned governments, or from any agency of
two or more of the party jurisdictions or their subdivisions.

G.The Commission may accept for any of its purposes and
functions under this compact any and all donations, and grants of money,
equipment, supplies, materials and services, conditional or otherwise, from any
State, the United States, or any other governmental agency, or from any person,
firm, association, foundation, or corporation, and may receive, utilize and
dispose of the same. Any donation or grant accepted by the Commission pursuant
to this paragraph or services borrowed pursuant to paragraph (F) of this
Article shall be reported in the annual report of the Commission. Such report
shall include the nature, amount and conditions, if any, of the donation,
grant, or services borrowed, and the identity of the donor or lender.

H.The Commission may establish and maintain such
facilities as may be necessary for the transacting of its business. The
Commission may acquire, hold, and convey real and personal property and any
interest therein.

I.The Commission shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of
its business and shall have the power to amend and rescind these bylaws. The
Commission shall publish its bylaws in convenient form and shall file a copy
thereof and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or
officer in each of the party States.

J.The Commission annually shall make to the Governor and
legislature of each party State a report covering the activities of the
Commission for the preceding year. The Commission may make such additional
reports as it may deem desirable.

ARTICLE
IV‑-POWERS

In
addition to authority conferred on the Commission by other provisions of the
compact, the Commission shall have authority to:

1.
Collect, correlate, analyze and interpret information and data concerning
educational needs and resources.

2.
Encourage and foster research in all aspects of education, but with special
reference to the desirable scope of instruction, organization, administration,
and instructional methods and standards employed or suitable for employment in
public educational systems.

3.
Develop proposals for adequate financing of education as a whole and at each of
its many levels.

4.
Conduct or participate in research of the types referred to in this Article in
any instance where the Commission finds that such research is necessary for the
advancement of the purposes and policies of this compact, utilizing fully the
resources of national associations, regional compact organizations for higher
education, and other agencies and institutions, both public and private.

5.
Formulate suggested policies and plans for the improvement of public education
as a whole, or for any segment thereof, and make recommendations with respect
thereto available to the appropriate governmental units, agencies and public
officials.

6.
Do such other things as may be necessary or incidental to the administration of
any of its authority or functions pursuant to this compact.

ARTICLE
V‑-COOPERATION WITH FEDERAL GOVERNMENT

A.If the laws of the United States specifically so
provide, or if administrative provision is made therefor within the Federal
Government, the United States may be represented on the Commission by not to
exceed ten representatives. Any such representative or representatives of the
United States shall be appointed and serve in such manner as may be provided by
or pursuant to Federal law, and may be drawn from any one or more branches of
the Federal Government, but no such representative shall have a vote on the Commission.

B.The Commission may provide information and make
recommendations to any executive or legislative agency or officer of the
Federal Government concerning the common educational policies of the States,
and may advise with any such agencies or officers concerning any matter of
mutual interest.

ARTICLE VI‑-COMMITTEES

A.To assist in the expeditious conduct of its business
when the full Commission is not meeting, the Commission shall elect a steering
committee of thirty-two members which, subject to the provisions of this
compact and consistent with the policies of the Commission, shall be
constituted and function as provided in the bylaws of the Commission.
One-fourth of the voting membership of the steering committee shall consist of
Governors, one-fourth shall consist of Legislators, and the remainder shall
consist of other members of the Commission. A Federal representative on the
Commission may serve with the steering committee, but without vote. The voting
members of the steering committee shall serve for terms of two years, except
that members elected to the first steering committee of the Commission shall be
elected as follows: Sixteen for one year and sixteen for two years. The
chair, vice-chair, and treasurer of the Commission shall be members of the
steering committee and, anything in this paragraph to the contrary
notwithstanding, shall serve during their continuance in these offices.
Vacancies in the steering committee shall not affect its authority to act, but
the Commission at its next regularly ensuing meeting following the occurrence
of any vacancy shall fill it for the unexpired term. No person shall serve
more than two terms as a member of the steering committee; provided that
service for a partial term of one year or less shall not be counted toward the
two term limitation.

B.The Commission may establish advisory and technical
committees composed of State, local, and Federal officials, and private persons
to advise it with respect to any one or more of its functions. Any advisory or
technical committee may, on request of the States concerned, be established to
consider any matter of special concern to two or more of the party States. The
Commission may establish such additional committees as its bylaws may provide.

C.The Commission may establish such additional
committees as its bylaws may provide.

ARTICLE
VII‑-FINANCE

A.The Commission shall advise the Governor or designated
officer or officers of each party State of its budget and estimated
expenditures for such period as may be required by the laws of that party
State. Each of the Commission's budgets of estimated expenditures shall
contain specific recommendations of the amount or amounts to be appropriated by
each of the party States.

B.The total amount of appropriation requests under any
budget shall be apportioned among the party States. In making such
apportionment, the Commission shall devise and employ a formula which takes
equitable account of the populations and per capita income levels of the party
States.

C.The Commission shall not pledge the credit of any
party States. The Commission may meet any of its obligations in whole or in
part with funds available to it pursuant to Article III(G) of this compact,
provided that the Commission takes specific action setting aside such funds
prior to incurring an obligation to be met in whole or in part in such manner.
Except where the Commission makes use of funds available to it pursuant to
Article III(G) thereof, the Commission shall not incur any obligation prior to
the allotment of funds by the party States adequate to meet the same.

D.The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission
shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established by its
bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
Commission shall be audited yearly by a qualified public accountant, and the
report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual reports
of the Commission.

E.The accounts of the Commission shall be open at any
reasonable time for inspection by duly constituted officers of the party States
and by any persons authorized by the Commission.

F.Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent
Commission compliance with laws relating to audit or inspection of accounts by
or on behalf of any government contributing to the support of the Commission.

ARTICLE
VIII‑-ELIGIBLE PARTIES; ENTRY INTO AND WITHDRAWAL

A.This compact shall have as eligible parties all States,
Territories, and Possessions of the United States, the District of members of
the Commission from his or her State, and shall provide to the Commission an
equitable share of the financial support of the Commission from any source
available to him or her.

B.Any state or other eligible jurisdiction may enter
into this compact and it shall become binding thereon when it has adopted the same:
Provided that in order to enter into initial effect, adoption by at least ten
eligible party jurisdictions shall be required.

C.Adoption of the compact may be either by enactment
thereof or by adherence thereto by the Governor; provided that in the absence
of enactment, adherence by the Governor shall be sufficient to make his State a
party only until December 31, 1967. During any period when a State is
participating in this compact through gubernatorial action, the Governor shall
appoint those persons who, in addition to himself, shall serve as the members
of the Commission from his or her State, and shall provide to the Commission an
equitable share of the financial support of the Commission from any source
available to him or her.

D.Except for a withdrawal effective on December 31,
1967, in accordance with paragraph C of this Article, any party State may
withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no
such withdrawal shall take effect until one year after the Governor of the
withdrawing State has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the
Governors of all other party States. No withdrawal shall affect any liability
already incurred by or chargeable to a party State prior to the time of such
withdrawal.

ARTICLE
IX‑-CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This
compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof.
The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the
constitution of any State or of the United States, or the application thereof
to any Government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity
of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any
Government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If
this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any State
participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to
the State affected as to all severable matters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
seven members of the education commission of the states representing the state
of Washington are designated or shall be appointed as follows: (1) The
governor; (2) two members of the senate, one from each caucus appointed by the
president; (3) two members of the house of representatives, one from each
caucus appointed by the speaker; and (4) two members appointed by the
governor. One of the members appointed by the governor shall be a member of
the academic achievement and accountability commission. Appointments shall be
made in accordance with the guiding principles set forth in Article III(A) of
the compact.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
term of the members appointed by the president and the speaker shall be
dependent upon continued membership in the house from which appointed and shall
expire upon the adjournment sine die of the regular session of the legislature
during an odd-numbered year next succeeding the appointment of such member.
Vacancies occurring during the term shall be filled for the unexpired term by
the appointment of a successor in the same manner as for the vacating member.
Members appointed by the governor shall serve at the governor's pleasure.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
governor or a member designated by the governor shall be chair of the members
of the commission representing this state.

The
commissioners shall cooperate with all public and private entities having an
interest in educational matters.

The
commissioners may employ such professional, technical and clerical assistance
as may be required to aid them in carrying out their functions in this chapter
prescribed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Each
member of the commission from the state of Washington shall be paid, from funds
appropriated by the legislature of the state of Washington for that purpose,
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Such member
may, regardless of any charter or statutory provision to the contrary, be an
officer or employee holding another public position.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. There
is hereby granted to the commissioners representing this state all the powers
provided for in said compact and all powers necessary or incidental to the
carrying out of said compact in every particular.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. All
officers of this state are hereby authorized and directed to do all things,
falling within their respective provinces and jurisdiction, necessary to or
incidental to the carrying out of the compact for education in every
particular. All officers, bureaus, departments and persons of and in the
government or administration of this state are hereby authorized and directed,
at convenient times and upon the request of the commissioners representing this
state, to furnish the education commission with information and data possessed
by them or any of them, and to aid the commission by any means lying within
their legal powers respectively.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Pursuant to Article III(I) of the compact, the commission shall file a copy of
its bylaws and any amendment thereto with the secretary of state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

---
END ---