BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
chapter is enacted for the purpose of protecting the public health, safety, and
welfare, and to provide for state administrative control, supervision,
licensure, and regulation of the practice of physical therapy. It is the
intent of the legislature that only individuals who meet and maintain
prescribed standards of competence and conduct may engage in the practice of
physical therapy as authorized by this chapter. This chapter shall be
liberally construed to promote the public interest and to accomplish the
purpose stated in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Board" means the state board of physical therapy.

(2)
"Physical therapy" means the care and services provided by or under
the direction and supervision of a physical therapist licensed by the state.

(3)
"Physical therapist" means a person who meets all the requirements of
this chapter and is licensed in this state to practice physical therapy.

(4)
"Practice of physical therapy" means:

(a)
Examining, evaluating, and testing individuals with mechanical, physiological,
and developmental impairments, functional limitations, and disability or other
health and movement-related conditions in order to determine a diagnosis,
prognosis, plan of therapeutic intervention, and to assess and document the
ongoing effects of intervention;

(b)
Alleviating impairments and functional limitations by designing, implementing,
and modifying therapeutic interventions that include, but are not limited to
therapeutic exercise; functional training in self-care and in-home, community,
or work reintegration; manual therapy including soft tissue and joint
mobilization and manipulation; therapeutic massage, assistive and adaptive
orthotic, prosthetic, protective, and supportive devices and equipment; airway
clearance techniques; debridement and wound care; physical agents or
modalities; mechanical and electrotherapeutic modalities; and patient-related
instruction;

(c)
Reducing the risk of injury, impairment, functional limitation, and disability,
including the promotion and maintenance of fitness, health, and quality of life
in all age populations;

(d)
Engaging in administration, consultation, education, and research.

(5)(a)
"Physical therapist assistant" means a person who meets the
requirements of this chapter for licensure as a physical therapist assistant
and who performs physical therapy procedures and related tasks that have been
selected and delegated only by the supervising physical therapist.

(b)
"Physical therapy aide" means a person trained under the direction of
a physical therapist who performs designated and supervised routine physical
therapy tasks.

(c)
"Other assistive personnel" means other trained or educated health
care personnel, not defined in (a) or (b) of this subsection, who perform
specific designated tasks related to physical therapy under the supervision of
a physical therapist. At the direction of the supervising physical therapist,
and if properly credentialed and not prohibited by any other law, other
assistive personnel may be identified by the title specific to their training
or education.

(6)
"Restricted physical therapy license" means a license to which
restrictions or conditions, or both, as to scope of practice, place of
practice, supervision of practice, duration of licensed status, or type or
condition of patient or client served are imposed by the board.

(7)
"On-site supervision" means the supervising physical therapist must
(a) be continuously on-site and present in the department or facility where
assistive personnel or holders of interim permits are performing services; (b)
be immediately available to assist the person being supervised in the services
being performed; and (c) maintain continued involvement in appropriate aspects
of each treatment session in which a component of treatment is delegated to
assistive personnel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The board shall consist of five members who shall be appointed by the
governor. Four members shall be physical therapists who reside in Washington
and who possess an unrestricted license to practice physical therapy in the
state and who shall have been practicing in Washington for no less than five
years preceding appointment. One member shall be a resident of Washington
appointed from the public at large and who is not affiliated with or has a
financial interest in, any health care profession and who has an interest in
the rights of consumers.

(2)
All appointments are for terms of four years and shall be staggered. No member
shall serve for more than two successive four- year terms or for more than ten
consecutive years. By board approval, members may extend service beyond four
years until a new member is appointed or the member is reappointed.

(3)
The governor may, at the request of the board, remove any member of the board
for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty.

(4)
Each board member shall be entitled to reimbursement of travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for attending each meeting of the board
or for representing the board in an official board-approved activity.

(5)
There shall be no liability on the part of, and no action for damages against,
any member of the board when the person is functioning within the scope of
board duties and acting without malice and in the reasonable belief that the
action taken by him or her is warranted by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
board has the following powers and duties:

(1)
Evaluate the qualifications of applicants for licensure and provide for the
national examinations for physical therapists and physical therapist
assistants;

(2)
Adopt passing scores for examinations;

(3)
Issue licenses or permits to those who qualify under this chapter;

(4)
Regulate the practice of physical therapy by interpreting and enforcing the
provisions of this chapter, including disciplinary action;

(5)
Adopt and revise rules as it deems necessary and appropriate, consistent with
this chapter and chapter 34.05 RCW, for the discharge of its obligation under
this chapter. The rules, when lawfully adopted, shall have the effect of law;

(6)
Meet at least once each quarter in compliance with the open public meetings
act, chapter 42.30 RCW. A majority of board members shall constitute a quorum
for the transaction of business. The board shall keep an official record of
all of its proceedings;

(7)
Establish requirements for assessing continuing competence;

(8)
Establish and collect fees for sustaining the necessary operation and expenses
of the board;

(9)
Elect officers from its members necessary for the operations and obligations of
the board. Terms of office shall be one year;

(10)
Provide for the timely orientation and training of new professional and public
appointees to the board, including training in licensing and disciplinary
procedures and orientation to all statutes, rules, policies, and procedures of
the board;

(11)
Maintain a current listing of all persons licensed or otherwise regulated under
this chapter, including the name, current business and residential address,
telephone numbers, and license;

(12)
Provide information to the public regarding the complaint process;

(13)
Employ necessary personnel to carry out the administrative work of the board;

(14)
Enter into contracts for services necessary for adequate enforcement of this
chapter;

(15)
Report final disciplinary action taken against a licensed physical therapist or
licensed physical therapist assistant to the national disciplinary data base
recognized by the board;

(16)
Publish, at least annually, final disciplinary action taken against any
licensed physical therapist or licensed physical therapist assistant;

(17)
Publish board rulings, opinions, or interpretations of statutes or rules to
guide persons regulated under this chapter;

(18)
Participate in or conduct performance audits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
physical therapy licensing account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from this chapter must be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this chapter.
Only the board or the board's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88
RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
It is unlawful for any person to practice or in any manner hold himself or
herself out to practice physical therapy or designate himself or herself as a
physical therapist, unless he or she is duly licensed in accordance with this
chapter.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting persons licensed
under any other law of this state from engaging in the profession or practice
for which they are licensed, provided, however, that they are not representing themselves
to be physical therapists or providers of physical therapy.

(3)
The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical therapists under
this chapter when engaged in the following activities:

(a)
A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree as a physical
therapist in an approved professional education program and is satisfying
supervised clinical education requirements related to his or her physical
therapy education while under on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist;

(b)
A physical therapist while practicing in the United States armed services,
United States public health service, or veterans administration as based on
requirements under federal regulations for state licensure of health care
providers;

(c)
A physical therapist licensed in another United States jurisdiction, or a
foreign-educated physical therapist credentialed in another country, performing
physical therapy as part of teaching or participating in an educational seminar
of no more than sixty days in a calendar year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist or for licensure as a
physical therapist assistant shall file an application as required by the
board. A nonrefundable application fee and the cost of the examination shall
accompany the completed written application. Fees shall be established by
rules adopted in accordance with section 4 of this act.

(2)
Any applicant may request in writing and, upon request, shall be granted a
hearing based upon action taken by the board regarding his or her application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
An applicant may take the examination for physical therapist licensure after
the application process has been completed. The national examination shall
test entry-level competency related to physical therapy theory, examination and
evaluation, diagnosis, prognosis, treatment intervention, prevention, and
consultation.

(2)
An applicant may take the examination for physical therapist assistant
licensure after the application process has been completed. The national
examination shall test for requisite knowledge and skills in the technical
application of physical therapy services.

(3)
Examinations shall be available within the state at least quarterly, at such
time and place as the board shall determine. The passing score shall be
determined by the board.

(4)
Applicants who do not pass the examination after the first attempt may retake
the examination one additional time without reapplication for licensure. This
must occur within six months from the first failure. Prior to being approved
by the board for subsequent testing beyond two attempts, individuals shall
reapply and demonstrate evidence satisfactory to the board of having
successfully completed either additional clinical training or coursework, or
both, as determined by the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
An applicant for a license as a physical therapist shall have the following
qualifications:

(a)
Be of good moral character;

(b)
Have completed the application process;

(c)
Be a graduate of a professional physical therapy education program accredited
by a national accreditation agency approved by the board;

(d)
Have successfully passed the national examination approved by the board.

(2)
The board shall issue a license to a physical therapist who has a valid unrestricted
license from another United States jurisdiction in which he or she, when
granted the license, previously met all requirements as specified in subsection
(1) of this section or section 10 of this act, and as further established by
rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
An applicant for licensure as a physical therapist who has been educated
outside of the United States shall meet the following qualifications:

(a)
Be of good moral character;

(b)
Have completed the application process;

(c)
Provide satisfactory evidence that his or her education is substantially
equivalent to the requirements of physical therapists educated in accredited
educational programs as determined by the board. If the board determines that
a foreign-educated applicant's education is not substantially equivalent, it
may require completion of additional coursework before proceeding with the
application process;

(d)
Provide written proof that the school of physical therapy education is
recognized by its own ministry of education;

(e)
Provide written proof of authorization to practice as a physical therapist
without limitations in the country where the professional education occurred;

(f)
Provide proof of legal authorization to reside and seek employment in the
United States or its territories;

(g)
Have his or her educational credentials evaluated by a board-approved
credential evaluation agency;

(h)
Have passed the board-approved English proficiency examinations if his or her
native language is not English;

(i)
Have participated in an interim supervised clinical practice period prior to
licensure;

(j)
Have successfully passed the national examination approved by the board.

(2)
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if the foreign-educated
physical therapist applicant is a graduate of a professional physical therapy
education program accredited by an agency approved by the board, the
requirements in subsection (1)(c), (d), (g), and (i) of this section may be
waived.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
When a foreign-educated applicant satisfies the board's requirements as listed
in section 10 of this act, prior to licensure the board shall issue an interim
permit to the applicant for the purpose of participating in a supervised
clinical practice period. An applicant who has failed the national examination
is not eligible for an interim permit until after he or she has passed the
examination.

(2)
The time period of an interim permit shall be no less than ninety days nor more
than six months.

(3)
An interim permit holder shall, to the satisfaction of the board, complete a
period of clinical practice under the continuous and on-site supervision of a
physical therapist who holds an unrestricted license issued pursuant to this
chapter in a facility approved by the board and as further required by rules.

(4)
An interim permit is immediately revoked upon notification of an interim permit
holder that he or she has failed the licensing examination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. An
applicant for licensure as a physical therapist assistant shall meet the
following requirements:

(1)
Be of good moral character;

(2)
Have completed the application process;

(3)
Be a graduate of a physical therapist assistant education program accredited by
an agency approved by the board;

(4)
Have successfully passed the national examination approved by the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
board shall waive the examination and grant a license to a person who has
practiced as a physical therapist assistant in this state on the effective date
of this section if the board determines that the person meets commonly accepted
standards for practicing as a physical therapist assistant, as established by
rule of the board. Persons eligible for licensure as a physical therapist
assistant under this section shall apply for a license before October 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. (1) A
physical therapist licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall renew
his or her license as specified in rules. An individual who fails to renew his
or her license by the date of expiration shall not practice physical therapy in
the state of Washington. A physical therapist assistant licensed under the
provisions of this chapter shall renew his or her license as specified in
rules. An individual who fails to renew his or her license by the date of
expiration shall not continue to function as a physical therapist assistant.

(2)
Each licensee shall report to the board a name change and changes in business
and home address within thirty days of the change.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
Reinstatement of a lapsed license following a renewal deadline requires payment
of a renewal fee and late penalty in accordance with rules.

(2)
Reinstatement of a license that has lapsed for more than three consecutive
years requires reapplying for a license and payment of fees in accordance with
rules. The individual shall successfully demonstrate to the board competency
in the practice of physical therapy, or shall serve an internship under a
restricted license or take remedial courses as determined by the board, or
both, at the board's discretion. The board may also require the applicant to
take an examination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. (1)
No person shall practice or in any manner hold himself or herself out to be
engaging in the practice of physical therapy or designate himself or herself as
a physical therapist unless duly licensed as a physical therapist in accordance
with this chapter.

(2)
A physical therapist licensed under this chapter is fully authorized to
practice physical therapy as defined in this chapter.

(3)
A physical therapist shall refer persons under his or her care to appropriate
health care practitioners if the physical therapist has reasonable cause to
believe symptoms or conditions are present that require services beyond the
scope of practice or when physical therapy is contraindicated.

(4)
Physical therapists shall adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the
physical therapy profession and as further established by rule.

(5)
A physical therapist who meets further qualifications as established by rule
may penetrate tissue for the purpose of testing neuromuscular performance.

(6)
A physical therapist may perform wound debridement and wound management that
includes, but is not limited to, sharp debridement, debridement with other
agents, dry dressings, wet dressings, topical agents including enzymes, and
hydrotherapy.

(7)
A physical therapist may purchase, store, and administer topical and aerosol
medications as part of the practice of physical therapy as defined in this
chapter. A physical therapist shall comply with rules duly adopted by the
board of pharmacy or the department of health specifying protocols for storage
of medications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1) A
physical therapist shall use the letters "PT" in connection with his
or her name or place of business to denote licensure under this chapter.

(2)
It is unlawful for any person, or for any business entity, its employees,
agents, or representatives to use in connection with his or her name, or the
name or activity of the business, the words "physical therapy,"
"physical therapist," "physiotherapy,"
"physiotherapist," "registered physical therapist," the
letters "PT," "LPT," "RPT," or any other words,
abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying directly or indirectly that
physical therapy is provided or supplied, including the billing of services
labeled as physical therapy, unless the services are provided by or under the
direction of a physical therapist licensed in accordance with this chapter.

(3)
A physical therapist assistant shall use the letters "PTA" in
connection with his or her name to denote licensure under this chapter.

(4)
No person shall use the title "physical therapist assistant," the
letters "PTA," or any other words, abbreviations, or insignia in
connection with his or her name to indicate or imply, directly or indirectly,
that he or she is a physical therapist assistant without being licensed in
accordance with this chapter as a physical therapist assistant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. Any
physical therapist licensed under this chapter not practicing physical therapy
or providing services may place his or her license in an inactive status. The
board shall prescribe requirements for maintaining an inactive status and
converting from an inactive or active status. The secretary of the department
of health may establish fees for alterations in license status.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. (1)
Physical therapists are responsible for patient care given by assistive
personnel under their supervision. A physical therapist may delegate to
assistive personnel and supervise selected acts, tasks, or procedures that fall
within the scope of physical therapy practice but do not exceed the education
or training of the assistive personnel.

(2)
Physical therapist assistants shall at all times be under the supervision of a
licensed physical therapist as further set forth in rule.

(3)
Physical therapy aides and other assistive personnel shall perform patient care
activities under on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. The
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the
issuance and denial of licenses and interim permits, and the discipline of
licensees and holders of interim permits under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. (1)
The public shall have access to the following information:

(a)
A listing of physical therapists licensed in the state, including place of
practice, license number, date of expiration, and status of license. This
listing shall also include interim permit holders;

(b)
A listing of physical therapist assistants licensed in the state, including
place of employment, license number, and date of expiration;

(c)
A listing of official actions taken by the board.

(2)
Home addresses and telephone numbers of physical therapists and physical
therapist assistants are not public records and shall be kept confidential by
the board.

(3)
Physical therapists shall disclose in writing to patients if a referring
practitioner is deriving direct or indirect compensation from the referral to
physical therapy.

(4)
Physical therapists shall disclose in writing any financial interest in
products they endorse and recommend to their patients.

(5)
Physical therapists have the responsibility to ensure that the patient has
knowledge of freedom of choice in services and products.

(6)
Information relating to the physical therapist/patient relationship is
confidential and may not be communicated to a third party not involved in that
patient's care without the prior written consent of the patient. The physical
therapist/patient privilege does not extend to cases in which the physical
therapist has a duty to report information as required by law.

(7)
Any person may submit a complaint regarding any licensee or any other person
potentially in violation of this chapter. Confidentiality shall be maintained
subject to law.

(8)
The board shall keep all information relating to the receiving and
investigation of complaints filed against licensees confidential until the
information becomes public record or as required by law.

(9)
Each licensee shall display a copy of his or her license or current renewal
verification in a location accessible to public view at his or her place of
practice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
18.74.005 (Purpose) and 1983 c 116 s 1;

(2) RCW
18.74.010 (Definitions) and 1997 c 275 s 8, 1991 c 12 s 1, 1988 c
185 s 1, 1983 c 116 s 2, 1961 c 64 s 1, & 1949 c 239 s 1;

(3) RCW
18.74.012 (Consultation with health care practitioner not
required for certain treatments) and 1991 c 12 s 2, 1990 c 297 s 19, & 1988
c 185 s 2;

(4) RCW
18.74.015 (Referral to health care practitioners--When required)
and 1988 c 185 s 3;

(5) RCW
18.74.020 (Board created--Members--Staff assistance--Compensation
and travel expenses) and 1991 c 3 s 174, 1984 c 287 s 46, 1983 c 116 s 3, 1979
c 158 s 62, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 44, & 1949 c 239 s 2;

(6) RCW
18.74.023 (Board--Powers and duties) and 1995 c 299 s 1 &
1995 c 198 s 9;

(7) RCW
18.74.025 (Standards for appropriateness of physical therapy
care--Violation) and 1991 c 12 s 5;

(8) RCW
18.74.027 (Board--Officers--Meetings--Quorum) and 1983 c 116 s 5;

(9) RCW
18.74.029 (Application of Uniform Disciplinary Act) and 1993 c
133 s 2, 1987 c 150 s 47, & 1986 c 259 s 123;

(10) RCW
18.74.030 (Qualifications of applicants) and 1983 c 116 s 6, 1961
c 64 s 2, & 1949 c 239 s 3;

(11) RCW
18.74.035 (Examinations--Scope--Time and place) and 1995 c 198 s
10, 1991 c 3 s 176, 1983 c 116 s 7, & 1961 c 64 s 3;

(12) RCW
18.74.040 (Licenses) and 1991 c 3 s 177, 1983 c 116 s 8, &
1949 c 239 s 4;

(13) RCW
18.74.050 (Licenses--Fees) and 1996 c 191 s 59, 1991 c 3 s 178,
1985 c 7 s 63, 1983 c 116 s 9, 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 65, 1961 c 64 s 4, &
1949 c 239 s 5;

(14) RCW
18.74.060 (Licensure by endorsement) and 1996 c 191 s 60, 1991 c
3 s 179, 1985 c 7 s 64, 1983 c 116 s 10, 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 66, 1961 c 64 s
5, & 1949 c 239 s 6;

(15) RCW
18.74.065 (Licenses--Issuance to persons licensed or registered
before July 24, 1983) and 1983 c 116 s 11;

(16) RCW
18.74.070 (Renewal of license) and 1996 c 191 s 61, 1991 c 3 s
180, 1983 c 116 s 12, 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 67, 1971 ex.s. c 266 s 13, 1961 c
64 s 6, & 1949 c 239 s 7;

(17) RCW
18.74.073 (Licenses--Inactive status--Fees) and 1998 c 143 s 1;

(18) RCW
18.74.075 (Interim permits) and 1993 c 133 s 1;

(19) RCW
18.74.085 (Advertising of spinal manipulation or mobilization
prohibited) and 1988 c 185 s 4;

(20) RCW
18.74.090 (False advertising--Use of name and words--License
required--Prosecutions of violations) and 1991 c 3 s 181, 1987 c 150 s 48, 1986
c 259 s 125, 1983 c 116 s 18, 1961 c 64 s 8, & 1949 c 239 s 9;

(21) RCW
18.74.095 (False advertising--Injunctions) and 1991 c 3 s 182,
1983 c 116 s 19, & 1961 c 64 s 9;

(22) RCW
18.74.120 (Record of proceedings--Register) and 1991 c 3 s 183,
1983 c 116 s 21, 1979 c 158 s 63, 1977 c 75 s 11, & 1949 c 239 s 12;

(23) RCW
18.74.125 (Construction of chapter--Activities not
prohibited--Use of letters or words in connection with name) and 1961 c 64 s
10;

(24) RCW
18.74.130 (Exemptions) and 1983 c 116 s 22;

(25) RCW
18.74.135 (Insurance coverage and benefits not required or
regulated) and 1988 c 185 s 5;

(26) RCW 18.74.140
(Practice setting not restricted) and 1991 c 12 s 4;

(27) RCW
18.74.900 (Severability--1949 c 239) and 1949 c 239 s 13;

(28) RCW
18.74.910 (Severability--1961 c 64) and 1961 c 64 s 11; and

(29) RCW
18.74.911 (Severability--1983 c 116) and 1983 c 116 s 24.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23.
Sections 1 through 21 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---