BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.060 and 1987 c 109 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

(a)
Water masters shall be appointed by the department whenever it shall find the
interests of the state or of the water users to require them((.));
and

(b)
The districts for or in which the water masters serve shall be designated water
master districts, which shall be fixed from time to time by the department, as
required, and they shall be subject to revision as to boundaries or to complete
abandonment as local conditions may indicate to be expedient, the spirit of
this provision being that no district shall be created or continued where the
need for the same does not exist.

(2)
The department shall appoint a water master for each watershed management area
for which a plan has been adopted by a planning unit and by the counties with
territory in the watershed management area under RCW 90.82.130.

(3)
Water masters shall be supervised by the department, shall be compensated for
services from funds of the department, and shall be technically qualified to
the extent of understanding the elementary principals of hydraulics and
irrigation, and of being able to make water measurements in streams and in open
and closed conduits of all characters, by the usual methods employed for that
purpose. Counties and municipal and public corporations of the state are
authorized to contribute moneys to the department to be used as compensation to
water masters in carrying out their duties. All such moneys received by the
department shall be used exclusively for said purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

If
a watershed planning process has been initiated under chapter 90.82 RCW for a
water resource inventory area or WRIA as defined in RCW 90.82.020 and a person
has filed an application for a water right permit for a beneficial use of water
within or from the WRIA that has been documented as having been used by the
applicant before January 1, 1993, the person may continue to use the water
beneficially until one of the following occurs:

(1)
Following the adoption by the counties with territory in the WRIA of a water
resource plan for the WRIA under RCW 90.82.130, the department makes its final
decision granting or denying the water right application filed by the person;
or

(2) If the department has not made a final decision on the water
right application, a court of competent jurisdiction issues a decree pursuant
to a general adjudication under RCW 90.03.200 that defines or denies the
person's right to appropriate water as provided in the application.

---
END ---