BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of health shall adopt as rules conservation and efficiency standards
and safeguards that shall apply to the transmission of water to and the
distribution of water by a public water system receiving water through an
intertie approved after the effective date of this section. The standards
shall apply to a public water system receiving such water if the public water
system has at least one thousand service connections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

If
a water right certificate was issued by the department of ecology before the
effective date of this section to a public water system and, at the time the
certificate was issued, the amount of water listed on the certificate as being
subject to diversion for use under the certificate included both amounts
beneficially used by the date of the issuance and amounts not yet beneficially
used by that date, the water right represented by the certificate is for the
total of both such amounts. Any amounts not yet beneficially used under such a
certificate by the effective date of this section are governed by the inchoate
portion of the water right and remain available to a public water system
holding the certificated right for further development and for transfer or
change for further development. The place of use for the water right
represented by such a certificate is the place of use listed on the certificate
or the place of use identified in the water system plan approved by the
department of health on the effective date of this section for the public water
system, whichever document identifies a larger service area for the public
water system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
beneficial use of water governed by an inchoate portion of a water right
described in section 2 or 5 of this act that begins on or after the effective
date of this section is subject to the following conditions:

(1)
The beneficial use shall be consistent with any comprehensive land use plan
adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW for the area in which the beneficial use takes
place or, if comprehensive land use planning has not been conducted for that
area under chapter 36.70A RCW, the beneficial use shall be consistent with any
comprehensive plan adopted under chapter 36.70 RCW for the area; and

(2)
If a public water system applies for a transfer, change, or amendment to an
inchoate portion of its water right to provide for the initial beneficial use
of water governed by the inchoate portion of the right, the public water system
and the department shall study the effects of the transfer, change, or
amendment on habitat for fish stocks listed or proposed for listing as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act or as
critical or depressed in the state's salmon and steelhead stock inventory. If
the proposed use would adversely impact such habitat and the public water
system does not withdraw the application, the system shall develop a plan for
mitigating the adverse impacts and for monitoring the effectiveness of the
mitigation effort. Any such mitigation shall be conducted concurrently with
the transfer, change, or amendment of the right. This subsection includes, but
is not limited to, any change of the place of use for such an inchoate portion
of a water right made through an intertie.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department may not approve any transfer or change of a water right held by
a public water system that changes the place of use for the right for
beneficial use by a public water system unless the conservation and efficiency
measures and safeguards for the distribution of water in the new place of use
are at least as stringent as the conservation and efficiency measures and
safeguards existing for the distribution of water by the system in the place of
use for the original water right before the transfer or change.

(2)
This subsection applies to any transfer or change of a water right that changes
the place of use of water so that it may be beneficially used by a public water
system with one thousand or more service connections. The department of
ecology may not approve such a transfer or change for a water right unless the
system for distributing water in the new place of use satisfies the standards
and safeguards adopted by the department of health under section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A new
section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

If
a water right certificate was issued by the department of ecology before the
effective date of this section to a public water system and, at the time the
certificate was issued, the amount of water listed on the certificate as being
subject to withdrawal for use under the certificate included both amounts
beneficially used by the date of the issuance and amounts not yet beneficially
used by that date, the water right represented by the certificate is for the
total of both such amounts. Any amounts not yet beneficially used under such a
certificate by the effective date of this section are governed by the inchoate
portion of the water right and remain available to a public water system
holding the certificated right for further development and for further
development through the amendment of the right. The place of use for the water
right represented by such a certificate is the place of use listed on the
certificate or the place of use identified in the water system plan approved by
the department of health on the effective date of this section for the public
water system, whichever document identifies a larger service area for the
public water system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department may not approve any amendment of a water right held by a public
water system that changes the place of use for the right for beneficial use by
a public water system unless the conservation and efficiency measures and
safeguards for the distribution of water in the new place of use are at least
as stringent as the conservation and efficiency measures and safeguards
existing for the distribution of water by the system in the place of use for
the original water right before the amendment.

(2)
This subsection applies to any amendment of a water right that changes the
place of use of water so that it may be beneficially used by a public water
system with one thousand or more service connections. The department of
ecology may not approve such an amendment for a water right unless the system
for distributing water in the new place of use satisfies the standards and
safeguards adopted by the department of health under section 1 of this act.

Sec.
7. RCW
90.03.383 and 1991 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability
of public water systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently
utilizing the increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the
most populous areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water supply
management, and the trend toward regional planning and regional solutions to
resource issues, interconnections of public water systems through interties
provide a valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for the
citizens of the state. Public water systems have been encouraged in the past
to utilize interties to achieve public health and resource management
objectives. The legislature finds that it is in the public interest to
recognize interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, and to have
associated water rights modified by the department of ecology to reflect
current use of water through those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section. The legislature further finds it in the public interest to
develop a coordinated process to review proposals for interties commencing use
after January 1, 1991.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water between those
systems for other than emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or
delivery is within established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates
specified in the systems' existing water right permits or certificates, or
contained in claims filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in
better management of public water supply consistent with existing rights and
obligations. Interties include interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange, acquisition, or delivery of water to serve as
primary or secondary sources of supply((, but do not include development of
new sources of supply to meet future demand)).

(b)
"Service area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a
coordinated water system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW
respectively. When a public water system does not have a designated service
area subject to the approval process of those chapters, the service area shall
be the designated place of use contained in the water right permit or
certificate, or contained in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3)
Public water systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991,
or that have received written approval from the department of health prior to
that date, shall file written notice of those interties with the department of
health and the department of ecology. The notice may be incorporated into the
public water system's five-year update of its water system plan, but shall be
filed no later than June 30, 1996. The notice shall identify the location of
the intertie; the dates of its first use; the purpose, capacity, and current
use; the intertie agreement of the parties and the service areas assigned; and
other information reasonably necessary to modify the water right permit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water
systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, 1991, the
department of ecology, upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this
subsection, shall, as soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions
in the water right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use
through such interties, provided that the place of use is within service area
designations established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW, or a coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
70.116 RCW, and further provided that the water used is within the
instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit
and that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing water rights have
been filed with the department of ecology prior to September 1, 1991. Where
such complaints of impairment have been received, the department of ecology
shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve them in a timely manner through
agreement of the parties or through available administrative remedies.

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or
delivery of water through interties commencing use after January 1, 1991, shall
be permitted when the intertie improves overall system reliability, enhances
the manageability of the systems, provides opportunities for conjunctive use,
or delays or avoids the need to develop new water sources, and otherwise meets
the requirements of this section, provided that each public water system's
water use shall not exceed the instantaneous or annual withdrawal rate
specified in its water right authorization, shall not adversely affect existing
water rights, and shall not be inconsistent with state-approved plans such as
water system plans or other plans which include specific proposals for
construction of interties. Interties commencing use after January 1, 1991,
shall not be inconsistent with regional water resource plans developed pursuant
to chapter 90.54 RCW.

(5)
For public water systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW
or chapter 70.116 RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1,
1991, shall be incorporated into water system plans pursuant to chapter 43.20
RCW or coordinated water system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and
submitted to the department of health and the department of ecology for review
and approval as provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section.
The plan shall state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system
reliability, enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities
for conjunctive use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.

(6)
The department of health shall be responsible for review and approval of
proposals for new interties. In its review the department of health shall
determine whether the intertie satisfies the criteria of subsection (4) of this
section, with the exception of water rights considerations, which are the
responsibility of the department of ecology, and shall determine whether the
intertie is necessary to address emergent public health or safety concerns
associated with public water supply.

(7)
If the intertie is determined by the department of health to be necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the public water system shall amend its water system plan as required
and shall file an application with the department of ecology to change its
existing water right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described in
the approved water system plan. The department of ecology shall process the
application for change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate,
except that, notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding
notice and protest periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one
time, and the comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication
of the notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department
of ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely
affected by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an
extension of the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the
department of health and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which
its determination will be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and
in no event shall the total review period for the department of ecology exceed
one hundred eighty days.

(8)
If the department of health determines the proposed intertie appears to meet
the requirements of subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the department of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the
department of ecology an application for change to the underlying water right
or claim as necessary to reflect the new place of use. The department of ecology
shall consider the applications pursuant to the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and
90.44.100 as appropriate. If in its review of proposed interties and
associated water rights the department of ecology determines that additional
information is required to act on the application, the department may request
applicants to provide information necessary for its decision, consistent with
agency rules and written guidelines. Parties disagreeing with the decision of
the department of ecology on the application for change in place of use may
appeal the decision to the pollution control hearings board.

(9)
The department of health may approve plans containing intertie proposals prior
to the department of ecology's decision on the water right application for
change in place of use. However, notwithstanding such approval, construction
work on the intertie shall not begin until the department of ecology issues the
appropriate water right document to the applicant consistent with the approved
plan.

(10) An intertie may not be used to deliver a primary or
secondary supply of water to a receiving system on a temporary basis unless the
terms of the intertie agreement specify the source of the water that will be
used by the receiving system to replace the water delivered on the temporary
basis, and provide that replacement water will be available for delivery to, or
use by, the receiving system before delivery by the supplying system under the
agreement is terminated. However, if a primary or secondary supply of water is
delivered to a receiving system on a temporary basis by means of an intertie on
the effective date of this section and the agreement between the supplying
system and receiving system does not contain such provision for such a
replacement supply of water for the receiving system, the delivery of the water
by the supplying system to the receiving system may not be terminated until the
agreement is modified to establish such provisions, and such replacement water
is available for delivery to or use by the receiving system.

---
END ---