BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall process and render decisions on applications
for changes or transfers under this chapter and amendments of ground water
rights under chapter 90.44 RCW as a matter of higher priority than processing
and rendering decisions on applications for new water rights. Any application
for a new water right for which a permit decision has not been made by the
department at the time a transfer, change, or amendment is approved shall not
be considered an existing water right subject to analysis as to whether the
application may be injured, impaired, or detrimentally affected by the transfer
or change.

---
END ---