BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

An
alternative learning experience parent partnership program may be counted as a
course of study. An alternative learning experience parent partnership program
is an individualized course of study for a student who is not homeschooled
under RCW 28A.225.010(4), a private school student under RCW 28A.225.010(1)(a),
or an adult education student. The alternative learning experience is provided
in accordance with a written alternative learning experience plan that is
implemented pursuant to the school district board's policy for alternative
learning experience parent partnership programs. The school district board
policy must have been adopted in a public meeting. The alternative learning experience
is provided by the school district and may be conducted in part outside of the
regular classroom. A portion of the alternative learning experience may be
provided by the student's parent or guardian under supervision by the school
district. An alternative learning experience parent partnership program may be
counted as a course of study if the following requirements are met:

(1)
Each school district claiming basic education funding for alternative learning
experience parent partnership programs shall have written policies on file
that:

(a)
Require a written plan for each student participating in an alternative
learning experience that meets the minimum criteria under subsection (2) of
this section;

(b)
Require that all alternative learning experience curriculum and course
requirements be approved by the school district;

(c)
Describe how student performance will be supervised, evaluated, and recorded by
school district staff;

(d)
Require that each student's educational progress will be reviewed at least once
during the first twenty school days and afterwards at least once every
forty-five school days and that the results of each evaluation shall be
communicated to the student and if the student is in grades K-8, the student's
parent or guardian. If the school district determines that a student is not
substantially successful in completing the learning activities described in the
written alternative learning experience plan, a revised written plan may be
implemented. Any revised written plan shall be designed to enable the student
to be substantially successful in completing the learning activities described
in the revised written plan within ninety school days from the date that the
district first determines that the student is not substantially successful in
completing the assigned learning activities included in the original written
plan. If the school district determines that the student is still not
substantially successful in completing his or her assigned learning activities
after ninety school days from the date that the district first determines that
the student is not substantially successful in completing the learning
activities included in the original written plan, or sooner at the discretion
of the school district, a plan to remove the student from the alternative
program shall be devised. Such plan shall specify that the student shall be
removed from the alternative program no later than the end of the current
school year for a period of at least one school term. Students removed from
the alternative program shall be offered the opportunity to enroll in another
course of study;

(e)
Require that the alternative learning experience plan for each student and all
records of enrollment, attendance, and total hours of participation in educational
activities for the student are maintained and available for audit in the
appropriate school building;

(f)
Ensure that board policies, student instruction, and the instructional
materials referenced in the alternative learning experience plan are consistent
with the United States and Washington state Constitutions and RCW 28A.600.025;
and

(g)
At the discretion of the school district board, the policy may describe
responsibilities of the student's parent or guardian including, but not limited
to:

(i)
Approval of the written alternative learning experience plan;

(ii)
Responsibility for the parent or guardian to provide or supervise a portion of
the student's alternative learning experience if the parent or guardian agrees;
and

(iii)
Requirements to meet with district staff for purposes of evaluating the
student's performance and/or receiving instructions on assisting with the
student's alternative learning experience. The school district board may also
prescribe requirements for appointing a person to provide or supervise a
portion of the student's alternative learning experience in the event the
student's parent or guardian will not or can not be a participant in the
student's alternative learning experience;

(2)
The alternative learning experience plan for a student shall be a written plan
of instruction designed to meet the individual needs of the student, and shall
be approved by a school district official and any other person as required or
allowed by school district policy. The written plan shall include, but not be
limited to, the following elements:

(a)
A schedule of the duration of the program, including beginning and ending
dates;

(b)
A description of the learning activities the student is expected to
successfully complete. Such description shall be sufficient in detail to guide
and advise the student of the expectations;

(c)
A description of the teaching component of the program, including where and
when teaching activities will be conducted by school district staff;

(d)
A description of the responsibilities of the student including a requirement
that if, on average, the student attends school fewer than five hours a week,
the student shall meet one-on-one with qualified district staff for an average
minimum of sixty minutes every five school days for instruction, review of the
student's assignments, testing, and/or other learning activities. If more than
one student meets with a qualified district staff member at one time, the
required time is increased proportionately, for example, the requirement
becomes one hundred twenty minutes if two full-time equivalent students meet
with the staff member at one time. Students enrolled in board-approved
distance learning programs are exempt from the requirements of this subsection
(2)(d); and

(e)
A reasonably accurate estimate of the average number of hours per month that
the student will be engaged in learning activities to meet the requirements of
the alternative learning experience plan. This estimate may be used in
reporting enrollment in compliance with subsection (3) of this section and must
be based upon the criteria in subsection (3)(a)(i) of this section;

(3)
The full-time equivalency of students enrolled in alternative learning
experiences shall be determined based upon both (a) and (b) of this subsection
as follows:

(a)
The number of hours that each student engages in learning activities as
determined by either (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection as follows:

(i)
The total number of hours that the student engages in learning activities under
the written alternative learning experience plan including:

(A)
Those hours in which a student is engaged in teaching and learning experiences
conducted by school district staff;

(B)
Those hours of work-based learning calculated that counts one hour per
scheduled school day as four hundred five hours of scheduled work experience
per school year;

(C)
Those hours of learning activity other than those specified in (a)(i)(A), (B),
and (D) of this subsection that are provided by the student's parent or
guardian, or other person as designated by the written plan, under the direct
supervision of the district's qualified instructional staff; and

(D)
Those hours that the student participates in learning activities other than
those specified in (a)(i)(A), (B), and (C) of this subsection. Such learning
activity shall be pursuant to the student's alternative learning experience
plan and if the student is in grades K-8, only includes those hours the student
is supervised by the student's parent or guardian or other person designated by
the written alternative learning experience plan;

(ii)
The district may use the estimated average hours per month the student is
engaged in learning activities as stated in the alternative learning experience
plan that meet the requirements of (a)(i) of this subsection. However, for any
count date on which the student has averaged, for the immediate two prior
months during the current school year, a number of hours engaged in learning
activities that differ by more than five hours a week from the alternative
learning experience plan estimate under subsection (2)(e) of this section, the
district shall adjust the full-time equivalency of the student for such count
date to the lesser of one or the full-time equivalency calculated using the
two-month average;

(b)
The district shall exclude students meeting the definition of enrollment
exclusions or students who have not met with appropriate district staff for
twenty consecutive school days. Any such student shall not be counted as an
enrolled student until the student has met with appropriate district staff and
resumed participation in his or her alternative learning experience or
participated in another course of study;

(4)
The district shall keep on file in the appropriate school building and have
available for audit, documentation of all hours of learning activities used to
determine the student's full-time equivalency including documentation of the
following:

(a)
For students in grades K-8, written statements from the student's parent or
guardian or other person as designated by the written alternative learning
experience plan. Such statements shall be submitted to the district on a
monthly basis or more often at the discretion of the district and shall list
those hours that the student has engaged in planned learning activities while
not in the presence of district staff. Reported hours shall be used to
determine the full-time equivalency of the student under subsection (3) of this
section;

(b)
For students in grades 9-12, the student shall submit to the district written
statements on a monthly basis or more often at the discretion of the district.
Such statements shall list those hours that the student has engaged in planned
learning activities while not in the presence of district staff. Reported
hours shall be used to determine the full-time equivalency of the student under
subsection (3) of this section; and

(c)
Each student's educational progress in grades two through ten shall be assessed
at least annually using either the state assessment provided the student's
grade level or another assessment selected by the school district if the state
assessment is not provided;

(5)
The school district shall either:

(a)
Maintain a ratio of full-time equivalent certificated instructional staff
serving the annual average full-time equivalent students reported for basic
education funding under this section that is at least equal to the district's
basic education funding ratio for the grade band of the students being reported
for basic education funding pursuant to this section; or

(b)
Separately account for, document, and have available for audit, evidence that
the alternative learning experience parent partnership program expends during
the school year at least seventy percent of the basic education entitlement
claimed for students enrolled in alternative learning experiences during the
school year. Such expenditures shall be direct expenditures in the following
programs as defined in the "Accounting Manual for Public School
Districts in Washington State" for the school year:

(i)
Program 01, basic education; and/or

(ii)
Program 31, vocational, basic, state; and/or

(iii) Program 45, skills center, basic, state.

---
END ---