BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 24.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any department or agency of the state may apply to the secretary of state for
the administrative suspension of a corporation or foreign corporation's
certificate of incorporation if the agency establishes that the corporation or
foreign corporation meets any of the criteria established under section 7 of
this act. The application must state the legal name of the corporation or
foreign corporation, a description of the reasons for the request, and the
names of other agencies the applicant is aware of which have contracted with,
or have a contract with, the corporation or foreign corporation.

(2)
Upon receiving an application under subsection (1) of this section, the
secretary of state shall issue a certificate of suspension which will be filed
in the secretary of state's office, mailed to the corporation or foreign
corporation according to subsection (3) of this section, and mailed to any
agencies the secretary of state knows the corporation or foreign corporation
has contracted with.

(3)
If the secretary of state suspends a corporation or foreign corporation's
certificate of incorporation under subsection (1) of this section, the
secretary shall provide written notice by certified mail addressed to the
corporation or foreign corporation's registered agent. If, according to the
records of the secretary of state, the corporation or foreign corporation does
not have a registered agent, the notice may be given by first class mail
addressed to the corporation or foreign corporation's last known address or at
the address of any corporation or foreign corporation officer or director.
Notice is deemed to have been given five days after the date the notice is
deposited in the mail, correctly addressed, and with correct postage affixed.
The notice shall inform the corporation or foreign corporation that its
certificate is suspended, the reasons for the suspension, the corporation or
foreign corporation's right to request an adjudicative proceeding to contest
the suspension within twenty days of the date of notice, and the procedures for
appealing the suspension under section 2 of this act. Included with the notice
shall be the certificate of suspension.

(4)
Upon the filing of a certificate of suspension under subsection (2) of this
section, the authority of the corporation or foreign corporation to enter into
personal service or client service contracts with the state shall cease. The
filing of a certificate of suspension shall not otherwise affect the corporation
or foreign corporation's authority to conduct affairs in the state, or to
defend any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state. The filing
of a certificate of suspension shall not impair any remedy available to or
against such corporation or foreign corporation, its directors, officers,
members, or shareholders, for any right or claim, or liability incurred. The
filing of a certificate of suspension shall not relieve the corporation or
foreign corporation of complying with any applicable requirements, obligations,
or fees established under this chapter.

(5)
Upon the filing of a certificate of suspension under subsection (2) of this
section, the secretary shall notify the department of licensing of the
suspension. The notice shall include the corporation or foreign corporation's
unified business identifier number.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 24.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A corporation or foreign corporation may request an adjudicative proceeding
upon service of the notice described in section 1 of this act. The request for
an adjudicative proceeding must be received by the secretary within twenty days
of service.

(2)
The request must be in writing and indicate the current mailing address and
daytime phone number, if available, of the corporation or foreign
corporation. The proceedings under this subsection shall be conducted in
accordance with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW. The secretary may enter
into an agreement with another public entity to provide the adjudicative
proceeding.

(3)
If a corporation or foreign corporation timely requests an adjudicative
proceeding pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the secretary may not
suspend the certificate of incorporation of the corporation or foreign
corporation unless the adjudicative proceeding results in a finding that the
corporation or foreign corporation meets any of the criteria developed by the
office of financial management pursuant to section 7 of this act.

(4)
The decision resulting from the adjudicative proceeding must be in writing and
inform the corporation or foreign corporation of its right to review. The
corporation or foreign corporation's copy of the decision may be sent by
regular mail to the corporation or foreign corporation's most recent address of
record.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 24.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary of state shall cancel the certificate of suspension and reinstate
the articles of incorporation to unrestricted status of a corporation or
foreign corporation who has had its certificate of incorporation suspended
pursuant to section 1 of this act, if either the secretary of state has
determined that the corporation or foreign corporation has remedied the
misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance that led to the suspension and taken
sufficient corrective action to prevent a reoccurrence of the misfeasance,
malfeasance, or nonfeasance, or a court of competent jurisdiction or an
administrative law judge has ordered the secretary to reinstate the certificate
of incorporation. The secretary shall make a determination regarding
reinstatement after considering recommendations made by the agency that applied
to the secretary for suspension of the corporation or foreign corporation's
certificate of incorporation.

(2)
To reinstate the articles of incorporation of a corporation or foreign
corporation, the secretary of state shall cancel the certificate of suspension,
prepare and file a certificate of reinstatement, and mail a copy of both
certificates to the corporation or foreign corporation. The certificates shall
be sent by certified mail addressed to the corporation or foreign corporation's
registered agent. If, according to the records of the secretary of state, the
corporation or foreign corporation does not have a registered agent, the
certificates may be sent by first class mail addressed to the corporation or
foreign corporation's last known address or at the address of any corporation
or foreign corporation officer or director. Notice is deemed to have been
given five days after the date the notice is deposited in the mail, correctly
addressed, and with correct postage affixed.

(3)
Upon the filing of a certificate of reinstatement, the secretary of state shall
notify the department of licensing of the reinstatement. The notice shall
include the corporation or foreign corporation's unified business identifier
number.

(4)
Reinstatement under this section relates back to and takes effect as of the
date of suspension. The corporate authority shall be deemed to have continued
without interruption from that date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 24.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A corporation or foreign corporation that has had its certificate of
incorporation suspended for the purpose of contracting with the state may not
enter into any contract for personal services or client services with the state
until the secretary of state reinstates the corporation or foreign
corporation's articles of incorporation to unrestricted status.

(2)
A corporation or foreign corporation whose certificate of incorporation has been
suspended by the secretary of state pursuant to section 1 of this act may not
maintain any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state arising out
of a contract entered into with a state agency in violation of subsection (1)
of this section until such corporation or foreign corporation shall have
obtained a certificate of reinstatement under section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 24.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A corporation or foreign corporation whose certificate of incorporation has
been suspended under section 1 of this act may petition the secretary of state
for reinstatement after an interval determined by the secretary.

(2)
Upon a petition by a corporation or foreign corporation, the secretary of state
shall request a recommendation by the applying agency under section 9 of this
act. Within five working days of receiving the recommendation, the secretary
shall determine whether the corporation or foreign corporation has remedied the
misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance that was the subject of the original
application and taken sufficient corrective action to prevent a reoccurrence of
the misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance. If the secretary determines that
reinstatement is appropriate, he or she shall reinstate the corporation or
foreign corporation's articles of incorporation consistent with section 3 of
this act. If the secretary determines that reinstatement is not appropriate,
he or she shall notify the corporation or foreign corporation of the decision,
the corporation or foreign corporation's right to appeal, and the procedures
for filing an appeal. The notice shall be sent by regular mail addressed to
the corporation or foreign corporation's registered agent. If, according to
the records of the secretary of state, the corporation or foreign corporation
does not have a registered agent, the notice may be sent by first class mail
addressed to the corporation or foreign corporation's last known address or at
the address of any corporation or foreign corporation officer or director.
Notice is deemed to have been given five days after the date the notice is
deposited in the mail, correctly addressed, and with correct postage affixed.

(3)
A corporation or foreign corporation may request an adjudicative proceeding
upon service of the notice described in subsection (2) of this section. The
request for an adjudicative proceeding must be received by the secretary within
twenty days of service. The request must be in writing and indicate the
current mailing address and daytime phone number, if available, of the
corporation or foreign corporation. The proceedings under this subsection
shall be conducted in accordance with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW.
The secretary may enter into an agreement with another public entity to provide
the adjudicative proceeding.

(4)
In any hearing under this section, the applying agency shall be represented.

(5)
The decision resulting from the adjudicative proceeding must be in writing and
inform the corporation or foreign corporation of its right to review. The
corporation or foreign corporation's copy of the decision may be sent by
regular mail to the corporation or foreign corporation's most recent address of
record.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW to read as follows:

Upon
receiving a notice from the secretary of state under section 1 of this act of
the suspension of a corporation or foreign corporation's articles of
incorporation, or a notice under section 3 of this act of the reinstatement of
a corporation or foreign corporation's article of incorporation to unrestricted
status, the director shall so indicate on electronic records containing unified
business identifiers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall develop specific criteria to determine whether a corporation
or foreign corporation that contracts with the state to provide personal
services or client services should be reported to the secretary of state under
section 10 of this act. The criteria shall describe misfeasance, malfeasance,
or nonfeasance by a corporation or foreign corporation related to performance
of a personal service or client service contract with a state agency that
warrants the suspension of its authority to contract with the state, and shall
include, but is not limited to the following criteria:

(a)
Failure to meet reporting requirements;

(b)
Fraud;

(c)
Misuse of funds;

(d)
Failure to comply, timely complete, or repeatedly violate a corrective action
plan;

(e)
Material breach of contract;

(f)
Default on performance of material terms of the contract;

(g)
Gross nonperformance;

(h)
Significant overpayments; and

(i)
Significant double billing.

(2)
The director shall develop general guidelines for when a state agency should
recommend to the secretary of state that a corporation or foreign corporation's
articles of incorporation should be reinstated to unrestricted status. The
guidelines shall correspond to the criteria developed in subsection (1) of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A state agency may not contract with a corporation or foreign corporation for
personal services or client services for as long as a corporation or foreign
corporation's certificate of incorporation is suspended by the secretary of
state pursuant to section 1 of this act.

(2)
Within three months of being notified of the suspension of a corporation or
foreign corporation's certificate of incorporation pursuant to section 1 of
this act, a state agency shall terminate any contracts for personal services or
client services the agency has entered into with the corporation or foreign
corporation.

(3)
State agencies shall place in all contracts with corporations or foreign
corporations for personal services or client services clauses notifying the
corporations or foreign corporations of the provisions of this act.

(4)
An agency shall competitively procure any contract for client services when the
prior contract was terminated because the corporation or foreign corporation's
certificate of incorporation was suspended by the secretary of state under
section 1 of this act. The competitive procurement process shall conform to
the requirements of chapter 39.29 RCW.

(5)
Prior to entering into a contract for personal services or client services with
a corporation or foreign corporation, an agency shall check the department of
licensing's electronic records of unified business identifiers to determine if
the corporation or foreign corporation has had its certificate of incorporation
suspended under section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An agency, which has applied to the secretary of state to suspend the certificate
of incorporation of a corporation or foreign corporation under section 1 of
this act, shall recommend that the secretary of state reinstate the corporation
or foreign corporation's certificate of incorporation if the corporation or
foreign corporation has remedied the misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance
that was the subject of the application and the agency determines that the
corporation or foreign corporation has taken sufficient corrective action to
prevent a reoccurrence of the misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance. In
making this determination, the agency shall use the guidelines developed by the
office of financial management under section 7 of this act.

(2)
The recommendation will be in writing and shall include a copy of the original
application and a description of the reasons for the recommendation.

(3)
Upon the request of the secretary of state, an agency shall provide the
secretary with a recommendation regarding whether the secretary should
reinstate the corporation or foreign corporation's articles of incorporation to
unrestricted status. The recommendation shall be in accordance with subsection
(1) of this section. The agency shall provide the recommendation to the
secretary of state within ten working days of the request.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If a nonprofit corporation or foreign corporation that is a party to a contract
for personal services or client services with a state agency meets any of the
criteria developed by the office of financial management under section 2 of
this act, the state agency shall apply to the secretary of state for suspension
of the corporation or foreign corporation's certificate of incorporation pursuant
to section 1 of this act.

(2)
A state agency that makes an application under subsection (1) of this section
shall notify the corporation or foreign corporation of the application. Notice
shall be by first class mail to the corporation or foreign corporation's last
known address.

Sec.
11. RCW
24.03.005 and 1989 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

(1)
"Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a corporation
not for profit subject to the provisions of this chapter, except a foreign
corporation.

(2)
"Foreign corporation" means a corporation not for profit organized
under laws other than the laws of this state.

(3)
"Not for profit corporation" or "nonprofit corporation"
means a corporation no part of the income of which is distributable to its
members, directors or officers.

(4)
"Articles of incorporation" and "articles" mean the
original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto, and includes
articles of merger and restated articles.

(5)
"Bylaws" means the code or codes of rules adopted for the regulation
or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or
names by which such rules are designated.

(6)
"Member" means an individual or entity having membership rights in a
corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles or incorporation
or bylaws.

(7)
"Board of directors" means the group of persons vested with the
management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name by which
such group is designated in the articles or bylaws.

(8)
"Insolvent" means inability of a corporation to pay debts as they
become due in the usual course of its affairs.

(9)
"Duplicate originals" means two copies, original or otherwise, each
with original signatures, or one original with original signatures and one copy
thereof.

(10)
"Conforms to law" as used in connection with duties of the secretary
of state in reviewing documents for filing under this chapter, means the
secretary of state has determined that the document complies as to form with
the applicable requirements of this chapter.

(11)
"Effective date" means, in connection with a document filing made by
the secretary of state, the date which is shown by affixing a "filed"
stamp on the documents. When a document is received for filing by the
secretary of state in a form which complies with the requirements of this
chapter and which would entitle the document to be filed immediately upon
receipt, but the secretary of state's approval action occurs subsequent to the
date of receipt, the secretary of state's filing date shall relate back to the
date on which the secretary of state first received the document in acceptable
form. An applicant may request a specific effective date no more than thirty
days later than the receipt date which might otherwise be applied as the
effective date.

(12)
"Executed by an officer of the corporation," or words of similar
import, means that any document signed by such person shall be and is signed by
that person under penalties of perjury and in an official and authorized
capacity on behalf of the corporation or person making the document submission
with the secretary of state.

(13)
"An officer of the corporation" means, in connection with the
execution of documents submitted for filing with the secretary of state, the
president, a vice president, the secretary, or the treasurer of the
corporation.

(14)
"Public benefit not for profit corporation" or "public benefit
nonprofit corporation" means a corporation no part of the income of which
is distributable to its members, directors, or officers and that holds a
current tax exempt status as provided under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) or is
specifically exempted from the requirement to apply for its tax exempt status
under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).

(15)
"Personal services and client services" have the meaning given to
them under chapter 39.29 RCW.

(16)
"Suspended certificate of incorporation" means a certificate of
incorporation that is evidence that all conditions precedent required to be
performed by the incorporators have been complied with and that the corporation
may conduct affairs in this state, except for entering into personal service or
client service contracts with the state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---