BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
PURPOSE. The purpose of this chapter is to enable an optional
water allocation method within qualified water resource inventory areas, by
allowing local water management districts to restructure water holdings into
new packages more suitable to current and future water users, in a manner that
will result in more efficient use of water resources, ensure the maintenance of
adequate instream flows for fish, improve protection of existing water rights,
help alleviate water shortages, provide a flexible and timely means of water
allocation, save capital outlays, reduce development costs, improve the
economic well-being of the state's citizenry and communities, maximize
involvement by local citizens in water resource management, and provide
incentives for water conservation, while improving effectiveness of state
oversight of water resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:

(1)
Water banking and marketing has proven to be of merit in addressing water
resource issues in other states;

(2)
Water banking and limited water marketing by water resource management
districts can provide a means of water allocation that will result in more
efficient use of water resources, ensure the maintenance of adequate instream
flows for fish, improve protection of existing water rights, help alleviate
water shortages, provide a flexible and timely means of water allocation, save
capital outlays, reduce development costs, improve the economic well-being of
the state's citizenry and communities, maximize involvement of local citizens
in water resource management, and provide incentives for water conservation,
while improving effectiveness of state oversight of water resources;

(3)
There is no single best model by which water banking and marketing could or
should operate; local banks and markets should be permitted sufficient latitude
in their formation and operation to reflect site-specific conditions, within a
state-established framework of suitable guidelines, standards, and minimum
requirements; and

(4)
The state should enable and assist in the formation of water resource
management districts in water resource inventory areas that meet the terms and
conditions set forth in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Board" means the board of directors of the water resource management
districts.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(4)
"District area" means the surface area encompassed by the boundary of
the water resource management district over which the district has water
resource management jurisdiction.

(5)
"Implementing rules" means the rules necessary to give force and
effect to the provisions of this chapter that create rights or obligations for
any party, including a state agency, or that establish water management policy.

(6)
"Inchoate water right" means a water right in good standing, some,
but not all, of which can be documented as having been put to beneficial use.

(7)
"Manager" means the person or persons authorized by the board to
manage the activities of the district.

(8)
"Minimum instream flow" means a minimum flow under chapter 90.03 or
90.22 RCW or a base flow under chapter 90.54 RCW.

(9)
"Person" means any individual, firm, association, water users'
association, corporation, irrigation district, or municipal corporation.

(10)
"Public water system" has the meaning provided in RCW 70.119A.020.

(11)
"Margin of error" means the unavoidable total cumulative error in
measuring water flows during water resource assessments.

(12)
"WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in chapter
173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

(13)
"WRIA plan" means the product of a planning unit established under the
provisions of chapter 90.82 RCW.

(14)
"Water resource management district" means a water resource
management district created by this chapter.

(15)
"Water bank" means an entity into which water rights may be
deposited, and from which water flows may be withdrawn, that is managed by the
board.

(16)
"Water marketing" means voluntary transfers of water into, and
authorized transfer of water out of, the water banks under the terms and
conditions set forth in this chapter.

(17)
"Water reserve" means a quantity of stored water that is kept in
reserve to meet potential shortfalls in water supply due to contingencies such
as prolonged drought, substantial leaks in water systems, nonpermitted water
use, and the margin of error associated with data collection during water
resource assessments.

(18)
"Water resource assessment" means the assessment of water supply and
use within a WRIA as provided in RCW 90.82.070.

(19)
"Water right" means a valid certificate or permit issued by the
department under chapter 90.03 RCW, or a claim of water right.

(20)
"Water transaction" means an accepted deposit of water flow into, or
an authorized withdrawal of water flow from, a water resource management
district water bank, as evidenced by a lawfully executed contract between the
parties depositing or withdrawing water and the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. WATER
RESOURCE MANAGEMENT DISTRICTS. (1) Water resource management districts may be
established for the purposes of this chapter.

(2)
A water resource management district shall be a corporate body, shall be of
permanent duration, and shall have a seal.

(3)
A water resource management district shall be known and designated as water
resource management district for . . . . . . WRIA
subdivision of the . . . . . . WRIA of the county in
which it is located.

(4)
A water resource management district, with the authorities and responsibilities
as set forth in subsection (5) of this section, shall be formed according to
the procedure set forth in subsection (6) of this section in WRIAs or
multi-WRIA management areas identified in RCW 90.82.040 that meet the following
terms and conditions:

(a)
Each management area must be undertaking, or must have completed, water
resource assessments under RCW 90.82.070;

(b)
Each management area must be undertaking to establish, under RCW 90.82.080, or
must have established minimum instream flows;

(c)
Each management area must, where applicable, be undertaking planning under
chapter 70.116 RCW, or must have approved coordinated water system plans under
chapter 70.116 RCW.

(5)
A water resource management district shall:

(a)
Monitor all water flows throughout the district area at a frequency to maintain
accurate and timely information about surface water and ground water flow, use,
and any and all other relevant water resource parameters necessary to the
fulfillment of its responsibilities under this chapter;

(b)
As provided in this chapter, finance, construct, maintain, and operate
facilities to capture, store, and use peak surface water flows, to maintain
established minimum instream flows in all streams and rivers within its
district area, protect existing water rights, maintain a water reserve, and
enable limited water marketing under the terms and conditions set forth in this
chapter;

(c)
Release stored water into the waters within the boundary of the district to
maintain established minimum instream flows and protect existing water rights;

(d)
Establish and manage a water bank under the terms of this chapter;

(e)
Hold, manage, and allocate, on behalf of the state, water from trust water
rights acquired by accepting deposits to water banks as provided in this
chapter;

(f)
Purchase, lease, or accept temporary or permanent donations of water from water
right holders for deposit into water banks as provided in this chapter;

(g)
Lease water to applicants therefor;

(h)
Incur bonded indebtedness to finance the construction of water capture,
storage, and distribution facilities as provided by this chapter;

(i)
Acquire, purchase, hold, lease, manage, occupy, and sell real and personal
property or any interest therein, enter into and perform all necessary
contracts, appoint and employ necessary agents and employees and fix their
compensation, employ contractors including contracts for professional services,
sue and be sued, and do any and all lawful acts required and expedient to carry
out the purposes of this chapter.

(6)
A water resource management district is established as follows:

(a)
Any holder or holders of water rights located within the boundaries of a
potential water resource management district's district area who wish to form a
water resource management district shall develop, or cause to be developed, a
preliminary district management plan, which shall include a study to determine
whether conducting the activities that this chapter permits a water resource
management district to conduct are consistent with the intent of this chapter.
The plan shall, in a comprehensive, professional, and verifiable manner, using
the water resource assessment performed for the WRIA in which the potential
district is located, ascertain or propose at least the following:

(i)
The availability of sufficient water to establish a water bank as provided in
section 12 of this act;

(ii)
The potential for capture, storage, and distribution of peak flows by
affordable technology, and cost estimates thereof;

(iii)
An estimate of the existing water right holders who are potential depositors to
a water bank within the district area, either through employment of
conservation measures, reuse, reclaimed water, or transfer of unused portions
of existing rights;

(iv)
An assessment of the impact of a water market mechanism, as provided in this
chapter, upon the social opportunity costs and benefits and nonmarket public
values associated with water resource uses in the proposed district area, such
as fish and wildlife habitat, water quality, power generation, and water-based
recreation;

(v)
An assessment of a mitigation plan for any identified adverse impacts;

(vi)
An outline of the proposed plan of operation of the water bank and water market
as provided in this chapter, including, but not limited to:

(A)
Its district boundary;

(B)
The number and term of office of the members of its board;

(C)
Its proposed pricing mechanism for both water deposits and water withdrawals;

(D)
Sources of funds;

(E)
Identification of the type, capacity, and cost of construction, maintenance,
and operation of any storage and distribution projects proposed in the plan;

(F)
Sources of ground and surface water to be stored, deposited, and withdrawn;

(G)
Any limitations of types of rights, source locations, class of owner, or type
of use that might be imposed upon either deposits accepted or withdrawals
permitted by the water bank;

(H)
Procedures for determining the bankable quantity of water provided by
depositors; and

(I)
The mechanism of posting and processing offers to deposit and requests to
withdraw water from the water resource management district's water bank; and

(vii)
An estimate of the potential for improving water resource management by water
banking and marketing within the proposed district area.

(b)
If the study required by subsection (5) of this section clearly supports a
conclusion that formation of a water resource management district would most
likely improve management of the area's water resources consistent with the
intent of this chapter, supporters of formatting a water resource management
district may circulate, or cause to be circulated, among the other water rights
holders located within the potential district's area, a petition calling for
forming the district. A petition receiving valid signatures of at least twenty
percent of the water rights holders located within the prospective district's
area may be submitted to the department. The petition must contain a true copy
of the results of the study undertaken as part of the preliminary plan required
by subsection (5) of this section, and a true copy of draft articles of
incorporation and bylaws of the prospective water resource management
district. The petition must state that establishment of the district will be
conducive to the public health, convenience, and welfare and will benefit the
property within the district. The petition must state the proposed name of the
district, according to the requirements of subsection (3) of this section. The
petition must be accompanied by a bond of five thousand dollars to defray costs
incurred by the department in considering the creation of the water resource
management district. There is no limit to the time available to those
circulating a petition; however, all signatories to the petition must be
holders of valid water rights at the time the petition is submitted to the
department.

(c)
The department shall complete a review of the preliminary plan within ninety
days of receiving a petition to form a district. If the department concurs
with the plan's conclusion, the department shall arrange a meeting between its
representatives, representatives of the petitioners, of local tribes with
jurisdiction, of affected county governments, and of cities located wholly or
partially inside the proposed district area, to draft a memorandum of agreement
that establishes the specific water resource management objectives of the
district and the general terms and conditions of the operation of the water
resource management district, based upon and incorporating the elements of the
preliminary plan submitted with the petition, suitably modified to address
concerns of the affected parties. The terms of the memorandum of agreement may
not be inconsistent with the watershed plan applicable to the proposed district
area adopted under chapter 90.82 RCW. Terms and conditions not directly
related to water resource management as provided in this chapter may not be
incorporated into the memorandum of agreement.

(d)
If the petition and the attached feasibility study are verified and accepted by
the department, the department shall notify the legislative authority of each
county in which the district area is located, informing each of the intent of
the petitioners to form a water resource management district, whereupon each
legislative authority, at a regular or special meeting, shall cause to be
published once a week for at least two weeks in one or more newspapers of
general circulation in the proposed district, a notice that the petition has
been presented to the department, setting forth the boundaries of the proposed
district, summarizing its purpose and plan, and stating the time and place of a
public hearing, which shall be held no earlier than forty-five days from the
date the notice is postmarked. The notice shall clearly indicate the criteria
for eligibility to vote on the formation of the proposed district, and shall
indicate how true copies of the preliminary plan, draft articles of
incorporation and bylaws, and draft memorandum of agreement may be obtained by
those eligible voters. At that hearing, any person, firm, or corporation may
appear before the county legislative authority and make a statement in support
of or opposition to the establishment of the district.

(e)
If the department finds, upon review of the testimony provided at the public
hearing provided by (d) of this subsection, that the proposed water resource
management district would fulfill the intent of this chapter, the department
shall authorize the auditor of each county within which the area of the
proposed district is located to hold a special election on the first special
election date provided for in RCW 29.13.020 that falls at least three months
after the date of the public hearing as provided in this section.

(f)
Those persons eligible to vote in the election are those living in and
registered to vote in the district area who are also either holders of water
rights, owners of wells exempt from permits under RCW 90.44.050, or owners of
real property located within the proposed district area.

(g)
The number of votes allotted to each voter shall be as set forth in this
chapter.

(h)
If the water resource management district is created, the county or counties
may charge to the board the costs of the auditor or auditors related to the
election to authorize the establishment of the district.

(i)
The election shall also provide for election of the initial members of the
board of the prospective water resource management district, under the terms
and conditions set forth in this chapter.

(j)
Formal completion of the establishment of a water resource management district
requires:

(i)
Affirmative votes from the electors within the proposed district area, as
follows: Seventy percent of the total of all holders of inchoate water rights,
plus fifty percent of all other persons eligible to vote;

(ii)
Execution of a final version of the memorandum of agreement by all parties
thereto; and

(iii)
Adoption by the department of a rule that applies only to the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
CONFLICT OF INTEREST. Any board member who seeks to enter into, or has any
interest in any entity that seeks to enter into, any water transaction
authorized under this chapter, must disclose the transaction to the other board
members prior to any board action on any aspect of the transaction, and must
refrain from voting on any aspect of the transaction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
QUALIFICATIONS OF WATER MANAGER. Persons hired by the board to serve as water
manager must have the following qualifications:

(1)
A bachelor of science degree from an accredited institution in a water-related
field, such as hydrology or engineering;

(2)
A demonstrated familiarity with state water law and hydrology; and

(3)
Experience in one water resource management field or more, as determined by the
board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
ESTABLISHMENT OF DISTRICT AREA. The boundaries of the district area of a water
resource management district are coterminous with the boundaries of
subdivisions of WRIAs established by the department. The districts may include
within their boundaries one or more counties, cities, and towns, or other
political subdivisions. However, no portion or all of any city or town may be included
without the consent by resolution of the city or town legislative authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
JURISDICTION OVER WATER RESOURCES. (1) The following waters located within the
boundaries of a district area fall under the jurisdiction of a water resource
management district, to be allocated under the terms and conditions set forth
in this chapter, and the terms and conditions of the memorandum of agreement
provided for in section 4(6)(c) of this act:

(a)
All surface and ground water not allocated to existing water rights or instream
flows;

(b)
All waters allocated to the trust water rights established under chapter 90.42
RCW;

(c)
All water captured and stored in storage facilities constructed by a water
resource management district.

(2)
A water resource management district may transfer water back and forth between
water sources under its jurisdiction as needed to fulfill its duties and
responsibilities under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
LIMITATION OF AUTHORITY AND RESPONSIBILITY. No water resource management
district may purvey water to retail customers or in any other way perform the
essential functions of a public water system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. WATER
RESOURCE MONITORING. A water resource management district shall perform or
cause to be performed continuous monitoring of all water flows throughout the
district area in order to maintain accurate and timely information about
magnitudes of water flow, water storage, water use, and any and all other
relevant water resource parameters necessary to the fulfillment of its responsibilities
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. WATER
STORAGE AND DISTRIBUTION FACILITIES. (1) If the water resource assessment
indicates there is, within the district area, insufficient water available,
using current supplies, to meet minimum instream flows, provide water to all
existing permitted water users to the full extent of their water rights,
establish a water reserve, and provide water for likely future beneficial uses,
a water resource management district shall undertake the financing,
construction, maintenance, and operation of water storage and distribution
facilities as necessary to fulfill its responsibilities under this chapter.

(2)
A water resource management district may undertake the financing, construction,
maintenance, and operation of additional water storage and distribution
facilities it deems necessary from time to time to fulfill the terms and
conditions of its responsibilities under this chapter.

(3)
Water storage and distribution facilities as provided under this section may
include, but are not limited to, natural and artificial surface reservoirs and
natural and artificial ground water aquifer recharge by injection wells,
spreading basins, and other recharge efforts.

(4)
Surface storage facilities meeting the requirements set forth in this section
may provide a variety of uses, including fish spawning and rearing habitat and
recreational uses, and, thus, may qualify to be classified as multipurpose
impoundment structures as described in RCW 90.54.020(6).

(5)
Surface storage facilities meeting the requirements set forth in this section
may be considered for fish and wildlife habitat enhancement or mitigation
projects under chapter 90.74 RCW.

(6)
Surface storage facilities with demonstrable wetlands functions meeting the
requirements set forth in this section may be used for wetland mitigation
banking purposes under chapter 90.84 RCW.

(7)
At all times, a water resource management district shall undertake water
storage and distribution projects in a cost-effective manner, using the best
available and affordable technology.

(8)
The state and all local governments with jurisdiction shall render all means
provided under state and local statute and rule to expedite all necessary
permits for the construction and operation of such storage and distribution
facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. WATER
BANKS. (1) A water resource management district shall establish a water bank
and shall ensure that the water bank holds all waters under its jurisdiction,
as provided in this chapter.

(2)
The manager shall utilize the water bank to facilitate water marketing as
provided by this chapter.

(3)
The manager shall at all times maintain complete and accurate records of all
water bank transactions, including the deposits and withdrawals provided for in
this chapter. The manager shall maintain data that includes: The type of each
transaction; the duration of each transaction; and the magnitude, both annual
and instantaneous flow, of the water flow associated with each transaction.
The manager shall make available for public inspection, during ordinary
business hours, the records of the water bank.

(4)
The manager shall ensure the solvency of the water bank at all times. The
manager shall maintain in the district water bank deposits of sufficient
duration and magnitude to ensure sufficient water to meet all water resource
responsibilities of the water resource management district. Failure of the
manager to maintain the solvency of the water bank may result in dissolution of
the water resource management district by department order, in addition to
applicable civil and criminal actions.

(5)
The manager shall, in computing the amount of water available for allocation
from the water bank, take into account the net return flow from each beneficial
use within the district area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. WATER
MARKETING. (1) Water resource management districts may market the waters under
their jurisdiction, according to the terms and conditions set forth in this
section, and the terms and conditions of the memorandum of agreement provided
for in this chapter. Water marketing under this section consists of accepting
deposits into, and permitting withdrawals from, the water bank, at prices set
by a market mechanism established by the district.

(2)
The board shall establish rules and operate the water market at all times to:
Maximize economic efficiency, provide equity to all parties, minimize
transaction costs, discourage speculative behavior, factor into water pricing
all relevant externalities identified in the water resource management district
plan, and allocate risk appropriately. The board shall craft district water
market rules that allow for predictable outcomes for all parties participating
in water marketing within the district area.

(3)
The board shall establish rules for operation of the water market, including
the mechanism for setting water prices and processing all deposit offers and
withdrawal requests, according to the terms and conditions set forth in this
chapter and the terms and conditions set forth in the memorandum of agreement.
The board shall publish the rules and make them available to all water rights
holders and potential water users within the district area.

(4)
All the terms and conditions of each deposit into and each withdrawal from a
water bank managed by a water resource management district must be set forth in
a written contract, executed by representatives of, and binding upon, parties
thereto.

(5)
The board may purchase, lease, or accept donations of water from water rights
holders, on a temporary or permanent basis, for deposit into a water bank as
provided in this chapter.

(6)
Contracts between depositors of water into a water bank and the water resource
management district may contain an option enabling the water resource
management district to renew such contracts under mutually agreed upon terms
and conditions.

(7)
Before accepting any water deposit under the terms of this section, the manager
shall investigate the legal and physical status of the depositor's water
rights, including the demonstrated consumption of the depositor, if any, to
ensure that the amount of water offered by the depositor is both legally and
physically available.

(8)
Before accepting any water deposit under the terms of this section, the manager
shall determine if the prospective depositor is a member of any type of
district under the laws of the state of Washington, including irrigation
districts and water districts, and, if the prospective depositor is, the
manager shall, before accepting the prospective deposit, require the
prospective depositor to obtain approval from the authority of the district.

(9)
Before accepting any water deposit under the terms of this section, the manager
shall determine if the water offered by a prospective depositor is encumbered
by any private contract or other arrangement, including one established by
common custom or practice, and shall condition the acceptance of any such
deposit upon the prospective depositor's removal of all encumbrances.

(10)
The board may lease water from the water bank to prospective water users who
apply for it.

(11)
Uses of water permitted to those requesting withdrawals may be continuous in
nature or may be intermittent or seasonal in nature. If the withdrawal is
intermittent or seasonal in nature, the withdrawn water, during the periods of
the year in which it is unused, must be returned to the water bank.

(12)
No lease of water withdrawal may extend further than ninety-nine years without
approval of the department.

(13)
The water resource management district shall offer all lessees of water
withdrawals the right of first refusal to lease the same amount of water for
specified lengths of time.

(14)
Applicants for withdrawals from the water bank must put the water applied for
to actual beneficial use within one year from the execution of the contract
therefor, or the withdrawal contract is null and void, and the water withdrawal
is prohibited.

(15)
The manager shall reject any proposed water withdrawal from the water bank if
the proposed withdrawal has potential to impair minimum instream flow levels or
potential to reduce the quantity of water available to other existing water
right holders.

(16)
Before issuing approval of any withdrawal, the manager shall assess any
potential third-party impacts of any prospective water withdrawal under this
section, and may reject or condition the approval of the withdrawal upon
finding significant impacts. The finding must be set forth in a document of
public record, and must reflect consideration of the terms and conditions of
the water resource management district memorandum of agreement as provided in
this chapter.

(17)
A water resource management district may charge appropriate transaction costs
to persons who deposit and to persons who withdraw water from the district.
The transaction costs may include a prorated share of the cost of recovery of
investments in capture, storage, and distribution facilities, district
management overhead, and other reasonable costs. Magnitudes of transaction
costs must be proportional to the magnitudes of deposits and withdrawals.
Although transaction costs may vary between classes of water rights holders,
water users, water sources, and other relevant water resource parameters,
transaction costs must be generally similar among similar classes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
MONITORING‑-INVESTIGATION. (1) The department shall monitor the
operation of a water resource management district to determine if the district
is fulfilling its obligations under this chapter. The manager and board of
each district shall cooperate fully with the department while it conducts any
investigation. The department may visit the offices and other facilities of a
district to fulfill its obligations under this section, and may do so without
warning to the manager or board.

(2)
After any investigation, if the department concludes that the district is
failing to meet its obligations under this chapter, or failing to meet the
terms and conditions of the memorandum of agreement as provided in this
chapter, and if the department deems the situation correctable by the district,
the department shall issue an administrative order under chapter 34.05 RCW,
detailing the corrective action to be undertaken by the district.

(3)
If the corrective action is not undertaken according to the terms and
conditions of the administrative order, or if the department deems infraction
uncorrectable by the district, the department may, at its discretion, order the
dissolution of the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
EXEMPTION FROM APPEAL. Water transactions by a water resource management
district may not be appealed under RCW 90.03.200, however any person may file
an appeal with the department on grounds that any consummated or contemplated
water transaction under this chapter has had, is having, or could have the
effect of impairing established minimum instream flows within, or downstream
of, the district area. A true copy of the appeal must be served upon the
manager when it is filed with the department. Upon filing of the appeal, the
department shall conduct an investigation of the merit of the appeal and shall
take such action as it deems appropriate as provided in this chapter. Nothing
in this section limits the rights of water rights holders, the state, or other
affected parties to file suits in equity in state court against the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. RIVER
IMPROVEMENT FUND TAX. Upon request by the board, the legislative authority of
the county or counties in which the district is located may dedicate a portion
of the river improvement fund tax under RCW 86.12.010 for the purposes of
funding capture, storage, and distribution facilities as provided in this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
RIGHTS NOT IMPAIRED. (1) Nothing in this chapter affects or impairs any
existing water rights.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter infringes upon the rate-making prerogatives of any
public water purveyor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18.
GOVERNING BOARD‑-TERMS OF OFFICE‑-ELECTION‑-APPOINTMENT‑-VACANCIES‑‑QUALIFICATIONS.
(1) The number of members serving on the board shall be as set forth in the
memorandum of agreement establishing the water resource management district.
The term of office for each member of a board is six years and until his or her
successor is elected and qualified. One member of the board is elected at the
time of special district general elections in each even-numbered year for a
term of six years, beginning as soon as the election returns have been
certified for assumption of office by elected officials of cities.

(2)
The terms of office of the initial members of the board are limited to provide
staggered six-year terms. One-third of the members-elect receiving the highest
numbers of votes shall serve for a full six-year term; one-third receiving the
next highest numbers of votes shall serve for an initial term of four years;
and the remaining one-third shall serve an initial term of two years.

(3)
After the initial election forming the district, regular elections for members
of the board shall be special purpose elections, regularly held on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in February in each even-numbered year, at which
a member of the board is regularly elected.

(4)
Any registered voter living in the area of the district, who is also an owner
of real property or holder of a water right located within the district, may
become a candidate for a position on the board by filing written notice of
intent with the county auditor at least sixty days before a special district general
election. The county auditor in consultation with the district shall establish
the filing period. The names of all candidates for such positions shall be
listed alphabetically.

(5)
Members of the board shall hold office until their successors are elected and
qualified, and shall assume office as soon as the election returns have been
certified.

(6)
The requirements for the filing period, the method for filing declarations of
candidacy for the board of the district, and the arrangement of candidate names
on the ballot for all district elections conducted after the initial election
in the district are the same as the requirements for the initial election in
the district. No primary elections may be held for the board.

(7)
When a vacancy occurs in the board, the legislative authority of the county
within which the district, or the largest portion of the district, is located,
shall appoint someone who meets the qualifications in subsection (4) of this
section to serve until a person is elected, at the next special district
general election occurring sixty or more days after the vacancy has occurred,
to serve the remainder of the unexpired term. The person so elected shall take
office immediately when qualified as defined in RCW 29.01.135.

(8)
If an election for the position which became vacant would otherwise have been
held at this special district election, only one election shall be held, and
the person elected to fill the succeeding term for that position takes office
immediately when qualified as defined in RCW 29.01.135 and serves both the
remainder of the unexpired term and the succeeding term. A vacancy occurs upon
the death, resignation, or incapacity of a board member, or whenever the board
member ceases being a qualified voter of the district.

(9)
An elected or appointed member of a board, or a candidate for a board, must be
a qualified voter of the district as provided in subsection (4) of this
section; however, the state, its agencies and political subdivisions, or their
designees under RCW 85.38.010(3) are not eligible for election or appointment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. BOARD‑-COMPENSATION
AND EXPENSES. Board members may receive up to seventy dollars for attendance
at official meetings of the board and for each day or major part thereof served
and for all necessary services actually performed in connection with duties as
a member. The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to the members,
secretary, and all other agents and employees of the district. Compensation
for the members shall not exceed six thousand seven hundred twenty dollars in
one calendar year. A member is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable
expenses actually incurred in connection with service on the board, including
subsistence and lodging, while away from the member's place of residence and
mileage for use of a privately owned vehicle in accordance with chapter 42.24
RCW.

Any
member may waive all or any portion of the compensation payable under this
section for any period during his or her term of office by filing a written
waiver with the secretary as provided in this section. The waiver, to be
effective, must be filed any time after the member's election and before the
date on which the compensation would otherwise be paid. The waiver shall
specify the month or period of months for which it is made.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. BOARD‑-BOND.
Each board member, whether elected or appointed, shall enter into a bond,
payable to the district. The bond shall be in the sum of not less than one
thousand dollars nor more than five thousand dollars, as set forth in the
memorandum of agreement provided in this chapter. The bond shall be
conditioned on the faithful performance of the member's duties on the board and
shall be filed with the county clerk of the county within which the district,
or the largest portion of the district, is located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
GENERAL ELECTIONS. General elections shall be held in each district on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in February in each even-numbered year.
The auditor of the county within which a district, or the largest portion of a
district, is located may provide for special elections whenever necessary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22.
VOTING RIGHTS. (1) Eligible voters of the district, as specified in this
chapter shall receive two votes at any election.

(2)
If multiple undivided interests, other than community property interests, exist
in a water right, well, or lot or parcel, and no person owns a majority
undivided interest, the owners of undivided interests at least equal to a
majority interest may designate in writing:

(a)
Which owner is eligible to vote and may cast two votes; or

(b)
Which two owners are eligible to vote and may cast one vote each.

(3)
If the water right, well, or land is owned as community property, each spouse
is entitled to one vote if both spouses otherwise qualify to vote, unless one
spouse designates in writing that the other spouse may cast both votes.

(4)
A corporation, partnership, or governmental entity shall designate:

(a)
A natural person to cast its two votes; or

(b)
Two natural persons to each cast one of its two votes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23.
PRESUMED ELIGIBLE VOTERS' LIST‑-NOTICE OF REQUIREMENTS OF VOTING
AUTHORITY‑-COPY OF VOTERS' LIST TO COUNTY AUDITOR. (1) Each district
shall prepare and maintain a list of presumed eligible voters and shall ensure
that the list includes:

(a)
The assessor's tax number for each lot or parcel in the district;

(b)
Each water right or well number in the district;

(c)
The name or names of the owners of such water rights, well, or lots and parcels
and their mailing address;

(d)
The extent of the ownership interest of the persons; and

(e)
If the persons are natural persons, whether they are known to be registered
voters in the state of Washington.

(2)
Whenever a voters' list is prepared, the district shall attempt to notify each
owner of the requirements necessary to establish voting authority to vote.
Whenever water rights, wells, or lots or parcels in the district are sold, the
district shall attempt to notify the purchasers of the requirements necessary
to establish voting authority.

(3)
Each district shall provide a copy of the voters' list, and any revised list,
to the auditor of the county within which all or the largest portion of the
district is located. The district must compile the list of eligible voters and
provide it to the county auditor by the first day of November preceding the
special district general election. If the district fails to provide the county
auditor with the list of qualified voters by the required date, the county
auditor shall compile the list and charge the district for the costs required
for its preparation. The county auditor may not be held responsible for any
errors in the list.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24.
ELECTIONS‑-WHEN NOT REQUIRED. (1) No election shall be held to elect a
member of a board, or to fill the remainder of an unexpired term which arose
from a vacancy on the board, if no one or only one person files for the
position.

(2)
If only one person files for the position, he or she is considered to have been
elected to the position at the election that otherwise would have taken place
for the position.

(3)
If no one files for the position, and the upcoming election is one at which
someone would have been elected to fill the expired term, the position is
treated as vacant at the expiration of the term.

(4)
If no one files for the position, and the upcoming election is one at which
someone would have been elected to fill the remaining term of office, the
person appointed to fill the vacancy is considered to have been elected to the
position at the election and serves for the remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25.
ELECTIONS‑-AUDITOR'S ASSISTANCE‑-NOTICE‑-AUDITOR'S COSTS.
(1) The auditor of the county within which a district, or the largest portion
of a district, is located shall assist the district with its elections as
provided in this section.

(2)
The county auditor shall publish notice of an election to create a district,
and notice of all special district elections not conducted by mail, in a
newspaper of general circulation in the district at least once not more than
ten nor less than three days before the election. The notices shall describe
the election and indicate the election site or sites in the district and the
date and times ballots may be cast.

(3)
In a district with at least five hundred qualified voters, the county auditor
shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the district a notice of
the filing period and place for filing a declaration of candidacy to become a
member of the board. The auditor shall publish this notice at least seven days
before the closing of the filing period. In a district with less than five
hundred qualified voters, the district shall mail or deliver notice described
in this subsection to each qualified voter of the district at least seven days
before the closing of the filing period.

(4)
All costs of the county auditor incurred related to elections under this
chapter shall be reimbursed by the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26.
ELECTIONS‑-AUDITOR TO CONDUCT‑-ELECTION BY MAIL. (1) In a district
with less than five hundred qualified voters, the district must contract with
the county auditor to conduct the special district elections. The county
auditor may conduct the election by mail.

(2)
In a district with at least five hundred qualified voters, the district may
contract with the county auditor to staff the voting site during the election
or contract with the county auditor to conduct the election by mail. A
district with at least five hundred qualified voters may also choose to conduct
its own elections. A district that conducts its own elections must enter into
an agreement with the county auditor, specifying the responsibilities of both
parties.

(3)
If the county auditor conducts a district election by mail, the provisions of
chapter 29.36 RCW which govern elections by mail, except for the requirements
of RCW 29.36.120, shall apply.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27.
ELECTION OFFICIALS‑-DUTIES‑-VOTING HOURS‑-CHALLENGED BALLOTS‑-ABSENTEE
BALLOTS. For special district elections that are not conducted by mail, the
board shall appoint three voters of the district, who may be members of the
board, to act as election officials, unless the district contracts with the
county auditor to staff the election site. The election officials shall
distribute a ballot or ballots to each voter of the district who arrives at the
voting place, during the hours for the election on the day of the election, and
requests a ballot. The election officials shall also provide ballots to those
persons arriving at the polling place during the hours for the election on the
day of the election who present documents or evidence sufficient to establish
their eligibility to vote. A person arriving at the polling place at the
proper time who demands a ballot, but who fails to present documents or
evidence that, in the opinion of the election officials, is sufficient to
establish eligibility to vote, must be given a ballot clearly marked as
"challenged" and must be allowed to vote. Each challenged ballot
must be numbered consecutively, and a list of such persons and their ballot
numbers must be made.

The
board shall designate those hours from seven o'clock a.m. to eight o'clock p.m.
during which the election will be held; however, at least six consecutive hours
must be designated. When the election is over, the election officials shall
secure the ballots and transport them to the county auditor's office by noon of
the day following the election. The auditor may, at his or her discretion,
station at the election site a deputy auditor or deputy auditors, who shall
observe the election and transport the ballots to the auditor's office. The
auditor shall count the ballots and certify the count of votes for and against
each measure and for each candidate appearing on the ballot. The auditor shall
make a separate count of any challenged ballots. The auditor shall count a
challenged ballot as a normal ballot if documentation or evidence is supplied
to the auditor before four o'clock p.m. on the day after the election that, in
the opinion of the auditor, is sufficient to establish the person's eligibility
to vote.

Additionally, voting by absentee ballot is allowed in every district. A
request for an absentee ballot may be made by an eligible voter by mail or in
person to the county auditor who supervises the special district elections. An
absentee ballot shall be provided to each voter of a district requesting such a
ballot under this section. A person requesting such a ballot may present
information establishing his or her eligibility to vote in the district. The
auditor shall provide an absentee ballot to each person requesting an absentee
ballot who is either included on the list of presumed eligible voters or who
submits information which, in the auditor's opinion, establishes his or her
eligibility to vote. The names of persons thus determined to be eligible to
vote shall be added to the list of presumed eligible voters for the appropriate
special district. The request for an absentee ballot must be made no more than
forty-five days before the election. To be valid, absentee ballots must be
postmarked on or before the day of the election and mailed to the county auditor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28.
REFUNDING GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS. (1) The board may, by resolution, without
submitting the matter to the voters of the district, provide for the issuance
of refunding general obligation bonds to refund any outstanding general
obligation bonds, or any part thereof, at maturity thereof, or before the
maturity thereof, if they are subject to call for prior redemption, or if all
of the owners thereof consent.

(2)
The total cost to the district over the life of the refunding bonds or
refunding portion of an issue of bonds shall not exceed the total cost to the
district which the district would have incurred but for the refunding over the
remainder of the life of the bonds to be refunded thereby.

(3)
The refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded thereby, or
may be sold as the board deems to be in the best interest of the district. The
proceeds of the sale shall be used exclusively for paying, retiring, and
canceling the bonds to be refunded and the interest thereon. The bonds may be
of any form, including bearer bonds or registered bonds, as provided in RCW
39.46.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29.
MAINTENANCE OR GENERAL FUND AND SPECIAL FUNDS‑-USE OF SURPLUS IN
MAINTENANCE OR GENERAL FUND. If a district has accumulated money in the
maintenance fund or general fund of the district in excess of the requirements
of that fund, the board may, at its discretion, use any of that surplus money
for any of the following purposes:

(1)
Redemption or servicing of outstanding obligations of the district;

(2)
Maintenance expenses of the district;

(3)
Construction or acquisition of any facilities necessary to carry out the
purposes of the district; or

(4)
Any other proper district purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30.
MAINTENANCE OR GENERAL FUND AND SPECIAL FUNDS‑-DEPOSITS AND INVESTMENTS.
Whenever there is accumulated, in any general or special fund of a district,
money the disbursement of which is not yet due, the board may, by resolution,
authorize the treasurer to deposit or invest the money in qualified public
depositaries, or to invest the money in any investment permitted at any time by
RCW 36.29.020. However, the county treasurer may refuse to invest any district
money the disbursement of which will be required during the period of
investment to meet outstanding obligations of the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31.
DEPOSIT ACCOUNT REQUIREMENTS. The district shall deposit district money in any
account, which may be interest-bearing, subject to requirements and conditions
prescribed by the state auditor. The account must be in the name of the
district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 32. LOANS
FROM MAINTENANCE OR GENERAL FUNDS TO CONSTRUCTION FUNDS OR OTHER FUNDS. The
board may, by resolution, authorize and direct a loan or loans from maintenance
funds or general funds of the district to construction funds or other funds of
the district, if the loan does not, in the opinion of the board, impair the
ability of the district to operate and maintain its water banking facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 33. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
water resource management districts provided for in chapter 90.-- RCW (sections
1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act) are not subject to the requirements
of this chapter if those requirements conflict with the provisions of chapter
90.-- RCW (sections 1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 34. A
new section is added to chapter 90.42 RCW to read as follows:

The
water resource management districts provided for in chapter 90.-- RCW (sections
1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act) are not subject to the requirements
of this chapter if those requirements conflict with the provisions of chapter
90.-- RCW (sections 1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 35. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
water resource management districts provided for in chapter 90.-- RCW (sections
1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act) are not subject to the requirements
of this chapter if those requirements conflict with the provisions of chapter
90.-- RCW (sections 1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 36. A
new section is added to chapter 90.54 RCW to read as follows:

The
water resource management districts provided for in chapter 90.-- RCW (sections
1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act) are not subject to the requirements
of this chapter if those requirements conflict with the provisions of chapter
90.-- RCW (sections 1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 37.
REPORT TO LEGISLATURE. The department shall report biennially, by December
31st of each even-numbered year, to the appropriate committees of the legislature
on the districts formed or sought to be formed under the authority of this
chapter, the volumes and length of terms of water accepted for deposit to and
permitted for withdrawal from districts formed, and a general summary of their
funding sources and disposition of revenues and expenses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 38.
SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of
the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 39.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40.
Sections 1 through 32 and 37 through 39 of this act constitute a new chapter in
Title 90 RCW.

---
END ---