BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act may be known and cited as the Washington athletic trainer's act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature finds it necessary to regulate the practice of athletic training at
the level of certification in order to establish professional standards of
competence and conduct which assures the public health and safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Athletic injury" means an injury sustained by a person as a result
of that person's participation in sports, games, recreation, exercise, or skill
activities utilizing physical strength, flexibility, agility, range of motion,
speed, or stamina.

(2)
"Athletic trainer" means a person who practices athletic training as
defined in this section.

(3)
"Athletic training" means the practice of prevention, recognition,
evaluation, management, disposition, treatment, rehabilitation, physical
conditioning, or physical reconditioning of athletic injuries under the
direction of an authorized health care practitioner and including the use of
physical modalities defined in this section.

(4)
"Authorized health care practitioner" means physicians, osteopathic
physicians, naturopaths, podiatric physicians and surgeons, dentists, and, in
clinical settings, physical therapists and occupational therapists.

(5)
"Department" means the department of health.

(6)
"Physical modalities" means the use of physical, chemical,
electrical, and other noninvasive modalities including, but not limited to heat,
cold, air, light, water in any of its forms, sound, massage, and therapeutic
exercise.

(7)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. No
person may represent oneself as a certified athletic trainer nor use any title
or description of services that includes the words certified athletic trainer
or training without applying for certification, meeting the required
qualifications specified in this chapter, and being certified by the
department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to
the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a)
The applicant is at least eighteen years of age;

(b)
The applicant has graduated with a baccalaureate or postgraduate degree from an
educational program with an athletic training curriculum recommended by the
secretary;

(c)
The applicant has successfully completed an approved examination. The
examination must test the applicant's knowledge of the basic and clinical
sciences relative to athletic training theory and practice, including
professional skills and judgment in the utilization of techniques and methods;
and

(d)
The applicant has paid any required fee.

(2)
The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of
meeting the requirements in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate or issuance
of a conditional certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of
educational programs in athletic training. The secretary may utilize or
contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession
or in education to assist in the evaluations. The secretary must establish by
rule the standards and procedures for revocation of approval of education
programs. The standards and procedures set must apply equally to educational
programs in the United States and in foreign jurisdictions. The secretary may
establish a fee for educational program evaluations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) The
secretary shall establish the date and location of examinations. Applicants
who have been found by the secretary to meet the other requirements for
certification must be scheduled for the next examination following the filing
of the application. The secretary shall establish by rule the examination
application deadline.

(2)
The secretary or the secretary's designees shall examine each applicant, by
means determined most effective, on subjects appropriate to the scope of
practice, as applicable. The examinations must be limited to the purpose of
determining whether the applicant possesses the minimum skill and knowledge
necessary to practice competently.

(3)
The examination papers, all grading of the papers, and the grading of any
practical work must be preserved for a period of not less than one year after
the secretary has made and published the decisions. All examinations must be
conducted under fair and wholly impartial methods.

(4)
Any applicant failing to make the required grade in the first examination may
take up to three subsequent examinations as the applicant desires upon
prepaying a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 for each
subsequent examination. Upon failing four examinations, the secretary may
invalidate the original application and require remedial education before the
person may take future examinations.

(5)
The secretary may approve an examination prepared or administered by a private
testing agency or association of licensing agencies for use by an applicant in
meeting the credentialing requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Applications for credentialing must be submitted on forms provided by the
secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation that reasonably
relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the criteria for
credentialing provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW. Each
applicant must pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The
fee must accompany the application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
secretary shall waive the examination and credential a person authorized to
practice within the state of Washington if the secretary determines that the
person meets commonly accepted standards of education and experience for the
profession. This section applies only to those individuals who file an
application for waiver within one year of the establishment of the authorized
practice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. In
addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary may:

(1)
Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2)
Establish all credentialing, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with
RCW 43.70.250;

(3)
Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4)
Register any applicants, and to issue certificates to applicants who have met
the education, training, and examination requirements for certification and to
deny a credential to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications,
except that proceedings concerning the denial of certification based upon
unprofessional conduct or impairment shall be governed by the uniform
disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5)
Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to
implement this chapter, and hire individuals certified under this chapter to
serve as examiners for any practical examinations;

(6)
Determine minimum education requirements and evaluate and designate those
educational programs from which graduation will be accepted as proof of
eligibility to take a qualifying examination for applicants for certification;

(7)
Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and supervise the
grading and administration of, examinations for applicants for certification;

(8)
Determine whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal
education, and establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an
applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to
take any qualifying examination;

(9)
Determine which states have certification requirements equivalent to those of
this state, and issue certification to individuals credentialed in those states
without examinations;

(10)
Define and approve any experience requirement for certification;

(11)
Implement and administer a program for consumer education;

(12)
Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;

(13)
Maintain the official department record of all applicants and persons
credentialed under this chapter; and

(14)
Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

The
secretary shall consult with representative athletic trainer organizations in
implementing this chapter and in the adoption of any rules. The consultation
may take the form of an ad hoc committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
secretary must keep an official record of all proceedings. A part of the
record must consist of a register of all applicants for credentialing under
this chapter and the results of each application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. An
applicant holding a credential in another state may be credentialed to practice
in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other
state's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the standards
in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for
renewal of a credential. Failure to renew shall invalidate the credential and
all privileges granted by the credential. If a certificate has lapsed for a
period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the
satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or
meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. The
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial
of certification, uncertified and unauthorized practice, and the discipline of
persons certified under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining
authority under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
The provisions of this chapter relating to the regulating of athletic trainers
are exclusive. A governmental subdivision of this state may not enact a law or
rule regulating athletic trainers, except as provided in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section.

(2)
This section does not prevent a political subdivision of this state from
levying a business fee, business and occupation tax, or other tax upon athletic
trainers, if the fee or tax is levied by the state on other types of businesses
within its boundaries.

(3)
This section does not prevent this state or a political subdivision of this
state from regulating athletic trainers with respect to activities that are not
regulated under this chapter.

Sec.
16. RCW
18.130.040 and 1998 c 243 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions
having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a)
The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following
professions:

(i)
Dispensing opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii)
Naturopaths licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW;

(iii)
Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv)
Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v)
Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi)
Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii)
Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii)
Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under
chapter 18.84 RCW;

(ix)
Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x)
Persons registered or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi)
Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii)
Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii)
Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv)
Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv)
Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi)
Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii)
Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii)
Persons registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under
RCW 18.48.020;

(xix)
Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW; ((and))

(xx)
Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW; and

(xxi)
Athletic trainers certified under chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 1 through 15 of
this act).

(b)
The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i)
The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii)
The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25
RCW;

(iii)
The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv)
The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v)
The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in
chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi)
The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii)
The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57
RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii)
The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix)
The medical quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW
governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A
RCW;

(x)
The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi)
The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii)
The nursing care quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79
RCW governing licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii)
The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established
in chapter 18.83 RCW; and

(xiv)
The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3)
In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining
authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions and
criteria established in this chapter and the chapters specified in subsection
(2) of this section. This chapter also governs any investigation, hearing, or
proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a license
conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered pursuant to RCW
18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4)
All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure substantially
consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary Act, among the
disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this section.

Sec.
17. RCW
7.70.020 and 1995 c 323 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter "health care provider" means either:

(1)
A person licensed by this state to provide health care or related services,
including, but not limited to, a licensed acupuncturist, a physician,
osteopathic physician, dentist, nurse, optometrist, podiatric physician and
surgeon, chiropractor, physical therapist, psychologist, pharmacist, optician,
physician's assistant, midwife, osteopathic physician's assistant, nurse
practitioner, ((or)) physician's trained mobile intensive care
paramedic, or athletic trainer, including, in the event such person is
deceased, his or her estate or personal representative;

(2)
An employee or agent of a person described in part (1) above, acting in the
course and scope of his employment, including, in the event such employee or
agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative; or

(3)
An entity, whether or not incorporated, facility, or institution employing one
or more persons described in part (1) above, including, but not limited to, a
hospital, clinic, health maintenance organization, or nursing home; or an
officer, director, employee, or agent thereof acting in the course and scope of
his or her employment, including in the event such officer, director, employee,
or agent is deceased, his or her estate or personal representative.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18.
Sections 1 through 15 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---