BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 34.12 RCW to read as follows:

When
requested by the state auditor, the chief administrative law judge shall assign
a special administrative law judge to conduct an adjudicative proceeding under
section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
department and a private entity that is party to an agreement under this
chapter are subject to a periodic fiscal audit, after agreements entered into
under this chapter have been finalized, and annually after that. The audit
must be conducted by an accounting firm selected by the state auditor and a
panel of state legislators that includes the chairpersons and ranking minority
members from each of the following committees: The house of representatives
and senate transportation committees, the house of representatives appropriations
committee, and the senate ways and means committee. A final report of the
audit must be presented to the appropriate legislative standing committees at
their next regularly scheduled meetings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
state auditor shall review and comment on the necessity and appropriateness of
any toll increases proposed by the private entity and the department. If
revenues from tolls are greater than initially forecast, the department shall
establish procedures for public review of receipts generated every three years
after completion of the project. The department shall also establish
procedures to either lower the tolls or retire the bonds issued for the project
earlier than originally provided.

Sec.
4. RCW
47.46.040 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All projects designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must
comply with all applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the
agreement is executed, including but not limited to the following provisions:
Chapter 39.12 RCW, this title, RCW 41.06.380, chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW 49.60.180,
and 49 C.F.R. Part 21.

(2)
The secretary or a designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other
experts within and outside state government in the negotiation and development
of the agreements.

(3)
Agreements shall provide for private ownership of the projects during the
construction period. After completion and final acceptance of each project or
discrete segment thereof, the agreement shall provide for state ownership of
the transportation systems and facilities and lease to the private entity
unless the state elects to provide for ownership of the facility by the private
entity during the term of the agreement.

The
state shall lease each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project
segments, to the private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4)
The department may exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the
development, construction, financing operation, and maintenance of
transportation projects under this chapter. Agreements for maintenance
services entered into under this section shall provide for full reimbursement
for services rendered by the department or other state agencies. Agreements
for police services for projects, involving state highway routes, developed
under agreements shall be entered into with the Washington state patrol. The agreement
for police services shall provide that the state patrol will be reimbursed for
costs on a comparable basis with the costs incurred for comparable service on
other state highway routes. The department may provide services for which it
is reimbursed, including but not limited to preliminary planning, environmental
certification, and preliminary design of the demonstration projects.

(5)
The plans and specifications for each project constructed under this section
shall comply with the department's standards for state projects. A facility
constructed by and leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the
state highway system for purposes of identification, maintenance, and
enforcement of traffic laws and for the purposes of applicable sections of this
title. Upon reversion of the facility to the state, the project must meet all
applicable state standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for
reconstruction or renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet
all applicable state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6)
For the purpose of facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity
in the financing, development, construction, and operation of the
transportation systems and facilities, the agreements may include provisions
for the department to exercise its authority, including the lease of
facilities, rights of way, and airspace, exercise of the power of eminent
domain, granting of development rights and opportunities, granting of necessary
easements and rights of access, issuance of permits and other authorizations,
protection from competition, remedies in the event of default of either of the
parties, granting of contractual and real property rights, liability during
construction and the term of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of
rights of way in excess of appraised value, and any other provision deemed
necessary by the secretary.

(7)
The agreements entered into under this section may include provisions
authorizing the state to grant necessary easements and lease to a private
entity existing rights of way or rights of way subsequently acquired with
public or private financing. The agreements may also include provisions to
lease to the entity airspace above or below the right of way associated or to
be associated with the private entity's transportation facility. In
consideration for the reversion rights in these privately constructed
facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the lease of airspace
rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to exceed fifty
years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department continues to
lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so only at fair
market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity the right of
first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by the state in
the vicinity of the public-private project.

(8)
Agreements under this section may include any contractual provision that is
necessary to protect the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred
to study, plan, design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce
laws, and maintain toll highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not
unreasonably inhibit or prohibit the development of additional public
transportation systems and facilities. Agreements under this section must
secure and maintain liability insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to
protect the project's viability and may address state indemnification of the
private entity for design and construction liability where the state has
approved relevant design and construction plans.

(9)
((Agreements shall include a process that provides for public involvement in
decision making with respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a)
In carrying out the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of
this section, the private entity shall proactively seek public participation
through a process appropriate to the characteristics of the project that
assesses and demonstrates public support among: Users of the project,
residents of communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of
communities impacted by the project.

(b)
The private entity shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process
that provides, periodically throughout the development and implementation of
the project, users and residents of communities in the affected project area an
opportunity to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not
limited to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi)
tolling or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project
cost; (viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other
salient characteristics.

(c)
If the affected project area has not been defined, the private entity shall
define the affected project area by conducting, at a minimum: (i) A comparison
of the estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the
project and in other communities impacted by the project who could be subject
to tolls or user fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient
traffic that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the
anticipated traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential
economic impact resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on
residents, commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the
vicinity of and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic
impact of tolls or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and
(v) an analysis of the relationship of the project to state transportation
needs and benefits.

The
agreement may require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the
affected project area.

(d)
In seeking public participation, the private entity shall establish a local
involvement committee or committees comprised of residents of the affected
project area, individuals who represent cities and counties in the affected
project area, organizations formed to support or oppose the project, if such
organizations exist, and users of the project. The private entity shall, at a
minimum, establish a committee as required under the specifications of RCW
47.46.030(5)(b) (ii) and (iii) and appointments to such committee shall be made
no later than thirty days after the project area is defined.

(e)
Local involvement committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the
department and the private entity on all issues related to the development and
implementation of the public involvement process established under this
section.

(f)
The department and the private entity shall provide the legislative
transportation committee and local involvement committees with progress reports
on the status of the public involvement process including the results of an
advisory vote, if any occurs.

(11))) Before
final execution of negotiated agreements, the agreements must be adopted as
rules in compliance with the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW. Provisions of
the agreement that are subject to rule-making procedures include the
following: (a) Alternative sizes and scopes of the project; (b) design; (c)
tolling or user-fee strategies and tolling or user-fee amounts; (d) project
costs and projected overruns, including anticipated toll increases; and (e)
facility operation.

(10)
Nothing in this chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents
to render such advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in
the best interests of the state and the public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

As
used in this section, the term "tolls" includes both tolls and user
fees.

If
agreements entered into under this chapter contain provisions allowing
adjustments in tolls, those adjustments are subject to the following
procedures:

(1)
A party seeking adjustments in the tolls shall submit a petition to the office
of the state auditor stating the amount of the proposed toll adjustment, the
specific provisions of the agreement that permit the proposed adjustment, and
the rationale and supporting evidence for the proposed adjustment.

(2)
A party submitting a petition for an adjustment in tolls shall provide
reasonable public notice to all persons residing or doing business within the
geographic area most likely to be affected by the toll adjustment. The notice
must set forth, in plain and understandable language, the essential elements of
the petition for toll adjustment.

(3)
A person may challenge the proposed toll adjustment by submitting a letter to
the state auditor demanding an adjudicative proceeding. The demand letter must
be received by the state auditor not more than twenty days after publication of
the toll adjustment petition.

(4)
If the state auditor does not receive a demand for an adjudicative proceeding
within twenty days of the publication of the toll adjustment petition, then the
auditor shall grant the petition for a toll adjustment.

(5)
If a demand for an adjudicative proceeding is received by the state auditor
within the allotted time period, the state auditor shall request the chief
administrative law judge to appoint a special administrative law judge to
conduct findings of fact and conclusions of law on the petition for the
proposed toll adjustment.

(6)
In any adjudication conducted under this section, the office of the attorney
general's public counsel division shall represent the interests of the toll
payers in the most affected geographic area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

In
an adjudicative proceeding under section 5 of this act, the special
administrative law judge's investigation must determine whether: (1) The
proposed toll adjustment is allowable under the terms of the agreement; and (2)
whether the underlying rationale, or data for the toll adjustment, support the
amount of the requested toll adjustment.

At
the conclusion of the hearing, the special administrative law judge shall make
findings of fact and conclusions of law, including a determination on the
appropriate amount of toll adjustment, if any.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 47.46 RCW to read as follows:

In no event may the state auditor entertain a petition for a toll
adjustment more than once in any three-year period, except for emergencies.
For purposes of this section, an emergency is when the actual revenues from a
toll operation are insufficient to meet the obligations for debt retirement on
the construction bonds for the project.

---
END ---