BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may grant an application for participation in the house-banked
card room pilot program or a subsequent house-banked card room license
established by the commission only after public notification and local public
meetings have been completed consistent with this section.

(2)
The commission shall establish a process for early and continuous public
participation in the granting of applications for participation in the house-banked
card room pilot program and for any subsequent house-banked card room license
established by the commission. This process shall include public meetings in
the local communities affected and opportunities for written and oral comments.

Notification
shall be provided to the following:

(a)
All newspapers of general circulation in the local area and all local radio
stations, television stations, and cable networks;

(b)
The local law enforcement agencies and any other local agency or organization
that requests such notification from the commission;

(c)
All residents and/or property owners within a one-half mile radius of the
proposed card room location; and

(d)
Churches, schools, and public institutions within a one-half mile radius of the
licensed card room location.

(3) If requested, the applicant shall meet with neighboring
residents, organizations, and public agencies regarding any reasonable concerns
they may have on the impact of the gambling activity on the neighboring area.

---
END ---