BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Any
state agency involved in the implementation of salmon preservation and
restoration efforts shall identify actual and potential problems in such
implementation that are attributable to interagency performance. In addition,
these agencies shall report to the legislature by September 1, 1999, regarding
identified problems. The report shall include a proposed method for
streamlining the implementation of salmon preservation and restoration efforts,
particularly pertaining to interagency cooperation. Further, any agency may
additionally report to the legislature regarding problems in the implementation
of salmon preservation and restoration efforts attributable to interagency
performance at any time after September 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---