BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Hepatitis A, a viral infection of the liver, is a serious disease to which the
severity increases with age;

(b)
Transmission is highly variable spreading from person to person directly or
through contaminated food;

(c)
The most effective means of preventing hepatitis A is through universal
immunization;

(d)
Washington state's high rate of hepatitis A places it as one of the top ten
states in the nation; and

(e)
The centers for disease control have established a vaccine program that is
without cost to states with such high rates of hepatitis A.

(2) The department is directed to present a hepatitis A vaccination
plan, and seek funding for such a plan through the centers for disease
control's vaccination for children program, which may not require state
funding. If the department receives funding through the centers for disease
control, it shall promptly implement a vaccination program that is consistent
with the centers for disease control's requirements.

---
END ---