BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.24.020 and 1994 c 92 s 496 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to other powers and duties granted to the department, the director
of licensing shall administer all laws with respect to the examination of
applicants for, and the issuance of, licenses to persons to engage in any
business, profession, trade, occupation, or activity except for health
professions.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.24.086 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 315 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the policy of the state of Washington that the cost of each
professional, occupational or business licensing program be fully borne by the
members of that profession, occupation or business. The director of licensing
shall from time to time establish the amount of all application fees, license
fees, registration fees, examination fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and any
other fee associated with licensing or regulation of professions, occupations
or businesses, except for health professions, administered by ((the business
and professions administration in)) the department of licensing. In fixing
said fees, the director shall set the fees for each such program at a
sufficient level to defray the costs of administering that program. All such
fees shall be fixed by rule adopted by the director in accordance with the
provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

((For
fees associated with the licensing or regulation of health professions
administered by the department of health, see RCW 43.70.250.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
director of licensing shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director shall
receive a salary in an amount fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW
43.03.040.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director of licensing shall supervise and administer the activities of the
department of licensing and shall advise the governor and the legislature with
respect to matters under the jurisdiction of the department.

(2)
In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director
has the following powers and duties:

(a)
Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the responsibilities
of the department;

(b)
Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other
funds;

(c)
Appoint a deputy director and such assistant directors, special assistants, and
administrators as may be needed to administer the department. These employees
are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d)
Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
functions necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the department;

(e)
Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for
efficient administration, but the director is responsible for the official acts
of the officers and employees of the department; and

(f)
Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3)
The director may establish advisory groups as may be necessary to carry out the
responsibilities of the department.

(4)
The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the
director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and
intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless
specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and
supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such
administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as
otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided
by law.

Sec.
5. RCW
19.02.030 and 1993 c 142 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created within the department of licensing a business license center.

(2)
The duties of the center shall include:

(a)
Developing and administering a computerized one-stop master license system
capable of storing, retrieving, and exchanging license information with due
regard to privacy statutes, as well as issuing and renewing master licenses in
an efficient manner;

(b)
Providing a license information service detailing requirements to establish or
engage in business in this state;

(c)
Providing for staggered master license renewal;

(d)
Identifying types of licenses appropriate for inclusion in the master license
system;

(e)
Recommending in reports to the governor and the legislature the elimination,
consolidation, or other modification of duplicative, ineffective, or
inefficient licensing or inspection requirements; and

(f)
Incorporating licenses into the master license system.

(3)
((The department of licensing shall establish the position of assistant
director of the business license center.

(4))) The
director of licensing may adopt under chapter 34.05 RCW such rules as may be
necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.54.920 and 1963 c 25 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of RCW 43.24.060((, 43.24.110)) and 43.24.120 are not
applicable to the licensing and regulation of the practice of optometry.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.24.010 and 1979 c 158 s 94, 1965 c 100 s 1, & 1965 c 8 s
43.24.010;

(2) RCW
43.24.024 and 1994 c 92 s 497, 1979 c 158 s 96, & 1965 ex.s.
c 170 s 42;

(3) RCW
43.24.110 and 1997 c 58 s 867 & 1986 c 259 s 149;

(4) RCW
46.01.050 and 1994 c 92 s 501, 1979 c 158 s 116, 1969 ex.s. c 281
s 34, & 1965 c 156 s 5;

(5) RCW
46.01.055 and 1979 c 158 s 117, 1969 ex.s. c 281 s 35, & 1967
c 32 s 117; and

(6) RCW
46.01.090 and 1990 c 250 s 15, 1979 c 158 s 119, & 1965 c 156
s 9.

---
END ---