BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.160 and 1996 c 184 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The owner of a vehicle which under reciprocal relations with another
jurisdiction would be required to obtain a license registration in this state
or an unlicensed vehicle which would be required to obtain a license
registration for operation on public highways of this state may, as an
alternative to such license registration, secure and operate such vehicle under
authority of a trip permit issued by this state in lieu of a Washington
certificate of license registration, and licensed gross weight if applicable.
The licensed gross weight may not exceed eighty thousand pounds for a
combination of vehicles nor forty thousand pounds for a single unit vehicle
with three or more axles. Trip permits may also be issued for movement of
mobile homes pursuant to RCW 46.44.170. For the purpose of this section, a
vehicle is considered unlicensed if the licensed gross weight currently in
effect for the vehicle or combination of vehicles is not adequate for the load
being carried. Vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.135 shall not be operated
under authority of trip permits in lieu of further registration within the same
registration year.

(2)
Each trip permit shall authorize the operation of a single vehicle at the
maximum legal weight limit for such vehicle for a period of three consecutive
days commencing with the day of first use. No more than three such permits may
be used for any one vehicle in any period of thirty consecutive days, except
that in the case of a recreational vehicle as defined in RCW 43.22.335, no more
than two trip permits may be used for any one vehicle in a one-year period.
Every permit shall identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for
which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety and signed by the
operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of this state.
Correction of data on the permit such as dates, license number, or vehicle
identification number invalidates the permit. The trip permit shall be displayed
on the vehicle to which it is issued as prescribed by the department.

(3)
Vehicles operating under authority of trip permits are subject to all laws,
rules, and regulations affecting the operation of like vehicles in this state.

(4)
Prorate operators operating commercial vehicles on trip permits in Washington
shall retain the customer copy of such permit for four years.

(5)
Trip permits may be obtained from field offices of the department of
transportation, Washington state patrol, department of licensing, or other
agents appointed by the department. For each permit issued, there shall be
collected a filing fee as provided by RCW 46.01.140, an administrative fee of
eight dollars, and an excise tax of one dollar. If the filing fee amount of
one dollar prescribed by RCW 46.01.140 is increased or decreased after January
1, 1981, the administrative fee shall be adjusted to compensate for such change
to insure that the total amount collected for the filing fee, administrative
fee, and excise tax remain at ten dollars. These fees and taxes are in lieu of
all other vehicle license fees and taxes. No exchange, credits, or refunds may
be given for trip permits after they have been purchased.

(6)
The department may appoint county auditors or businesses as agents for the
purpose of selling trip permits to the public. County auditors or businesses
so appointed may retain the filing fee collected for each trip permit to defray
expenses incurred in handling and selling the permits.

(7)
A violation of or a failure to comply with any provision of this section is a
gross misdemeanor.

(8)
The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems necessary to administer
this section.

(9)
A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on the issuance of a trip permit.
The surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of
supporting vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the commercial
vehicle information systems and networks program. All other
administrative fees and excise taxes collected under the provisions of this
chapter shall be forwarded by the department with proper identifying detailed
report to the state treasurer who shall deposit the administrative fees to the
credit of the motor vehicle fund and the excise taxes to the credit of the
general fund. Filing fees will be forwarded and reported to the state
treasurer by the department as prescribed in RCW 46.01.140.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.38.100 and 1998 c 176 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any special fuel user operating a motor vehicle into this state for commercial
purposes may make application for a trip permit that shall be good for a period
of three consecutive days beginning and ending on the dates specified on the
face of the permit issued, and only for the vehicle for which it is issued.

(2)
Every permit shall identify, as the department may require, the vehicle for
which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety, signed, and dated by
the operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways of this
state. Correction of data on the permit such as dates, vehicle license number,
or vehicle identification number invalidates the permit. A violation of, or a
failure to comply with, this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

(3)
For each permit issued, there shall be collected a filing fee of one dollar, an
administrative fee of ten dollars, and an excise tax of nine dollars. Such
fees and tax shall be in lieu of the special fuel tax otherwise assessable
against the permit holder for importing and using special fuel in a motor
vehicle on the public highways of this state, and no report of mileage
shall be required with respect to such vehicle. Trip permits will not be
issued if the applicant has outstanding fuel taxes, penalties, or
interest owing to the state or has had a special fuel license revoked for cause
and the cause has not been removed.

(4)
Blank permits may be obtained from field offices of the department of
transportation, Washington state patrol, department of licensing, or other
agents appointed by the department. The department may appoint county auditors
or businesses as agents for the purpose of selling trip permits to the public.
County auditors or businesses so appointed may retain the filing fee collected
for each trip permit to defray expenses incurred in handling and selling the
permits.

(5) A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on the issuance of a
trip permit. The surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the
purpose of supporting vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the
commercial vehicle information systems and networks program. All other
fees and excise taxes collected by the department for trip permits shall be
credited and deposited in the same manner as the special fuel tax collected
under this chapter and shall not be subject to exchange, refund, or credit.

---
END ---