BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that ex-offenders who obtain and retain employment upon
release from incarceration are less likely to reoffend and return to prison.
Furthermore, ex-offenders face unique and often overwhelming obstacles in
finding and retaining employment as a result of their criminal histories and
skill deficits. The legislature further finds that, based on the more than
twenty-year history of the employment security department's ex-offender work
orientation program, providing job development, job referral, and direct job placement
services to ex-offenders can be a cost-effective use of taxpayer resources to
assist ex-offenders in overcoming the obstacles to their employment.

The
legislature intends, therefore, to expand transitional employment services for
ex-offenders through community-based organizations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 50.62 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The employment security department shall provide, subject to available funds,
transitional employment services to eligible offenders. Transitional
employment services may include: (a) Skill identification; (b) job finding
techniques; (c) supportive services necessary for offenders to obtain or retain
jobs; (d) job referrals and direct placement; and (e) facilitating employment
upgrades after initial placements.

(2)
Offenders are eligible for transitional employment services if they: (a) Are
in a work release program; (b) are under community supervision or community
placement; or (c) have been released from a correctional facility within the
previous two years.

(3)
The employment security department shall develop and implement a method for
evaluating the outcomes of the services provided, including the extent to which
the transitional employment services affect the recidivism rates of
participating offenders in comparison with the recidivism rates of
nonparticipating offenders.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of eight hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
administrative contingency fund to the employment security department for the
purposes of providing transitional employment services to ex-offenders through
the ex-offender work orientation program.

(2) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the employment security department for the purposes of
providing transitional employment services to ex-offenders through the
ex-offender work orientation program.

---
END ---