BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to provide tax credits to businesses that permanently hire
current residents of distressed counties. The credit is to equal the first
year's wages of the new hire, not to exceed the total business and occupation
tax liability of the business in the following year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3)
"Eligible area" means an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.62.010.

(4)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(5)
"Qualified employment position" means a new permanent full-time
employee employed by the recipient at a minimum wage of at least eight dollars
per hour during the entire year prior to the tax year. The employee must have
been a resident of the county in which the employment occurs prior to
employment. The employment position must be a new position which adds to the
total employment level of the recipient and may not be the result of a prior
staff reduction, retirement, dismissal, or personnel turnover.

(6)
"Tax year" means the calendar year in which taxes are due.

(7)
"Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Application for tax credits under this chapter must be made before the actual
hiring of qualified employment positions. The application shall be made to the
department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The application
shall contain information regarding the location of the employee, the residency
of the employee, the applicant's average employment, if any, at the facility
for the prior year, estimated or actual wages of employees related to the
position, and other information required by the department. The department
shall rule on the application within sixty days.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person shall be allowed a credit against the tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW as
provided in this section. The credit shall equal the wages paid for each
qualified employment position in the prior year. The amount of credit that may
be taken in the tax year is the lesser of the wages paid for the qualified
employment position or the recipient's total tax liability. Credits must be
taken in the tax year and may not be carried over to future years.

(2)
No recipient may use the tax credits to decertify a union or to displace
existing jobs in any community in the state.

(3)
No recipient may receive a tax credit on taxes which have not been paid during
the taxable year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Each recipient shall submit a report to the department on December 31st of each
year. The report shall contain information, as required by the department,
from which the department may determine whether the recipient is meeting the
requirements of this chapter. If the recipient fails to submit a report or
submits an inadequate report, the department may declare the amount of taxes
for which a credit has been used to be immediately assessed and payable.

(2)
If, on the basis of a report under this section or other information, the
department finds that a recipient is not eligible for tax credit under this
chapter for reasons other than failure to create a qualified employment
position, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used for the project
shall be immediately due.

(3)
If, on the basis of a report under this section or other information, the
department finds that a recipient has failed to create the qualified employment
position, the department shall assess interest, but not penalties, on the
credited taxes for which a credit has been used. The interest shall be
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes, shall be assessed
retroactively to the date of the tax credit, and shall accrue until the taxes
for which a credit has been used are repaid.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
employment security department shall make, and certify to the department of
revenue, all determinations of employment and wages required under this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Applications, reports, and any other information received by the department
under this chapter are not confidential and are subject to disclosure.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

---
END ---