BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there exists in distressed areas of the state of
Washington a need for infrastructure to act as a stimulant for economic
expansion. The legislature further finds that existing resources at the local
government level are inadequate to finance necessary sewer, water, and storm
water treatment systems for future business retention, expansion, or
recruitment.

It
is the policy of the state of Washington to assist in the development of
infrastructure necessary to support job creation, expansion, retention, or
recruitment efforts in distressed areas. It is also the policy of the state of
Washington to allocate, where appropriate, existing resources to assist
distressed areas with their infrastructure project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.146 RCW to read as follows:

For
the period beginning July 1, 1999, and ending June 30, 2004, the department
shall give priority to pollution control facilities projects that are financed
in part with funds under RCW 82.14.370 and that are located in a distressed
county. As used in this section, "distressed county" has the same
meaning as in RCW 82.14.370.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.155 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the period beginning July 1, 1999, and ending June 30, 2004, the public
works board shall give priority in the awarding of low-interest or
interest-free loans for the construction of new or expanded public works facilities
that are financed in part with funds under RCW 82.14.370, and that are located
in a distressed county.

(2)
The loans may have a deferred payment of up to five years, but shall be repaid
within twenty years. The public works board may require other terms and
conditions and may charge such rates of interest on its loans as it deems
appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section. Repayments shall be
made to the public works assistance account.

(3)
The public works board may make such loans irrespective of the annual loan
cycle and reporting required in RCW 43.155.070.

(4)
As used in this section, "distressed county" has the same meaning as
in RCW 82.14.370.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---