BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.50571 and 1998 c 214 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A defendant who is arrested for an offense involving driving while under the
influence as defined in RCW 46.61.502, driving under age twenty-one after
consuming alcohol as defined in RCW 46.61.503, or being in physical control of
a vehicle while under the influence as defined in RCW 46.61.504, shall be
required to appear in person before a magistrate within one judicial day after
the arrest if the defendant is served with a citation or complaint at the time
of the arrest. A court may by local court rule waive the requirement for
appearance within one judicial day if it provides for the appearance at the
earliest practicable day following arrest and establishes the method for
identifying that day in the rule.

(2)
A defendant who is charged by citation, complaint, or information with an
offense involving driving while under the influence as defined in RCW
46.61.502, driving under age twenty-one after consuming alcohol as defined in
RCW 46.61.503, or being in physical control of a vehicle while under the
influence as defined in RCW 46.61.504, and who is not arrested, shall appear in
court for arraignment in person as soon as practicable, but in no event later
than fourteen days after the next day on which court is in session following
the issuance of the citation or the filing of the complaint or information.

(3)
At the time of an appearance required by this section, the court shall
determine the necessity of imposing conditions of pretrial release according to
the procedures established by court rule for a preliminary appearance or an
arraignment.

(4) Appearances required by this section are mandatory and may not
be waived.

---
END ---