BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.16 RCW to read as follows:

The
county legislative authority of a county may cause an action to be filed in the
superior court of that county for a declaratory judgment finding that a county
elected official has abandoned his or her responsibilities by being absent from
the county and failing to perform his or her official duties for a period of at
least thirty consecutive days, but not including: (1) Absences approved by the
county legislative authority; or (2) absences arising from leave taken for
legitimate medical or disability purposes. If such a declaratory judgment is
issued, the county official is no longer eligible to receive compensation from
the date the declaratory judgment is issued until the court issues a subsequent
declaratory judgment finding that the county official has commenced performing
his or her responsibilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.17.010 and 1991 c 363 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

The
county officers of the counties of this state shall receive a salary for the
services required of them by law, or by virtue of their office, which salary
shall be full compensation for all services of every kind and description
rendered by them. However, if the superior court issues a declaratory
judgment under section 1 of this act finding that a county officer has
abandoned his or her duties, the county officer may not be paid compensation.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.17.050 and 1963 c 4 s 36.17.050 are each amended to read as follows:

The auditor shall not draw his warrant for the salary of any
officer until the latter shall have first filed his duplicate receipt with the
auditor, properly signed by the treasurer, showing he has made the last
required monthly statement and settlement. If the superior court issues a
declaratory judgment under section 1 of this act finding that a county officer
has abandoned his or her duties, the county officer may not be paid a salary.

---
END ---