BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.46.015 and 1985 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is established a Washington state arts commission. The commission consists of
((nineteen)) twenty-one members appointed by the governor and ((two))
four members of the legislature, one from each caucus in the senate
and appointed by the president of the senate and one from each caucus in
the house of representatives and appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives. ((The legislative members shall be from opposite major
political parties.)) The governor shall appoint citizens representing the
various disciplines within the visual, performing and literary arts, and other
citizens active in the arts community. The governor shall consider nominations
for membership from individuals actively involved in cultural, state or
community organizations. The governor shall also consider geographical
distribution of the membership in the appointment of new members.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.105.032 and 1996 c 137 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created the Washington state information services board. The board
shall be composed of ((thirteen)) fifteen members. Eight members
shall be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall be a representative of
higher education, one of whom shall be a representative of an agency under a
state-wide elected official other than the governor, and two of whom shall be
representatives of the private sector. One member shall represent the judicial
branch and be appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court. One member
shall be the superintendent of public instruction or shall be appointed by the
superintendent of public instruction. ((One)) Two members
shall represent the house of representatives and shall be selected by the
speaker of the house of representatives with one representative chosen from
each caucus of the house of representatives; ((one)) two
members shall represent the senate and shall be appointed by the
president of the senate with one representative chosen from each caucus of
the senate. ((The representatives of the house of representatives and
senate shall not be from the same political party.)) One member shall be
the director who shall be a voting member of the board. These members shall
constitute the membership of the board with full voting rights. Members of the
board shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. The board shall
select a chairperson from among its members.

Vacancies
shall be filled in the same manner that the original appointments were made.

A
majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.

Members
of the board shall be compensated for service on the board in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.71.030 and 1996 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is established the Puget Sound council composed of ((nine)) eleven
members. Seven members shall be appointed by the governor. In making these
appointments, the governor shall include representation from business, the
environmental community, agriculture, the shellfish industry, counties, cities,
and the tribes. ((One)) Two members shall be ((a))
members of the senate selected by the president of the senate with
one member selected from each caucus in the senate, and ((one)) two
members shall be ((a)) members of the house of
representatives selected by the speaker of the house of representatives with
one member selected from each caucus in the house of representatives. The
legislative members shall be nonvoting members of the council. Appointments to
the council shall reflect geographical balance and the diversity of population
within the Puget Sound basin. Members shall serve four-year terms. Of the
initial members appointed to the council, two shall serve for two years, two
shall serve for three years, and two shall serve for four years. Thereafter
members shall be appointed to four-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled by
appointment in the same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of
the unexpired term of the position being vacated. Nonlegislative members shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
Legislative members shall be reimbursed as provided in RCW 44.04.120.

(2)
The council shall:

(a)
Recommend to the action team projects and activities for inclusion in the
biennial work plan;

(b)
Recommend to the action team coordination of work plan activities with other
relevant activities, including but not limited to, agencies' activities other
than those funded through the plan, local plan initiatives, and governmental
and nongovernmental watershed restoration and protection activities; and

(c)
Recommend to the action team proposed amendments to the Puget Sound management
plan.

(3) The chair of the action team shall convene the council at least
four times per year and shall jointly convene the council and the action team
at least two times per year.

---
END ---