BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to ensure that the common schools have an
adequate supply of classroom teachers. The legislature finds that the price of
housing is significantly higher in certain areas of the state than in other
areas of the state. The legislature further finds that the percentage of
salary required to procure housing in these areas is significantly greater for
those teachers who receive salaries at the level provided to less experienced
teachers on the state salary schedule. Therefore, the legislature finds that
there is a need to provide a housing supplement to the salaries of low-salaried
teachers in areas of the state that are most impacted by housing affordability
issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To address extraordinary housing costs for teachers who reside in certain areas
and who receive salaries at the level provided to less experienced teachers on
the state salary schedule, a housing affordability salary supplement is
provided, subject to funding in the omnibus appropriations act.

(2)
To be eligible for the supplement, a district must be:

(a)
Among the quartile of districts that can raise a ten percent maintenance and
operating levy based on the lowest property tax rate; and

(b)
Located wholly or partly within a county that is above the state average in the
cost of housing rental rates for a two bedroom residence, as measured by the
housing and urban development fair market rent data.

(3)
Teachers in eligible districts shall receive the salary supplement during each
school year that the teacher is placed in any of the first five years of the
state salary schedule.

(4)
The supplement shall equal the difference between the rental rate for the
county and the state average rental rate. The supplement shall be calculated
on an annual basis before the beginning of the school year for each school
year, based on the data from the previous year. The annual supplement shall be
allocated and paid on a monthly basis during the school year that the teacher
is eligible. The total annual supplement must be at least one hundred dollars.

(5)
The housing affordability salary supplement provided under this section shall
not be considered part of the state's obligation to fund basic education.

(6) If the legislature revokes any benefits granted under this
section, no affected employee is entitled to receive such benefits as a matter of
contractual right.

---
END ---