BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that people with similar support needs are being placed
appropriately in adult family home and developmental disability group home
residential settings in their communities. The legislature finds that
different entities within state government with statutory responsibility for
services to specific populations are paying adult family home and developmental
disability group home providers at different rates for these settings. The
legislature recognizes the role state government plays in promoting certain
business practices as a result of the payment methodologies it employs.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that rates paid to adult family
home and developmental disability group home providers, by entities within
state government with statutory responsibility for services to specific
populations, shall be the same for people with similar support needs.

---
END ---