BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.97 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby established a fund to be known as the Columbia river gorge
national scenic area indemnity fund. The indemnity fund shall consist of
legislative appropriations and any federal or other grants deposited into the
fund.

(2)
The state treasurer shall be the custodian of the indemnity fund.
Disbursements shall be on authorization of the attorney general or the attorney
general's designee. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for disbursements from this
fund.

(3)
The indemnity fund shall be used exclusively for purposes of paying claims
submitted by counties subject to the Columbia river gorge compact and paying
necessary expenses of administering the indemnity fund. Claims may be submitted
for any sums paid as damages to plaintiffs in suits arising out of enforcement
of the Columbia river gorge national scenic area act or the Columbia river
gorge compact and for costs for defense of such suits. A claim shall not be
paid when the attorney general determines that liability of the claimant county
was caused by gross negligence by an officer or employee of the county or by
actions not authorized under state law or the Columbia river gorge national
scenic area act or the Columbia river gorge compact.

(4)
The attorney general may investigate each claim and determine whether the claim
is valid. The attorney general shall notify each claimant of the attorney
general's determination as to the validity and amount of each claimant's
claim. A claimant may request a hearing on the attorney general's
determination within twenty days of receipt of written notification and a
hearing shall be held by the attorney general pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.
Upon determining the amount and validity of the claim, the attorney general
shall pay the claim from the indemnity fund.

(5)
The requirement that the state of Washington pay claims under this section only
exists to the extent that the indemnity fund contains sufficient money to pay
the claims. In the event that the amount in the indemnity fund is insufficient
to pay all approved claims, the claims shall be paid in the order in which they
were filed with the attorney general, until such time as sufficient moneys are
available in the indemnity fund to pay all of the claims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
from the general fund for deposit in the Columbia river gorge national scenic
area indemnity fund for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

(2) The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2001, from the general fund for deposit in the Columbia river gorge
national scenic area indemnity fund for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

---
END ---