BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.77.010 and 1989 c 431 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
(("Motor vehicle" means any truck, trailer, semitrailer, tractor
or any self-propelled or motor driven vehicle used upon any public highway of
this state for the purpose of transporting solid waste, for the collection
and/or disposal thereof;

(2)
"Public highway" means every street, road, or highway in this state;

(3)
"Common carrier" means any person who undertakes to transport solid
waste, for the collection and/or disposal thereof, by motor vehicle for
compensation, whether over regular or irregular routes, or regular or irregular
schedules;

(4)
"Contract carrier" means all garbage and refuse transporters not
included under the terms "common carrier" and "private
carrier," as herein defined, and further, shall include any person who
under special and individual contracts or agreements transports solid waste by
motor vehicle for compensation;

(5)
"Private carrier" means a person who, in his own vehicle, transports
solid waste purely as an incidental adjunct to some other established private
business owned or operated by him in good faith: PROVIDED, That a person who
transports solid waste from residential sources in a vehicle designed or used
primarily for the transport of solid waste shall not constitute a private
carrier;

(6)
"Vehicle" means every device capable of being moved upon a public
highway and in, upon, or by which any solid waste is or may be transported or
drawn upon a public highway, excepting devices moved by human or animal power
or used exclusively upon stationary rail or tracks;

(7)))
"Solid waste collection company" means every person or his lessees,
receivers, or trustees, owning, controlling, operating or managing vehicles
used in the business of transporting solid waste for collection and/or disposal
for compensation, except septic tank pumpers, over any public highway in this
state whether as a "common carrier" thereof or as a "contract
carrier" thereof;

(((8)))
(2) Solid waste collection does not include collecting or transporting
recyclable materials from a drop-box or recycling buy-back center, nor
collecting or transporting recyclable materials by or on behalf of a commercial
or industrial generator of recyclable materials to a recycler for use or
reclamation. Transportation of these materials is regulated under chapter
81.80 RCW; and

(((9)))
(3) "Solid waste" means the same as defined under RCW
70.95.030, except for the purposes of this chapter solid waste does not include
recyclable materials except for source separated recyclable materials collected
from residences.

Sec.
2. RCW
81.77.180 and 1991 c 319 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A solid waste collection company collecting recyclable materials from
residences shall utilize one or more private recycling businesses when
arranging for the processing and marketing of such materials, if the following
conditions are met:

(a)
A recycling business is located within the county at the time the collection
program commences or at any time that the solid waste collection company
changes its existing processor;

(b)
A local private recycling business is capable and competent to provide the
processing and marketing service; and

(c)
A local private recycling business offers to pay a price for the recyclable
materials which is equal to or greater than the price offered by out-of-county
private recyclers, or proposes a charge for the processing and marketing
service which is equal to or less than the charge for the service available
from an out-of-county private recycler.

(2)
This section shall not apply to:

(a)
Cities or towns who exercise their authority under RCW 81.77.130 to provide
residential curbside collection of recyclable materials;

(b)
A solid waste collection company that is directed by a city, town, or county to
utilize a publicly owned recyclable processing facility located within such
city, town, or county; or

(c)
Counties which exercise their authority under RCW 36.58.040 to contract for the
residential curbside collection of source separated recyclables.

((This
section shall not apply to programs for the collection of source separated
recyclable materials where rates to implement the programs have been filed with
the commission prior to May 21, 1991.))

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "private recycling business" means
any private for-profit or private not-for-profit firm that engages in the
processing and marketing of recyclable materials.

(((4)
This section is not enforceable by complaint filed with the commission.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
81.77.015 and 1965 ex.s. c 105 s 5;

(2) RCW
81.77.020 and 1989 c 431 s 18 & 1961 c 295 s 3;

(3) RCW
81.77.0201 and 1997 c 171 s 4;

(4) RCW
81.77.030 and 1989 c 431 s 20, 1987 c 239 s 1, 1965 ex.s. c 105 s
1, & 1961 c 295 s 4;

(5) RCW
81.77.040 and 1989 c 431 s 21, 1987 c 239 s 2, & 1961 c 295 s
5;

(6) RCW
81.77.050 and 1989 c 431 s 22, 1973 c 115 s 9, & 1961 c 295 s
6;

(7) RCW
81.77.060 and 1989 c 431 s 23 & 1961 c 295 s 7;

(8) RCW
81.77.070 and 1961 c 295 s 8;

(9) RCW
81.77.080 and 1989 c 431 s 24, 1971 ex.s. c 143 s 3, 1969 ex.s. c
210 s 11, 1963 c 59 s 12, & 1961 c 295 s 9;

(10) RCW
81.77.090 and 1961 c 295 s 10;

(11) RCW
81.77.100 and 1989 c 431 s 25, 1985 c 436 s 2, & 1961 c 295 s
11;

(12) RCW
81.77.110 and 1989 c 431 s 26 & 1965 ex.s. c 105 s 2;

(13) RCW
81.77.120 and 1987 c 239 s 3;

(14) RCW
81.77.160 and 1997 c 434 s 1 & 1989 c 431 s 30;

(15) RCW
81.77.170 and 1989 c 431 s 36; and

(16) RCW
81.77.190 and 1991 c 319 s 406.

---
END ---