BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.80.070 and 1963 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
"common carrier," "contract carrier," or "temporary
carrier" shall operate for the transportation of property for compensation
in this state without first obtaining from the commission a permit so to do.
((Permits heretofore issued or hereafter issued to any carrier, shall be
exercised by said carrier to the fullest extent so as to render reasonable
service to the public. Applications for common or contract carrier permits or
extensions thereof shall be on file for a period of at least thirty days prior
to the granting thereof unless the commission finds that special conditions
require the earlier granting thereof.))

The
commission shall issue a permit ((or extension thereof shall be issued))
to any qualified applicant ((therefor, authorizing the whole or any part of
the operations covered by the application,)) if it is found that the
applicant is fit, willing, and able ((properly)) to perform properly
the proposed services ((proposed)) and conform to ((the
provisions of)) this chapter and the ((requirements,)) rules ((and
regulations)) of the commission ((thereunder, and that)). In the
case of common carriers of household goods, as defined by rule of the
commission, such operations ((will)) must be consistent with
the public interest((, and, in the case of common carriers, that the same
are or will be required by the present or future public convenience and
necessity, otherwise such application shall be denied)).

Nothing
contained in this chapter shall be construed to confer upon any person or persons
the exclusive right or privilege of transporting property for compensation over
the public highways of the state.

For
the purposes of this section, fit, willing, and able to provide a
transportation service in the public interest is based on an applicant's
financial fitness, financial responsibility, regulatory fitness, willingness,
and ability to provide the public with safe, secure, reliable, and competitive
transportation service.

The commission may determine if an applicant is fit, willing,
and able to provide a transportation service in the public interest through a
course of personal background checks, on-site inspections, written
examinations, and provisional operations through which the applicant may be
required to demonstrate sufficient ability to conform with this chapter and the
rules of the commission.

---
END ---