BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.190 and 1995 c 397 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The house of representatives and the senate shall report annually: The total
budget; the portion of the total attributed to staff; and the number of
full-time and part-time staff positions by assignment, with dollar figures as
well as number of positions.

(2)
Unless authorized by subsection (3) of this section or otherwise expressly
authorized by law, no public funds may be used directly or indirectly for
lobbying: PROVIDED, This does not prevent officers or employees of an agency
from communicating with a member of the legislature on the request of that
member; or communicating to the legislature, through the proper official
channels, requests for legislative action or appropriations which are deemed
necessary for the efficient conduct of the public business or actually made in
the proper performance of their official duties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That this
subsection does not apply to the legislative branch.

(3)
Any agency, not otherwise expressly authorized by law, may expend public funds
for lobbying, but such lobbying activity shall be limited to (a) providing
information or communicating on matters pertaining to official agency business
to any elected official or officer or employee of any agency or (b) advocating
the official position or interests of the agency to any elected official or
officer or employee of any agency: PROVIDED, That public funds may not be
expended as a direct or indirect gift or campaign contribution to any elected
official or officer or employee of any agency. For the purposes of this
subsection, the term "gift" means a voluntary transfer of any thing
of value without consideration of equal or greater value, but does not include
informational material transferred for the sole purpose of informing the
recipient about matters pertaining to official agency business. This section
does not permit the printing of a state publication which has been otherwise
prohibited by law.

(4)
No elective official or any employee of his or her office or any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or authorize
the use of any of the facilities of a public office or agency, directly or
indirectly, in any effort to support or oppose an initiative to the
legislature. "Facilities of a public office or agency" has the same
meaning as in RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply to the following activities:

(a)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose an
initiative to the legislature so long as (i) any required notice of the meeting
includes the title and number of the initiative to the legislature, and (ii) members
of the legislative body or members of the public are afforded an approximately
equal opportunity for the expression of an opposing view;

(b)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any
initiative to the legislature at an open press conference or in response to a
specific inquiry;

(c)
Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency;

(d)
Activities conducted regarding an initiative to the legislature that would be
permitted under RCW 42.17.130 and 42.52.180 if conducted regarding other ballot
measures.

(5)
Each state agency, county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or special purpose district which expends public funds for
lobbying shall file with the commission, except as exempted by (d) of this
subsection, ((quarterly)) statements providing the following information
for the ((quarter)) calendar month just completed:

(a)
The name of the agency filing the statement;

(b)
The name, title, and job description and salary of each elected official,
officer, or employee who lobbied, a general description of the nature of the
lobbying, and the proportionate amount of time spent on the lobbying;

(c)
A listing of expenditures incurred by the agency for lobbying including but not
limited to travel, consultant or other special contractual services, and
brochures and other publications, the principal purpose of which is to
influence legislation;

(d)
For purposes of this subsection the term "lobbying" does not include:

(i)
Requests for appropriations by a state agency to the office of financial
management pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW nor requests by the office of
financial management to the legislature for appropriations other than its own
agency budget requests;

(ii)
Recommendations or reports to the legislature in response to a legislative
request expressly requesting or directing a specific study, recommendation, or
report by an agency on a particular subject;

(iii)
Official reports including recommendations submitted to the legislature on an
annual or biennial basis by a state agency as required by law;

(iv)
Requests, recommendations, or other communication between or within state
agencies or between or within local agencies;

(v)
Any other lobbying to the extent that it includes:

(A)
Telephone conversations or preparation of written correspondence;

(B)
In-person lobbying on behalf of an agency of no more than four days or parts
thereof during any three-month period by officers or employees of that agency
and in-person lobbying by any elected official of such agency on behalf of such
agency or in connection with the powers, duties, or compensation of such
official: PROVIDED, That the total expenditures of nonpublic funds made in
connection with such lobbying for or on behalf of any one or more members of
the legislature or state elected officials or public officers or employees of
the state of Washington do not exceed fifteen dollars for any three-month
period: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the exemption under this subsection is in
addition to the exemption provided in (A) of this subsection;

(C)
Preparation or adoption of policy positions.

The
statements shall be in the form and the manner prescribed by the commission and
shall be filed within ((one month)) fifteen days after the end of
the ((quarter)) calendar month covered by the report.

(6)
In lieu of reporting under subsection (5) of this section any county, city,
town, municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, or special purpose
district may determine and so notify the public disclosure commission, that
elected officials, officers, or employees who on behalf of any such local
agency engage in lobbying reportable under subsection (5) of this section shall
register and report such reportable lobbying in the same manner as a lobbyist
who is required to register and report under RCW 42.17.150 and 42.17.170. Each
such local agency shall report as a lobbyist employer pursuant to RCW
42.17.180.

(7)
The provisions of this section do not relieve any elected official or officer
or employee of an agency from complying with other provisions of this chapter,
if such elected official, officer, or employee is not otherwise exempted.

(8)
The purpose of this section is to require each state agency and certain local agencies
to report the identities of those persons who lobby on behalf of the agency for
compensation, together with certain separately identifiable and measurable
expenditures of an agency's funds for that purpose. This section shall be
reasonably construed to accomplish that purpose and not to require any agency
to report any of its general overhead cost or any other costs which relate only
indirectly or incidentally to lobbying or which are equally attributable to or
inseparable from nonlobbying activities of the agency.

The public disclosure commission may adopt rules clarifying and
implementing this legislative interpretation and policy.

---
END ---