BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95.030 and 1998 c 36 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"City" means every incorporated city and town.

(2)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(3)
"Committee" means the state solid waste advisory committee.

(4)
"Composted material" means organic solid waste that has been
subjected to controlled aerobic degradation at a solid waste facility in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Natural decay of organic
solid waste under uncontrolled conditions does not result in composted
material.

(5)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(7)
"Disposal site" means the location where any final treatment,
utilization, processing, or deposit of solid waste occurs.

(8)
"Energy recovery" means a process operating under federal and state
environmental laws and regulations for converting solid waste into usable
energy and for reducing the volume of solid waste.

(9)
"Functional standards" means criteria for solid waste handling
expressed in terms of expected performance or solid waste handling functions.

(10)
"Incineration" means a process of reducing the volume of solid waste
operating under federal and state environmental laws and regulations by use of
an enclosed device using controlled flame combustion.

(11)
"Jurisdictional health department" means city, county, city-county,
or district public health department.

(12)
"Landfill" means a disposal facility or part of a facility at which
solid waste is placed in or on land and which is not a land treatment facility.

(13)
"Local government" means a city, town, or county.

(14)
"Modify" means to substantially change the design or operational
plans including, but not limited to, removal of a design element previously set
forth in a permit application or the addition of a disposal or processing
activity that is not approved in the permit.

(15)
"Multiple family residence" means any structure housing two or more
dwelling units.

(16)
"Person" means individual, firm, association, copartnership,
political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, public or
private corporation, or any other entity whatsoever.

(17)
"Recyclable materials" means those solid wastes that are separated
for recycling or reuse, such as papers, metals, and glass, that are identified
as recyclable material pursuant to a local comprehensive solid waste plan.
Prior to the adoption of the local comprehensive solid waste plan, adopted
pursuant to RCW 70.95.110(2), local governments may identify recyclable
materials by ordinance from July 23, 1989.

(18)
"Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste materials
into usable or marketable materials for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration.

(19)
"Residence" means the regular dwelling place of an individual or
individuals.

(20)
"Sewage sludge" means a semisolid substance consisting of settled
sewage solids combined with varying amounts of water and dissolved materials,
generated from a wastewater treatment system, that does not meet the
requirements of chapter 70.95J RCW.

(21)
"Soil amendment" means any substance that is intended to improve the
physical characteristics of the soil, except composted material, commercial
fertilizers, agricultural liming agents, unmanipulated animal manures,
unmanipulated vegetable manures, food wastes, food processing wastes, and
materials exempted by rule of the department, such as biosolids as defined in
chapter 70.95J RCW and wastewater as regulated in chapter 90.48 RCW.

(22)
"Solid waste" or "wastes" means all putrescible and
nonputrescible solid and semisolid wastes including, but not limited to,
garbage, rubbish, ashes, industrial wastes, swill, sewage sludge, demolition
and construction wastes in containers under ten cubic yards in size,
abandoned vehicles or parts thereof, and recyclable materials.

(23)
"Solid waste handling" means the management, storage, collection,
transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, and final disposal of solid
wastes, including the recovery and recycling of materials from solid wastes,
the recovery of energy resources from solid wastes or the conversion of the
energy in solid wastes to more useful forms or combinations thereof.

(24)
"Source separation" means the separation of different kinds of solid
waste at the place where the waste originates.

(25)
"Vehicle" includes every device physically capable of being moved
upon a public or private highway, road, street, or watercourse and in, upon, or
by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public
or private highway, road, street, or watercourse, except devices moved by human
or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(26)
"Waste-derived soil amendment" means any soil amendment as defined in
this chapter that is derived from solid waste as defined in RCW 70.95.030, but
does not include biosolids or biosolids products regulated under chapter 70.95J
RCW or wastewaters regulated under chapter 90.48 RCW.

(27) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or
toxicity of waste generated or reusing materials.

---
END ---