BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that manufactured homes and mobile homes provide a source of
affordable housing for many residents in the state of Washington. The
legislature further finds that many mobile home park residents are facing
development pressures where mobile home park owners are converting their mobile
home parks to other uses. The legislature further finds that closure of these
mobile home parks cause the displacement of mobile home residents, many of
which are senior citizens.

It
is the intent of the legislature to establish incentives designed to preserve
existing mobile home parks and to assist in the development of additional
mobile home parks by nonprofit organizations and for-profit corporations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall provide technical assistance to nonprofit
organizations to assist in the acquisition of existing mobile home parks, and
the development of new mobile home parks by nonprofit and for-profit
organizations.

---
END ---