BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.305 and 1998 c 165 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department, having good cause to believe that a licensed driver is
incompetent or otherwise not qualified to be licensed may upon notice require
him or her to submit to an examination.

(a)
The director has good cause to require an examination if he or she receives a
written report based upon personal observation of deterioration or lack of
skills necessary for driving from:

(i)
A law enforcement officer;

(ii)
A physician;

(iii)
A physical therapist;

(iv)
A chiropractor;

(v)
A registered nurse;

(vi)
A psychologist;

(vii)
A social worker; or

(viii)
A family member.

(b)
A report received by the department under this subsection is exempt from public
inspection and copying under chapter 42.17 RCW. The department shall not
divulge the identity of the person making the report without that person's
permission. A person who makes a report in good faith may not be held liable
in a civil action based upon the contents of the report, the fact that it was
made, or the consequences of the report.

(2)
The department shall require a driver reported under RCW 46.52.070(2), when a
fatality occurred, to submit to an examination. The examination must be
completed no later than one hundred twenty days after the accident report
required under RCW 46.52.070(2) is received by the department unless the
department, at the request of the operator, extends the time for examination.

(3)
The department may require a driver reported under RCW 46.52.070(2) to submit
to an examination, or suspend the person's license subject to RCW 46.20.322, when
a serious injury occurred. The examination must be completed no later than one
hundred twenty days after the accident report required under RCW 46.52.070(2)
is received by the department.

(4)
The department may in addition to an examination under this section require
such person to obtain a certificate showing his or her condition signed by a
licensed physician or other proper authority designated by the department.

(5)
Upon the conclusion of an examination under this section the department shall
take driver improvement action as may be appropriate and may suspend or revoke
the license of such person or permit him or her to retain such license, or may
issue a license subject to restrictions as permitted under RCW 46.20.041. The
department may suspend or revoke the license of such person who refuses or
neglects to submit to such examination.

(6)
The department may require payment of a fee by a person subject to examination
under this section. The department shall set the fee in an amount that is
sufficient to cover the additional cost of administering examinations required
by this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

A report filed with the department of licensing under RCW 46.20.041
that causes the director to commence an inquiry into a person's driving ability
is exempt from the disclosure requirements of this chapter.

---
END ---