BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No merchant, without giving notice to the purchaser, may sell, trade, or
transfer to any third person information which concerns the purchaser and which
is gathered in connection with the sale, rental, or exchange of tangible
personal property to the purchaser at the merchant's place of business. Notice
required by this section shall be made at least by the prominent posting of a
sign or signs in as many locations as necessary to ensure that they are likely
to be seen by those patronizing the business. The sign shall inform a
purchaser of his or her right to make a request under this section and the
merchant's obligation to comply with that request. If requested by the
purchaser not to sell, trade, or transfer such information, the merchant shall
not do so. No merchant may sell, trade, or transfer any information gathered
solely as the result of any customer payment by personal check, credit card, or
where the merchant records the customer's driver's license number.

(2)
This section does not apply to the electronic transfer of information necessary
to confirm a credit or debit transaction when a purchaser chooses to use a form
of payment other than cash.

(3)
For the purposes of this section "merchant" means any person or
entity engaged in the sale of goods in Washington state.

(4)
Any merchant offering point of service financial benefits in return for the
provision of personal information shall permit consumers to remain anonymous if
they have concerns about their privacy.

(5) Any merchant who violates this section is liable for damages in
an amount determined by the trier of fact payable to the purchaser whose
personal information was sold or otherwise disclosed in violation of this
chapter. In addition, such purchaser may recover reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs.

---
END ---