BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Definitions. The definitions of this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Backbone cabling systems" means a system that provides
interconnections between telecommunications closets, equipment rooms, and
entrance facilities in the telecommunications cabling system structure.
Backbone cabling consists of the backbone cables, intermediate and main
cross-connects, mechanical terminations, and patch cords or jumpers used for
backbone to backbone cross-connection. Backbone cabling also includes cabling
between buildings.

(2)
"Board" means the telecommunications board created in section 5 of
this act.

(3)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department or the director's
designee.

(5)
"Horizontal cabling systems" means the portions of the
telecommunications cabling system that extends from the work area
telecommunications outlet or connector to the telecommunications closet. The
horizontal cabling includes the horizontal cables, the telecommunications
outlet or connector in the work area, the mechanical termination, and
horizontal cross-connections located in the telecommunications closet.

(6)
"Network demarcation point" means the point or interconnection
between the service provider's communications cabling, terminal equipment, and
protective apparatus and the customer's premises telecommunications cabling
system. The location of this point for regulated carriers is determined by
federal and state regulations. The carrier should be contacted to determine
the location policies in effect in the area.

(7)
"Scope of work" means the work of a telecommunications contractor.
This includes the installation, maintenance, and testing of telecommunications
systems, equipment, and associated hardware. The scope includes installations
of supporting hardware, pathway systems, and cable management systems, which
excludes cable tray and conduit raceway systems. The scope also includes open
wiring systems of telecommunications cables, surface nonmetallic raceways
designated and used exclusively for telecommunications, optical fiber innerduct
raceways, underground raceways designated and used exclusively for
telecommunications, and installed for additions or extensions to existing
telecommunications systems not to exceed fifty feet inside the building, and
incidental short sections of circular or surface metal raceway, not to exceed
ten feet, for access or protection of telecommunications cabling. A
telecommunications contractor may install cable tray and ladder rack in
telecommunications service entrance rooms, spaces, or closets.

(8)
"Telecommunications administrator" means a person designated by a
telecommunications contractor to supervise the installation of
telecommunications systems in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(9)
"Telecommunications closet" means a room for housing
telecommunications equipment, cable terminations, and cross-connect wiring that
serve that particular floor. The closet is the recognized transition point
between the backbone and horizontal pathway facilities.

(10)
"Telecommunications contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that advertises, offers to undertake, undertakes,
submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining
telecommunications systems.

(11)
"Telecommunications service entrance room or space" means a room or
space used as the building serving facility in which the joining of
interbuilding and intrabuilding backbone facilities takes place. The service
entrance room may also house electronic equipment serving any telecommunications
function.

(12)
"Telecommunications systems" means structured cabling systems that
begin at the demarcation point between the local service provider and the
customer's premises structured cabling system. A structured cabling system is
the complete collective configuration of cabling and associated hardware at a
given site and installed to perform specific telecommunications functions.

(a)
Telecommunications systems encompass all forms of information generation,
processing, and transporting of signals conveyed electronically or optically
within or between buildings, including voice, data, video, and audio.

(b)
Telecommunications systems include structured cabling systems, compatible
connecting hardware, telecommunications equipment, premises switching
equipment, infrared, fiber optic, radio-frequency, and other limited-energy
interconnections associated with telecommunications systems or appliances.

(c)
Telecommunications systems do not include horizontal cabling used for fire
protection signaling systems, intrusion alarms, access control systems, patient
monitoring systems, energy management control systems, industrial and
automation control systems, HVAC/refrigeration control systems, lighting
control systems, and stand-alone amplified sound or public address systems.

(d)
Telecommunications systems may interface with other building signal systems
including security, alarms, and energy management at cross-connection junctions
within telecommunications closets or at extended points of demarcation.
Telecommunications systems do not include the installation or termination of
premises line voltage service, feeder, or branch circuit conductors or
equipment.

(13)
"Workstation" means a building space where the occupant normally
interacts with telecommunications equipment. The telecommunications outlet in
the work area is the point at which end-user equipment plugs into the building
telecommunications utility formed by the pathway, space, and building wiring
system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
All installations of wires and equipment defined as telecommunications systems
are subject to the requirements of this chapter. Installations shall be in
conformity with approved methods of construction for safety to life and
property. The national electrical code approved standards of the
telecommunications industries association, the electronic industries
association, the American national standards institute, and other safety
standards approved by the department shall be evidence of approved methods of
installation.

(2)
This chapter may not limit the authority or power of any city or town to enact
and enforce under authority given by law in RCW 19.28.360, any ordinance, or
rule requiring an equal, higher, or better standard of construction and an
equal, higher, or better standard of materials, devices, appliances, and
equipment than that required by this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage in, conduct, or carry on
the business of installing or maintaining telecommunications systems without
having a telecommunications contractor registration. Telecommunications
contractors registered under this chapter are not required to be registered
under chapter 18.27 RCW or licensed under chapter 19.28 RCW. All
telecommunications registrations expire twenty-four calendar months following
the day of their issue. A telecommunications contractor registration is not
required for persons making telecommunications installations on their own
property or for regularly employed employees working on the premises of their
employer.

(2)
Application for a telecommunications contractor registration shall be made in
writing to the department accompanied by the required fee. The applications
shall state:

(a)
The name and address of the applicant. In the case of firms or partnerships,
the applications shall state the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership. In the case of corporations, the applications shall state the
names of the corporation's managing officials;

(b)
The location of the place of business of the applicant and the name under which
the business is conducted;

(c)
The employer social security number or tax identification number;

(d)
Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees
working in Washington, as follows:

(i)
The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii)
The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii)
For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an
agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement,
filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile
certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation law;

(e)
The employment security department number; and

(f)
The state excise tax registration number.

(3)
The unified business identifier account number may be substituted for the
information required by subsection (2)(d), (e), and (f) of this section if the
applicant will not employ employees in Washington.

(4)
The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information
provided by the applicant under subsection (2)(d) of this section including,
but not limited to, information regarding the coverage of an individual
employee of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another
state, the department may notify the other state that the applicant is
employing employees in Washington.

(5)
To obtain a telecommunications contractor registration the applicant must
designate an individual who currently possesses a telecommunications
administrator certificate. To obtain an administrator's certificate an
individual must pass an examination as set forth in section 4 of this act.
Examination criteria will be determined by the board.

(6)
No examination may be required of any applicant for an administrator
certificate who was engaged as a bona fide registered or licensed contractor
performing telecommunications installations, or of an employee, principle, or
officer of a bona fide registered or licensed contractor performing
telecommunications installations in the state of Washington on or before the
effective date of this section. Applicants qualifying under this section shall
be issued an administrator certificate by the department upon making an
application and paying the required fee. Individuals must apply before July 1,
2003, to qualify for an administrator certificate without examination under
this section. The board shall certify to the department the names of all
persons entitled to this administrator certificate.

(7)
The application for a contractor registration shall be accompanied by a bond in
the sum of four thousand dollars with the state of Washington named as obligee
in the bond, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the
department. The bond shall at all times be kept in full force and effect, and
any cancellation or revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom,
suspends the registration issued to the principal until a new bond has been
filed and approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall, on the next business day, deposit the fee accompanying the
application in the telecommunications fund and shall file the bond in the
office. The department shall, upon request, furnish to any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified copy of the bond upon the
payment of a fee that the department shall set by rule. The fee shall cover
but not exceed the cost of furnishing the certified copy. The bond shall be
conditioned that the principal will pay for all labor, including employee
benefits, and material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions
to the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a failure of the
principal to make the installation or maintenance in accordance with this
chapter. In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the applicant may
file with the department a cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable
to the department. If the applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department
shall deposit the funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial
bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay
annually to the depositor the interest derived from the account.

(8)
Any person, firm, or corporation sustaining any damage or injury by reason of
the principal's breach of the conditions of the bond required under this
section may bring an action against the surety named therein, joining in the
action the principal named in the bond; the action shall be brought in the
superior court of any county in which the principal on the bond resides or
transacts business, or in the county in which the work was performed as a
result of which the breach is alleged to have occurred; the action shall be
maintained and prosecuted as other civil actions. Claims or actions against
the surety on the bond shall be paid in full in the following order of
priority: (a) Labor, including employee benefits, (b) materials and equipment
used upon such work, (c) taxes and contributions due to the state, (d) damages
sustained by any person, firm, or corporation due to the failure of the
principal to make the installation in accordance with this chapter, or any
ordinance, building code, or regulation applicable thereto. However, the total
liability of the surety on any bond may not exceed the sum of four thousand
dollars, and the surety on the bond may not be liable for monetary penalties.
Any action shall be brought within one year from the completion of the work in
the performance of which the breach is alleged to have occurred. The surety
shall mail a conformed copy of the judgment against the bond to the department
within seven days. In the event that a cash or securities deposit has been
made in lieu of the surety bond, and in the event of a judgment being entered
against the depositor and deposit, the director shall upon receipt of a
certified copy of a final judgment, pay the judgment from the deposit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Each applicant for a telecommunications contractor registration shall designate
a supervisory employee or member of the firm to take the administrator's
examination. This person shall be designated as administrator under the
contractor's registration. No person may qualify as administrator for more
than one contractor. If the relationship of the administrator with the
telecommunications contractor is terminated, the contractor's registration is
void within ninety days unless another administrator is qualified by the
board. However, if the administrator dies, the contractor's registration is
void within one hundred eighty days unless another administrator is qualified
by the board.

(2)
A certificate issued under this section is valid for two years from the nearest
birthdate of the administrator, unless revoked or suspended, and is
nontransferable. The certificate may be renewed for a two-year period without
examination by appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date. If the
certificate is not renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay
twice the usual fee. A person may take the administrator's test as many times as
necessary to pass, without limit.

(3)
The administrator shall:

(a)
Be a member of the firm or a supervisory employee and shall be available during
working hours to carry out the duties of an administrator under this section;

(b)
Ensure that all telecommunications work complies with the telecommunication
installation laws and rules;

(c)
Ensure proper permits are required and inspections made;

(d)
See that corrective notices issued by an inspecting authority are complied
with; and

(e)
Notify the department in writing within ten days if the administrator
terminates the relationship with the telecommunications contractor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
There is created a telecommunications board, consisting of seven members to be
appointed by the governor with the advice of the director as provided in this
section.

(2)
It is the purpose and function of the board to advise the director on all
matters pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including, but not
limited to, standards of installation, minimum inspection procedures, and the
adoption of rules pertaining to this chapter. However, no rules may be amended
or repealed until the board has had an opportunity to consider any proposed
amendments or repeals, and to make recommendations to the director relative
thereto.

(3)
The members of the board shall be selected and appointed as follows: Two
members representing workers in the telecommunications industry; two members
representing telecommunications contractors, with one contractor member being a
telephone company representative; one member shall be a certified
telecommunications administrator; one member shall be a manufacturer in the
telecommunications industry; and one member representing the public. The board
shall have one nonvoting member who is a building official charged with
administration of an electrical inspection program in an incorporated city or
town established by ordinance under RCW 19.28.360.

(4)
The governor shall appoint or reappoint board members for terms of four years,
except the governor may appoint the initial members to staggered terms of from
one to three years. The governor shall fill vacancies caused by death,
resignation, or otherwise for the unexpired term of such members by appointing
their successors from the same business classification. The same procedure is
followed in making such subsequent appointments as is provided for the original
appointments. The board, at this first meeting shall elect one of its members
to serve as chair. The department in conjunction with the board shall develop
rules to govern board procedure.

(5)
Meetings of the board shall be held at least quarterly in accordance with a
schedule established by the board. Each member of the board shall receive
compensation in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Compensation
is paid out of the telecommunications fund, on vouchers approved by the
director.

(6)
The chief electrical inspector may serve as staff support and secretary of the
board, but may not be a voting member.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. All
sums collected by the department of labor and industries from registrations,
permit fees, or other sources, shall be paid to the state treasurer and placed
in a special fund designated as the telecommunications fund. The director or
the director's designee, upon approval by the board, shall issue vouchers for
sums necessary to accomplish the intent of this chapter to be paid regularly by
the state treasurer. The treasurer shall keep an accurate record of payments
into, or receipts of, the fund, and of all disbursements therefrom.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The director, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's
recommendations, shall set a schedule of registration, work permit fees, and
penalty fees that will cover the costs of administration and enforcement of
this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2)
The director, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's
recommendations, shall adopt reasonable rules in furtherance of safety to life
and property. All rules shall be kept on file by the department. Compliance
with the rules shall be prima facie evidence of compliance with this chapter.
The department, upon request, shall deliver a copy of the rules to all persons,
firms, partnerships, corporations, or other entities licensed under this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
The director and the officials of all incorporated cities and towns where
electrical inspections are required by local ordinances, allowed by RCW
19.28.360, have the power to enforce this chapter in their jurisdictions.

(2)
The director, through the chief electrical inspector and other inspectors
appointed under RCW 19.28.070, shall enforce this chapter. Compliance
enforcement may be performed by contractor compliance inspectors appointed
under chapter 18.27 RCW. The expenses of the director and the salaries and
expenses of state inspectors incurred in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter shall be paid entirely out of the telecommunications dedicated fund, on
vouchers approved by the director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
The director shall require permits for and cause an inspector to inspect all
installations of telecommunications systems on the customer side of the
demarcation line for projects greater than ten outlets. However:

(a)
All projects penetrating fire barriers, passing through hazardous locations and
all riser backbone installations regardless of size shall be inspected;

(b)
All installations in single-family and duplex residences do not require
inspections;

(c)
No permits or inspections may be required for installation or replacement of
cord and plug connected telecommunications equipment or for patch cord and
jumper cross-connected equipment.

(2)
Upon request, the department shall make the required inspection within
forty-eight hours. The forty-eight hour period excludes holidays, Saturdays,
and Sundays.

(3)
A written report of the inspection, which plainly and clearly states any
corrections or changes required, shall be made by the inspector. A copy of the
report shall be furnished to the person or entity doing the installation work,
and a copy shall be filed by the department.

(4)
Whenever the installation of any telecommunications cabling and associated
hardware is not in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a condition as
to be dangerous to life or property, the person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity owning, using, or operating it shall be notified
by the department and shall within fifteen working days, or such further
reasonable time as may upon request be granted, make such repairs and changes
as are required to remove the danger to life or property and to make it conform
to this chapter. The director, through the inspector, is empowered to
disconnect or order the discontinuance of the telecommunications cabling or
electrical service to conductors or equipment that are found to be in a
dangerous or unsafe condition and not in accordance with this chapter. Upon
making a disconnection, the inspector shall attach a notice stating that the
conductors have been found dangerous to life or property and are not in
accordance with this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such
defective conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and
until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and secure
condition that complies with this chapter.

(5)
The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right during reasonable
hours to enter into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of his
or her official duties for the purpose of making any inspection or test of the
installation of new or altered telecommunications systems contained in or on
the buildings or premises. No telecommunications cabling subject to this
chapter may be concealed until it has been approved by the inspector making the
inspection. At the time of the inspection, wiring or equipment subject to this
chapter must be sufficiently accessible to permit the inspector to verify
installation conformance with the adopted codes and any other requirements of
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
to install or maintain any telecommunications cabling and associated hardware
in violation of this chapter. When the interpretation and application of the
installation or maintenance standards provided for in this chapter are in
dispute or in doubt, the board shall, upon application of any interested
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity, determine the methods
of installation or maintenance of the cabling materials and hardware to be used
in the case submitted for its decision.

(2)
Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity desiring a decision
of the board under this section shall, in writing, notify the director of such
desire and shall accompany the notice with a certified check payable to the
department in the sum of two hundred dollars. The notice shall specify the
ruling or interpretation desired and the contention of the person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity as to the proper interpretation or application on
the question on which a decision is desired. If the board determines that the
contention of the applicant for a decision was proper, the two hundred dollars
shall be returned to the applicant; otherwise it shall be used in paying the
expenses and per diem of the members of the board in connection with the
matter. Any portion of the two hundred dollars not used in paying the per diem
and expenses of the board in the case shall be paid into the telecommunications
fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. Any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the
provisions of this chapter shall be assessed a penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars or more than ten thousand dollars per violation. The
department, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's
recommendations, shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating this
chapter. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity violating any of these provisions of the amount of
the penalty and of the specific violation. The notice shall be sent by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the
assessed party. Penalties are subject to review by an appeal to the board.
The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes
its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the
penalty is given to the assessed party, and shall be made by filing a written
notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a
certified check for two hundred dollars, that shall be returned to the assessed
party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the
board sustains the decision of the department, the two hundred dollars shall be
applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the
members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after
payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the telecommunications
fund. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law
judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and order. The
board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review a proposed decision
and shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board
meeting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
The department has the power, in case of serious noncompliance with this
chapter, to revoke or suspend for such a period as it determines, any
contractor registration or administrator certificate issued under this chapter.
The department shall notify the holder of the registration or certificate of
the revocation or suspension. Notice shall be made by certified mail sent to
the address of the holder of the registration or certificate as shown on the
application. A revocation or suspension is effective twenty days after the
holder receives notice. Any revocation or suspension is subject to review by
an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of a
revocation or suspension until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall
be filed within twenty days after notice of the revocation or suspension is
given, and shall be effected by filing a written notice of appeal with the
department, accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars. The
certified check shall be returned to the holder of the registration or
certificate, if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board.
The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. If the
board sustains the decision of the department, the two hundred dollars shall be
applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the
members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after
payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the telecommunications
fund.

(2)
The department shall immediately suspend the registration or certificate of a
person who has been certified under RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order.
If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement
during the suspension, reissuance of the registration or certificate shall be
automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the department of
social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the
order.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to relieve from, or lessen
the responsibility or liability of, any person for injury or damage to person
or property caused by, or resulting from, any defect of any nature in any
telecommunications work performed by the person, or in any telecommunications
equipment owned, controlled, installed, operated, or used by him or her. The
state of Washington, its officers, agents, or employees may not incur, or be
held as assuming any liability by reason of, or in consequence of, any
permission, certificate of inspection, inspection, act performed, or approval
authorized, issued, or given under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Disputes arising under this chapter regarding whether the city or town's
telecommunications rules, regulations, or ordinances are equal to the rules
adopted by the department shall be resolved by arbitration. The department
shall appoint two members of the board to serve on the arbitration panel, and
the city or town shall appoint two persons to serve on the arbitration panel.
These four persons shall choose a fifth person to serve. If the four persons
cannot agree on a fifth person, the presiding judge of the superior court of
the county in which the city or town is located shall choose a fifth person. A
decision of the arbitration panel may be appealed to the superior court of the
county in which the city or town is located within thirty days after the date
the panel issues its final decision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
At the time of registration and subsequent reregistration, the applicant shall
furnish insurance or financial responsibility in the form of an assigned
account in the amount of twenty thousand dollars for injury or damages to
property, fifty thousand dollars for injury or damage including death to any
one person, and one hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage including
death to more than one person, or financial responsibility to satisfy these
amounts.

(2)
Failure to maintain insurance or financial responsibility relative to the
contractor's activities is cause to suspend or deny the contractor's
registration.

(3)(a)
Proof of financial responsibility authorized in this section may be given by
providing, in the amount required by subsection (1) of this section, an
assigned account acceptable to the department. The assigned account shall be
held by the department to satisfy any execution on a judgment issued against
the contractor for damage to property or injury or death to any person
occurring in the contractor's contracting operation, according to the
provisions of the assigned account agreement. The department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the assigned account.

(b)
The assigned account filed with the director as proof of financial
responsibility shall be canceled three years after:

(i)
The contractor's registration has expired or been revoked;

(ii)
The contractor has furnished proof of insurance as required by subsection (1)
of this section; or

(iii)
No legal action has been instituted against the contractor or on the account at
the end of the three-year period.

(c)
If a contractor chooses to file an assigned account as authorized in this
section, the contractor shall, on a contracting project, notify each person
with whom the contractor enters into a contract or to whom the contractor
submits a bid, that the contractor has filed an assigned account in lieu of
insurance and that recovery from the account for any claim against the
contractor for property damage or personal injury or death occurring on the
project requires the claimant to obtain a court judgment.

Sec.
16. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period:
The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction
and operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects
account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions
account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal justice
assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data
processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers' retirement
system plan II account, the telecommunications fund, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
17. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services account,
the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan II and
plan III account, the telecommunications fund, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan II and III
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement
fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances
of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18.
Sections 1 through 15 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19.
Section 16 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20.
Section 17 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---