BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that incentives for early intervention will assist employers
and workers to take actions that substantially reduce the incidence of
long-term disability and economic loss suffered by injured workers, and the
economic loss incurred by employers through increasing workers' compensation
premiums and costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
An employer may request early intervention benefits as provided in this section
to assist an injured worker to return to work in a modified or a new job with
the employer of injury, or to a new job with a new employer, the costs of which
the supervisor of industrial insurance or supervisor's designee, in his or her
sole discretion, may pay if:

(a)
The supervisor or supervisor's designee has not made a determination with
regard to vocational rehabilitation services for the injured worker under RCW
51.32.095;

(b)
The attending doctor has certified that it is more probable than not that the
injured worker's disability will last twelve months or more from the date of
injury;

(c)
The injured worker's disability constitutes a substantial impairment that
prevents the injured worker from performing an essential function of the job at
injury;

(d)
The department has been provided with a job analysis of the proposed job
completed by a qualified vocational rehabilitation professional and approved by
the attending doctor. The job analysis must meet standards determined by
department rule, not to exceed the job analysis requirements of the federal
Americans with disabilities act, P.L. 101-336;

(e)
The employer providing the proposed job agrees to pay no less than ninety-five
percent of the wages of the job at injury and the proposed job is available to
the worker for at least twelve consecutive months; and

(f)
If benefits are to be provided for returning an injured worker to a new job,
the job at injury cannot be modified without undue hardship to the employer of
injury.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, for a claim, the total
combined costs of early intervention benefits and benefits under RCW 51.32.250
may not exceed five thousand dollars, subject to the following limits:

(a)
Costs under this section may be authorized for: (i) The costs of job
modification, including workstation improvements and personal accommodation
devices; (ii) skill enhancement costs, limited to tuition, books, and fees, to
provide the injured worker with skills to meet the requirements of the new job;
and (iii) a wage subsidy for the employer of up to thirty percent of the
injured worker's wages for a modified job at injury or a new job.

(b)
Costs under this section may not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for
any one or a combination of the following:

(i)
Specialized professional job modification consultation services to assist with
workstation improvements and the selection of personal accommodation devices;

(ii)
Skill enhancement costs; and

(iii)
Wage subsidy.

(3)
An employer may request an exceptional early intervention benefit as provided
in this subsection, the costs of which the supervisor or supervisor's designee,
in his or her sole discretion, may pay up to ten thousand dollars for a claim
if the supervisor or designee determines that more probably than not:

(a)
The exceptional benefit will enable the injured worker to return to work; and

(b)
The injured worker has significant permanent restrictions and marked objective
medical findings directly related to the industrial injury which establish that
the benefits authorized under subsection (2) of this section will not result in
the injured worker's return to work without undue hardship to the employer.

(4)
A supervisor's or designee's determination under this section may not be used
or received in evidence, obtained in discovery, or otherwise disclosed in a
civil or administrative proceeding, other than a proceeding under this title.

(5)
If the payment of a wage subsidy pursuant to a schedule authorized under this
section is not completed before claim closure, the subsidy may continue to be
paid after the claim is closed, consistent with the authorized schedule.

(6)
The costs of job modifications, including workstation improvements and personal
accommodation devices, and the costs of consultation services shall be charged
to the employer's medical aid fund cost experience. The costs of skill
enhancement benefits and wage subsidies shall be charged to the employer's
accident fund cost experience.

(7)(a)
If an employer fails to retain an injured worker who received benefits under
this section for at least fifty-two weeks in the new or modified job at
ninety-five percent or more of the wages of the job at injury, the employer
must repay the benefits paid under this section, unless the failure to retain
the worker was for reasons not attributable to the employer. The employer may
contest a department order assessing the repayment in the same manner and to
the same extent as provided in RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060.

(b)(i)
If a department's order of repayment under this subsection becomes final under
chapter 51.52 RCW, the director or director's designee may file with the clerk
in any county within the state a warrant in the amount representing the sum to
be repaid plus interest accruing from the date the order became final. The
clerk of the court shall be entitled to a filing fee of five dollars, which
shall be added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be
mailed to the employer within three days of filing with the clerk.

(ii)
The clerk of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately
designate a superior court cause number for the warrant and the clerk shall
cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause number
assigned to the warrant, the name of the employer named in the warrant, the
amount of the repayment plus interest accrued, and the date the warrant was
filed. The amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the
title to and interest in all real and personal property of the employer against
whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in
the office of such clerk. The sheriff shall then proceed in the same manner
and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to execution or other
process issued against rights or property upon judgment in the superior court.

(iii)
A warrant docketed under this subsection shall be sufficient to support:

(A)
The issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the department in the manner
provided by law in the case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied; and

(B)
Any action by the department authorized under this title for the collection of
payments due to the state fund.

(8)
The benefits authorized under this section do not affect:

(a)
The vocational rehabilitation and job modification benefits authorized under
RCW 51.32.095 and 51.32.250, except as provided in this section; or

(b)
The benefits authorized under RCW 51.32.090(3), except that an injured worker may
not receive a wage subsidy benefit under this section and benefits under RCW
51.32.090(3) for the same period.

(9)
To assist in verifying employer compliance with this section, the department
shall enter into an interagency agreement with the employment security
department regarding access to employer wage reports.

(10)
The benefits provided in this section are available to any otherwise eligible
worker insured under the state fund who is injured or contracts an occupational
disease on or after July 1, 1999, and before July 1, 2002.

(11)
As used in this section, "undue hardship" means a job modification
requiring significant difficulty or expense, when considered in light of the
following factors: (a) The nature and cost of the modification needed; (b) the
overall financial resources of the facility or facilities involved in providing
the modification, the number of persons employed at the facility, the effect on
expenses and resources or the impact otherwise of the modification on the
operation of the facility; (c) the overall financial resources of the employer,
the overall size of the employer with respect to the number of employees, and
the number, type, and location of the employer's facilities; and (d) the type
of operation or operations of the employer, including the composition,
structure, and functions of the work force of the employer; the geographic
separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of the facility or
facilities to the employer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Within forty-eight hours after an application for temporary total disability
compensation has been received by the department, the department shall notify
the employer, claimant, and attending doctor in writing of the availability of
early intervention benefits under section 2 of this act. After payment of
fourteen consecutive days, and before payment of twenty-one consecutive days,
of temporary total disability compensation to a state fund claimant, the
department shall contact the employer or the employer's representative and
discuss the use of early intervention benefits to achieve an early return to
work for the claimant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Beginning December 1, 2000, the department shall report annually to the workers'
compensation advisory committee and the appropriate committees of the
legislature on a cost-benefit analysis of the utilization of benefits under
section 2 of this act and the effect of the utilization on return-to-work
outcomes, long-term wage replacement impacts, and cost experience for
employers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 51.32 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---