BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.12.035 and 1997 c 59 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A family or assistance unit is not eligible for aid for any month if for that
month the total income of the family or assistance unit, without application of
income disregards, exceeds one hundred eighty-five percent of the state
standard of need for a family of the same composition: PROVIDED, That for the
purposes of determining the total income of the family or assistance unit, the
earned income of a dependent child who is a full-time student for whom
temporary assistance for needy families is being provided shall be disregarded
for six months per calendar year.

(2)
Participation in a strike does not constitute good cause to leave or to refuse
to seek or accept employment. Assistance is not payable to a family for any
month in which any caretaker relative with whom the child is living is, on the
last day of the month, participating in a strike. An individual's need shall
not be included in determining the amount of aid payable for any month to a
family or assistance unit if, on the last day of the month, the individual is
participating in a strike.

(3)
Children over eighteen years of age and under nineteen years of age who are
full-time students reasonably expected to complete a program of secondary
school, or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training, before
reaching nineteen years of age are eligible to receive temporary assistance for
needy families: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That if such students do not successfully
complete such program before reaching nineteen years of age, the assistance
rendered under this subsection during such period shall not be a debt due the
state.

(4)
Children with disabilities who are over eighteen years of age and under
twenty-one years of age and who are full-time students whose education is being
provided in accordance with RCW 28A.155.020 are eligible to receive temporary
assistance for needy families benefits.

(5) The department is authorized to grant exceptions to the
eligibility restrictions for children over eighteen years of age and under
twenty-one years of age under subsection (3) and (4) of this section when it
determines that such exceptions will facilitate the children's ability to
complete their educations and increase their potential to achieve
self-sufficiency in the future.

---
END ---