BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.67.360 and 1998 c 31 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
city, code city, town, county, special purpose district, municipal corporation,
or quasi-municipal corporation that is engaged in the sale or distribution of
storm water services or sewer services may use public moneys or credit
derived from operating revenues from the sale of storm water services or
sewer services to assist the owners of structures or equipment in financing the
acquisition and installation of materials and equipment, including any
connection charges, for compensation or otherwise, for the conservation or
more efficient use of storm water services or sewer services in such
structures or equipment. Except for the necessary support of the poor and
infirm, an appropriate charge-back shall be made for the extension of public
moneys or credit. The charge-back shall be a lien against the structure
benefited or a security interest in the equipment benefited.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.92.025 and 1985 c 445 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Cities and towns are authorized to charge property owners seeking to connect to
the water system or ((sewerage)) sewer system of the city
or town as a condition to granting the right to so connect, in addition to the
cost of such connection, such reasonable connection charge as the legislative
body of the city or town shall determine proper in order that such property
owners shall bear their equitable share of the cost of such system. The
equitable share may include interest charges applied from the date of
construction of the water system or sewer system until the connection,
or for a period not to exceed ten years, at a rate commensurate with the rate
of interest applicable to the city or town at the time of construction or major
rehabilitation of the water system or sewer system, or at the time of
installation of the water or sewer lines to which the property owner is seeking
to connect but not to exceed ten percent per year: PROVIDED, That the
aggregate amount of interest shall not exceed the equitable share of the cost
of the system allocated to such property owners. Connection charges collected
shall be considered revenue of such system.

(2)
Cities and towns may provide a mechanism for property owners to pay the
connection charge authorized in subsection (1) of this section in installments
over a specified period of time as authorized in RCW 35.67.360.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to appropriation, the department shall distribute grants to allow local
governments, special districts, and other municipal corporations to finance
connection charges under RCW 35.67.360 and 35.92.025.

(2)
A local government, special district, or other municipal corporation that receives
funds under this section, shall establish a local revolving fund for the
repayment of loans to individuals to finance connection charges under RCW
35.67.360 and 35.92.025.

(3)
The department shall develop criteria for the award of funds under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the purposes of section 3 of this act.

(2) The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for the purposes of section 3 of this act.

---
END ---