BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.24 RCW to read as follows:

In order
to assure compliance with the protections under this chapter and the rules of
the board, and to assure public confidence in the confidentiality of reported
information, the department shall:

(1)
Report annually to the board incidents of unauthorized disclosure of
information protected under RCW 70.24.105 and the rules of the board related to
disease reporting. The report shall include recommendations for preventing
future unauthorized disclosures and improving the system of confidentiality for
reported information;

(2)
Assist health care providers, facilities that conduct tests, local health
departments, and other persons involved in disease reporting to understand,
implement, and comply with this chapter and the rules of the board related to
disease reporting; and

(3)
Develop and implement, in coordination with local health departments and health
care providers, a program of public and consumer education regarding the
functioning and purpose of the confidentiality provisions of RCW 70.24.105 and
the rules of the board, and the rights and remedies provide for any violation
thereof.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.24.084 and 1988 c 206 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter shall have a right of action
in superior court and may recover for each violation:

(a)
Against any person who negligently violates a provision of this chapter, ((one))
two thousand dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater, for each
violation.

(b)
Against any person who intentionally or recklessly violates a provision of this
chapter, ((two)) ten thousand dollars, or actual damages,
whichever is greater, for each violation.

(c)
Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(d)
Such other relief, including an injunction, as the court may deem appropriate.

(2)
Any action under this chapter is barred unless the action is commenced within
three years after the cause of action accrues.

(3)
Each violation of this chapter is a separate and actionable offense.

(4)
Nothing in this chapter limits the rights of the subject of a test for a
sexually transmitted disease to recover damages or other relief under any other
applicable law.

(((4)))
(5) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to impose civil liability
or criminal sanction for disclosure of a test result for a sexually transmitted
disease in accordance with any reporting requirement for a diagnosed case of
sexually transmitted disease by the department or the centers for disease
control of the United States public health service.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.05.070 and 1993 c 492 s 239 are each amended to read as follows:

The
local health officer, acting under the direction of the local board of health
or under direction of the administrative officer appointed under RCW 70.05.040
or 70.05.035, if any, shall:

(1)
Enforce the public health statutes of the state, rules of the state board of
health and the secretary of health, and all local health rules, regulations and
ordinances within his or her jurisdiction including imposition of penalties
authorized under RCW 70.119A.030, the confidentiality provisions in RCW
70.24.105 and rules adopted to implement those provisions, and filing of
actions authorized by RCW 43.70.190;

(2)
Take such action as is necessary to maintain health and sanitation supervision
over the territory within his or her jurisdiction;

(3)
Control and prevent the spread of any dangerous, contagious or infectious
diseases that may occur within his or her jurisdiction;

(4)
Inform the public as to the causes, nature, and prevention of disease and
disability and the preservation, promotion and improvement of health within his
or her jurisdiction;

(5)
Prevent, control or abate nuisances which are detrimental to the public health;

(6)
Attend all conferences called by the secretary of health or his or her
authorized representative;

(7)
Collect such fees as are established by the state board of health or the local
board of health for the issuance or renewal of licenses or permits or such
other fees as may be authorized by law or by the rules of the state board of
health;

(8)
Inspect, as necessary, expansion or modification of existing public water
systems, and the construction of new public water systems, to assure that the
expansion, modification, or construction conforms to system design and plans;

(9)
Take such measures as he or she deems necessary in order to promote the public
health, to participate in the establishment of health educational or training
activities, and to authorize the attendance of employees of the local health
department or individuals engaged in community health programs related to or
part of the programs of the local health department.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.05.120 and 1993 c 492 s 241 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
local health officer or administrative officer appointed under RCW 70.05.040,
if any, who shall refuse or neglect to obey or enforce the provisions of
chapters 70.05, 70.24, and 70.46 RCW or the rules, regulations or orders
of the state board of health or who shall refuse or neglect to make prompt and
accurate reports to the state board of health, may be removed as local health
officer or administrative officer by the state board of health and shall not
again be reappointed except with the consent of the state board of health. Any
person may complain to the state board of health concerning the failure of the
local health officer or administrative officer to carry out the laws or the
rules and regulations concerning public health, and the state board of health
shall, if a preliminary investigation so warrants, call a hearing to determine
whether the local health officer or administrative officer is guilty of the
alleged acts. Such hearings shall be held pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 34.05 RCW, and the rules and regulations of the state board of health
adopted thereunder.

Any
member of a local board of health who shall violate any of the provisions of
chapters 70.05, 70.24, and 70.46 RCW or refuse or neglect to obey or
enforce any of the rules, regulations or orders of the state board of health
made for the prevention, suppression or control of any dangerous contagious or
infectious disease or for the protection of the health of the people of this
state, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not
less than ten dollars nor more than two hundred dollars. Any physician who
shall refuse or neglect to report to the proper health officer or administrative
officer within twelve hours after first attending any case of contagious or
infectious disease or any diseases required by the state board of health to be
reported or any case suspicious of being one of such diseases, shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than ten dollars
nor more than two hundred dollars for each case that is not reported.

Any person violating any of the provisions of chapters 70.05,
70.24, and 70.46 RCW or violating or refusing or neglecting to obey any of
the rules, regulations or orders made for the prevention, suppression and
control of dangerous contagious and infectious diseases by the local board of
health or local health officer or administrative officer or state board of
health, or who shall leave any isolation hospital or quarantined house or place
without the consent of the proper health officer or who evades or breaks
quarantine or conceals a case of contagious or infectious disease or assists in
evading or breaking any quarantine or concealing any case of contagious or
infectious disease, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction
thereof shall be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor
more than one hundred dollars or to imprisonment in the county jail not to
exceed ninety days or to both fine and imprisonment.

---
END ---