BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.105.020 and 1993 c 280 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following
definitions shall apply:

(1)
"Department" means the department of information services;

(2)
"Board" means the information services board;

(3)
"Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations
and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department;

(5)
"Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term includes,
but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment maintenance and repair,
operation of a physical plant, security, computer hardware and software
installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch services, programming
services, and computer time-sharing;

(6)
"Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of the
state's telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes specially
conditioned high-speed communications carrier lines, multiplexors, switches
associated with such communications lines, and any equipment and software
components necessary for management and control of the backbone network;

(7)
"Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by wire,
radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;

(8)
"Information processing" means the electronic capture, collection,
storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and presentation of information
in the form of data, text, voice, or image and includes telecommunications and
office automation functions;

(9)
"Information services" means data processing, telecommunications, and
office automation;

(10)
"Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities
used in information processing, such as computers, word processors, terminals,
telephones, and cables;

(11)
"Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or
license;

(12)
"Video telecommunications" means the electronic interconnection of
two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting and/or receiving visual and
associated audio information. Video telecommunications shall not include
existing public television broadcast stations as currently designated by the
department of community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330
RCW;

(13)
"K-20 network user steering committee" or "committee" means
the K-20 network user steering committee created in section 3 of this act;

(14)
"K-20 network" means the network established in RCW 28D.02.070;

(15)
"Educational sectors" means those institutions of higher education,
school districts, and educational service districts that use the network for
distance education, data transmission, and other uses permitted by the board.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.105.041 and 1996 c 171 s 8 and 1996 c 137 s 12 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall have the following powers and duties related to information
services:

(a)
To develop standards governing the acquisition and disposition of equipment,
proprietary software and purchased services, and confidentiality of
computerized data;

(b)
To purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire, dispose of, and maintain
equipment, proprietary software, and purchased services, or to delegate to
other agencies and institutions of state government, under appropriate
standards, the authority to purchase, lease, rent, or otherwise acquire,
dispose of, and maintain equipment, proprietary software, and purchased
services: PROVIDED, That, agencies and institutions of state government are
expressly prohibited from acquiring or disposing of equipment, proprietary
software, and purchased services without such delegation of authority. The
acquisition and disposition of equipment, proprietary software, and purchased
services is exempt from RCW 43.19.1919 and, as provided in RCW 43.19.1901, from
the provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.200. This subsection (1)(b) does
not apply to the legislative branch;

(c)
To develop state-wide or interagency technical policies, standards, and
procedures;

(d)
To review and approve standards and common specifications for new or expanded
telecommunications networks proposed by agencies, public postsecondary
education institutions, educational service districts, or state-wide or
regional providers of K-12 information technology services, and to assure the
cost-effective development and incremental implementation of a state-wide video
telecommunications system to serve: Public schools; educational service districts;
vocational-technical institutes; community colleges; colleges and universities;
state and local government; and the general public through public affairs
programming;

(e)
To provide direction concerning strategic planning goals and objectives for the
state. The board shall seek input from the legislature and the judiciary;

(f)
To develop and implement a process for the resolution of appeals by:

(i)
Vendors concerning the conduct of an acquisition process by an agency or the
department; or

(ii)
A customer agency concerning the provision of services by the department or by
other state agency providers;

(g)
To establish policies for the periodic review by the department of agency
performance which may include but are not limited to analysis of:

(i)
Planning, management, control, and use of information services;

(ii)
Training and education; and

(iii)
Project management;

(h)
To set its meeting schedules and convene at scheduled times, or meet at the
request of a majority of its members, the chair, or the director; and

(i)
To review and approve that portion of the department's budget requests that
provides for support to the board.

(2)
State-wide technical standards to promote and facilitate electronic information
sharing and access are an essential component of acceptable and reliable public
access service and complement content-related standards designed to meet those
goals. The board shall:

(a)
Establish technical standards to facilitate electronic access to government
information and interoperability of information systems. Local governments are
strongly encouraged to follow the standards established by the board; and

(b)
Require agencies to consider electronic public access needs when planning new
information systems or major upgrades of systems.

In
developing these standards, the board is encouraged to include the state
library, state archives, and appropriate representatives of state and local
government.

(3)
The board, in consultation with the K-20 network user steering committee, has
the duty to govern, operate, and oversee the K-20 network, including but not
limited to the following duties: Establishing and implementing K-20 network
policy, including network rates, growth, finance, subsidies, and technology;
establishing and implementing network user policies including user access;
coordinating budget requests for shared portions of the K-20 network; and user/provider
dispute resolution. The board shall delegate general operational and technical
oversight to the K-20 network user steering committee as appropriate.

(b)
The board has the authority to adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement
the provisions regarding the K-20 network.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

The
K-20 network user steering committee is established, and shall report to the
board.

(1)
The committee consists of the following seven voting members: The executive
director of the higher education coordinating board or the director's
appointee; the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
appointee; the executive director of the state board for community and
technical colleges or the executive director's appointee; a representative of
the educational services districts, appointed by that organization; a
representative of the baccalaureate institutions, appointed by the council of
presidents; a representative of the computer or telecommunications industry,
appointed by the governor; and a representative of the department, appointed by
the director. The committee includes as ex officio, nonvoting members, a
representative of the organization that operates the K-20 network, appointed by
that organization, the state librarian, a representative of the independent
nonprofit institutions of higher education appointed by the Washington
association of independent colleges and universities, and such additional ex
officio, nonvoting members as may be appointed by the board. The committee
shall select a chair from among its members.

(2)
The committee shall have general operational and technical oversight over the
K-20 network, as delegated by the board.

(3)
The department shall supply necessary staff support to the committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
28D.02.060, 28D.02.065, and 28D.02.070 are each recodified as sections in
chapter 43.105 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
28D.02.060 and 1997 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
K-20 technology account is hereby created in the state treasury. The
department of information services shall deposit into the account moneys
received from legislative appropriations, gifts, grants, and endowments for the
buildout and installation of the K-20 telecommunication system. The
account shall be subject to appropriation and may be expended solely for the
K-20 telecommunication system approved by the ((committee under RCW
28D.02.010)) board. Disbursements from the account shall be on
authorization of the director of the department of information services with
approval of the ((committee under RCW 28D.02.010)) board.

Sec.
6. RCW 28D.02.065
and 1997 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The education technology revolving fund is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from billings under subsection (2) of this section
must be deposited in the revolving fund. Only the director of the department
of information services or the director's designee may authorize expenditures
from the fund. The revolving fund shall be used ((only)) to pay for ((the
acquisition of)) network operations, transport, equipment, software,
supplies, and services, maintenance and depreciation of on-site data and
shared infrastructure, and other costs incidental to the ((acquisition,))
development, operation, and administration of shared educational information
technology services, telecommunications, and systems. The revolving fund shall
not be used for the acquisition, maintenance, or operations of local ((networks))
telecommunications infrastructure or the maintenance or depreciation
of on-premises video equipment specific to a particular institution
or group of institutions.

(2)
The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving fund are subject to
the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. The department of information services shall, in
consultation with entities connected to the network under RCW 28D.02.070 and
subject to the review and approval of the office (([of])) of
financial management, establish and implement a billing structure ((to
assure that all network users pay an equitable share of the costs in relation
to their usage of the)) for network services identified in
subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
7. RCW
28D.02.070 and 1996 c 137 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
information services board shall prepare a technical plan for the design and
construction of the K-20 telecommunication system. The board shall ensure that
the technical plan adheres to the ((principles described in RCW 28D.02.020
and the)) goals and objectives established ((by the committee))
under RCW ((28D.02.010)) 43.105.041. The board shall provide
formal project approval and oversight during the development and implementation
of the K-20 telecommunications network. In approving the plan, the board shall
conduct a request for proposal process. The technical plan shall be developed
in phases as follows:

(1)
Phase one shall provide a telecommunication backbone connecting educational
service districts, the main campuses of public baccalaureate institutions, the
branch campuses of public research institutions, and the main campuses of
community colleges and technical colleges.

(2)
Phase two shall provide for (a) connection to the network by entities that
include, but need not be limited to: School districts, public higher education
off-campus and extension centers, and branch campuses of community
colleges and technical colleges, ((and independent nonprofit baccalaureate
institutions,)) as prioritized by the (([K-20])) K-20
telecommunications oversight and policy committee, or as modified by the
board; ((and)) (b) distance education facilities and components for
entities listed in subsections (1) and (2) of this section; and (c)
connection for independent nonprofit institutions of higher education, provided
that:

(i)
The board and each independent nonprofit institution of higher education to be
connected agree in writing to terms and conditions of connectivity. The terms
and conditions shall ensure, among other things, that the provision of K-20
services does not violate Article VIII, section 5 of the state Constitution and
that the institution shall adhere to network policies; and

(ii)
The board determines that inclusion of the independent nonprofit institutions
of higher education will not significantly affect the network's eligibility for
federal universal service fund discounts or subsidies.

(((3)
Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to, connections to
public libraries, state and local governments, community resource centers, and
the private sector.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

Actions
of the K-20 telecommunications oversight and policy committee in effect on June
30, 1999, shall remain in effect thereafter unless modified or repealed by the
board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The board is not intended to duplicate the statutory responsibilities of the
higher education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
or the governing boards of the institutions of higher education.

(2)
The board may not interfere in any curriculum or legally offered programming
offered over the network.

(3)
The coordination of telecommunications planning for institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 remains the responsibility of the higher
education coordinating board under RCW 28B.80.600. The board may recommend but
not require revisions to the higher education coordinating board's
telecommunications plan.

(4)
The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common schools remains
the responsibility of the superintendent of public instruction. The board may
recommend but not require revisions to the superintendent's telecommunications
plans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

The
private sector member of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.250.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of information services shall maintain, in consultation with the
committee and the board, the K-20 operations cooperative, which shall be
responsible for day-to-day network management, technical network status
monitoring, technical problem response coordination, and other duties as agreed
to by the department, the committee, and the board. Funding for the K-20
operations cooperative shall be provided from the education technology
revolving fund under RCW 28D.02.065.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
28D.02.005 (Intent--Finding) and 1996 c 137 s 1;

(2) RCW
28D.02.010 (K-20 telecommunications oversight and policy
committee) and 1996 c 137 s 2;

(3) RCW
28D.02.020 (Design and implementation plan) and 1996 c 137 s 3;

(4) RCW
28D.02.030 (Proposed location plan of higher education delivery
sites) and 1996 c 137 s 4;

(5) RCW
28D.02.040 (Proposed location plan of public education delivery
sites) and 1996 c 137 s 5; and

(6) RCW
28D.02.050 (Network governance structure--Recommendations of the
higher education coordinating board and the superintendent of public
instruction) and 1996 c 137 s 6.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---