BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the unemployment insurance system, designed to provide
benefits to workers during temporary periods of involuntary unemployment, has
tax inequities that need to be addressed. It is the intent of the legislature
to modify the system to ensure that the original purpose of unemployment
insurance is met while fairly balancing employers' obligations under the system
and to address needs of unemployed workers.

---
END ---