BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.630 and 1991 c 343 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.40.670 and 1995 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon
recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance
under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740. The member shall
receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.40.620 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
The retirement for disability of a judge, who is a member of the retirement
system, by the supreme court under Article IV, section 31 of the Constitution
of the state of Washington (Amendment 71), with the concurrence of the
department, shall be considered a retirement under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living
at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her
legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is
no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.32.765 and 1991 c 343 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.32.760.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.32.790 and 1995 c 144 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon
recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance
under the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825. The member shall receive
a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW 41.32.760 and
shall have the allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is neither a designated person or persons still
living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or
her legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is
no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec.
5. RCW
41.32.875 and 1996 c 39 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
6. RCW
41.32.880 and 1995 c 239 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be
eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member
shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.32.840 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any
further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by
the retiree as provided in RCW 41.32.851.

Sec.
7. RCW
41.26.430 and 1993 c 517 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.26.420.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age fifty-five.

Sec.
8. RCW
41.26.470 and 1995 c 144 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the director shall be
eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through
41.26.550. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed
as provided for in RCW 41.26.420 and shall have such allowance ((actuarially))
reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-five.

(2)
Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall
be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as required by the
department. If such medical examinations reveal that such a member has
recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is no longer
entitled to benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be
canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service
rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if unable to
perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's request, in such other
like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which
the member is then able to perform. In no event shall a member previously
drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary or
rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position held
by the member at the date of the retirement for disability. If the department
determines that the member is able to return to service, the member is entitled
to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing shall comply with the
requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act.

(3)
Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty
on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits under RCW 41.04.500 through
41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW 41.04.535 shall receive or continue to
receive service credit subject to the following:

(a)
No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(b)
No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or
is separated without leave of absence.

(c)
Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for
the period of the service credited.

(d)
Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the
department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(e)
State contributions shall be as provided in RCW 41.26.450.

(f)
Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would
have received had the disability not occurred.

(g)
The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted for a
period not to exceed six consecutive months.

(h)
Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section
or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit
as a matter of contractual right.

(4)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is neither such designated person or persons still
living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or
her legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is
no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec.
9. RCW
41.35.420 and 1998 c 341 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
10. RCW
41.35.440 and 1998 c 341 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon
recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance
under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599. The member shall
receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.35.400 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living
at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her
legal representative.

Sec.
11. RCW
41.35.680 and 1998 c 341 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.35.510;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
12. RCW
41.35.690 and 1998 c 341 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be
eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member
shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.35.620 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any
further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by
the retiree as provided in RCW 41.35.220.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 9 through 12 of this act take effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---