BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
By September 15, 1999, the department of labor and industries shall develop, in
consultation with the workers' compensation advisory committee, a plan for
implementing the recommendations contained in the joint legislative audit and
review committee's report on the workers' compensation system performance audit
mandated under chapter 330, Laws of 1997. Except as provided in subsection (2)
of this section, the department shall report on the plan by December 1, 1999,
to the appropriate committees of the legislature, including at a minimum:

(a)
A review of the recommendations that the department has implemented or plans to
implement, with timelines for implementation;

(b)
A review of the recommendations that the department does not plan to implement,
if any, with the reasons for such decisions; and

(c)
Recommendations for legislation that may be required to implement the recommendations.

(2)
The department shall report by September 15, 1999, on the plan for implementing
recommendation two of the joint legislative audit and review committee's report
and section 2 of this act. The report shall include, at a minimum, an
implementation timetable and recommendations for legislation to implement the
plan.

(3)
In conjunction with that part of the report under subsection (1) of this
section regarding the audit's recommendations for vocational rehabilitation,
the department shall also include a report on the study undertaken by the
subcommittee on vocational services of the workers' compensation advisory
committee. The report shall include a plan for improving the industrial
insurance vocational rehabilitation system and recommendations for legislation,
if any.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.28.020 and 1984 c 159 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
a worker is entitled to compensation under this title he or she shall file with
the department or his or her ((self-insuring)) employer((, as the
case may be,)) his or her application for such, together with the
certificate of the physician who attended him or her, and it shall be the duty
of the physician to inform the injured worker of his or her rights under this
title and to lend all necessary assistance in making this application for
compensation and such proof of other matters as required by the rules of the
department without charge to the worker. The department shall provide
physicians with a manual which outlines the procedures to be followed in
applications for compensation involving occupational diseases, and which
describes claimants' rights and responsibilities related to occupational
disease claims. If application for compensation is made to ((a
self-insuring)) an employer, he or she shall forthwith send a copy
thereof to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---