BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.32.765 and 1991 c 343 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.32.760.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance: (a) Actuarially reduced,
if the member is under age sixty; or (b) reduced by two percent, if the member
is age sixty or older, to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.35.420 and 1998 c 341 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance: (a) Actuarially reduced, if the member is
under age sixty; or (b) reduced by two percent, if the member is age sixty or
older, to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.40.630 and 1991 c 343 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance: (a) Actuarially reduced, if the member is
under age sixty; or (b) reduced by two percent, if the member is age sixty or
older, to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 2 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---