BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.24.510 and 1989 c 234 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A person who in good faith communicates a complaint or information
to any agency of federal, state, or local government, or to any
self-regulatory organization that has been delegated authority by a federal,
state, or local government agency and is subject to oversight by the delegating
agency, is immune from civil liability for claims based upon the communication
to the agency or organization regarding any matter reasonably of concern to
that agency ((shall be immune from civil liability on claims based upon the
communication to the agency)) or organization. A person prevailing
upon the defense provided for in this section shall be entitled to recover
costs and reasonable attorneys' fees incurred in establishing the defense.

---
END ---