BE IT ENACTED BY
THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.212 and 1989 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of licensing shall notify the public of the requirements of RCW
46.30.020 through 46.30.040 at the time of new vehicle registration and when
the department sends a registration renewal notice.

(2)
The department of licensing shall not issue an original vehicle license or
renew a vehicle license unless the applicant provides written proof of meeting
the financial responsibility requirements for operating a motor vehicle as
provided in RCW 46.30.020.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.16.210 and 1997 c 241 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receipt of the application and proper fee for original vehicle license,
the director shall make a recheck of the application and in the event that
there is any error in the application it may be returned to the county auditor
or other agent to effectively secure the correction of such error, who shall
return the same corrected to the director.

(2)
Application for the renewal of a vehicle license shall be made to the director
or his agents, including county auditors, by the registered owner on a form
prescribed by the director. The application must be accompanied by the
certificate of registration for the last registration period in which the
vehicle was registered in Washington unless the applicant submits a preprinted
application mailed from Olympia, and the payment of such license fees and
excise tax as may be required by law. Such application shall be handled in the
same manner and the fees transmitted to the state treasurer in the same manner
as in the case of an original application. Any such application which upon
validation becomes a renewal certificate need not have entered upon it the name
of the lien holder, if any, of the vehicle concerned.

(3)
Persons expecting to be out of the state during the normal renewal period of a
vehicle license may secure renewal of such vehicle license and have license
plates or tabs preissued by making application to the director or his agents
upon forms prescribed by the director. The application must be accompanied by
the certificate of registration for the last registration period in which the
vehicle was registered in Washington and be accompanied by such license fees,
and excise tax as may be required by law.

(4)
Every applicant for an original vehicle license or for the renewal of a
vehicle license shall provide current proof of financial responsibility to
operate a vehicle as required in RCW 46.30.020. The department may adopt rules
regarding valid proof of financial responsibility for persons applying for or
renewing a vehicle license.

(5)
Application for the annual renewal of a vehicle license number plate to the
director or the director's agents shall not be required for those vehicles
owned, rented, or leased by the state of Washington, or by any county, city,
town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state of
Washington or a governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state and
recognized as a governmental entity by the United States department of the
interior.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.30.040 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial
responsibility to a law enforcement officer ((or)), to a court, or
to the department of licensing on an application for an original vehicle
license or the renewal of a vehicle license, including an expired or
canceled insurance policy, bond, or certificate of deposit is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

---
END ---