BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.12.030 and 1995 c 274 s 1 and 1995 c 256 s 23 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
application for (([a])) a certificate of ownership shall be upon
a form furnished or approved by the department and shall contain:

(1)
A full description of the vehicle, which shall contain the proper vehicle
identification number, the number of miles indicated on the odometer at the
time of delivery of the vehicle, and any distinguishing marks of
identification;

(2)
The name and address of the person who is to be the registered owner of the
vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security interest, the name and
address of the secured party;

(3)
Such other information as the department may require. The department may in
any instance, in addition to the information required on the application,
require additional information and a physical examination of the vehicle or of
any class of vehicles, or either. A physical examination of the vehicle is
mandatory ((if it previously was registered in any other state or country or))
if it has been rebuilt after surrender of the certificate of ownership to the
department under RCW 46.12.070 due to the vehicle's destruction or declaration
as a total loss. ((The inspection must verify that the vehicle
identification number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on the
foreign title and registration certificate. If the vehicle is from a
jurisdiction that does not issue titles, the inspection must verify that the
vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with the number shown on
the registration certificate. The inspection must also confirm that the
license plates on the vehicle are those assigned to the vehicle by the
jurisdiction in which the vehicle was previously licensed.)) The
inspection must be made by a member of the Washington state patrol or other
person authorized by the department to make such inspections.

The
application shall be subscribed by the registered owner and be sworn to by that
applicant in the manner described by RCW 9A.72.085. The department shall
retain the application in either the original, computer, or photostatic form.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.12.040 and 1990 c 238 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
application accompanied by a draft, money order, certified bank check, or cash
for one dollar and twenty-five cents, together with the last preceding
certificates or other satisfactory evidence of ownership, shall be forwarded to
the director.

The
fee shall be in addition to any other fee for the license registration of the
vehicle. The certificate of ownership shall not be required to be renewed
annually, or at any other time, except as by law provided.

In
addition to the application fee and any other fee for the license registration
of a vehicle, there shall be collected from the applicant an inspection fee
whenever a physical examination of the vehicle is required as a part of the vehicle
licensing or titling process.

((For vehicles previously registered in any other state or
country, the inspection fee shall be fifteen dollars and shall be deposited in
the motor vehicle fund.)) For all ((other)) vehicles requiring a
physical examination, the inspection fee shall be twenty dollars and shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund.

---
END ---