BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Moneys
collected under this chapter from persons required to be licensed by the
gambling commission engaging in the business of gambling activities using or
conducting punch boards, pull-tabs, social card games, or bingo shall be
deposited in the fair fund created in RCW 15.76.115. During the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000, the amount deposited in the fair fund shall be limited to
two million dollars. During subsequent fiscal years, the amount deposited in
the fair fund shall be limited to the amount deposited in the prior year
increased by the fiscal growth factor established in chapter 43.135 RCW.
Amounts collected in excess of these limits shall be deposited in the general
fund as provided in RCW 82.32.380.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---