BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that changes in the rapidly changing telecommunications
market are resulting in new consumer problems. The legislature further finds
that unauthorized changes in telecommunications service, known commonly as
slamming, and unauthorized billing for service on telecommunications bills,
known commonly as cramming, are unfair and deceptive consumer practices. The
legislature further finds that consumers should have options available to
protect themselves against unauthorized service changes and billings. In
addition, current penalties and remedies need to be increased to provide a more
effective deterrent to these practices.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Every local exchange telecommunications company must offer to its customers, as
a part of basic local service and at no additional cost, the following optional
services:

(a)
Preferred carrier freeze. Preferred carrier freeze procedures, including any
solicitation thereof, must clearly distinguish among telecommunications
services subject to a preferred carrier freeze. The carrier offering the
freeze must obtain separate authorization for each service for which a
preferred carrier freeze is requested. If a customer has subscribed to
preferred carrier freeze, the local exchange company may not make changes to
the customer's telecommunications services including without limitation local
exchange service, intraLATA, interLATA, intrastate toll, interstate toll, or
international toll service except on direct oral or written direction of the
customer and shall reject any orders for change in service that are submitted
on behalf of the customer; and

(b)
Bill block services. Customers may block the billing of nontelecommunication
products or services or telecommunication services provided by a company other
than the customer's local exchange carrier or authorized long distance
carrier. On request of bill block services by the customer, service providers
that are not affiliated with the local exchange carrier shall not submit
charges to the local exchange carrier for nontelecommunications products,
services or nonpresubscribed intrastate or interstate toll services. For
purposes of this subsection, nonpresubscribed intrastate or interstate toll
services shall not include dial-around long distance or calling card services.

(2)
Each local exchange telecommunications company must notify its customers of the
services described in this section at the time service is established and at
least once per year thereafter. The commission may prescribe the form of
notice by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. All
lists of charges for services that appear on a customer's bill shall be clear,
separate, and distinct. At a minimum, all bills must clearly identify on the
bill the company making the charge, the specific product, service, or package
of services being billed for, and a toll-free contact number for disputing a
charge. The commission may prescribe the form of bill disclosure by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
(1)(a) No person shall: (i) Cause a change in a customer's selection of
telecommunications company without the customer's authorization as prescribed
by the commission; and (ii) place or cause to be placed an unauthorized charge
on a customer's telecommunications account.

(b)
Any customer who is the victim of acts prohibited by this section is absolved
of liability for (i) all charges imposed by the unauthorized carrier for
products or services provided during the first thirty days after the
unauthorized change, or for a longer period of time as permitted by the
commission; (ii) all charges required to return the customer to his or her
properly authorized carrier; and (iii) all other charges imposed in connection with
the unauthorized change.

(2)
The carrier that a customer contacts to report an unauthorized change, whether
that entity is the customer's local exchange company, unauthorized carrier, or
the customer's authorized carrier shall immediately take appropriate action to
return the customer to his or her authorized carrier. The carrier that a
customer calls to report an unauthorized change, whether that entity is the
customer's local exchange company, unauthorized carrier, or the customer's
authorized carrier is required to inform the customer that he or she is not
required to pay for any unauthorized charges incurred for the first thirty days
after the unauthorized charge. The unauthorized carrier shall remove charges,
if any, from the customer's bill for charges incurred within the first thirty
days of the unauthorized change and any charges required to return the customer
to his or her properly authorized carrier. The local exchange carrier, when
serving as the billing agent, may independently carry out the provisions of
this subsection.

(3)
If a customer disputes a charge for nontelecommunications service, or
telecommunications services provided by a company other than the customer's
local exchange carrier or authorized long-distance carrier, the local exchange
company shall remove the charge from the bill. This subsection does not affect
the ability of the charging company to independently collect legitimate
charges.

(4)
The commission may adopt rules necessary to enforce this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In
addition to any penalties provided by law, the commission may take one or more
of the following actions:

(1)
Order payment by an unauthorized service provider to the service provider
previously selected by the customer in an amount not to exceed all charges
billed to the customer by the unauthorized service provider for services
provided during the unauthorized service period; and

(2)
Order the unauthorized service provider to refund all payments made by the
customer for services provided during the unauthorized service period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by section 4(1)(a) of this act are
matters vitally affecting the public interest for purposes of applying the
consumer protection act. A violation of section 4(1)(a) of this act is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the
consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. In any action under chapter 19.86
RCW, a person who proves any of the causes of action identified in this section
is entitled to a presumption of injury and in addition to recovering costs and
reasonable attorneys' fees, damages may be ordered in the amount of two
thousand five hundred dollars.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
Washington utilities and transportation commission and the attorney general
shall assess and report to the legislature by June 2000 whether the practices
of unauthorized service changes and billing have been deterred by this act and
may make recommendations to the legislature with regard to enforcement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 80.36 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---