BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.120 and 1990 c 9 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
new driver's license may be issued and no previously issued license may be
renewed until the applicant therefor has successfully passed a driver licensing
examination. However, the department may waive all or any part of the
examination of any person applying for the renewal of a driver's license except
when the department determines that an applicant for a driver's license is not
qualified to hold a driver's license under this title. The department may also
waive the actual demonstration of the ability to operate a motor vehicle by a
person who surrenders a valid driver's license issued by the person's previous
home state and who is otherwise qualified to be licensed. For a new license
examination a fee of seven dollars shall be paid by each applicant, in addition
to the fee charged for issuance of the license. A new license is one issued to
a driver who has not been previously licensed in this state or to a driver whose
last previous Washington license has been expired for more than ((four))
six years.

Any
person renewing his or her driver's license more than sixty days after the
license has expired shall pay a penalty fee of ten dollars in addition to the
renewal fee under RCW 46.20.181. The penalty fee shall be deposited in the
highway safety fund.

Any
person who is outside the state at the time his or her driver's license expires
or who is unable to renew the license due to any incapacity may renew the
license within sixty days after returning to this state or within sixty days
after the termination of any such incapacity without the payment of the penalty
fee.

The department shall provide for giving examinations at places and
times reasonably available to the people of this state.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.161 and 1998 c 41 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department, upon receipt of a fee of ((fourteen)) thirty dollars,
unless the driver's license is issued for a period other than six years, in
which case the fee shall be five dollars for each year that the license is
issued, which includes the fee for the required photograph, shall issue to
every applicant qualifying therefor a driver's license, which license shall
bear thereon a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the name of
record, date of birth, Washington residence address, photograph, and a brief
description of the licensee, and either a facsimile of the signature of the
licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write his usual signature
with pen and ink immediately upon receipt of the license. No license is valid
until it has been so signed by the licensee.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.181 and 1990 c 250 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, every driver's
license expires on the ((fourth)) sixth anniversary of the licensee's
birthdate following the issuance of the license. Every such license is
renewable on or before its expiration upon application prescribed by the
department and the payment of a fee of ((fourteen)) thirty
dollars. This fee includes the fee for the required photograph.

(2) During the period from July 1, 2000, to July 1, 2006, the
department may issue or renew a driver's license for a period other than six
years, or may extend by mail a license that has already been issued, in order
to evenly distribute, as nearly as possible, the yearly renewal rate of
licensed drivers. The fee for a driver's license issued or renewed for a
period other than six years, or that has been extended by mail, is five dollars
for each year that the license is issued, renewed, or extended. The department
may adopt any rules as are necessary to carry out this subsection.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.20.470 and 1989 c 178 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be an additional fee for issuing any class of commercial driver's license
in addition to the prescribed fee required for the issuance of the original
driver's license. The additional fee for each class shall not exceed ((twelve))
twenty-four dollars for the original commercial driver's license or
subsequent renewals, unless the commercial driver's license is renewed or
extended for a period other than six years, in which case the fee for each
class shall not exceed four dollars for each year that the commercial driver's
license is renewed or extended. The fee shall be deposited in the highway
safety fund.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.20.505 and 1993 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person applying for a special endorsement or a new category of endorsement of a
driver's license authorizing such person to drive a motorcycle or a
motor-driven cycle shall pay an examination fee of two dollars which is not
refundable. In addition, the endorsement fee for the initial or new category
motorcycle endorsement shall ((be six)) not exceed nine dollars,
and the subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall ((be fourteen)) not
exceed thirty dollars, unless the endorsement is renewed or extended for
a period other than six years, in which case the subsequent renewal endorsement
fee shall not exceed five dollars for each year that the endorsement is renewed
or extended. The initial or new category and renewal endorsement fees
shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety education account of the highway
safety fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---