BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to promote the creation and the retention of
jobs. To that end section 2 of this act allows counties to provide public
facilities that will attract and retain businesses, thereby creating and
maintaining jobs.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.14.370 and 1998 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The legislative authority of a ((distressed)) rural county with
a population density of sixty or fewer persons per square mile, as determined
by the office of financial management, may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed ((0.04))
0.08 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of
the article used in the case of a use tax.

(b)
The legislative authority of a rural county with a population density greater
than sixty persons per square mile but less than one hundred persons per square
mile, as determined by the office of financial management, may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall
not exceed 0.04 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or the
value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing qualifying public facilities in rural counties. The public
facility must be listed as an item in the county's capital facilities plan or
the capital facilities plan of a city or town located within the county. In
implementing this section, the county shall consult with cities, towns, and
port districts within the county.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5)
For purposes of this section((, "distressed county")):

(a)
"Rural county" means a county ((in which the average level of
unemployment for the three years before the year in which a tax is first
imposed under this section exceeds the average state unemployment for those
years by twenty percent)) with a population density of fewer than one
hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial
management.

(b)
"Public facilities" means a project of a local government for the
planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and industrial
water, flood control, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer,
railroad, electricity, natural gas, telecommunications, buildings or
structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation, job
retention, or job expansion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. It is
the intent of the legislature that a county imposing a tax under RCW 82.14.370
use that money for targeted and effective projects that benefit the public. Therefore,
the amendments in section 2 of this act apply to any ordinance adopted under
RCW 82.14.370.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.160.020 and 1997 c 367 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other
evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant to this
chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan association,
credit union, development credit corporation, insurance company, investment
company, trust company, savings institution, or other financial institution
approved by the board and maintaining an office in the state.

(5)
"Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(6)
"Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue bonds
used to fund industrial development facilities.

(7)
"Local government" or "political subdivision" means any
port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state providing
for public facilities under this chapter.

(8)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer
than one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of
financial management.

(9)
"Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and are
approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings bank,
investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan association,
building and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or any other
financial institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any entity
specified in this subsection.

(((9)))
(10) "Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue
bonds from which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made
available to two or more users under this chapter.

(((10)))
(11) "User" means one or more persons acting as lessee,
purchaser, mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or
applying to receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.

(((11)))
(12) "Public facilities" means a project of a local
government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, flood control, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer,
storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural gas, telecommunications,
buildings or structures, and port facilities, all for the purpose of job
creation, job retention, or job expansion.

(((12)))
(13) "Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (((13))) (14)
of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section.

(((13)))
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip
code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services
under this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion,
or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes
designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is
not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political subdivision
and the finding by the board that unique circumstances exist. The board shall
not obligate more than twenty percent of its biennial appropriation as grants.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would directly result in a
development or expansion that would displace existing jobs in any other
community in the state.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable
materials or for facilities that support recycling, including processes not
currently provided in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking
facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste
processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on
recyclable materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste
paper; (iv) which support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban
areas to ((distressed)) a rural ((areas)) county;
or (v) which substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of
the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)(i)
Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, when the application
includes convincing evidence that a specific private development or expansion
is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility improvement is
made.

(ii)
Applications for projects located in rural counties or rural natural resources
impact areas need not demonstrate evidence that specific private development or
expansion is ready to occur if funds are provided.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to:

(a)
The relative benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project
would create, not just the total number of jobs it would create after the
project is completed and according to the unemployment rate in the area in
which the jobs would be located. ((As long as there is more demand for
financial assistance than there are funds available, the board is instructed to
fund projects in order of their priority)); and

(b)
The rate of return on the state's investment, that includes the expected
increase in state and local tax revenues associated with the project.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

Before
any financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision
seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it
at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic
revitalization board.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.160.070 and 1998 c 321 s 27 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to
read as follows:

Public
facilities financial assistance, when authorized by the board, is subject to
the following conditions:

(1)
The moneys in the public facilities construction loan revolving account and the
distressed county public facilities construction loan account shall be used
solely to fulfill commitments arising from financial assistance authorized in
this chapter or, during the 1989-91 fiscal biennium, for economic development
purposes as appropriated by the legislature. The total outstanding amount
which the board shall dispense at any time pursuant to this section shall not
exceed the moneys available from the accounts. The total amount of outstanding
financial assistance in Pierce, King, and Snohomish counties shall never exceed
sixty percent of the total amount of outstanding financial assistance disbursed
by the board under this chapter without reference to financial assistance
provided under RCW 43.160.220.

(2)
On contracts made for public facilities loans the board shall determine the
interest rate which loans shall bear. The interest rate shall not exceed ten
percent per annum. The board may provide reasonable terms and conditions for
repayment for loans, including partial forgiveness of loan principal and
interest payments on projects located in rural counties or rural natural
resources impact areas, as the board determines. The loans shall not
exceed twenty years in duration.

(3)
Repayments of loans made from the public facilities construction loan revolving
account under the contracts for public facilities construction loans shall be
paid into the public facilities construction loan revolving account.
Repayments of loans made from the distressed county public facilities
construction loan account under the contracts for public facilities
construction loans shall be paid into the distressed county public facilities
construction loan account. Repayments of loans from moneys from the new
appropriation from the public works assistance account for the fiscal biennium
ending June 30, 1999, shall be paid into the public works assistance account.

(4)
When every feasible effort has been made to provide loans and if loans
are not possible, the board may provide grants upon finding that unique
circumstances exist.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.160.080 and 1998 c 321 s 30 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to
read as follows:

There
shall be a fund in the state treasury known as the public facilities
construction loan revolving account, which shall consist of all moneys
collected under this chapter or deposited by the state treasurer pursuant to
any other legislative act, except moneys of the board collected in
connection with the issuance of industrial development revenue bonds and moneys
deposited in the distressed county public facilities construction loan account
under RCW 43.160.220, and any moneys appropriated to it by law((: PROVIDED,
That seventy-five percent of all principal and interest payments on loans made
with the proceeds deposited in the account under section 901, chapter 57, Laws
of 1983 1st ex. sess. shall be deposited in the general fund as reimbursement
for debt service payments on the bonds authorized in RCW 43.83.184)).
Disbursements from the revolving account shall be on authorization of the
board. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control, the
public facilities construction loan revolving account shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.160.900 and 1993 c 320 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The community economic revitalization board shall report to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature biennially on the implementation of this
chapter. The report shall include information on the number of applications
for community economic revitalization board assistance, the number and types of
projects approved, the grant or loan amount awarded each project, the projected
number of jobs created or retained by each project, the actual number of jobs
created or retained by each project, the amount of state and local tax
revenue generated by projects funded under this chapter, the number of
delinquent loans, and the number of project terminations. The report may also
include additional performance measures and recommendations for programmatic
changes. The first report shall be submitted by December 1, 1994.

(2)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct performance
reviews on the effectiveness of the program administered by the board under
this chapter. The committee may contract for services to conduct the
performance reviews. The costs for the performance reviews shall be paid from
repayments of principal and interest on loans made under this chapter. The
performance reviews shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2000, December 1, 2004, and December 1, 2008.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The economic health and well-being of the state is of substantial public
concern, particularly in geographic areas of high unemployment, economic
stagnation, and poverty.

(2)
The consequences of minimal economic activity and persistent unemployment and
underemployment are serious threats to the safety, health, and welfare of
residents of these geographic areas, decreasing the value of private
investments and jeopardizing the sources of public revenue.

(3)
The economic and social interdependence of communities and the vitality of
industrial and economic activity necessitates and partially depends upon
preventing substantial dislocation of residents and rebuilding the
diversification of the areas' economy.

(4)
The ability to remedy problems in stagnant areas of the state is beyond the
power and control of the regulatory process and influence of the state; and the
ordinary operations of private enterprise, without additional governmental
assistance, are insufficient to adequately remedy the problems of poverty and
unemployment.

(5)
Revitalization of depressed communities requires stimulation of private
investment, development of new business ventures, provision of capital to
ventures sponsored by local organizations and capable of growth in the business
markets, and assistance to viable, but underfinanced, small businesses in order
to create and preserve jobs that are sustainable in the local economy.

Therefore,
the legislature declares there to be a substantial public purpose in providing
capital to promote economic development and job creation in areas of economic
stagnation, unemployment, and poverty. To accomplish this purpose, the
legislature hereby creates the rural Washington loan fund and vests in the
department of community, trade, and economic development the authority to spend
federal funds to stimulate the economy of distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Distressed area" means: (a) A rural county; (b) a metropolitan
statistical area, as defined by the office of federal statistical policy and
standards, United States department of commerce, in which the average level of
unemployment for the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which an
application is filed under this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment
for such calendar year by twenty percent; (c) an area within a county, which
area: (i) Is composed of contiguous census tracts; (ii) has a minimum
population of five thousand persons; (iii) has at least seventy percent of its
families and unrelated individuals with incomes below eighty percent of the
county's median income for families and unrelated individuals; and (iv) has an
unemployment rate which is at least forty percent higher than the county's
unemployment rate; or (d) a county designated as a rural natural resources
impact area under RCW 43.31.601. For purposes of this subsection,
"families and unrelated individuals" has the same meaning that is
ascribed to that term by the federal department of housing and urban
development in its regulations authorizing action grants for economic
development and neighborhood revitalization projects.

(4)
"Fund" means the rural Washington loan fund.

(5)
"Local development organization" means a nonprofit organization which
is organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a commitment to a
long-standing effort for an economic development program, and makes a
demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed or underemployed
residents in an area.

(6)
"Project" means the establishment of a new or expanded business in an
area, which business, when completed, will provide employment opportunities.
"Project" also means the retention of an existing business in an
area, which business, when completed, will provide employment opportunities.

(7)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer than
one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial
management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the department is
authorized to approve applications of local governments for federal community
development block grant funds or other federal funds which the local
governments would use to make loans to finance business projects within their
jurisdictions. Applications approved by the department under this chapter must
conform to applicable federal requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
The department may approve an application providing a loan for a project only
if the department finds that the project:

(a)
Will result in creation of employment opportunities, maintenance of threatened
employment, or development or expansion of business ownership by minorities and
women;

(b)
Has been approved by the director as conforming to federal rules and
regulations governing the spending of federal community development block grant
funds or other applicable federal funds;

(c)
Will be of public benefit and for a public purpose, and that the benefits,
including increased or maintained employment, improved standard of living,
employment of disadvantaged workers, and development or expansion of business
ownership by minorities and women, will primarily accrue to residents of the
area;

(d)
Will probably be successful;

(e)
Would probably not be completed without the loan because other capital or
financing at feasible terms is unavailable, or because the return on investment
is inadequate.

(2)(a)
The department shall, subject to applicable federal funding criteria, give
priority to applications that capitalize or recapitalize an existing or new
local revolving loan fund.

(b)
The department shall, subject to applicable federal funding criteria, give
higher priority to economic development projects that contain provisions for
child care.

(3)
The department may not approve an application that fails to provide for
adequate reporting or disclosure of financial data to the department. The
department may require an annual or other periodic audit of the project books.

(4)
The department may require that the project be managed in whole or in part by a
local development organization and may prescribe a management fee to be paid to
that organization by the recipient of the loan or grant.

(5)
The department shall fix the terms and rates pertaining to its loans.

(6)
If there is more demand for loans than funds available for lending, the
department shall provide loans for those projects which will lead to the
greatest amount of employment or benefit to a community. In determining the
"greatest amount of employment or benefit," the department shall also
consider the employment which would be saved by its loan and the benefit
relative to the community, not just the total number of new jobs or jobs saved.

(7)
To the extent permitted under federal law, the department shall require
applicants to provide for the transfer of all payments of principal and
interest on loans to the rural Washington loan fund created under this
chapter. Under circumstances where federal law does not permit the department
to require the transfer, the department shall give priority to applicants who
on their own volition make commitments to provide for the transfer.

(8)
The department shall not approve any application to finance or help finance a
shopping mall.

(9)
For loans not made to minority and women-owned businesses, the department shall
make at least eighty percent of the appropriated funds available to projects
located in distressed areas, and may make up to twenty percent available to
projects located in areas not designated as distressed.

(10)
If an objection is raised to a project on the basis of unfair business
competition, the department shall evaluate the potential impact of a project on
similar businesses located in the local market area. The department may deny a
grant if the department determines the proposed project is not likely to result
in a net increase in employment within a local market area.

(11)
For loans to minority and women-owned businesses who do not meet the credit
criteria, the department may consider nontraditional credit standards to offset
past discrimination that has precluded full participation of minority or
women-owned businesses in the economy. For applicants with high potential who
do not meet the credit criteria, the department shall consider developing
alternative borrowing methods. For applicants denied loans due to credit
problems, the department shall provide financial counseling within available
resources and provide referrals to credit rehabilitation services. In
circumstances of competing applications, the department shall give priority to
members of eligible groups which previously have been least served by this
fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
department is encouraged to work with local development organizations to
promote applications for loans by the fund. The department shall also provide
assistance to local development organizations and local governments to identify
viable projects for consideration by the department. The department shall
provide technical assistance to organizations that administer local revolving
loan funds regarding practices to establish sustainable operations. The
department shall adopt such rules and regulations as are appropriate to carry
out its authority under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. The
department may receive and approve applications on a monthly basis but shall
receive and approve applications on at least a quarterly basis for each fiscal
year. The department shall make every effort to simplify the loan process for
applicants. Department staff shall process and assist in the preparation of
applications. Each application shall show in detail the nature of the project,
the types and numbers of jobs to be created, wages to be paid to new employees,
and methods of hiring unemployed persons from the local market area. Each
application must contain a credit analysis of the business to receive the loan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. The
department shall make available an amount of federal community development
block grant funds equal to the amount of state funds transferred or
appropriated to the department for purposes of supplementing the department's
block grant funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. The
department may make grants of state funds to local governments that qualify as
"entitlement communities" under the federal law authorizing community
development block grants. These grants may be made only on condition that the
entitlement community provide the department with assurances that the
entitlement community will: (1) Spend the grant moneys for purposes and in a
manner satisfying state constitutional requirements; (2) spend the grant moneys
for purposes and in a manner satisfying federal requirements; and (3) spend at
least the same amount of the grant for loans to businesses from the federal
funds received by the entitlement community.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. There
is established the rural Washington loan fund, which shall be an account in the
state treasury. The rural Washington loan fund shall include revenue from the
sources established by this chapter, appropriations by the legislature, federal
funds, private contributions, all loan payments of principal and interest that
are transferred under section 12 of this act, and all other sources. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after legislative appropriation for loans or
grants under this chapter. Any expenditures of federal moneys must conform to
applicable federal law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. (1)
The department shall develop guidelines for rural Washington loan funds to be
used to fund local economic development revolving loan funds. The department
shall consider the selection process for grantees, loan quality criteria, legal
and regulatory issues, and ways to minimize duplication between development
loan funds and local economic development revolving loan funds.

(2)
The department may make loans or grants from the rural Washington loan fund to
local governments to capitalize new, or to recapitalize existing, economic
development revolving loan funds in distressed areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. The
department shall develop performance standards for judging the effectiveness of
the program including, to the extent possible, examining the effectiveness of
loans or grants with regard to:

(1)
Creation of jobs for individuals of low and moderate income;

(2)
Retention of existing employment;

(3)
Creation of new employment opportunities;

(4)
Diversification of the economic base of local communities;

(5)
Establishment of employee cooperatives;

(6)
Providing assistance in cases of employee buyouts of firms to prevent the loss
of existing employment;

(7)
The degree of risk assumed by the rural Washington loan fund, with emphasis on
loans which did not receive financing from commercial lenders, but which are
considered financially sound.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. Any
funds appropriated by the legislature to the rural Washington loan fund for
purposes of the timber recovery act shall be used for development loans in
rural natural resources impact areas as defined in RCW 43.31.601.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
Subject to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the department is
authorized to approve applications of minority and women-owned businesses for
loans or loan guarantees from the fund. Applications approved by the
department under this chapter must conform to applicable federal requirements.
The department shall prioritize available funds for loan guarantees rather than
loans when possible. The department may enter into agreements with other
public or private lending institutions to develop a joint loan guarantee
program for minority and women-owned businesses. If such a program is
developed, the department may provide funds, in conjunction with the other
organizations, to operate the program. This section does not preclude the
department from making individual loan guarantees.

To
the maximum extent practicable, the department shall make available to minority
and women-owned businesses, on an equal basis, funds available under this
section. The department shall submit to the appropriate committees of the
senate and house of representatives quarterly reports that detail the number of
loans approved and the characteristics of the recipients by ethnic and gender
groups.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. The
department may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private
sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and
benefit of the purposes of this chapter, and the department may spend gifts,
grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources according to
their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates
RCW 42.17.710.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24.
Sections 9 through 22 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. It is
the intent of the legislature to attract and retain technology-based businesses
in rural counties. Section 26 of this act provides a tax incentive to those
businesses that are engaged in the business of providing technical support services
from rural counties. Encouragement of these types of business will stimulate
the information technology industry and be of benefit to the state economy in
general. To further the impact and benefit of this program, this incentive is
limited to rural counties of the state. The legislature finds that providing
this targeted incentive will both increase its effectiveness and create a high
technology work force in rural counties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized
against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for persons engaged in a rural
county in the business of providing information technology help desk services
to third parties.

(2)
To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be conducted from a
rural county.

(3)
The amount of the tax credit for persons engaged in the activity of providing
information technology help desk services in rural counties shall be equal to
one hundred percent of the amount of tax due under this chapter that is
attributable to providing the services from the rural county. In order to
qualify for the credit under this subsection, the county must meet the
definition of "rural county" at the time the person begins to conduct
qualifying business in the county.

(4)
No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. These
records include information relating to description of activity engaged in a
distressed county by the person.

(5)
If at any time the department finds that a person is not eligible for tax
credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used
is immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties,
on the credited taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest shall
be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter
82.32 RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was
taken, and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.

(6)
The credit under this section may be used against any tax due under this
chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried
over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. No
refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(7)
A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an annual report to
the department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: Type of activity in which the person is engaged in the
county, number of employees in the distressed county, and how long the person
has been located in the county. The report must be filed by January 30th of
each year for which credit was claimed during the previous year.

(8)
Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility; however, the credit
is available to the successor only if the eligibility conditions of this
section are met.

(9)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of less than
one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial
management.

(b)
"Information technology help desk services" means the following
services performed using electronic and telephonic communication:

(i)
Software maintenance;

(ii)
Software diagnostics and troubleshooting;

(iii)
Software installation;

(iv)
Software repair;

(v)
Software information and training; and

(vi)
Software upgrade.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. A
new section is added to chapter 82.62 RCW to read as follows:

A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this chapter if the person is
receiving credit for the same position under section 26 of this act or RCW
82.04.44525.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
information technology help desk services business and occupation tax credit
shall be terminated on June 30, 2003, as provided in section 29 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective June 30, 2004:

(1)
Section 26 of this act; and

(2)
Section 27 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30.
Sections 25 through 27 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.168.010 (Legislative findings and declaration) and 1985 c 164 s
1;

(2) RCW
43.168.020 (Definitions) and 1996 c 290 s 3, 1995 c 226 s 27, 1993
c 280 s 56, 1991 c 314 s 19, 1988 c 42 s 18, 1987 c 461 s 2, & 1985 c 164 s
2;

(3) RCW
43.168.031 (State development loan fund committee--Terminated June
30, 1994--Powers and duties transferred) and 1995 c 399 s 92 & 1988 c 186 s
7;

(4) RCW
43.168.040 (Approval of applications for federal community
development block grant funds for projects) and 1987 c 461 s 3 & 1985 c 164
s 4;

(5) RCW 43.168.050
(Application approval--Conditions and limitations) and 1993 c 512 s 12, 1990
1st ex.s. c 17 s 74, 1989 c 430 s 9, 1987 c 461 s 4, 1986 c 204 s 2, & 1985
c 164 s 5;

(6) RCW
43.168.060 (Staff support and other duties of department--Rules)
and 1985 c 164 s 6;

(7) RCW
43.168.070 (Processing of applications--Contents of applications)
and 1993 c 512 s 14, 1987 c 461 s 5, & 1985 c 164 s 7;

(8) RCW
43.168.090 (Availability of funds for committee use) and 1985 c
164 s 9;

(9) RCW
43.168.100 (Entitlement community grants--Conditions) and 1993 c
512 s 15, 1986 c 204 s 1, & 1985 c 164 s 10;

(10) RCW
43.168.110 (Washington state development loan fund) and 1992 c 235
s 11 & 1985 c 164 s 11;

(11) RCW
43.168.120 (Guidelines for use of funds for existing economic
development revolving loan funds--Grants to local governments to assist
existing economic development revolving loan funds) and 1987 c 461 s 6;

(12) RCW
43.168.130 (Development of performance standards) and 1998 c 245 s
52 & 1987 c 461 s 7;

(13) RCW
43.168.140 (Rural natural resources impact areas) and 1995 c 226 s
28 & 1991 c 314 s 20;

(14) RCW
43.168.150 (Minority and women-owned businesses--Application
process--Joint loan guarantee program) and 1993 c 512 s 13; and

(15) RCW
43.168.900 (Severability--1985 c 164) and 1985 c 164 s 15.

---
END ---