BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.56.200 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.200 are each amended to read as
follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of robbery in the first degree if:

(a)
In the commission of a robbery or of immediate flight therefrom, he or
she:

(((a)))
(i) Is armed with a deadly weapon; or

(((b)))
(ii) Displays what appears to be a firearm or other deadly weapon; or

(((c)))
(iii) Inflicts bodily injury; or

(b)
He or she commits a robbery within and against a financial institution as
defined in RCW 7.88.010.

(2)
Robbery in the first degree is a class A felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---