BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

The
juvenile accountability incentive account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. Federal awards for juvenile accountability incentives
received by the secretary of the department of social and health services,
shall be deposited into the account. Interest earned from the inception of the
trust account shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for the purposes specified in the federal award or awards.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1998 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the energy
account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive account, the rural
rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account, the youth
athletic facility grant account, the self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur
dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust fund. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the
state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without
the specific affirmative directive of this section.

---
END ---