BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for each
financial institution for each loan in which part or all of the principal
balance owed is forgiven to assist the victim of a landslide in an area that
has been declared an emergency by the governor. The loan must be secured by a
home that is in the boundaries of the declared emergency area and the home is
or will be a total loss or is or will be permanently uninhabitable.

(2)(a)
The credit is equal to one quarter of the amount forgiven, up to a maximum
credit per loan of fifty thousand dollars.

(b)
If less than the total principal balance is forgiven, the financial institution
may claim the credit only if the partial forgiveness is part of a plan to
assist multiple victims of the emergency and involves multiple financial
institutions in a pooling or other arrangement.

(c)
The department may request verification from the military department or other
state agency that the loan is secured by a home in the declared emergency area,
that (b) of this subsection applies, or may request other reasonable
verification.

(3)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Financial institution" means any person to which a loan is owed.

(b)
"Loan" means an obligation secured by a deed of trust or mortgage on
a single-family residence that is located in a state declared emergency area
resulting from a landslide.

(4)
This section applies to all loans or parts of loans forgiven after the
effective date of this section.

(5)
Participation of a financial institution in this program contributes toward
meeting the credit needs of the communities it serves as set forth under
chapter 30.60 RCW for state banks, chapter 32.40 RCW for state savings banks,
and the federal community reinvestment act of 1977 for federal savings banks,
federal savings and loan associations, and national banks.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---