BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that efforts to restore salmon runs and address the
state's population growth make accurate inventories of water rights and water
usage vitally important. The legislature further recognizes that improved
inventories, accurate reporting, and a reliable funding source are necessary to
ensure legal withdrawals and diversions of our shared and finite water
resources. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to create mandatory
metering or measuring, reporting, and funding obligations for water users and
the department of ecology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Beginning January 1, 2000, the department shall require that all claimed,
certificated, or permitted withdrawals or diversions be metered or have other
approved means of measuring maximum instantaneous and total annual water
withdrawal or diversion.

(2)
Beginning January 1, 2002, the department shall require that all withdrawals or
diversions exempt from water right permitting requirements serving two or more
residences shall be metered or have other approved means of measuring maximum
instantaneous and total annual water withdrawal or diversion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Beginning January 15, 2001, and each January 1st thereafter, the department
shall require, without exception, all holders of water right claims,
certificates, and permits to report to the state on the following:

(a)
The periods of the withdrawal or diversion; and

(b)
The maximum instantaneous and annual volume of the withdrawal or diversion for
the previous year, under each water right claim, certificate, or permit.

(2)
Beginning January 15, 2000, the department shall begin an inventory of all withdrawals
and diversions exempt from water right permitting requirements. This inventory
is to be completed no later than December 2001, and updated annually beginning
in January 2003.

(3)
Beginning January 15, 2003, and each January 1st thereafter, the department
shall require, without exception, all holders of a water right exempt from
water right permitting requirements serving two or more residences to report to
the state on the following:

(a)
The periods of the withdrawal or diversion; and

(b)
The maximum instantaneous and annual volume of the withdrawal or diversion for
the previous year, under each water right exempt from water right permitting
requirements.

(4)
Beginning July 1, 2000, and each July 1st thereafter, the department shall
provide an inventory of the withdrawals and diversions within the state, both
instantaneous and annual, by water resource inventory area (WRIA) and as
applicable and requested by sub-WRIA, based on reported water withdrawals and
diversions and as estimated for all exempt withdrawals or diversions.
Additionally, beginning July 1, 2003, the inventory shall include the actual
reported withdrawals or diversions exempt from water right permitting
requirements serving two or more residences and estimated instantaneous and annual
volumes for other withdrawals or diversions exempt from water right permitting
requirements.

(5)
Beginning July 1, 2000, and each July 1st thereafter, the department shall
provide the legislature the water withdrawal and diversion inventory by WRIA and
if requested by sub-WRIA. The complete annual water withdrawal and diversion
inventory shall be made available for public review and copies thereof
available at the cost of printing.

(6)
Beginning January 1, 2000, and each January 1st thereafter, the department
shall require, without exception, the payment of a state water use and
management fee in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per water right
claim, certificate, or permit.

(7)
Beginning January 1, 2003, and each January 1st thereafter, the department
shall require, without exception, the payment of a state water use and
management fee in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars per water right exempt
from water right permitting requirements serving two or more residences.

(8)
All state water use and management fee revenues shall be used in the following
manner and priority:

(a)
Preparation and development of the annual water withdrawal and diversion
inventories as required by this section;

(b)
Preparation and development of watershed assessments by watershed planning
units created under chapter 247, Laws of 1998;

(c)
Preparation and development of watershed plans, including instream flows, by
watershed planning units created under chapter 247, Laws of 1998; and

(d)
Watershed water resource enhancement projects as included in watershed plans
developed under chapter 247, Laws of 1998.

(9)
The failure to report maximum instantaneous, total annual withdrawal or
diversion volume, or to pay the required state water use and management fee by
the end of January of each year for each claim, certificate, permit, or water
right exempt from water right permitting requirements shall result in an annual
fine of not more than ten thousand dollars nor less than one thousand dollars
based upon the estimated total volume of the withdrawal or diversion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
failure to report maximum instantaneous, total annual withdrawal or diversion
volume, or to pay the required state water use and management fee for any:

(1)
Claim;

(2)
Certificate;

(3)
Permit; or

(4)
Water right exempt from water right permitting requirements, but required to
meter or measure and report under sections 2 and 3 of this act;

for
five consecutive years or for five of any ten years shall result in the
statutory relinquishment of the water right under the claim, certificate,
permit, or water right exempt from water right permitting requirements, but
required to meter or measure and report under sections 2 and 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
failure to report maximum instantaneous, total annual withdrawal or diversion
volume, or to pay the required state water use and management fee for any
claim, certificate, permit, or water right exempt from water right permitting
requirements, but required to meter or measure and report under sections 2 and
3 of this act, is prima facie evidence of nonuse and abandonment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
state water use and management fee account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from section 3 of this act must be deposited
into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes under section 3 of this act. Only the director of ecology or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account
is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1998 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the energy
account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition
center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, ((and)) the
children's trust fund, and the state water use and management fee account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
director shall adopt rules to implement sections 2 through 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. RCW
90.44.450 (Metering or measuring ground water
withdrawals--Reports) and 1989 c 348 s 7 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Section 9 of this act takes effect January 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 2 through 6 and 8 of this act are added to chapter 90.03 RCW.

---
END ---