BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.400.200 and 1997 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter, allow, and order
paid salaries and compensation for all district employees in conformance with
this section.

(2)(a)
Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary
provided in the appropriations act in the state-wide salary allocation schedule
for an employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b)
Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters degree shall not
be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the state-wide
salary allocation schedule for an employee with a masters degree and zero years
of service;

(3)(a)
The actual average salary paid to basic education and special education
certificated instructional staff shall not exceed the district's average basic
education and special education program certificated instructional staff salary
used for the state basic education allocations for that school year as
determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410.

(b)
Fringe benefit contributions for basic education and special education
certificated instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this
subsection only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit
contribution exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided
per certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations
act in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this
section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness
or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement
benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or employer
contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits
allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state
operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is
payable. A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.

(c)
Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in programs other than
basic education and special education shall be consistent with the salary and
benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic education and
special education programs.

(4)
Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the
limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for
additional time, additional responsibilities, or incentives, or as specified
in section 2 of this act. Supplemental contracts shall not cause the state
to incur any present or future funding obligation. Supplemental contracts
shall be subject to the collective bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW
and the provisions of RCW 28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and if not
renewed shall not constitute adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300
through 28A.405.380. No district may enter into a supplemental contract under
this subsection for the provision of services which are a part of the basic
education program required by Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.

(5)
Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW
28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The professional development program is established. The professional
development program shall provide certificated instructional staff
opportunities to: Develop and update student learning improvement plans;
implement curriculum materials and instructional strategies; implement the
selected curricula and instruction; and develop and implement assessment
strategies and training in assessment scoring. The professional development
program may also fund other activities intended to improve student learning for
all students, including students with diverse needs. Activities undertaken with
funding provided for the professional development program shall be: Consistent
with the school or district improvement plan; designed to improve the ability
of teachers, and other instructional certificated and classified staff, to
assist students in meeting the essential academic learning requirements; and
designed to achieve state and local accountability goals. School districts
shall conduct professional development program training on days other than
student in-class days as designated by the school calendar.

(2)
The professional development program established by this section is not within
the program of basic education. Stipends provided through the professional
development program are not basic education program salaries under RCW
28A.400.200.

(3)
If the legislature revokes any benefits granted under this section, no affected
employee is entitled to receive the benefits as a matter of contractual right.

(4)
The professional development program terminates at the end of the 2000-01
school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---