BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that transportation facilities linking urban centers in
the state of Washington are still woefully inadequate. Furthermore, it
contradicts the intent and purpose of establishing regional transportation
authorities to provide them with various public financing alternatives and then
apply a state sales tax to purchases made by such authorities. Therefore, the
legislature intends that the savings resulting from the exemption provided in
section 2 of this act will provide additional funds that a transportation
authority can use to develop light rail linking urban centers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales made to a regional
transportation authority created under chapter 81.112 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use by a regional transportation authority, created under chapter 81.112 RCW,
of any property purchased at retail or acquired by lease, gift, or bailment.

---
END ---