BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that an increasing number of children are coming to school
from backgrounds that reflect many of society's dysfunctions. The backgrounds
of these young students often inhibit the students' abilities to take full
advantage of the educational opportunities offered to them. The legislature
also finds that these children would benefit greatly from early intervention by
school counselors trained to help the children adapt to the demands of the
educational system. The legislature intends to provide an opportunity for
school districts to hire counselors for their elementary schools through a
voluntary grant program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The school counselors voluntary grant program is established. The purpose of
the program is to provide school districts with the funding to hire and support
counselors to work with elementary school children.

(2)
The program shall be administered by the office of the superintendent of public
instruction. In its administration of the program, the responsibilities of the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall include, but need not
be limited to:

(a)
Adoption and distribution of rules and program guidelines;

(b)
Use of simple, brief, and clear application processes, forms, and reporting
requirements that help make the program accessible to school districts with
minimal administrative teams;

(c)
Selection of grant recipients;

(d)
The annual adjustment of grant amounts, which may reflect compensation
increases and other fiscal changes adopted by the legislature; and

(e)
Distribution of a report by November 15th of each even-numbered year to the
governor, the education and fiscal committees of the legislature, the
educational community, and other interested parties. The report shall focus
primarily on the results of the grants made for each recipient and of the
program as a whole, and shall include any recommendations for program improvements.
The first report shall include information on the number of school counselors
needed by the school system, the cost of hiring and supporting the counselors,
the numbers of qualified counselors available for schools, and recommendations
for ensuring an adequate supply of trained counselors for the public schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

Any
school district may participate in the program subject to the following
requirements:

(1)
Grant funds shall be used to hire qualified school counselors to work
exclusively with elementary school children.

(2)
Grant funds shall supplement and not supplant funding provided by the district
to support elementary school counselors during a base year determined by the
superintendent of public instruction.

(3) During the 1999-2000 biennium, priority shall be given to
school districts that indicate the greatest need. The need may be determined
through factors that include, but need not be limited to, elementary schools
with the lowest percentage of school counselors and schools with a high
percentage of children in need of the services of a school counselor.

---
END ---