BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature recognizes the importance of long-term habitat productivity and
diversity for fish, and for the protection of water quality and quantity to
meet the needs of people and fish. The legislature also recognizes the
importance of maintaining and enhancing fish habitats necessary to sustain
healthy fish populations. The legislature additionally recognizes that impacts
from upstream and upland storm water run-off that is inadequately controlled
can significantly affect fish habitat and water quality and quantity. One
impact is an increased deposit of sediment in watercourses in agricultural
lands. Such impacts increase the need for drainage maintenance.

(2)
The legislature finds that: (a) Watercourse maintenance activities can be
conducted in a manner that is beneficial to fish habitat and fish propagation;
and (b) the state lacks a clear policy relating to watercourse maintenance
activities, especially what differentiates an entirely artificial watercourse from
a natural watercourse that has been altered by man.

(3)
The legislature therefore declares that watercourse maintenance activities
shall be regulated in the least burdensome manner that is consistent with the
state's fish management objectives and the federal endangered species act.

(4)
It is the intent of the legislature to authorize the department of fish and
wildlife to adopt rules applicable to watercourse maintenance activities under
chapter 75.20 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall adopt rules applicable to watercourse maintenance
activities. The department shall adopt these rules in cooperation with the
affected communities and other interested parties.

(2)
The department shall develop rules for watercourse maintenance activities that
will use, divert, obstruct, or change the natural flow or bed of any of the
salt or fresh waters of the state. Rules shall include criteria for differentiation
of wholly artificial watercourses from natural watercourses that have been
altered by man. Following the adoption of the rules, the department shall
update and distribute the irrigation and fish pamphlet describing the methods
of watercourse maintenance activities that are approved under the rules. The
pamphlet serves as the hydraulic project approval for any project that is
conducted solely for watercourse maintenance and that is conducted as described
in the pamphlet. No further hydraulic project approval is required for such a
project.

(3)
Nothing in this section prohibits the department from requiring a hydraulic
project approval for those parts of hydraulic projects that are not
specifically described in the pamphlet.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
As a first step in the rule-making process required under section 2 of this
act, the department of fish and wildlife shall conduct a pilot project in at
least one representative and willing drainage district in cooperation with the
conservation commission, local farmers, and other interested parties. The
purpose of the pilot project is to develop interim guidelines to serve as a
model for application state-wide. The pilot will focus on natural watercourses
that have been substantially altered by man in previous times and are commonly
referred to as drainage ditches. Management practices will be developed that
provide for occasional maintenance to remove build up of silt and noxious
weeds, such as reed canary grass, in a manner that does not decrease, and where
possible increases, fish habitat and water quality in these watercourses. The
growing of shade trees on one side of drainage ditches as a means of
discouraging growth of reed canary grass while providing improved fish and
wildlife benefits shall be considered. The project shall also include an
investigation, in cooperation with the department of ecology, of the adequacy
of storm water programs for upland urbanized land that may drain into the
project area. Any local jurisdictions with inadequate storm water programs
will be notified accordingly. The department of fish and wildlife shall submit
a report to the legislature by December 1, 2000, concerning the pilot project
created in this section.

(2)
The pilot project shall be completed by June 30, 2000, and the rules shall be
adopted by March 31, 2001. The updated pamphlet shall be published within two
months of adoption of the rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of funding the pilot
project created in section 3 of this act, rule development work under this act,
and the report to the legislature.

---
END ---