BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.70.010 and 1997 c 3 s 126 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
If, on or before December 31 in any calendar year, any real or personal
property placed upon the assessment roll of that year is destroyed in whole or
in part, or is in an area that has been declared a disaster area by the
governor and has been reduced in value by more than twenty percent as a result
of a natural disaster, the assessed value of such property shall be reduced for
that assessment year by an amount determined ((as follows:

(a)
First take)) by taking the assessed value of such
taxable property before destruction or reduction in value and deduct therefrom
the true and fair value of the remaining property after destruction or
reduction in value.

(((b)))
(2) Taxes levied for collection in the year in which the assessed value has
been reduced under subsection (1) of this section shall be abated in whole or
in part as provided in this subsection. The amount of taxes to be abated shall
be determined by first multiplying the amount deducted from assessed value
under subsection (1) of this section by the rate of levy applicable to the
property in the tax year. Then divide ((any amount remaining)) the
product by the number of days in the year and multiply the quotient by the
number of days remaining in the calendar year after the date of the destruction
or reduction in value of the property. If taxes abated under this section
have been paid, the amount paid shall be refunded under RCW 84.69.020. For
taxes levied for collection in 1998 and 1999, this subsection (2) applies to
property that is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that has been
declared a disaster area by the governor and has been reduced in value by more
than twenty percent as a result of a natural disaster. For taxes levied for
collection in 2000 through 2004, this subsection (2) applies to property that
is destroyed in whole or in part, or is in an area that has been declared a
federal disaster area and has been reduced in value by more than twenty percent
as a result of a natural disaster. This subsection (2) does not apply to taxes
levied for collection in 2005 and thereafter.

(((2)))
(3) No reduction in the assessed value or abatements shall be
made more than three years after the date of destruction or reduction in value.

(((3)))
(4) The assessor shall make such reduction on his or her own motion;
however, the taxpayer may make application for reduction on forms prepared by
the department and provided by the assessor. The assessor shall notify the
taxpayer of the amount of reduction.

(((4)))
(5) If destroyed property is replaced prior to the valuation dates
contained in RCW 36.21.080 and 36.21.090, the total taxable value for that assessment
year shall not exceed the value as of the appropriate valuation date in RCW
36.21.080 or 36.21.090, whichever is appropriate.

(5)
The taxpayer may appeal the amount of reduction to the county board of
equalization within thirty days of notification or July 1st of the year of
reduction, whichever is later. The board shall reconvene, if necessary, to
hear the appeal.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.69.020 and 1998 c 306 s 2 and 1997 c 393 s 18 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

On
the order of the county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before or after
delinquency shall be refunded if they were:

(1)
Paid more than once;

(2)
Paid as a result of manifest error in description;

(3)
Paid as a result of a clerical error in extending the tax rolls;

(4)
Paid as a result of other clerical errors in listing property;

(5)
Paid with respect to improvements which did not exist on assessment date;

(6)
Paid under levies or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or unconstitutional;

(7)
Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by any person
exempted from paying real property taxes or a portion thereof pursuant to RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, as now or hereafter amended;

(8)
Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by either a
public official or employee or by any person with respect to real property in
which the person paying the same has no legal interest;

(9)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the county
board of equalization and ordered reduced by the board;

(10)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the state
board of tax appeals and ordered reduced by the board: PROVIDED, That the
amount refunded under subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall only be
for the difference between the tax paid on the basis of the appealed valuation
and the tax payable on the valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's
order;

(11)
Paid as a state property tax levied upon property, the assessed value of which
has been established by the state board of tax appeals for the year of such levy:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the amount refunded shall only be for the difference
between the state property tax paid and the amount of state property tax which
would, when added to all other property taxes within the one percent limitation
of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution equal one percent of the
assessed value established by the board;

(12)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was adjudicated to be unlawful
or excessive: PROVIDED, That the amount refunded shall be for the difference
between the amount of tax which was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged
unlawful or excessive and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the
assessed valuation determined as a result of the proceeding;

(13)
Paid on property acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled under RCW
84.60.050(2);

(14)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW
84.48.065; ((or))

(15)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW 84.40.039;
or

(16)
Abated under RCW 84.70.010.

No
refunds under the provisions of this section shall be made because of any error
in determining the valuation of property, except as authorized in subsections
(9), (10), (11), and (12) of this section nor may any refunds be made if a bona
fide purchaser has acquired rights that would preclude the assessment and
collection of the refunded tax from the property that should properly have been
charged with the tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes shall include the
proportionate amount of interest and penalties paid. The county treasurer may
deduct from moneys collected for the benefit of the state's levy, refunds of
the state levy including interest on the levy as provided by this section and
chapter 84.68 RCW.

The
county treasurer of each county shall make all refunds determined to be
authorized by this section, and by the first Monday in February of each year,
report to the county legislative authority a list of all refunds made under
this section during the previous year. The list is to include the name of the
person receiving the refund, the amount of the refund, and the reason for the
refund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---