BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the administration of the federal ban on the export of
unprocessed timber from public lands in Washington should be done at the state
level rather than the federal level. With this act, the legislature intends to
provide express authority for the governor to continue to administer, modify,
and enforce this program, as necessary, in a manner that meets the current
federal export restrictions while recognizing the important public purpose that
the management and harvesting of timber from public lands serves in Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06 RCW to read as follows:

The
governor, or his or her designee, may establish, administer, and enforce a
state program prohibiting unprocessed timber exports from public lands for as
long as is required by federal law. This program must be administered and
enforced in a manner that meets the current federal export restrictions for
unprocessed timber on public lands as enacted in 16 U.S.C. Sec. 620(c).
Enforcement provisions, including civil and administrative penalties, may be
adopted consistent with the federal law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
34.05.328 does not apply to rules adopted under section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 19.85 RCW to read as follows:

RCW 19.85.030 does not apply to rules adopted under section 2 of
this act.

---
END ---