BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.400.200 and 1997 c 141 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every school district board of directors shall fix, alter, allow, and order
paid salaries and compensation for all district employees in conformance with
this section.

(2)(a)
Salaries for certificated instructional staff shall not be less than the salary
provided in the appropriations act in the state-wide salary allocation schedule
for an employee with a baccalaureate degree and zero years of service; and

(b)
Salaries for certificated instructional staff with a masters degree shall not
be less than the salary provided in the appropriations act in the state-wide
salary allocation schedule for an employee with a masters degree and zero years
of service((;)).

(3)(a)
If the actual average salary paid to basic education and special
education certificated instructional staff ((shall not)) exceeds
the district's average basic education and special education program
certificated instructional staff salary used for the state basic education
allocations for that school year as determined pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410,
the state shall not incur any present or future funding obligations for that
portion of salary.

(b)
Fringe benefit contributions for basic education and special education
certificated instructional staff shall be included as salary under (a) of this
subsection only to the extent that the district's actual average benefit
contribution exceeds the amount of the insurance benefits allocation provided per
certificated instructional staff unit in the state operating appropriations act
in effect at the time the compensation is payable. For purposes of this
section, fringe benefits shall not include payment for unused leave for illness
or injury under RCW 28A.400.210; employer contributions for old age survivors
insurance, workers' compensation, unemployment compensation, and retirement
benefits under the Washington state retirement system; or employer
contributions for health benefits in excess of the insurance benefits
allocation provided per certificated instructional staff unit in the state
operating appropriations act in effect at the time the compensation is
payable. A school district may not use state funds to provide employer
contributions for such excess health benefits.

(c)
Salary and benefits for certificated instructional staff in programs other than
basic education and special education shall be consistent with the salary and
benefits paid to certificated instructional staff in the basic education and
special education programs.

(4)
((Salaries and benefits for certificated instructional staff may exceed the
limitations in subsection (3) of this section only by separate contract for
additional time, additional responsibilities, or incentives. Supplemental
contracts shall not cause the state to incur any present or future funding
obligation. Supplemental contracts shall be subject to the collective
bargaining provisions of chapter 41.59 RCW and the provisions of RCW
28A.405.240, shall not exceed one year, and if not renewed shall not constitute
adverse change in accordance with RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.380. No
district may enter into a supplemental contract under this subsection for the
provision of services which are a part of the basic education program required
by Article IX, section 3 of the state Constitution.

(5)))
Employee benefit plans offered by any district shall comply with RCW
28A.400.350 and 28A.400.275 and 28A.400.280.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
41.59.935 (Construction of chapter‑-Certain agreements
subject to RCW 28A.150.410 and 28A.400.200) and 1997 c 431 s 22, 1990 c 33 s
571, 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 206, & 1981 c 16 s 3 are each repealed.

---
END ---