BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.01 RCW to read as follows:

All
management responsibility, supervision and control, records, leases, contracts,
and other powers and duties for lands held in trust for the use and support of
agricultural colleges are transferred from the commissioner of public lands and
the board of natural resources to the board of regents of Washington State
University.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 79.01 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the powers conferred upon the board of regents of Washington State
University by chapter 28B.30 RCW, the board of regents of Washington State
University has full control of the agricultural college lands held in trust for
the use and support of agricultural colleges including but not limited to:

(1)
The authority to manage, supervise, control, improve, sell, acquire, maintain
records, contract, and lease the land or valuable materials and any
improvements on the land;

(2)
The authority to contract with any private or government entity for the
management, stewardship, sale, and removal or extraction of timber or other
valuable materials;

(3)
Any and all powers and responsibilities given to the commissioner of public
lands or the board of natural resources under this Title for public lands; and

(4) The authority to invest, borrow, contract indebtedness, and
issue bonds from the revenues or proceeds for the sale of the agricultural
college lands.

---
END ---