BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of over‑the‑counter
drugs that have been classified as "generally recognized as safe and
effective for use and not misbranded" by the federal food and drug
administration under 21 C.F.R. Part 330.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of over‑the‑counter
drugs that have been classified as "generally recognized as safe and
effective for use and not misbranded" by the federal food and drug
administration under 21 C.F.R. Part 330.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect October 1, 1999.

---
END ---