BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person may not knowingly trap, take, breed, shelter, tend, feed, or kill a
domestic dog or cat for the purpose of dealing in the raw fur, or products that
include the raw fur, of a domestic dog or cat. A person may not knowingly buy,
sell, barter, or otherwise exchange for profit the raw fur, or products that
include the raw fur, of a domestic dog or cat.

(2)
Nothing in this section is intended to prevent a person or the person's agent
from:

(a)
Killing dogs injuring stock, under RCW 16.08.020;

(b)
Taking into custody or destroying dogs harassing deer or elk, after an
emergency has been declared, under RCW 77.12.315;

(c)
Purchasing, receiving, or reselling raw furs for profit, or dealing in raw furs
for commercial profit, under chapters 77.15 and 77.32 RCW; or

(d)
Having a pet dog or cat stuffed by a licensed taxidermist, practicing taxidermy
for profit, or selling an item produced by a taxidermist, under chapters 77.15
and 77.32 RCW.

(3) The first conviction under this section is a gross misdemeanor
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(2), and by a mandatory fine of not less than
five hundred dollars per pet animal. A second or subsequent conviction under this
section is a class C felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(c), and by a
mandatory fine of not less than one thousand dollars per pet animal.

---
END ---