BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

If the basic rates adopted by the pension funding council pursuant
to RCW 41.45.060 include a zero state or employer contribution rate to a
retirement plan, consistent with the most current actuarial valuation results,
the zero state or employer contribution rate shall be effective July 1st of the
ensuing biennium.

---
END ---