BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to the sale of printed material
distributed through the United States mail at no cost to the recipient. As
proof of exemption, the buyer must provide the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department.

(2)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Printed material" means human-readable information produced on paper
via offset-lithography, letterpress, gravure, or similar processes. It
includes pamphlets, flyers, brochures, catalogs, letters, circulars, and coupon
books.

(b)
"At no cost to the recipient" means the recipient is not charged or
billed for the printed material and/or gives no consideration in exchange for
the printed material.

(c)
"Recipient" is a person, other than the buyer of the printed
material, to whom the printed material is distributed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of printed
material that is distributed through the United States mail at no cost to the
recipient.

(2) The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

---
END ---