BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.165.030 and 1990 c 33 s 148 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 28A.165.010 through 28A.165.090.

(1)
"Basic skills" means reading, mathematics, and language arts as well
as readiness activities associated with such skills.

(2)
"Placement testing" means the administration of objective measures by
a school district for the purposes of diagnosing the basic skills achievement
levels, determining the basic skills areas of greatest need, and establishing
the learning assistance needs of individual students in conformance with
instructions established by the superintendent of public instruction for such
purposes.

(3)
"Approved program" means a program conducted pursuant to a plan
submitted by a district and approved by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.165.040.

(4)
"Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through grade
((nine)) eleven who scores below grade level in basic skills, as
determined by placement testing, and who is identified under RCW 28A.165.050 to
receive additional services or support under an approved program.

(5) "Basic skills tests" means state-wide tests at the ((fourth))
third and eighth grade levels established pursuant to RCW 28A.230.190.

---
END ---