BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the
amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year
following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance
with the following:

(1)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied
by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of
the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person who sells, transfers, or is
displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to
a replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an exemption on more
than one residence in any year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the
person to a hospital or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of
exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital
costs;

(2)
The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in
fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the
property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such person
must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in
which he or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each
spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3)
The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of age or older on
December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason
of physical disability: PROVIDED, That any surviving spouse of a person who
was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death shall qualify if
the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets
the requirements of this section;

(4)
Except for veterans of the armed forces of the United States with one
hundred percent service-connected disabilities, the amount that the person
shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be calculated on the basis of
combined disposable income, as defined in RCW 84.36.383. If the person
claiming the exemption was retired for two months or more of the assessment year,
the combined disposable income of such person shall be calculated by
multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of such person
during the months such person was retired by twelve. If the income of the
person claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment
year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, or when other substantial
changes occur in disposable income that are likely to continue for an
indefinite period of time, the combined disposable income of such person shall
be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of
such person after such occurrences by twelve. If it is necessary to estimate
income to comply with this subsection, the assessor may require confirming
documentation of such income prior to May 31 of the year following application;

(5)(a)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less or who is a veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with a one hundred percent
service-connected disability shall be exempt from all excess property
taxes; and

(b)(i)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less but greater than
eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
the greater of forty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation
of his or her residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand dollars of the
valuation of his or her residence; or

(ii)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less or who is a veteran
of the armed forces of the United States with a one hundred percent service-connected
disability shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on the greater
of fifty thousand dollars or sixty percent of the valuation of his or her
residence; and

(6)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less or who is a veteran of
the armed forces of the United States with a one hundred percent
service-connected disability, the valuation of the residence shall be the
assessed value of the residence on the later of January 1, 1995, or January 1st
of the assessment year the person first qualifies under this section. If the
person subsequently fails to qualify under this section only for one year
because of high income, this same valuation shall be used upon requalification.
If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in succession because of
high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the valuation upon
requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment
year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers the exemption
under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the different
residence shall be the assessed value of the different residence on January 1st
of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.

In
no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and
fair value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

This
subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the
year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the
property shall be added to the value otherwise determined under this subsection
at their true and fair value in the year in which they are made.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.383 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly
indicates a different meaning:

(1)
The term "residence" shall mean a single family dwelling unit whether
such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on
which such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre, except that a residence
includes any additional property up to a total of five acres that comprises the
residential parcel if this larger parcel size is required under land use
regulations. The term shall also include a share ownership in a
cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership if the person
claiming exemption can establish that his or her share represents the specific
unit or portion of such structure in which he or she resides. The term shall
also include a single family dwelling situated upon lands the fee of which is
vested in the United States or any instrumentality thereof including an Indian tribe
or in the state of Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
84.04.080 and 84.04.090, such a residence shall be deemed real property.

(2)
The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed
in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and
placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with
sewer, water, or other utilities: PROVIDED, That a mobile home located on land
leased by the owner of the mobile home shall be subject, for tax billing,
payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal property provisions of
chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" shall mean the state department of revenue.

(4)
"Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse,
and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the
assessment year, less amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his
or her spouse during the assessment year for:

(a)
Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws
of this state or another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; ((and))

(b)
The treatment or care of either person received in the home or in a nursing
home; and

(c)
Health care insurance of either person, including any deduction for medicare
under Title XVIII of the social security act.

(5)
"Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the
federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such
subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose
of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not
included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a)
Capital gains, other than ((nonrecognized gain on the sale of a principal
residence under section 1034 of the federal internal revenue code, or))
gain excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal revenue
code to the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b)
Amounts deducted for loss;

(c)
Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(d)
Pension and annuity receipts;

(e)
Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f)
Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments and
benefits for disabilities related to the performance of military duties;

(g)
Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h)
Dividend receipts; and

(i)
Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(6) "Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person
claiming the exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

---
END ---