BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1998
c 346 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 8,602,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((9,390,000))

14,538,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 34,314,000

General
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 238,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account Appropriation. $ 3,000,000

Enhanced
911 Account Appropriation............. $ 26,782,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State Appropriation. $ ((25,487,000))

29,810,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-Federal Appropriation $ ((110,812,000))

139,285,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((218,625,000))

256,569,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$365,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
(($1,145,000)) $5,468,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999, $3,000,000 of the flood control assistance
account appropriation, and $6,197,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for deposit in the disaster response account
to cover costs pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
(($25,122,000)) $27,996,000 of the disaster response
account--state appropriation is provided ((solely)) for the state share
of response and recovery costs associated with federal emergency management
agency (FEMA) disaster number 1079 (November/December 1995 storms), FEMA
disaster 1100 (February 1996 floods), FEMA disaster 1152 (November 1996 ice
storm), FEMA disaster 1159 (December 1996 holiday storm), FEMA disaster 1172
(March 1997 floods), FEMA disaster 1252 (1998 northeast counties floods),
FEMA disaster 1255 (1998 Kelso landslide), or the state share of response and
recovery costs associated with FEMA declared disasters occurring between
February 1, 1999, and June 30, 1999, and to assist local governmental
entities with the matching funds necessary to earn FEMA funds for FEMA disaster
1100 (February 1996 floods). (($356,000)) $1,805,000 of the
disaster response account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
fire mobilization costs. $9,000 of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with FEMA disaster 1182
(Pend Oreille county 1997 spring flood). The military department may, upon
approval of the director of the office of financial management, use portions of
the disaster response account‑-state appropriation to offset costs of new
disasters occurring before June 30, 1999.

(3)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of a conditional scholarship program
pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4)
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5)
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$72,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for emergency worker claims pursuant to chapter 38.52 RCW.

(6)
$825,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for reimbursement of costs associated with activation of the
Washington national guard for preserving the peace at the July 1998 Makah days
celebration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of six million three hundred ninety thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 1999, to the department of natural resources for emergency fire
suppression activities during the 1998 wildfire season.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---