BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The
sum of two million dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30,
1999, from the general fund to the fair fund for purposes set forth under RCW
15.76.115.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---