BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
fifty-fifth legislature appropriated over two hundred seventy-five million
dollars to the state board of education to finance school construction and
modernization projects for the 1997-99 biennium with the intent of fully
funding the state's share of such school construction projects. The total
amount of state financial assistance requested by local school districts and
approved by the state board of education for the biennium is in excess of the
money appropriated. It is the intent of the legislature to provide a
supplemental appropriation to provide sufficient money to fund all of the
school construction and modernization projects approved by the state board of
education for the 1997-99 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of thirteen million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars is appropriated
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the general fund to the common
school construction account. The sum of thirteen million seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the common school construction
account to the state board of education for public school construction and
modernization projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---