BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1998
c 346 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in
this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be
allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in subsection (3) of this section, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of
this section.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and
spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in
this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state
moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys
shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys"
includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be
spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state
funds.

(3)(a)
The appropriations to the department of social and health services in chapters
149 and 454, Laws of 1997, as amended, shall be expended for the programs and
in the amounts specified therein. However, after May 1, 1998, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state
appropriations for fiscal year 1998 among programs after approval by the
director of financial management. ((However, the department shall not
transfer general fund‑-state appropriations from the economic services
program for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium.))

(b)
After May 1, 1999, after approval by the director of financial management
and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
moneys among programs, including federal moneys that are provided solely for a
specified purpose. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided
in (d) of this subsection.

(c)
To the extent that the transfer of appropriations under ((subsection))
(a) of this subsection is insufficient to fund actual expenditures in
fiscal year 1998 in the medical assistance program that exceed the expenditures
projected in the November 1997 medical assistance caseload forecast, the
department may transfer general fund appropriations, not to exceed five million
dollars, within the medical assistance program from fiscal year 1999 into
fiscal year 1998.

(((c)))
(d) To the extent that transfers under (b) of this subsection are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 1999 caseload
forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical assistance, long-term
care, foster care, adoption support, and child support programs, the department
may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose
after approval by the director of financial management.

(e)
The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior to
approving any allotment modifications.

Sec.
2. 1998
c 346 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

The
appropriations to the department of corrections in chapter 454, Laws of 1997,
as amended, shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified
therein. However, after April 1, ((1998)) 1999, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state
appropriations for fiscal year ((1998)) 1999 between the
institutional services and community corrections programs after approval by the
director of financial management. The director of financial management shall
notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of
representatives in writing prior to approving any deviations from appropriation
levels.

(1)
ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 13,926,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 13,910,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 28,336,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$187,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $155,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5759 (risk classification). If
the bill is not enacted by July 1, 1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(b)
$500,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for a feasibility study regarding the replacement of the
department's offender based tracking system. This appropriation is conditioned
on the department satisfying the requirements of section 902, chapter 149, Laws
of 1997.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 289,665,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 303,830,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 18,097,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Rebate Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 673,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,614,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 613,879,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the
Washington corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that
provided in the 1995-97 biennium.

(b)
$3,978,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$5,381,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the criminal justice costs associated with the
implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (revising the
juvenile code). If Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(c)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of offenders.

(d)
$296,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $297,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted education
providers. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be used
primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct, front-line
service delivery.

(e)
The department may expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered
into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local jails. If any funds are
generated in excess of actual costs, they shall be deposited in the state
general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed revenue generated by such
agreements and shall be treated as recovery of costs.

(f)
$70,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6139 (amphetamine
crimes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(g)
$36,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1172 (sex offender
registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h)
$8,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2628 (methamphetamine
manufacture). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 88,830,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 90,670,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 179,500,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$27,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $185,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
criminal justice costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute
House Bill No. 3900 (revising the juvenile code). If Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(b)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(c)
$467,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $505,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
increase payment rates for contracted education providers and contracted work
release facilities. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be
used primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct,
front-line service delivery.

(d)
$45,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5760
(mentally ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e)
$609,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1998 appropriation
and $226,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999
appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with allowing community
corrections officers to carry firearms.

(4)
CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 4,055,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ 4,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,222,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$100,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for transfer to
the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts provided only for
administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and technical assistance
associated with advising cities and counties in developing, promoting, and
implementing consistent, safe, and efficient offender work programs.

(b)
$50,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $50,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
correctional industries board of directors to hire one staff person,
responsible directly to the board, to assist the board in fulfilling its
duties.

(5)
INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 6,851,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 6,538,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 13,389,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---