BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Bomb" means any device containing an explosive substance and capable
of being exploded. "Bomb" does not include fireworks or small arms
ammunition or small arms primers as defined and authorized under state or
federal law.

(2)
"Material" means a picture film or a publication, or any combination
thereof.

(a)
"Picture film" means any film, film or plate negative, film or plate
positive, film designed to be projected on a screen for exhibition, glass
slides or transparencies, either in negative or positive form, designed for
exhibition by projection on a screen, videotape, or any other medium used to
electronically transmit or reproduce images on a screen.

(b)
"Publication" means any book, magazine, article, pamphlet, writing,
printing illustration, picture, sound recording, electronic transmission, or
telephonic communication.

(3)
"Knowledge" means knowledge as defined in RCW 9A.08.010(1)(b).

(4)
"Knowledge of its character" means that the person has knowledge that
the material contains, depicts, or describes instructions about explosive
devices or substances with such specificity and sufficiency that a person using
the information would be able to assemble a bomb and cause it to be detonated.
Such knowledge may be proved by direct or circumstantial evidence, or both.
"Instructions" does not include information clearly and obviously
intended for safety instructional purposes only.

(5)
"Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.

(6)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, or other legal entity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. No
person may with knowledge of its character provide materials about bomb making
in such a way that minors, as part of the invited general public, are able to
access the materials. However, a person is deemed not to have provided access
to materials about bomb making to minors if:

(1)
The materials about bomb making are kept in an area that is not accessible to
minors without the consent of the minor's parent or guardian; or

(2)
In the case of an operator who transmits materials about bomb making via cable
television transmissions, the operator first notifies the subscriber of the
availability of a device that allows a subscriber to prohibit access to the
viewing of a particular cable transmission; or

(3)
In the case of a person who provides a minor with access to a computer
containing material about bomb making that is stored locally, or that can be
connected to the internet, the computer is equipped with specialized filtering
software actively installed for the purpose of protecting minors from accessing
materials about bomb making; or

(4)
In the case of a person publishing a world wide web page containing materials
about bomb making, the web page contains codes or hidden comments that trigger
the blocking mechanisms of any browser-filtering software that is designed for
the purpose of protecting minors from accessing materials about bomb making; or

(5)
In the case of a person hosting or mirroring internet content on servers
located within the state of Washington, the person mandates the inclusion in
all web pages of codes or hidden comments that trigger the blocking mechanisms
of any browser-filtering software that is designed for the purpose of
protecting minors from accessing materials about bomb making; or

(6)
In the case of a person providing electronic communications or
telecommunications access or connection to or from a facility, system, or
network, whether one-way or interactive, including transmission, downloading,
storage, navigational tools, and related capabilities that are incidental to
the provision of the electronic communications or telecommunications access or
connection, the person mandates the inclusion in all web pages of codes or
hidden comments that trigger the blocking mechanisms of any browser-filtering
software that is designed for the purpose of protecting minors from accessing
materials about bomb making, or to sell, furnish, present, distribute, allow to
view or hear, or otherwise disseminate to a minor, with or without
consideration, any materials about bomb making.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. In
any prosecution for violation of section 2 of this act, it is an affirmative
defense that:

(1)
The materials about bomb making were displayed or otherwise disseminated to a
minor by the minor's parent or legal guardian, for a bona fide purpose; or

(2)
The person made a reasonable good faith attempt to ascertain the true age of
the minor by requiring production of a driver's license, marriage license,
birth certificate, or other governmental or educational identification card or
paper, or copy thereof if supplied by mail or electronic facsimile when
in-person production thereof is impractical, and not relying solely on the oral
allegations or apparent age of the minor; or

(3)
If engaged in the commercial distribution of materials about bomb making by
electronic or telephonic transmission, access by persons under eighteen years
of age is restricted by requiring use of a verified credit card, debit account,
adult access code, or adult personal identification number before transmission
of the material.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
person who is convicted of violating section 2 of this act is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

(2)
Each day that a violation of section 2 of this act occurs or continues is a
separate offense and is punishable as a separate violation.

(3)
Every act, thing, or transaction prohibited by section 2 of this act is a
separate offense as to each item involved and is punishable as such.

(4)
For the purpose of this section, multiple copies of the same identical item, or
other such identical materials are a single offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Any person who is injured by a bomb, any person who is a parent, guardian, or
sibling of a person who has been injured or killed by a bomb, and the estate of
a person who has been killed by a bomb has a cause of action against:

(a)
Any person who committed a violation of section 2 of this act and as a result
of the violation the person was injured or killed; and

(b)
Any parent or guardian of a minor who knew that a minor under his or her
control possessed a bomb without the parent's or guardian's consent or not for
a bona fide purpose, or who reasonably should have known that a minor under his
or her control possessed a bomb for other than a bona fide purpose, and who
failed to ensure the bomb was disposed of in a lawful manner, and as a result
of the failure the person was injured or killed.

(2)
In such an action, in addition to damages for medical, hospital, medication
expenses, and loss of services and support, damages may be recovered for pain
and suffering and the loss of love and companionship of the person in such
amount as, under all the circumstances of the case, may be just.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 9 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---