BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Annuity issuer" means an insurer that has issued any insurance
contract used to fund periodic payments under a structured settlement;

(2)
"Interested parties" means, with respect to any structured
settlement, the payee, any beneficiary irrevocably designated in the structured
settlement to receive payments after the payee's death, the annuity issuer, and
the structured settlement obligor;

(3)
"Payee" means an individual who is receiving payments under a
structured settlement;

(4)
"Structured settlement" means an arrangement for periodic payment of
damages established by settlement or judgment in resolution of a tort claim or
for periodic payments in settlement of a worker's compensation claim;

(5)
"Structured settlement agreement" means the agreement, judgment,
stipulation, or release embodying the terms of a structured settlement,
including the rights of the payee to receive periodic payments;

(6)
"Structured settlement obligor" means, with respect to any structured
settlement, the party that has the continuing periodic payment obligation to
the payee under a structured settlement agreement or under an agreement
providing for qualified assignment within the meaning of section 130 of the
internal revenue code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue
code of the United States, as amended;

(7)
"Structured settlement payment rights" means the right to receive
periodic payments, including lump sum payments, under a structured settlement,
whether from the settlement obligor, annuity issuer, or any other person;

(8)
"Transfer" means sale, assignment, or other conveyance of structured
settlement payment rights by a payee to a third party for consideration;

(9)
"Transfer agreement" means the agreement providing for transfer of
structured settlement payment rights from a payee to a transferee;

(10)
"Transferee" means any person receiving structured settlement payment
rights resulting from a transfer;

(11)
"Applicable laws" means the federal laws of the United States and the
laws of the state of Washington;

(12)
"Third party" means any person or entity other than a structured
settlement obligor or annuity issuer; and

(13)
"Future value" means the total amount of any and all periodic
payments to be made pursuant to a structured settlement that are unpaid as of
the effective date of the transfer agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
CONDITIONS. (1) No structured settlement agreement or transfer of structured
settlement payment rights shall be effective unless all of the provisions in
this section are satisfied.

(2)
Prior to or contemporaneous with the date on which the payee executes a
structured settlement agreement, or in the case of a transfer, prior to or
contemporaneous with the date on which the payee executes a transfer agreement,
the payee must have been provided with a disclosure statement, in bold type, no
smaller than 14 points, setting forth the following:

(a)
The amounts and due dates of all payments due under the structured settlement
agreement or, in the case of a transfer, the amount and due dates of all
structured settlement payments to be transferred;

(b)
The aggregate amount of all payments due under the structured settlement
agreement or, in the case of a transfer, the aggregate amount of all structured
settlement payments to be transferred;

(c)
The discounted present value of all payments due under the structured
settlement agreement or, in the case of a transfer, the discounted present
value of all structured settlement payments to be transferred and the discount
rate used in determining such discounted present value;

(d)
The gross amount payable to the structured settlement obligor and the annuity
issuer in return for their agreement to make the payments due under the
structured settlement agreement to the payee or, in the case of a transfer, the
gross amount payable to the payee in exchange for the structured settlement
payments to be transferred;

(e)
The gross amount of all brokers' commissions, rebates, service charges,
application or processing fees, closing costs, filing or administrative
charges, legal fees, notary fees and other commissions, fees, costs, expenses,
and charges related to the structured settlement agreement or, in the case of a
transfer, payable by the payee or deductible from the gross amount otherwise
payable to the payee in connection with the transfer; and

(f)
In the case of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights, the net
amount payable to the payee after the deduction of all commissions, fees,
costs, expenses, and charges described in (e) of this subsection.

(3)
The payee must be represented by independent legal counsel in connection with
the structured settlement or transfer.

(4)
In the case of a transfer only, the payee and/or the transferee shall provide
the following proper notification to all interested parties at least fourteen
days prior to the anticipated closing date of the transfer:

(a)
Written notice of the transfer, including the anticipated closing date;

(b)
A copy of the disclosure statement required by subsection (2) of this section;
and

(c)
The name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the transferee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. RIGHT
OF RESCISSION. Any payee who enters into a structured settlement or structured
settlement transfer agreement shall have an absolute, irrevocable, and
nonwaivable five-day right of rescission. During the five-day rescission
period, the payee may rescind and cancel the structured settlement or the
structured settlement transfer agreement without penalty or further obligation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
APPLICABILITY, NONWAIVER. (1) This chapter applies to any structured
settlement and any transfer of structured settlement payment rights involving a
payee domiciled in this state. The provisions of this chapter may not be
waived.

(2)
This chapter applies to any structured settlement or transfer of structured
settlement payment rights executed on or after the effective date of this act.
This chapter does not impair, limit, effect, or otherwise apply to any
structured settlement or transfer agreement executed prior to the effective
date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 48 RCW.

---
END ---