BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.68.010 and 1993 c 492 s 233 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation or association, whether
organized as a cooperative, or for profit or nonprofit, to pay, or offer to pay
or allow, directly or indirectly, to any person licensed by the state of
Washington to engage in the practice of medicine and surgery, drugless
treatment in any form, dentistry, or pharmacy and it shall be unlawful for such
person to request, receive or allow, directly or indirectly, a rebate, refund,
commission, unearned discount or profit by means of a credit or other valuable
consideration in connection with the referral of patients to any person, firm,
corporation or association, or in connection with the furnishings of medical,
surgical or dental care, diagnosis, treatment or service, on the sale, rental,
furnishing or supplying of clinical laboratory supplies or services of any
kind, drugs, medication, or medical supplies, or any other goods, services or
supplies prescribed for medical diagnosis, care or treatment. Ownership of a
financial interest in any firm, corporation or association which furnishes any
kind of clinical laboratory, kidney dialysis services, or other services
prescribed for medical, surgical, or dental diagnosis shall not be prohibited
under this section where (1) the referring practitioner affirmatively discloses
to the patient in writing, the fact that such practitioner has a financial
interest in such firm, corporation, or association; and (2) the referring
practitioner provides the patient with a list of effective alternative
facilities, informs the patient that he or she has the option to use one of the
alternative facilities, and assures the patient that he or she will not be
treated differently by the referring practitioner if the patient chooses one of
the alternative facilities.

Any
person violating the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.68.030 and 1965 ex.s. c 58 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the exceptions in RCW 19.68.010, the license of
any person so licensed may be revoked or suspended if he has directly or
indirectly requested, received or participated in the division, transference,
assignment, rebate, splitting or refunding of a fee for, or has directly or
indirectly requested, received or profited by means of a credit or other
valuable consideration as a commission, discount or gratuity in connection with
the furnishing of medical, surgical or dental care, diagnosis or treatment or
service, including x-ray examination and treatment, or for or in connection
with the sale, rental, supplying or furnishing of clinical laboratory service
or supplies, x-ray services or supplies, inhalation therapy service or
equipment, ambulance service, hospital or medical supplies, physiotherapy or
other therapeutic service or equipment, artificial limbs, teeth or eyes,
orthopedic or surgical appliances or supplies, optical appliances, supplies or
equipment, devices for aid of hearing, drugs, medication or medical supplies or
any other goods, services or supplies prescribed for medical diagnosis, care or
treatment, except payment, not to exceed thirty-three and one-third percent of
any fee received for x-ray examination, diagnosis or treatment, to any hospital
furnishing facilities for such examination, diagnosis or treatment.

---
END ---