BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.131.381 and 1994 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
linked deposit program shall be terminated on June 30, ((2000)) 2004,
as provided in RCW 43.131.382.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.131.382 and 1994 c 126 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective June 30, ((2001)) 2005:

(1)
RCW 43.86A.060 and 1993 c 512 s 30;

(2)
RCW 43.63A.690 and 1993 c 512 s 31; and

(3) RCW 43.86A.070 and 1993 c 512 s 34.

---
END ---