BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
c ... (ESSB 5180) s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,268,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 7,240,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,091,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,950,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,057,000

Electrical
License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,055,000

Farm
Labor Revolving Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,211,000

Public
Works Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,996,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 167,736,000

Accident
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 9,112,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 170,197,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 1,592,000

Plumbing
Certificate Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 971,000

Pressure
Systems Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 420,671,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims
compensation program within the public safety and education account funds
appropriated in this section. In the event that cost containment measures are
necessary, the department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b)
develop preferred provider and managed care contracts; (c) coordinate with the
department of social and health services to use the public safety and education
account as matching funds for federal Title XIX reimbursement, to the extent
this maximizes total funds available for services to crime victims.

(2)
$123,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $22,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5597 (needle stick protection). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$302,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $302,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5439 (false claims). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$709,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $709,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5580 (payments during appeals). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$481,000 of the medical aid account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470
(chemically related illnesses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$5,000,000 of the medical aid account--state appropriation is provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 2232 (occupational safety and
health grants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---