BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to part V, chapter 309, Laws of 1999 (uncodified) to read
as follows:

For
purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent student in
state basic education appropriations provided under chapter 309, Laws of 1999,
including appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 4.0 percent from
the 1998-99 school year to the 1999-00 school year, and 3.4 percent from the
1999-00 school year to the 2000-01 school year.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---