BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.13.010 and 1994 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All state, county, city, town, and district general elections for the election
of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county, city, town, district, and
precinct officers, and for the submission to the voters of the state, county,
city, town, or district of any measure for their adoption and approval or
rejection, shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of
November, in the year in which they may be called. A state-wide general
election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November
of each year: PROVIDED, That the state-wide general election held in
odd-numbered years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29.13.020, or as otherwise provided by law;
(b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any unexpired terms
in the membership of either branch of the congress of the United States; (c)
the election of state and county officers for the remainder of any unexpired
terms of offices created by or whose duties are described in Article II,
section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article
IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the
election of county officers in any county governed by a charter containing
provisions calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the
approval or rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional
amendments, matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional convention,
initiative measures and referendum measures proposed by the electorate,
referendum bills, and any other matter provided by the legislature for
submission to the electorate.

(2)
A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to exist, call a
special county election by presenting a resolution to the county auditor at
least forty-five days prior to the proposed election date. Except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, a special election called by the county legislative
authority shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by such
governing body:

(a)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;

(b)
The second Tuesday in March;

(c)
The fourth Tuesday in April;

(d)
The third Tuesday in May;

(e)
The day of the primary as specified by RCW 29.13.070; or

(f)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3)
In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this
section, a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or
other act of God. Such county special election shall be noticed and conducted
in the manner provided by law.

(4)
In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference primary is
conducted ((in February, March, April, or May)) under chapter 29.19 RCW,
((the date on which)) a county legislative authority may call a
special election ((may be called by the county legislative authority))
under subsection (2) of this section ((during the month of that primary is))
only on the date of the presidential preference primary or on
another date specified under subsection (2) of this section that is twenty-one
or more days from the date of the presidential preference primary.

(5)
This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes,
whether general or special in nature, having different dates for such city,
town, and district elections, the purpose of this section being to establish
mandatory dates for holding elections except for those elections held pursuant
to a home-rule charter adopted under Article XI, section 4 of the state
Constitution. This section shall not be construed as fixing the time for
holding primary elections, or elections for the recall of any elective public
officer.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.13.020 and 1994 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All city, town, and district general elections shall be held throughout the state
of Washington on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November in
the odd-numbered years.

This
section shall not apply to:

(a)
Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;

(b)
Public utility districts or district elections at which the ownership of
property within those districts is a prerequisite to voting, all of which
elections shall be held at the times prescribed in the laws specifically
applicable thereto;

(c)
Consolidation proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.315 RCW ((28A.315.280))
and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW.

(2)
The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon request in the
form of a resolution of the governing body of a city, town, or district, presented
to the auditor at least forty-five days prior to the proposed election date,
may, if the county auditor deems an emergency to exist, call a special election
in such city, town, or district, and for the purpose of such special election
he or she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, such a special election shall be held on one of
the following dates as decided by the governing body:

(a)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;

(b)
The second Tuesday in March;

(c)
The fourth Tuesday in April;

(d)
The third Tuesday in May;

(e)
The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29.13.070; or

(f)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3)
In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference primary is
conducted ((in February, March, April, or May)) under chapter 29.19 RCW,
((the date on which)) a county auditor may call a special
election ((may be called)) under subsection (2) of this section ((during
the month of that primary is)) only on the date of the presidential preference
primary or on another date specified under subsection (2) of this section if
the date is twenty-one or more days from the date of the presidential preference
primary.

(4)
In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section, a special
election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be called at any time to
meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God,
except that no special election may be held between the first day for
candidates to file for public office and the last day to certify the returns of
the general election other than as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of
this section. Such special election shall be conducted and notice thereof
given in the manner provided by law.

(5)
This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes,
whether general or special in nature, having different dates for such city,
town, and district elections, the purpose of this section being to establish
mandatory dates for holding elections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. For
the year 2000 only, in addition to having special elections that may be held on
the date of the presidential preference primary, as well as on the normal
special election dates in April, May, September, and November as provided under
RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020, one other special election may be held in the
months of February or March as provided in this section. By December 1, 1999,
each county auditor shall determine whether this additional special election
date may be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in February or on
the third Tuesday in March, in 2000. If a school district is located in more than
one county, this additional special election date must be the same in each
county in which the school district is located. The secretary of state shall
be the final arbitrator, if the county auditors of counties in which such a
school district is located cannot agree on a common date for the additional
special election, and shall determine the date of the additional special
election in those counties by December 15, 1999.

This section expires July 1, 2000.

---
END ---