BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
implementation of the shoreline management act through shoreline master
programs requires a full integration with the necessary habitat protection
measures for threatened and endangered species. The inclusion of specie
protection requirements are not fully defined until the development and approval
of species recovery plans for each federally listed threatened or endangered
species listed under the endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.).

The
shoreline master program guidelines rule, adopted under RCW 90.58.060, shall be
consistent with the habitat protection elements necessary for the recovery of
listed species as defined in the federally developed recovery plans for each
listed evolutionarily significant unit. However, the guidelines may not be
used as the states' enforcement tool to require compliance with any federal
law. Recovery plans for each listed species may vary markedly due to
scientific findings that apply to each species' biological needs and limiting
factors. These variations in biological requirements necessary for the
recovery of each individual specie shall be incorporated into shoreline master
programs through the review and approval of the shoreline master program by the
independent science panel established under RCW 75.46.050.

Premature
adoption of shoreline master program guidelines or alterations in local
shoreline master programs may cause uncertainty and place unnecessary financial
burdens upon private landowners and city and county governments if changes are
made before an independent science panel review and finalization of federal
recovery plans, thus necessitating a number of major plan revisions within a
short period of time, all occurring before vital scientific review has been
accomplished at the state and federal level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall suspend the adoption of shoreline master program guidelines
until such time as federal salmon recovery plans are finalized for each
threatened or endangered species listed under the endangered species act (16
U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.). Only upon completion and approval of a federal
specie recovery plan shall a city or county incorporate those findings into a
new shoreline master program for the geographic area covered by federal
listing.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after the
adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program for
regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the required
elements of the guidelines adopted by the department.

If
amendments to shoreline master programs are identified as high priority
limiting factors, as defined in RCW 75.46.010, for salmon recovery, review and
revision for compliance with guidelines adopted subsequent to May 1999 shall
occur within thirty-six months. However, if a city or a county is located in a
rural natural resources impact area, as defined in RCW 43.160.020, amendments
to its shoreline master program shall not be required unless the provisions in
the current shoreline master program have been found to be inadequate according
to peer review by the independent science panel created by RCW 75.46.050.
Further, if amendments to shoreline master programs are identified as high
priority limiting factors, as defined in RCW 75.46.010, for salmon recovery,
review and revision for compliance with guidelines adopted subsequent to May
1999 shall occur within thirty-six months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall submit each draft revised shoreline master program to the independent
science panel authorized under RCW 75.46.050 for purposes of review, comment,
and approval. The department shall not approve a shoreline master program
unless the independent science panel has approved it in its entirety. The
independent science panel must certify that the program is the best scientific
methodology that will lead to specie recovery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
independent science panel created in RCW 75.46.050, in cooperation with the
Washington association of counties and the Washington association of cities,
shall report annually to the legislature concerning the effects of this chapter
and chapter 36.70A RCW on the recovery of endangered species.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The
growth management hearings boards created in RCW 36.70A.250, working in
cooperation with the association of Washington counties and the association of
Washington cities, shall report to the legislature annually concerning local
actions to integrate the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW, and the
growth management provisions of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department of ecology shall hold a public hearing on the draft shoreline
management rules filed with the code reviser's office on April 7, 1999, in any
county where the county legislative authority requests such a hearing, prior to
December 31, 1999. The legislature shall review the rules and their impact
during the 2000 regular session and make any necessary changes in law. The
department of ecology shall delay implementation of the rules as provided in
section 2 of this act.

Sec.
8. RCW
90.58.060 and 1995 c 347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall periodically review and adopt guidelines consistent with
RCW 90.58.020, containing the elements specified in RCW 90.58.100 for:

(a)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of
state-wide significance.

(2)
Before adopting or amending guidelines under this section, the department shall
provide an opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a)
The department shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and
federally recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a
copy, and shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state
register. Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within
sixty days from the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b)
The department shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in
different locations throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity
for residents in all parts of the state to present statements and views on the
proposed guidelines. Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once in
each of the three weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more
newspapers of general circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment
to the guidelines addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number
and location of hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this
subsection to assure all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the
proposed amendment. The department shall accept written comments on the
proposal during the sixty-day public comment period and for seven days after
the final public hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the public comment period, the department shall review the
comments received and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of
this chapter. The proposal shall then be published for adoption pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3)
The department may propose amendments to the guidelines not more than once each
year. At least once every five years the department shall conduct a review of
the guidelines pursuant to the procedures outlined in subsection (2) of this
section.

(4)
This section is subject to the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of
1999 (this act).

Sec.
9. RCW
36.70A.480 and 1995 c 347 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For shorelines of the state, the goals and policies of the shoreline management
act as set forth in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one of the goals of this chapter
as set forth in RCW 36.70A.020. The goals and policies of a shoreline master
program for a county or city approved under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be
considered an element of the county or city's comprehensive plan. The goals
and policies of a shoreline master program for a county or a city approved
under chapter 90.58 RCW after April 7, 1999, shall be considered an element of
the county or city's comprehensive plan only after a scientific review of the
shoreline master program conducted by the independent science panel in RCW
75.46.050. All other portions of the shoreline master program for a county
or city adopted under chapter 90.58 RCW, including use regulations, shall be
considered a part of the county or city's development regulations.

(2)
The shoreline master program shall be adopted pursuant to the procedures of
chapter 90.58 RCW rather than the procedures set forth in this chapter for the
adoption of a comprehensive plan or development regulations.

Sec.
10. RCW
75.46.050 and 1998 c 246 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governor shall request the national academy of sciences, the American
fisheries society, or a comparable institution to screen candidates to serve as
members on the independent science panel. The institution that conducts the
screening of the candidates shall submit a list of the nine most qualified
candidates to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
the majority leader of the senate. The candidates shall reflect expertise in
habitat requirements of salmon, protection and restoration of salmon populations,
artificial propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.

(2)
The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority leader in the
senate shall each remove one name from the nomination list. The governor shall
consult with tribal representatives and the governor shall appoint five
scientists from the remaining names on the nomination list.

(3)
The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. The
independent science panel members shall elect the chair of the panel among
themselves every two years. The members of the independent science panel shall
be compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
The independent science panel shall be governed by generally accepted
guidelines and practices governing the activities of independent science boards
such as the national academy of sciences. The purpose of the independent
science panel is to help ensure that sound science is used in salmon recovery
efforts. The governor's salmon recovery office shall request review of salmon
recovery plans by the science review panel. The science review panel does not
have the authority to review individual projects or project lists developed
under RCW 75.46.060, 75.46.070, and 75.46.080 or to make policy decisions.

(5)
The independent science panel shall act as the peer review panel for state
shorelines master program guideline rules adopted under RCW 90.58.060, and all
local shoreline master programs and growth management plans that would affect
endangered species.

(6) The independent science panel shall submit its findings
to the legislature and the governor.

---
END ---