BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
sum of four million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of public instruction
for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, for:

(1)
Alternative school start-up grants which are in addition to the grants funded
in the two million dollars alternative school start-up appropriation contained
in section 501(2)(l), chapter 309, Laws of 1999, and these grants shall be
awarded in the same manner and for the same purposes;

(2)
School safety programs for prevention and intervention. School districts may
apply for and administer these grants independently or jointly with other
school districts or educational service districts. The funds may be expended
for proven-effective programs to improve safety in schools, including:
Security assessments of school facilities; violence prevention and reporting
training for staff as appropriate to the particular duties and responsibilities
of the specific staff, including administrators; nonviolence and leadership
training for staff and students; and school safety plans. The educational
service districts and school districts may contract for any services under this
subsection.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the education committees
of the house of representatives and senate on the number and types of programs
administered through these grants by February 15, 2001, and February 15th of
every two years thereafter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2001, the sum of two million five hundred
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from
the general fund--state and the sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the public safety and
education account to the superintendent of public instruction for matching
grants to enhance security in schools. These appropriations are a supplement
to the five million nine hundred twenty-three thousand dollar appropriation for
school security contained in section 501(2)(e), chapter 309, Laws of 1999, and
shall be expended in the same manner and for the same purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
biennial appropriations in this act shall be allotted by the office of
financial management evenly between fiscal year 2000 and fiscal year 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---