BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall not issue any permits allowing surface mining,
or the reclamation of surface mine tailings which are authorized solely under
the authority of the federal mining law of 1872, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 22-39.

---
END ---