BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that manufactured homes and mobile homes provide a source of
affordable housing for many residents in the state of Washington. The
legislature further finds that many mobile home park residents are facing
development pressures where mobile home park owners are converting their mobile
home parks to other uses. The legislature further finds that closure of these
mobile home parks causes the displacement of mobile home residents, many of
which are senior citizens.

It
is the intent of the legislature to establish incentives designed to preserve
existing mobile home parks and to assist in the development of additional
mobile home parks by nonprofit organizations and for-profit corporations.

PART I‑‑Department
Technical Assistance

Sec.
2. RCW
59.22.039 and 1993 c 66 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may provide technical assistance to resident organizations who
wish to convert the mobile home park in which they reside to resident
ownership. Technical assistance does not include details connected with the
sale or conversion of a mobile home park which would require the department to
act in a representative capacity, or the drafting of documents affecting legal
or property rights of the parties by the department.

(2)
The department may provide technical assistance to nonprofit organizations to
assist in the development of new mobile home parks. Technical assistance does
not include details connected with the acquisition of property which would
require the department to act in a representative capacity, or the drafting of
documents affecting legal or property rights of the parties by the department.

PART II‑‑Consumer
Protection Application

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 59.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW. Civil actions against a party for violations under chapter 19.86
RCW may only be instituted by the office of the attorney general.

PART III‑‑Land
Development Regulations

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

Each
city that plans and zones under this chapter must, not later than December 31,
2000, adopt an ordinance providing that no project permit may be issued for
converting a mobile home park to another use until all mobile homes in the park
have been relocated to other locations or demolished. For purposes of this
section, the term "mobile home park" has the meaning set forth in RCW
59.20.030 and the term "project permit" has the meaning set forth in
RCW 36.70B.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

Each
code city that plans and zones under this chapter must, not later than December
31, 2000, adopt an ordinance providing that no project permit may be issued for
converting a mobile home park to another use until all mobile homes in the park
have been relocated to other locations or demolished. For purposes of this
section, the term "mobile home park" has the meaning set forth in RCW
59.20.030 and the term "project permit" has the meaning set forth in
RCW 36.70B.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

Each
county planning under this chapter must, not later than December 31, 2000,
incorporate in their development regulations, zoning regulations, or official
controls a requirement that no project permit may be issued for converting a
mobile home park to another use until all mobile homes in the park have been
relocated to other locations or demolished. For purposes of this section, the
term "mobile home park" has the meaning set forth in RCW 59.20.030
and the term "project permit" has the meaning set forth in RCW
36.70B.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70B RCW to read as follows:

No
project permit may be issued for converting a mobile home park to another use
until all mobile homes in the park have been relocated to other locations or
demolished. For purposes of this section, the term "mobile home
park" has the same meaning as set forth in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each city that plans and zones under this chapter must, not later than December
31, 2000, adopt an ordinance or ordinances that:

(a)
Provides for an adequate supply of land that is zoned for the placement of
mobile home parks due to increased demand for mobile home parks or as the
result of the conversion of existing mobile home parks to another use;

(b)
Prohibits a change in the zoning classification of land for the placement of
mobile home parks for a period of at least thirty years after the date a
project permit is issued for the construction of a mobile home park; and

(c)
Provides for an expedited permit process for the development of mobile home
parks.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the term "mobile home park" has the
meaning set forth in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A new
section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each code city that plans and zones under this chapter must, not later than
December 31, 2000, adopt an ordinance or ordinances that:

(a)
Provides for an adequate supply of land that is zoned for the placement of
mobile home parks due to increased demand for mobile home parks or as the
result of the conversion of existing mobile home parks to another use;

(b)
Prohibits a change in the zoning classification of land for the placement of
mobile home parks for a period of at least thirty years after the date a
project permit is issued for the construction of a mobile home park; and

(c)
Provides for an expedited permit process for the development of mobile home
parks.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the term "mobile home park" has the
meaning set forth in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each county that plans and zones under this chapter must, not later than
December 31, 2000, adopt an ordinance or ordinances that:

(a)
Provides for an adequate supply of land that is zoned for the placement of
mobile home parks due to increased demand for mobile home parks or as the
result of the conversion of existing mobile home parks to another use;

(b)
Prohibits a change in the zoning classification of land for the placement of
mobile home parks for a period of at least thirty years after the date a
project permit is issued for the construction of a mobile home park; and

(c)
Provides for an expedited permit process for the development of mobile home
parks.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the term "mobile home park" has the
meaning set forth in RCW 59.20.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW to read as follows:

A
person that develops a mobile home park in response to the closure of an
existing mobile home park with an equal number of mobile home spaces shall not
be required to pay an impact fee under RCW 82.02.050 through 82.02.090 for
public facilities or system improvements. As used in this section,
"mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

PART IV‑‑Mobile
Home Financing

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
legislature recognizes, as provided in Article XI, section 1 of the state
Constitution, that it is the paramount duty of the state to make ample
provision for the education of all children residing in this state. Each year,
the state property tax levy generates considerably less than one-half of the
money that the legislature has appropriated for basic education that year,
which is about one-quarter of the money the legislature has appropriated for
all K-12 education purposes that year. Allowing a diversion of a small portion
of the state property tax levy for purposes provided in section 13 of this act
does not alter or limit the paramount duty of the state to make ample provision
for education of all children residing in the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a county or city may impose a regular property tax
levy upon each eligible improvement within the county or city. The rate of the
levy for each eligible improvement is equal to one hundred percent of the state
equalized levy. The levy for a particular eligible improvement expires after a
period of five years.

(2)
The levy under this section shall be credited against the levy for the state
upon each eligible improvement.

(3)
The revenue from the levy under this section shall: (a) Be used solely for
either mobile home relocation assistance or for the construction of mobile home
parks; and (b) constitute the state's contribution toward either mobile home
relocation assistance costs or mobile home park construction costs.

(4)
The definitions in this subsection apply for the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Eligible improvement" means a building or structure that is
constructed on land where a change of use has occurred;

(b)
"Mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030;

(c)
"State levy rate" means the rate of the state levy adjusted to the
state equalization value under RCW 84.52.065;

(d)
"Change of use" means land where the county or city has issued a
project permit that authorizes the conversion of a mobile home park to another
use;

(e)
"Project permit" has the same meaning as in RCW 36.70B.020.

(5)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall not be included as
part of the calculation under RCW 84.52.043.

PART V‑‑Right
of First Refusal

Sec.
14. RCW
59.23.025 and 1993 c 66 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If notice of a desire to purchase has been given under RCW 59.23.015, a park
owner shall notify the qualified tenant organization that an agreement to
purchase and sell has been reached and the terms of the agreement, including
the availability and terms of seller financing, before closing a sale with any
other person or entity. If, within ((thirty)) ninety days after
the actual notice has been received, the qualified tenant organization tenders
to the park owner an amount equal to two percent of the agreed purchase price,
((refundable only according to this chapter)) which is refundable if
the qualified tenant organization is not able to obtain financing for the
purchase of the mobile home park, together with a fully executed purchase
and sale agreement at least as favorable to the park owner as the original
agreement, the mobile home park owner must sell the mobile home park to the
qualified tenant organization. The tenant organization must then close the
sale on the same terms as outlined in the original agreement between the park
owner and the prospective purchaser. In the case of seller financing, a mobile
home park owner may decline to sell the mobile home park to the qualified
tenant organization if, based on reasonable and objective evidence, to do so
would present a greater financial risk to the seller than would selling on the
same terms to the original offeror.

If
the qualified tenant organization fails to perform under the terms of the
agreement the owner may proceed with the sale to any other party at these
terms. If the park owner thereafter elects to accept an offer at a price lower
than the price specified in the notice, the homeowners will have an additional
ten days to meet the price and terms and conditions of this lower offer by
executing a contract. If the qualified tenant organization fails to perform
following two such opportunities, the park owner shall be free for a period of twenty-four
months to execute a sale of the park to any other party.

A
mobile home park owner who enters into a signed agreement to sell or transfer
the ownership of the mobile home park to a relative or a legal entity composed
of relatives or established for the benefit of relatives of the mobile home
park owner, who signs an agreement stating the intention to maintain the
property as a mobile home park is exempted from the requirements of this
section and RCW 59.23.030.

Sec.
15. RCW
59.23.030 and 1993 c 66 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure
on the part of a mobile home park owner to give notice as required by this
chapter renders a sale of the mobile home park that occurs within ((thirty))
ninety days of the time the qualified tenant organization knows or has
reason to know that a violation of the notice provisions of RCW 59.23.015 has
occurred, voidable upon application to superior court after notice and
hearing. If the court determines that the notice provisions of this chapter
have been violated, the court shall issue an order setting aside the improper
sale. In an action brought under this section, the court shall award the
prevailing party attorneys' fees and costs. For the purposes of this section,
a "prevailing party" includes any third party purchaser who appears
and successfully defends his or her interest.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---