BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
PATIENT RIGHTS. (1) It is the intent of the legislature that
patients covered by health plans receive quality health care designed to
maintain and improve their health. The purpose of chapter . . .,
Laws of 1999 1st sp. sess. (this act) is to ensure that health plan patients:

(a)
Have improved access to information regarding their health plans;

(b)
Have access to a quick and impartial grievance process;

(c)
Are protected from unnecessary invasions of health care privacy;

(d)
Are assured that personal health care information will be used only as
necessary to obtain and pay for health care or to improve the quality of care;
and

(e)
Have access to an emergency health plan.

(2)
Effective January 1, 2000, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 1st sp. sess.
(this act) applies to: Health plans offered, renewed, or issued by a carrier;
medical assistance provided under RCW 74.09.522; the basic health plan offered
under chapter 70.47 RCW; and public employee health benefits provided under
chapter 41.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
HEALTH CARE PROVIDER ACCESS. (1) Each enrollee in a health plan must have
adequate choice among qualified health care providers.

(2)
Each health carrier must allow an enrollee to choose a primary care provider
who is accepting new enrollees from a list of participating providers who
substantially share the varied characteristics of the enrolled population.

(3)
Each health carrier must have a process whereby an enrollee whose medical
condition so warrants may be authorized to use a medical specialist as a
primary care provider. This may include enrollees suffering from chronic
diseases and those with other special needs.

(4)
Each health carrier must provide, upon the request of an enrollee, access by
the enrollee to a second opinion from a participating provider regarding any
medical diagnosis or treatment plan.

(5)
Each health carrier must, at the carrier's expense, allow enrollees to continue
receiving services from a primary care provider whose contract with the plan or
whose contract with a subcontractor is being terminated by the plan or
subcontractor without cause under the terms of that contract for no longer than
sixty days following notice of termination to the enrollees or, in group
coverage arrangements involving periods of open enrollment, only until the end
of the next open enrollment period. The provider's relationship with the
health plan or subcontractor must be continued on the same terms and conditions
as those of the contract the plan or subcontractor is terminating, except for
any provision requiring that the health plan assign new enrollees to the
terminated provider.

(6)
The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section that promote clear
communication with consumers and take into consideration standards recommended
by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
HEALTH INFORMATION PRIVACY. (1) Each carrier must develop and implement
policies and procedures governing the collection, use, and disclosure of health
information. These policies and procedures must include methods for enrollees
to access information about themselves and to amend any information that is
inaccurate, for enrollees to restrict the disclosure of sensitive information
about themselves, and for enrollees to obtain information about the carrier's
health information policies. In addition, these policies and procedures must
include methods for carrier oversight and enforcement of information policies,
for carrier storage and disposal of health information, and for carrier
conformance to state and federal laws governing the collection, use, and disclosure
of personally identifiable health information. Each carrier must provide a
summary notice of its health information policies to enrollees, including the
enrollee's right to restrict the collection, use, and disclosure of their own
health information.

(2)
Except as otherwise required by statute or rule, or a carrier's disclosure made
pursuant to requirements in RCW 70.02.050 and 70.02.900 for health care
providers, a carrier is, and all persons acting at the direction of or on
behalf of a carrier or in receipt of an enrollee's personally identifiable
health information are, prohibited from collecting, using, or disclosing
personally identifiable health information unless authorized in writing by the
person who is the subject of the information. At a minimum, such authorization
must be valid for a limited time and purpose; be specific as to purpose and
types of information to be collected, used, or disclosed; and identify the
persons who will be receiving the information.

(3)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent: (a) The creation, use,
or release of anonymous data that has been coded or encrypted to protect the
identity of the individual; or (b) the release by a carrier of personally
identifiable health information for health research subject to the requirements
of the federal "common rule" at 21 C.F.R. Secs. 50 and 56 and 45
C.F.R. Sec. 46.

(4)
The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section and shall take
into consideration health information privacy standards recommended by the
national association of insurance commissioners and other related professional
organizations.

(5)
The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of chapter 70.02 RCW as they
apply to carriers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
INFORMATION DISCLOSURE. (1) A carrier that offers a health plan may not enroll
a person in a health plan or offer to sell a health plan to an enrollee or to a
group representative, agent, employer, or enrollee representative if that
person is not given the following information before purchase or selection:

(a)
A listing of covered benefits, including prescription drug categories,
definitions of terms such as generic versus brand name, and policies regarding
coverage of drugs, such as how they become approved or are taken off the
formulary, and how consumers may be involved in decisions about benefits;

(b)
A listing of exclusions, reductions, and limitations to covered benefits,
including policies and practices related to any drug formulary, and any definition
of medical necessity or other coverage criteria upon which they may be based;

(c)
A statement of the carrier's policies for protecting the confidentiality of
health information;

(d)
A statement containing the cost of premiums and enrollee point-of-service
cost-sharing requirements;

(e)
A summary explanation of the carrier's grievance process and right to an
independent review as set forth in sections 6 and 7 of this act;

(f)
A statement regarding the availability of a point-of-service option, if any,
and how the option operates; and

(g)
A convenient means of obtaining a list of participating providers, including
disclosure of network arrangements that restrict access to providers within any
plan network.

(2)
Upon the request of any person, including a current enrollee, prospective
enrollee, or the insurance commissioner, a carrier and the Washington state
health care authority, established by chapter 41.05 RCW, in relation to the
uniform medical plan must provide written information regarding any health care
plan it offers, that includes the following written information:

(a)
Any documents, instruments, or other information referred to in the enrollment
agreement;

(b)
A full description of the procedures to be followed by an enrollee for consulting
a provider other than the primary care provider and whether the enrollee's
primary care provider, the carrier's medical director, or another entity must
authorize the referral;

(c)
Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for obtaining prior
authorization for health care services;

(d)
A written description of any reimbursement or payment arrangements, including,
but not limited to, capitation provisions, fee-for-service provisions, and
health care delivery efficiency provisions, between a carrier and a provider or
network;

(e)
An annual accounting of all payments made by the carrier that have been counted
against any payment limitations, visit limitations, or other overall
limitations on a person's coverage under a plan;

(f)
Circumstances under which the plan may retrospectively deny coverage for
emergency and nonemergency care that had prior authorization under the plan's
written policies;

(g)
A copy of the carrier's grievance process claim or service denial and for
dissatisfaction with care; and

(h)
Descriptions and justifications for provider compensation programs, including
any incentives or penalties that are intended to encourage providers to
withhold services or minimize or avoid referrals to specialists.

(3)
Each carrier and the Washington state health care authority shall provide to
all enrollees and prospective enrollees a list of available disclosure items.

(4)
Nothing in this section requires a carrier to divulge proprietary information
to an enrollee.

(5)
No carrier may advertise, market, or present any health plan to the public as a
plan that covers services that help prevent illness or promote the health of
enrollees unless it:

(a)
Provides all clinical preventive health services provided by the basic health
plan, authorized by chapter 70.47 RCW;

(b)
Monitors and reports annually to enrollees on standardized measures of health
care and satisfaction of all enrollees in the health plan as defined by the
state department of health, after consideration of national standardized
measurement systems adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health care services;

(c)
Has a certificate of approved partnership with the state department of health
or a local health jurisdiction, attesting to the plan's active participation in
community-wide efforts to maintain and improve the health status of its
enrollees through activities such as public health educational programs; and

(d)
Makes available upon request to enrollees its integrated plan to identify and
manage the most prevalent diseases within its enrolled population, including
cancer, heart disease, and stroke.

(6)
No carrier may preclude or discourage its providers from informing patients of
the care he or she requires, including various treatment options, and whether
in the providers' view such care is consistent with the plan's health coverage
criteria, or otherwise covered by the patient's service agreement with the
carrier. No carrier may prohibit, discourage, or penalize a provider otherwise
practicing in compliance with the law from advocating on behalf of a patient
with a carrier. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a
provider to bind a carrier to pay for any service.

(7)
No carrier may preclude or discourage patients or those paying for their
coverage from discussing the comparative merits of different carriers with
their providers. This prohibition specifically includes prohibiting or
limiting providers participating in those discussions even if critical of a
carrier.

(8)
The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section that promote clear
communication with consumers and take into consideration standards recommended
by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
GRIEVANCE PROCESS. (1) Each carrier must have a fully operational,
comprehensive grievance process that complies with the requirements of this
section. The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section that
promote clear communication with consumers and take into consideration
standards recommended by national managed care accreditation organizations and
state agencies that purchase managed health care services.

(2)
Each carrier must provide written notice to an enrollee and the enrollee's
provider of its decision to modify, discontinue, or deny a health service for
the enrollee.

(3)
Each carrier must process as a grievance:

(a)
An enrollee's complaint about the quality or availability of a health service;

(b)
An enrollee's complaint about an issue other than the quality or availability
of a health service that the carrier has not resolved within response timelines
established by the commissioner by rule; and

(c)
An enrollee's request that the carrier reconsider: (i) Its decision to modify,
discontinue, or deny a health service; or (ii) its initial resolution of a
complaint or grievance made by an enrollee.

(4)
To process a grievance, each carrier must:

(a)
Provide written notice to the enrollee when the grievance is received;

(b)
Assist the enrollee with the grievance process;

(c)
Expedite a grievance if the enrollee's provider or the carrier's medical
director determines, or if other evidence indicates that following the
grievance process response timelines could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's
health or ability to regain maximum function;

(d)
Cooperate with a representative chosen by the enrollee;

(e)
Consider information submitted by the enrollee;

(f)
Investigate and resolve the grievance; and

(g)
Provide written notice of its resolution of the grievance to the enrollee and,
with the permission of the enrollee, to the enrollee's providers.

(5)
Written notice required by subsections (2) and (4) of this section must
explain:

(a)
The carrier's decision and the supporting coverage or clinical reasons,
including any alternative health service that may be appropriate; and

(b)
The carrier's grievance process, including information, as appropriate, about
how to exercise an enrollee's rights to obtain a second opinion, how to
continue receiving services as provided in this section, and how to discuss a
grievance resolution with an impartial carrier representative authorized to
review and modify the grievance resolution.

(6)
When an enrollee requests that the carrier reconsider its decision to modify or
discontinue a health service that an enrollee is receiving through the plan,
the carrier must continue to provide that health service until the grievance is
resolved. If the resolution affirms the carrier's decision, the enrollee may
be responsible for the cost of this continued health service.

(7)
Each carrier must provide a clear explanation of the grievance process upon
request, upon enrollment to new enrollees, and annually to enrollees and
subcontractors.

(8)
Each carrier must: Track each grievance until final resolution; maintain, and
make accessible to the commissioner for a period of three years, a log of all
grievances; and identify and evaluate trends in grievances.

(9)
No penalty, fine, sanction, or obligation resulting from a grievance may be
imposed on a provider until any related provider complaints filed under RCW
48.43.055 have been adjudicated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF HEALTH CARE DISPUTES. (1) There is a need for a process
for the fair consideration of consumer complaints relating to decisions by the
carrier to modify, discontinue, or deny coverage of or payment for health
care. The commissioner shall adopt rules that:

(a)
Permit a person to seek review of a carrier's decision to modify, discontinue,
or deny a health service by an independent review organization, after the
carrier has completed its grievance procedures and its decision is unfavorable
to the enrollee, or the carrier has exceeded the timelines for grievances
established by the commissioner, without good cause and without reaching a
decision;

(b)
Establish and use a rotational registry system for the assignment of a
certified independent review organization to each appeal;

(c)
Require carriers to provide to the appropriate independent review organization
not later than the third business day after the date the carrier receives a
request for review a copy of:

(i)
Any medical records of the enrollee that are relevant to the review;

(ii)
Any documents used by the plan in making the determination to be reviewed by
the organization;

(iii)
Any documentation and written information submitted to the carrier in support
of the appeal; and

(iv)
A list of each physician or health care provider who has provided care to the
enrollee and who may have medical records relevant to the appeal; and

(d)
Require carriers to comply with the independent review organization's
determination regarding the medical necessity or appropriateness of, or the
application of other health plan coverage criteria to, health care items and
services for an enrollee, and to pay for the independent review.

(2)
Health information or other confidential or proprietary information in the
custody of a carrier may be provided to an independent review organization,
subject to rules adopted by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
INDEPENDENT REVIEW ORGANIZATIONS. (1) The commissioner shall:

(a)
Adopt rules providing a procedure to certify an organization that may contract
to perform independent review of health care disputes described in section 6 of
this act. The organization shall:

(i)
Be formed by health care providers who have demonstrated expertise and a
history of reviewing health care in terms of medical necessity,
appropriateness, and the application to other health plan coverage criterion;

(ii)
Be advised by a consumer advisory board that is broadly representative of the
patient population whose claims are to be reviewed; and

(iii)
Meet other reasonable requirements of the commissioner directly related to the
functions the organization is to perform under section 6 of this act;

(b)
Designate every two years organizations selected in accordance with this
subsection to perform the functions listed in section 6 of this act; and

(c)
Ensure that the organization is free from interference by state government in
its functioning except to ensure that it complies with the certification it has
received from the commissioner and chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 1st
sp. sess. (this act).

(2)
The commissioner must adopt rules to certify organizations described under
subsection (1)(a) of this section. The rules must ensure:

(a)
The confidentiality of medical records transmitted to an independent review
organization for use in independent reviews;

(b)
The qualifications and independence of each health care provider or physician
making review determinations for an independent review organization;

(c)
The fairness of the procedures used by an independent review organization in
making the determinations; and

(d)
Timely notice to enrollees of the results of the independent review, including
the clinical basis for the determination.

(3)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must require that
each independent review organization make its determination:

(a)
Not later than the earlier of:

(i)
The fifteenth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The twentieth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the request that the determination be made; and

(b)
In cases of a condition that could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's health
or ability to regain maximum function, not later than the earlier of:

(i)
Seventy-two hours after the date the independent review organization receives
the information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The eighth day after the date the independent review organization receives the
request that the determination be made.

(4)
To be certified as an independent review organization under this chapter, an
organization must submit to the commissioner an application in the form
required by the commissioner. The application must include:

(a)
For an applicant that is publicly held, the name of each stockholder or owner
of more than five percent of any stock or options;

(b)
The name of any holder of bonds or notes of the applicant that exceed one
hundred thousand dollars;

(c)
The name and type of business of each corporation or other organization that
the applicant controls or is affiliated with and the nature and extent of the
affiliation or control;

(d)
The name and a biographical sketch of each director, officer, and executive of
the applicant and any entity listed under (c) of this subsection and a
description of any relationship the named individual has with:

(i)
A carrier;

(ii)
A utilization review agent;

(iii)
A nonprofit health corporation;

(iv)
A health care provider; or

(v)
A group representing any of the entities described by (d)(i) through (iv) of
this subsection;

(e)
The percentage of the applicant's revenues that are anticipated to be derived
from reviews conducted under section 6 of this act;

(f)
A description of the areas of expertise of the health care professionals making
review determinations for the applicant; and

(g)
The procedures to be used by the independent review organization in making
review determinations regarding reviews conducted under section 6 of this act.

(5)
The independent review organization shall annually submit the information
required by subsection (4) of this section. If at any time there is a material
change in the information included in the application under subsection (4) of
this section, the independent review organization shall submit updated
information to the commissioner.

(6)
An independent review organization may not be a subsidiary of, or in any way
owned or controlled by, a carrier or a trade or professional association of
carriers.

(7)
An independent review organization, and individuals acting on its behalf, are
immune from suit in a civil action when performing functions under chapter
. . ., Laws of 1999 1st sp. sess. (this act). However, this immunity
does not apply to an act or omission made in bad faith or that involves gross
negligence.

(8)
Rules adopted for this section must promote clear communication with
consumers. In adopting the rules, the commissioner must take into
consideration standards recommended by national managed care accreditation
organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 7.70 RCW to read as follows:

CARRIER
LIABILITY. (1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this
section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Enrollee" means an individual covered by a health plan, including
dependents.

(b)
"Health care provider" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(c)
"Health care treatment decision" means a determination made regarding
whether a health care service or services covered by the health plan are
actually provided by the health plan and a decision that affects the quality of
the diagnosis, care, or treatment provided to the plan's enrollees.

(d)
"Health carrier" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(e)
"Health plan" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005, except that
it includes a policy, contract, or agreement offered by any person, not just a
health carrier.

(f)
"Managed care entity" means an entity other than a health carrier
that delivers, administers, or assumes risk for health care services with
systems or techniques to control or influence the quality, accessibility,
utilization, or costs and prices of the services to a defined enrollee
population, but does not include an employer purchasing coverage or acting on
behalf of its employees or the employees of one or more subsidiaries or
affiliated corporations of the employer or a pharmacy under chapter 18.64 RCW.

(g)
"Accepted standard of care" means when a health carrier or managed
care entity or a person who is an employee, agent, or ostensible agent of a
health carrier or managed care entity is making health care treatment
decisions, that degree of care under chapter 7.70 RCW that a reasonably prudent
health care provider would use under the same or similar circumstances.

(2)(a)
A health carrier or a managed care entity for a health plan shall follow the
accepted standard of care for health care providers when making health care
treatment decisions and is liable for damages for harm to an enrollee
proximately caused by its failure to follow the accepted standard of care. For
other acts or omissions, a health carrier or managed care entity, and its
employees, agents, or ostensible agents, is liable for damages for harm to an
enrollee, proximately caused by its failure to exercise ordinary care.

(b)
A health carrier or a managed care entity for a health plan is also liable for
damages for harm to an enrollee proximately caused by health care treatment
decisions made by its:

(i)
Employees;

(ii)
Agents; or

(iii)
Ostensible agents who are acting on its behalf and over whom it has the right
to exercise influence or control or has actually exercised influence or control
that result from a failure to follow the accepted standard of care.

(3)
It is a defense to any action asserted under this section against a health
carrier or managed care entity for a health plan that:

(a)
Neither the health carrier or managed care entity, nor any employee, agent,
ostensible agent, or representative for whose conduct the health carrier or
managed care entity is liable under subsection (2)(b) of this section,
controlled, influenced, or participated in the health care decision; or

(b)
The health carrier or managed care entity did not deny or delay payment for
treatment prescribed or recommended by a health care provider for the enrollee.

(4)
This section does not create any liability on the part of an employer or an employer
group purchasing organization that purchases coverage or assumes risk on behalf
of its employers.

(5)
Nothing in any law of this state prohibiting a health carrier or managed care
entity from practicing medicine or being licensed to practice medicine may be
asserted as a defense by the health carrier or managed care entity in an action
brought against it under this section. (6)(a) A person may not maintain a
cause of action under this section against a health carrier or managed care
entity unless the affected enrollee or the enrollee's representative has
exercised the opportunity established in section 7 of this act to seek
independent review of the health care treatment decision.

(b)
The enrollee is not required to comply with (a) of this subsection and no
abatement or other penalty for failure to comply shall be imposed if the
enrollee has filed a pleading alleging in substance that:

(i)
Harm to the enrollee has already occurred because of the conduct of the health
carrier or managed care entity or because of an act or omission of an employee,
agent, ostensible agent, or representative of the carrier or entity for whose
conduct it is liable; or

(ii)
The review would not be beneficial to the enrollee, unless the court, upon
motion by a defendant carrier or entity, finds after hearing that the pleading
was not made in good faith.

(c)
This subsection does not prohibit an enrollee from pursuing other appropriate
remedies, including injunctive relief, a declaratory judgment, or other relief
available under law, if its requirements place the enrollee's health in serious
jeopardy.

(7)
In an action against a health carrier, a finding that a health care provider is
an employee, agent, or ostensible agent of such a health carrier shall not be
based solely on proof that the person's name appears in a listing of approved
physicians or health providers made available to enrollees under a health plan.

(8)
Any action under this section shall be commenced within three years of the
completion of the independent review process, if applicable, under subsection
(6) of this section, or within three years of the accrual of the cause of
action if the independent review process under subsection (6) of this section
is not applicable.

(9)
This section does not apply to workers' compensation insurance under Title 51
RCW.

Sec.
9. RCW
70.47.060 and 1998 c 314 s 17 and 1998 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
administrator has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care
services, including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital
services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be
necessary for basic health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that funds are available, offer as basic health plan services chemical
dependency services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services shall
increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by more than
five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating
managed health care system under the Washington basic health plan shall be
entitled to receive covered basic health care services in return for premium payments
to the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize proven preventive and
primary health care and shall include all services necessary for prenatal,
postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for groups
of subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal
services through the medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the
administrator shall not contract for such services except to the extent that
such services are necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to
maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care
provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule of
basic health care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger, for
those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage
through the plan only for their dependent children. In designing and revising
the schedule of services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for
assessing health services under ((the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW
48.47.030)) chapter 48.47 RCW, and such other factors as the
administrator deems appropriate. In addition to coverage set forth in this
section, an emergency health plan must be offered, as required in section 10 of
this act.

However,
with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive
prenatal and postnatal services through the medical assistance program under
chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services
except to the extent that the services are necessary over not more than a
one-month period in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of
pregnancy by the managed care provider.

(2)(a)
To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator
from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross family income, giving
appropriate consideration to family size and the ages of all family members.
The enrollment of children shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums
shall be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.

(b)
To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized
enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the
state for the plan plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(c)
An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of a
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator.

(d)
To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing coverage identical
to the basic health plan, as configured on January 1, 1996, a basic health plan
model plan with uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.

(3)
To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost sharing due a managed
health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure
shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but
shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.

(4)
To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an
overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the
administrator finds that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the
administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger
no longer exists.

(5)
To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as defined in RCW
70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who qualify may be based
on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the administrator.

(6)
To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery of services and
availability of the plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations
contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7)
To solicit and accept applications from managed health care systems, as defined
in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under
the plan. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health
care services are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection
of two or more participating managed health care systems. In adopting any
rules or procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make suitable
allowance for the need for health care services and the differences in local
availability of health care resources, along with other resources, within and
among the several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become
eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue to receive
services from their existing providers within the managed health care system if
such providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.

(8)
To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep
records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the
respective managed health care systems.

(9)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan,
on behalf of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for
enrollment in the Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale premiums.
Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption support program
authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall not be
counted toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes of this
chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes accurately,
the administrator shall have the authority either to bill the enrollee for the
amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two hundred
percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee incorrectly
reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define the
appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement the
sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No subsidy
may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family income
exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110, who is a
recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter 74.09
RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10)
To accept applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their
employees, spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. The administrator may
require all or the substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures necessary to
facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed
health care system. The administrator may require that a business owner pay at
least an amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its portion
of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee enrolled
in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare who wish
to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care coverage and
services from a managed care system participating in the plan. The
administrator shall adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or from
all such enrollees whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator with the
participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(11)
To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed health care
system in return for the provision of covered basic health care services to enrollees
in the system. Although the schedule of covered basic health care services
will be the same for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with participating
managed health care systems may vary among the systems. In negotiating rates
with participating systems, the administrator shall consider the
characteristics of the populations served by the respective systems, economic
circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve the resources of the
basic health plan trust account, and other factors the administrator finds
relevant.

(12)
To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by participating
managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee access to good quality
basic health care, to require periodic data reports concerning the utilization
of health care services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate
information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of
participating managed health care systems to assure compliance with the
purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed
health care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care
systems and to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and
the department of health, to minimize duplication of effort.

(13)
To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care
coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal
statutes that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

(14)
To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and to integrate it
into the plan wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(15)
To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for rural residents,
underserved populations, and persons of color.

(16)
In consultation with appropriate state and local government agencies, to
establish criteria defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in
government-operated institutions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The administrator must offer emergency health plan coverage designed as
follows:

(a)
Copayments and other cost sharing must be the same as the nonsubsidized basic
health plan, as set forth in RCW 70.47.060, except for the requirement of a one
thousand dollar annual deductible.

(b)
The schedule of benefits must be the same as the nonsubsidized basic health
plan, as set forth in RCW 70.47.060, except for the exclusion of chemical
dependency services, mental health services, organ transplant services, and
prenatal and maternity services.

(c)
Except as required by federal law, participating health carriers may impose a
nine-month waiting period for coverage of a preexisting condition if such
condition existed, was diagnosed, or was treated during the six-month period
prior to enrollment.

(d)
Monthly premiums for this coverage must not exceed fifty percent of the average
aggregate monthly cost of the subsidized basic health plan coverage.

(e)
Enrollees are limited to thirty-six months of consecutive enrollment.

(2)
Any health carrier that contracts with the Washington state health care
authority to provide employee benefits pursuant to chapter 41.05 RCW must offer
this coverage in a manner required by the administrator in rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. This
act may be known and cited as the health care patient bill of rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 1 through 7 and 14 of this act are each added to chapter 48.43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. To
the extent permitted by law, if any provision of this chapter conflicts with
state or federal law, such provision must be construed in a manner most
favorable to the enrollee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
48.43.075 (Informing patients about their care--Health carriers
may not preclude or discourage) and 1996 c 312 s 2;

(2) RCW
48.43.095 (Information provided to an enrollee or a prospective
enrollee) and 1996 c 312 s 4; and

(3) RCW
48.43.105 (Preparation of documents that compare health
carriers--Immunity--Due diligence) and 1996 c 312 s 5.

---
END ---