BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1) 1999
c 309 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 722,863,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 784,657,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,345,803,000))

2,401,804,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 261,534,000

Emergency
Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((339,535,000))

397,982,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,463,592,000))

4,578,040,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall continue to make use of the special eligibility category
created for children through age 18 and in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level made eligible for medicaid as of July 1,
1994.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that Harborview medical center continue to
be an economically viable component of the health care system and that the
state's financial interest in Harborview medical center be recognized.

(3)
Funding is provided in this section for the adult dental program for Title XIX
categorically eligible and medically needy persons and to provide foot care
services by podiatric physicians and surgeons.

(4)
$1,647,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,672,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for treatment of low-income kidney dialysis patients.

(5)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $160,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the prenatal triage clearinghouse to provide access and outreach to
reduce infant mortality.

(6)
((The department shall adopt a new formula for distributing funds under the
low-income disproportionate share hospital (LI-DSH) program. Under this new
formula, (a) the state's Level 1 trauma center shall continue to receive the
same amount of LI-DSH payments as in fiscal year 1999; and (b) a net profitability
factor shall be included with other factors to determine LI-DSH payments. The
net profitability factor shall inversely relate hospital percent net operating
income to payment under the program.)) $6,400,000 of the health services
account appropriation is provided solely to replace general fund‑-state
and general fund‑-federal funding so that the current level of payments
to hospitals under the low-income disproportionate share hospital program can
be maintained, under the current low-income disproportionate share hospital
payment distribution methodology.

(7)
The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 15, 1999, and again by December 15, 1999, on (a) actions it has taken
and proposes to take to increase the share of medicare part B premium payments
upon which it is collecting medicaid matching funds; (b) the percentage of such
premium payments for each month of service subsequent to June 1998 which have
been paid with unmatched, state-only funds; and (c) why matching funds could
not be collected on those payments.

(8)
The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 1999, and again by October 1, 2000, on the amount which has been
recovered from third-party payers as a result of its efforts to improve
coordination of benefits on behalf of "basic health plan-plus"
enrollees.

(9)
The department shall report to the health care and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 1999, on options for controlling the growth in medicaid
prescription drug expenditures through strategies such as but not limited to
volume purchasing, selective contracting, supplemental drug discounts, and
improved care coordination for high utilizers.

(10)
$3,992,000 of the health services account appropriation and $7,651,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for health
insurance coverage for children with family incomes between 200 percent and 250
percent of the federal poverty level, as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No.
5416 (children's health insurance program). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(11)
$191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $391,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587
(patient bill of rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these
amounts shall lapse.

(12)
Upon approval from the federal health care financing administration, the
department shall implement the section 1115 family planning waiver to provide
family planning services to persons with family incomes at or below two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.

(13)
Except in the case of rural hospitals and Harborview medical center, weighted
average payments under the ratio-of-cost-to-charges hospital payment system
shall increase by no more than 175 percent of the DRI HCFA hospital
reimbursement market basket index.

(14)
In accordance with Substitute Senate Bill No. 5968, $52,047,000 of the health
services account appropriation and $56,002,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation, or so much thereof as may be expended without exceeding the
medicare upper payment limit, are provided solely for supplemental payments to
nursing homes operated by rural public hospital districts. Such payments shall
be distributed among the participating rural public hospital districts
proportional to the number of days of medicaid-funded nursing home care
provided by each district during the preceding calendar year, relative to the
total number of such days of care provided by all participating rural public
hospital districts. Prior to making any supplemental payments, the department shall
first obtain federal approval for such payments under the medicaid state plan.
The payments shall further be conditioned upon (a) a contractual commitment by
the association of public hospital districts and participating rural public
hospital districts to make an intergovernmental transfer to the state
treasurer, for deposit into the health services account, equal to at least 82
percent of the supplemental payment amount; and (b) a contractual commitment by
the participating districts to not allow expenditures covered by the
supplemental payments to be used for medicaid nursing home rate-setting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2) This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---