BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Assisted housing" means any single or multifamily dwelling unit that
is owned or managed by a housing authority.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(4)
"Housing authority" has the same meaning as in RCW 35.82.020.

(5)
"Office" means the office of assisted housing ombudsman.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
In order to provide general assistance to tenants in assisted housing and
housing authorities, the department shall establish the office of assisted
housing ombudsman. The office shall serve as the coordinating office within
state government for matters relating to landlord-tenant relationships between
tenants of assisted housing and housing authorities.

(2)
The department shall provide an ombudsman service to tenants of assisted
housing and housing authorities with respect to problems and disputes between
housing authorities and tenants of assisted housing. The office shall be
responsible for investigating and resolving complaints between residents of
assisted housing and the housing authority.

(3)
The department may contract with nonprofit organizations to provide the
ombudsman services required under this chapter.

(4)
In order to implement this chapter, the department shall have the following
powers and duties:

(a)
To provide services for coordinating the activities of the assisted housing
ombudsman throughout the state;

(b)
To establish procedures consistent with section 5 of this act for appropriate
access by the assisted housing ombudsman to tenant and housing authority files,
including procedures to protect the confidentiality of the files and ensure
that the identity of any complainant or tenant will not be disclosed without
the written consent of the complainant or tenant, or upon court order;

(c)
To establish a state-wide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data
relating to complaints for the purpose of identifying and resolving significant
problems, with provisions for submission of such data to the appropriate
legislative committees, on a regular basis;

(d)
To establish procedures to assure that any files maintained by the office of
assisted housing ombudsman shall be disclosed only at the discretion of the
ombudsman having authority over the disposition of such files, except that the
identity of any complainant or tenant of assisted housing shall not be
disclosed by such ombudsman unless:

(i)
Such complainant or tenant, or the complainant's or tenant's legal
representative, consents in writing to such disclosure; or

(ii)
Such disposition is required by court order;

(e)
To carry out such other activities the department deems appropriate to
implement this chapter; and

(f)
To adopt rules to carry out this chapter in accordance with federal and state
regulations and rules that govern landlord-tenant relations in assisted
housing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Any
person employed, retained, or contracted by the department as an assisted
housing ombudsman under this chapter shall have training or experience or both
in the following areas:

(1)
Federal or state assisted housing programs;

(2)
The federal and state laws governing landlord-tenant relationships; and

(3)
Dispute or problem resolution techniques, including investigation, mediation,
and negotiation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Every
housing authority shall post in a conspicuous location a notice that contains
the name, address, and phone number of the office of assisted housing ombudsman
and a brief description of the services provided by the office. The form of
the notice shall be approved by the office. This information shall also be
distributed to tenants of assisted housing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. All
records and files of the office of assisted housing ombudsman relating to any
complaint or investigation made pursuant to carrying out its duties and the
identities of complainants, witnesses, or tenants shall remain confidential
unless disclosure is authorized by the tenant or their legal representative.
No disclosure may be made outside the office without the consent of any named
tenant or complainant unless the disclosure is made without the identity of the
individuals being disclosed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---