BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
state parks and recreation commission shall sell to the port of Camas Washougal
forty-five acres of land near Cottonwood Beach, which is adjacent to or near
the port of Camas Washougal industrial park. The state parks and recreation commission
shall immediately institute actions necessary to facilitate this transfer. The
final sale price shall not exceed twenty-seven percent of the price paid by the
state parks and recreation commission to acquire the property. The proceeds of
this sale must be placed into the parkland acquisition account created under
RCW 79A.05.170.

The
state parks and recreation commission shall take all measures necessary to
facilitate the transfer of legal ownership, including the conveyance of title
and any other necessary documents. The port of Camas Washougal shall take all
measures necessary to accept the transfer of legal ownership from the state
parks and recreation commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---