BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that hazardous substance cleanup projects exist, and due to
their large size the normal biennial appropriation from the local toxics
control account is insufficient to meet project funding requirements. The
legislature further finds that in these cases the project sponsor may require
state financial assistance to successfully address the costs associated with
cleaning up the hazardous substances and returning the commercial or industrial
property to productive reuse.

It
is the intent of the legislature to assist local governments with financing
large-scale, multiyear remediation projects through extended grant payments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.105D RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department may enter into contracts with local governments to provide
extended grant payments to assist with the financing of large-scale, multiyear
remediation projects designed to clean up hazardous substances.

(2)
Extended grant payments shall be made annually in equal amounts that are
necessary to cover all or part of the principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the local government. The total extended grant payment cannot exceed
the allowed percentage of the total eligible cost of the project estimated at
the time of design and construction. No contract for extended grant payments
shall exceed a period of twenty years.

(3)
The department may require repayment of some or all of the extended grant. In
determining a repayment schedule, the department shall consider:

(a)
The potential increase in market value of the property;

(b)
The revenue-generating capacity of the property;

(c)
The ability of the local government to participate in the cost of remediation;
and

(d)
Other factors the department deems necessary to further the purposes of this
chapter.

(4)
The department shall use repayment of extended grant payments to further the
state's goal of equitable sharing of the financial responsibility for
environmental remediation projects.

(5) Any moneys appropriated by the legislature from the local
toxics control account to the department shall first be used to satisfy the
conditions of extended grant payment contracts.

---
END ---