BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.46.090 and 1983 c 204 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes this state's responsibility to foster culture and the
arts and its interest in the viable development of ((her)) the
state's artists and ((craftsmen)) craftpersons by the
establishment of the Washington state arts commission. ((The legislature
declares it to be a policy of this state that a portion of appropriations for
capital expenditures be set aside for the acquisition of works of art to be
placed in public buildings or lands.)) There is hereby established a
visual arts program to be administered by the Washington state arts commission.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.46.095 and 1990 c 33 s 578 are each amended to read as follows:

All
works of art purchased and commissioned under the visual arts program shall become
a part of a state art collection developed, administered, and operated by the
Washington state arts commission. All works of art previously purchased or
commissioned under ((RCW 43.46.090, 43.17.200, 43.19.455, 28B.10.025, or
28A.335.210)) the visual arts program shall be considered a part of
the state art collection to be administered by the Washington state arts
commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
28A.335.210 (Purchase of works of art--Procedure) and 1983 c 204 s
7, 1982 c 191 s 2, & 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 5;

(2) RCW
28B.10.025 (Purchases of works of art--Procedure) and 1990 c 33 s
557, 1983 c 204 s 8, 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 8, & 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 4;

(3) RCW
28B.10.027 (Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of
art--Expenditure by arts commission--Conditions) and 1983 c 204 s 9;

(4) RCW
43.17.200 (Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of
art--Expenditure by arts commission--Conditions) and 1983 c 204 s 4 & 1974
ex.s. c 176 s 2;

(5) RCW
43.17.205 (Purchase of works of art--Interagency reimbursement
for expenditure by visual arts program) and 1990 c 33 s 574 & 1983 c 204 s
3;

(6) RCW
43.17.210 (Purchase of works of art--Procedure) and 1990 c 33 s
575 & 1983 c 204 s 5; and

(7) RCW
43.19.455 (Purchase of works of art--Procedure) and 1990 c 33 s
576, 1983 c 204 s 6, & 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 3.

---
END ---