BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
24.06.005 and 1982 c 35 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

(1)
"Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a mutual
corporation or miscellaneous corporation subject to the provisions of this
chapter, except a foreign corporation.

(2)
"Foreign corporation" means a mutual or miscellaneous corporation or
other corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state which
would be subject to the provisions of this chapter if organized under the laws
of this state.

(3)
"Mutual corporation" means a corporation organized to accomplish one
or more of its purposes on a mutual basis for members and other persons.

(4)
"Miscellaneous corporation" means any corporation which is organized
for a purpose or in a manner not provided for by the Washington business
corporation act or by the Washington nonprofit corporation act, and which is
not required to be organized under other laws of this state.

(5)
"Articles of incorporation" includes the original articles of
incorporation and all amendments thereto, and includes articles of merger.

(6)
"Bylaws" means the code or codes of rules adopted for the regulation
or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or
names by which such rules are designated.

(7)
"Member" means one having membership rights in a corporation in
accordance with provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

(8)
"Stock" or "share" means the units into which the proprietary
interests of a corporation are divided in a corporation organized with stock.

(9)
"Stockholder" or "shareholder" means one who is a holder of
record of one or more shares in a corporation organized with stock.

(10)
"Board of directors" means the group of persons vested with the
management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name by which
such group is designated.

(11)
"Insolvent" means inability of a corporation to pay debts as they
become due in the usual course of its affairs.

(12)
"Duplicate originals" means two copies, original or otherwise, each
with original signatures, or one original with original signatures and one copy
thereof.

(13)
"Conforms to law" as used in connection with duties of the secretary
of state in reviewing documents for filing under this chapter, means the
secretary of state has determined the document complies as to form with the
applicable requirements of this chapter.

(14)
"Effective date" means, in connection with a document filing made by
the secretary of state, the date which is shown by affixing a "filed"
stamp on the documents. When a document is received for filing by the
secretary of state in a form which complies with the requirements of this
chapter and which would entitle the document to be filed immediately upon
receipt, but the secretary of state's approval action occurs subsequent to the
date of receipt, the secretary of state's filing date shall relate back to the
date on which the secretary of state first received the document in acceptable
form. An applicant may request a specific effective date no more than thirty
days later than the receipt date which might otherwise be applied as the
effective date.

(15)
"Executed by an officer of the corporation," or words of similar
import, means that any document signed by such person shall be and is signed by
that person under penalties of perjury and in an official and authorized
capacity on behalf of the corporation or person making the document submission
with the secretary of state.

(16)
"An officer of the corporation" means, in connection with the
execution of documents submitted for filing with the secretary of state, the
president, a vice president, the secretary, or the treasurer of the
corporation.

(17)
"Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted"
means any process of electronic communication not directly involving the
physical transfer of paper that is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and
reproduction of the transmitted information by the recipient. However, such an
electronic transmission must either set forth or be submitted with information,
including any security or validation controls used, from which it can
reasonably be determined that the electronic transmission was authorized by, as
applicable, the corporation or shareholder or member by or on behalf of which
the electronic transmission was sent.

Sec.
2. RCW
24.06.095 and 1970 ex.s. c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
initial bylaws of a corporation shall be adopted by its board of directors.
The power to alter, amend or repeal the bylaws or adopt new bylaws shall be
vested in the board of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws. The bylaws may contain any provisions for the
regulation and management of the affairs of a corporation not inconsistent with
law or the articles of incorporation: PROVIDED, That where the bylaws of an
existing corporation prohibit voting by mail, by electronic transmission,
or by proxy or attorney-in-fact, and the quorum required by its bylaws for
election of directors or transaction of other business has not been obtained at
a shareholders' or members' meeting, for a period which includes at least two
consecutive annual meeting dates, the board of directors shall have power to
amend such bylaws to thereafter authorize voting by mail, by electronic
transmission, or by proxy or attorney-in-fact.

Sec.
3. RCW
24.06.105 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Written
or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice given by electronic
transmission, stating the place, day and hour of the meeting and, in case
of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called,
shall be delivered not less than ten nor more than fifty days before the date
of the meeting, either personally or by mail or electronic transmission,
by or at the direction of the president, or the secretary, or the officers or
persons calling the meeting, to each member or shareholder entitled to vote at
such meeting. If provided in the articles of incorporation, notice of regular
meetings other than annual may be made by providing each member with the
adopted schedule of regular meetings for the ensuing year at any time after the
annual meeting and ten days prior to a regular meeting and at any time when
requested by a member or by such other notice as may be prescribed by the
bylaws. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when deposited
in the United States mail, addressed to the member or shareholder at his or
her address as it appears on the records of the corporation, with postage
thereon prepaid. If sent by electronic transmission, the notice is deemed
to be delivered when sent, addressed to the member or shareholder at his or her
electronic transmission address as it appears on the records of the
corporation.

Sec.
4. RCW
24.06.110 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The
right of a class or classes of members or shareholders to vote may be limited,
enlarged or denied to the extent specified in the articles of incorporation.
Unless so limited, enlarged or denied, each member and each outstanding share
of each class shall be entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote
of members or shareholders. No member of a class may acquire any interest which
will entitle him or her to a greater vote than any other member of the
same class.

A
member or shareholder may vote in person or, unless the articles of
incorporation or the bylaws otherwise provide, may vote by mail, by
electronic transmission, or by proxy executed in writing by the member or
shareholder or by his or her duly authorized attorney-in-fact:
PROVIDED, That no proxy shall be valid for more than eleven months from the
date of its execution unless otherwise specified in the proxy.

If
a member or shareholder may vote by proxy, the proxy may be given by:

(1)
Executing a writing authorizing another person or persons to act for the member
or shareholder as proxy. Execution may be accomplished by the member or
shareholder or the member's or shareholder's authorized officer, director,
employee, or agent signing the writing or causing his or her signature to be
affixed to the writing by any reasonable means including, but not limited to,
facsimile signature; or

(2)
Authorizing another person or persons to act for the member or shareholder as
proxy by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of an electronic
transmission to the person who will be the holder of the proxy, or to a proxy
solicitation firm, proxy support service organization, or like agent duly
authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive the
transmission. If it is determined that the electronic transmissions are valid,
the inspector of election or, if there are no inspectors, any other officer or
agent of the corporation making that determination on behalf of the corporation
shall specify the information upon which they relied. The corporation shall
require the holders of proxies received by electronic transmission to provide
to the corporation copies of the electronic transmission and the corporation
shall retain copies of the electronic transmission for a reasonable period of
time.

The
articles of incorporation may provide that whenever proposals or directors or
officers are to be voted upon, such vote may be taken by mail or by
electronic transmission if the name of each candidate and the text of each
proposal to be so voted upon are set forth in a writing accompanying or
contained in the notice of meeting. Persons voting by mail or by electronic
transmission shall be deemed present for all purposes of quorum, count of
votes and percentages of total voting power voting.

The
articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that in all elections for
directors every person entitled to vote shall have the right to cumulate his or
her vote and to give one candidate a number of votes equal to his or her
vote multiplied by the number of directors to be elected, or by distributing
such votes on the same principle among any number of such candidates.

Sec.
5. RCW
24.06.115 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The
articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide the number or percentage of
votes which members or shareholders are entitled to cast in person, by mail, by
electronic transmission, or by proxy, which shall constitute a quorum at
meetings of shareholders or members. However, in no event shall a quorum be
less than one-fourth of the votes which members or shareholders are entitled to
cast in person, by mail, by electronic transmission, or by proxy, at a
meeting considering the adoption of a proposal which is required by the
provisions of this chapter to be adopted by at least two-thirds of the votes
which members or shareholders present at the meeting in person or by mail,
by electronic transmission, or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.
In all other matters and in the absence of any provision in the articles of
incorporation or bylaws, a quorum shall consist of one-fourth of the votes
which members or shareholders are entitled to cast in person, by mail, by
electronic transmission, or by proxy at the meeting. On any proposal on
which a class of shareholders or members is entitled to vote as a class, a
quorum of the class entitled to vote as such class must also be present in person,
by mail, by electronic transmission, or represented by proxy.

Sec.
6. RCW
24.06.190 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

Amendments
to the articles of incorporation shall be made in the following manner:

The
board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed
amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members
and shareholders, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written
or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice by electronic transmission,
setting forth the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected
thereby shall be given to each member and shareholder entitled to vote at such
meeting within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the
giving of notice of meetings of members and shareholders. The proposed
amendment shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes
which members or shareholders present in person or by mail or by electronic
transmission at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast:
PROVIDED, That when any class of shares or members is entitled to vote thereon
by class, the proposed amendment must receive at least two-thirds of the votes
of the members or shareholders of each class entitled to vote thereon as a
class, who are present in person, by mail, by electronic transmission,
or represented by proxy at such meeting.

Any
number of amendments may be submitted and voted upon at any one meeting.

Sec.
7. RCW
24.06.195 and 1982 c 35 s 130 are each amended to read as follows:

The
articles of amendment shall be executed in duplicate originals by the corporation
by an officer of the corporation, and shall set forth:

(1)
The name of the corporation.

(2)
Any amendment so adopted.

(3)
A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members and shareholders
at which the amendment was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting,
and that such amendment received at least two-thirds of the votes which members
or shareholders of the corporation, and of each class entitled to vote thereon
as a class, present at such meeting in person, by mail, by electronic
transmission, or represented by proxy were entitled to cast, or a statement
that such amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members
and shareholders entitled to vote with respect thereto.

Sec.
8. RCW
24.06.220 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

A
plan of merger or consolidation shall be adopted in the following manner:

The
board of directors of such corporation shall adopt a resolution approving the
proposed plan and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of
members or shareholders which may be either an annual or a special meeting.
Written or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice by electronic transmission,
setting forth the proposed plan or a summary thereof shall be given to each
member and shareholder within the time and in the manner provided in this
chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members and shareholders. The
proposed plan shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes
which members and shareholders present in person or by mail or by electronic
transmission at each such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to
cast: PROVIDED, That when any class of shares or members is entitled to vote
thereon as a class, the proposed amendment must receive at least two-thirds of
the votes of the members or shareholders of each class entitled to vote thereon
as a class, who are present in person, by mail, by electronic transmission,
or represented by proxy at such meeting.

After
such approval, and at any time prior to the filing of the articles of merger or
consolidation, the merger or consolidation may be abandoned pursuant to
provisions therefor, if any, set forth in the plan of merger or consolidation.

Sec.
9. RCW
24.06.225 and 1982 c 35 s 134 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon approval, articles of merger or articles of consolidation shall be
executed in duplicate originals by each corporation, by an officer of each
corporation, and shall set forth:

(a)
The plan of merger or the plan of consolidation;

(b)
A statement setting forth the date of the meeting of members or shareholders at
which the plan was adopted, that a quorum was present at such meeting, and that
such plan received at least two-thirds of the votes which members and shareholders
of the corporation and of each class entitled to vote thereon as a class,
present at such meeting in person or by mail or by electronic transmission
or represented by proxy were entitled to cast, or a statement that such
amendment was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members;

(2)
Duplicate originals of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation
shall be delivered to the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds
that such articles conform to law, he or she shall, when all fees have been
paid as prescribed in this chapter:

(a)
Endorse on each of such originals the word "filed", and the effective
date of the filing thereof;

(b)
File one of such originals in his or her office;

(c)
Issue a certificate of merger or a certificate of consolidation to which he or
she shall affix one of such originals.

The
certificate of merger or certificate of consolidation, together with the
original of the articles of merger or articles of consolidation affixed thereto
by the secretary of state shall be returned to the surviving or new
corporation, as the case may be, or its representative, and shall be retained
by the corporation.

Sec.
10. RCW
24.06.240 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

A
sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the
property and assets of a corporation may be made upon such terms and conditions
and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or
property, real or personal, including shares of any corporation for profit,
domestic or foreign, as may be authorized in the following manner:

(1)
The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending a sale, lease,
exchange, or other disposition and directing that it be submitted to a vote at
a meeting of members or shareholders which may be either an annual or a special
meeting.

(2)
Written or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice by electronic transmission,
stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of such meeting is to consider
the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all of
the property and assets of the corporation shall be given to each member and
shareholder within the time and in the manner provided by this chapter for the
giving of notice of meetings of members and shareholders.

(3)
At such meeting the members may authorize such sale, lease, exchange, or other
disposition and may fix, or may authorize the board of directors to fix, any or
all of the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by
the corporation therefor.

(4)
Such authorization shall require at least two-thirds of the votes which members
and shareholders present at such meetings in person, by mail, by electronic
transmission, or represented by proxy are entitled to cast: PROVIDED, That
even after such authorization by a vote of members or shareholders, the board
of directors may, in its discretion, without further action or approval by
members, abandon such sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of assets,
subject only to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating
thereto.

Sec.
11. RCW
24.06.250 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
member or shareholder electing to exercise such right of dissent shall file
with the corporation, prior to or at the meeting of members and shareholders at
which such proposed corporate action is submitted to a vote, a written
objection to such proposed corporate action. If such proposed corporate action
be approved by the required vote and such member or shareholder shall not have
voted in favor thereof, such member or shareholder may, within ten days after
the date on which the vote was taken, or if a corporation is to be merged
without a vote of its members and shareholders into another corporation, any
other members or shareholders may, within fifteen days after the plan of such
merger shall have been mailed or sent by electronic transmission to such
members and shareholders, make written demand on the corporation, or, in the
case of a merger or consolidation, on the surviving or new corporation,
domestic or foreign, for payment of the fair value of such member's membership
or of such shareholder's shares, and, if such proposed corporate action is
effected, such corporation shall pay to such member, upon surrender of his or
her membership certificate, if any, or to such shareholder, upon surrender
of the certificate or certificates representing such shares, the fair value
thereof as of the day prior to the date on which the vote was taken approving
the proposed corporate action, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in
anticipation of such corporate action. Any member or shareholder failing to make
demand within the ten day period shall be bound by the terms of the proposed
corporate action. Any member or shareholder making such demand shall
thereafter be entitled only to payment as in this section provided and shall
not be entitled to vote or to exercise any other rights of a member or
shareholder.

No
such demand shall be withdrawn unless the corporation shall consent thereto.
The right of such member or shareholder to be paid the fair value of his or
her shares shall cease and his or her status as a member or
shareholder shall be restored, without prejudice to any corporate proceedings
which may have been taken during the interim, if:

(1)
Such demand shall be withdrawn upon consent; or

(2)
The proposed corporate action shall be abandoned or rescinded or the members or
shareholders shall revoke the authority to effect such action; or

(3)
In the case of a merger, on the date of the filing of the articles of merger
the surviving corporation is the owner of all the outstanding shares of the
other corporations, domestic and foreign, that are parties to the merger; or

(4)
No demand or petition for the determination of fair value by a court shall have
been made or filed within the time provided by this section; or

(5)
A court of competent jurisdiction shall determine that such member or
shareholder is not entitled to the relief provided by this section.

Within
ten days after such corporate action is effected, the corporation, or, in the
case of a merger or consolidation, the surviving or new corporation, domestic
or foreign, shall give written notice thereof to each dissenting member or
shareholder who has made demand as herein provided, and shall make a written
offer to each such member or shareholder to pay for such shares or membership
at a specified price deemed by such corporation to be the fair value thereof.
Such notice and offer shall be accompanied by a balance sheet of the
corporation in which the member has his or her membership or the shares
of which the dissenting shareholder holds, as of the latest available date and
not more than twelve months prior to the making of such offer, and a profit and
loss statement of such corporation for the twelve months' period ended on the
date of such balance sheet.

If
within thirty days after the date on which such corporate action was effected
the fair value of such shares or membership is agreed upon between any such
dissenting member or shareholder and the corporation, payment therefor shall be
made within ninety days after the date on which such corporate action was
effected, upon surrender of the membership certificate, if any, or upon
surrender of the certificate or certificates representing such shares. Upon
payment of the agreed value the dissenting member or shareholder shall cease to
have any interest in such membership or shares.

If
within such period of thirty days a dissenting member or shareholder and the
corporation do not so agree, then the corporation, within thirty days after
receipt of written demand from any dissenting member or shareholder given
within sixty days after the date on which such corporate action was effected,
shall, or at its election at any time within such period of sixty days may,
file a petition in any court of competent jurisdiction in the county in this
state where the registered office of the corporation is located praying that
the fair value of such membership or shares be found and determined. If, in
the case of a merger or consolidation, the surviving or new corporation is a
foreign corporation without a registered office in this state, such petition
shall be filed in the county where the registered office of the domestic
corporation was last located. If the corporation shall fail to institute the
proceeding as herein provided, any dissenting member or shareholder may do so
in the name of the corporation. All dissenting members and shareholders,
wherever residing, shall be made parties to the proceeding as an action against
their memberships or shares quasi in rem. A copy of the petition shall be
served on each dissenting member and shareholder who is a resident of this
state and shall be served by registered or certified mail on each dissenting
member or shareholder who is a nonresident. Service on nonresidents shall also
be made by publication as provided by law. The jurisdiction of the court shall
be plenary and exclusive. All members and shareholders who are parties to the
proceeding shall be entitled to judgment against the corporation for the amount
of the fair value of their shares. The court may, if it so elects, appoint one
or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend a decision on
the question of fair value. The appraisers shall have such power and authority
as shall be specified in the order of their appointment or an amendment
thereof. The judgment shall be payable only upon and concurrently with the
surrender to the corporation of the membership certificate, if any, or of the
certificate or certificates representing such shares. Upon payment of the
judgment, the dissenting shareholder or member shall cease to have any interest
in such shares or membership.

The
judgment shall include an allowance for interest at such rate as the court may
find to be fair and equitable in all the circumstances, from the date on which
the vote was taken on the proposed corporate action to the date of payment.

The
costs and expenses of any such proceeding shall be determined by the court and
shall be assessed against the corporation, but all or any part of such costs
and expenses may be apportioned and assessed as the court may deem equitable
against any or all of the dissenting members and shareholders who are parties
to the proceeding to whom the corporation shall have made an offer to pay for
membership or shares if the court shall find that the action of such members or
shareholders in failing to accept such offer was arbitrary or vexatious or not
in good faith. Such expenses shall include reasonable compensation for and
reasonable expenses of the appraisers, but shall exclude the fees and expenses
of counsel for and experts employed by any party; but if the fair value of the
memberships or shares as determined materially exceeds the amount which the
corporation offered to pay therefor, or if no offer was made, the court in its
discretion may award to any member or shareholder who is a party to the
proceeding such sum as the court may determine to be reasonable compensation to
any expert or experts employed by the member or shareholder in the proceeding.

Within
twenty days after demanding payment for his or her shares or membership,
each member and shareholder demanding payment shall submit the certificate or
certificates representing his or her membership or shares to the
corporation for notation thereon that such demand has been made. His or her
failure to do so shall, at the option of the corporation, terminate his or
her rights under this section unless a court of competent jurisdiction, for
good and sufficient cause shown, shall otherwise direct. If membership or
shares represented by a certificate on which notation has been so made shall be
transferred, each new certificate issued therefor shall bear a similar
notation, together with the name of the original dissenting holder of such
membership or shares, and a transferee of such membership or shares shall
acquire by such transfer no rights in the corporation other than those which
the original dissenting member or shareholder had after making demand for
payment of the fair value thereof.

Sec.
12. RCW
24.06.260 and 1982 c 35 s 137 are each amended to read as follows:

A
corporation may dissolve and wind up its affairs in the following manner:

(1)
The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the
corporation be dissolved, and directing that the question of such dissolution
be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members and shareholders which may be
either an annual or a special meeting.

(2)
Written or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice by electronic transmission,
stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of such meeting is to consider
the advisability of dissolving the corporation shall be given to each member
and shareholder within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for
the giving of notice of meetings of members and shareholders.

(3)
A resolution to dissolve the corporation shall be adopted upon receiving at
least two-thirds of the votes which members and shareholders present in person
or by mail or by electronic transmission at such meeting or represented
by proxy are entitled to cast.

Upon
the adoption of such resolution by the members and shareholders, the corporation
shall cease to conduct its affairs and, except insofar as may be necessary for
the winding up thereof, shall immediately cause a notice of the proposed
dissolution to be mailed to each known creditor of the corporation and to the
department of revenue, and shall proceed to collect its assets and to apply and
distribute them as provided in RCW 24.06.265.

Sec.
13. RCW
24.06.270 and 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

A
corporation may, at any time prior to the issuance of a certificate of
dissolution by the secretary of state, revoke the action theretofore taken to
dissolve the corporation, in the following manner:

(1)
The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the voluntary
dissolution proceedings be revoked, and directing that the question of such
revocation be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members or shareholders which
may be either an annual or a special meeting.

(2)
Written or printed notice or, if specifically permitted by the articles of
incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, notice by electronic transmission,
stating that the purpose or one of the purposes of the meeting is to consider
the advisability of revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be
given to each member and shareholder within the time and in the manner provided
in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members or
shareholders.

(3)
A resolution to revoke voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted upon
receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members and shareholders
present in person or by mail or by electronic transmission at such
meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

Sec.
14. RCW
24.06.275 and 1993 c 356 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

If
voluntary dissolution proceedings have not been revoked, then after all debts,
liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall have been paid and
discharged, or adequate provision shall have been made therefor, and all of the
remaining property and assets of the corporation shall have been transferred,
conveyed or distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter,
articles of dissolution shall be executed in duplicate by the corporation, by
an officer of the corporation; and such statement shall set forth:

(1)
The name of the corporation.

(2)
The date of the meeting of members or shareholders at which the resolution to
dissolve was adopted, certifying that:

(a)
A quorum was present at such meeting;

(b)
Such resolution received at least two-thirds of the votes which members and
shareholders present in person or by mail or by electronic transmission
at such meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast or was adopted by
a consent in writing signed by all members and shareholders;

(c)
All debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation have been paid and
discharged or that adequate provision has been made therefor;

(d)
All the remaining property and assets of the corporation have been transferred,
conveyed or distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

(e)
There are no suits pending against the corporation in any court or, if any
suits are pending against it, that adequate provision has been made for the
satisfaction of any judgment, order or decree which may be entered; and

(f) A copy of a revenue clearance certificate issued pursuant to
chapter 82.32 RCW.

---
END ---