BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
25.15.005 and 1995 c 337 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Certificate of formation" means the certificate referred to in RCW
25.15.070, and the certificate as amended.

(2)
"Event of dissociation" means an event that causes a person to cease
to be a member as provided in RCW 25.15.130.

(3)
"Foreign limited liability company" means an entity that is formed
under:

(a)
The limited liability company laws of any state other than this state; or

(b)
The laws of any foreign country that is: (((A)[(i)])) (i) An
unincorporated association, (((B)[(ii)])) (ii) formed under a
statute pursuant to which an association may be formed that affords to each of
its members limited liability with respect to the liabilities of the entity,
and (((C)[(iii)])) (iii) not required, in order to transact
business or conduct affairs in this state, to be registered or qualified under
Title 23B or 24 RCW, or any other chapter of the Revised Code of Washington
authorizing the formation of a domestic entity and the registration or
qualification in this state of similar entities formed under the laws of a
jurisdiction other than this state.

(4)
"Limited liability company" and "domestic limited liability
company" means a limited liability company having one or more members
that is organized and existing under this chapter.

(5)
"Limited liability company agreement" means any written agreement of
the members, or any written statement of the sole member, as to the affairs
of a limited liability company and the conduct of its business which is binding
upon ((all of)) the member or members.

(6)
"Limited liability company interest" means a member's share of the
profits and losses of a limited liability company and a member's right to
receive distributions of the limited liability company's assets.

(7)
"Manager" or "managers" means, with respect to a limited
liability company that has set forth in its certificate of formation that it is
to be managed by managers, the person, or persons designated in accordance with
RCW 25.15.150(2).

(8)
"Member" means a person who has been admitted to a limited liability
company as a member as provided in RCW 25.15.115 and who has not been
dissociated from the limited liability company.

(9)
"Person" means a natural person, partnership (whether general or
limited and whether domestic or foreign), limited liability company, foreign
limited liability company, trust, estate, association, corporation, custodian,
nominee, or any other individual or entity in its own or any representative
capacity.

(10)
"Professional limited liability company" means a limited liability company
which is organized for the purpose of rendering professional service and whose
certificate of formation sets forth that it is a professional limited liability
company subject to RCW 25.15.045.

(11)
"Professional service" means the same as defined under RCW
18.100.030.

(12)
"State" means the District of Columbia or the Commonwealth of Puerto
Rico or any state, territory, possession, or other jurisdiction of the United
States other than the state of Washington.

Sec.
2. RCW
25.15.130 and 1995 c 337 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person ceases to be a member of a limited liability company, and the
person or its successor in interest attains the status of an assignee as set
forth in RCW 25.15.250(2), upon the occurrence of one or more of the
following events:

(a)
The member dies or withdraws by voluntary act from the limited liability
company as provided in subsection (3) of this section;

(b)
The member ceases to be a member as provided in RCW 25.15.250(2)(b) following
an assignment of all the member's limited liability company interest;

(c)
The member is removed as a member in accordance with the limited liability
company agreement;

(d)
Unless otherwise provided in the limited liability company agreement, or with
the written consent of all other members at the time, the member (i) makes a
general assignment for the benefit of creditors; (ii) files a voluntary
petition in bankruptcy; (iii) becomes the subject of an order for relief in
bankruptcy proceedings; (iv) files a petition or answer seeking for himself or
herself any reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment,
liquidation, dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation;
(v) files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the
material allegations of a petition filed against him or her in any proceeding
of the nature described in (d) (i) through (iv) of this subsection; or (vi)
seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or
liquidator of the member or of all or any substantial part of the member's
properties;

(e)
Unless otherwise provided in the limited liability company agreement, or with
the consent of all other members at the time, one hundred twenty days after the
commencement of any proceeding against the member seeking reorganization,
arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar
relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the proceeding has not been
dismissed, or if within ninety days after the appointment without his or her
consent or acquiescence of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the member or
of all or any substantial part of the member's properties, the appointment is
not vacated or stayed, or within ninety days after the expiration of any stay,
the appointment is not vacated;

(f)
Unless otherwise provided in the limited liability company agreement, or with
written consent of all other members at the time, in the case of a member who
is an individual, the entry of an order by a court of competent jurisdiction
adjudicating the member incapacitated, as used and defined under chapter 11.88
RCW, as to his or her estate;

(g)
Unless otherwise provided in the limited liability company agreement, or with
written consent of all other members at the time, in the case of a member that
is another limited liability company, the dissolution and commencement of
winding up of such limited liability company;

(h)
Unless otherwise provided in the limited liability company agreement, or with
written consent of all other members at the time, in the case of a member that
is a corporation, the filing of articles of dissolution or the equivalent for
the corporation or the administrative dissolution of the corporation and the
lapse of any period authorized for application for reinstatement; or

(i)
Unless otherwise provided in the limited liability company agreement, or with
written consent of all other members at the time, in the case of a member that
is a limited partnership, the dissolution and commencement of winding up of
such limited partnership.

(2)
The limited liability company agreement may provide for other events the
occurrence of which result in a person ceasing to be a member of the limited
liability company.

(3)
A member may withdraw from a limited liability company at the time or upon the
happening of events specified in and in accordance with the limited liability
company agreement. If the limited liability company agreement does not specify
the time or the events upon the happening of which a member may withdraw, a
member may not withdraw prior to the time for the dissolution and commencement
of winding up of the limited liability company, without the written consent of
all other members at the time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 25.15 RCW under the subchapter heading
"Article IV" to read as follows:

In the event of the death, resignation, or removal of the sole
remaining manager, or if one of the events described in RCW 25.15.130(1) (d)
through (i) occurs with regard to the sole remaining manager, and unless the
limited liability company agreement provides otherwise, the limited liability
company shall become member-managed unless one or more managers are appointed
by majority vote of the members within ninety days after the occurrence of such
an event.

Sec.
4. RCW
25.15.270 and 1997 c 21 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
limited liability company is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon
the first to occur of the following:

(1)
The dissolution date, if any, specified in ((a limited liability company
agreement. If a date is not specified in the agreement or the agreement does
not specify perpetual existence, then the dissolution date is thirty years
after the date of formation)) the certificate of formation. If a
dissolution date is not specified in the certificate of formation, the limited
liability company's existence will continue until the first to occur of the
events described in subsections (2) through (6) of this section. If a
dissolution date is specified in the ((agreement, it is renewable by consent))
certificate of formation, the certificate of formation may be amended and
the existence of the limited liability company may be extended by vote of
all the members;

(2)
The happening of events specified in a limited liability company agreement;

(3)
The written consent of all members;

(4)
Unless the limited liability company agreement provides otherwise, ninety
days following an event of dissociation of ((a)) the last
remaining member, unless ((the business of the limited liability company
is continued either by the consent of all the remaining members within ninety
days following the occurrence of any such event or pursuant to a right to
continue stated in the limited liability company agreement)) those
having the rights of assignees in the limited liability company under RCW
25.15.130(1) have, by the ninetieth day, voted to admit one or more members,
voting as though they were members, and in the manner set forth in RCW
25.15.120(1);

(5)
The entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under RCW 25.15.275; or

(6)
The expiration of two years after the effective date of dissolution under RCW
25.15.285 without the reinstatement of the limited liability company.

Sec.
5. RCW
25.10.080 and 1987 c 55 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to form a limited partnership a certificate of limited partnership
must be executed and duplicate originals filed in the office of the secretary
of state. The certificate shall set forth:

(a)
The name of the limited partnership;

(b)
The address of the office for records and the name and address of the agent for
service of process appointed pursuant to RCW 25.10.040;

(c)
The name and the geographical and mailing addresses of each general partner;

(d)
If the limited partnership is to have a specific date of dissolution, the
latest date upon which the limited partnership is to dissolve; and

(e)
Any other matters the general partners determine to include therein.

(2)
A limited partnership is formed at the time of the filing of the certificate of
limited partnership in the office of the secretary of state or at any later
time specified in the certificate of limited partnership if, in either case,
there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
25.10.220 and 1981 c 51 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, after the filing of a limited
partnership's original certificate of limited partnership, additional general
partners may be admitted only with the specific written consent of each general
partner, if any, and limited partners representing at least two-thirds of
the agreed value, as stated in the records of the partnership required to be
kept under RCW 25.10.050, of contributions made, or required to be made, by all
limited partners.

Sec.
7. RCW
25.10.230 and 1987 c 55 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as approved by the specific written consent of all partners at the time, a
person ceases to be a general partner of a limited partnership, and the
person or its successor in interest attains the status of an assignee as set
forth in RCW 25.10.400(1), upon the happening of any of the following
events:

(1)
The general partner withdraws from the limited partnership as provided in RCW
25.10.320;

(2)
The general partner ceases to be a member of the limited partnership as
provided in RCW 25.10.400;

(3)
The general partner is removed as a general partner in accordance with the
partnership agreement;

(4)
Unless otherwise provided in writing in the partnership agreement, the general
partner:

(a)
Makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

(b)
Files a voluntary petition in bankruptcy;

(c)
Is adjudicated a bankrupt or insolvent;

(d)
Files a petition or answer seeking for himself or herself any reorganization,
arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation, dissolution, or similar
relief under any statute, law, or regulation;

(e)
Files an answer or other pleading admitting or failing to contest the material
allegations of a petition filed against him or her in any proceeding of this
nature; or

(f)
Seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or
liquidator of the general partner or of all or any substantial part of his or
her properties;

(5)
Unless otherwise provided in the certificate of limited partnership, ninety
days after the commencement of any proceeding against the general partner
seeking reorganization, arrangement, composition, readjustment, liquidation,
dissolution, or similar relief under any statute, law, or regulation, the
proceeding has not been dismissed, or if within sixty days after the
appointment without the general partner's consent or acquiescence of a trustee,
receiver, or liquidator of the general partner of all or any substantial part
of his or her properties, the appointment is not vacated or stayed, or within
sixty days after the expiration of any such stay, the appointment is not
vacated;

(6)
In the case of a general partner who is a natural person:

(a)
His or her death; or

(b)
The entry by a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicating the general partner
incompetent to manage his or her person or estate;

(7)
In the case of a general partner who is acting as a general partner by virtue
of being a trustee of a trust, the termination of the trust (but not merely the
substitution of a new trustee);

(8)
In the case of a general partner that is a separate partnership, the dissolution
and commencement of winding up of the separate partnership;

(9)
In the case of a general partner that is a corporation, the filing of a
certificate of dissolution, or its equivalent, for the corporation or the
revocation of its charter; or

(10)
In the case of an estate, the distribution by the fiduciary of the estate's
entire interest in the partnership.

Sec.
8. RCW
25.10.440 and 1996 c 76 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the
happening of the first to occur of the following:

(1)
((At)) The dissolution date, if any, specified in
the certificate of limited partnership ((as amended from time to time, or if
no date is specified, at a date which is thirty years after the effective date
of filing the original certificate of limited partnership)). If a
dissolution date is not specified in the certificate of limited partnership,
the limited partnership's existence shall continue until the first to occur of
the events described in subsections (2) through (6) of this section. If a
dissolution date is specified in the certificate of limited partnership and
unless the limited partnership agreement provides otherwise, the certificate of
limited partnership may be amended and the existence of the limited partnership
may be extended by the vote of all the partners;

(2)
Upon the happening of events specified in the partnership agreement;

(3)
Written consent of all partners;

(4)
((An event of withdrawal of a general partner unless at the time there is at
least one other general partner and the partnership agreement permits the
business of the limited partnership to be carried on by the remaining general
partner and that partner does so, but the limited partnership is not dissolved
and is not required to be wound up by reason of any event of withdrawal if,
within ninety days after the withdrawal, all partners agree in writing to
continue the business of the limited partnership and to the appointment of one
or more additional general partners if necessary or desired)) Unless the
limited partnership agreement provides otherwise, ninety days following:

(a)
The withdrawal of, or the assignment of the interest of, the last remaining
limited partner if by the ninetieth day a majority of the number of general
partners have failed to vote to admit one or more limited partners; or

(b)
An event of withdrawal with respect to the last remaining general partner if by
the ninetieth day the limited partners have failed to vote to admit one or more
general partners. For the purposes of this subsection (4)(b) and unless the
limited partnership agreement provides otherwise, the vote of the limited
partners shall be the vote of limited partners representing two-thirds of the
total agreed value, as stated in the records of the partnership required to be
kept under RCW 25.10.050, of contributions made, or required to be made, by all
limited partners;

(5)
Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under RCW 25.10.450; or

(6)
Administrative dissolution under RCW 25.10.455.

Sec.
9. RCW
25.10.660 and 1981 c 51 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

In any case not provided for in this chapter, the provisions of the
Washington revised uniform partnership act, or its successor statute,
govern.

Sec.
10. RCW
25.05.050 and 1998 c 103 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A partnership is an entity distinct from its partners.

(2)
A limited liability partnership continues to be the same entity that existed
before the filing of ((a statement of qualification under RCW 25.05.420))
an application under RCW 25.05.500(2).

Sec.
11. RCW
25.05.225 and 1998 c 103 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

A
partner is dissociated from a partnership upon the occurrence of any of the
following events:

(1)
The partnership's having notice of the partner's express will to withdraw as a
partner or on a later date specified by the partner;

(2)
An event agreed to in the partnership agreement as causing the partner's
dissociation;

(3)
The partner's expulsion pursuant to the partnership agreement;

(4)
The partner's expulsion by the unanimous vote of the other partners if:

(a)
It is unlawful to carry on the partnership business with that partner;

(b)
There has been a transfer of all or substantially all of that partner's
transferable interest in the partnership, other than a transfer for security
purposes or a court order charging the partner's interest which, in either
case, has not been foreclosed;

(c)
Within ninety days after the partnership notifies a corporate partner that it
will be expelled because it has filed articles of dissolution, it has been
administratively or judicially dissolved, or its right to conduct business has
been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, and there is no
revocation of the articles of dissolution, no reinstatement following its
administrative dissolution, or reinstatement of its right to conduct business
by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, as applicable; or

(d)
A partnership or limited liability company that is a partner has been dissolved
and its business is being wound up;

(5)
On application by the partnership or another partner, the partner's expulsion
by judicial determination because:

(a)
The partner engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected
the partnership business;

(b)
The partner willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the
partnership agreement or of a duty owed to the partnership or the other
partners under RCW 25.05.165; or

(c)
The partner engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business which makes
it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with the
partner;

(6)
The partner's:

(a)
Becoming a debtor in bankruptcy;

(b)
Executing an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

(c)
Seeking, consenting to, or acquiescing in the appointment of a trustee,
receiver, or liquidator of that partner or of all or substantially all of that
partner's property; or

(d)
Failing, within ninety days after the appointment, to have vacated or stayed
the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the partner or of all
or substantially all of the partner's property obtained without the partner's
consent or acquiescence, or failing within ninety days after the expiration of
a stay to have the appointment vacated;

(7)
In the case of a partner who is an individual:

(a)
The partner's death;

(b)
The appointment of a guardian or general conservator for the partner; or

(c)
A judicial determination that the partner has otherwise become incapable of
performing the partner's duties under the partnership agreement;

(8)
In the case of a partner that is a trust or is acting as a partner by virtue of
being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the trust's entire transferable
interest in the partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a
successor trustee;

(9)
In the case of a partner that is an estate or is acting as a partner by virtue
of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the estate's
entire transferable interest in the partnership, but not merely by reason of
the substitution of a successor personal representative; or

(10) Termination of a partner who is not an individual,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, or estate.

---
END ---