BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.04.010 and 1997 c 220 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term state shall include the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners and agencies thereof.

The
term municipality shall include every city, county, town, district or other
public agency thereof which is authorized by law to require the execution of
public work, except drainage districts, diking districts, diking and drainage
improvement districts, drainage improvement districts, diking improvement
districts, consolidated diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated
drainage improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement districts,
irrigation districts or any such other districts as shall from time to time be
authorized by law for the reclamation or development of waste or undeveloped
lands.

The
term public work shall include all work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state
or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property
therein. All public works, including maintenance when performed by contract
shall comply with the provisions of chapter 39.12 RCW ((39.12.020)).
The term does not include work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement performed under contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or
under development agreements entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases
entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).

The
term contract shall mean a contract in writing for the execution of public work
for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after advertisement and
competitive bid. However, a contract which is awarded from a small works
roster under the authority of RCW 39.04.150, 35.22.620, 28B.10.355, 35.82.075,
and 57.08.050 need not be advertised.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.12.020 and 1989 c 12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public
works and under all public building service maintenance contracts of the state
or any county, municipality or political subdivision created by its laws, shall
be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same
trade or occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is
performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor
required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily
visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer
line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for
which no field office is needed or established, a contractor may post the
prevailing rate of wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel
crushing, concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:

(1)
A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW
39.12.040; and

(2)
The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of the
department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning
prevailing wages may be made.

((This
chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed on
monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or
political subdivision created by its laws.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to: (1) Workers or other persons regularly employed on
a monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or
political subdivision created by its laws; or (2) common school construction
performed under Title 28A RCW.