BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.18.020 and 1999 c 42 s 635 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Revenue collected under this section is subject to division with the state
public safety and education account under RCW 36.18.025 and with the county or
regional law library fund under RCW 27.24.070.

(2)
Clerks of superior courts shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

(a)
The party filing the first or initial paper in any civil action, including, but
not limited to an action for restitution, adoption, or change of name, shall
pay, at the time the paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten dollars except,
in an unlawful detainer action under chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW for which the
plaintiff shall pay a case initiating filing fee of thirty dollars, or in
proceedings filed under RCW 28A.225.030 alleging a violation of the compulsory
attendance laws where the petitioner shall not pay a filing fee. The thirty
dollar filing fee under this subsection for an unlawful detainer action shall
not include an order to show cause or any other order or judgment except a
default order or default judgment in an unlawful detainer action.

(b)
Any party, except a defendant in a criminal case, filing the first or initial
paper on an appeal from a court of limited jurisdiction or any party on any
civil appeal, shall pay, when the paper is filed, a fee of one hundred ten
dollars.

(c)
For filing of a petition for judicial review as required under RCW 34.05.514 a
filing fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(d)
For filing of a petition for unlawful harassment under RCW 10.14.040 a filing
fee of ((one hundred ten)) forty-one dollars.

(e)
For filing the notice of debt due for the compensation of a crime victim under
RCW 7.68.120(2)(a) a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(f)
In probate proceedings, the party instituting such proceedings, shall pay at
the time of filing the first paper therein, a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(g)
For filing any petition to contest a will admitted to probate or a petition to
admit a will which has been rejected, or a petition objecting to a written
agreement or memorandum as provided in RCW 11.96A.220, there shall be paid a
fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(h)
Upon conviction or plea of guilty, upon failure to prosecute an appeal from a
court of limited jurisdiction as provided by law, or upon affirmance of a
conviction by a court of limited jurisdiction, a defendant in a criminal case
shall be liable for a fee of one hundred ten dollars.

(i)
With the exception of demands for jury hereafter made and garnishments
hereafter issued, civil actions and probate proceedings filed prior to
midnight, July 1, 1972, shall be completed and governed by the fee schedule in
effect as of January 1, 1972: PROVIDED, That no fee shall be assessed if an
order of dismissal on the clerk's record be filed as provided by rule of the
supreme court.

(3) No fee shall be collected when a petition for relinquishment of
parental rights is filed pursuant to RCW 26.33.080 or for forms and
instructional brochures provided under RCW 26.50.030.

---
END ---