BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.64.030 and 1999 c 296 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The clerk shall enter all judgments in the execution docket, subject to the
direction of the court and shall specify clearly the amount to be recovered,
the relief granted, or other determination of the action.

(2)(a)
On the first page of each judgment which provides for the payment of money,
including judgments in rem, mandates of judgments, and judgments on
garnishments, the following shall be succinctly summarized: The judgment
creditor and the name of his or her attorney, the judgment debtor, the amount
of the judgment, the interest owed to the date of the judgment, and the total
of the taxable costs and attorney fees, if known at the time of the entry of
the judgment.

(b)
If the judgment provides for the award of any right, title, or interest in real
property, the first page must also include an abbreviated legal description of
the property in which the right, title, or interest was awarded by the
judgment, including lot, block, plat, or section, township, and range, and
reference to the judgment page number where the full legal description is
included, if applicable; ((and)) or the assessor's property tax
parcel or account number, consistent with RCW 65.04.045(1) (f) and (g).

(c)
If the judgment provides for damages arising from the ownership, maintenance,
or use of a motor vehicle as specified in RCW 46.29.270, the first page of the
judgment summary must clearly state that the judgment is awarded pursuant to
RCW 46.29.270 and that the clerk must give notice to the department of
licensing as outlined in RCW 46.29.310.

(3) If the attorney fees and costs are not included in the
judgment, they shall be summarized in the cost bill when filed. The clerk may
not enter a judgment, and a judgment does not take effect, until the judgment
has a summary in compliance with this section. The clerk is not liable for an
incorrect summary.

---
END ---