BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.08.180 and 1999 c 281 s 1 and 1999 c 40 s 7 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor revolving fund shall be
distributed by the board at least once every three months in accordance with
RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210: PROVIDED, That the board shall reserve
from distribution such amount not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as
may be necessary for the proper administration of this title.

(1)
All license fees, penalties and forfeitures derived under ((this act)) chapter
13, Laws of 1935 from spirits, beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer,
and wine private club; and sports entertainment facility licenses or spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant; spirits, beer, and wine private club; and sports entertainment
facility licensees shall every three months be disbursed by the board as
follows:

(a)
Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the ((Washington state
patrol)) death investigations account for the state toxicology
program pursuant to RCW 68.50.107; and

(b)
Of the remaining funds:

(i)
6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent to Washington
State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research and for the
dissemination of such research; and

(ii)
89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department of social and
health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW 70.96A.050;

(2)
The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW 66.24.320 and
66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars annually shall
be disbursed every three months by the board to the general fund to be used for
juvenile alcohol and drug prevention programs for kindergarten through third
grade to be administered by the superintendent of public instruction;

(3)
Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from license fees pursuant
to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and 66.24.360, shall be transferred to
the general fund to be used by the department of social and health services
solely to carry out the purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and

(4) One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210
shall every three months be disbursed by the board to Washington State
University solely for wine and wine grape research, extension programs related
to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in both wine grape
production and the processing aspects of the wine industry in accordance with
RCW 28B.30.068. The director of financial management shall prescribe suitable
accounting procedures to ensure that the funds transferred to the general fund
to be used by the department of social and health services and appropriated are
separately accounted for.

---
END ---