BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW
9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW
9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with
forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a
narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule
I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW
9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW
9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1
(RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW
9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property
for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A
Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW
9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct
1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Foreign Protection Order Violation (RCW 26.52.070
(3) and (4))

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW ((88.12.032)) 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
((88.12.155)) 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled
Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile
Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun
or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2
(RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation
(RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness
(RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or
threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or
possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a
Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for
Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW
69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a
Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.440 and 1999 c 322 s 6 and 1999 c 196 s 11 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Decision not to prosecute.

STANDARD:
A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question or would result in decreased respect for the law.

GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The
following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the
standard.

(a)
Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where
the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent
of the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b)
Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in
question is antiquated in that:

(i)
It has not been enforced for many years; and

(ii)
Most members of society act as if it were no longer in existence; and

(iii)
It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv)
The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This
reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law
in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c)
De Minimus Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where no public
interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d)
Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of
confinement; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iii)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(e)
Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge
because the accused is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another
county; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iv)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(f)
High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on,
prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of
prosecuting the offense in question. This reason should be limited to minor
cases and should not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g)
Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because
the motives of the complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no
public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or
would result in decreased respect for the law.

(h)
Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given
to an accused in order to prosecute another where the accused's information or
testimony will reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible
for more serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the
public interest.

(i)
Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because the victim requests
that no criminal charges be filed and the case involves the following crimes or
situations:

(i)
Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii)
Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no major loss was
suffered;

(iii)
Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care
should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not
the product of threats or pressure by the accused.

The
presence of these factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a
prosecution which has been commenced.

Notification

The
prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law
enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2)
Decision to prosecute.

(a)
STANDARD:

Crimes
against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which,
when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that
could be raised under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable
and objective fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW
9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be provided
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(8).

Crimes
against property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of
such convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

See
table below for the crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES AGAINST PERSONS

Aggravated Murder

1st
Degree Murder

2nd
Degree Murder

1st
Degree Kidnaping

1st
Degree Assault

1st
Degree Assault of a Child

1st
Degree Rape

1st
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Arson

2nd
Degree Kidnaping

2nd
Degree Assault

2nd
Degree Assault of a Child

2nd
Degree Rape

2nd
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Manslaughter

2nd
Degree Manslaughter

1st
Degree Extortion

Indecent
Liberties

Incest

2nd
Degree Rape of a Child

Vehicular
Homicide

Vehicular
Assault

3rd
Degree Rape

3rd
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Child Molestation

3rd
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Extortion

1st
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Intimidating
a Juror

Communication
with a Minor

Intimidating
a Witness

Intimidating
a Public Servant

Bomb
Threat (if against person)

3rd
Degree Assault

3rd
Degree Assault of a Child

Unlawful
Imprisonment

Promoting
a Suicide Attempt

Riot
(if against person)

Stalking

Custodial
Assault

No-Contact Order-Domestic Violence Pretrial (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b)
and (c))

No-Contact Order-Domestic Violence Sentence (RCW 10.99.050(2))

Protection
Order-Domestic Violence Civil (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

Foreign
Protection Order Violation (RCW 26.52.070 (3) and (4))

Counterfeiting
(if a violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))

CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES

2nd Degree Arson

1st
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Theft

1st
Degree Perjury

1st
Degree Introducing Contraband

1st
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

Bribery

Bribing
a Witness

Bribe
received by a Witness

Bomb
Threat (if against property)

1st
Degree Malicious Mischief

2nd
Degree Theft

2nd
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Introducing Contraband

2nd
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

2nd
Degree Malicious Mischief

1st
Degree Reckless Burning

Taking
a Motor Vehicle without Authorization

Forgery

2nd
Degree Perjury

2nd
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Tampering
with a Witness

Trading
in Public Office

Trading
in Special Influence

Receiving/Granting
Unlawful Compensation

Bigamy

Eluding
a Pursuing Police Vehicle

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough

Escape
from Community Custody

Riot
(if against property)

Thefts
of Livestock

ALL
OTHER UNCLASSIFIED FELONIES

Selection
of Charges/Degree of Charge

(i)
The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe the nature of
defendant's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary
to ensure that the charges:

(A)
Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(B)
Will result in restitution to all victims.

(ii) The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea.
Overcharging includes:

(A) Charging a higher degree;

(B)
Charging additional counts.

This
standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which
demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a defendant's criminal conduct, but
to decline to charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication.
Crimes which do not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same
course of conduct, do not all have to be charged.

(b) GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

(i) Police Investigation

A
prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the
necessary factual investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute.
The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has
been conducted before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary
circumstances the investigation should include the following:

(A)
The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of
written statements whenever possible;

(B)
The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and

(C)
The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's
version of the events.

If
the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist
upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify
what the investigation needs to include.

(ii)
Exceptions

In
certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal
complaint before the investigation is complete if:

(A)
Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(B)
The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not
apprehended; or

(C)
The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the
crime.

In
the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting
attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to
complete the investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation
does not produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the
complaint should be dismissed.

(iii)
Investigation Techniques

The
prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were
used in the case investigation including:

(A)
Polygraph testing;

(B)
Hypnosis;

(C)
Electronic surveillance;

(D)
Use of informants.

(iv)
Pre-Filing Discussions with Defendant

Discussions
with the defendant or his/her representative regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential
agreements can be reached.

(v)
Pre-Filing Discussions with Victim(s)

Discussions
with the victim(s) or victims' representatives regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur before the filing of charges. The discussions
may be considered by the prosecutor in charging and disposition decisions, and
should be considered before reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding
these decisions.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000, and applies to offenses committed on or after
July 1, 2000.

---
END ---