BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.41.110 and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of financial management shall:

(1)
Provide technical assistance to the governor and the legislature in identifying
needs and in planning to meet those needs through state programs and a plan for
expenditures.

(2)
Perform the comprehensive planning functions and processes necessary or
advisable for state program planning and development, preparation of the
budget, inter-departmental and inter-governmental coordination and cooperation,
and determination of state capital improvement requirements.

(3)
Provide assistance and coordination to state agencies and departments in their
preparation of plans and programs.

(4)
Provide general coordination and review of plans in functional areas of state
government as may be necessary for receipt of federal or state funds.

(5)
Participate with other states or subdivisions thereof in interstate planning.

(6)
Encourage educational and research programs that further planning and provide
administrative and technical services therefor.

(7)
Carry out the provisions of RCW 43.62.010 through 43.62.050 relating to the
state census.

(8)
Be the official state participant in the federal-state cooperative program for
local population estimates and as such certify all city and county special
censuses to be considered in the allocation of state and federal revenues.

(9)
Be the official state center for processing and dissemination of federal
decennial or quinquennial census data in cooperation with other state agencies.

(10)
Be the official state agency certifying annexations, incorporations, or
disincorporations to the United States bureau of the census.

(11)
Review all United States bureau of the census population estimates used for
federal revenue sharing purposes and provide a liaison for local governments
with the United States bureau of the census in adjusting or correcting revenue
sharing population estimates.

(12)
Provide fiscal notes depicting the expected fiscal impact of proposed
legislation in accordance with chapter 43.88A RCW.

(13)
Be the official state agency to estimate and manage the cash flow of all public
funds as provided in chapter 43.88 RCW. To this end, the office shall adopt
such rules as are necessary to manage the cash flow of public funds.

(14) Complete and make available to the public by December 31st
of each year a report listing all taxes and fees the state is authorized to
levy, citing the statutory authority for each.

---
END ---