BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 71.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
secretary shall adopt rules under the administrative procedure act, chapter
34.05 RCW, for the oversight and operation of the program established pursuant
to this chapter. Such rules shall include provisions for an annual inspection
of the special commitment center and requirements for treatment plans and the
retention of records.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---