BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.82.901 and 1996 c 127 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Sections
1 through 16 of this act ((shall)) expire January 1, ((2001)) 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department of labor and industries, in full consultation with the department of
social and health services, shall conduct a comprehensive cost-benefit
evaluation of the drug-free workplace program. The evaluation shall take into
account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and costs of the
program. The departments of labor and industries and social and health
services shall submit an interim report to the legislature on September 1,
2001, and shall issue a comprehensive final evaluation report on December 1,
2002.

---
END ---