BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An insurer shall not request a credit report on an applicant or existing
policyholder if such an inquiry negatively affects the credit rating or credit
score of the applicant or policyholder. A request for a credit report by an
insurer is deemed to negatively impact the applicant or policyholder unless the
insurance commissioner states in writing that the insurer's procedures
regarding credit reports have no negative impact on applicants or
policyholders.

(2)
For purposes of this section, "credit report" means the same as
"consumer report" as defined in RCW 19.182.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.03 RCW to read as follows:

In
conducting examinations of insurers under this chapter, the commissioner shall
review the insurer's use of credit reports and the insurer's compliance with
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---