BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 66.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall require any person who has any of the following retail licenses
to obtain and maintain liquor liability insurance of at least two hundred
thousand dollars or a bond of at least two hundred thousand dollars with a
surety authorized to conduct a surety business in this state:

(a)
Beer and/or wine restaurant license issued under RCW 66.24.320;

(b)
Private club beer and wine license issued under RCW 66.24.452;

(c)
Public house license issued under RCW 66.24.580;

(d)
Snack bar license issued under RCW 66.24.350;

(e)
Spirits, beer, and wine license issued under RCW 66.24.400;

(f)
Spirits, beer, and wine private club license issued under RCW 66.24.450;

(g)
Tavern license issued under RCW 66.24.330;

(h)
Sports/entertainment facility license issued under RCW 66.24.570; or

(i)
Microbrewery license issued under RCW 66.24.244, a domestic brewery license
issued under RCW 66.24.240, or a domestic winery license issued under RCW
66.24.170, unless the licensee under this subsection (1)(i) does not allow the
consumption of liquor on the premises.

(2)
All licensees subject to the requirements of this section shall supply proof of
compliance at the time the license is issued or renewed. Failure to provide
proof is grounds for the board to deny the license.

(3)
The board may require proof of liquor liability insurance or bond as required
by this section. Failure to provide proof shall be just cause for emergency
suspension of the person's license or licenses until proof of insurance or a
bond is made to the board.

Sec.
2. RCW
66.24.120 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The board in suspending any license may further provide in the
order of suspension that such suspension shall be vacated upon payment to the
board by the licensee of a monetary penalty in an amount then fixed by the
board, or until proof of insurance is presented to the board as required
under section 1 of this act.

---
END ---