BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.210 and 1981 c 139 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be the duty of all peace officers, law enforcement officers, and law
enforcement agencies within this state to investigate, enforce, and prosecute
all violations of this chapter.

(2)
In addition to the authority granted by subsection (1) of this section law
enforcement agencies of cities and counties shall investigate and report to the
commission all violations of the provisions of this chapter and of the rules of
the commission found by them and shall assist the commission in any of its
investigations and proceedings respecting any such violations. Such law
enforcement agencies shall not be deemed agents of the commission.

(3)
In addition to its other powers and duties, the commission shall have the power
to enforce the penal provisions of chapter 218, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and
as it may be amended, and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct
of or participation in gambling activities and the manufacturing, importation,
transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of equipment or
paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith. The director, the
deputy director, both assistant directors, and each of the commission's
investigators, enforcement officers, and inspectors shall have the power, under
the supervision of the commission, to enforce the penal provisions of chapter
218, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and as it may be amended, and the penal laws of
this state relating to the conduct of or participation in gambling activities
and the manufacturing, importation, transportation, distribution, possession,
and sale of equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection
therewith. They shall have the power and authority to apply for and execute
all warrants and serve process of law issued by the courts in enforcing the
penal provisions of chapter 218, Laws of 1973 1st ex. sess. and as it may be
amended, and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct of or
participation in gambling activities and the manufacturing, importation,
transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of equipment or
paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith. They shall have the
power to arrest without a warrant, any person or persons found in the act of
violating any of the penal provisions of chapter 218, Laws of 1973 1st ex.
sess. and as it may be amended, and the penal laws of this state relating to
the conduct of or participation in gambling activities and the manufacturing,
importation, transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of equipment or
paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith. To the extent set forth
above, the commission shall be a law enforcement agency of this state with the
power to investigate for violations of and to enforce the provisions of this
chapter, as now law or hereafter amended, and to obtain information from and
provide information to all other law enforcement agencies.

(4) Criminal history record information that includes
nonconviction data, as defined in RCW 10.97.030, may be disseminated by a
criminal justice agency to the Washington state gambling commission for any
purpose associated with the investigation for suitability for involvement in
gambling activities authorized under this chapter. The Washington state
gambling commission shall only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under
this section to criminal justice agencies.

---
END ---