BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
word "drugs" includes, but is not limited to:

(1)
Those drugs and substances regulated by chapters 69.41 and 69.50 RCW; or

(2)
Any other substance that impairs a person's ability to operate a motor vehicle.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
46.61.540 ("Drugs," what included) and 1975 1st ex.s. c
287 s 5 are each repealed.

---
END ---