BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.225 RCW to read as follows:

Upon the approval of a student's parent and the principal of the
student's school, a student may be excused from school for up to five days each
year to participate in state-recognized search and rescue activities as defined
in chapter 38.52 RCW and accompanying rules.

---
END ---