BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Over 200,000 men in the United States were diagnosed with prostate cancer
during the last year, and approximately forty-two thousand American men died
due to this disease;

(2)
With an estimated nine million American men currently afflicted with this
disease, prostate cancer can be considered a serious epidemic in the United
States deserving immediate public health attention; and

(3)
Significantly more research is needed to determine the causes and most
effective treatments for prostate cancer.

The
legislature further finds that greater public awareness about cancer
prevention, strengthening cancer support networks, and fostering the
development community cancer prevention resources are an important part of the
legislature's goal of cancer prevention and the overall improvement of our
state's public health.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
There is established the prostate cancer task force to consist of seventeen members
selected as follows:

(a)
Two members of the house of representatives, one selected from each of the
caucuses;

(b)
Two members of the senate, one selected from each of the caucuses;

(c)
Two members representing local public health officers;

(d)
One member who is a physician and is a board certified oncologist;

(e)
One member who is a physician and is a board certified urologist;

(f)
Four members who are prostate cancer patients or survivors;

(g)
One member who is a prostate cancer researcher; and

(h)
Four cancer advocates, no less than one of whom must represent the group most
at risk of prostate cancer.

(2)
The secretary of the department of health shall appoint all nonlegislative
members of the task force within thirty days from the effective date of this
act. The secretary shall consider obtaining a geographical distribution and
balance throughout the state.

(3)
Staffing shall be provided by the department of health.

(4)
Members of the task force shall serve without remuneration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
task force shall:

(1)
Conduct a survey and produce a resource guide of public and private community
resources that assist persons with prostrate cancer and their families;

(2)
Identify resources in Washington state that are devoted to conducting prostate
cancer research, detection, and treatment;

(3)
Conduct a national survey of programs, education and training resources, and
research and assistance that could serve as a model for Washington state;

(4)
Develop a state-wide strategy for targeting information, assistance, and direct
care to groups that are most at risk of prostate cancer, and determine the
roles that local and state government, institutions of higher education, and
the private sector should play to decrease the incidence of prostate cancer,
increase the quality of life for patients and survivors of prostate cancer, and
foster the search for a cure;

(5)
Identify areas of the state that are most in need of cancer information and
assistance;

(6)
Determine gaps in research, detection, and treatment of prostate cancer in
Washington state;

(7)
Identify the salient nonmedical supportive needs of prostate cancer patients
and survivors and their families; and

(8)
Provide a written report to the governor, the house of representatives health
care committee, and the senate committee on health and long-term care by
December 12, 2000, presenting the findings and recommendations of the task
force.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act expires July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---