BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.46.020 and 1999 c 353 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Accrual method of accounting" means a method of accounting in which
revenues are reported in the period when they are earned, regardless of when
they are collected, and expenses are reported in the period in which they are
incurred, regardless of when they are paid.

(2)
"Appraisal" means the process of estimating the fair market value or
reconstructing the historical cost of an asset acquired in a past period as
performed by a professionally designated real estate appraiser with no
pecuniary interest in the property to be appraised. It includes a systematic,
analytic determination and the recording and analyzing of property facts,
rights, investments, and values based on a personal inspection and inventory of
the property.

(3)
"Arm's-length transaction" means a transaction resulting from
good-faith bargaining between a buyer and seller who are not related
organizations and have adverse positions in the market place. Sales or
exchanges of nursing home facilities among two or more parties in which all
parties subsequently continue to own one or more of the facilities involved in
the transactions shall not be considered as arm's-length transactions for
purposes of this chapter. Sale of a nursing home facility which is subsequently
leased back to the seller within five years of the date of sale shall not be
considered as an arm's-length transaction for purposes of this chapter.

(4)
"Assets" means economic resources of the contractor, recognized and
measured in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(5)
"Audit" or "department audit" means an examination of the
records of a nursing facility participating in the medicaid payment system,
including but not limited to: The contractor's financial and statistical records,
cost reports and all supporting documentation and schedules, receivables, and
resident trust funds, to be performed as deemed necessary by the department and
according to department rule.

(6)
"Bad debts" means amounts considered to be uncollectible from
accounts and notes receivable.

(7)
"Beneficial owner" means:

(a)
Any person who, directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement,
understanding, relationship, or otherwise has or shares:

(i)
Voting power which includes the power to vote, or to direct the voting of such
ownership interest; and/or

(ii)
Investment power which includes the power to dispose, or to direct the
disposition of such ownership interest;

(b)
Any person who, directly or indirectly, creates or uses a trust, proxy, power
of attorney, pooling arrangement, or any other contract, arrangement, or device
with the purpose or effect of divesting himself or herself of beneficial
ownership of an ownership interest or preventing the vesting of such beneficial
ownership as part of a plan or scheme to evade the reporting requirements of
this chapter;

(c)
Any person who, subject to (b) of this subsection, has the right to acquire
beneficial ownership of such ownership interest within sixty days, including
but not limited to any right to acquire:

(i)
Through the exercise of any option, warrant, or right;

(ii)
Through the conversion of an ownership interest;

(iii)
Pursuant to the power to revoke a trust, discretionary account, or similar
arrangement; or

(iv)
Pursuant to the automatic termination of a trust, discretionary account, or
similar arrangement;

except
that, any person who acquires an ownership interest or power specified in
(c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection with the purpose or effect of
changing or influencing the control of the contractor, or in connection with or
as a participant in any transaction having such purpose or effect, immediately
upon such acquisition shall be deemed to be the beneficial owner of the
ownership interest which may be acquired through the exercise or conversion of
such ownership interest or power;

(d)
Any person who in the ordinary course of business is a pledgee of ownership
interest under a written pledge agreement shall not be deemed to be the
beneficial owner of such pledged ownership interest until the pledgee has taken
all formal steps necessary which are required to declare a default and
determines that the power to vote or to direct the vote or to dispose or to
direct the disposition of such pledged ownership interest will be exercised;
except that:

(i)
The pledgee agreement is bona fide and was not entered into with the purpose
nor with the effect of changing or influencing the control of the contractor,
nor in connection with any transaction having such purpose or effect, including
persons meeting the conditions set forth in (b) of this subsection; and

(ii)
The pledgee agreement, prior to default, does not grant to the pledgee:

(A)
The power to vote or to direct the vote of the pledged ownership interest; or

(B)
The power to dispose or direct the disposition of the pledged ownership
interest, other than the grant of such power(s) pursuant to a pledge agreement
under which credit is extended and in which the pledgee is a broker or dealer.

(8)
"Capital portion of the rate" means the sum of the property and
financing allowance rate allocations, as established in part E of this chapter.

(9)
"Capitalization" means the recording of an expenditure as an asset.

(10)
"Case mix" means a measure of the intensity of care and services
needed by the residents of a nursing facility or a group of residents in the
facility.

(11)
"Case mix index" means a number representing the average case mix of
a nursing facility.

(12)
"Case mix weight" means a numeric score that identifies the relative
resources used by a particular group of a nursing facility's residents.

(13)
"Contractor" means a person or entity licensed under chapter 18.51
RCW to operate a medicare and medicaid certified nursing facility, responsible
for operational decisions, and contracting with the department to provide
services to medicaid recipients residing in the facility.

(14)
"Default case" means no initial assessment has been completed for a
resident and transmitted to the department by the cut‑off date, or an
assessment is otherwise past due for the resident, under state and federal
requirements.

(15)
"Department" means the department of social and health services
(DSHS) and its employees.

(16)
"Depreciation" means the systematic distribution of the cost or other
basis of tangible assets, less salvage, over the estimated useful life of the
assets.

(17)
"Direct care" means nursing care and related care provided to nursing
facility residents. Therapy care shall not be considered part of direct care.

(18)
"Direct care supplies" means medical, pharmaceutical, and other
supplies required for the direct care of a nursing facility's residents.

(19)
"Entity" means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, or any other association of individuals capable of entering
enforceable contracts.

(20)
"Equity" means the net book value of all tangible and intangible
assets less the recorded value of all liabilities, as recognized and measured
in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles.

(21)
"Facility" or "nursing facility" means a nursing home
licensed in accordance with chapter 18.51 RCW, excepting nursing homes
certified as institutions for mental diseases, or that portion of a
multiservice facility licensed as a nursing home, or that portion of a hospital
licensed in accordance with chapter 70.41 RCW which operates as a nursing home.

(22)
"Fair market value" means the replacement cost of an asset less
observed physical depreciation on the date for which the market value is being
determined.

(23)
"Financial statements" means statements prepared and presented in conformity
with generally accepted accounting principles including, but not limited to,
balance sheet, statement of operations, statement of changes in financial
position, and related notes.

(24)
"Generally accepted accounting principles" means accounting principles
approved by the financial accounting standards board (FASB).

(25)
"Goodwill" means the excess of the price paid for a nursing facility
business over the fair market value of all net identifiable tangible and
intangible assets acquired, as measured in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.

(26)
"Grouper" means a computer software product that groups individual
nursing facility residents into case mix classification groups based on
specific resident assessment data and computer logic.

(27)
"Historical cost" means the actual cost incurred in acquiring and
preparing an asset for use, including feasibility studies, architect's fees,
and engineering studies.

(28)
"Imprest fund" means a fund which is regularly replenished in exactly
the amount expended from it.

(29)
"Joint facility costs" means any costs which represent resources
which benefit more than one facility, or one facility and any other entity.

(30)
"Lease agreement" means a contract between two parties for the
possession and use of real or personal property or assets for a specified
period of time in exchange for specified periodic payments. Elimination (due
to any cause other than death or divorce) or addition of any party to the
contract, expiration, or modification of any lease term in effect on January 1,
1980, or termination of the lease by either party by any means shall constitute
a termination of the lease agreement. An extension or renewal of a lease
agreement, whether or not pursuant to a renewal provision in the lease
agreement, shall be considered a new lease agreement. A strictly formal change
in the lease agreement which modifies the method, frequency, or manner in which
the lease payments are made, but does not increase the total lease payment
obligation of the lessee, shall not be considered modification of a lease term.

(31)
"Medical care program" or "medicaid program" means medical
assistance, including nursing care, provided under RCW 74.09.500 or authorized
state medical care services.

(32)
"Medical care recipient," "medicaid recipient," or
"recipient" means an individual determined eligible by the department
for the services provided under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(33)
"Minimum data set" means the overall data component of the resident
assessment instrument, indicating the strengths, needs, and preferences of an
individual nursing facility resident.

(34)
"Net book value" means the historical cost of an asset less
accumulated depreciation.

(35)
"Net invested funds" means the net book value of tangible fixed
assets employed by a contractor to provide services under the medical care
program, including land, buildings, and equipment as recognized and measured in
conformity with generally accepted accounting principles, plus an allowance
of working capital which shall be five percent of the product of the per
patient day rate multiplied by the prior calendar year adjusted total patient
days of each contractor.

(36)
"Noncapital portion of the rate" means the sum of the direct care,
therapy care, operations, support services, and variable return rate
allocations, as established in part E of this chapter.

(37)
"Operating lease" means a lease under which rental or lease expenses
are included in current expenses in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles.

(38)
"Owner" means a sole proprietor, general or limited partners, members
of a limited liability company, and beneficial interest holders of five percent
or more of a corporation's outstanding stock.

(39)
"Ownership interest" means all interests beneficially owned by a
person, calculated in the aggregate, regardless of the form which such
beneficial ownership takes.

(40)
"Patient day" or "resident day" means a calendar day of
care provided to a nursing facility resident, regardless of payment source,
which will include the day of admission and exclude the day of discharge;
except that, when admission and discharge occur on the same day, one day of
care shall be deemed to exist. A "medicaid day" or "recipient
day" means a calendar day of care provided to a medicaid recipient
determined eligible by the department for services provided under chapter 74.09
RCW, subject to the same conditions regarding admission and discharge
applicable to a patient day or resident day of care.

(41)
"Professionally designated real estate appraiser" means an individual
who is regularly engaged in the business of providing real estate valuation
services for a fee, and who is deemed qualified by a nationally recognized real
estate appraisal educational organization on the basis of extensive practical
appraisal experience, including the writing of real estate valuation reports as
well as the passing of written examinations on valuation practice and theory,
and who by virtue of membership in such organization is required to subscribe
and adhere to certain standards of professional practice as such organization
prescribes.

(42)
"Qualified therapist" means:

(a)
A mental health professional as defined by chapter 71.05 RCW;

(b)
A mental retardation professional who is a therapist approved by the department
who has had specialized training or one year's experience in treating or
working with the mentally retarded or developmentally disabled;

(c)
A speech pathologist who is eligible for a certificate of clinical competence
in speech pathology or who has the equivalent education and clinical
experience;

(d)
A physical therapist as defined by chapter 18.74 RCW;

(e)
An occupational therapist who is a graduate of a program in occupational
therapy, or who has the equivalent of such education or training; and

(f)
A respiratory care practitioner certified under chapter 18.89 RCW.

(43)
"Rate" or "rate allocation" means the medicaid
per-patient-day payment amount for medicaid patients calculated in accordance
with the allocation methodology set forth in part E of this chapter.

(44)
"Real property," whether leased or owned by the contractor, means the
building, allowable land, land improvements, and building improvements
associated with a nursing facility.

(45)
"Rebased rate" or "cost-rebased rate" means a
facility-specific component rate assigned to a nursing facility for a
particular rate period established on desk-reviewed, adjusted costs reported
for that facility covering at least six months of a prior calendar year
designated as a year to be used for cost-rebasing payment rate allocations
under the provisions of this chapter.

(46)
"Records" means those data supporting all financial statements and
cost reports including, but not limited to, all general and subsidiary ledgers,
books of original entry, and transaction documentation, however such data are
maintained.

(47)
"Related organization" means an entity which is under common
ownership and/or control with, or has control of, or is controlled by, the
contractor.

(a)
"Common ownership" exists when an entity is the beneficial owner of
five percent or more ownership interest in the contractor and any other entity.

(b)
"Control" exists where an entity has the power, directly or indirectly,
significantly to influence or direct the actions or policies of an organization
or institution, whether or not it is legally enforceable and however it is
exercisable or exercised.

(48)
"Related care" means only those services that are directly related to
providing direct care to nursing facility residents. These services include,
but are not limited to, nursing direction and supervision, medical direction,
medical records, pharmacy services, activities, and social services.

(49)
"Resident assessment instrument," including federally approved
modifications for use in this state, means a federally mandated, comprehensive
nursing facility resident care planning and assessment tool, consisting of the
minimum data set and resident assessment protocols.

(50)
"Resident assessment protocols" means those components of the
resident assessment instrument that use the minimum data set to trigger or flag
a resident's potential problems and risk areas.

(51)
"Resource utilization groups" means a case mix classification system
that identifies relative resources needed to care for an individual nursing
facility resident.

(52)
"Restricted fund" means those funds the principal and/or income of
which is limited by agreement with or direction of the donor to a specific purpose.

(53)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services.

(54)
"Support services" means food, food preparation, dietary,
housekeeping, and laundry services provided to nursing facility residents.

(55)
"Therapy care" means those services required by a nursing facility
resident's comprehensive assessment and plan of care, that are provided by
qualified therapists, or support personnel under their supervision, including
related costs as designated by the department.

(56)
"Title XIX" or "medicaid" means the 1965 amendments to the
social security act, P.L. 89‑07, as amended and the medicaid program
administered by the department.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.46.421 and 1999 c 353 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of part E of this chapter is to determine nursing facility medicaid
payment rates that, in the aggregate for all participating nursing facilities,
are in accordance with the biennial appropriations act.

(2)(a)
The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid payment rate
methodologies described in this chapter to determine initial component rate
allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.

(b)
The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to adjustment as
provided in this section in order to assure that the state-wide average payment
rate to nursing facilities is less than or equal to the state-wide average
payment rate specified in the biennial appropriations act.

(3)
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating a legal right or
entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been adjusted under this section or
(b) would cause the state-wide average payment rate to exceed the state-wide
average payment rate specified in the biennial appropriations act.

(4)(a)
The state-wide average payment rate for the capital portion of the rate for any
state fiscal year under the nursing facility medicaid payment system, weighted
by patient days, shall not exceed the annual state-wide weighted average
nursing facility payment rate for the capital portion of the rate identified
for that fiscal year in the biennial appropriations act.

(b)
If the department determines that the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate for the capital portion of the rate calculated in accordance with this
chapter is likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
for the capital portion of the rate identified in the biennial appropriations
act, then the department shall adjust all nursing facility property and
financing allowance payment rates proportional to the amount by which the
weighted average rate allocations would otherwise exceed the budgeted capital
portion of the rate amount. Any such adjustments shall only be made
prospectively, not retrospectively, and shall be applied proportionately to
each component rate allocation for each facility.

(c)
Any rate adjustments made under (b) of this subsection that are in excess of
the amount necessary to comply with (a) of this subsection shall be refunded to
each nursing facility.

(5)(a)
The state-wide average payment rate for the noncapital portion of the rate for
any state fiscal year under the nursing facility payment system, weighted by
patient days, shall not exceed the annual state-wide weighted average nursing
facility payment rate for the noncapital portion of the rate identified for
that fiscal year in the biennial appropriations act.

(b)
If the department determines that the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate for the noncapital portion of the rate calculated in accordance with this
chapter is likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
for the noncapital portion of the rate identified in the biennial
appropriations act, then the department shall adjust all nursing facility
direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, and variable return
payment rates proportional to the amount by which the weighted average rate
allocations would otherwise exceed the budgeted noncapital portion of the rate
amount. Any such adjustments shall only be made prospectively, not
retrospectively, and shall be applied proportionately to each direct care,
therapy care, support services, operations, and variable return rate allocation
for each facility.

(c)
Any rate adjustments made under (b) of this subsection that are in excess of
the amount necessary to comply with (a) of this subsection shall be refunded to
each nursing facility.

(6)(a)
If pro rata reductions are made pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section
but not pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section, and if the annual
state-wide weighted average nursing facility payment rate for the noncapital
portion of the rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act is greater than the state-wide average payment rate for the
noncapital portion of the rate for that state fiscal year under the nursing
facility medicaid payment system, weighted by patient days, then at the end of
that state fiscal year, the department shall:

(i)
Calculate the difference between the actual rate and the rate set in the
biennial appropriations act;

(ii)
For the purposes of implementing subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
increase the capital portion of the rate established in the biennial
appropriations act by the amount calculated in (a)(i) of this subsection (6);
and

(iii)
Apply the provisions of subsection (4)(c) of this section.

(b)
If pro rata reductions are made pursuant to subsection (5)(b) of this section
but not pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section, and if the annual
state-wide weighted average nursing facility payment rate for the capital
portion of the rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act is greater than the state-wide average payment rate for the
capital portion of the rate for that state fiscal year under the nursing
facility medicaid payment system, weighted by patient days, then at the end of
that fiscal year the department shall:

(i)
Calculate the difference between the actual rate and the rate set in the
biennial appropriations act;

(ii)
For the purposes of implementing subsections (4) and (5) of this section,
increase the noncapital portion of the rate established in the biennial
appropriations act by the amount calculated in (b)(i) of this subsection (6);
and

(iii)
Apply the provisions of subsection (5)(c) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
74.46.908 (Repealer) and 1999 c 353 s 17 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

(2) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---