BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

TABLE
OF CONTENTS

Page
#

I.
WASHINGTON STATE HEALTH INSURANCE POOL...................... 2

A.
INDIVIDUAL HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE OFFERED BY THE POOL.... 7

B.
RISK SHARING PROGRAM....................................... 19

II.
INSURANCE ACCESS RULES.................................... 22

III.
ELIMINATION OF MODEL PLAN MANDATE IN INDIVIDUAL AND SMALL GROUP MARKET..................................................... 34

IV.
INDIVIDUAL AND GROUP MARKET RATE SETTING.................. 49

V.
WASHINGTON BASIC HEALTH PLAN............................... 57

VI.
MISCELLANEOUS............................................. 81

I. WASHINGTON STATE HEALTH
INSURANCE POOL

Sec.
101. RCW
48.41.020 and 1987 c 431 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the purpose and intent of the legislature to provide access to health
insurance coverage to all residents of Washington who are denied ((adequate))
health insurance ((for any reason)). ((It is the intent of the
legislature that adequate levels of health insurance coverage be made available
to residents of Washington who are otherwise considered uninsurable or who are
underinsured.)) It is the intent of the Washington state health insurance
coverage access act to:

(1)
Provide a mechanism to ((insure)) ensure the availability of
comprehensive health insurance to persons unable to obtain such insurance
coverage on either an individual or group basis directly under any health plan;

(2)
Establish a mechanism to equitably distribute the excessive risk sometimes
associated with the individual health insurance markets among all health
purchasers;

(3)
Enable health carriers to better protect against the cost of covering high risk
individuals; and

(4)
Create incentives for carriers to develop quality health plans in the
individual markets, rather than focus on risk avoidance.

Sec.
102. RCW
48.41.030 and 1997 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meaning indicated,)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise((:)).

(1)
"Accounting year" means a twelve-month period determined by the board
for purposes of record-keeping and accounting. The first accounting year may
be more or less than twelve months and, from time to time in subsequent years,
the board may order an accounting year of other than twelve months as may be
required for orderly management and accounting of the pool.

(2)
"Administrator" means the entity chosen by the board to administer
the pool under RCW 48.41.080.

(3)
"Board" means the board of directors of the pool.

(4)
"Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.

(5)
"Covered person" means any individual resident of this state who is
eligible to receive benefits from any member, or other health plan.

(6)
"Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.38.025.

(7)
"Health care provider" means any physician, facility, or health care
professional, who is licensed in Washington state and entitled to reimbursement
for health care services.

(8)
"Health care services" means services for the purpose of preventing,
alleviating, curing, or healing human illness or injury.

(9)
"Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005.

(10)
"Health coverage" means any group or individual disability insurance
policy, health care service contract, and health maintenance agreement, except
those contracts entered into for the provision of health care services pursuant
to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq. The
term does not include short-term care, long-term care, dental, vision,
accident, fixed indemnity, disability income contracts, civilian health and
medical program for the uniform services (CHAMPUS), 10 U.S.C. 55, limited
benefit or credit insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability
insurance, insurance arising out of the worker's compensation or similar law,
automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are
payable with or without regard to fault and which is statutorily required to be
contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(((10)))
(11) "Health plan" means any arrangement by which persons,
including dependents or spouses, covered or making application to be covered
under this pool, have access to hospital and medical benefits or reimbursement
including any group or individual disability insurance policy; health care
service contract; health maintenance agreement; uninsured arrangements of group
or group-type contracts including employer self-insured, cost-plus, or other
benefit methodologies not involving insurance or not governed by Title 48 RCW;
coverage under group-type contracts which are not available to the general
public and can be obtained only because of connection with a particular
organization or group; and coverage by medicare or other governmental
benefits. This term includes coverage through "health coverage" as
defined under this section, and specifically excludes those types of programs
excluded under the definition of "health coverage" in subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.

(((11)))
(12) "Medical assistance" means coverage under Title XIX of
the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., Sec. 1396 et seq.) and chapter
74.09 RCW.

(((12)))
(13) "Medicare" means coverage under Title XVIII of the Social
Security Act, (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).

(((13)))
(14) "Member" means any commercial insurer ((which)) that
provides disability insurance or group stop loss insurance as defined in RCW
48.21.015, any health care service contractor, and any health maintenance
organization licensed under Title 48 RCW. "Member" shall also mean,
as soon as authorized by federal law, employers and other entities, including a
self-funding entity and employee welfare benefit plans that provide health plan
benefits in this state on or after May 18, 1987. "Member" does not
include any insurer, health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization
whose products are exclusively dental products or those products excluded from
the definition of "health coverage" set forth in subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.

(((14)))
(15) "Network provider" means a health care provider who has
contracted in writing with the pool administrator or a health carrier
contracting with the pool administrator to offer pool coverage to accept
payment from and to look solely to the pool or health carrier according
to the terms of the pool health plans.

(((15)))
(16) "Plan of operation" means the pool, including articles,
by-laws, and operating rules, adopted by the board pursuant to RCW 48.41.050.

(((16)))
(17) "Point of service plan" means a benefit plan offered by
the pool under which a covered person may elect to receive covered services
from network providers, or nonnetwork providers at a reduced rate of benefits.

(((17)))
(18) "Pool" means the Washington state health insurance pool
as created in RCW 48.41.040.

(((18)
"Substantially equivalent health plan" means a "health
plan" as defined in subsection (10) of this section which, in the judgment
of the board or the administrator, offers persons including dependents or
spouses covered or making application to be covered by this pool an overall level
of benefits deemed approximately equivalent to the minimum benefits available
under this pool.))

(19)
"Small employer" or "small group" has the same meaning as
in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
103. RCW
48.41.040 and 1989 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is ((hereby)) created a nonprofit entity to be known as the
Washington state health insurance pool.

(2)
The pool has two functions:

(a)
To offer health insurance coverage to eligible persons as defined in RCW
48.41.100. The continued need for this function shall be reviewed by the
legislature in 2003 as provided in section 116 of this act; and

(b)
To administer a risk sharing program for subsidization and equitable
distribution of individual market losses experienced by health carriers, as
provided in this chapter.

(3)
All members in this state on or after May 18, 1987, shall be members of the
pool. When authorized by federal law, all self-insured employers shall also be
members of the pool.

(((2)
Pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW the commissioner shall, within ninety days after
May 18, 1987, give notice to all members of the time and place for the initial
organizational meetings of the pool.))

(4)
A board of directors shall be established, which shall be comprised of ((nine))
eleven voting members. The ((commissioner)) governor
shall select ((three)) six members of the board ((who)).
One shall represent (((a) the general public, (b))) health care
providers, ((and (c))) one shall represent health insurance
agents, two shall represent consumers, one shall represent private small
employer health care purchasers, and one shall represent private large employer
health care purchasers. ((The remaining)) Four members of
the board shall be selected by election from among the members of the pool((.
The elected members shall)), and, to the extent possible, shall
include at least one representative of health care service contractors, one
representative of health maintenance organizations, and one representative of
commercial insurers which provides disability insurance. The governor shall
select one additional member of the board who shall serve as chair. The chair
must not be an employee or director of a member of the pool. When
self-insured organizations become eligible for participation in the pool, the
membership of the board shall be increased to ((eleven and at least one
member of the board shall represent the self-insurers)) thirteen. One
of the new members shall be appointed by the governor, and one, who shall
represent the self-insurers, shall be selected by election from among the
members of the pool. The insurance commissioner shall serve as an ex officio
nonvoting member.

(((3)))
(5) Except for the chair, the original voting members of the
board of directors shall be appointed for intervals of one to three years.
Thereafter, except for the chair, all voting board members shall
serve a term of three years. The chair shall serve at the pleasure of the
governor. Board members shall receive no compensation, but shall be
reimbursed for all travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(((4)))
(6) The board shall submit to the commissioner a plan of operation for
the pool and any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to assure the fair,
reasonable, and equitable administration of the pool. The commissioner shall,
after notice and hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, approve the plan of
operation if it is determined to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable
administration of the pool and provides for the sharing of ((pool))
losses on an equitable, proportionate basis among the members of the pool. The
plan of operation shall become effective upon approval in writing by the
commissioner consistent with the date on which the coverage under this chapter
must be made available. If the board fails to submit a plan of operation
within one hundred eighty days after the appointment of the board or any time
thereafter fails to submit acceptable amendments to the plan, the commissioner
shall, within ninety days after notice and hearing pursuant to chapters 34.05
and 48.04 RCW, adopt such rules as are necessary or advisable to effectuate
this chapter. The rules shall continue in force until modified by the
commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by the board and approved by the
commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104.
Thirty days from the effective date of this section, the existing board of
directors of the Washington state health insurance pool shall be dissolved, and
the appointment or election of new members of the board under RCW 48.41.040
shall be effective. For purposes of setting terms, the new members of the
board shall be treated as original members.

A.
INDIVIDUAL HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE OFFERED BY THE POOL

Sec.
105. RCW
48.41.060 and 1997 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of offering health insurance coverage, the board shall have
the general powers and authority granted under the laws of this state to insurance
companies, health care service contractors, and health maintenance
organizations, licensed or registered to offer or provide the kinds of health
coverage defined under this title. In addition thereto, the board ((may:

(1)
Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and
purposes of this chapter including the authority, with the approval of the
commissioner, to enter into contracts with similar pools of other states for
the joint performance of common administrative functions, or with persons or
other organizations for the performance of administrative functions;

(2)
Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary to avoid the
payment of improper claims against the pool or the coverage provided by or through
the pool;

(3))) shall:

(a)
Establish appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments, expense
allowances, agent referral fees, claim reserve formulas and any other actuarial
functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates shall not be
unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the risk experience, and
expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and rate schedules may be adjusted
for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation in claim costs and
shall take into consideration appropriate risk factors in accordance with
established actuarial underwriting practices consistent with Washington state
small group plan rating requirements under RCW 48.44.023 and 48.46.066;

(((4)
Assess members of the pool in accordance with the provisions of this chapter,
and make advance interim assessments as may be reasonable and necessary for the
organizational or interim operating expenses. Any interim assessments will be
credited as offsets against any regular assessments due following the close of
the year;

(5))) (b)
Issue policies of health coverage in accordance with the requirements of this
chapter; and

(((6)))
(c) Establish procedures for the administration of the premium discounts
provided under RCW 48.41.200.

(2)
For purposes of administering the risk sharing program, the board shall:

(a)
Establish the standard health plans, as provided in section 117 of this act;
and

(b)
Determine carrier losses eligible for subsidization and disburse loss recovery
payments, as provided in section 118 of this act.

(3)(a)
For purposes of both offering health insurance coverage and administering the
risk sharing program, the board shall assess members of the pool as provided in
this chapter, and make advance assessments as may be reasonable and necessary
for organizational or interim operating expenses. Any interim assessments will
be credited as offsets against any regular assessments due following the close
of the year.

(b)
If the board determines that assessments in any accounting year will exceed the
threshold level established in section 120 of this act, the board shall
petition the commissioner for approval of an assessment in excess of the
threshold amount.

(4)
In addition, the board may:

(a)
Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and
purposes of this chapter, including the authority, with the approval of the
commissioner, to enter into contracts with similar pools of other states for
the joint performance of common administrative functions, or with persons or
other organizations for the performance of administrative functions;

(b)
Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary to avoid the
payment of improper claims against the pool or the coverage provided by or
through the pool;

(c)
Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial and other committees as necessary to
provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool, policy, and other
contract design, and any other function within the authority of the pool; and

(((7)))
(d) Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the
financial data submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the pool to
have an annual audit of its operations by an independent certified public
accountant.

Sec.
106. RCW
48.41.080 and 1997 c 231 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall select an administrator ((from the membership of the pool))
whether domiciled in this state or another state through a competitive bidding
process to administer the pool.

(1)
The board shall evaluate bids based upon criteria established by the board,
which shall include:

(a)
The administrator's proven ability to handle health coverage;

(b)
The efficiency of the administrator's claim-paying procedures;

(c)
An estimate of the total charges for administering the plan; and

(d)
The administrator's ability to administer the pool in a cost-effective manner.

(2)
The administrator shall serve for a period of three years subject to removal
for cause. At least six months prior to the expiration of each three-year
period of service by the administrator, the board shall invite all interested
parties, including the current administrator, to submit bids to serve as the
administrator for the succeeding three-year period. Selection of the
administrator for this succeeding period shall be made at least three months
prior to the end of the current three-year period.

(3)
The administrator shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the board
including:

(a)
((All)) Administering eligibility and administrative claim
payment functions relating to the pool;

(b)
Administering procedures to identify those eligible for premium discounts
under RCW 48.41.200;

(c)
Establishing a premium billing procedure for collection of premiums from
covered persons. Billings shall be made on a periodic basis as determined by
the board, which shall not be more frequent than a monthly billing;

(((c)))
(d) Performing all necessary functions to assure timely payment of
benefits to covered persons under the pool including:

(i)
Making available information relating to the proper manner of submitting a
claim for benefits to the pool, and distributing forms upon which submission
shall be made;

(ii)
Taking steps necessary to offer and administer managed care benefit plans; and

(iii)
Evaluating the eligibility of each claim for payment by the pool;

(((d)))
(e) Submission of regular reports to the board regarding the operation
of the pool. The frequency, content, and form of the report shall be as
determined by the board;

(((e)))
(f) Following the close of each accounting year, determination of net
paid and earned premiums, the expense of administration, and the paid and
incurred losses for the year and reporting this information to the board and
the commissioner on a form as prescribed by the commissioner.

(4)
The administrator shall be paid as provided in the contract between the board
and the administrator for its expenses incurred in the performance of its
services.

Sec.
107. RCW
48.41.090 and 1989 c 121 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For health insurance coverage issued by the pool, following the close of
each accounting year, the pool administrator shall determine the net premium
(premiums less administrative expense allowances), the pool expenses of
administration, and incurred losses for the year, taking into account
investment income and other appropriate gains and losses.

(2)(a)
Each member's proportion of participation in the pool shall be determined
annually by the board based on annual statements and other reports deemed
necessary by the board and filed by the member with the commissioner; and shall
be determined by multiplying the total cost of pool operation by a fraction((,)).
The numerator of ((which)) the fraction equals that member's
total: Number of resident insured persons, including spouse and
dependents under the member's health plans; plus the number of resident
beneficiaries covered under group stop loss insurance as defined in RCW
48.21.015, minus; the number of insured persons covered under individual
policies or contracts in the state during the preceding calendar year((,
and)). The denominator of ((which)) the fraction
equals the total number of resident insured persons including spouses and
dependents insured under all health plans, and resident beneficiaries
covered under group stop loss insurance as defined in RCW 48.21.015, minus the
number of insured persons covered under individual policies or contracts in
the state by pool members.

(b)
Any deficit incurred by the pool shall be recouped by assessments among members
apportioned under this subsection pursuant to the formula set forth by the
board among members.

(3)
The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member
if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the
ability of the member to fulfill its contractual obligations. If an assessment
against a member is abated or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which
such assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members
in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in subsection
(2) of this section. The member receiving such abatement or deferment shall
remain liable to the pool for the deficiency.

(4)
If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the pool,
the excess shall be held at interest and used by the board to offset future
losses or to reduce pool premiums. As used in this subsection, "future
losses" includes reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

Sec.
108. RCW
48.41.100 and 1995 c 34 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any individual person who is a resident of this state is eligible ((for))
to purchase pool coverage ((upon providing evidence of rejection for
medical reasons, a requirement of restrictive riders, an up-rated premium, or a
preexisting conditions limitation on health insurance, the effect of which is
to substantially reduce coverage from that received by a person considered a
standard risk, by at least one member within six months of the date of
application. Evidence of rejection may be waived in accordance with rules
adopted by the board)) if they reside in a county of the state where no
member offers to the public all of the standard health plans as provided in
section 202 of this act.

(2)
The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the pool:

(a)
Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i) twelve months have
lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can show continuous other
coverage which has been involuntarily terminated for any reason other than
nonpayment of premiums;

(b)
Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out five hundred thousand dollars
in benefits;

(c)
Inmates of public institutions and persons whose benefits are duplicated under
public programs.

(3)
Any person whose health insurance coverage is involuntarily terminated for any
reason other than nonpayment of premium may apply for coverage under the plan.

Sec.
109. RCW
48.41.110 and 1997 c 231 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The pool ((is authorized to)) shall offer health plans,
including one or more managed care plans of coverage as provided in this
section and RCW 48.41.120, 48.41.130, 48.41.140, 48.41.200, and sections 112
and 114 of this act. ((Such plans))

(2)
The managed care plans of coverage may, but are not required to, include
point of service features that permit participants to receive in-network
benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to differential cost shares.
Covered persons enrolled in the pool on January 1, ((1997)) 2000,
may continue coverage under the pool plan in which they are enrolled on that
date. However, the pool may incorporate managed care features into such
existing plans.

(((2)))
(3) The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining the benefits
and exclusions of the pool policy in plain language. After approval by the
board ((of directors)), such brochure shall be made reasonably available
to participants or potential participants.

(4)
The health insurance policy issued by the pool shall pay only ((usual, customary,
and)) reasonable ((charges)) amounts for medically necessary
eligible health care services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis or
treatment of illnesses, injuries, and conditions which are not otherwise
limited or excluded. Eligible expenses are the ((usual, customary, and))
reasonable ((charges)) amounts for the health care services and
items for which benefits are extended under the pool policy. Such benefits
shall at minimum include, but not be limited to, the following services or
related items:

(a)
Hospital services, including charges for the most common semiprivate room, for
the most common private room if semiprivate rooms do not exist in the health
care facility, or for the private room if medically necessary, but limited to a
total of one hundred eighty inpatient days in a calendar year, and limited to
thirty days inpatient care for mental and nervous conditions, or alcohol, drug,
or chemical dependency or abuse per calendar year;

(b)
Professional services including surgery for the treatment of injuries,
illnesses, or conditions, other than dental, which are rendered by a health
care provider, or at the direction of a health care provider, by a staff of
registered or licensed practical nurses, or other health care providers;

(c)
The first twenty outpatient professional visits for the diagnosis or treatment
of one or more mental or nervous conditions or alcohol, drug, or chemical
dependency or abuse rendered during a calendar year by one or more physicians,
psychologists, or community mental health professionals, or, at the direction
of a physician, by other qualified licensed health care practitioners, in the
case of mental or nervous conditions, and rendered by a state certified
chemical dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW, in the case of
alcohol, drug, or chemical dependency or abuse;

(d)
Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a prescription;

(e)
Services of a skilled nursing facility, excluding custodial and convalescent
care, for not more than one hundred days in a calendar year as prescribed by a
physician;

(f)
Services of a home health agency;

(g)
Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and nuclear medicine therapy;

(h)
Oxygen;

(i)
Anesthesia services;

(j)
Prostheses, other than dental;

(k)
Durable medical equipment which has no personal use in the absence of the
condition for which prescribed;

(l)
Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;

(m)
Oral surgery limited to the following: Fractures of facial bones; excisions of
mandibular joints, lesions of the mouth, lip, or tongue, tumors, or cysts
excluding treatment for temporomandibular joints; incision of accessory
sinuses, mouth salivary glands or ducts; dislocations of the jaw; plastic
reconstruction or repair of traumatic injuries occurring while covered under
the pool; and excision of impacted wisdom teeth;

(n)
Maternity care services, as provided in the managed care plan to be designed by
the pool board of directors, and for which no preexisting condition waiting
periods may apply;

(o)
Services of a physical therapist and services of a speech therapist;

(p)
Hospice services;

(q)
Professional ambulance service to the nearest health care facility qualified to
treat the illness or injury; and

(r)
Other medical equipment, services, or supplies required by physician's orders
and medically necessary and consistent with the diagnosis, treatment, and
condition.

(((3)))
(5) The board shall design and employ cost containment measures and
requirements such as, but not limited to, care coordination, provider network
limitations, preadmission certification, and concurrent inpatient review which
may make the pool more cost-effective.

(((4)))
(6) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit limitations, exceptions,
and cost shares such as copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles that are
consistent with managed care products, except that differential cost shares may
be adopted by the board for nonnetwork providers under point of service plans.
The pool benefit policy cost shares and limitations must be consistent with
those that are generally included in health plans approved by the insurance
commissioner; however, no limitation, exception, or reduction may be used that
would exclude coverage for any disease, illness, or injury.

(((5)))
(7) The pool may not reject an individual for health plan coverage based
upon preexisting conditions of the individual or deny, exclude, or otherwise
limit coverage for an individual's preexisting health conditions; except that
it ((may)) shall impose a ((three-month)) six-month
benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions for which medical advice was
given, or for which a health care provider recommended or provided treatment,
within ((three)) six months before the effective date of
coverage. The pool may not avoid the requirements of this section through the
creation of a new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification. Credit against the waiting period shall be provided as
required by RCW 48.43.015.

Sec.
110. RCW
48.41.120 and 1989 c 121 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitation provided in subsection (3) of this section, a pool
policy offered in accordance with ((this chapter)) RCW 48.41.110(4)
shall impose a deductible. Deductibles of five hundred dollars and one
thousand dollars on a per person per calendar year basis shall initially be
offered. The board may authorize deductibles in other amounts. The deductible
shall be applied to the first five hundred dollars, one thousand dollars, or
other authorized amount of eligible expenses incurred by the covered person.

(2)
Subject to the limitations provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
mandatory coinsurance requirement shall be imposed at the rate of twenty
percent of eligible expenses in excess of the mandatory deductible.

(3)
The maximum aggregate out of pocket payments for eligible expenses by the
insured in the form of deductibles and coinsurance under a pool policy
offered in accordance with RCW 48.41.110(4) shall not exceed in a calendar
year:

(a)
One thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or three thousand dollars per
family, per calendar year for the five hundred dollar deductible policy;

(b)
Two thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or five thousand dollars per
family per calendar year for the one thousand dollar deductible policy; or

(c)
An amount authorized by the board for any other deductible policy.

(4)
Eligible expenses incurred by a covered person in the last three months of a
calendar year, and applied toward a deductible, shall also be applied toward
the deductible amount in the next calendar year.

Sec.
111. RCW
48.41.130 and 1997 c 231 s 215 are each amended to read as follows:

All
policy forms issued by the pool shall conform in substance to prototype forms
developed by the pool, and shall in all other respects conform to the
requirements of this chapter, and shall be filed with and approved by the
commissioner before they are issued. ((The pool shall not issue a pool
policy to any individual who, on the effective date of the coverage applied
for, already has or would have coverage substantially equivalent to a pool
policy as an insured or covered dependent, or who would be eligible for such
coverage if he or she elected to obtain it at a lesser premium rate. However,
coverage provided by the basic health plan, as established pursuant to chapter
70.47 RCW, shall not be deemed substantially equivalent for the purposes of
this section.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 112. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
board shall design and offer, on or before June 1, 2000, an additional plan of
coverage. The plan shall be designed to offer a more affordable plan option
for pool enrollees, and shall have the following components:

(1)
Services covered more limited in scope than those contained in RCW
48.41.110(4);

(2)
Enrollee cost-sharing that may include but not be limited to point-of-service
cost-sharing for covered services;

(3)
Deductibles of three thousand dollars on a per person per calendar year basis,
and four thousand dollars on a per family per calendar year basis. The
deductible shall be applied to the first three thousand dollars, or four
thousand dollars, of eligible expenses incurred by the covered person or
family, respectively, except that the deductible shall not be applied to
clinical preventive services as recommended by the United States public health
service;

(4)
Alternative payment methodologies for network providers that may include but
are not limited to resource-based relative value fee schedules, capitation
payments, diagnostic related group fee schedules, and other similar strategies
including risk sharing arrangements; and

(5)
Other appropriate care management and cost containment measures determined
appropriate by the board including but not limited to care coordination,
provider network limitations, preadmission certification, and utilization
review. Care management or cost containment measures chosen by the board must
be consistent with any applicable rules adopted by the commissioner under this
title.

Sec.
113. RCW
48.41.140 and 1987 c 431 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Coverage shall provide that health insurance benefits are applicable to
children of the person in whose name the policy is issued including adopted and
newly born natural children. Coverage shall also include necessary care and
treatment of medically diagnosed congenital defects and birth abnormalities.
If payment of a specific premium is required to provide coverage for the child,
the policy may require that notification of the birth or adoption of a child
and payment of the required premium must be furnished to the pool within
thirty-one days after the date of birth or adoption in order to have the
coverage continued beyond the thirty-one day period. For purposes of this
subsection, a child is deemed to be adopted, and benefits are payable, when the
child is physically placed for purposes of adoption under the laws of this
state with the person in whose name the policy is issued; and, when the person
in whose name the policy is issued assumes financial responsibility for the
medical expenses of the child. For purposes of this subsection, "newly
born" means, and benefits are payable, from the moment of birth.

(2)
A pool policy shall provide that coverage of a dependent, unmarried person
shall terminate when the person becomes nineteen years of age: PROVIDED, That
coverage of such person shall not terminate at age nineteen while he or she is
and continues to be both (a) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason
of developmental disability or physical handicap and (b) chiefly dependent upon
the person in whose name the policy is issued for support and maintenance,
provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the pool by
the policy holder within thirty-one days of the dependent's attainment of age
nineteen and subsequently as may be required by the pool but not more
frequently than annually after the two-year period following the dependent's
attainment of age nineteen.

(((3)
A pool policy may contain provisions under which coverage is excluded during a
period of six months following the effective date of coverage as to a given
covered individual for preexisting conditions, as long as medical advice or
treatment was recommended or received within a period of six months before the
effective date of coverage.

These
preexisting condition exclusions shall be waived to the extent to which similar
exclusions have been satisfied under any prior health insurance which was for
any reason other than nonpayment of premium involuntarily terminated, if the
application for pool coverage is made not later than thirty days following the
involuntary termination. In that case, with payment of appropriate premium,
coverage in the pool shall be effective from the date on which the prior
coverage was terminated.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 114. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

On
or after July 1, 2001, the pool must offer to new applicants only the standard
health plans established under section 117 of this act. All of the standard
health plans must be offered.

Sec.
115. RCW
48.41.200 and 1997 c 231 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The pool shall determine the standard risk rate by calculating the average
group standard rate for groups comprised of up to fifty persons charged by the
five largest members offering coverages in the state comparable to the pool
coverage. In the event five members do not offer comparable coverage, the
standard risk rate shall be established using reasonable actuarial techniques
and shall reflect anticipated experience and expenses for such coverage.
Maximum rates for pool coverage shall be one hundred fifty percent for the
indemnity health plan and, for the managed care plan and the plan
established under section 112 of this act, one hundred twenty-five percent
((for managed care plans)) of the rates established as applicable for
group standard risks in groups comprised of up to fifty persons.

(2)
Maximum rates for standard health plans issued by the pool under section 114 of
this act shall, for each plan, be one hundred percent of the average rate
charged for that plan by the five largest members offering the standard health
plans in the state. In the event five members do not offer the standard health
plans, the rates shall be established using reasonable actuarial techniques and
shall reflect anticipated experience and expenses for such coverage.

(3)
For any person fifty-five years old or older purchasing pool coverage other
than a standard health plan:

(a)
The rate shall be reduced by thirty percent from what it would otherwise be if
their current gross family income is less than two hundred fifty-one percent of
the federal poverty level;

(b)
The rate shall be reduced by fifteen percent from what it would otherwise be if
their current gross family income is more than two hundred fifty percent but
less than three hundred one percent of the federal poverty level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 116. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
On or before October 15, 2002, the joint legislative audit and review committee
shall submit recommendations to the health policy committees of the senate and
the house of representatives regarding the continued need for the pool to offer
health insurance coverage to individuals residing in Washington state.

(2)
In developing its recommendations, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall consider:

(a)
The extent to which comprehensive health plans are being offered to the public
in each county of the state;

(b)
The stability of the individual insurance market in each county of the state;
and

(c)
Any other information deemed relevant by the committee.

B.
RISK SHARING PROGRAM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 117. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
On or before November 1, 2000, the board shall establish the policy and
contract forms and benefits levels for five standard health plans to be offered
to individuals as provided in section 122 of this act.

(2)
Proposed policy and contract forms and benefits levels for the five standard
health plans shall be developed by a committee, chosen from and by the members
of the pool who are carriers, and submitted to the board for review and
approval. The board may modify the committee's proposal prior to approval.

(3)
The standard health plans shall represent a range of health plans sufficiently
diverse to meet the needs of individuals seeking health insurance coverage in
Washington state. One standard health plan shall be a basic health benefits
plan, and four plans shall include enhanced benefits of proportionally
increasing actuarial value.

(a)
The basic health benefits plan shall be designed to meet the needs of healthy
persons without chronic or serious illness.

(b)
Appropriate options to obtain maternity care and prescription drug benefits
must be available among the standard health plans. However, maternity care and
prescription drug coverage need not be offered in all of the plans.

(c)
At least one of the standard health plans shall offer benefits that are
sufficiently comprehensive to meet the needs of persons with chronic illness.

(d)
To ensure adequate choice of coverage options for individuals, each standard
health plan shall offer varying levels of consumer cost-sharing, which may
include deductibles, coinsurance, or point-of-service cost-sharing.

(4)
In designing the standard health plans, the board also may:

(a)
Include managed care and other cost containment measures. Care management or
cost containment measures included in the plans must be consistent with any
applicable rules adopted by the commissioner under this title; and

(b)
Provide incentives for utilization of primary care and clinical preventive
services recommended by the United States public health service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 118. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Risk sharing shall be implemented through an assessment and loss subsidization
mechanism. Every member shall be liable for an assessment to subsidize losses
of members that result from issuing standard health plans to individuals,
unless the member has received an exemption under subsection (2) of this
section.

(2)
A carrier may apply to the board, by a date established by the board, for an
exemption from the assessment and subsidization of losses provided for in this
section. A carrier that applies for an exemption shall agree to offer all of
the standard health plans and to cover a minimum number of individuals. The
formula for determining the minimum number of individuals a carrier must cover
under this subsection shall be established by the board. If a carrier's
average monthly enrollment in any calendar year is less than the minimum
determined by the board, then the carrier shall be liable for an assessment for
that year. In determining the amount of the assessment due from these carriers
under section 119 of this act, the board shall deduct the number of insured
individuals under the carrier's health plans from its total number of resident
insured persons.

(3)
The risk sharing program shall include parameters that will limit its costs.
In determining the amount of a carrier's losses to be subsidized, the board
shall consider at least the following:

(a)
The proportion of a carrier's losses submitted for subsidization that are
attributable to administration and claims management;

(b)
The extent to which a carrier seeking subsidization of losses has implemented
care management or care coordination practices for people with chronic illness
covered by standard health plans issued by the carrier; and

(c)
The relative health status of people covered by a carrier's standard health
plans, in comparison to that of the general population.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 119. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the risk sharing program, following the close of each accounting year, the
board shall determine the amount of loss to be subsidized, on a per carrier and
aggregate basis and the pool expenses of administration attributable to the
risk sharing program.

(2)(a)
Each member's proportion of participation in the pool shall be determined
annually by the board based on annual statements and other reports deemed
necessary by the board and filed by the member with the commissioner. The
member's proportion of participation in the pool shall be determined by
multiplying the total loss to be recovered by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction equals that member's total number of resident insured persons,
including spouse and dependents under the member's health plans, plus the
number of resident insured persons covered under stop loss policies issued to
self-insured employer plans. The denominator of the fraction equals the total
number of resident insured persons, including spouses and dependents, insured under
all health plans, including employer purchased stop loss policies.

(b)
Any deficit incurred by the pool shall be recouped by assessments among members
apportioned under this subsection pursuant to the formula set forth by the
board among members.

(3)
The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member
if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the
ability of the member to fulfill its contractual obligations. If an assessment
against a member is abated or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which
the assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members
in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in subsection
(2) of this section. The member receiving the abatement or deferment shall
remain liable to the pool for the deficiency.

(4)
If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the pool,
the excess shall be held at interest and used by the board to offset future
losses or to reduce pool premiums. As used in this subsection, future losses
includes reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 120. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

In
any accounting year, total pool assessments attributable to both offering
health insurance coverage and the risk sharing program shall not exceed fifty
cents per covered life per month. However, the board may petition the
commissioner for approval of a greater specified amount. The commissioner
shall approve such amount if he or she finds, after consideration of the (1)
board's subsidy determination process; (2) number of subsidy-eligible lives;
(3) size of the entire individual market; (4) morbidity experience of people
who have purchased coverage through the pool and subsidy-eligible lives; and
(5) morbidity experience of the entire individual market; that the amount
petitioned by the board is not greater than is necessary to fulfill the
purposes of this chapter. For the purpose of making this determination, the
commissioner may, at the expense of the pool, seek independent actuarial
certification of the need for the increase.

II.
INSURANCE ACCESS RULES

Sec.
201. RCW
48.43.005 and 1997 c 231 s 202 and 1997 c 55 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

((Unless
otherwise specifically provided,)) The definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to establish
the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially demonstrated
differences in utilization or cost attributable to geographic region, age, family
size, and use of wellness activities.

(2)
"Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter 70.47 RCW,
as revised from time to time.

(3)
(("Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required
in RCW 70.47.060(2)(d).

(4)))
"Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered health
services, including the description of how those benefits are to be
administered, that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under the basic
health plan, as revised from time to time.

(((5)))
(4) "Certification" means a determination by a review
organization that an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service
or procedure has been reviewed and, based on the information provided, meets
the clinical requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, level of
care, or effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable health benefit
plan.

(((6)))
(5) "Community rate" means the average rate resulting from the
pooling of medical experience of all enrollees in the group purchasing coverage
in a specified market.

(6)
"Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted during a
patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.

(7)
"Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person covered by a
health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder, beneficiary of a
group plan, or individual covered by any other health plan.

(8)
"Creditable coverage" means coverage of an individual under any of
the following:

(a)
An employer-sponsored group health plan including self-funded plans;

(b)
A health plan issued by a carrier, without regard to whether the coverage is
offered in the group market, the individual market, or otherwise;

(c)
Medicare, Title XVIII of the federal social security act;

(d)
Medicaid, Title XIX of the federal social security act;

(e)
Medical and dental care sponsored by the federal government for members and
certain former members of the uniformed services, and for their dependents;

(f)
A medical care program of the Indian health service or of a tribal
organization;

(g)
The Washington state health insurance pool under chapter 48.41 RCW;

(h)
A health plan offered under the federal employees health benefits program,
Title 5 U.S.C. chapter 89;

(i)
The Washington basic health plan, as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW, and any
state-funded medical program administered by the department of social and
health services under chapter 74.09 RCW; and

(j)
A health benefit plan under section 5(e) of the federal peace corps act (22
U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)).

(9)
"Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse and
unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the enrollee's
health benefit plan.

(((9)))
(10) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a
full-time basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term
includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a partner of
a partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if the self-employed
individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent contractor is included as
an employee under a health benefit plan of a small employer, but does not work
less than thirty hours per week and derives at least seventy-five percent of
his or her income from a trade or business through which he or she has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form. Persons covered under a health
benefit plan pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of
1986 shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.

(((10)))
(11) "Eligible individual" means an individual who meets the
following conditions:

(a)
The individual has at least eighteen months of creditable coverage as of the
date on which the individual seeks coverage;

(b)
The individual's most recent prior creditable coverage was under a group health
plan, governmental plan, church plan, or health insurance coverage offered in
connection with any of these plans;

(c)
The individual is not eligible for coverage under any of the following: (i) An
employer-sponsored group health plan; (ii) medicare, Title XVIII of the federal
social security act; (iii) medicaid, Title XIX of the federal social security
act;

(d)
The individual does not have other health insurance coverage;

(e)
The individual's most recent coverage was not terminated because of nonpayment
of premiums or fraud; and

(f)
If the individual has been offered the option of continuing coverage under the
federal consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act continuation provision,
under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161, the individual has both elected and exhausted the
continuation coverage.

(12)
"Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and acute onset of a
symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead a prudent layperson
acting reasonably to believe that a health condition exists that requires
immediate medical attention, if failure to provide medical attention would
result in serious impairment to bodily functions or serious dysfunction of a
bodily organ or part, or would place the person's health in serious jeopardy.

(((11)))
(13) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.

(((12)))
(14) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts
paid to health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments, coinsurance, or
deductibles.

(((13)))
(15) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on
behalf of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for medical
services or nonprovision of medical services included in the covered person's
health benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues other than denial of
payment for medical services or nonprovision of medical services, including
dissatisfaction with medical care, waiting time for medical services, provider
or staff attitude or demeanor, or dissatisfaction with service provided by the
health carrier.

(((14)))
(16) "Health care facility" or "facility" means
hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020,
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under chapter
71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under
chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW,
and includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision
or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities as required by federal
law and implementing regulations.

(((15)))
(17) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:

(a)
A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or
health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state
consistent with state law; or

(b)
An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in
the course and scope of his or her employment.

(((16)))
(18) "Health care service" means that service offered or
provided by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.

(((17)))
(19) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a
disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.

(((18)))
(20) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means
any policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide,
arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:

(a)
Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;

(b)
Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter 48.66 RCW;

(c)
Limited health care services offered by limited health care service contractors
in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;

(d)
Disability income;

(e)
Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance policy such as
automobile personal injury protection coverage and homeowner guest medical;

(f)
Workers' compensation coverage;

(g)
Accident only coverage;

(h)
Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity when marketed solely as a
supplement to a health plan;

(i)
Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;

(j)
Dental only and vision only coverage; and

(k)
Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term limited purpose
or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is guaranteed renewable while
the covered person is enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate
student at an accredited higher education institution, after a written request
for such classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the
insurance commissioner.

(((19)))
(21) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial
value of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.

(((20)))
(22) "Open enrollment" means, for purposes of portability
of individual health plan coverage, the ((annual sixty-two)) semiannual
thirty-day periods during the months of January and July ((and
August)) during which every health carrier offering individual health plan
coverage must ((accept onto individual coverage any state resident within
the carrier's service area regardless of health condition who submits an
application in accordance with RCW 48.43.035(1))) credit any preexisting
condition exclusion or limitation satisfied under creditable coverage without a
significant break in coverage toward the new health plan.

(((21)))
(23) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition,
illness, or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.

(((22)))
(24) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited
by a health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of a
health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the premium.
"Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee point-of-service
cost-sharing.

(((23)))
(25) "Review organization" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as defined
in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined in RCW
48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or acting on
behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.

(((24)))
(26) "Significant break in coverage" means a period of ninety
consecutive days during all of which the individual does not have creditable
coverage.

(27)
"Small employer" or "small group" means any person,
firm, corporation, partnership, association, political subdivision except
school districts, or self-employed individual that is actively engaged in
business that, on at least fifty percent of its working days during the
preceding calendar quarter, employed no more than fifty eligible employees,
with a normal work week of thirty or more hours, the majority of whom were
employed within this state, and is not formed primarily for purposes of buying
health insurance and in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship
exists. In determining the number of eligible employees, companies that are
affiliated companies, or that are eligible to file a combined tax return for
purposes of taxation by this state, shall be considered an employer.
Subsequent to the issuance of a health plan to a small employer and for the
purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be
determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided, a small
employer shall continue to be considered a small employer until the plan
anniversary following the date the small employer no longer meets the
requirements of this definition. The term "small employer" includes
a self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The term "small
employer" also includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor who
derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income from a trade or
business through which the individual or sole proprietor has attempted to earn
taxable income and for which he or she has filed the appropriate internal
revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for the previous taxable year.

(((25)))
(28) "Standard health plan" means any of the health plans
established under section 117 of this act.

(29)
"Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent, or
retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the allocation
of health care resources and services of a provider or facility, given or
proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

(((26)))
(30) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an
activity consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood
cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the purpose of improving enrollee
health status and reducing health service costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
On or after July 1, 2001, a carrier shall, as a condition of issuing health plans
in Washington state, offer all of the standard individual plans established
under section 117 of this act. A carrier shall be deemed to have satisfied its
obligation to provide the standard individual health plans by paying an
assessment as provided in section 118 of this act.

(2)
Individual health plans offered to new applicants on or after July 1, 2001,
shall be limited to the standard health plans established under section 117 of
this act.

Sec.
203. RCW
48.43.015 and 1995 c 265 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting condition exclusion or
limitation applicable to group health coverage, other than small group health
coverage, for persons who have creditable coverage without a significant break
in coverage as of their first day of coverage, or if there is a waiting period
under an employer-sponsored group health plan, the first day of the waiting
period. If the person has creditable coverage without a significant break in
coverage for at least three months, the carrier may not impose preexisting
condition exclusions or limitations. If the person has creditable coverage
without a significant break in coverage for less than three months, the carrier
must reduce the duration of the preexisting condition exclusion or limitation
by the number of days of creditable coverage the individual has.

(2)
Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting condition exclusion or
limitation applicable to small group health coverage for persons who have
creditable coverage without a significant break in coverage as of their first
day of coverage, or if there is a waiting period under an employer-sponsored
group health plan, the first day of the waiting period. If the person has
creditable coverage without a significant break in coverage for at least six
months, the carrier may not impose preexisting condition exclusions or
limitations.

If
the person has creditable coverage without a significant break in coverage for
less than six months, the carrier must reduce the duration of the preexisting
condition exclusion or limitation by the number of days of creditable coverage
the individual has.

(3)(a)
Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting condition exclusion or
limitation ((for persons or groups who had similar health coverage under a
different health plan at any time during the three-month period immediately
preceding the date of application for the new health plan if such person was
continuously covered under the immediately preceding health plan)) applicable
to individual coverage for eligible individuals, as defined in RCW 48.43.005,
seeking to purchase individual coverage.

(b)
Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting condition exclusion or limitation
applicable to individual coverage for persons who had creditable coverage
without a significant break in coverage, when the individual's most recent
coverage is equivalent to the health coverage the individual seeks to purchase;
or provides significantly greater benefits than the health coverage the
individual seeks to purchase. If the person ((was continuously covered))
has creditable coverage without a significant break in coverage for at
least ((three)) six months ((under the immediately preceding health
plan)), the carrier may not impose ((a waiting period for coverage of))
preexisting condition((s)) exclusions or limitations. If the
person ((was continuously covered)) has creditable coverage without a
significant break in coverage for less than ((three)) six
months ((under the immediately preceding health plan)), the carrier must
((credit any waiting period under the immediately preceding health plan
toward the new health plan. For the purposes of this subsection, a preceding
health plan includes an employer provided self-funded health plan.

(2)
Subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, nothing contained
in this section requires a health carrier to amend a health plan to provide new
benefits in its existing health plans. In addition, nothing in this section
requires a carrier to waive benefit limitations not related to an individual or
group's preexisting conditions or health history.)) reduce
the duration of the preexisting condition exclusion or limitation by the number
of days of creditable coverage the individual has.

(c)(i)
A health carrier may impose a preexisting condition exclusion or limitation of
up to six months duration for individuals who have creditable coverage without
a significant break in coverage when the benefits under the individual's most
recent coverage are significantly less than the health coverage plan the
individual seeks to purchase, if the application for the new health plan is
submitted in a month other than designated open enrollment periods. The preexisting
exclusion or limitation imposed shall relate only to the benefits under the new
health coverage plan that were not included in the individual's most recent
prior creditable coverage.

(ii)
Every health carrier shall waive any preexisting condition exclusion or
limitation for individuals who have creditable coverage without a significant
break in coverage when the benefits under the individual's most recent coverage
are significantly less than the health coverage plan the individual seeks to
purchase and the application is submitted during an open enrollment period. If
the person has creditable coverage without a significant break in coverage for
at least six months, the carrier may not impose preexisting condition
exclusions or limitations. If the person has creditable coverage without a
significant break in coverage for less than six months, the carrier must reduce
the duration of the preexisting condition exclusion or limitation by the number
of days of creditable coverage the individual has. The preexisting exclusion
or limitation imposed shall relate only to the benefits under the new health
coverage plan that were not included in the individual's most recent prior
creditable coverage.

(iii)
An individual whose application for a new health plan is submitted in a month
other than a designated open enrollment period shall be considered to have
applied during an open enrollment period if the individual is seeking
individual coverage because he or she has lost coverage under a group health
plan due to loss of employment, his or her employer has terminated his or her
group health plan, or he or she has relocated to a new service area not served
by their most recent health plan.

(4)
Subject to the provisions of subsections (1) through (3) of this section,
nothing contained in this section requires a health carrier to amend a health
plan to provide new benefits in its existing health plans. In addition,
nothing in this section requires a carrier to waive benefit limitations not
related to an individual or group's preexisting conditions or health history.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No carrier may reject an individual for individual health plan coverage, or a
group for small group health plan coverage, based upon preexisting conditions
of the individual or members of the group and no carrier may deny, exclude, or
otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting health conditions
except as provided in this section.

(2)
Preexisting condition exclusions or limitations imposed upon a person enrolling
in individual or small group coverage shall be no more restrictive than six
months for a preexisting condition for which medical advice was given or for
which a health care provider recommended or provided treatment within six
months prior to the effective date of coverage.

(3)
For individual coverage, preexisting condition exclusions or limitations shall
not apply to prenatal care services. For small group coverage, preexisting
condition exclusions or limitations shall not apply to pregnancy.

(4)
No carrier may avoid the requirements of this section through the creation of a
new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification. A new or changed rate classification will be deemed an attempt
to avoid the provisions of this section if the new or changed classification
would substantially discourage applications for coverage from individuals who
are higher than average health risks.

Sec.
205. RCW
48.43.025 and 1995 c 265 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For group health benefit plans other than small group health benefit plans,
no carrier may reject ((an individual)) a group for health
plan coverage based upon preexisting conditions of ((the individual)) a
person in a group and no carrier may deny, exclude, or otherwise limit
coverage for ((an individual's)) a person's preexisting health
conditions((; except that)).

(2)
Except as provided in RCW 48.43.015, a carrier may impose a three-month
benefit ((waiting period)) exclusion or limitation for
preexisting conditions for which medical advice was given, or for which a
health care provider recommended or provided treatment within three months
before the effective date of coverage. Preexisting condition exclusions or
limitations shall not apply to pregnancy.

(((2)))
(3) No carrier may avoid the requirements of this section through the
creation of a new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification. A new or changed rate classification will be deemed an attempt
to avoid the provisions of this section if the new or changed classification
would substantially discourage applications for coverage from individuals or
groups who are higher than average health risks. These provisions apply only
to individuals who are Washington residents.

Sec.
206. RCW
48.43.035 and 1995 c 265 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All health carriers shall accept for enrollment any state resident within the
carrier's service area and provide or assure the provision of all covered
services regardless of age, sex, family structure, ethnicity, race, health
condition, genetic information, geographic location, employment status,
socioeconomic status, conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence,
other condition or situation, or the provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The
insurance commissioner may grant a temporary exemption from this subsection,
if, upon application by a health carrier the commissioner finds that the
clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees
will be impaired if a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of
additional eligible individuals.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all health plans shall
contain or incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of the continuity of coverage
of the plan. For the purposes of this section, a plan is "renewed"
when it is continued beyond the earliest date upon which, at the carrier's sole
option, the plan could have been terminated for other than nonpayment of
premium. In the case of group plans, the carrier may consider the group's
anniversary date as the renewal date for purposes of complying with the
provisions of this section.

(3)
The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in health plans shall not
prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing a health plan for:

(a)
Nonpayment of premium;

(b)
Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the insurance commissioner;

(c)
Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare benefits by reason of
age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement plan or medicare cost, risk, or
other plan offered by the carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;

(d)
Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment amount owed to the
carrier and not the provider of health care services;

(e)
Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;

(f)
Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or

(g)
Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no longer permit the
continued offering of such coverage.

(4)
The provisions of this section do not apply in the following cases:

(a)
A carrier has zero enrollment on a product; or

(b)
A carrier replaces a product and the replacement product is provided to all
covered persons within that class or line of business, includes all of the
services covered under the replaced product, and does not significantly limit
access to the kind of services covered under the replaced product. The health
plan may also allow unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product.
On or after July 1, 2001, a carrier may satisfy the requirement of this section
by offering, as a replacement product for an individual product other than a
standard health plan, the standard health plan that is most comparable, with
respect to actuarial value and services covered, to the product being
discontinued; or

(c)
A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment of its service
area because the carrier has demonstrated to the insurance commissioner that
the carrier's clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve
enrollees would be exceeded.

(5)
The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans deemed by the
insurance commissioner to be unique or limited or have a short-term purpose,
after a written request for such classification by the carrier and subsequent
written approval by the insurance commissioner.

III.
ELIMINATION OF MODEL PLAN MANDATE IN

INDIVIDUAL
AND SMALL GROUP MARKET

Sec.
301. RCW
48.20.028 and 1997 c 231 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
An insurer offering any health benefit plan to any individual shall offer and
actively market to all individuals a health benefit plan providing benefits
identical to the schedule of covered health benefits that are required to be
delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan subject to RCW
48.43.025 and 48.43.035. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer
from offering, or an individual from purchasing, other health benefit plans
that may have more or less comprehensive benefits than the basic health plan,
provided such plans are in accordance with this chapter. An insurer offering a
health benefit plan that does not include benefits provided in the basic health
plan shall clearly disclose these differences to the individual in a brochure
approved by the commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.20.390, 48.20.393, 48.20.395, 48.20.397,
48.20.410, 48.20.411, 48.20.412, 48.20.416, and 48.20.420 if the health benefit
plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that provides
benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these requirements
differ from the basic health plan.

(2)))
Premiums for health benefit plans for individuals shall be calculated using the
adjusted community rating method that spreads financial risk across the
carrier's entire individual product population. All such rates shall conform
to the following:

(a)
The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may
only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age;

(iv)
Tenure discounts; and

(v)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age
sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and
coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be
subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the family composition;

(ii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual; or

(iii)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(h)
A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan of two years or
more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.

(((3)))
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool
the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and shall not be
required to be pooled with the medical experience of health benefit plans
offered to small employers under RCW 48.21.045.

(((4)))
(3) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," (("basic
health plan,")) "adjusted community rate," and
"wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
302. RCW
48.21.045 and 1995 c 265 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
An insurer offering any health benefit plan to a small employer shall offer and
actively market to the small employer a health benefit plan providing benefits
identical to the schedule of covered health services that are required to be
delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan. Nothing in this
subsection shall preclude an insurer from offering, or a small employer from
purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more or less comprehensive
benefits than the basic health plan, provided such plans are in accordance with
this chapter. An insurer offering a health benefit plan that does not include
benefits in the basic health plan shall clearly disclose these differences to
the small employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.21.130, 48.21.140, 48.21.141, 48.21.142,
48.21.144, 48.21.146, 48.21.160 through 48.21.197, 48.21.200, 48.21.220,
48.21.225, 48.21.230, 48.21.235, 48.21.240, 48.21.244, 48.21.250, 48.21.300,
48.21.310, or 48.21.320 if: (i) The health benefit plan is the mandatory
offering under (a) of this subsection that provides benefits identical to the
basic health plan, to the extent these requirements differ from the basic
health plan; or (ii) the health benefit plan is offered to employers with not
more than twenty-five employees.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall prohibit an insurer from offering, or a purchaser
from seeking, benefits in excess of the basic health plan services. All forms,
policies, and contracts shall be submitted for approval to the commissioner,
and the rates of any plan offered under this section shall be reasonable in
relation to the benefits thereto.

(3)))
Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this
((section)) chapter shall be subject to the following provisions:

(a)
The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may
only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age; and

(iv)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age
sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and
coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be
subject to the requirements of this subsection (((3))) (1).

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;

(ii)
Changes to the family composition of the employee;

(iii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by
the amounts attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for
health improvement programs.

(h)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i)
Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool the medical
experience of all small groups purchasing coverage.

(((4)))
(2) The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower
than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy
for the benefit of employees in this state. Nothing in this section shall
restrict the right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing
benefits in excess of those provided herein.

(((5)))
(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by an
insurer in determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall be
applied uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or receiving
coverage from the carrier.

(b)
An insurer shall not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i)
One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups with three or less
employees; and

(ii)
Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than
three employees.

(c)
In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to a small
employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or dependents who have
similar existing coverage in determining whether the applicable percentage of
participation is met.

(d)
An insurer may not increase any requirement for minimum employee participation
or modify any requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a
small employer at any time after the small employer has been accepted for
coverage.

(((6)))
(4) An insurer must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a small
employer and their dependents. An insurer may not offer coverage to only
certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only part of
the group. An insurer may not modify a health plan with respect to a small
employer or any eligible employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or
otherwise, to restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases,
medical conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

(((7))) (5) As used in this section, "health
benefit plan," "small employer," (("basic health
plan,")) "adjusted community rate," and "wellness
activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
303. RCW
48.44.022 and 1997 c 231 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
A health care service contractor offering any health benefit plan to any
individual shall offer and actively market to all individuals a health benefit
plan providing benefits identical to the schedule of covered health benefits
that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan, subject to the provisions in RCW 48.43.025 and 48.43.035. Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or an individual
from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more or less
comprehensive benefits than the basic health plan, provided such plans are in
accordance with this chapter. A contractor offering a health benefit plan that
does not include benefits provided in the basic health plan shall clearly disclose
these differences to the individual in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335, 48.44.340,
48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and 48.44.460 if the
health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that
provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these
requirements differ from the basic health plan.

(2)))
Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject to the
following provisions:

(a)
The health care service contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age;

(iv)
Tenure discounts; and

(v)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The health care service contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates
for individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the
primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both
rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the family composition;

(ii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual; or

(iii)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(h)
A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan of two years or
more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.

(((3)))
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool
the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and shall not be
required to be pooled with the medical experience of health benefit plans
offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023.

(((4)))
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.44.023 "health benefit
plan," "small employer," (("basic health plan,"))
"adjusted community rates," and "wellness activities" mean
the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
304. RCW
48.44.023 and 1995 c 265 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
A health care services contractor offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer shall offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan providing benefits identical to the schedule of covered health services
that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or
a small employer from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
or less comprehensive benefits than the basic health plan, provided such plans
are in accordance with this chapter. A contractor offering a health benefit
plan that does not include benefits in the basic health plan shall clearly
disclose these differences to the small employer in a brochure approved by the
commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335, 48.44.340,
48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and 48.44.460 if: (i) The
health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that
provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these
requirements differ from the basic health plan; or (ii) the health benefit plan
is offered to employers with not more than twenty-five employees.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health care service contractor from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, benefits in excess of the basic health
plan services. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for
approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this
section shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.

(3)))
Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as defined in this
section shall be subject to the following provisions:

(a)
The contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and
may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age; and

(iv)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age
sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and
coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be
subject to the requirements of this subsection (((3))) (1).

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;

(ii)
Changes to the family composition of the employee;

(iii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by
the amounts attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for
health improvement programs.

(h)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i)
Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool the medical
experience of all groups purchasing coverage.

(((4)))
(2) The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower
than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy
for the benefit of employees in this state. Nothing in this section shall
restrict the right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing
benefits in excess of those provided herein.

(((5)))
(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by a
contractor in determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer shall
be applied uniformly among all small employers applying for coverage or
receiving coverage from the carrier.

(b)
A contractor shall not require a minimum participation level greater than:

(i)
One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups with three or less
employees; and

(ii)
Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than
three employees.

(c)
In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to a small
employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or dependents who have
similar existing coverage in determining whether the applicable percentage of
participation is met.

(d)
A contractor may not increase any requirement for minimum employee
participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer contribution
applicable to a small employer at any time after the small employer has been
accepted for coverage.

(((6)))
(4) A contractor must offer coverage to all eligible employees of a
small employer and their dependents. A contractor may not offer coverage to
only certain individuals or dependents in a small employer group or to only
part of the group. A contractor may not modify a health plan with respect to a
small employer or any eligible employee or dependent, through riders,
endorsements or otherwise, to restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for
specific diseases, medical conditions, or services otherwise covered by the
plan.

Sec.
305. RCW
48.46.064 and 1997 c 231 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
A health maintenance organization offering any health benefit plan to any
individual shall offer and actively market to all individuals a health benefit
plan providing benefits identical to the schedule of covered health benefits
that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan, subject to the provisions in RCW 48.43.025 and 48.43.035. Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude a health maintenance organization from offering,
or an individual from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
or less comprehensive benefits than the basic health plan, provided such plans
are in accordance with this chapter. A health maintenance organization
offering a health benefit plan that does not include benefits provided in the
basic health plan shall clearly disclose these differences to the individual in
a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510, 48.46.520,
and 48.46.530 if the health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of
this subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to
the extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan.

(2)))
Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject to the
following provisions:

(a)
The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates based on an
adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age;

(iv)
Tenure discounts; and

(v)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to develop separate
rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare
is the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer.
Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the family composition;

(ii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual; or

(iii)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(h)
A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan of two years or
more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.

(((3)))
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool the
medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and shall not be
required to be pooled with the medical experience of health benefit plans
offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066.

(((4)))
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.46.066, "health benefit
plan," (("basic health plan,")) "adjusted community
rate," "small employer," and "wellness activities"
mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
306. RCW
48.46.066 and 1995 c 265 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
A health maintenance organization offering any health benefit plan to a small
employer shall offer and actively market to the small employer a health benefit
plan providing benefits identical to the schedule of covered health services
that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a health maintenance
organization from offering, or a small employer from purchasing, other health
benefit plans that may have more or less comprehensive benefits than the basic
health plan, provided such plans are in accordance with this chapter. A health
maintenance organization offering a health benefit plan that does not include
benefits in the basic health plan shall clearly disclose these differences to
the small employer in a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510, 48.46.520,
and 48.46.530 if: (i) The health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under
(a) of this subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic health
plan, to the extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan; or
(ii) the health benefit plan is offered to employers with not more than
twenty-five employees.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall prohibit a health maintenance organization from
offering, or a purchaser from seeking, benefits in excess of the basic health
plan services. All forms, policies, and contracts shall be submitted for
approval to the commissioner, and the rates of any plan offered under this
section shall be reasonable in relation to the benefits thereto.

(3)))
Premium rates for health benefit plans for small employers as defined in ((this
section)) RCW 48.43.005 shall be subject to the following
provisions:

(a)
The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates based on an
adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age; and

(iv)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments, which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Employees under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to develop separate
rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare
is the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer.
Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection (((3)))
(1).

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the enrollment of the small employer;

(ii)
Changes to the family composition of the employee;

(iii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the small employer; or

(iv)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
Rating factors shall produce premiums for identical groups that differ only by
the amounts attributable to plan design, with the exception of discounts for
health improvement programs.

(h)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(i)
Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool the medical
experience of all groups purchasing coverage.

(((4)))
(2) The health benefit plans authorized by this section that are lower
than the required offering shall not supplant or supersede any existing policy
for the benefit of employees in this state. Nothing in this section shall
restrict the right of employees to collectively bargain for insurance providing
benefits in excess of those provided herein.

(((5)))
(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection, requirements used by a
health maintenance organization in determining whether to provide coverage to a
small employer shall be applied uniformly among all small employers applying
for coverage or receiving coverage from the carrier.

(b)
A health maintenance organization shall not require a minimum participation
level greater than:

(i)
One hundred percent of eligible employees working for groups with three or less
employees; and

(ii)
Seventy-five percent of eligible employees working for groups with more than
three employees.

(c)
In applying minimum participation requirements with respect to a small
employer, a small employer shall not consider employees or dependents who have
similar existing coverage in determining whether the applicable percentage of
participation is met.

(d)
A health maintenance organization may not increase any requirement for minimum
employee participation or modify any requirement for minimum employer
contribution applicable to a small employer at any time after the small
employer has been accepted for coverage.

(((6)))
(4) A health maintenance organization must offer coverage to all
eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. A health
maintenance organization may not offer coverage to only certain individuals or
dependents in a small employer group or to only part of the group. A health
maintenance organization may not modify a health plan with respect to a small
employer or any eligible employee or dependent, through riders, endorsements or
otherwise, to restrict or exclude coverage or benefits for specific diseases,
medical conditions, or services otherwise covered by the plan.

IV.
INDIVIDUAL AND GROUP MARKET RATE SETTING

Sec.
401. RCW
48.44.020 and 1990 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any health care service contractor may enter into contracts with or for the
benefit of persons or groups of persons which require prepayment for health
care services by or for such persons in consideration of such health care
service contractor providing one or more health care services to such persons
and such activity shall not be subject to the laws relating to insurance if the
health care services are rendered by the health care service contractor or by a
participating provider.

(2)
The commissioner may on examination, subject to the right of the health care
service contractor to demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and
34.05 RCW, disapprove any contract form for any of the following grounds:

(a)
If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous or
misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which unreasonably or
deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in the general coverage of
the contract; or

(b)
If it has any title, heading, or other indication of its provisions
which is misleading; or

(c)
If purchase of health care services thereunder is being solicited by deceptive
advertising; or

(d)
If((,)) the benefits provided therein ((are unreasonable in relation
to the amount charged for the contract)) contain unreasonable
restrictions; or

(e)
If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of patients; or

(f)
If it violates any provision of this chapter; or

(g)
If it fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards required by
regulation made by the commissioner pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; or

(h)
If any contract for health care services with any state agency, division,
subdivision, board, or commission or with any political subdivision,
municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation fails to comply with
state law.

(3)(a)
Every contract between a health care service contractor and a participating
provider of health care services shall be in writing and shall state that in
the event the health care service contractor fails to pay for health care
services as provided in the contract, the enrolled participant shall not be
liable to the provider for sums owed by the health care service contractor. Every
such contract shall provide that this requirement shall survive termination of
the contract.

(b)
No participating provider, agent, trustee, or assignee may maintain any
action against an enrolled participant to collect sums owed by the health care
service contractor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. A
new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Claims" means the cost to the health care service contractor of
health care services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, provided to a contract
holder or paid to or on behalf of a contract holder in accordance with the
terms of a health benefit plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005. This includes
capitation payments or other similar payments made to providers for the purpose
of paying for health care services for an enrollee.

(b)
"Claims reserved" means: (i) The liability for claims that have been
reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for claims that have not been
reported but which may reasonably be expected; and (iii) additional claims
reserves for other accepted accounting purposes.

(c)
"Earned premiums" means premiums, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, plus any
rate credits or recoupments less any refunds, for the applicable period,
whether received before, during, or after the applicable period.

(d)
"Incurred claims expense" means claims paid during the applicable
period plus any increase, or less any decrease, in the claims reserves.

(e)
"Loss ratio" means incurred claims expense as a percentage of earned
premiums.

(2)(a)
A health care service contractor shall file, for informational purposes only, a
notice of its schedule of rates for its individual and group plans with the
commissioner prior to use.

(b)
These rates shall be calculated to include no more than twenty percent of
premium attributable to all nonclaims expenses, including administrative costs,
calculated over the length of the rating period. Rates shall be calculated for
a period of one year.

(3)
A health care service contractor shall file with the notice required under
subsection (2) of this section supporting documentation of its method of
determining the rates charged. The commissioner may request only the following
supporting documentation:

(a)
A description of the health care service contractor's rate-making methodology;

(b)
An actuarially determined estimate of incurred claims which includes the
experience data, assumptions, and justifications of the health care service
contractor's projection;

(c)
The aggregate percentage of premium attributable to (i) administrative
expenses; and (ii) contributions to reserves or profit that were used in
determining the community rate; and

(d)
A certification by a member of the American academy of actuaries, or other
person acceptable to the commissioner, that the adjusted community rate charged
can be reasonably expected to result in an aggregate loss ratio that meets or
exceeds the loss ratio standard established in subsection (6) of this section.

(4)
By the last day of May each year any health care service contractor providing
individual or small group health benefit plans in this state shall file for
review by the commissioner supporting documentation of its actual loss ratio
for its individual and small group health benefit plans offered in this state
in aggregate for the preceding calendar year. The filing shall include a
certification by a member of the American academy of actuaries, or other person
acceptable to the commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been calculated
in accordance with accepted actuarial principles.

(a)
If the commissioner has not contested the calculation prior to the expiration
of sixty working days, commencing with the date the filing is delivered to the
commissioner, the loss ratio as filed by the carrier shall be used in
calculating refunds under subsection (5) of this section.

(b)
If the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss ratio, the
commissioner shall state in writing the grounds for contesting the calculation
to the health care service contractor.

(c)
Any dispute regarding the calculation of the actual loss ratio shall upon
written demand of either the commissioner or the health care service contractor
be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

(5)
If the actual loss ratio for the preceding calendar year is less than the loss
ratio standard established in subsection (6) of this section, refunds are due
and the following shall apply:

(a)
The health care service contractor shall calculate a percentage of premium to
be refunded to contract holders by subtracting the actual loss ratio for the
preceding year from the loss ratio standard established in subsection (6) of
this section.

(b)
The refund due to each individual or small group contract holder is the
percentage calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by the premium
earned from each contract holder in the previous calendar year. Interest shall
be added to the refund due at a five percent annual rate calculated from the
end of the calendar year for which refunds are due to the date the refunds are
made.

(c)
Any refund due a contract holder in excess of ten dollars shall be mailed to
the contract holder at his or her last known mailing address or credited
against any premiums due.

(d)
All refunds equal to or less than ten dollars shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall be remitted to the Washington state health insurance pool to be
used as directed by the pool board of directors.

(e)
Any refund required to be issued under this section shall be issued within
thirty days after the actual loss ratio is determined under subsection (4) of
this section.

(f)
Any refund issued by a health care service contractor to a contract holder
under this section that remains unclaimed by that contract holder one year from
the date it was issued shall be remitted to the Washington state health
insurance pool to be used as directed by the pool board of directors. Health
care service contractors that comply with this subsection shall be relieved of
liability for any unclaimed refunds.

(6)
The loss ratio standard applicable to this section shall be eighty percent.

Sec.
403. RCW
48.46.060 and 1989 c 10 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any health maintenance organization may enter into agreements with or for the
benefit of persons or groups of persons, which require prepayment for health
care services by or for such persons in consideration of the health maintenance
organization providing health care services to such persons. Such activity is not
subject to the laws relating to insurance if the health care services are
rendered directly by the health maintenance organization or by any provider
which has a contract or other arrangement with the health maintenance
organization to render health services to enrolled participants.

(2)
All forms of health maintenance agreements issued by the organization to
enrolled participants or other marketing documents purporting to describe the
organization's comprehensive health care services shall comply with such
minimum standards as the commissioner deems reasonable and necessary in order
to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, and which fully
inform enrolled participants of the health care services to which they are
entitled, including any limitations or exclusions thereof, and such other
rights, responsibilities and duties required of the contracting health
maintenance organization.

(3)
Subject to the right of the health maintenance organization to demand and
receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, the commissioner may
disapprove an agreement form for any of the following grounds:

(a)
If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous, or
misleading clauses, or exceptions or conditions which unreasonably or
deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in the general coverage of
the agreement;

(b)
If it has any title, heading, or other indication which is misleading;

(c)
If purchase of health care services thereunder is being solicited by deceptive advertising;

(d)
If the benefits provided therein ((are unreasonable in relation to the
amount charged for the agreement)) contain unreasonable restrictions;

(e)
If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of patients;

(f)
If it is in any respect in violation of this chapter or if it fails to conform
to minimum provisions or standards required by the commissioner by rule under
chapter 34.05 RCW; or

(g)
If any agreement for health care services with any state agency, division,
subdivision, board, or commission or with any political subdivision,
municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation fails to comply with
state law.

(4)
No health maintenance organization authorized under this chapter shall cancel
or fail to renew the enrollment on any basis of an enrolled participant or
refuse to transfer an enrolled participant from a group to an individual basis
for reasons relating solely to age, sex, race, or health status((: PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That)). Nothing contained herein shall prevent
cancellation of an agreement with enrolled participants (a) who violate any
published policies of the organization which have been approved by the
commissioner, or (b) who are entitled to become eligible for medicare benefits
and fail to enroll for a medicare supplement plan offered by the health
maintenance organization and approved by the commissioner, or (c) for failure
of such enrolled participant to pay the approved charge, including
cost-sharing, required under such contract, or (d) for a material breach of the
health maintenance agreement.

(5)
No agreement form or amendment to an approved agreement form shall be used
unless it is first filed with the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 404. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Claims" means the cost to the health maintenance organization of
health care services, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, provided to an enrollee or
paid to or on behalf of the enrollee in accordance with the terms of a health
benefit plan, as defined in RCW 48.43.005. This includes capitation payments
or other similar payments made to providers for the purpose of paying for
health care services for an enrollee.

(b)
"Claims reserved" means: (i) The liability for claims that have been
reported but not paid; (ii) the liability for claims that have not been
reported but which may reasonably be expected; and (iii) additional claims
reserves for other accepted accounting purposes.

(c)
"Earned premiums" means premiums, as defined in RCW 48.43.005, plus
any rate credits or recoupments less any refunds, for the applicable period,
whether received before, during, or after the applicable period.

(d)
"Incurred claims expense" means claims paid during the applicable
period plus any increase, or less any decrease, in the claims reserves.

(e)
"Loss ratio" means incurred claims expense as a percentage of earned
premiums.

(2)(a)
A health maintenance organization shall file, for informational purposes only,
a notice of its schedule of rates for its individual and group plans with the
commissioner prior to use.

(b)
These rates shall be calculated to include no more than twenty percent of
premium attributable to all nonclaims expenses, including administrative costs,
calculated over the length of the rating period. Rates shall be calculated for
a period of one year.

(3)
A health maintenance organization shall file with the notice required under
subsection (2) of this section supporting documentation of its method of
determining the rates charged. The commissioner may request only the following
supporting documentation:

(a)
A description of the health maintenance organization's rate-making methodology;

(b)
An actuarially determined estimate of incurred claims which includes the
experience data, assumptions, and justifications of the health maintenance
organization's projection;

(c)
The aggregate percentage of premium attributable to (i) administrative
expenses; and (ii) contributions to reserves or profit that were used in
determining the community rate; and

(d)
A certification by a member of the American academy of actuaries, or other
person acceptable to the commissioner, that the adjusted community rate charged
can be reasonably expected to result in an aggregate loss ratio that meets or
exceeds the loss ratio standard established in subsection (6) of this section.

(4)
By the last day of May each year any health maintenance organization providing
individual or small group health benefit plans in this state shall file for
review by the commissioner supporting documentation of its actual loss ratio
for its individual and small group health benefit plans offered in the state in
aggregate for the preceding calendar year. The filing shall include a
certification by a member of the American academy of actuaries, or other person
acceptable to the commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been calculated
in accordance with accepted actuarial principles.

(a)
If the commissioner has not contested the calculation prior to the expiration
of sixty working days, commencing with the date the filing is delivered to the
commissioner, the loss ratio as filed by the carrier shall be used in
calculating refunds under subsection (5) of this section.

(b)
If the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss ratio, the
commissioner shall state in writing the grounds for contesting the calculation
to the health maintenance organization.

(c)
Any dispute regarding the calculation of the actual loss ratio shall, upon
written demand of either the commissioner or the health maintenance
organization, be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

(5)
If the actual loss ratio for the preceding calendar year is less than the loss
ratio standard established in subsection (6) of this section, refunds are due
and the following shall apply:

(a)
The health maintenance organization shall calculate a percentage of premium to
be refunded to enrollees and small group agreement holders by subtracting the
actual loss ratio for the preceding year from the loss ratio standard
established in subsection (6) of this section.

(b)
The refund due to each enrollee or small group agreement holder is the
percentage calculated in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by the premium
earned from each enrollee or small group agreement holder in the previous
calendar year. Interest shall be added to the refund due at a five percent
annual rate calculated from the end of the calendar year for which refunds are
due to the date the refunds are made.

(c)
Any refund due an enrollee or small group agreement holder in excess of ten
dollars shall be mailed to the enrollee or small group agreement holder at his
or her last known mailing address or credited against any premiums due.

(d)
All refunds equal to or less than ten dollars shall be aggregated and such amounts
shall be remitted to the Washington state health insurance pool to be used as
directed by the pool board of directors.

(e)
Any refund required to be issued under this section shall be issued within
thirty days after the actual loss ratio is determined under subsection (4) of
this section.

(f)
Any refund issued by a health maintenance organization to an enrollee or small
group agreement holder under this section that remains unclaimed by that
enrollee or small group agreement holder one year from the date it was issued
shall be remitted to the Washington state health insurance pool to be used as
directed by the pool board of directors. Health maintenance organizations that
comply with this subsection shall be relieved of liability for any unclaimed refunds.

(6)
The loss ratio standard applicable to this section shall be eighty percent.

V.
WASHINGTON BASIC HEALTH PLAN

Sec.
501. RCW
70.47.010 and 1993 c 492 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The legislature finds that limitations on access to health care services for
enrollees in the state, such as in rural and underserved areas, are
particularly challenging for the basic health plan. Statutory restrictions
have reduced the options available to the administrator to address the access
needs of basic health plan enrollees. It is the intent of the legislature to
authorize the administrator to develop alternative purchasing strategies to
ensure access to basic health plan enrollees in all areas of the state,
including: (i) The use of differential rating for managed health care systems
based on geographic differences in costs; and (ii) limited use of
self-insurance in areas where adequate access cannot be assured through other
options.

(b)
In developing alternative purchasing strategies to address health care access
needs, the administrator shall consult with interested persons including health
carriers, health care providers, and health facilities, and with other
appropriate state agencies including the office of the insurance commissioner
and the office of community and rural health. In pursuing such alternatives,
the administrator shall continue to give priority to prepaid managed care as
the preferred method of assuring access to basic health plan enrollees.

(2)
The legislature further finds that:

(a)
A significant percentage of the population of this state does not have
reasonably available insurance or other coverage of the costs of necessary
basic health care services;

(b)
This lack of basic health care coverage is detrimental to the health of the
individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare, and results in
substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial health care, often at the
expense of health care providers, health care facilities, and all purchasers of
health care, including the state; and

(c)
The use of managed health care systems has significant potential to reduce the
growth of health care costs incurred by the people of this state generally, and
by low-income pregnant women, and at-risk children and adolescents who need
greater access to managed health care.

(((2)))
(3) The purpose of this chapter is to provide or make more readily available
necessary basic health care services in an appropriate setting to working
persons and others who lack coverage, at a cost to these persons that does not
create barriers to the utilization of necessary health care services. To that
end, this chapter establishes a program to be made available to those residents
not eligible for medicare who share in a portion of the cost or who pay the
full cost of receiving basic health care services from a managed health care
system.

(((3)))
(4) It is not the intent of this chapter to provide health care services
for those persons who are presently covered through private employer-based
health plans, nor to replace employer-based health plans. However, the
legislature recognizes that cost-effective and affordable health plans may not
always be available to small business employers. Further, it is the intent of
the legislature to expand, wherever possible, the availability of private
health care coverage and to discourage the decline of employer-based coverage.

(((4)))
(5)(a) It is the purpose of this chapter to acknowledge the initial
success of this program that has (i) assisted thousands of families in their
search for affordable health care; (ii) demonstrated that low-income, uninsured
families are willing to pay for their own health care coverage to the extent of
their ability to pay; and (iii) proved that local health care providers are
willing to enter into a public-private partnership as a managed care system.

(b)
As a consequence, the legislature intends to extend an option to enroll to
certain citizens above two hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines
within the state who reside in communities where the plan is operational and
who collectively or individually wish to exercise the opportunity to purchase
health care coverage through the basic health plan if the purchase is done at
no cost to the state. It is also the intent of the legislature to allow
employers and other financial sponsors to financially assist such individuals
to purchase health care through the program so long as such purchase does not
result in a lower standard of coverage for employees.

(c)
The legislature intends that, to the extent of available funds, the program be
available throughout Washington state to subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees. It is also the intent of the legislature to enroll subsidized
enrollees first, to the maximum extent feasible.

(d)
The legislature directs that the basic health plan administrator identify
enrollees who are likely to be eligible for medical assistance and assist these
individuals in applying for and receiving medical assistance. The
administrator and the department of social and health services shall implement
a seamless system to coordinate eligibility determinations and benefit coverage
for enrollees of the basic health plan and medical assistance recipients.

Sec.
502. RCW
70.47.020 and 1997 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system
of enrollment and payment ((on a prepaid capitated basis)) for basic
health care services, administered by the plan administrator through
participating managed health care systems, created by this chapter.

(2)
"Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan administrator,
who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington state health
care authority.

(3)
"Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any combination thereof, that
provides directly or by contract basic health care services, as defined by the
administrator and rendered by duly licensed providers, ((on a prepaid
capitated basis)) to a defined patient population enrolled in the plan and
in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or self-insured
method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees provided under
RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations under RCW 70.47.100(6).

(4)
"Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the
individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated institution,
unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c)
who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health care system
participating in the plan; (d) whose gross family income at the time of
enrollment does not exceed twice the federal poverty level as adjusted for
family size and determined annually by the federal department of health and
human services; and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage from a
particular managed health care system in return for periodic payments to the
plan.

(5)
"Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus
the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for medicare;
(b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated institution,
unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the administrator; (c)
who resides in an area of the state served by a managed health care system
participating in the plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic health care coverage
from a particular managed health care system; and (e) who pays or on whose
behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan, without any
subsidy from the plan.

(6)
"Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic payment
the administrator makes to a managed health care system on behalf of a
subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the plan of providing the
plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount determined to be the
subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW 70.47.060(2).

(7)
"Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross family income
which an individual, their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the
plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee or a
nonsubsidized enrollee.

(8)
"Rate" means the ((per capita)) amount, negotiated by the
administrator with and paid to a participating managed health care system, that
is based upon the enrollment of subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the
plan and in that system.

Sec.
503. RCW
70.47.060 and 1998 c 314 s 17 and 1998 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
administrator has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care
services, including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital
services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be
necessary for basic health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that funds are available, offer as basic health plan services chemical
dependency services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services shall
increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by more than
five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating
managed health care system under the Washington basic health plan shall be
entitled to receive covered basic health care services in return for premium
payments to the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize proven
preventive and primary health care and shall include all services necessary for
prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage
for groups of subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and
postnatal services through the medical assistance program under chapter 74.09
RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services except to the
extent that such services are necessary over not more than a one-month period
in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed
care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule
of basic health care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger,
for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure basic
coverage through the plan only for their dependent children. In designing and
revising the schedule of services, the administrator shall consider the
guidelines for assessing health services under the mandated benefits act of
1984, RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as the administrator deems
appropriate.

However,
with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive
prenatal and postnatal services through the medical assistance program under
chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services
except to the extent that the services are necessary over not more than a
one-month period in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of
pregnancy by the managed care provider.

(2)(a)
To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator
from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross family income, giving
appropriate consideration to family size and the ages of all family members.
The enrollment of children shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums
shall be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.

(b)
To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized
enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount equal
to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the state for
the plan plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those enrollees
and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(c)
An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of a
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator.

(((d)
To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing coverage identical
to the basic health plan, as configured on January 1, 1996, a basic health plan
model plan with uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.))

(3)
To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost sharing due a managed
health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure
shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but
shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.

(4)
To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an
overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the
administrator finds that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the
administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger
no longer exists.

(5)
To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as defined in RCW
70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who qualify may be based
on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the administrator.

(6)
To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery of services and
availability of the plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations
contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7)
To solicit and accept applications from managed health care systems, as defined
in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under
the plan. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health
care services are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection
of two or more participating managed health care systems. In adopting any
rules or procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make suitable
allowance for the need for health care services and the differences in local availability
of health care resources, along with other resources, within and among the
several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed health care
systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become eligible for
medical assistance may, at their option, continue to receive services from
their existing providers within the managed health care system if such
providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of social
and health services.

(8)
To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep
records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the
respective managed health care systems.

(9)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan,
on behalf of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for
enrollment in the Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale premiums.
Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption support
program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes
of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill the
enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of
up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define
the appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement
the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No
subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110,
who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter
74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10)
To accept applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their
employees, spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. The administrator may
require all or the substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures necessary to
facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed
health care system. The administrator may require that a business owner pay at
least an amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its
portion of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare
who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care
coverage and services from a managed care system participating in the plan.
The administrator shall adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or
from all such enrollees whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator
with the participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(11)
To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed health care
system in return for the provision of covered basic health care services to
enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of covered basic health care
services will be the same or actuarially equivalent for similar
enrollees, the rates negotiated with participating managed health care systems
may vary among the systems. In negotiating rates with participating systems,
the administrator shall consider the characteristics of the populations served
by the respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and other
factors the administrator finds relevant.

(12)
To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by participating
managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee access to good quality
basic health care, to require periodic data reports concerning the utilization
of health care services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate
information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of
participating managed health care systems to assure compliance with the
purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed
health care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care
systems and to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and
the department of health, to minimize duplication of effort.

(13)
To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care
coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal
statutes that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

(14)
To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and to integrate it
into the plan wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(15)
To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for rural residents,
underserved populations, and persons of color.

(16)
In consultation with appropriate state and local government agencies, to
establish criteria defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in
government-operated institutions.

Sec.
504. RCW
70.47.100 and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A managed health care systems participating in the plan shall do so by
contract with the administrator and shall provide, directly or by contract with
other health care providers, covered basic health care services to each
enrollee covered by its contract with the administrator as long as
payments from the administrator on behalf of the enrollee are current. A
participating managed health care system may offer, without additional cost,
health care benefits or services not included in the schedule of covered
services under the plan. A participating managed health care system shall not
give preference in enrollment to enrollees who accept such additional health
care benefits or services. Managed health care systems participating in the
plan shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based
upon health status, sex, race, ethnicity, or religion. The administrator may
receive and act upon complaints from enrollees regarding failure to provide
covered services or efforts to obtain payment, other than authorized
copayments, for covered services directly from enrollees, but nothing in this
chapter empowers the administrator to impose any sanctions under Title 18 RCW
or any other professional or facility licensing statute.

(2)
The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for enrollees to
transfer their enrollments among participating managed health care systems
serving their respective areas. The administrator shall establish a period of
at least twenty days in a given year when this opportunity is afforded
enrollees, and in those areas served by more than one participating managed
health care system the administrator shall endeavor to establish a uniform
period for such opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees to transfer their
enrollment to another participating managed health care system at any time upon
a showing of good cause for the transfer.

((Any
contract between a hospital and a participating managed health care system
under this chapter is subject to the requirements of RCW 70.39.140(1) regarding
negotiated rates.))

(3)
Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the administrator
shall determine, on an actuarially sound basis, the reasonable cost of
providing the schedule of basic health care services, expressed in terms of
upper and lower limits, and recognizing variations in the cost of providing the
services through the various systems and in different areas of the state.

(4)
In negotiating with managed health care systems for participation in the plan,
the administrator shall adopt a uniform procedure that includes at least the
following:

(((1)))
(a) The administrator shall issue a request for proposals, including
standards regarding the quality of services to be provided; financial integrity
of the responding systems; and responsiveness to the unmet health care needs of
the local communities or populations that may be served;

(((2)))
(b) The administrator shall then review responsive proposals and may
negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to refine any proposals;

(((3)))
(c) The administrator may then select one or more systems to provide the
covered services within a local area; and

(((4)))
(d) The administrator may adopt a policy that gives preference to
respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics, that have a history of
providing quality health care services to low-income persons.

(5)
The administrator may establish procedures and policies to further negotiate
and contract with managed health care systems following completion of the
request for proposal process in subsection (4) of this section, upon a
determination by the administrator that it is necessary to provide access to
covered basic health care services for enrollees.

(6)
The administrator may utilize a self-funded or self-insured method of providing
insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees provided under RCW 41.05.140 if:
(a) It is necessary to provide access to covered basic health care services for
subsidized enrollees; (b) funding for adequate reserves is available in the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account; and (c) other options for
providing access to covered basic health care services for subsidized enrollees
are not feasible.

Sec.
505. RCW
41.05.140 and 1994 c 153 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for property and casualty insurance, the authority may self-fund,
self-insure, or enter into other methods of providing insurance coverage for
insurance programs under its jurisdiction ((except property and casualty
insurance)), including the basic health plan as provided in chapter
70.47 RCW. The authority shall contract for payment of claims or other
administrative services for programs under its jurisdiction. If a program does
not require the prepayment of reserves, the authority shall establish such
reserves within a reasonable period of time for the payment of claims as are
normally required for that type of insurance under an insured program.

(2)
Reserves established by the authority for employee and retiree benefit programs
shall be held in a separate trust fund by the state treasurer and shall be
known as the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund. The state
investment board shall act as the investor for the funds and, except as
provided in RCW 43.33A.160, one hundred percent of all earnings from these
investments shall accrue directly to the public employees' and retirees'
insurance reserve fund.

(3)
Any savings realized as a result of a program created for employees and
retirees under this section shall not be used to increase benefits unless such
use is authorized by statute.

(4)
Reserves established by the authority to provide insurance coverage for the
basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW shall be held in a separate trust
account in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be known as the basic
health plan self-insurance reserve account. The state investment board shall
act as the investor for the funds and, except as provided in RCW 43.33A.160,
one hundred percent of all earnings from these investments shall accrue
directly to the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account.

(5)
Any program created under this section shall be subject to the examination
requirements of chapter 48.03 RCW as if the program were a domestic insurer.
In conducting an examination, the commissioner shall determine the adequacy of
the reserves established for the program.

(((5)))
(6) The authority shall keep full and adequate accounts and records of
the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of any program created under
this section.

(((6)))
(7) The authority shall file a quarterly statement of the financial
condition, transactions, and affairs of any program created under this section
in a form and manner prescribed by the insurance commissioner. The statement
shall contain information as required by the commissioner for the type of
insurance being offered under the program. A copy of the annual statement
shall be filed with the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate.

Sec.
506. RCW 43.79A.040
and 1999 c 384 s 8 and 1999 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 507. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state health insurance pool account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from moneys specifically appropriated to the
account must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only to cover deficits incurred by the Washington state health insurance
pool under this chapter in excess of the threshold established in this
section. To the extent funds are available in the account, funds shall be
expended from the account only to offset that portion of the deficit that would
otherwise have to be recovered by imposing an assessment on members in excess
of a threshold of seventy cents per insured person per month. The commissioner
shall authorize expenditures from the account, to the extent that funds are
available in the account, upon certification by the pool board that assessments
will exceed the threshold level established in this section. The account is
subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec.
508. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, and 1999 c 94 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal
sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and
pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account)) and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western
Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account,
the county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the marine
operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education
account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account,
the safety and education account, the special category C account, the state
patrol highway account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation
fund, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
509. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, 1999 c 94 s 3,
and 1999 c 94 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 2 account, the tobacco prevention and control account,
the tobacco settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the
tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund,
the University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief
and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account)) and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' administrative
fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington state health insurance pool account,
the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
510. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior
to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the
resource management cost account, the site closure account, the special
wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees'
insurance reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the
state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account)) and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state health insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
511. RCW
48.44.130 and 1961 c 197 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

No
health care service contractor nor any individual acting on behalf thereof
shall guarantee or agree to the payment of future dividends or future refunds
of unused charges or savings in any specific or approximate amounts or
percentages in respect to any contract being offered to the public, except in a
group contract containing an experience refund provision or in compliance
with RCW 48.44.022.

Sec.
512. RCW
48.46.300 and 1983 c 106 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No health maintenance organization nor any individual acting in behalf thereof
may guarantee or agree to the payment of future dividends or future refunds of
unused charges or savings in any specific or approximate amounts or percentages
in respect to any contract being offered to the public, except in a group
contract containing an experience refund provision or in compliance with RCW
48.46.064.

(2)
The issuance, sale, or offer for sale in this state of securities of its own
issue by any health maintenance organization domiciled in this state other than
the memberships and bonds of a nonprofit corporation are subject to the
provisions of chapter 48.06 RCW relating to obtaining solicitation permits.

Sec.
513. RCW
48.21.047 and 1995 c 265 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No insurer shall offer any health benefit plan to any small employer without
complying with the provisions of RCW 48.21.045(((5))) (1).

(2)
Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations or through
member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health
care shall not be considered small employers and such plans shall not be
subject to the provisions of RCW 48.21.045(((5))) (1).

(3)
For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW
48.43.005.

Sec.
514. RCW
48.44.024 and 1995 c 265 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No health care service contractor shall offer any health benefit plan to any
small employer without complying with the provisions of RCW 48.44.023(((5)))
(1).

(2)
Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations or through
member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health
care shall not be considered small employers and such plans shall not be
subject to the provisions of RCW 48.44.023(((5))) (1).

(3)
For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW
48.43.005.

Sec.
515. RCW
48.46.068 and 1995 c 265 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No health maintenance organization shall offer any health benefit plan to any
small employer without complying with the provisions of RCW 48.46.066(((5)))
(1).

(2)
Employers purchasing health plans provided through associations or through
member-governed groups formed specifically for the purpose of purchasing health
care shall not be considered small employers and such plans shall not be
subject to the provisions of RCW 48.46.066(((5))) (1).

(3)
For purposes of this section, "health benefit plan," "health
plan," and "small employer" mean the same as defined in RCW
48.43.005.

VI.
MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. RCW
48.41.180 (Offer of coverage to eligible persons) and 1987 c 431
s 18 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602.
Subheadings and the table of contents used in this act are not any part of the
law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604. (1)
Section 509 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

(2)
Section 510 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605.
Sections 508 and 509 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 606. With
the exception of sections 509 and 510 of this act, this act is necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support
of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect
immediately.

---
END ---