BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that individuals with disabilities face many barriers and
disincentives to employment. Individuals with disabilities are often unable to
obtain health insurance that provides the services and supports necessary to
allow them to live independently and enter or rejoin the work force. In some
cases, government policies and services create barriers to employment through
disqualifying workers with disabilities from needed health care and support
services. The legislature finds that there is a compelling public interest in
eliminating barriers to work by creating financial incentives to work, by
continuing needed health care coverage, and by providing individuals with
disabilities real choice in obtaining the services and technology they need to
find, enter, and maintain employment.

The
legislature intends to strengthen the state's policy of supporting individuals
with disabilities in leading fully productive lives by implementing the ticket
to work and work incentives improvement act, public law H.R. 1180, that will
foster higher levels of employment and economic self-sufficiency. This shall
include improving incentives to work by continuing coverage for health care and
support services, by seeking federal funding for innovative programs, and by
exploring options which provide individuals with disabilities a choice in
receiving services needed to obtain and maintain employment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature to remove barriers to employment for
individuals with disabilities by providing medical assistance to the working
disabled in accordance with federal law and eligibility requirements
established by the department.

(2)
The department shall establish income, resource, and cost-sharing requirements
in accordance with federal law. In developing premium obligations and
cost-sharing requirements under this act, the department must strongly consider
that individuals receiving benefits under this act:

(a)
Will be employed, and may be earning significant income. Premium obligations
and cost-sharing requirements must be designed to reduce the public funding
needed to subsidize the cost of coverage, but must not be set so high as to
create substantial barriers to obtaining coverage under this act; and

(b)
May have employer-sponsored health insurance coverage. The department must
make every effort to maximize opportunities to coordinate benefits with
employer-sponsored coverage available to individuals receiving benefits under
this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.09.510 and 1997 c 58 s 201 and 1997 c 59 s 14 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Medical
assistance may be provided in accordance with eligibility requirements
established by the department, as defined in the social security Title XIX
state plan for mandatory categorically needy persons and: (1) Individuals who
would be eligible for cash assistance except for their institutional status;
(2) individuals who are under twenty-one years of age, and who ((would
be eligible for temporary assistance for needy families, but do not qualify as
dependent children and who)) are in (a) foster care, (b) subsidized
adoption, (c) a nursing facility or an intermediate care facility for the
mentally retarded, or (d) inpatient psychiatric facilities; (3) the aged,
blind, and disabled who: (a) Receive only a state supplement, or (b) would not
be eligible for cash assistance if they were not institutionalized; (4)
categorically eligible individuals who meet the income and resource
requirements of the cash assistance programs; (5) individuals who are enrolled
in managed health care systems, who have otherwise lost eligibility for medical
assistance, but who have not completed a current six-month enrollment in a
managed health care system, and who are eligible for federal financial
participation under Title XIX of the social security act; (6) children and
pregnant women allowed by federal statute for whom funding is appropriated; (7)
working individuals with disabilities authorized under section
1902(a)(10)(A)(ii) of the social security act for whom funding is appropriated;
(8) other individuals eligible for medical services under RCW 74.09.035 and
74.09.700 for whom federal financial participation is available under Title XIX
of the social security act; and (((8))) (9) persons allowed by
section 1931 of the social security act for whom funding is appropriated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall:

(1)
Work with interested public and private entities to determine the feasibility
of seeking designation as one or more employment networks within the state to
serve social security administration recipients with disabilities who are
issued a ticket to work under the provisions of the ticket to work and work
incentives improvement act;

(2)
Explore the feasibility of federal grants available to assist in the development
of infrastructure to assist persons with disabilities seek, gain, and maintain
employment; and

(3)
Determine the feasibility of applying for a demonstration grant to provide
medicaid benefits for individuals with potentially severe disabilities under
the ticket to work and work incentives improvement act, as an incentive to
obtain or keep employment in lieu of general assistance cash benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect October 1, 2000.

---
END ---