BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.250 and 1997 c 58 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, "work
activity" means:

(1)
Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(2)
Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector, including
employment through the state or federal work-study program for a period not to
exceed twenty-four months;

(3)
Work experience, including:

(a)
An internship or practicum, that is paid or unpaid and is required to complete
a course of vocational training or to obtain a license or certificate in a high
demand field, as determined by the employment security department. No
internship or practicum shall exceed twelve months; or

(b)
Work associated with the refurbishing of publicly assisted housing, if
sufficient paid employment is not available;

(4)
On-the-job training;

(5)
Job search and job readiness assistance;

(6)
Community service programs;

(7)
Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months with respect to
any individual;

(8)
Job skills training directly related to employment;

(9)
Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has
not received a high school diploma or a GED;

(10)
Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to
a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or
received such a certificate;

(11)
The provision of child care services to an individual who is participating in a
community service program; ((and))

(12)
Internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience performed by an
intern in a business, industry, or government or nongovernmental agency
setting;

(13)
Practicums, which include any educational program in which a student is working
under the close supervision of a professional in an agency, clinic, or other
professional practice setting for purposes of advancing their skills and
knowledge; and

(14) Services required by the recipient under RCW
74.08.025(3) and 74.08A.010(3) to become employable.

---
END ---