BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

The deployment and operation of a vessel between established ferry
terminal facilities is not an action requiring environmental review under this
chapter. The purpose of this section is to clarify the scope of the
application of this chapter to ferry operations, and it is the legislature's
intent that this section be given retroactive effect to the maximum extent
possible in order to accomplish this purpose.

---
END ---