BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that population growth and overall economic prosperity has
had a profound effect on law enforcement in counties with significant urban
centers and suburban growth in Washington. Incorporations and annexations have
caused cities, both small and large, to consider their own municipal police
departments. Furthermore, the legislature recognizes that cities, counties,
and the Washington state patrol have limited resources to support and maintain
necessary public safety services.

In
the absence of county-wide law enforcement needs and services analysis, some
law enforcement agencies have developed special unit capabilities that may need
coordination with other cities' law enforcement agencies and the county
sheriff. The legislature also finds that as a result, there may be differences
in public safety service delivery in Washington where there is either
duplication or an absence of available specialty services increasing the
possibility of municipal liability and risk, and inefficient and/or unnecessary
use of public safety funds. Recognizing that coordinated law enforcement and
basic public safety service standards on a county-wide basis is in the best
interests of the citizens of Washington, the legislature therefore intends with
this act to authorize a study of law enforcement costs, expenditures, services,
cooperative arrangements, and service delivery models for counties with over
one hundred fifty thousand population. The goal of the regional services study
is to produce implementable recommendations for cost-effective, collaborative
law enforcement service delivery partnerships.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 39.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall contract for the
purposes of conducting a study of the total costs and expenditures for law
enforcement for both counties and cities within the county for counties with
populations over one hundred fifty thousand. The focus of the study:

(a)
Would include recommendations for law enforcement jurisdictions, Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs' actions, and the legislature;

(b)
Shall be to research, compile, and analyze data sufficient to provide a
comprehensive analysis of the costs and total expenditures for law
enforcement. These costs include but are not limited to special services,
defined as but not limited to: SWAT teams, bomb disposal units, air support,
marine units, hostage negotiation teams, homicide investigation units, drug
units, canine units, arson investigation teams, computer fraud and forensics
units, domestic violence and special assault units, and gang and youth violence
units. The study should distinguish where there are duplications and gaps in
service delivery;

(c)
Shall be to obtain data from all local governments on the types of costs
identified in (b) of this subsection. This data will be compiled and analyzed
by the agency or organization commissioned to conduct the study for each county;

(d)
Shall be to obtain data from those counties and law enforcement agencies where
master interlocal agreements, joint specialty service units, and other
cooperative arrangements have been developed between law enforcement agencies
to improve the effectiveness, efficiency, and ensured quality of specialty law
enforcement services.

(2)
The study shall commence no later than July 1, 2000, and be completed by no
later than January 1, 2001. The final report shall be distributed to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs and to the appropriate
standing committee no later than January 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2001, to the criminal justice training commission, for the sole
purpose of carrying out this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---