BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.32A.060 and 1997 c 146 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 13.32A.050(1) (a) or (b) shall
inform the child of the reason for such custody and shall:

(a)
Transport the child to his or her home or to a parent at his or her place of
employment, if no parent is at home. The parent may request that the officer
take the child to the home of an adult extended family member, responsible
adult, crisis residential center, the department, or a licensed youth shelter.
In responding to the request of the parent, the officer shall take the child to
a requested place which, in the officer's belief, is within a reasonable
distance of the parent's home. The officer releasing a child into the custody
of a parent, an adult extended family member, responsible adult, or a licensed
youth shelter shall inform the person receiving the child of the reason for
taking the child into custody and inform all parties of the nature and location
of appropriate services available in the community; or

(b)
After attempting to notify the parent, take the child to a designated crisis
residential center's secure facility or a center's semi-secure facility if a
secure facility is full, not available, or not located within a reasonable
distance:

(i)
If the child expresses fear or distress at the prospect of being returned to
his or her home which leads the officer to believe there is a possibility that
the child is experiencing some type of child abuse or neglect, as defined in
RCW 26.44.020;

(ii)
If it is not practical to transport the child to his or her home or place of
the parent's employment; or

(iii)
If there is no parent available to accept custody of the child; or

(c)
After attempting to notify the parent, if a crisis residential center is full,
not available, or not located within a reasonable distance, the officer may
request the department to accept custody of the child. If the department
determines that an appropriate placement is currently available, the department
shall accept custody and place the child in an out-of-home placement. Upon
accepting custody of a child from the officer, the department may place the
child in an out-of-home placement for up to seventy-two hours, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, without filing a child in need of services
petition under this chapter, obtaining parental consent, or obtaining an order
for placement under chapter 13.34 RCW. Upon transferring a child to the
department's custody, the officer shall provide written documentation of the
reasons and the statutory basis for taking the child into custody. If the
department declines to accept custody of the child, the officer may release the
child after attempting to take the child to the following, in the order
listed: The home of an adult extended family member; a responsible adult; a
licensed youth shelter and shall immediately notify the department if no
placement option is available and the child is released.

(2)
An officer taking a child into custody under RCW 13.32A.050(1) (c) or (d) shall
inform the child of the reason for custody. An officer taking a child into
custody under RCW 13.32A.050(1)(c) may release the child to the supervising
agency, or shall take the child to a designated crisis residential center's
secure facility. If the secure facility is not available, not located within a
reasonable distance, or full, the officer shall take the child to a semi-secure
crisis residential center. An officer taking a child into custody under RCW
13.32A.050(1)(d) may place the child in a juvenile detention facility as
provided in RCW 13.32A.065 or a secure facility, except that the child shall be
taken to either (a) a secure crisis residential center which is a separate,
secure section of a juvenile detention facility; or (b) detention whenever
the officer has been notified that a juvenile court has entered ((a
detention)) an order directing such placement under this
chapter or chapter 13.34 RCW. In no case shall a child in contempt be
confined in a crisis residential center that is a free-standing facility
outside a juvenile detention facility.

(3)
Whenever an officer transfers custody of a child to a crisis residential center
or the department, the child may reside in the crisis residential center or may
be placed by the department in an out-of-home placement for an aggregate total
period of time not to exceed seventy-two hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays, except that a child placed in a secure facility within a
crisis residential center under a court order entered under RCW 13.32A.250 must
remain in the secure facility as provided in RCW 13.32A.065. Thereafter,
the child may continue in out-of-home placement only if the parents have
consented, a child in need of services petition has been filed under this
chapter, or an order for placement has been entered under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(4)
The department shall ensure that all law enforcement authorities are informed
on a regular basis as to the location of all designated secure and semi-secure
facilities within centers in their jurisdiction, where children taken into
custody under RCW 13.32A.050 may be taken.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.32A.065 and 1996 c 133 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A child may be placed in either (a) a secure crisis residential center which
is a separate, secure section of a juvenile detention facility; or (b)
detention after being taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.32A.050(1)(d). In
no case shall a child in contempt be confined in a crisis residential center
that is a free-standing facility outside a juvenile detention facility.
The court shall hold a ((detention)) review hearing within twenty-four
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The court shall release the
child after twenty-four hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays,
unless:

(a)
A motion and order to show why the child should not be held in contempt has
been filed and served on the child at or before the detention hearing; and

(b)
The court believes that the child would not appear at a hearing on contempt.

(2)
If the court ((orders the child to remain in detention)) finds that
the conditions in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section have been met,
the court may order the child to remain confined either in (a) a secure
crisis residential center which is a separate, secure section of a juvenile
detention facility; or (b) detention, and shall set the matter for a
hearing on contempt within seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays. In no case shall a child in contempt be confined in a crisis
residential center that is a free-standing facility outside a juvenile
detention facility.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.32A.130 and 1997 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A child admitted to a secure facility within a crisis residential center shall
remain in the facility for not more than five consecutive days, but for at
least twenty-four hours after admission. If the child admitted under this
section is transferred between centers or between secure and semi-secure
facilities, the aggregate length of time spent in all such centers or
facilities may not exceed five consecutive days.

(2)(a)(i)
The facility administrator shall determine within twenty-four hours after a
child's admission to a secure facility whether the child is likely to remain in
a semi-secure facility and may transfer the child to a semi-secure facility or
release the child to the department. The determination shall be based on: (A)
The need for continued assessment, protection, and treatment of the child in a
secure facility; and (B) the likelihood the child would remain at a semi-secure
facility until his or her parents can take the child home or a petition can be
filed under this title.

(ii)
In making the determination the administrator shall consider the following
information if known: (A) The child's age and maturity; (B) the child's
condition upon arrival at the center; (C) the circumstances that led to the
child's being taken to the center; (D) whether the child's behavior endangers
the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; (E) the
child's history of running away which has endangered the health, safety, and
welfare of the child; and (F) the child's willingness to cooperate in the
assessment.

(b)
If the administrator of a secure facility determines the child is unlikely to
remain in a semi-secure facility, the administrator shall keep the child in the
secure facility pursuant to this chapter and in order to provide for space for
the child may transfer another child who has been in the facility for at least
seventy-two hours to a semi-secure facility. The administrator shall only make
a transfer of a child after determining that the child who may be transferred
is likely to remain at the semi-secure facility.

(c)
A crisis residential center administrator is authorized to transfer a child to
a crisis residential center in the area where the child's parents reside or
where the child's lawfully prescribed residence is located.

(d)
An administrator may transfer a child from a semi-secure facility to a secure
facility whenever he or she reasonably believes that the child is likely to
leave the semi-secure facility and not return and after full consideration of
all factors in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(3)
If no parent is available or willing to remove the child during the first
seventy-two hours following admission, the department shall consider the filing
of a petition under RCW 13.32A.140.

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the parents
may remove the child at any time during the five-day period unless the staff of
the crisis residential center has reasonable cause to believe that the child is
absent from the home because he or she is abused or neglected or if allegations
of abuse or neglect have been made against the parents. The department or any
agency legally charged with the supervision of a child may remove a child from
a crisis residential center at any time after the first twenty-four-hour period
after admission has elapsed and only after full consideration by all parties of
the factors in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(5)
Crisis residential center staff shall make reasonable efforts to protect the
child and achieve a reconciliation of the family. If a reconciliation and
voluntary return of the child has not been achieved within forty-eight hours
from the time of intake, and if the administrator of the center does not
consider it likely that reconciliation will be achieved within the five-day period,
then the administrator shall inform the parent and child of: (a) The
availability of counseling services; (b) the right to file a child in need of
services petition for an out-of-home placement, the right of a parent to file
an at-risk youth petition, and the right of the parent and child to obtain
assistance in filing the petition; (c) the right to request the facility
administrator or his or her designee to form a multidisciplinary team; (d) the
right to request a review of any out-of-home placement; (e) the right to
request a mental health or chemical dependency evaluation by a
county-designated professional or a private treatment facility; and (f) the
right to request treatment in a program to address the child's at-risk behavior
under RCW 13.32A.197.

(6)
At no time shall information regarding a parent's or child's rights be
withheld. The department shall develop and distribute to all law enforcement
agencies and to each crisis residential center administrator a written
statement delineating the services and rights. Every officer taking a child
into custody shall provide the child and his or her parent(s) or responsible
adult with whom the child is placed with a copy of the statement. In addition,
the administrator of the facility or his or her designee shall provide every
resident and parent with a copy of the statement.

(7)
A crisis residential center and its administrator or his or her designee acting
in good faith in carrying out the provisions of this section are immune from
criminal or civil liability for such actions.

(8)
This section does not apply to children admitted to either (a) a secure crisis
residential center which is a separate, secure section of a juvenile detention
facility; or (b) detention by a court order issued under RCW 13.32A.250(3) or
28A.225.090(2). In no case shall a child in contempt be confined in a crisis
residential center that is a free-standing facility outside a juvenile
detention facility.

Sec.
4. RCW
13.32A.250 and 1998 c 296 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In all child in need of services proceedings and at-risk youth proceedings, the
court shall verbally notify the parents and the child of the possibility of a
finding of contempt for failure to comply with the terms of a court order
entered pursuant to this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the court shall treat the parents and the child equally for the
purposes of applying contempt of court processes and penalties under this
section.

(2)
Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this chapter is a
civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), subject to the
limitations of subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
The court may impose remedial sanctions including a fine of up to one hundred
dollars and confinement for up to seven days, or both for contempt of court
under this section.

(4)
A child placed in confinement for contempt under this section shall be placed
in confinement ((only)) either in a secure juvenile detention
facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with a county or a secure
crisis residential center which is a separate, secure section of a juvenile
detention facility. In no case shall a child in contempt be confined in a
crisis residential center that is a free-standing facility outside a juvenile
detention facility.

(5)
A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, a child, juvenile court
personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of
the child under a court order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(6)
Whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of
a motion for contempt and the information set forth in a supporting
declaration, that a child has violated a placement order entered under this
chapter, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and
take the child to detention or to a secure crisis residential center.
The order may be entered ex parte without prior notice to the child or other
parties. Following the child's admission to detention or to the secure
facility, a ((detention)) review hearing must be held in accordance
with RCW 13.32A.065.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 13.32A RCW to read as follows:

The
court may only provide for confinement of a child in a secure crisis
residential center under RCW 13.32A.250(3) or 28A.225.090(2) if: (1) The
department and the center director certify that space is available to
accommodate the child held in contempt; and (2) such confinement is consistent
with any local court rule of the superior court of the county in which the
secure crisis residential center is located. If the department and the center
director rescind their certification, the court shall immediately transfer the
child to a juvenile detention facility for the remainder of the period of
confinement.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.225.090 and 1999 c 319 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to:

(a)
Attend the child's current school;

(b)
If there is space available and the program can provide educational services
appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an
alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention
program, or another public educational program;

(c)
Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center.
Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian
school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private
programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the
child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept
the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by
contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to
enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall
contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the
child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate
that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly
basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district
shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the
remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter
into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d)
Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or

(e)
Submit to testing for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a
determination that such testing is appropriate to the circumstances and
behavior of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the
mandatory attendance law.

(2)
If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may order the
child to be ((subject to detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e))) placed
in confinement for contempt, either in a juvenile detention facility operated
by or under a contract with a county or in a secure crisis residential center
which is a separate, secure section of a juvenile detention facility, or
may impose alternatives to ((detention)) confinement such as
community service. Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under
this subsection shall not be subject to detention for a period greater than
that permitted pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under
chapter 13.32A RCW. In no case shall a child in contempt be confined in a
crisis residential center that is a free-standing facility outside a juvenile
detention facility.

(3)
Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010,
28A.225.015, or 28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars
for each day of unexcused absence from school. It shall be a defense for a
parent charged with violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised
reasonable diligence in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to
attend school or that the child's school did not perform its duties as required
in RCW 28A.225.020. The court may order the parent to provide community
service instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section
may be suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW
28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised
plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent
attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of
analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

(4)
If a child continues to be truant after entering into a court-approved order
with the truancy board under RCW 28A.225.035, the juvenile court shall find the
child in contempt, and the court may order the child to be subject to
detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may impose alternatives to
detention such as meaningful community service. Failure by a child to comply
with an order issued under this subsection may not subject a child to detention
for a period greater than that permitted under a civil contempt proceeding
against a child under chapter 13.32A RCW.

(5)
Subsections (1), (2), and (4) of this section shall not apply to a six or seven
year-old child required to attend public school under RCW 28A.225.015.

Sec.
7. RCW
74.13.033 and 1995 c 312 s 62 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a resident of a center becomes by his or her behavior disruptive to the
facility's program, such resident may be immediately removed to a separate area
within the facility and counseled on an individual basis until such time as the
child regains his or her composure. The department may set rules and
regulations establishing additional procedures for dealing with severely
disruptive children on the premises. A child confined in a secure crisis
residential center which is a separate, secure section of a juvenile detention
facility under RCW 13.32A.250(3) or 28A.225.090(2) may be moved to an available
bed in a juvenile detention facility. In no case shall a child in contempt be
confined in a crisis residential center that is a free-standing facility
outside a juvenile detention facility.

(2)
When the juvenile resides in this facility, all services deemed necessary to
the juvenile's reentry to normal family life shall be made available to the
juvenile as required by chapter 13.32A RCW. In assessing the child and
providing these services, the facility staff shall:

(a)
Interview the juvenile as soon as possible;

(b)
Contact the juvenile's parents and arrange for a counseling interview with the
juvenile and his or her parents as soon as possible;

(c)
Conduct counseling interviews with the juvenile and his or her parents, to the
end that resolution of the child/parent conflict is attained and the child is
returned home as soon as possible;

(d)
Provide additional crisis counseling as needed, to the end that placement of
the child in the crisis residential center will be required for the shortest
time possible, but not to exceed five consecutive days or, in the case of a
child admitted by court order issued under RCW 13.32A.250(3) or 28A.225.090(2),
seven consecutive days; and

(e)
Convene, when appropriate, a multidisciplinary team.

(3)
Based on the assessments done under subsection (2) of this section the facility
staff may refer any child who, as the result of a mental or emotional disorder,
or intoxication by alcohol or other drugs, is suicidal, seriously assaultive,
or seriously destructive toward others, or otherwise similarly evidences an
immediate need for emergency medical evaluation and possible care, for
evaluation pursuant to chapter 71.34 RCW, to a mental health professional
pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW, or to a chemical dependency specialist pursuant
to chapter 70.96A RCW whenever such action is deemed appropriate and consistent
with law.

(4)
A juvenile taking unauthorized leave from a facility shall be apprehended and
returned to it by law enforcement officers or other persons designated as
having this authority as provided in RCW 13.32A.050. If returned to the
facility after having taken unauthorized leave for a period of more than
twenty-four hours a juvenile shall be supervised by such a facility for a
period, pursuant to this chapter, which, unless where otherwise provided, may
not exceed five consecutive days on the premises. Costs of housing juveniles
admitted to crisis residential centers shall be assumed by the department for a
period not to exceed five consecutive days.

Sec.
8. RCW
74.13.034 and 1995 c 312 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A child taken into custody and taken to a crisis residential center established
pursuant to RCW 74.13.032 may, if the center is unable to provide appropriate
treatment, supervision, and structure to the child, be taken at department
expense to another crisis residential center, the nearest regional secure
crisis residential center, or a secure facility with which it is collocated under
RCW 74.13.032. Placement in both locations shall not exceed five consecutive
days from the point of intake as provided in RCW 13.32A.130 or, in the case
of a child admitted by court order issued under RCW 13.32A.250(3) or
28A.225.090(2), seven consecutive days.

(2)
A child taken into custody and taken to a crisis residential center established
by this chapter may be placed physically by the department or the department's
designee and, at departmental expense and approval, in a secure juvenile detention
facility operated by the county in which the center is located for a maximum of
forty-eight hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if the child has
taken unauthorized leave from the center and the person in charge of the center
determines that the center cannot provide supervision and structure adequate to
ensure that the child will not again take unauthorized leave. Juveniles placed
in such a facility pursuant to this section may not, to the extent possible,
come in contact with alleged or convicted juvenile or adult offenders.

(3)
Any child placed in secure detention pursuant to this section shall, during the
period of confinement, be provided with appropriate treatment by the department
or the department's designee, which shall include the services defined in RCW
74.13.033(2). If the child placed in secure detention is not returned home or
if an alternative living arrangement agreeable to the parent and the child is
not made within twenty-four hours after the child's admission, the child shall
be taken at the department's expense to a crisis residential center. Placement
in the crisis residential center or centers plus placement in juvenile
detention shall not exceed five consecutive days from the point of intake as
provided in RCW 13.32A.130 or, in the case of a child admitted by court
order issued under RCW 13.32A.250(3) or 28A.225.090(2), seven consecutive days.

(4) Juvenile detention facilities used pursuant to this section
shall first be certified by the department to ensure that juveniles placed in
the facility pursuant to this section are provided with living conditions
suitable to the well-being of the child. Where space is available, juvenile
courts, when certified by the department to do so, shall provide secure
placement for juveniles pursuant to this section, at department expense.

---
END ---