BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that competence in information literacy and fluency in
information technology are increasingly important in the workplace as well as
in day-to-day activities. The legislature finds that to prepare students to
meet the challenges of the work force and society, students must be able to
effectively manage and apply information from a variety of sources. In addition,
the legislature finds that institutions of higher education have the
opportunity to provide students with a framework and approach to use
information and technology effectively.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning in April 2000, representatives of the public baccalaureate
institutions designated by the council of presidents, in consultation with
representatives of the community and technical colleges and representatives of
the higher education coordinating board, shall convene an interinstitutional
group to begin to: (a) Develop a definition of information and technology
literacy; (b) develop strategies or standards by which to measure the
achievement of information and technology literacy; and (c) develop a financial
assessment of the cost of implementation.

(2)
The baccalaureate institutions shall provide the house of representatives and
senate committees on higher education with a progress report in January 2001.

(3)
By the end of January 2002, the baccalaureate institutions shall deliver to the
house of representatives and senate committees on higher education a report
detailing: (a) The definition of information and technology literacy; (b)
strategies or standards for measurement; (c) institutionally specific plans for
implementation; and (d) an evaluation of the feasibility of implementation
taking into consideration cost.

(4)
If the legislature determines that implementation is feasible, the public baccalaureate
institutions shall pilot test strategies to assess and report on information
and technology literacy during the 2002-03 academic year.

(5)
By the end of January 2004, the institutions shall report to the house of
representatives and senate committees on higher education the results of the
2002-03 pilot study.

(6)
Implementation of assessment strategies shall begin in the academic year
2003-04.

(7) The higher education coordinating board shall report results to
the house of representatives and senate committees on higher education in the
2005 legislative session.

---
END ---