BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
transportation fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for transportation purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall deposit into the transportation fund all revenue received from
taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the sale of, use of, or
charge made for:

(1)
Vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers used, or of the type designed primarily to
be used, upon the public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure
of the owner, or for the conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or
property, including fixed loads and facilities for human habitation; but not
including (a) dock and warehouse tractors and their cars or trailers, lumber
carriers of the type known as spiders, and all other automotive equipment not
designed primarily for use upon public streets or highways, (b) motor vehicles
or their trailers used entirely upon private property, or (c) mobile homes as
defined in RCW 46.04.302;

(2)
Travel trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.623;

(3)
Campers as defined in RCW 46.04.085;

(4)
Building, repairing, or improving of, or ingredients and components used for,
any publicly owned street, place, road, highway, easement, right-of-way, mass
public transportation terminal or parking facility, bridge, tunnel, or trestle
as described in RCW 82.04.050; and

(5)
Construction, improvement, or repair of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other
facility operated by the Washington state ferries or for the repair, overhaul,
or the dry-docking of any ferry operated by Washington state ferries.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---