BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
c 379 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE
SECRETARY OF STATE

Eastern
Branch Archives Building: Design (98-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for completion of the design
phase for the eastern regional archives facility to be sited on the south campus
of the Riverpoint higher education park in Spokane.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((48,645))

295,482

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((530,972))

284,135

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,135,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,714,617

Sec.
2. 1999
c 379 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Economic Revitalization (86-1-001) (00-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section from the public facilities construction loan
revolving account is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The department shall ensure that all funds transferred from the public works
assistance account into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account during the 1997-99 biennium are used only for loans to local
governments.

(2)
The department shall also ensure that all principal and interest payments from
these loans are paid into the public works assistance account.

(3)
The new appropriation from the public facility construction loan revolving
account shall be used solely to provide loans to eligible local governments and
grants to the extent permitted by law. The department shall ensure that all
principal and interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are
paid into this account.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State..... $ 1,539,515

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State...................... $ 9,500,000

-------------

Subtotal Reappropriation............. $ ((11,539,515))

11,039,515

Appropriation:

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State...................... $ ((13,000,000))

6,641,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 559,003

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 36,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((60,598,518))

54,239,518

Sec.
3. 1999
c 379 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

County
Public Facility Construction (00-2-010)

The
appropriations in this section shall be used solely for financial assistance to
distressed counties that have experienced extraordinary costs due to the
location of a major new business facility or the substantial expansion of an
existing business facility in the county. The entire appropriation from the
state building construction account shall be provided as a grant to support the
Grays Harbor water system project.

Appropriation:

Distressed
County Facilities Construction

Loan
Account‑-State................. $ ((4,000,000))

2,619,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 3,500,000

-------------

Subtotal Appropriation.............. $ ((7,500,000))

6,119,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((23,500,000))

22,119,000

Sec.
4. 1999
c 379 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public
Works Trust Fund (94-2-001) (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$10,000,000 of the new appropriation in this section is provided solely for the
preconstruction program as set forth in RCW 43.155.068.

(2)
$2,000,000 of the new appropriation in this section is for the emergency loan
program as set forth in RCW 43.155.065.

(3)
Not more than one percent of the new appropriation may be used for planning
loans.

(4)
It is the express intent of the legislature to use moneys in the public works
assistance account for no other purposes except the following:

(a)
To make loans and to give financial guarantees to local governments for public
works projects approved and recommended by the public works board;

(b)
To provide appropriations for state match requirements under federal law for
projects and activities conducted and financed by the public works board under
the drinking water assistance account;

(c)
To provide those costs approved by the public works board for administration of
the programs specified in this section; and

(d)
To provide water quality facility grants to local governments pursuant to
section 16 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 179,446,108

Appropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 203,150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 68,904,717

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 852,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,304,100,825

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Holly
Park Education Center

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for education space in the
Holly park housing development for South Seattle Community College; and

(2)
The appropriation in this section must be matched by an equal amount from other
sources.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Clark
County Skills Center

The
appropriation in this section must be matched by at least $1,300,000 from other
sources.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Services Facilities Program

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The state grant may provide no more than twenty-five percent of either the
estimated total capital cost or actual total capital cost, whichever is less.
The remaining portion of the project capital cost shall be a match from
nonstate sources and may include cash, land value, and other in-kind
contributions.

(2)
$150,000 is provided for hopelink located in Bellevue.

(3)
$75,000 is provided for the community action council of Lewis, Mason, and
Thurston counties located in Shelton.

(4)
$100,000 is provided for children northwest to construct one
childcare/community center in Clark county.

(5)
$128,000 is provided for the friends of youth located in Duvall.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 453,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 453,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative
Building Rehabilitation and Capitol Addition

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903, chapter 379, Laws of 1999;

(2)
$500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for design of the
interior rehabilitation and exterior preservation of the state legislative
building;

(3)
$1,500,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for design of a
capitol addition and access and site improvements to the south portico area;
and

(4)
$1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided to conduct a
feasibility study to identify the potential for private financial support, to
investigate the attachment of exterior sandstone, and to develop a detailed
space use analysis and programming to improve the overall efficiency of
buildings on the capitol campus.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account--State.... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 102,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 105,500,000

Sec.
9. 1999
c 379 s 928 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Yakima
National Guard Armory and Readiness Center: Design and ((utilities)) construction
(98-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

Funds
expended on this project for off-site utility infrastructure, and facility
construction and design, which may include the provision of electricity,
natural gas service, water service, sewer service, or facility construction and
design shall be for the benefit of the state. Entities that subsequently
connect or use this off-site utility infrastructure shall reimburse the state
at a rate proportional to their use. The military department shall develop
policies and procedures to ensure that this reimbursement occurs.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑‑Federal...................... $ 474,000

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 2,725,000

General
Fund‑-Federal...................... $ 8,275,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ 11,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 2,573,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((3,288,000))

692,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((16,861,000))

14,739,000

Sec.
10. 1999
c 379 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Ward renovation phase 6 (94-1-316)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((768,458))

82,800

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((5,400,765))

12,088,480

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((6,169,223))

12,171,280

Sec.
11. 1999
c 379 s 240 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern
State Hospital: Legal offender unit (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ ((6,297,315))

5,297,315

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 12,398,685

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((18,696,000))

17,696,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Security
Improvements at Western State Hospital (99-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for facility improvements
that are required as a result of the passage of Senate Bill No. 6214.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 538,815

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 115,185

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 654,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special
Commitment Center: Site development at McNeil Island (01‑2‑001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 4,828,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 59,171,500

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 64,000,000

Sec.
14. 1999
c 379 s 252 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (97-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement
with the department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal. $ 16,133,576

Appropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal. $ 16,985,921

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 17,739,874

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 34,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((67,873,450))

84,859,371

Sec.
15. 1999
c 379 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
39 Waste Disposal Facilities (82-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contracts
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities 1980)‑-State...... $ ((6,113,126))

6,871,420

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ ((12,293,785))

11,535,491

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 18,406,911

Sec.
16. 1999
c 379 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial
Clean Water Fund (86-2-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Up to $15,000,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided for
the extended grant payment to Metro/King county. The department shall, in
cooperation with Metro/King county, document the eligible costs remaining for
the extended grant payment, and submit a revised payment schedule to the
governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 1999.

(2)
Up to $10,000,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided for
the extended grant payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.

(3)
$3,600,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the
construction of a wastewater treatment plant at the city of Connell.

(4)
$900,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the
construction of a wastewater treatment plant at the city of Pateros.

(5)
The entire public works assistance account appropriation is provided for water
quality facility grants for communities with populations less than 5,000. The
department shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a
regulatory order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with water
quality regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been completed; and
(c) projects with a local match from reasonable water quality rates and
charges.

(((5)))
(6) The remaining appropriation in this section is provided for
state-wide water quality implementation and planning grants and loans. The
department shall give priority consideration to projects located in basins with
critical or depressed salmonid stocks.

(((6)))
(7) The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects
under contract on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated
with contracted projects lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this subsection for specific projects upon
findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of the
house of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and the
senate ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects
funded from the reappropriation in this section.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 32,336,890

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 52,000,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 10,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 62,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 158,376,857

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 140,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 392,713,747

Sec.
17. 1999
c 379 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Fund (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State............................... $ ((55,640,931))

28,810,479

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal............................. $ ((34,914,688))

38,704,192

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ ((90,555,619))

67,514,671

Appropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State............................... $ ((32,375,833))

52,854,981

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal............................. $ ((46,830,366))

48,147,552

-------------

Subtotal Appropriation.............. $ ((79,206,199))

101,002,533

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 120,971,790

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 320,207,299

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((610,940,907))

609,696,293

Sec.
18. 1999
sp.s. c 13 s 22 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Salmon
Recovery Grants Program (00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The entire (($119,928,000)) appropriation in this section is
provided solely to the salmon recovery funding board to provide grants to local
governments, state agencies, tribes, conservation districts, private
landowners, and nonprofit entities for salmon recovery activities pursuant to
chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2079), Laws of 1999 sp. sess. or chapter
. . . (Senate Bill No. 5595), Laws of 1999 sp. sess. If neither
chapter . . . (House Bill No. 2079), Laws of 1999 sp. sess. nor
chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5595), Laws of 1999 are enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this section shall lapse.

(2)
Up to $19,650,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for grants to local governments for salmon recovery in accordance with a grant
from the department of interior, United States fish and wildlife service
received in December 1998.

(((6)))
(3) $6,200,000 of the state building construction account‑-state,
$18,260,000 of the salmon recovery account, and $63,238,000 of the general fund‑‑federal
appropriation shall be distributed by the salmon recovery funding board for
fish passage barrier correction and fish screens to protect fish, for habitat
projects, and to purchase or lease riparian easements to restore and to protect
environmentally sensitive land in riparian areas to protect water quality and
improve salmon and steelhead habitat. The salmon recovery funding board shall
adopt rules for the implementation of this subsection consistent with the
requirements of the conservation reserve enhancement program, except the
eligibility is not limited to agricultural lands and contracts may exceed
fifteen years in duration. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation will be used primarily for landowners that do not qualify for the
federal conservation reserve enhancement program.

(4)
A final list of projects funded with appropriations from this section shall be
submitted to the office of financial management and the legislature by June
30th of each year.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal...................... $ 82,888,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-

State............................... $ 6,200,000

Salmon
Recovery Account.................... $ ((30,840,000))

18,510,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((119,928,000))

107,598,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((119,928,000))

107,598,000

Sec.
19. 1999
c 379 s 930 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington
Wildlife and Recreation Program (98-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section for the wildlife and recreation program under
chapter 43.98A RCW and RCW 43.98A.040 are subject to the following condition
and limitation:

(1)
The new appropriations in this section are provided for the approved list of projects
included in LEAP capital document No. 1999‑W3, as developed on April 23,
1999, and LEAP capital document No. 2000-W4, as developed on February 28,
2000.

(2)
Any funding provided in this section for the Mt. Spokane - Quartz Mountain
acquisition by the state parks and recreation commission shall not exceed fair
market value as determined by an evaluation of three independent appraisals.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,475,416

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 23,733,311

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 25,872,718

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 56,081,445

Appropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 23,000,000

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 25,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 48,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 213,018,555

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 190,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 507,100,000

Sec.
20. 1999
c 379 s 335 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation
Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 5,000,000

((Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 5,000,000))

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((10,000,000))

15,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 20,000,000

Sec.
21. 1999
c 379 s 337 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy
Waste Management Grants Program (98-2-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($1,500,000)) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely
for a state-wide grant program to assist dairy operators in implementing dairy
waste management systems; and

(2)
$1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a state-wide grant
program to provide technical assistance to dairy operators for development and
implementation of dairy waste management plans.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State............... $ 529,132

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State............... $ 3,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 2,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 5,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 2,470,868

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 12,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((18,000,000))

20,500,000

Sec.
22. 1999
c 379 s 341 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Grandy
Creek Hatchery (92-5-024)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((3,667,100))

267,100

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 652,080

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ ((0))

3,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,319,180

Sec.
23. 1999
c 379 s 361 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Warm
Water Game Fish Access Facilities (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ 210,000

Appropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ ((600,000))

300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,080,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((2,890,000))

2,590,000

Sec.
24. 1999
c 379 s 373 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Small
Timber Landowner Program (00-5-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(((1)))
This appropriation is provided solely to purchase or lease riparian and other
sensitive aquatic areas from willing owners of small parcels of forest land.

(((2)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts are equal to or less than
$50,000,000 during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then $5,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section may be expended. If federal grants for salmon
recovery efforts during the 1999-2001 biennium exceed $50,000,000, then the
entire appropriation in this section may be expended.))

Appropriation:

((General
Fund‑-Federal)) State Building

Construction
Account................ $ ((10,000,000))

2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((10,000,000))

2,500,000

Sec.
25. 1999
c 379 s 383 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Administrative
Site Preservation (00-1-018)

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 51,400

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 203,580

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((565,500))

514,100

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 361,920

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,131,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 938,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,118,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,187,000

Sec.
26. 1999
c 379 s 384 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust
Land Transfer (00-2-001)

The
state building construction account appropriation in this section is subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from
trust status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest restrictive easements for
certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate for state
park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources
conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2)
Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at
fair market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by
the department to the common school construction account in the same manner as
timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be
made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value
of the land transferred shall be deposited in the natural resources real
property replacement account. These funds shall be expended by the department
for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.

(3)
Property subject to easement agreements under this section shall be appraised
at fair market value both with and without the imposition of the easement. The
entire difference in appraised value shall be deposited by the department to
the common school construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from
other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource
management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.

(4)
All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section are
authorized to be paid out of this appropriation. Authorized costs include the
actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and
other similar costs.

(5)
Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value
may occur if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by
the board of natural resources.

(6)
Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department,
with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a
real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the
purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of
thirty years. The department of natural resources, in consultation with the
receiving state agencies, shall develop policy to address requests to replace
transferred properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no
longer deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(7)
The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the
intent of this section. However, the department or receiving agencies may
remove a property from the transfer list in subsection (8) of this section if,
based on new, substantive information, it is determined that transfer of the
property is not in the state-wide interest of either the common school trust or
the receiving agency.

(8)
The appropriation in this section is provided to execute transfers or easements
for the list of properties identified in LEAP capital document No. ((99-3))
2000-4, as developed on ((April 8, 1999)) February 28, 2000,
as follows: Projects in category A shall be transferred; to the extent that
local funding is provided for the land value of the property, projects in
category B shall be transferred; and projects in category C and remaining
projects in category B may be transferred or leased as funding allows.

(9)
The department shall execute trust land transfers and easements such that 90
percent of the appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school
construction fund. To achieve the 90:10 ratio, the department may offset
transfers of property with low timber-to-land ratios with easements on other
properties.

(10)
On June 30, 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted
funds from this appropriation to the common school construction fund and the
appropriation in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement‑-

State.................................... $ 6,200,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 66,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 72,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 34,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 220,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 326,700,000

Sec.
27. 1999
c 379 s 388 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Right-of-Way
Acquisition (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 387,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((650,000))

644,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,037,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,392,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,429,000

Sec.
28. 1999
c 379 s 390 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-011)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 35,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 136,600

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((379,500))

344,500

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 242,900

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 759,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 609,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,580,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,948,000

Sec.
29. 1999
c 379 s 931 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Grants (00-2-014)

The
appropriation in this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP
capital document No. ((1999-A1)) 2000-A2, as developed on ((April
23, 1999)) February 28, 2000.

The
department shall submit a list of recommended projects to be funded from the
aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2001-03 capital budget. The list
shall result from a competitive grants program developed by the department
based upon, at a minimum: A uniform criteria for the selection of projects and
awarding of grants for up to fifty percent of the total project cost; local
community support for the project; and a state-wide geographic distribution of
projects. The list of projects shall be submitted to the office of financial
management by September 15, 2000.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State... $ 2,340,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State... $ 5,550,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 9,716,817

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 41,606,817

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

Salmon
Recovery Program

The
appropriation in this section is provided to the following agencies for the
following purposes:

(1)
For the Department of Fish and Wildlife

(a)
$100,000 is provided solely to implement methods to reduce the by-catch of
listed salmon stocks.

(b)
$2,000,000 is provided solely for the following purposes in the Methow river
valley:

(i)
$500,000 to develop baseline hydrological data for the Methow river;

(ii)
$750,000 to purchase water rights pursuant to chapter ... (Senate Bill No.
6525), Laws of 2000. If chapter ... (Senate Bill No. 6525), Laws of 2000 is
not enacted by June 30, 2000, this subsection (1)(b)(ii) is null and void and
$250,000 of the appropriation in this subsection (1)(b)(ii) shall be used for
the purposes of (b)(iii) of this subsection and $500,000 shall be used for the
same purpose as section 18(3) of this act; and

(iii)
$750,000 to provide salmonid screening. Any such screening provided for a
point of diversion for a water right in the Methow river valley shall be sized
to accommodate: (A) Not less than the annual amount of water diverted at that
point of diversion during any of the five years beginning with calendar year
1994 and ending with calendar year 1998; and (B) not less than the
instantaneous amount of water diverted at that point of diversion at the peak
of diversion during any of those five calendar years.

(c)
$950,000 is provided solely for grants to lead entities established in
accordance with RCW 75.46.060.

(d)
$880,000 is provided solely for contracted engineering services to lead
entities or community-based organizations to implement habitat projects.

(e)
$5,000,000 is provided to buy back commercial licenses for salmon fishers. If
the department of fish and wildlife is allocated $14,000,000 or more of federal
money during the biennium to buy back commercial fish licenses, the
appropriation in this subsection (1)(e) shall be distributed sixty percent to
buy back Puget Sound purse seine, gill net, and reef net commercial salmon
licenses and forty percent to other commercial salmon licenses. If the
department is allocated less than $14,000,000 of federal money during the
biennium to buy back commercial fish licenses, the appropriation in this
subsection (1)(e) shall be distributed eighty percent to buy back Puget Sound
purse seine, gill net, and reef net commercial salmon licenses and twenty
percent to other commercial salmon licenses.

(2)
For the State Conservation Commission

$1,000,000
is provided solely for grants to the Columbia ground water management area for
the irrigation water management cost share program and for public health
information to households with at-risk infant water users.

(3)
For the Department of Agriculture

$150,000
is provided solely for the agriculture, fish, and water negotiation process. If
an appropriation equal to or more than the appropriation in this subsection (3)
for the same purpose is provided in the omnibus operations appropriations act,
the appropriation in this subsection (3) shall be used for the same purpose as
section 18(3) of this act.

(4)
For the Interagency Committee for Outdoor Recreation

$250,000
is provided solely for the development of a strategic plan to improve the
accuracy and availability of information needed for planning and managing
natural resources in the state. The plan shall address the collection,
analysis, and management of information consistent with the national spacial
data infrastructure framework being supported by the Washington geographic
information council.

(5)
$2,000,000 is provided solely for deposit into the advanced environmental
mitigation revolving account created in RCW 47.12.340 to mitigate the adverse
impacts upon the environment from transportation projects. The amounts deposited
into the account shall be used for salmonid habitat mitigation.

Appropriation:

Salmon
Recovery Account.................... $ 12,330,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 12,330,000

Sec.
31. 1999
c 379 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle
Crime Laboratory (00-2-008)

The
appropriations in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 900,000

Appropriation:

County
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State...................... $ 650,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State........ $ 2,500,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State...................... $ 250,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 9,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((10,000,000))

12,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((11,100,000))

13,600,000

Sec.
32. 1999
c 379 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Common
School Construction: Quality and value improvements (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($9,800,000)) Up to $4,800,000 of this appropriation is provided
to implement chapter . . . (House Bill No. 1831), Laws of 1999. ((If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, this appropriation shall lapse.))

(2)
$200,000 from this appropriation is provided to fund two FTEs in the office of
state fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent
of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that
are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(3)
On an annual basis, the state board shall report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature and the office of financial management with a summary of the
results of the value engineering studies and constructability reviews, and an
evaluation of the use of building commissioning construction management
services and fire marshal reviews.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State... $ ((10,000,000))

5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 40,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((50,000,000))

45,000,000

Sec.
33. 1999
c 379 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
School Building Construction (98-2-001)(00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
Up to $6,491,519 of the new appropriation provided in this section may be
provided for emergency repairs.

(((a)))
(b) Prior to the distribution of funds authorized by this subsection,
the state board shall develop rules for school district eligibility to receive
emergency grants and requirements for repayment of recovered costs. It is
intended that these funds be provided to school districts only for emergency
repairs due to accidents, natural disasters, fire, floods, vandalism, or
similar events and only after all avenues of local funding have been exhausted.

(((b)))
(2) The state board shall report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management the amount and purpose of
each grant provided to school districts.

(((c)))
(3) Any recoveries by the districts from insurance, litigation, or other
sources for repairs and improvements funded from this appropriation shall be
returned to the state in proportion to the state assistance as a share of total
project cost.

(((2)
Total cash disbursed from the common school construction account may not exceed
the available cash balance.))

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 1,993,556

Common
School Construction Account‑-State... $ 112,424,633

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ 114,418,189

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State... $ ((315,081,000))

365,649,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 607,956,559

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 1,390,582,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((2,428,037,748))

2,478,605,748

Sec.
34. 1999
c 379 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Program
Management (98-1-001)

Funding
is provided for up to five FTE regional coordinators. The coordinators
shall have direct construction or architectural training and experience and be
strategically located across the state. The coordinators shall assist local
school districts with: State board of education rules relating to school
construction and modernization projects, building condition analysis,
development of state studies and surveys, architect/engineer and construction
manager selection, value engineering, and constructability reviews during
design, building commissioning, construction administration, maintenance
issues, and data verification to allow equitable administration of the state
board priority system.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 1,619,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,644,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,263,000

Sec.
35. 1999
c 379 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

((Campus
Wide)) Clarke Hall and Lloyd Auditorium: Seismic stabilization
(02-1-008)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((500,000))

800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ ((500,000))

0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((1,000,000))

800,000

Sec.
36. 1999
c 379 s 634 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Safety (98-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

((State
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,500,000))

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 2,671,684

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((1,200,000))

1,028,316

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

Sec.
37. 1999
c 379 s 641 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Nuclear
Reactor: Decommissioning (99-2-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((750,000))

1,149,696

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((450,000))

50,304

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

Sec.
38. 1999
c 379 s 642 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Tacoma
Branch Campus: Phase III predesign (00-2-021)

The
appropriation in this section is to conduct a predesign of the project
described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by
the office of financial management. Future appropriations for this project are
subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July
1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 55,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 39. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works and Classroom Improvements

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 14,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,000,000

Sec.
40. 1999
c 379 s 686 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Health Sciences Building (98-2-903)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(2)
No money from the reappropriation may be expended in a manner that is
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

(3)
Design and construction of this building shall accommodate at least 240
additional full-time equivalent students on the Riverpoint campus.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,871,010

Appropriation:

((Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State))

State
Higher Education Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 36,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 814,365

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,985,375

Sec.
41. 1999
c 379 s 794 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett
Community College - Instructional Technology Center: Construction (96-2-652)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ ((1,600,000))

1,873,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ ((15,017,483))

14,744,483

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 16,617,483

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 42. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1)
1999 c 379 s 610 (uncodified);

(2)
1999 c 379 s 611 (uncodified); and

(3)
1999 c 379 s 613 (uncodified).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---