BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The aquatic nuisance species committee is created for the purpose of fostering
state, federal, tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic nuisance species
issues. The mission of the committee is to minimize the unauthorized or
accidental introduction of nonnative aquatic species and give special emphasis
to preventing the introduction and spread of aquatic nuisance species. The
term "aquatic nuisance species" means a nonnative aquatic plant or
animal species that threatens the diversity or abundance of native species, the
ecological stability of infested waters, or commercial, agricultural, or
recreational activities dependent on such waters.

(2)
The committee consists of representatives from each of the following state
agencies: Department of fish and wildlife, department of ecology, department
of agriculture, department of health, department of natural resources, Puget
Sound water quality action team, state patrol, state noxious weed control
board, and Washington sea grant program. The committee shall encourage and
solicit participation by: Federally recognized tribes of Washington, federal
agencies, Washington conservation organizations, and representatives from
industries that may either be affected by the introduction of an aquatic
nuisance species or that may serve as a pathway for their introduction.

(3)
The committee has the following duties:

(a)
Periodically revise the state of Washington aquatic nuisance species management
plan, originally published in June 1998;

(b)
Make recommendations to the legislature on statutory provisions for classifying
and regulating aquatic nuisance species;

(c)
Recommend to the state noxious weed control board that a plant be classified
under the process designated by RCW 17.10.080 as an aquatic noxious weed;

(d)
Coordinate education, research, regulatory authorities, monitoring and control
programs, and participate in regional and national efforts regarding aquatic
nuisance species;

(e)
Consult with representatives from industries and other activities that may
serve as a pathway for the introduction of aquatic nuisance species to develop
practical strategies that will minimize the risk of new introductions; and

(f)
Prepare a biennial report to the legislature with the first report due by
December 1, 2001, making recommendations for better accomplishing the purposes
of this chapter, and listing the accomplishments of this chapter to date.

(4) The committee shall accomplish its duties through the authority
and cooperation of its member agencies. Implementation of all plans and
programs developed by the committee shall be through the member agencies and
other cooperating organizations.

---
END ---