BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Each
school district shall adopt a policy requiring schools to obtain from the
parents or guardians of each student and maintain in the student's record a
copy of the student's birth certificate. The policy shall provide that once
parents or guardians have provided a school with a copy of their child's birth
certificate, the copy shall remain in the student's file and shall follow the
student as long as the student is enrolled in a school within the district.
The policy shall also provide that requests for additional copies of birth
certificates shall not be made if a copy is already in the student's file.

The policies adopted in accordance with this section shall apply
beginning with the 2000-01 school year.

---
END ---