BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that herbicides and pesticides can present serious risks to
public health and to the environment. The misapplication or overuse of these
chemicals puts drinking water supplies at risk of contamination, and has
resulted in unnecessary death of wildlife. The legislature recognizes that the
limited use of these chemicals may still be necessary, but there is a need to
increase the posting and notice requirements when they are sprayed in areas of
high population density.

Sec.
2. RCW
17.21.410 and 1994 c 283 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A certified applicator making a landscape application to:

(a)
Residential property shall at the time of the application place a marker at the
usual point of entry to the property. If the application is made to an
isolated spot that is not a substantial portion of the property, the applicator
shall only be required to place a marker at the application site. If the
application is in a fenced or otherwise isolated backyard, no marker is
required.

(b)
Commercial properties such as apartments or shopping centers shall at the time
of application place a marker in a conspicuous location at or near each site
being treated.

(c)
A golf course shall at the time of the application place a marker at the first
tee and tenth tee or post the information in a conspicuous location such as on
a central message board.

(d)
A school, nursery school, or licensed day care shall at the time of the
application place a marker at each primary point of entry to the school
grounds.

(e)
A park, cemetery, rest stop, or similar property as may be defined in rule
shall at the time of the application place a marker at each primary point of
entry.

(2)
An individual making a landscape application to a school grounds, nursery
school, or licensed day care, and not otherwise covered by subsection (1) of
this section, shall be required to comply with the posting requirements in
subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(3)
The marker shall be a minimum of four inches by five inches. It shall have the
words: "THIS LANDSCAPE HAS BEEN TREATED BY" as the headline and
"FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL" as the footer. Larger size
requirements for markers may be established in rule for specific applications.
The company name and service mark with the applicator's telephone number where
information can be obtained shall be included between the headline and the footer
on the marker. The letters and service marks shall be printed in colors
contrasting to the background.

(4)
The property owner or tenant shall remove the marker according to the schedule
established in rule. A commercial applicator is not liable for the removal of
markers by unauthorized persons or removal outside the designated removal time.

(5)
A certified applicator who complies with this section cannot be held liable for
personal property damage or bodily injury resulting from markers that are placed
as required.

(6)
After July 1, 2000, a certified applicator must meet the additional
requirements for posting and notice contained in subsection (7) of this
section, if:

(a)
The certified applicator is making a landscape application or otherwise
spraying pesticides, except for commercial pesticide applicators making
structural applications; and

(b)
The land application or spraying of the pesticides is within an urban growth area
as defined by RCW 36.70A.110, or within any incorporated city or town located
in a county not planning under chapter 36.70A RCW.

(7) Before pesticides are applied or sprayed in accordance with
subsection (6) of this section, markers must be placed along the spray route at
least seven days prior to when the spraying occurs, and the markers must remain
for at least two days after the spraying occurs. The marker must indicate the
notice of intent to spray, the spray route, and a telephone number for citizens
in the area to contact for answers to their questions. The markers must be
prominently displayed and easily readable from the road.

---
END ---