BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.17.040 and 1973 c 80 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the director shall
make, adopt, modify, and repeal rules and regulations governing safety and
health standards for conditions of employment as authorized by this chapter
after a public hearing in conformance with the administrative procedure act and
the provisions of this chapter. At least thirty days prior to such public
hearing, the director shall cause public notice of such hearing to be made in
newspapers of general circulation in this state, of the date, time, and place
of such public hearing, along with a general description of the subject matter
of the proposed rules and information as to where copies of any rules and
regulations proposed for adoption may be obtained and with a solicitation for
recommendations in writing or suggestions for inclusion or changes in such
rules to be submitted not later than five days prior to such public hearing.
Any preexisting rules adopted by the department of labor and industries
relating to health and safety standards in work places subject to the
jurisdiction of the department shall remain effective insofar as such rules are
not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the director may not
adopt rules governing safety and health standards for work-related
musculoskeletal disorders caused by awkward postures, high hand force,
repetitive motion, repeated impacts, awkward lifting, vibration, or similar
physical tasks.

(3) By July 1, 2000, the director shall adopt by rule safety and
health standards to reduce employee exposure to workplace hazards that can
cause or aggravate work-related musculoskeletal disorders, including hazards
caused by awkward postures, high hand force, repetitive motion, repeated
impacts, awkward lifting, and vibration. The standards shall apply only to the
department of labor and industries and a state agency, to be designated by the
governor, with an appointed executive. The rule expires four years after the
date of adoption. The legislature shall not appropriate funds for the purposes
of implementing this subsection.

---
END ---