BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section, a public access computer is any computer that
is:

(a)
Located in a public school;

(b)
Frequently or regularly used by a minor; and

(c)
Connected to any computer communication system.

(2)
A public school that provides a public access computer shall do one or more of
the following:

(a)
Equip the computer with software that will limit a minor's ability to gain
access to obscene materials;

(b)
Purchase internet connectivity from an internet service provider that provides
filter services to limit access to obscene materials;

(c)
By January 1, 2001, develop and implement a policy that establishes measures to
restrict a minor from gaining computer access to obscene materials; or

(d)
Use reasonable efforts to limit a minor's ability to gain access to obscene
materials.

(3)
A public school that complies with this section is not liable for damages that
may arise from a minor gaining access to obscene materials through the use of a
public access computer that is owned or controlled by the public school.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section, a public access computer is any computer that
is:

(a)
Located in a public library;

(b)
Frequently or regularly used by a minor; and

(c)
Connected to any computer communication system.

(2)
A public library that provides a public access computer shall do one or more of
the following:

(a)
Equip the computer with software that will limit a minor's ability to gain
access to obscene materials;

(b)
Purchase internet connectivity from an internet service provider that provides
filter services to limit access to obscene materials;

(c)
By January 1, 2001, develop and implement a policy that establishes measures to
restrict a minor from gaining computer access to obscene materials; or

(d)
Use reasonable efforts to limit a minor's ability to gain access to obscene
materials.

(3)
A public library that complies with this section is not liable for damages that
may arise from a minor gaining access to obscene materials through the use of a
public access computer that is owned or controlled by the public library.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---