BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that protection of threatened and endangered species
requires review of state and local land use planning efforts. The legislature
finds that conflicts may arise from local government and state agency efforts
to coordinate requirements under the shoreline management act and the growth
management act with the federal endangered species act. These conflicts should
appropriately be addressed through collaborative negotiations involving state
agencies, local governments, and stakeholders and should be reviewed by the
legislature.

(2)
The legislature further finds that incentives may be appropriate to enhance
protection of critical habitat for fish and wildlife species.

(3)
Therefore, the legislature finds that there is a need to evaluate the
effectiveness and efficiency of state and local land use planning protecting
threatened and endangered species and to establish timelines for agency rule
making related to shorelines to correspond with funding for local shoreline
master programs and with collaborative negotiations with federal agencies
regarding assurances for endangered species protection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The joint task force on shoreline planning is created to consist of the
following twenty-eight members or their designees:

(a)
The following eight members of the house of representatives: (i) The co-chairs
of the committee on appropriations; (ii) the co-chairs of the committee on
local government; (iii) the co-chairs of the committee on natural resources;
and (iv) the co-chairs of the committee on agriculture and ecology;

(b)
The following eight members of the senate: (i) The chair and ranking minority
of the committee on ways and means; (ii) the chair and ranking minority of the
committee on state and local government; (iii) the chair and ranking minority
of the committee on natural resources; and (iv) the chair and ranking minority
of the committee on water resources;

(c)
One nonvoting member from the office of the governor with expertise in
shoreline planning;

(d)
Three nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate,
representing the citizens of the state;

(e)
Two nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate
from nominations by the association of Washington cities;

(f)
Two nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate
from nominations by the Washington state association of counties;

(g)
Two nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate
from nominations by environmental groups;

(h)
Two nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate
from nominations by the business community.

(2)
The nonlegislative members of the task force on shoreline planning shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members of the joint task force on
shoreline planning shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
44.04.120. The staff of senate committee services and the office of program
research of the house of representatives shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the joint task force on shoreline planning.

(3)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall be co-chaired by one senator,
chosen by the task force, and one state representative, chosen by the task
force, from opposite parties. A quorum for any meeting or hearing shall be six
members. The co-chairs may appoint experts and advisors as nonvoting members
of the joint task force on shoreline planning to provide input on various
subjects. Only the legislative members of the joint task force may vote on the
adoption of findings, conclusions, or recommendations. Any final findings,
conclusions, or recommendations of the joint task force on shoreline planning
must be agreed to by at least eight legislative members; however, minority
findings, conclusions, or recommendations may be included that are submitted by
any legislative member or group of legislative members. The open public
meetings act shall apply to all meetings and hearings of the joint task force
on shoreline planning. Rules of procedure shall be established at the first
meeting of the joint task force on shoreline planning.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall review and make
recommendations for legislation and policy regarding: (a) The use of the
shoreline management act planning and permitting process to establish the
measures necessary and appropriate to avoid harm to and protect and preserve
threatened and endangered species and their habitat while preserving economic
growth and development; (b) the integration of multiple land use laws, planning
activities, and permitting systems to enhance the efficiency and effectiveness
of regulatory programs for public and private property owners and lessen the
costs associated with measures necessary and appropriate to avoid harm to and
to protect and preserve fish and wildlife species and their habitat; (c) a
schedule and funding sources for development and amendment of shoreline master
programs for local governments identified in RCW 90.58.080(2)(b); (d) an
accurate evaluation of the immediate and ongoing costs to all local governments
of implementing revised guidelines; (e) identification of necessary funding for
local governments to implement such changes as may be recommended; (f)
regulatory flexibility that allows shoreline planning to reflect the value and
use of habitat, geographic and economic diversity, existing patterns of
development, and individual community circumstances and concerns; (g)
mechanisms for prioritizing shoreline regulation to focus on areas where there
is a demonstrated need for added protection; (h) incentives for landowners and
local governments to enhance protection of shorelines; and (i) opportunities
for the development of programmatic approaches for permitting programs.

(2)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall coordinate, to the extent
possible, with the national marine fisheries service and the United States fish
and wildlife service to ensure that species protection provided under the
shoreline management act meets federal protection requirements under the
endangered species act.

(3)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall commence July 1, 2000,
periodically report its findings and any recommendations to the legislature,
and present a final report addressing the recommendations of the joint task
force on shoreline planning to the legislature by December 31, 2001.

Sec.
4. RCW
90.58.060 and 1995 c 347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall periodically review and adopt guidelines consistent with
RCW 90.58.020, containing the elements specified in RCW 90.58.100 for:

(a)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of
state-wide significance.

(2)(a)
Before adopting or amending guidelines under this section, the department shall
convene a work group to develop guidelines. The work group shall include
representatives of all affected public agencies and interest groups, including
but not limited to state agencies, counties, cities, other affected local
governments, business associations, agriculture, aquaculture, environmental
associations, and building industry associations. The department shall invite
and encourage the participation of tribal governments and of federal and state
agencies responsible for federal clean water act and endangered species act enforcement.
The department shall use a negotiated decision-making process to develop the
guidelines.

(b)
Among other issues, in developing the guidelines, the department and the work
group shall focus on and prioritize the restoration and enhancement of urban
shoreline environments west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range that are
listed as water quality limited segments under section 303(d) of the federal
clean water act. The department and the work group shall develop strategies to
address issues, including but not limited to contaminated sediments, storm
water, land uses, hydraulic permit, and other activities, that may affect water
quality and endangered species protection in these areas. The department and
the work group shall include these strategies in the guidelines and prioritize
mechanisms to address water quality problems and endangered species protection
in these areas.

(c)
When the negotiated process specified in this subsection has resulted in the
development of guidelines, the department shall seek federal assurances from
federal agencies responsible for federal endangered species act enforcement
that the shoreline uses and activities governed by the guidelines and the local
shoreline master programs developed or amended pursuant to these guidelines
will not be subject to additional regulations or restrictions for purposes of
federal endangered species act compliance. The department shall not proceed
with adoption of the guidelines developed according to this subsection until it
has received the federal assurances.

(3)
After completing the process required by subsection (2) of this section and
before the guidelines are adopted, the department shall provide an
opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a)
The department shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and
federally recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a
copy, and shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state
register. Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within
sixty days from the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b)
The department shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in
different locations throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity
for residents in all parts of the state to present statements and views on the
proposed guidelines. Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once
in each of the three weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more
newspapers of general circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment
to the guidelines addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number
and location of hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this
subsection to assure all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the
proposed amendment. The department shall accept written comments on the
proposal during the sixty-day public comment period and for seven days after
the final public hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the public comment period, the department shall review the
comments received and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of
this chapter. The department shall seek federal assurances for any
modifications of the guidelines and shall obtain federal assurances before
proceeding to adopt the modified guidelines. The proposal shall then be
published for adoption pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((3)))
(4) The department may propose amendments to the guidelines not more
than once each year. At least once every ((five)) seven years
the department shall conduct a review of the guidelines pursuant to the
procedures outlined in subsection (((2))) (3) of this section.

(5)
For the purposes of this section, "federal assurances" has the same
application and effect for shoreline uses and activities as specified in RCW
75.46.350 for forest practices.

Sec.
5. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after
the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program
for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department within the
time specified by subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a)
Counties with populations greater than two hundred twenty-five thousand in 1999
as determined by the office of financial management and that are located west
of the crest of the Cascade mountain range and the cities and towns therein
with shorelines of the state shall review their master programs for compliance
with the guidelines and adopt or amend master programs as necessary within
thirty-six months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW
90.58.060.

(b)
For all counties, cities, and towns with shorelines of the state that are not
subject to (a) of this subsection, a schedule for review and development or
amendment of shoreline master programs shall be approved by the legislature
after recommendations from the joint task force are submitted as provided in
section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire June 30, 2002.

---
END ---