BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that while government services are provided to the citizens
of the state of Washington through many mechanisms, the most prevalent delivery
of services occurs through city, county, or state government actions.
Increased demand for these services and limited revenue to meet those services
have led to unproductive competition between cities, counties, and the state
for the revenue that is collected and shared between cities, counties, and the
state.

The
legislature further finds that rules adopted by state agencies cause local
governments to allocate funds to meet those rules that are not fully funded at
the state level.

Therefore,
the legislature finds that there is a need to evaluate the delivery of
government services and the allotment of revenues through the establishment of
a joint task force on local governments.

The
legislature further finds that the state must recognize the costs to local
governments of rules adopted by state agencies and mitigate the financial
impacts of those rules for a significant period to allow local governments to
develop strategies to comply with the requirements of Initiative 695.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The joint task force on local governments is created, to consist of thirty-two
members including:

(a)
The following ten members of the house of representatives or their designees:
(i) The cochairs of the committee on appropriations; (ii) the cochairs of the
committee on capital budget; (iii) the cochairs of the committee on finance;
(iv) the cochairs of the committee on local government; and (v) the cochairs of
the committee on transportation;

(b)
The following ten members of the senate or their designees: (i) The chair and
the ranking minority member of the committee on transportation; (ii) the chair
and the ranking minority member of the committee on ways and means; (iii) the
chair and ranking minority member of the committee on state and local
government; and (iv) four members of the senate, appointed by the president of
the senate, two from each political party;

(c)
One nonvoting member from the office of the governor with expertise in finance;

(d)
Five nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate,
representing the citizens of the state;

(e)
Two nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate
from nominations by the association of Washington cities;

(f)
Two nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate
from nominations by the Washington state association of counties;

(g)
Two nonvoting members shall be appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives and the majority and minority leaders of the senate
from nominations by the Washington association of county officials.

(2)
The nonlegislative members of the task force shall serve without compensation,
but will be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Legislative members of the task force will be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120. The staff of senate committee services
and the office of program research of the house of representatives shall
provide administrative and clerical assistance to the task force.

(3)
The task force must be cochaired by one senator, chosen by the task force, and
one state representative, chosen by the task force, from opposite political
parties. Six members is a quorum for a meeting or hearing. The cochairs may
appoint experts and advisors as nonvoting members of the task force to provide
input on various subjects. Only the legislative members of the joint task
force may vote on the adoption of findings, conclusions, or recommendations.
Final findings, conclusions, or recommendations of the task force must be
agreed to by at least ten legislative members. However, minority findings,
conclusions, or recommendations may be included that are submitted by any
legislative member or group of legislative members. The Open Public Meetings
Act applies to all meetings and hearings of the task force. The task force
shall establish rules of procedure at its first meeting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
joint task force on local governments shall:

(1)
Complete a thorough study of the delivery of government services and allotment
of revenues; and

(2)
Commence the study by July 1, 2000, present an interim report of its findings
and any recommendations to the legislature by January 30, 2001, and present a
final report addressing its recommendations to the legislature by January 1,
2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

State
agencies are required to:

(1)
Examine the impacts of all proposed rules to determine if they will result in
increased costs for local governments;

(2)
Notify associations of local governments of proposed rules affecting their
membership if it is determined that the rules will result in increased costs or
added administrative burdens for local governments;

(3)
Utilize rule development processes specified in chapter 34.05 RCW, the
administrative procedure act, to mitigate cost impacts of proposed rules on
local governments;

(4)
Ensure that adoption of new rules and rule amendments is consistent with the
principles and requirements of the governor's executive order 97-02,
particularly those that emphasize demonstration of need, effectiveness and
efficiency, clarity, consistency with legislative intent, coordination with
other jurisdictions and partnership with local governments, consideration of
cost, and fairness; and

(5)
Utilize rule development mechanisms to ensure that cost impacts are minimized
and participation in rule development is maximized. Examples include usability
testing of rules and other intensive stakeholder involvement methods.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act expires March 30, 2002.

---
END ---