BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that local governments are involved in implementing the
watershed management laws. The legislature further recognizes that local
governments and others are concerned about the financial and other impacts on
local governments associated with responding to current and proposed listings
of species under the federal endangered species act. The legislature also
recognizes that the department of ecology began a process last year to adopt
new shoreline master program guidelines to be used by local governments in
updating their current shoreline master programs. The legislature further
recognizes that the department of ecology's proposed revisions to the shoreline
master program guidelines generated much controversy and discussion about
substantive changes to the shoreline management act. The legislature intends
by this act to provide for a report by the department of ecology on its
guideline adoption process to inform the legislature about the new guidelines
and to understand any potential legislative or other implications of these new
guidelines.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

At
least one year before adopting guidelines under RCW 90.58.060, the department
of ecology shall submit the proposed guidelines to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature. The department of ecology shall also submit to
the appropriate standing committees of the legislature a report on the process
used by the department of ecology related to development of the proposed
guidelines and to be used regarding comments on the proposed guidelines.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act expire July 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---