BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.58.060 and 1995 c 347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall ((periodically review and)) adopt guidelines
consistent with RCW 90.58.020, containing the elements specified in RCW
90.58.100 for:

(a)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of
state-wide significance.

(2)
Before adopting or amending guidelines under this section, the department shall
provide an opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a)
The department shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and
federally recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a
copy, and shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state
register. Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within
sixty days from the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b)
The department shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in
different locations throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity
for residents in all parts of the state to present statements and views on the
proposed guidelines. Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once
in each of the three weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more
newspapers of general circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment
to the guidelines addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number
and location of hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this
subsection to assure all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the
proposed amendment. The department shall accept written comments on the
proposal during the sixty-day public comment period and for seven days after
the final public hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the public comment period, the department shall review the
comments received and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of
this chapter. The proposal shall then be published for adoption pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) The department may propose amendments to the guidelines not more
than once each year. ((At least once every five years the department shall
conduct a review of the guidelines pursuant to the procedures outlined in
subsection (2) of this section.))

---
END ---