BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that local governments will experience significant budget
impacts from the passage of Chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure No.
695). The legislature also finds that, as a result of Chapter 1, Laws of 2000
(Initiative Measure No. 695), local governments are reviewing their budgets,
establishing priorities, and identifying costs of local government services and
programs. The legislature further finds that Chapter 2, Laws of 1994
(Initiative Measure No. 601) required the state to consider the costs imposed
on local governments by laws requiring new programs and increased levels of
service. The legislature further finds that the state must recognize the costs
to local governments of regulations promulgated by state agencies and mitigate
the financial impacts of those regulations for a sufficient period to allow
local governments to develop strategies to comply with the requirements of
Chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure No. 695).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Until March 30, 2002, no state agency may propose or adopt any rule or engage
in any programmatic activity, other than normal contract negotiations, that
will create new costs for a local government.

(2)
Until March 30, 2002, before any state agency proposes or adopts a rule or
engages in any programmatic activity, other than normal contract negotiations,
the state agency shall assess whether the rule or activity would create any new
costs for a local government. Until March 30, 2002, a state agency shall issue
a finding that a rule or activity does not create any new costs for a local
government before proceeding with the rule or programmatic activity.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "local government" means a county,
city, or town.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "cost" means any expenses related
to implementation or response to the agency rule or activity. For the purposes
of this section, "cost" includes, but is not limited to, review,
technical assistance, planning, administration, legislative, implementation,
litigation, enforcement, or regulation expenses.

(5)
This section expires July 1, 2002.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---