BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.23.030 and 1999 c 261 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
municipal officer shall be beneficially interested, directly or indirectly, in
any contract which may be made by, through or under the supervision of such
officer, in whole or in part, or which may be made for the benefit of his or
her office, or accept, directly or indirectly, any compensation, gratuity or
reward in connection with such contract from any other person beneficially
interested therein. This section shall not apply in the following cases:

(1)
The furnishing of electrical, water or other utility services by a municipality
engaged in the business of furnishing such services, at the same rates and on
the same terms as are available to the public generally;

(2)
The designation of public depositaries for municipal funds;

(3)
The publication of legal notices required by law to be published by any
municipality, upon competitive bidding or at rates not higher than prescribed
by law for members of the general public;

(4)
The designation of a school director as clerk or as both clerk and purchasing
agent of a school district;

(5)
The employment of any person by a municipality for unskilled day labor at wages
not exceeding two hundred dollars in any calendar month. The exception
provided in this subsection does not apply to a county with a population of one
hundred twenty-five thousand or more, a city with a population of more than one
thousand five hundred, an irrigation district encompassing more than fifty
thousand acres, or a first class school district;

(6)(a)
The letting of any other contract in which the total amount received under the
contract or contracts by the municipal officer or the municipal officer's
business does not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar
month.

(b)
However, in the case of a particular officer of a second class city or town, or
a noncharter optional code city, or a member of any county fair board in a
county which has not established a county purchasing department pursuant to RCW
36.32.240, the total amount of such contract or contracts authorized in this
subsection (6) may exceed one thousand five hundred dollars in any calendar
month but shall not exceed eighteen thousand dollars in any calendar year.

(c)
The exceptions provided in this subsection (6) do not apply to a sale or lease
by the municipality as the seller or lessor. The exceptions provided in this
subsection (6) also do not apply to the letting of any contract by a county
with a population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or more, a city with a
population of ((ten)) thirty thousand or more in a rural
county, or an irrigation district encompassing more than fifty thousand
acres. For the purposes of this subsection, "rural county" has
the same meaning as in RCW 82.14.370(5).

(d)
The municipality shall maintain a list of all contracts that are awarded under
this subsection (6). The list must be made available for public inspection and
copying;

(7)
The leasing by a port district as lessor of port district property to a municipal
officer or to a contracting party in which a municipal officer may be
beneficially interested, if in addition to all other legal requirements, a
board of three disinterested appraisers and the superior court in the county
where the property is situated finds that all terms and conditions of such
lease are fair to the port district and are in the public interest. The
appraisers must be appointed from members of the American Institute of Real
Estate Appraisers by the presiding judge of the superior court;

(8)
The letting of any employment contract for the driving of a school bus in a
second class school district if the terms of such contract are commensurate
with the pay plan or collective bargaining agreement operating in the district;

(9)
The letting of any employment contract to the spouse of an officer of a school
district, when such contract is solely for employment as a substitute teacher
for the school district. This exception applies only if the terms of the
contract are commensurate with the pay plan or collective bargaining agreement
applicable to all district employees and the board of directors has found,
consistent with the written policy under RCW 28A.330.240, that there is a
shortage of substitute teachers in the school district;

(10)
The letting of any employment contract to the spouse of an officer of a school
district if the spouse was under contract as a certificated or classified
employee with the school district before the date in which the officer assumes
office and the terms of the contract are commensurate with the pay plan or
collective bargaining agreement operating in the district. However, in a
second class school district that has less than two hundred full-time
equivalent students enrolled at the start of the school year as defined in RCW
28A.150.040, the spouse is not required to be under contract as a certificated
or classified employee before the date on which the officer assumes office;

(11)
The authorization, approval, or ratification of any employment contract with
the spouse of a public hospital district commissioner if: (a) The spouse was
employed by the public hospital district before the date the commissioner was
initially elected; (b) the terms of the contract are commensurate with the pay
plan or collective bargaining agreement operating in the district for similar
employees; (c) the interest of the commissioner is disclosed to the board of
commissioners and noted in the official minutes or similar records of the
public hospital district prior to the letting or continuation of the contract;
and (d) and the commissioner does not vote on the authorization, approval, or
ratification of the contract or any conditions in the contract.

A municipal officer may not vote in the authorization, approval, or
ratification of a contract in which he or she is beneficially interested even
though one of the exemptions allowing the awarding of such a contract applies.
The interest of the municipal officer must be disclosed to the governing body
of the municipality and noted in the official minutes or similar records of the
municipality before the formation of the contract.

---
END ---