BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.01.060 and 1983 c 3 s 194 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
authorized assistants, employees, agents, appointees or representatives of the
department of natural resources may, in the course of their inspection and
enforcement duties as provided for in chapters 76.04, 76.06, 76.09, 76.16, and
76.36 ((and 76.40)) RCW, enter upon any lands, real estate, waters or
premises except the dwelling house or appurtenant buildings in this state
whether public or private and remain thereon while performing such duties.
Similar entry by the department of natural resources may be made for the
purpose of making examinations, locations, surveys and/or appraisals of all
lands under the management and jurisdiction of the department of natural
resources; or for making examinations, appraisals and, after five days' written
notice to the landowner, making surveys for the purpose of possible acquisition
of property to provide public access to public lands. In no event other than
an emergency such as fire fighting shall motor vehicles be used to cross a
field customarily cultivated, without prior consent of the owner. None of the
entries herein provided for shall constitute trespass, but nothing contained
herein shall limit or diminish any liability which would otherwise exist as a
result of the acts or omissions of said department or its representatives.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter 76.40 RCW was repealed by 1994 c 163 s 6.

Sec.
2. RCW
76.06.020 and 1988 c 128 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Agent" means the recognized legal representative, representatives,
agent, or agents for any owner;

(2)
"Department" means the department of natural resources;

(3)
"Owner" means and includes individuals, partnerships, corporations,
and associations;

(("Agent"
means the recognized legal representative, representatives, agent or agents for
any owner;))

(4)
"Timber land" means any land on which there is a sufficient number of
trees, standing or down, to constitute, in the judgment of the department, a
forest insect or forest disease breeding ground of a nature to constitute a
menace, injurious and dangerous to permanent forest growth in the district
under consideration.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Numbers
the definitions and places them in alphabetical order.

Sec.
3. RCW
76.09.040 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where necessary to accomplish the purposes and policies stated in RCW
76.09.010, and to implement the provisions of this chapter, the board shall
adopt forest practices rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW and in accordance
with the procedures enumerated in this section that:

(a)
Establish minimum standards for forest practices;

(b)
Provide procedures for the voluntary development of resource management plans
which may be adopted as an alternative to the minimum standards in (a) of this
subsection if the plan is consistent with the purposes and policies stated in
RCW 76.09.010 and the plan meets or exceeds the objectives of the minimum
standards;

(c)
Set forth necessary administrative provisions;

(d)
Establish procedures for the collection and administration of forest practice
fees as set forth by this chapter; and

(e)
Allow for the development of watershed analyses.

Forest
practices rules pertaining to water quality protection shall be adopted by the
board after reaching agreement with the director of the department of ecology
or the director's designee on the board with respect thereto. All other forest
practices rules shall be adopted by the board.

Forest
practices rules shall be administered and enforced by either the department or
the local governmental entity as provided in this chapter. Such rules shall be
adopted and administered so as to give consideration to all purposes and
policies set forth in RCW 76.09.010.

(2)
The board shall prepare proposed forest practices rules. In addition to any
forest practices rules relating to water quality protection proposed by the
board, the department of ecology may submit to the board proposed forest
practices rules relating to water quality protection.

Prior
to initiating the rule making process, the proposed rules shall be submitted
for review and comments to the department of fish and wildlife and to the
counties of the state. After receipt of the proposed forest practices rules,
the department of fish and wildlife and the counties of the state shall have
thirty days in which to review and submit comments to the board, and to the
department of ecology with respect to its proposed rules relating to water
quality protection. After the expiration of such thirty day period the board
and the department of ecology shall jointly hold one or more hearings on the
proposed rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW. At such hearing(s) any county
may propose specific forest practices rules relating to problems existing
within such county. The board may adopt and the department of ecology may
approve such proposals if they find the proposals are consistent with the
purposes and policies of this chapter.

(3)
The board shall establish by rule a riparian open space program that includes
acquisition of a fee interest in, or at the landowner's option, a conservation
easement on lands within unconfined avulsing channel migration zones. Once
acquired, these lands may be held and managed by the department, transferred to
another state agency, transferred to an appropriate local government agency, or
transferred to a private nonprofit nature ((conservation [conservancy]))
conservancy corporation, as defined in RCW 64.04.130, in fee or transfer
of management obligation. The board shall adopt rules governing the
acquisition by the state or donation to the state of such interest in lands
including the right of refusal if the lands are subject to unacceptable
liabilities. The rules shall include definitions of qualifying lands,
priorities for acquisition, and provide for the opportunity to transfer such
lands with limited warranties and with a description of boundaries that does
not require full surveys where the cost of securing the surveys would be
unreasonable in relation to the value of the lands conveyed. The rules shall
provide for the management of the lands for ecological protection or fisheries
enhancement. Because there are few, if any, comparable sales of forest land
within unconfined avulsing channel migration zones, separate from the other
lands or assets, these lands are likely to be extraordinarily difficult to
appraise and the cost of a conventional appraisal often would be unreasonable
in relation to the value of the land involved. Therefore, for the purposes of
voluntary sales under this section, the legislature declares that these lands
are presumed to have a value equal to: (a) The acreage in the sale multiplied
by the average value of commercial forest land in the region under the land
value tables used for property tax purposes under RCW 84.33.120; plus (b) the
cruised volume of any timber located within the channel migration multiplied by
the appropriate quality code stumpage value for timber of the same species
shown on the appropriate table used for timber harvest excise tax purposes
under RCW 84.33.091. For purposes of this section, there shall be an eastside
region and a westside region as defined in the forests and fish report as
defined in RCW 76.09.020.

(4)
Subject to appropriations sufficient to cover the cost of such an acquisition
program and the related costs of administering the program, the department is
directed to purchase a fee interest or, at the owner's option, a conservation
easement in land that an owner tenders for purchase; provided that such lands
have been taxed as forest lands and are located within an unconfined avulsing
channel migration zone. Lands acquired under this section shall become riparian
open space. These acquisitions shall not be deemed to trigger the compensating
tax of chapters 84.33 and 84.34 RCW.

(5)
Instead of offering to sell interests in qualifying lands, owners may elect to
donate the interests to the state.

(6)
Any acquired interest in qualifying lands by the state under this section shall
be managed as riparian open space.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects the reference to a
nature conservancy corporation.

Sec.
4. RCW
76.09.055 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that the declines of fish stocks throughout much of the
state ((requires [require])) require immediate action to be taken
to help restore these fish runs where possible. The legislature also
recognizes that federal and state agencies, tribes, county representatives, and
private timberland owners have spent considerable effort and time to develop
the forests and fish report. Given the agreement of the parties, the
legislature believes that the immediate adoption of emergency rules is
appropriate in this particular instance. These rules can implement many
provisions of the forests and fish report to protect the economic well-being of
the state, and to minimize the risk to the state and landowners to legal
challenges. This authority is not designed to set any precedents for the
forest practices board in future rule making or set any precedents for other
rule-making bodies of the state.

(2)
The forest practices board is authorized to adopt emergency rules amending the
forest practices rules with respect to the protection of aquatic resources, in
accordance with RCW 34.05.350, except: (a) That the rules adopted under this
section may remain in effect until permanent rules are adopted, or until June
30, 2001, whichever is sooner; (b) notice of the proposed rules must be
published in the Washington State Register as provided in RCW 34.05.320; (c) at
least one public hearing must be conducted with an opportunity to provide oral
and written comments; and (d) a rule-making file must be maintained as required
by RCW 34.05.370. In adopting the emergency rules, the board is not required
to prepare a small business economic impact statement under chapter 19.85 RCW,
prepare a statement indicating whether the rules constitute a significant
legislative rule under RCW 34.05.328, prepare a significant legislative rule
analysis under RCW 34.05.328, or follow the procedural requirements of the
state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW. The forest practices board
may only adopt recommendations contained in the forests and fish report as
emergency rules under this section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects a manifest
grammatical error.

Sec.
5. RCW
76.09.065 and 1997 c 173 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Effective July 1, 1997, an applicant shall pay an application fee and a
recording fee, if applicable, at the time an application or notification is
submitted to the department or to the local governmental entity as provided in
this chapter.

(2)
For applications and notifications submitted to the department, the application
fee shall be fifty dollars for class II, III, and IV forest practices
applications or notifications relating to the commercial harvest of timber.
However, the fee shall be five hundred dollars for class IV forest practices
applications on lands being converted to other uses or on lands which are not
to be reforested because of the likelihood of future conversion to urban
development or on lands that are contained within "urban growth
areas," designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except the fee shall be
fifty dollars on those lands where the forest landowner provides:

(a)
A written statement of intent signed by the forest landowner not to convert to
a use other than commercial forest product operations for ten years,
accompanied by either a written forest management plan acceptable to the
department or documentation that the land is enrolled under the provisions of
chapter 84.33 RCW; or

(b)
A conversion option harvest plan approved by the local ((government
[governmental])) governmental entity and submitted to the department
as part of the forest practices application.

All
money collected from fees under this subsection shall be deposited in the state
general fund.

(3)
For applications submitted to the local governmental entity, the fee shall be
five hundred dollars for class IV forest practices on lands being converted to
other uses or lands that are contained within "urban growth areas,"
designated pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW, except as otherwise provided in this
section, unless a different fee is otherwise provided by the local governmental
entity.

(4)
Recording fees shall be as provided in chapter 36.18 RCW.

(5)
An application fee under subsection (2) of this section shall be refunded or
credited to the applicant if either the application or notification is
disapproved by the department or the application or notification is withdrawn
by the applicant due to restrictions imposed by the department.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects a manifest
grammatical error.

Sec.
6. RCW
76.09.140 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources may take any necessary action to enforce
any final order or final decision, and may disapprove any forest practices
application or notification submitted by any person who has failed to comply
with a final order or final decision or has failed to pay any civil penalties
as provided in RCW 76.09.170, for up to one year from the issuance of a notice
of intent to disapprove notifications and applications under this section or
until the violator pays all outstanding civil penalties and complies with all
validly issued and outstanding notices to comply and stop work orders,
whichever is longer. For purposes of chapter 482, Laws of 1993, the terms
"final order" and "final decision" shall mean the same as
set forth in RCW 76.09.080, 76.09.090, and 76.09.110. The department shall
provide written notice of its intent to disapprove an application or
notification under this subsection. The department shall forward copies of its
notice of intent to disapprove to any affected landowner. The disapproval
period shall run from thirty days following the date of actual notice or when
all administrative and judicial appellate processes, if any, have been
exhausted. Any person provided the notice may seek review from the appeals
board by filing a request for review within thirty days of the date of the
notice of intent. While the notice of intent to disapprove is in effect, the
violator may not serve as a person in charge of, be employed by, manage, or
otherwise participate to any degree in forest practices.

(2)
On request of the department, the attorney general may take action necessary to
enforce this chapter, including, but not limited to: Seeking penalties,
interest, costs, and attorneys' fees; enforcing final orders or decisions; and
seeking civil injunctions, show cause orders, or contempt orders.

(3)
A county may bring injunctive, declaratory, or other actions for enforcement
for forest practice activities within its jurisdiction in the superior court as
provided by law against the department, the forest landowner, timber owner or
operator to enforce the forest ((practice[s])) practices rules or
any final order of the department, or the appeals board. No civil or criminal
penalties shall be imposed for past actions or omissions if such actions or
omissions were conducted pursuant to an approval or directive of the
department. Injunctions, declaratory actions, or other actions for enforcement
under this subsection may not be commenced unless the department fails to take
appropriate action after ten days written notice to the department by the
county of a violation of the forest practices rules or final orders of the
department or the appeals board.

(4)(a)
The department may require financial assurance prior to the conduct of any
further forest practices from an operator or landowner who within the preceding
three-year period has:

(i)
Operated without an approved forest practices application, other than an
unintentional operation in connection with an approved application outside the
approved boundary of such an application;

(ii)
Continued to operate in breach of, or failed to comply with, the terms of an
effective stop work order or notice to comply; or

(iii)
Failed to pay any civil or criminal penalty.

(b)
The department may deny any application for failure to submit financial
assurances as required.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects the reference to
forest practices.

Sec.
7. RCW
76.09.150 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall make inspections of forest lands, before, during and after
the conducting of forest practices as necessary for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with this chapter and the forest practices rules and to ensure that
no material damage occurs to the natural resources of this state as a result of
such practices.

(2)
Any duly authorized representative of the department shall have the right to
enter upon forest land at any reasonable time to enforce the provisions of this
chapter and the forest practices rules.

(3)
The department or the department of ecology may apply for an administrative
inspection warrant to either Thurston county superior court, or the superior
court in the county in which the property is located. An administrative
inspection warrant may be issued where:

(a)
The department has attempted an inspection of forest lands under this chapter
to ensure compliance with this chapter and the forest ((practice[s])) practices
rules or to ensure that no potential or actual material damage occurs to the
natural resources of this state, and access to all or part of the forest lands
has been actually or constructively denied; or

(b)
The department has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter
or of rules adopted under this chapter is occurring or has occurred.

(4)
In connection with any watershed analysis, any review of a pending application
by an identification team appointed by the department, any compliance studies,
any effectiveness monitoring, or other research that has been agreed to by a
landowner, the department may invite representatives of other agencies, tribes,
and interest groups to accompany a department representative and, at the
landowner's election, the landowner, on any such inspections. Reasonable
efforts shall be made by the department to notify the landowner of the persons
being invited onto the property and the purposes for which they are being
invited.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects the reference to
forest practices.

Sec.
8. RCW
76.12.090 and 1988 c 128 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of acquiring and paying for lands for state forests and
reforestation as herein provided the department may issue utility bonds of the
state of Washington, in an amount not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars in
principal, during the biennium expiring March 31, 1925, and such other amounts
as may hereafter be authorized by the legislature. Said bonds shall bear
interest at not to exceed the rate of two percent per annum which shall be
payable annually. Said bonds shall never be sold or exchanged at less than par
and accrued interest, if any, and shall mature in not less than a period equal
to the time necessary to develop a merchantable forest on the lands exchanged
for said bonds or purchased with money derived from the sale thereof. Said
bonds shall be known as state forest utility bonds. The principal or interest
of said bonds shall not be a general obligation of the state, but shall be
payable only from the forest development account. The department may issue
said bonds in exchange for lands selected by it in accordance with RCW
76.12.020, 76.12.030, 76.12.080, 76.12.090, 76.12.110, 76.12.120, and
76.12.140, ((and 76.12.150,)) or may sell said bonds in such manner as
it deems advisable, and with the proceeds purchase and acquire such lands. Any
of said bonds issued in exchange and payment for any particular tract of lands
may be made a first and prior lien against the particular land for which they
are exchanged, and upon failure to pay said bonds and interest thereon
according to their terms, the lien of said bonds may be foreclosed by
appropriate court action.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
76.12.150 was repealed by 1977 c 75 s 96.

Sec.
9. RCW
76.12.100 and 1988 c 128 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of acquiring, seeding, reforestation and administering land for
forests and of carrying out RCW 76.12.020, 76.12.030, 76.12.080, 76.12.090,
76.12.110, 76.12.120, and 76.12.140, ((and 76.12.150,)) the
department is authorized to issue and dispose of utility bonds of the state of
Washington in an amount not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars in principal
during the biennium expiring March 31, 1951: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no sum in
excess of one dollar per acre shall ever be paid or allowed either in cash,
bonds, or otherwise, for any lands suitable for forest growth, but devoid of
such, nor shall any sum in excess of three dollars per acre be paid or allowed
either in cash, bonds, or otherwise, for any lands adequately restocked with young
growth.

Any
utility bonds issued under the provisions of this section may be retired from
time to time, whenever there is sufficient money in the forest development
account, said bonds to be retired at the discretion of the department either in
the order of issuance, or by first retiring bonds with the highest rate of
interest.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 76.12.150 was repealed by 1977 c 75 s 96.

Sec.
10. RCW
76.12.140 and 1988 c 128 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
lands acquired by the state under RCW 76.12.020, 76.12.030, 76.12.080,
76.12.090, 76.12.110, 76.12.120, and 76.12.140, ((and 76.12.150,))
or any amendments thereto, shall be logged, protected and cared for in such
manner as to insure natural reforestation of such lands, and to that end the
department shall have power, and it shall be its duty to make rules and
regulations, and amendments thereto, governing logging operations on such
areas, and to embody in any contract for the sale of timber on such areas, such
conditions as it shall deem advisable, with respect to methods of logging,
disposition of slashings, and debris, and protection and promotion of new
forests. All such rules and regulations, or amendments thereto, shall be
adopted by the department under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any violation of any such
rules shall be a gross misdemeanor unless the department has specified by rule,
when not inconsistent with applicable statutes, that violation of a specific
rule is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 76.12.150 was repealed by
1977 c 75 s 96.

Sec.
11. RCW
76.13.010 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
to RCW 76.13.005, 76.13.007, 76.13.020, and 76.13.030.

(1)
"Cooperating organization" means federal, state, and local
agencies, colleges and universities, landowner assistance organizations,
consultants, forest resource-related industries, and environmental
organizations which promote and maintain programs designed to provide
information and technical assistance services to nonindustrial forest and
woodland owners.

(2)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(((2)))
(3) "Landowner" means an individual, partnership, private,
public or municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state agency, county, or local
government entity, educational institution, or association of individuals of
whatever nature that own nonindustrial forests and woodlands.

(((3)))
(4) "Nonindustrial forests and woodlands" are those suburban
acreages and rural lands supporting or capable of supporting trees and other
flora and fauna associated with a forest ecosystem, comprised of total
individual land ownerships of less than five thousand acres and not directly
associated with wood processing or handling facilities.

(((4)))
(5) "Stewardship" means managing by caring for, promoting,
protecting, renewing, or reestablishing or both, forests and associated
resources for the benefit of the landowner, the natural resources and the
citizens of Washington state, in accordance with each landowner's objectives,
best management practices, and legal requirements.

(((5)
"Cooperating organization" means federal, state, and local agencies,
colleges and universities, landowner assistance organizations, consultants,
forest resource-related industries, and environmental organizations which
promote and maintain programs designed to provide information and technical
assistance services to nonindustrial forest and woodland owners.))

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Arranges
definitions in alphabetical order.

Sec.
12. RCW
76.13.110 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources shall establish and maintain a small forest
landowner office. The small forest landowner office shall be a resource and
focal point for small forest landowner concerns and policies, and shall have
significant expertise regarding the management of small forest holdings,
governmental programs applicable to such holdings, and the forestry riparian
easement program.

(2)
The small forest landowner office shall administer the provisions of the
forestry riparian easement program created under RCW 76.13.120. With respect
to that program, the office shall have the authority to contract with private
consultants that the office finds qualified to perform timber cruises of
forestry riparian easements.

(3)
The small forest landowner office shall assist in the development of small
landowner options through alternate management plans or alternate harvest
restrictions appropriate to small landowners. The small forest landowner
office shall develop criteria to be adopted by the forest practices board in a
manual for alternate management plans or alternate harvest restrictions. These
alternate plans or alternate harvest restrictions shall meet riparian functions
while requiring less costly regulatory prescriptions. At the landowner's
option, alternate plans or alternate harvest restrictions may be used to
further meet riparian functions.

The
small (([forest])) forest landowner office shall evaluate the
cumulative impact of such alternate management plans or alternate harvest
restrictions on essential riparian functions at the subbasin or watershed
level. The small forest landowner office shall adjust future alternate
management plans or alternate harvest restrictions in a manner that will
minimize the negative impacts on essential riparian functions within a subbasin
or watershed.

(4)
An advisory committee is established to assist the small forest landowner
office in developing policy and recommending rules to the forest practices
board. The advisory committee shall consist of seven members, including a
representative from the department of ecology, the department of fish and
wildlife, and a tribal representative. Four additional committee members shall
be small forest landowners who shall be appointed by the commissioner of public
lands from a list of candidates submitted by the board of directors of the
Washington farm forestry association or its successor organization. The
association shall submit more than one candidate for each position. Appointees
shall serve for a term of four years. The small forest landowner office shall
review draft rules or rule concepts with the committee prior to recommending
such rules to the forest practices board. The office shall reimburse
nongovernmental committee members for reasonable expenses associated with
attending committee meetings as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
By December 1, 2000, the small forest landowner office shall provide a report
to the board and the legislature containing:

(a)
Estimates of the amounts of nonindustrial forests and woodlands in holdings of
twenty acres or less, twenty-one to one hundred acres, one hundred to one
thousand acres, and one thousand to five thousand acres, in western Washington
and eastern Washington, and the number of persons having total nonindustrial
forest and woodland holdings in those size ranges;

(b)
Estimates of the number of parcels of nonindustrial forests and woodlands held
in contiguous ownerships of twenty acres or less, and the percentages of those
parcels containing improvements used: (i) As primary residences for half or
more of most years; (ii) as vacation homes or other temporary residences for
less than half of most years; and (iii) for other uses;

(c)
The watershed administrative units in which significant portions of the
riparian areas or total land area are nonindustrial forests and woodlands;

(d)
Estimates of the number of forest practices applications and notifications
filed per year for forest road construction, silvicultural activities to
enhance timber growth, timber harvest not associated with conversion to
nonforest land uses, with estimates of the number of acres of nonindustrial
forests and woodlands on which forest practices are conducted under those
applications and notifications; and

(e)
Recommendations on ways the board and the legislature could provide more
effective incentives to encourage continued management of nonindustrial forests
and woodlands for forestry uses in ways that better protect salmon, other fish
and wildlife, water quality, and other environmental values.

(6)
By December 1, 2002, and every four years thereafter, the small forest
landowner office shall provide to the board and the legislature an update of
the report described in subsection (5) of this section, containing more recent
information and describing:

(a)
Trends in the items estimated under subsection (5)(a) through (d) of this
section;

(b)
Whether, how, and to what extent the forest practices act and rules contributed
to those trends; and

(c)
Whether, how, and to what extent: (i) The board and legislature implemented
recommendations made in the previous report; and (ii) implementation of or
failure to implement those recommendations affected those trends.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects the reference to the
small forest landowner office.

Sec.
13. RCW
76.13.120 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that the state should acquire easements along riparian
and other sensitive aquatic areas from small forest landowners willing to sell
or donate such easements to the state provided that the state will not be
required to acquire such easements if they are subject to unacceptable
liabilities. The legislature therefore establishes a forestry riparian
easement program.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section and RCW
76.13.100 and 76.13.110 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Forestry riparian easement" means an easement covering qualifying
timber granted voluntarily to the state by a small forest landowner.

(b)
"Qualifying timber" means those trees covered by a forest practices
application that the small forest landowner is required to leave unharvested
under the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370 or that is made
uneconomic to harvest by those rules, and for which the small landowner is
willing to grant the state a forestry riparian easement. "Qualifying
timber" is timber within or bordering a commercially reasonable harvest
unit as determined under rules adopted by the forest practices board.

(c)
"Small forest landowner" means a landowner meeting all of the
following characteristics: (i) A forest landowner as defined in RCW 76.09.020
whose interest in the land and timber is in fee or who has rights to the timber
to be included in the forestry riparian easement that extend at least fifty
years from the date the forest practices application associated with the
easement is submitted; (ii) an entity that has harvested from its own lands in
this state during the three years prior to the year of application an average
timber volume that would qualify the owner as a small timber harvester under
RCW 84.33.073(1); and (iii) an entity that certifies at the time of application
that it does not expect to harvest from its own lands more than the volume
allowed by RCW 84.33.073(1) during the ten years following application. If a
landowner's prior three-year average harvest exceeds the limit of RCW
84.33.073(1), or the landowner expects to exceed this limit during the ten
years following application, and that landowner establishes to the department
of natural resources' reasonable satisfaction that the harvest limits were or
will be exceeded to raise funds to pay estate taxes or equally compelling and
unexpected obligations such as court-ordered judgments or extraordinary medical
expenses, the landowner shall be deemed to be a small forest landowner.

For
purposes of determining whether a person qualifies as a small forest landowner,
the small forest landowner office, created in RCW 76.13.110, shall evaluate the
landowner under this definition as of the date that the forest practices
application is submitted with which the forestry riparian easement is
associated. A small forest landowner can include an individual, partnership,
corporate, or other nongovernmental legal entity. If a landowner grants timber
rights to another entity for less than five years, the landowner may still
qualify as a small forest landowner under this section.

(d)
"Completion of harvest" means that the trees have been harvested from
an area and that further entry into that area by mechanized logging or slash
treating equipment is not expected.

(3)
The department of natural resources is authorized and directed to accept and
hold in the name of the state of Washington forestry riparian easements granted
by small forest landowners covering qualifying timber and to pay compensation
to such landowners in accordance with subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
The department of natural resources may not transfer the easements to any
entity other than another state agency.

(4)
Forestry riparian easements shall be effective for fifty years from the date
the forest practices application associated with the qualifying timber is
submitted to the department of natural resources, unless the easement is
terminated earlier by the department of natural resources voluntarily, based on
a determination that termination is in the best interest of the state, or under
the terms of a termination clause in the easement.

(5)
Forestry riparian easements shall be restrictive only, and shall preserve all
lawful uses of the easement premises by the landowner that are consistent with
the terms of the easement and the requirement to protect riparian functions
during the term of the easement, subject to the restriction that the leave
trees required by the rules to be left on the easement premises may not be cut
during the term of the easement. No right of public access to or across, or
any public use of the easement premises is created by this statute or by the
easement. Forestry riparian easements shall not be deemed to trigger the
compensating tax of or otherwise disqualify land from being taxed under chapter
84.33 or 84.34 RCW.

(6)
Upon application of a small forest landowner for a riparian easement that is
associated with a forest practices application and the landowner's marking of
the qualifying timber on the qualifying lands, the small forest landowner
office shall determine the compensation to be offered to the small (([forest]))
forest landowner as provided for in this section. The legislature
recognizes that there is not readily available market transaction evidence of
value for easements of this nature, and thus establishes the following
methodology to ascertain the value for forestry riparian easements. Values so
determined shall not be considered competent evidence of value for any other
purpose.

The
small forest landowner office shall establish the volume of the qualifying
timber. Based on that volume and using data obtained or maintained by the
department of revenue under RCW 84.33.074 and 84.33.091, the small forest
landowner office shall attempt to determine the fair market value of the
qualifying timber as of the date the forest practices application associated
with the qualifying timber was submitted. If, under the forest practices rules
adopted under chapter 4, Laws of 1999 1st sp. sess., some qualifying timber may
be removed prior to the expiration of the fifty-year term of the easement, the
small forest landowner office shall apply a reduced compensation factor to
ascertain the value of those trees based on the proportional economic value,
considering income and growth, lost to the landowner.

(7)
Except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, the small forest
landowner office shall, subject to available funding, offer compensation to the
small forest landowner in the amount of fifty percent of the value determined
in subsection (6) of this section. If the landowner accepts the offer, the
department of natural resources shall pay the compensation promptly upon (a)
completion of harvest in the area covered by the forestry riparian easement;
(b) verification that there has been compliance with the rules requiring leave
trees in the easement area; and (c) execution and delivery of the easement to
the department of natural resources. Upon donation or payment of compensation,
the department of natural resources may record the easement.

(8)
For approved forest ((practice[s])) practices applications where
the regulatory impact is greater than the average percentage impact for all
small landowners as determined by the department of natural resources analysis
under the regulatory fairness act, chapter 19.85 RCW, the compensation offered
will be increased to one hundred percent for that portion of the regulatory
impact that is in excess of the average. Regulatory impact includes trees left
in buffers, special management zones, and those rendered uneconomic to harvest
by these rules. A separate average or high impact regulatory threshold shall
be established for western and eastern Washington. Criteria for these measurements
and payments shall be established by the small forest landowner office.

(9)
The forest practices board shall adopt rules under the administrative procedure
act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to implement the forestry riparian easement program,
including the following:

(a)
A standard version or versions of all documents necessary or advisable to
create the forestry riparian easements as provided for in this section;

(b)
Standards for descriptions of the easement premises with a degree of precision
that is reasonable in relation to the values involved;

(c)
Methods and standards for cruises and valuation of forestry riparian easements
for purposes of establishing the compensation. The department of natural
resources shall perform the timber cruises of forestry riparian easements
required under this chapter and chapter 76.09 RCW. Any rules concerning the
methods and standards for valuations of forestry riparian easements shall apply
only to the department of natural resources, small forest landowners, and the
small forest landowner office;

(d)
A method to determine that a forest ((practice[s])) practices
application involves a commercially reasonable harvest;

(e)
A method to address blowdown of qualified timber falling outside the easement
premises;

(f)
A formula for sharing of proceeds in relation to the acquisition of qualified
timber covered by an easement through the exercise or threats of eminent domain
by a federal or state agency with eminent domain authority, based on the
present value of the department of natural resources' and the landowner's
relative interests in the qualified timber;

(g)
High impact regulatory thresholds;

(h)
A method to determine timber that is qualifying timber because it is rendered
uneconomic to harvest by the rules adopted under RCW 76.09.055 and 76.09.370;
and

(i)
A method for internal department of natural resources review of small (([forest]))
forest landowner office compensation decisions under subsection (7) of
this section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Clarifies
a reference to the small forest landowner.

Also corrects references to
forest practices applications and the small forest landowner office.

Sec.
14. RCW
76.14.010 and 1988 c 128 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Department" means the department of natural resources;

(2)
"Forest land" means any lands considered best adapted for the growing
of trees; and

(3)
The term "owner" means and includes individuals, partnerships,
corporations, associations, federal land managing agencies, state of
Washington, counties, municipalities, and other forest landowners((;

"Forest
land" means any lands considered best adapted for the growing of trees)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Arranges
definitions in alphabetical order.

Sec.
15. RCW
76.15.010 and 1991 c 179 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
(("Department" means the department of natural resources.

(2)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, private or public
municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state entity, county or local governmental
entity, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

(3)))
"Community and urban forest" is that land in and around human
settlements ranging from small communities to metropolitan areas, occupied or
potentially occupied by trees and associated vegetation. Community and urban
forest land may be planted or unplanted, used or unused, and includes public
and private lands, lands along transportation and utility corridors, and
forested watershed lands within populated areas.

(((4)))
(2) "Community and urban forestry" means the planning,
establishment, protection, care, and management of trees and associated plants
individually, in small groups, or under forest conditions within municipalities
and counties.

(((5)))
(3) "Department" means the department of natural resources.

(4)
"Municipality" means a city, town, port district, public school
district, community college district, irrigation district, weed control
district, park district, or other political subdivision of the state.

(5)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, private or public
municipal corporation, Indian tribe, state entity, county or local governmental
entity, or association of individuals of whatever nature.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Arranges
definitions in alphabetical order.

Sec.
16. RCW
76.36.010 and 1984 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
words and phrases herein used, unless the same be clearly contrary to or
inconsistent with the context of this chapter or the section in which used,
shall be construed as follows:

(1)
(("Person" includes the plural and all corporations, foreign and
domestic, copartnerships, firms and associations of persons.

(2)
"Waters of this state" includes any and all bodies of fresh and salt
water within the jurisdiction of the state capable of being used for the
transportation or storage of forest products, including all rivers and lakes
and their tributaries, harbors, bays, bayous and marshes.

(3)
"Forest products" means logs, spars, piles, and poles, boom sticks
and shingle bolts and every form into which a fallen tree may be cut before it
is manufactured into lumber or run through a sawmill, shingle mill or tie mill,
or cut into cord wood, stove wood or hewn ties.

(4)
"Brand" means a unique symbol or mark placed on or in forest products
for the purpose of identifying ownership.

(5)
"Catch brand" means a mark or brand used by a person as an
identifying mark placed upon forest products and booming equipment previously
owned by another.

(6)))
"Booming equipment" includes boom sticks and boom chains.

(((7)))
(2) "Brand" means a unique symbol or mark placed on or in forest
products for the purpose of identifying ownership.

(3)
"Catch brand" means a mark or brand used by a person as an
identifying mark placed upon forest products and booming equipment previously
owned by another.

(4)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(5)
"Forest products" means logs, spars, piles, and poles, boom sticks,
and shingle bolts and every form into which a fallen tree may be cut before it
is manufactured into lumber or run through a sawmill, shingle mill, or tie
mill, or cut into cord wood, stove wood, or hewn ties.

(6)
"Person" includes the plural and all corporations, foreign and
domestic, copartnerships, firms, and associations of persons.

(7)
"Waters of this state" includes any and all bodies of fresh and salt
water within the jurisdiction of the state capable of being used for the
transportation or storage of forest products, including all rivers and lakes
and their tributaries, harbors, bays, bayous, and marshes.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Arranges
definitions in alphabetical order.

Sec.
17. RCW
76.42.020 and 1994 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(("Wood
debris" as used in this chapter is wood that is adrift on navigable waters
or has been adrift thereon and stranded on beaches, marshes, or tidal and
shorelands and which is not merchantable or economically salvageable under
chapter 76.40 RCW.))

(1)
"Removal" as used in this chapter shall include all activities
necessary for the collection and disposal of such wood debris: PROVIDED, That
nothing herein provided shall permit removal of wood debris from private
property without written consent of the owner.

(2)
"Wood debris" as used in this chapter is wood that is adrift on
navigable waters or has been adrift thereon and stranded on beaches, marshes,
or tidal and shorelands.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
Chapter 76.40 RCW was repealed by 1994 c 163 s 6.

(2)
Numbers definitions and arranges them in alphabetical order.

Sec.
18. RCW
76.48.020 and 1995 c 366 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
otherwise required by the context, as used in this chapter:

(1)
(("Christmas trees" means any evergreen trees or the top thereof,
commonly known as Christmas trees, with limbs and branches, with or without
roots, including fir, pine, spruce, cedar, and other coniferous species.

(2)
"Native ornamental trees and shrubs" means any trees or shrubs which
are not nursery grown and which have been removed from the ground with the
roots intact.

(3)
"Cut or picked evergreen foliage," commonly known as brush, means
evergreen boughs, huckleberry, salal, fern, Oregon grape, rhododendron, mosses,
bear grass, scotch broom (Cytisus scoparius) and other cut or picked evergreen
products. "Cut or picked evergreen foliage" does not mean cones or
seeds.)) "Authorization" means a properly
completed preprinted form authorizing the transportation or possession of
Christmas trees which contains the information required by RCW 76.48.080, a
sample of which is filed before the harvesting occurs with the sheriff of the
county in which the harvesting is to occur.

(2)
"Cascara bark" means the bark of a Cascara tree.

(3)
"Cedar processor" means any person who purchases, takes, or retains
possession of cedar products or cedar salvage for later sale in the same or
modified form following removal and delivery from the land where harvested.

(4)
"Cedar products" means cedar shakeboards, shake and shingle bolts,
and rounds one to three feet in length.

(5)
"Cedar salvage" means cedar chunks, slabs, stumps, and logs having a
volume greater than one cubic foot and being harvested or transported from
areas not associated with the concurrent logging of timber stands (a) under a
forest practices application approved or notification received by the
department of natural resources, or (b) under a contract or permit issued by an
agency of the United States government.

(6)
(("Processed cedar products" means cedar shakes, shingles, fence
posts, hop poles, pickets, stakes, rails, or rounds less than one foot in
length.

(7)
"Cedar processor" means any person who purchases, takes, or retains
possession of cedar products or cedar salvage for later sale in the same or
modified form following removal and delivery from the land where harvested.

(8)
"Cascara bark" means the bark of a Cascara tree.

(9)
"Wild edible mushrooms" means edible mushrooms not cultivated or
propagated by artificial means.

(10)
"Specialized forest products" means Christmas trees, native
ornamental trees and shrubs, cut or picked evergreen foliage, cedar products,
cedar salvage, processed cedar products, wild edible mushrooms, and Cascara
bark.

(11)
"Person" includes the plural and all corporations, foreign or
domestic, copartnerships, firms, and associations of persons.

(12))) "Christmas
trees" means any evergreen trees or the top thereof, commonly known as
Christmas trees, with limbs and branches, with or without roots, including fir,
pine, spruce, cedar, and other coniferous species.

(7)
"Cut or picked evergreen foliage," commonly known as brush, means
evergreen boughs, huckleberry, salal, fern, Oregon grape, rhododendron, mosses,
bear grass, scotch broom (Cytisus scoparius), and other cut or picked evergreen
products. "Cut or picked evergreen foliage" does not mean cones or
seeds.

(8)
"Harvest" means to separate, by cutting, prying, picking, peeling,
breaking, pulling, splitting, or otherwise removing, a specialized forest
product (a) from its physical connection or contact with the land or vegetation
upon which it is or was growing or (b) from the position in which it is lying
upon the land.

(((13)
"Transportation" means the physical conveyance of specialized forest
products outside or off of a harvest site by any means.

(14)
"Landowner" means, with regard to real property, the private owner,
the state of Washington or any political subdivision, the federal government,
or a person who by deed, contract, or lease has authority to harvest and sell
forest products of the property. "Landowner" does not include the
purchaser or successful high bidder at a public or private timber sale.

(15)
"Authorization" means a properly completed preprinted form
authorizing the transportation or possession of Christmas trees which contains
the information required by RCW 76.48.080, a sample of which is filed before
the harvesting occurs with the sheriff of the county in which the harvesting is
to occur.

(16))) (9)
"Harvest site" means each location where one or more persons are
engaged in harvesting specialized forest products close enough to each other
that communication can be conducted with an investigating law enforcement
officer in a normal conversational tone.

(((17)
"Specialized forest products permit" means a printed document in a
form specified by the department of natural resources, or true copy thereof, that
is signed by a landowner or his or her authorized agent or representative,
referred to in this chapter as "permittors" and validated by the
county sheriff and authorizes a designated person, referred to in this chapter
as "permittee", who has also signed the permit, to harvest and
transport a designated specialized forest product from land owned or controlled
and specified by the permittor and that is located in the county where the
permit is issued.

(18))) (10)
"Landowner" means, with regard to real property, the private owner,
the state of Washington or any political subdivision, the federal government,
or a person who by deed, contract, or lease has authority to harvest and sell
forest products of the property. "Landowner" does not include the
purchaser or successful high bidder at a public or private timber sale.

(11)
"Native ornamental trees and shrubs" means any trees or shrubs which
are not nursery grown and which have been removed from the ground with the
roots intact.

(12)
"Permit area" means a designated tract of land that may contain
single or multiple harvest sites.

(13)
"Person" includes the plural and all corporations, foreign or
domestic, copartnerships, firms, and associations of persons.

(14)
"Processed cedar products" means cedar shakes, shingles, fence posts,
hop poles, pickets, stakes, rails, or rounds less than one foot in length.

(15)
"Sheriff" means, for the purpose of validating specialized forest
products permits, the county sheriff, deputy sheriff, or an authorized employee
of the sheriff's office or an agent of the office.

(16)
"Specialized forest products" means Christmas trees, native
ornamental trees and shrubs, cut or picked evergreen foliage, cedar products,
cedar salvage, processed cedar products, wild edible mushrooms, and Cascara
bark.

(17)
"Specialized forest products permit" means a printed document in a
form specified by the department of natural resources, or true copy thereof,
that is signed by a landowner or his or her authorized agent or representative,
referred to in this chapter as "permittors" and validated by the
county sheriff and authorizes a designated person, referred to in this chapter
as "permittee," who has also signed the permit, to harvest and
transport a designated specialized forest product from land owned or controlled
and specified by the permittor and that is located in the county where the
permit is issued.

(18)
"Transportation" means the physical conveyance of specialized forest
products outside or off of a harvest site by any means.

(19)
"True copy" means a replica of a validated specialized forest
products permit as reproduced by a copy machine capable of effectively
reproducing the information contained on the permittee's copy of the
specialized forest products permit. A copy is made true by the permittee or
the permittee and permittor signing in the space provided on the face of the
copy. A true copy will be effective until the expiration date of the
specialized forest products permit unless the permittee or the permittee and
permittor specify an earlier date. A permittor may require the actual
signatures of both the permittee and permittor for execution of a true copy by
so indicating in the space provided on the original copy of the specialized
forest products permit. A permittee, or, if so indicated, the permittee and
permittor, may condition the use of the true copy to harvesting only,
transportation only, possession only, or any combination thereof.

(20)
(("Permit area" means a designated tract of land that may contain
single or multiple harvest sites.)) "Wild edible mushrooms"
means edible mushrooms not cultivated or propagated by artificial means.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Arranges definitions in alphabetical order.

Sec.
19. RCW
76.48.085 and 1995 c 366 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Buyers
who purchase specialized forest products are required to record (1) the permit
number; (2) the type of forest product purchased; (3) the permit holder's name;
and (4) the amount of forest product purchased. The buyer shall keep a record
of this information for a period of one year from the date of purchase and make
the records available for inspection by authorized enforcement officials.

The
buyer of specialized forest products must record the license plate number of
the vehicle transporting the forest products on the bill of sale, as well as
the seller's permit number on the bill of sale. This section shall not apply
to transactions involving Christmas trees.

((The
[This])) This section shall not apply to buyers of specialized
forest products at the retail sales level.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects a manifest
grammatical error.

Sec.
20. RCW
78.16.070 and 1945 c 93 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the event said lease shall be for reserved mineral rights on lands previously
sold by said county with mineral rights reserved, as provided in ((chapter
19, Laws of 1943 [RCW 36.34.010])) RCW 36.34.010, said lease shall
contain a provision that no rights shall be exercised under said lease by the
lessee, his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors,
or assigns, until provision has been made by the lessee, his or her
heirs, executors, administrators, successors, or assigns to pay to the
owner of the land upon which the rights reserved to the county are sought to be
((exercise [exercised])) exercised, full payment for all damages
to said owner by reason of entering upon said land; said rights to be
determined as provided for in ((said chapter 19, Laws of Washington, 1943
[RCW 36.34.010])) RCW 36.34.010: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in the
event of litigation to determine such damage, the primary term of such lease
shall be extended for a period equal to the time required for such litigation,
but not to exceed three years.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects the reference to RCW
36.34.010, corrects a manifest grammatical error, and makes the section gender
neutral.

Sec.
21. RCW
78.44.020 and 1993 c 518 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purposes of this chapter are to:

(1)
Provide that the usefulness, productivity, and scenic values of all lands and
waters involved in surface mining within the state will receive the greatest
practical degree of protection and reclamation at the earliest opportunity
following completion of surface mining;

(2)
Provide for the greatest practical degree of state-wide consistency in the
regulation of surface mines;

(3)
Apportion regulatory authority between state and local governments in order to
minimize redundant regulation of mining; and

(4)
Ensure that reclamation is consistent with local land use plans((; and

(5)
Ensure the power of local government to regulate land use and operations pursuant
to section 16 of this act)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

1993 c 518 s 16 was vetoed by
the governor.

Sec.
22. RCW
78.44.031 and 1999 c 252 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Approved subsequent use" means the post surface-mining land use
contained in an approved reclamation plan and approved by the local land use
authority.

(2)
"Completion of surface mining" means the cessation of mining and
directly related activities in any segment of a surface mine that occurs when
essentially all minerals that can be taken under the terms of the reclamation
permit have been depleted except minerals required to accomplish reclamation
according to the approved reclamation plan.

(3)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(4)
"Determination" means any action by the department including permit
issuance, reporting, reclamation plan approval or modification, permit
transfers, orders, fines, or refusal to issue permits.

(5)
"Disturbed area" means any place where activities clearly in
preparation for, or during, surface mining have physically disrupted, covered,
compacted, moved, or otherwise altered the characteristics of soil, bedrock,
vegetation, or topography that existed prior to such activity. Disturbed areas
may include but are not limited to: Working faces, water bodies created by
mine-related excavation, pit floors, the land beneath processing plant and
stock pile sites, spoil pile sites, and equipment staging areas. Disturbed
areas shall also include aboveground waste rock sites and tailing facilities,
and other surface manifestations of underground mines.

Disturbed
areas do not include:

(a)
Surface mine access roads unless these have characteristics of topography,
drainage, slope stability, or ownership that, in the opinion of the department,
make reclamation necessary;

(b)
Lands that have been reclaimed to all standards outlined in this chapter, rules
of the department, any applicable SEPA document, and the approved reclamation
plan; and

(c)
Subsurface aspects of underground mines, such as portals, tunnels, shafts,
pillars, and stopes.

(6)
"Miner" means any person or persons, any partnership, limited
partnership, or corporation, or any association of persons, including every
public or governmental agency engaged in surface mining.

(7)
"Minerals" means clay, coal, gravel, industrial minerals, metallic
substances, peat, sand, stone, topsoil, and any other similar solid material or
substance to be excavated from natural deposits on or in the earth for
commercial, industrial, or construction use.

(8)
"Operations" means all mine-related activities, exclusive of
reclamation, that include, but are not limited to activities that affect noise
generation, air quality, surface and ground water quality, quantity, and flow,
glare, pollution, traffic safety, ground vibrations, and/or significant or
substantial impacts commonly regulated under provisions of land use or other
permits of local government and local ordinances, or other state laws.

Operations
specifically include:

(a)
The mining or extraction of rock, stone, gravel, sand, earth, and other
minerals;

(b)
Blasting, equipment maintenance, sorting, crushing, and loading;

(c)
On-site mineral processing including asphalt or concrete batching, concrete
recycling, and other aggregate recycling;

(d)
Transporting minerals to and from the mine, on site road maintenance, road
maintenance for roads used extensively for surface mining activities, traffic
safety, and traffic control.

(9)
"Overburden" means the earth, rock, soil, and topsoil that lie above
mineral deposits.

(10)
"Permit holder" means any person or persons, any partnership, limited
partnership, or corporation, or any association of persons, either natural or
artificial, including every public or governmental agency engaged in surface
mining and/or the operation of surface mines, whether individually, jointly, or
through subsidiaries, agents, employees, operators, or contractors who holds a
state reclamation permit.

(11)
"Reclamation" means rehabilitation for the appropriate future use of
disturbed areas resulting from surface mining including areas under associated
mineral processing equipment, areas under stockpiled materials, and aboveground
waste rock and tailing facilities, and all other surface disturbances
associated with underground mines. Although both the need for and the
practicability of reclamation will control the type and degree of reclamation
in any specific surface mine, the basic objective shall be to reestablish on a
perpetual basis the vegetative cover, soil stability, and water conditions
appropriate to the approved subsequent use of the surface mine and to prevent
or mitigate future environmental degradation.

(12)
"Reclamation setbacks" include those lands along the margins of
surface mines wherein minerals and overburden shall be preserved in sufficient
volumes to accomplish reclamation according to the approved plan and the
minimum reclamation standards. Maintenance of reclamation setbacks may not
preclude other mine-related activities within the reclamation setback.

(13)
"Recycling" means the reuse of minerals or rock products.

(14)
"Screening" consists of vegetation, berms or other topography,
fencing, and/or other screens that may be required to mitigate impacts of
surface mining on adjacent properties and/or the environment.

(15)
"Segment" means any portion of the surface mine that, in the opinion
of the department:

(a)
Has characteristics of topography, drainage, slope stability, ownership, mining
development, or mineral distribution, that make reclamation necessary;

(b)
Is not in use as part of surface mining and/or related activities; and

(c)
Is larger than seven acres and has more than five hundred linear feet of
working face except as provided in a segmental reclamation agreement approved
by the department.

(16)
"SEPA" means the state environmental policy act, chapter 43.21C RCW
and rules adopted thereunder.

(17)(a)
"Surface mine" means any area or areas in close proximity to each
other, as determined by the department, where extraction of minerals results
in:

(i)
More than three acres of disturbed area;

(ii)
Surface mined slopes greater than thirty feet high and steeper than 1.0 foot
horizontal to 1.0 foot vertical; or

(iii)
More than one acre of disturbed area within an eight acre area, when the
disturbed area results from mineral prospecting or exploration activities.

(b)
Surface mines include areas where mineral extraction from the surface or
subsurface occurs by the auger method or by reworking mine refuse or tailings,
when the disturbed area exceeds the size or height thresholds listed in (a) of
this subsection.

(c)
Surface mining occurs when operations have created or are intended to create a
surface mine as defined by this subsection.

(d)
Surface mining shall exclude excavations or grading used:

(i)
Primarily for on-site construction, on-site road maintenance, or on-site
landfill construction;

(ii)
For the purpose of public safety or restoring the land following a natural
disaster;

(iii)
For the purpose of removing stockpiles;

(iv)
For forest or farm road construction or maintenance on site or on contiguous
lands;

(v)
Primarily for public works projects if the mines are owned or primarily
operated by counties with 1993 populations of less than twenty thousand
persons, and if each mine has less than seven acres of disturbed area; and

(vi)
For sand authorized by RCW ((43.51.685)) 79A.05.630.

(18)
"Topsoil" means the naturally occurring upper part of a soil profile,
including the soil horizon that is rich in humus and capable of supporting
vegetation together with other sediments within four vertical feet of the
ground surface.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.685 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.630 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
23. RCW
79.08.275 and 1996 c 129 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW ((43.51.1121 and 43.51.113)) 79A.05.120 and
79A.05.125, the portion of the Milwaukee Road corridor from the west end of
the bridge structure over the Columbia river, which point is located in section
34, township 16 north, range 23 east, W.M., to the Idaho border purchased by
the state shall be under the management and control of the department of
natural resources.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.1121 and 43.51.113
were recodified as RCW 79A.05.120 and 79A.05.125, respectively, pursuant to
1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
24. RCW
79.24.570 and 1969 ex.s. c 273 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

All
moneys received by the department of general administration from the management
of the east capitol site, excepting (1) funds otherwise dedicated prior to
April 28, 1967, (2) parking and rental charges and fines which are required to
be deposited in other accounts, and (3) reimbursements of service and other
utility charges made to the department of general administration, shall be
deposited in the capitol purchase and development account of the state general
fund ((or, in the event that revenue bonds are issued as authorized by RCW
79.24.630 through 79.24.647, into the state building bond redemption fund
pursuant to RCW 79.24.638)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 79.24.630 through
79.24.647 were repealed by 1994 c 219 s 21.

Sec.
25. RCW
79.71.090 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created the natural resources conservation areas stewardship account
in the state treasury to ensure proper and continuing management of land
acquired or designated pursuant to this chapter. Funds for the stewardship
account shall be derived from appropriations of state general funds, federal
funds, grants, donations, gifts, bond issue receipts, securities, and other
monetary instruments of value. Income derived from the management of natural
resources conservation areas shall also be deposited in this stewardship
account.

Appropriations
from this account to the department shall be expended for no other purpose than
the following: (1) To manage the areas approved by the legislature in
fulfilling the purposes of this chapter; (2) to manage property acquired as
natural area preserves under chapter 79.70 RCW; (3) to manage property
transferred under the authority and appropriation provided by the legislature
to be managed under chapter 79.70 RCW or this chapter or acquired under chapter
((43.98A)) 79A.15 RCW; and (4) to pay for operating expenses for
the natural heritage program under chapter 79.70 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter 43.98A RCW was
recodified as chapter 79A.15 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
26. RCW
79.71.100 and 1987 c 472 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby designates certain areas as natural resources conservation
areas:

(1)
The Mt. Si conservation area (King County), RCW ((43.51.940)) 79A.05.725,
is hereby designated the Mt. Si natural resources conservation area. The
department is directed to continue its management of this area and to develop a
plan for its continued conservation and use by the public. In accordance with
Article XVI of the Washington state Constitution, any available private lands
and trust lands located within the designated boundaries of the Mt. Si
conservation area shall be leased or acquired in fee from the appropriate trust
at fair market value using funds appropriated for that purpose.

(2)
Trust lands and state-owned land on Cypress Island (Skagit County) are hereby
designated as the Cypress Island natural resources conservation area. Any
available private lands necessary to achieve the purposes of this section shall
be acquired by the department of natural resources using funds appropriated for
that purpose. Trust lands located within the designated boundaries of the Cypress
Island natural resources conservation area shall be leased or acquired in fee
from the appropriate trust at fair market value.

(3)
Woodard Bay (Thurston County) is hereby designated the Woodard Bay natural
resources conservation area. The department is directed to acquire property
available in Sec. 18, T.19N, R1W using funds appropriated for that purpose.

(4)
The area adjacent to the Dishman Hills natural area (Spokane County) is hereby
designated the Dishman Hills natural resources conservation area. The
department is directed to acquire property available in Sec. 19, 29 and 30,
T.25N, R44E, using funds appropriated for that purpose.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.940 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.725 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
27. RCW
79.92.070 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 75 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the owner of any harbor area lease upon tidal waters shall desire to construct
thereon any wharf, dock, or other convenience of navigation or commerce, or to
extend, enlarge, or substantially improve any existing structure used in
connection with such harbor area, and shall deem the required expenditure not
warranted by his or her right to occupy such harbor area during the
remainder of the term of his or her lease, ((he)) the lease
owner may make application to the department of natural resources for a new
lease of such harbor area for a period not exceeding thirty years. Upon the
filing of such application accompanied by such proper plans, drawings or other
data, the department shall forthwith investigate the same and if it shall
determine that the proposed work or improvement is in the public interest and
reasonably adequate for the public needs, it shall by order fix the terms and
conditions and the rate of rental for such new lease, such rate of rental shall
be a fixed percentage, during the term of such lease, on the true and fair
value in money of such harbor area determined from time to time by the
department ((as provided in RCW 79.92.050)). The department may propose
modifications of the proposed wharf, dock, or other convenience or extensions,
enlargements, or improvements thereon. The department shall, within ninety
days from the filing of such application notify the applicant in writing of the
terms and conditions upon which such new lease will be granted, and of the
rental to be paid, and if the applicant shall within ninety days thereafter
elect to accept a new lease of such harbor area upon the terms and conditions,
and at the rental prescribed by the department, the department shall make a new
lease for such harbor area for the term applied for and the existing lease
shall thereupon be surrendered and canceled.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
79.92.050 was repealed by 1984 c 221 s 30, effective October 1, 1984.

Makes the section gender
neutral.

Sec.
28. RCW
79.92.080 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the expiration of any harbor area lease upon tidal waters hereafter expiring,
the owner thereof may apply for a re-lease of such harbor area for a period not
exceeding thirty years. Such application shall be accompanied with maps
showing the existing improvements upon such harbor area and the tidelands
adjacent thereto and with proper plans, drawings, and other data showing any
proposed extensions or improvements of existing structures. Upon the filing of
such application the department of natural resources shall forthwith
investigate the same and if it shall determine that the character of the
wharves, docks or other conveniences of commerce and navigation are reasonably
adequate for the public needs and in the public interest, it shall by order fix
and determine the terms and conditions upon which such re-lease shall be
granted and the rate of rental to be paid, which rate shall be a fixed
percentage during the term of such lease on the true and fair value in money of
such harbor area as determined from time to time by the department of natural
resources ((in accordance with RCW 79.92.050)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 79.92.050 was repealed by
1984 c 221 s 30, effective October 1, 1984.

Sec.
29. RCW
79.94.070 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
platting and appraisal of tidelands or shorelands of the first class as in this
chapter provided, if the department of natural resources shall deem it for the
best public interest to offer said tide or shore lands of the first class for
lease, the department shall cause a notice to be served upon the owner of record
of uplands fronting upon the tide or shore lands to be offered for lease if he or
she be a resident of the state, or if he or she be a nonresident of
the state, shall mail to his or her last known post office address, as
reflected in the county records, a copy of the notice notifying him or her
that the state is offering such tide or shore lands for lease, giving a
description of those lands and the department's appraised fair market value of
such tide or shore lands for lease, and notifying such owner that he or she
has a preference right to apply to lease said tide or shore lands at the
appraised value for the lease thereof for a period of sixty days from the date
of service of mailing of said notice. If at the expiration of sixty days from
the service or mailing of the notice, as above provided, there being no
conflicting applications filed, and the owner of the uplands fronting upon the
tide or shore lands offered for lease, has failed to avail himself or
herself of his or her preference right to apply to lease or to pay
to the department the appraised value for lease of the tide or shore lands
described in said notice, then in that event, said tide or shore lands may be
offered for lease to any person and may be leased in the manner provided for in
the case of lease of state lands.

If
at the expiration of sixty days two or more claimants asserting a preference
right to lease shall have filed applications to lease any tract, conflicting
with each other, the conflict between the claimants shall be equitably resolved
by the department of natural ((resource[s])) resources as the
best interests of the state require in accord with the procedures prescribed by
chapter 34.05 RCW: PROVIDED, That any contract purchaser of lands or rights
therein, which upland qualifies the owner for a preference right under this
section, shall have first priority for such preference right.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
the reference to the department of natural resources.

Makes the section gender
neutral.

Sec.
30. RCW
79.96.110 and 1994 c 264 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

In
case the director of fish and wildlife approves the vacation of the whole or
any part of said reserve, the department of natural resources may vacate and
offer for lease such parts or all of said reserve as it deems to be for the
best interest of the state, and all moneys received for the lease of such lands
shall be paid to the department of natural resources ((in accordance with
RCW 79.94.190)): PROVIDED, That nothing in RCW 79.96.090 through 79.96.110
shall be construed as authorizing the lease of any tidelands which have
heretofore, or which may hereafter, be set aside as state oyster reserves in
Eld Inlet, Hammersley Inlet, or Totten Inlet, situated in Mason or Thurston
counties: PROVIDED FURTHER, That any portion of Plat 138, Clifton's Oyster
Reserve, which has already been vacated, may be leased by the department.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 79.94.190 was repealed by
1984 c 221 s 30, effective October 1, 1984.

Sec.
31. RCW
79A.05.155 and 1982 c 156 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the commission determines it necessary, the applicant shall execute and file
with the secretary of state a bond payable to the state, in such penal sum as
the commission shall require, with good and sufficient sureties to be approved
by the commission, conditioned that the grantee of the permit will make the
improvement in accordance with the plans and specifications contained in the
permit, and, in case the improvement is made upon lands withdrawn from sale
under the provisions of RCW ((43.51.100)) 79A.05.105, will pay
into the state treasury to the credit of the fund to which the proceeds of the
sale of such lands would belong, the appraised value of all merchantable timber
and material on the land, destroyed, or used in making such improvement.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.100 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.105 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
32. RCW
79A.05.200 and 1967 ex.s. c 96 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
powers, functions, and duties heretofore exercised by the department of ((fisheries))
fish and wildlife, or its director, respecting the management, control,
and operation of the following enumerated tidelands, which are presently
suitable for public recreational use, are hereby transferred to the parks and
recreation commission which shall also have respecting such tidelands all the
powers conferred by this chapter ((43.51 RCW)), as now or
hereafter amended, respecting parks and parkways:

Parcel
No. 1. (Toandos Peninsula) The tidelands of the second class, owned by the
state of Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to, or abutting upon lots 1,
2, and 3, section 5, lots 1, 2, and 3, section 4, and lot 1, section 3, all in
township 25 north, range 1 west, W.M., with a frontage of 158.41 lineal chains,
more or less.

Parcel
No. 2. (Shine) The tidelands of the second class, owned by the state of
Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to, or abutting upon lots 1, 2, 3 and
that portion of lot 4 lying north of the south 8.35 chains thereof as measured
along the government meander line, all in section 35, township 28 north, range
1 east, W.M., with a frontage of 76.70 lineal chains, more or less.

Subject
to an easement for right of way for county road granted to Jefferson county
December 8, 1941 under application No. 1731, records of department of public
lands.

Parcel
No. 3. (Mud Bay - Lopez Island) The tidelands of the second class, owned by
the state of Washington situate in front of, adjacent to, or abutting upon lots
5, 6 and 7, section 18, lot 5, section 7 and lots 3, 4, and 5, section 8, all
in township 34 north, range 1 west, W.M., with a frontage of 172.11 lineal
chains, more or less.

Excepting,
however, any tideland of the second class in front of said lot 3, section 8
conveyed through deeds issued April 14, 1909 pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 24, Laws of 1895 under application No. 4985, records of department of
public lands.

Parcel
No. 4. (Spencer Spit) The tidelands of the second class, owned by the state of
Washington, situate in front of, adjacent to, or abutting upon lots 1, 3, and
4, section 7, and lot 5, section 18 all in township 35 north, range 1 west,
W.M., with a frontage of 118.80 lineal chains, more or less.

Parcel
No. 5. (Lilliwaup) The tidelands of the second class, owned by the state of
Washington, lying easterly of the east line of vacated state oyster reserve
plat No. 133 produced southerly and situate in front of, adjacent to or
abutting upon lot 9, section 30, lot 8, section 19 and lot 5 and the south 20
acres of lot 4, section 20, all in township 23 north, range 3 west, W.M., with
a frontage of 62.46 lineal chains, more or less.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
Powers, duties, and functions of the department of fisheries and the department
of wildlife were transferred to the department of fish and wildlife by 1993
sp.s. c 2, effective July 1, 1994.

(2) Chapter 43.51 RCW was
repealed and/or recodified in its entirety pursuant to 1999 c 249. The
remaining sections were recodified in chapter 79A.05 RCW.

Sec.
33. RCW
79A.05.205 and 1967 ex.s. c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state parks and recreation commission may take appropriate action to provide
public and private access, including roads and docks, to and from the tidelands
described in RCW ((43.51.240)) 79A.05.200.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.240 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.200 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
34. RCW
79A.05.250 and 1982 c 11 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may adopt such rules as are necessary to implement and enforce RCW
((43.51.290 through 43.51.320)) 79A.05.225 through 79A.05.240 and
46.61.585 after consultation with the winter recreation advisory committee.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.290 through
43.51.320 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.225 through 79A.05.240 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
35. RCW
79A.05.255 and 1994 c 264 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created a winter recreation advisory committee to advise the parks and
recreation commission in the administration of this chapter and to assist and
advise the commission in the development of winter recreation facilities and
programs.

(2)
The committee shall consist of:

(a)
Six representatives of the nonsnowmobiling winter recreation public appointed
by the commission, including a resident of each of the six geographical areas
of this state where nonsnowmobiling winter recreation activity occurs, as
defined by the commission.

(b)
Three representatives of the snowmobiling public appointed by the commission.

(c)
One representative of the department of natural resources, one representative
of the department of fish and wildlife, and one representative of the
Washington state association of counties, each of whom shall be appointed by
the director of the particular department or association.

(3)
The terms of the members appointed under subsection (2) (a) and (b) of this
section shall begin on October 1st of the year of appointment and shall be for
three years or until a successor is appointed, except in the case of
appointments to fill vacancies for the remainder of the unexpired term:
PROVIDED, That the first of these members shall be appointed for terms as
follows: Three members shall be appointed for one year, three members shall be
appointed for two years, and three members shall be appointed for three years.

(4)
Members of the committee shall be reimbursed from the winter recreational
program account created by RCW ((43.51.310)) 79A.05.235 for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
The committee shall meet at times and places it determines not less than twice
each year and additionally as required by the committee chairman or by majority
vote of the committee. The chairman of the committee shall be chosen under
procedures adopted by the committee. The committee shall adopt any other procedures
necessary to govern its proceedings.

(6)
The director of parks and recreation or the director's designee shall serve as
secretary to the committee and shall be a nonvoting member.

(7)
The winter recreation advisory committee and its powers and duties shall
terminate on June 30, 2001.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.310 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.235 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
36. RCW
79A.05.265 and 1977 ex.s. c 281 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that there is a need for hostels in the state for the safety
and welfare of transient persons with limited resources. It is the intent of
RCW ((43.51.360 through 43.51.370)) 79A.05.265 through 79A.05.275
that such facilities be established using locally donated structures. It is
the further intent of RCW ((43.51.360 through 43.51.370)) 79A.05.265
through 79A.05.275 that the state dispense any available federal or other
moneys for such related projects and provide assistance where possible.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.360 through
43.51.370 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.265 through 79A.05.275 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
37. RCW
79A.05.300 and 1980 c 89 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the reasons specified in RCW ((43.51.380)) 79A.25.250, the state
parks and recreation commission shall place a high priority on the
establishment of urban area state parks and shall revise its plan for future
state parks to achieve this priority. This section shall be implemented by
January 1, 1981.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.380 was recodified
as RCW 79A.25.250 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
38. RCW
79A.05.315 and 1996 c 129 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW ((43.51.1121 and 43.51.113)) 79A.05.120 and
79A.05.125, management control of the portion of the Milwaukee Road
corridor, beginning at the western terminus near Easton and concluding at the
west end of the bridge structure over the Columbia river, which point is
located in section 34, township 16 north, range 23 east, W.M., inclusive of the
northerly spur line therefrom, shall be transferred by the department of
natural resources to the state parks and recreation commission at no cost to
the commission.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.1121 and 43.51.113
were recodified as RCW 79A.05.120 and 79A.05.125 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
39. RCW
79A.05.320 and 1987 c 438 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state parks and recreation commission shall do the following with respect to
the portion of the Milwaukee Road corridor under its control:

(1)
Manage the corridor as a recreational trail except when closed under RCW ((43.51.409))
79A.05.325;

(2)
Close the corridor to hunting;

(3)
Close the corridor to all motorized vehicles except: (a) Emergency or law
enforcement vehicles; (b) vehicles necessary for access to utility lines; and
(c) vehicles necessary for maintenance of the corridor, or construction of the
trail;

(4)
Comply with legally enforceable conditions contained in the deeds for the
corridor;

(5)
Control weeds under the applicable provisions of chapters 17.04, 17.06, and
17.10 RCW; and

(6)
Clean and maintain culverts.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.409 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.325 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
40. RCW
79A.05.405 and 1993 c 182 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
water trail program account is created in the state treasury. All receipts
from sales of materials pursuant to RCW ((43.51.442)) 79A.05.385,
from state-wide water trail permit fees collected pursuant to RCW ((43.51.448))
79A.05.400, and all monetary civil penalties collected pursuant to RCW
((43.51.454)) 79A.05.415 shall be deposited in the water trail
program account. Any gifts, grants, donations, or moneys from any source
received by the commission for the water trail program shall also be deposited
in the water trail program account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation to the commission, and may be used solely for water trail
program purposes, including: (1) Administration, acquisition, development,
operation, planning, and maintenance of water trail lands and facilities, and
grants or contracts therefor; and (2) the development and implementation of
water trail informational, safety, enforcement, and education programs, and
grants or contracts therefor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
43.51.442, 43.52 448, and 43.51.454 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.385,
79A.05.400, and 79A.05.415, respectively, pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
41. RCW
79A.05.420 and 1994 c 264 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created a water trail advisory committee to advise the parks and
recreation commission in the administration of RCW ((43.51.440 through
43.51.454)) 79A.05.380 through 79A.05.415 and to assist and advise
the commission in the development of water trail facilities and programs.

(2)
The advisory committee shall consist of twelve members, who shall be appointed
as follows:

(a)
Five public members representing recreational water trail users, to be
appointed by the commission;

(b)
Two public members representing commercial sectors with an interest in the
water trail system, to be appointed by the commission;

(c)
One representative each from the department of natural resources, the
department of fish and wildlife, the Washington state association of counties,
and the association of Washington cities, to be appointed by the director of
the agency or association. The director of the Washington state parks and
recreation commission or the director's designee shall serve as secretary to
the committee and shall be a nonvoting member.

(3)
Except as provided in this section, the terms of the public members appointed
by the commission shall begin on January 1st of the year of appointment and
shall be for three years or until a successor is appointed, except in the case
of appointments to fill vacancies for the remainder of an unexpired term. In
making the initial appointments to the advisory committee, the commission shall
appoint two public members to serve one year, two public members to serve for
two years, and three public members to serve for three years. Public members
of the advisory committee may be reimbursed from the water trail program
account for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
The committee shall select a chair and adopt rules necessary to govern its
proceedings. The committee shall meet at the times and places it determines,
not less than twice a year, and additionally as required by the committee chair
or by majority vote of the committee.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.440 through
43.51.454 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.380 through 79A.05.415 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
42. RCW
79A.05.500 and 1969 ex.s. c 96 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of RCW ((43.51.500 through 43.51.570)) 79A.05.500 through
79A.05.530 is to provide: (1) The opportunity for healthful employment of
youths in programs of conservation, developing, improving, and maintaining
natural and artificial recreational areas for the welfare of the general
public; (2) the opportunity for our youths to learn vocational and work skills,
develop good work habits and a sense of responsibility and contribution to
society, improvement in personal physical and moral well being, and an
understanding and appreciation of nature.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.500 through
43.51.570 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.500 through 79A.05.530 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601, except for RCW 43.51.545 which was repealed by 1999 c 249 s 1701.

Sec.
43. RCW
79A.05.520 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.550 are each amended to read as follows:

Existing
provisions of law with respect to hours of work, rate of compensation, sick
leave, vacation, civil service and unemployment compensation shall not be
applicable to enrollees or temporary employees working under the provisions of
RCW ((43.51.500 through 43.51.570)) 79A.05.500 through 79A.05.530.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.500 through
43.51.570 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.500 through 79A.05.530 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601, except for RCW 43.51.545 which was repealed by 1999 c 249 s 1701.

Sec.
44. RCW
79A.05.535 and 1965 ex.s. c 48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state parks and recreation commission is authorized to enter into agreements
with and accept grants from the federal government for the support of any
program within the purposes of RCW ((43.51.500 through 43.51.570)) 79A.05.500
through 79A.05.530.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.500 through
43.51.570 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.500 through 79A.05.530 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601, except for RCW 43.51.545 which was repealed by 1999 c 249 s 1701.

Sec.
45. RCW
79A.05.540 and 1965 ex.s. c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW ((43.51.530 and 43.51.540)) 79A.05.510 and
79A.05.515, the commission may determine the length of enrollment and the
compensation of enrollees in accordance with the standards of any federal act
or regulation under which an agreement is made with, or a grant is received
from the federal government pursuant to RCW ((43.51.580)) 79A.05.535.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.530, 43.51.540, and
43.51.580 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.510, 79A.05.515, and 79A.05.535,
respectively, pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
46. RCW
79A.05.610 and 1969 ex.s. c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685)) 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.630, the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area shall
be under the jurisdiction of the Washington state parks and recreation
commission, which shall administer RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685)) 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.630 in accordance with the powers granted it herein and
under the appropriate provisions of this chapter ((43.51 RCW)).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
RCW 43.51.650 through 43.51.685 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.600 through
79A.05.630 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

(2) Chapter 43.51 RCW was
repealed and/or recodified in its entirety by 1999 c 249. The remaining
sections were recodified in chapter 79A.05 RCW.

Sec.
47. RCW
79A.05.615 and 1969 ex.s. c 55 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state parks and recreation commission shall administer the
Washington State Seashore Conservation Area in harmony with the broad
principles set forth in RCW ((43.51.650)) 79A.05.600. Where
feasible, the area shall be preserved in its present state; everywhere it shall
be maintained in the best possible condition for public use. All forms of
public outdoor recreation shall be permitted and encouraged in the area, unless
specifically excluded or limited by the commission. While the primary purpose
in the establishment of the area is to preserve the coastal beaches for public
recreation, other uses shall be allowed as provided in RCW ((43.51.650
through 43.51.685)) 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630, or when found not
inconsistent with public recreational use by the Washington state parks and
recreation commission.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
RCW 43.51.650 was recodified as RCW 79A.05.600 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

(2) RCW 43.51.650 through
43.51.685 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
48. RCW
79A.05.620 and 1969 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In
administering the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area, the Washington
state parks and recreation commission shall seek the cooperation and assistance
of federal agencies, other state agencies, and local political subdivisions.
All state agencies, and the governing officials of each local subdivision shall
cooperate with the commission in carrying out its duties. Except as otherwise
provided in RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685)) 79A.05.600 through
79A.05.630, and notwithstanding any other provision of law, other state
agencies and local subdivisions shall perform duties in the Washington State
Seashore Conservation Area which are within their normal jurisdiction, except
when such performance clearly conflicts with the purposes of RCW ((43.51.650
through 43.51.685)) 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.650 through
43.51.685 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
49. RCW
79A.05.625 and 1994 c 264 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685)) 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630
and ((43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695
shall be construed to interfere with the powers, duties and authority of the
department of fish and wildlife to regulate the conservation or taking of food
fish and shellfish. Nor shall anything in RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685))
79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630 and ((43.51.695 through 43.51.765))
79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695 be construed to interfere with the powers,
duties and authority of the department of fish and wildlife to regulate,
manage, conserve, and provide for the harvest of wildlife within such area:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no hunting shall be permitted in any state park.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.650 through
43.51.685 and 43.51.695 through 43.51.765 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.630 and 79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s
1601.

Sec.
50. RCW
79A.05.630 and 1997 c 137 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Lands
within the Seashore Conservation Area shall not be sold, leased, or otherwise
disposed of, except as herein provided. The commission may, under authority
granted in RCW ((43.51.210 and 43.51.215)) 79A.05.175 and 79A.05.180,
exchange state park lands in the Seashore Conservation Area for lands of equal
value to be managed by the commission consistent with this chapter. Only state
park lands lying east of the Seashore Conservation Line, as it is located at
the time of exchange, may be so exchanged. The department of natural resources
may lease the lands within the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area as
well as the accreted lands along the ocean in state ownership for the
exploration and production of oil and gas: PROVIDED, That oil drilling rigs
and equipment will not be placed on the Seashore Conservation Area or
state-owned accreted lands.

Sale
of sand from accretions shall be made to supply the needs of cranberry growers
for cranberry bogs in the vicinity and shall not be prohibited if found by the
commission to be reasonable, and not generally harmful or destructive to the
character of the land: PROVIDED, That the commission may grant leases and
permits for the removal of sands for construction purposes from any lands
within the Seashore Conservation Area if found by the commission to be
reasonable and not generally harmful or destructive to the character of the
land: PROVIDED FURTHER, That net income from such leases shall be deposited in
the state parks renewal and stewardship account.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.210 and 43.51.215
were recodified as RCW 79A.05.175 and 79A.05.180 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
51. RCW
79A.05.635 and 1988 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
cooperative program to provide recreation management plans for the ocean
beaches that comprise the Seashore Conservation Area established by RCW ((43.51.655))
79A.05.605 is created.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.655 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.605 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
52. RCW
79A.05.640 and 1988 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
to RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685 and 43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.695.

(1)
"Local government" means a county, city, or town.

(2)
"Ocean beaches" include the three ocean beaches described in RCW ((43.51.655))
79A.05.605.

(3)
"Pedestrian use" means any use that does not involve a motorized
vehicle.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
RCW 43.51.650 through 43.51.685 and 43.51.695 through 43.51.765 were recodified
as RCW 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630 and 79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695 pursuant
to 1999 c 249 s 1601. These citations have been combined to accurately reflect
those sections that relate to the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area,
RCW 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.695.

(2) RCW 43.51.655 was
recodified as RCW 79A.05.605 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
53. RCW
79A.05.645 and 1988 c 75 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
governments having a portion of the Seashore Conservation Area within their
boundaries may, individually or through an agreement with other local
governments located on the same ocean beach, adopt a recreation management plan
which meets the requirements of RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685 and
43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.695 for that
portion of the ocean beach. The legislature hereby encourages adoption of a
single plan for each beach.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.650 through
43.51.685 and 43.51.695 through 43.51.765 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.630 and 79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s
1601. These citations have been combined to accurately reflect those sections
that relate to the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area, RCW 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.695.

Sec.
54. RCW
79A.05.650 and 1988 c 75 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW ((43.51.715 and 43.51.720)) 79A.05.655 and
79A.05.660, a total of forty percent of the length of the beach subject to
the recreation management plan shall be reserved for pedestrian use under this
section and RCW ((43.51.725)) 79A.05.665. Restrictions on
motorized traffic under this section shall be from April 15th to the day
following Labor day of each year. Local jurisdictions may adopt provisions
within recreation management plans that exceed the requirements of this
section. The commission shall not require that a plan designate for pedestrian
use more than forty percent of the land subject to the plan.

(2)
In designating areas to be reserved for pedestrian use, the plan shall consider
the following:

(a)
Public safety;

(b)
State-wide interest in recreational use of the ocean beaches;

(c)
Protection of shorebird and marine mammal habitats;

(d)
Preservation of native beach vegetation;

(e)
Protection of sand dune topography;

(f)
Prudent management of clam beds;

(g)
Economic impacts to the local community; and

(h)
Public access and parking availability.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
43.51.715, 43.51.720, and 43.51.725 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.655,
79A.05.660, and 79A.05.665 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Also puts the date reference
in standard drafting style.

Sec.
55. RCW
79A.05.655 and 1988 c 75 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
RCW ((43.51.710(1))) 79A.05.650(1), recreation management plans
may make provision for vehicular traffic on areas otherwise reserved for
pedestrian use in order to:

(1)
Facilitate clam digging;

(2)
Accommodate organized recreational events of not more than seven consecutive
days duration;

(3)
Provide for removal of wood debris under RCW 4.24.210 and ((43.51.045(5)))
79A.05.035(5); and

(4)
Accommodate removal of sand located upland from the Seashore Conservation Area
or removal of sand within the Seashore Conservation Area under the terms of a
covenant, easement, or deed.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.710 and 43.51.045
were recodified as RCW 79A.05.650 and 79A.05.035 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
56. RCW
79A.05.665 and 1988 c 75 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Recreation
management plans shall, upon request of the commission, reserve on a permanent,
seasonal, or temporary basis, land adjoining national wildlife refuges and
state parks for pedestrian use. After a plan is approved, the commission may
require local jurisdictions to adopt amendments to the plan governing driving
on land adjoining wildlife refuges and state parks. Land reserved for
pedestrian use under this section for at least the period from April 15th
through the day following Labor Day of each year shall be included when
determining compliance with the requirements of RCW ((43.51.710)) 79A.05.650.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.710 was recodified
as RCW 79A.05.650 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
57. RCW
79A.05.685 and 1988 c 75 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Recreation
management plans shall be adopted by each participating jurisdiction and
submitted to the commission by September 1, 1989. The commission shall approve
the proposed plan if, in the commission's judgment, the plan adequately
fulfills the requirements of RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685 and 43.51.695
through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.695.

If
the proposed plan is not approved, the commission shall suggest modifications
to the participating local governments. Local governments shall have ninety
days after receiving the suggested modifications to resubmit a recreation
management plan. Thereafter, if the commission finds that a plan does not
adequately fulfill the requirements of RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685 and
43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.695, the
commission may amend the proposal or adopt an alternative plan.

If
a plan for all or any portion of the Seashore Conservation Area is not
submitted in accordance with RCW ((43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.635
through 79A.05.695, the commission shall adopt a recreation management plan
for that site.

Administrative
rules adopted by the commission under RCW 43.51.680 shall remain in effect for
all or any portion of each ocean beach until a recreation management plan for
that site is adopted or approved by the commission.

The
commission shall not adopt a recreation management plan for all or any portion
of an ocean beach while appeal of a commission decision regarding that site is
pending.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.650 through
43.51.685 and 43.51.695 through 43.51.765 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.630 and 79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s
1601. The references to RCW 79A.05.600 through 79A.05.630 and 79A.05.635 through
79A.05.695 have been combined to accurately reflect those sections that relate
to the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area, RCW 79A.05.600 through
79A.05.695.

Sec.
58. RCW
79A.05.693 and 1988 c 75 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The
ocean beaches within the Seashore Conservation Area are hereby declared a
public highway and shall remain forever open to the use of the public as
provided in RCW ((43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.635 through
79A.05.695.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.695 through
43.51.765 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
59. RCW
79A.05.695 and 1988 c 75 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Amendments
to the recreation management plan may be adopted jointly by each local
government participating in the plan and submitted to the commission for
approval. The commission shall approve a proposed amendment if, in the
commission's judgment, the amendment adequately fulfills the requirements of
RCW ((43.51.650 through 43.51.685 and 43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.695.

After
a plan is approved, the commission may require local jurisdictions to adopt
amendments to the plan if the commission finds that such amendments are
necessary to protect public health and safety, or to protect significant
natural resources as determined by the agency having jurisdiction over the
resource.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.650 through
43.51.685 and 43.51.695 through 43.51.765 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.630 and 79A.05.635 through 79A.05.695 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s
1601. These citations have been combined to accurately reflect those sections
that relate to the Washington State Seashore Conservation Area, RCW 79A.05.600
through 79A.05.695.

Sec.
60. RCW
79A.05.735 and 1994 c 264 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state department of natural resources and the state parks and recreation commission
have joined together in excellent cooperation in the conducting of this study
along with the citizen advisory subcommittee and have joined together in
cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife to accomplish other
projects of multidisciplinary concern, and because it may be in the best
interests of the state to continue such cooperation, the state parks and
recreation commission, the department of natural resources, and the department
of fish and wildlife are hereby directed to consider both short and long term
objectives, the expertise of each agency's staff, and alternatives such as
reasonably may be expected to safeguard the conservation area's values as
described in RCW ((43.51.940)) 79A.05.725 giving due regard to
efficiency and economy of management: PROVIDED, That the interests conveyed to
or by the state agencies identified in this section shall be managed by the
department of natural resources until such time as the state parks and recreation
commission or other public agency is managing public recreation areas and
facilities located in such close proximity to the conservation area described
in RCW ((43.51.942)) 79A.05.730 so as to make combined management
of those areas and facilities and transfer of management of the conservation
area more efficient and economical than continued management by the department
of natural resources. At that time the department of natural resources is
directed to negotiate with the appropriate public agency for the transfer of
those management responsibilities for the interests obtained within the
conservation area under RCW ((43.51.940 through 43.51.945)) 79A.05.725
through 79A.05.745: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state agencies identified
in this section may, by mutual agreement, undertake management of portions of
the conservation area as they may from time to time determine in accordance
with those rules and regulations established for natural area preserves under
chapter 79.70 RCW, for natural and conservation areas under present WAC
352-16-020(3) and (6), and under chapter 77.12 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
RCW 43.51.940 and 43.51.942 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.725 and 79A.05.730
pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

(2) RCW 43.51.940 through
43.51.945 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.725 through 79A.05.745 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
61. RCW
79A.05.750 and 1977 ex.s. c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of RCW ((43.51.946 through 43.51.956)) 79A.05.750
through 79A.05.795 to establish and recognize the Yakima river corridor
from Selah Gap (Yakima Ridge) to Union Gap (Rattlesnake Hills) as a uniquely
valuable recreation, conservation, and scenic resource in the state of
Washington.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.946 through
43.51.956 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.750 through 79A.05.795 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
62. RCW
79A.05.765 and 1977 ex.s. c 75 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Yakima county commissioners are authorized to coordinate the acquisition,
development, and operation of the Yakima river conservation area in accordance
with the purposes of RCW ((43.51.946 through 43.51.956)) 79A.05.750
through 79A.05.795 and in cooperation with public parks, conservation and
resource managing agencies.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.946 through
43.51.956 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.750 through 79A.05.795 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
63. RCW
79A.05.780 and 1977 ex.s. c 75 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state parks and recreation commission is directed to consult with
the Yakima county commissioners in the acquisition, development, and operation
of the Yakima river conservation area in accordance with the purposes of RCW ((43.51.946
through 43.51.956)) 79A.05.750 through 79A.05.795 and the Yakima
river study authorized in section 170, chapter 269, Laws of 1975, first
extraordinary session.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.946 through
43.51.956 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.750 through 79A.05.795 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
64. RCW
79A.05.793 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in RCW ((43.51.946 through 43.51.956)) 79A.05.750 through 79A.05.795
shall be construed to interfere with the powers, duties, and authority of the
state department of fish and wildlife or the state fish and wildlife commission
to regulate, manage, conserve, and provide for the harvest of wildlife within
such area: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no hunting shall be permitted in any state
park.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
43.51.946 through 43.51.956 were recodified as RCW 79A.05.750 through
79A.05.795 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
65. RCW
79A.15.020 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 14 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
habitat conservation account is established in the state treasury. The
committee shall administer the account in accordance with chapter ((43.99))
79A.25 RCW and this chapter, and shall hold it separate and apart from
all other money, funds, and accounts of the committee.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter 43.99 RCW was
recodified as chapter 79A.25 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
66. RCW
79A.15.030 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter shall be divided equally between the
habitat conservation and outdoor recreation accounts and shall be used
exclusively for the purposes specified in this chapter.

(2)
Moneys deposited in these accounts shall be invested as authorized for other
state funds, and any earnings on them shall be credited to the respective
account.

(3)
All moneys deposited in the habitat conservation and outdoor recreation
accounts shall be allocated under RCW ((43.98A.040 and 43.98A.050)) 79A.15.040
and 79A.15.050 as grants to state or local agencies for acquisition,
development, and renovation within the jurisdiction of those agencies, subject
to legislative appropriation. The committee may use or permit the use of any
funds appropriated for this chapter as matching funds where federal, local, or
other funds are made available for projects within the purposes of this
chapter.

(4)
Projects receiving grants under this chapter that are developed or otherwise
accessible for public recreational uses shall be available to the public on a
nondiscriminatory basis.

(5)
The committee may make grants to an eligible project from both the habitat
conservation and outdoor recreation accounts and any one or more of the
applicable categories under such accounts described in RCW ((43.98A.040 and
43.98A.050)) 79A.15.040 and 79A.15.050.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.98A.040 and 43.98A.050
were recodified as RCW 79A.15.040 and 79A.15.050 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
67. RCW
79A.15.060 and 1999 c 379 s 918 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and priorities
for distributions from the habitat conservation account.

(2)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
additional staff positions or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional,
or local agency to fund operation and maintenance of areas acquired under this
chapter, except that the committee may use moneys appropriated for this chapter
for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2001, for the administrative costs of
implementing the pilot watershed plan implementation program established in
section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and developing an inventory of publicly
owned lands established in section 329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997.

(3)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used for costs incidental to
acquisition, including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.

(4)
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the committee may not
approve a local project where the local agency share is less than the amount to
be awarded from the habitat conservation account.

(5)
During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2001, the committee may approve a
riparian zone habitat protection project established in section 329(6), chapter
235, Laws of 1997, where the local agency share is less than the amount to be
awarded from the habitat conservation account.

(6)
In determining acquisition priorities with respect to the habitat conservation
account, the committee shall consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(a)
For critical habitat and natural areas proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iii)
Uniqueness of the site;

(iv)
Diversity of species using the site;

(v)
Quality of the habitat;

(vi)
Long-term viability of the site;

(vii)
Presence of endangered, threatened, or sensitive species;

(viii)
Enhancement of existing public property;

(ix)
Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or state-wide
recreational or resource plan; and

(x)
Educational and scientific value of the site.

(b)
For urban wildlife habitat proposals, in addition to the criteria of (a) of
this subsection:

(i)
Population of, and distance from, the nearest urban area;

(ii)
Proximity to other wildlife habitat;

(iii)
Potential for public use; and

(iv)
Potential for use by special needs populations.

(7)
Before October 1st of each even-numbered year, the committee shall recommend to
the governor a prioritized list of state agency projects to be funded under RCW
((43.98A.040)) 79A.15.040(1) (a), (b), and (c). The governor may
remove projects from the list recommended by the committee and shall submit
this amended list in the capital budget request to the legislature. The list
shall include, but not be limited to, a description of each project; and shall
describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational
activities allowed prior to the project.

(8)
Before October 1st of each year, the committee shall recommend to the governor
a prioritized list of all local projects to be funded under RCW ((43.98A.040))
79A.15.040(1)(c). The governor may remove projects from the list
recommended by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital
budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited
to, a description of each project and any particular match requirement, and
describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational
activities allowed prior to the project.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.98A.040 was recodified
as RCW 79A.15.040 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
68. RCW
79A.15.070 and 1999 c 379 s 919 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In determining which state parks proposals and local parks proposals to fund,
the committee shall use existing policies and priorities.

(2)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
additional staff or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local
agency to fund operation and maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter,
except that the committee may use moneys appropriated for this chapter for the
fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2001, for the administrative costs of
implementing the pilot watershed plan implementation program established in
section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and developing an inventory of
publicly owned lands established in section 329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997.

(3)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used for costs incidental to
acquisition, including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.

(4)
The committee may not approve a project of a local agency where the share
contributed by the local agency is less than the amount to be awarded from the
outdoor recreation account.

(5)
The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and priorities
for the acquisition and development of trails and water access sites to be
financed from moneys in the outdoor recreation account.

(6)
In determining the acquisition and development priorities, the committee shall
consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(a)
For trails proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iii)
Linkage between communities;

(iv)
Linkage between trails;

(v)
Existing or potential usage;

(vi)
Consistency with an existing local land use plan or a regional or state-wide
recreational or resource plan;

(vii)
Availability of water access or views;

(viii)
Enhancement of wildlife habitat; and

(ix)
Scenic values of the site.

(b)
For water access proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Distance from similar water access opportunities;

(iii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iv)
Diversity of possible recreational uses; and

(v)
Public demand in the area.

(7)
Before October 1st of each even-numbered year, the committee shall recommend to
the governor a prioritized list of state agency projects to be funded under RCW
((43.98A.050)) 79A.15.050(1) (a), (c), and (d). The governor may
remove projects from the list recommended by the committee and shall submit
this amended list in the capital budget request to the legislature. The list
shall include, but not be limited to, a description of each project; and shall
describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational
activities allowed prior to the project.

(8)
Before October 1st of each year, the committee shall recommend to the governor
a prioritized list of all local projects to be funded under RCW ((43.98A.050))
79A.15.050(1) (b), (c), and (d) of this act. The governor may remove
projects from the list recommended by the committee and shall submit this
amended list in the capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall
include, but not be limited to, a description of each project and any
particular match requirement, and describe for each project any anticipated
restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the project.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.98A.050 was recodified
as RCW 79A.15.050 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
69. RCW
79A.25.020 and 1989 c 237 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)
To supervise the administrative operations of the committee and its staff;

(2)
To administer recreation grant-in-aid programs and provide technical assistance
to state and local agencies;

(3)
To prepare and update a strategic plan for the acquisition, renovation, and
development of recreational resources and the preservation and conservation of
open space. The plan shall be prepared in coordination with the office of the
governor and the office of financial management, with participation of federal,
state, and local agencies having recreational responsibilities, user groups,
private sector interests, and the general public. The plan shall be submitted
to the committee for review, and the committee shall submit its recommendations
on the plan to the governor. The plan shall include, but is not limited to:
(a) an inventory of current resources; (b) a forecast of recreational resource
demand; (c) identification and analysis of actual and potential funding
sources; (d) a process for broad scale information gathering; (e) an assessment
of the capabilities and constraints, both internal and external to state
government, that affect the ability of the state to achieve the goals of the
plan; (f) an analysis of strategic options and decisions available to the
state; (g) an implementation strategy that is coordinated with executive policy
and budget priorities; and (h) elements necessary to qualify for participation
in or the receipt of aid from any federal program for outdoor recreation;

(4)
To represent and promote the interests of the state on recreational issues and
further the mission of the committee;

(5)
Upon approval of the committee, to enter into contracts and agreements with
private nonprofit corporations to further state goals of preserving,
conserving, and enhancing recreational resources and open space for the public
benefit and use;

(6)
To appoint such technical and other committees as may be necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;

(7)
To create and maintain a repository for data, studies, research, and other
information relating to recreation in the state, and to encourage the
interchange of such information;

(8)
To encourage and provide opportunities for interagency and regional
coordination and cooperative efforts between public agencies and between public
and private entities involved in the development and preservation of
recreational resources; and

(9)
To prepare the state trails plan, as required by RCW ((67.32.050)) 79A.35.040.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 67.32.050 was recodified
as RCW 79A.35.040 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
70. RCW
79A.25.030 and 1995 c 166 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

From
time to time, but at least once each four years, the director of licensing
shall determine the amount or proportion of moneys paid to him or her as
motor vehicle fuel tax which is tax on marine fuel. The director shall make or
authorize the making of studies, surveys, or investigations to assist him or
her in making such determination, and shall hold one or more public
hearings on the findings of such studies, surveys, or investigations prior to
making his or her determination. The studies, surveys, or
investigations conducted pursuant to this section shall encompass a period of
twelve consecutive months each time. The final determination by the director
shall be implemented as of the next biennium after the period from which the
study data were collected. The director may delegate his or her duties
and authority under this section to one or more persons of the department of
licensing if he or she finds such delegation necessary and proper to the
efficient performance of these duties. Costs of carrying out the provisions of
this section shall be paid from the marine fuel tax refund account created in
RCW ((43.99.040)) 79A.25.040, upon legislative appropriation.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
43.99.040 was recodified as RCW 79A.25.040 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Also makes the section gender
neutral.

Sec.
71. RCW
79A.25.040 and 1995 c 166 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created the marine fuel tax refund account in the state treasury. The
director of licensing shall request the state treasurer to refund monthly from
the motor vehicle fund amounts which have been determined to be tax on marine
fuel. The state treasurer shall refund such amounts and place them in the
marine fuel tax refund account to be held for those entitled thereto pursuant
to chapter 82.36 RCW and RCW ((43.99.050)) 79A.25.050, except
that he or she shall not refund and place in the marine fuel tax refund
account for any period for which a determination has been made pursuant to RCW
((43.99.030)) 79A.25.030 more than the greater of the following
amounts: (1) An amount equal to two percent of all moneys paid to him or
her as motor vehicle fuel tax for such period, (2) an amount necessary to
meet all approved claims for refund of tax on marine fuel for such period.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
43.99.050 and 43.99.030 were recodified as RCW 79A.25.050 and 79A.25.030
pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Also makes the section gender
neutral.

Sec.
72. RCW
79A.25.060 and 1995 c 166 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
outdoor recreation account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account are subject to legislative appropriation. The committee shall
administer the account in accordance with chapter ((43.98A)) 79A.15
RCW and this chapter, and shall hold it separate and apart from all other
money, funds, and accounts of the committee.

Grants,
gifts, or other financial assistance, proceeds received from public bodies as
administrative cost contributions, and moneys made available to the state of
Washington by the federal government for outdoor recreation, may be deposited
into the account.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter 43.98A RCW was
recodified as chapter 79A.15 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
73. RCW
79A.25.070 and 1995 c 166 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming of refunds of tax
on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed to the right to such
refunds. The director of licensing, after taking into account past and
anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits to the marine fuel tax refund
account and the costs of carrying out the provisions of RCW ((43.99.030))
79A.25.030, shall request the state treasurer to transfer monthly from
the marine fuel tax refund account an amount equal to the proportion of the
moneys in the account representing the motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW
82.36.025 in effect on January 1, 1990, to the recreation resource account and
the remainder to the motor vehicle fund.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.99.030 was recodified
as RCW 79A.25.030 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
74. RCW
79A.25.080 and 1999 c 341 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Moneys
transferred to the recreation resource account from the marine fuel tax refund
account may be used when appropriated by the legislature, as well as any
federal or other funds now or hereafter available, to pay the necessary
administrative and coordinative costs of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation established by RCW ((43.99.110)) 79A.25.110. All
moneys so transferred, except those appropriated as aforesaid, shall be divided
into two equal shares and shall be used to benefit watercraft recreation in
this state as follows:

(1)
One share as grants to state agencies for (a) acquisition of title to, or any
interests or rights in, marine recreation land, (b) capital improvement and
renovation of marine recreation land, including periodic dredging in accordance
with subsection (3) of this section, if needed, to maintain or make the
facility more useful, or (c) matching funds in any case where federal or other
funds are made available on a matching basis for purposes described in (a) or
(b) of this subsection;

(2)
One share as grants to public bodies to help finance (a) acquisition of title
to, or any interests or rights in, marine recreation land, or (b) capital
improvement and renovation of marine recreation land, including periodic
dredging in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, if needed, to
maintain or make the facility more useful. A public body is authorized to use
a grant, together with its own contribution, as matching funds in any case
where federal or other funds are made available for purposes described in (a)
or (b) of this subsection. The committee may prescribe further terms and
conditions for the making of grants in order to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

(3)
For the purposes of this section "periodic dredging" is limited to
dredging of materials that have been deposited in a channel due to unforeseen
events. This dredging should extend the expected usefulness of the facility
for at least five years.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.99.110 was recodified
as RCW 79A.25.110 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
75. RCW
79A.25.100 and 1965 c 5 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Marine
recreation land with respect to which money has been expended under RCW ((43.99.080))
79A.25.080 shall not, without the approval of the committee, be
converted to uses other than those for which such expenditure was originally
approved. The committee shall only approve any such conversion upon conditions
which will assure the substitution of other marine recreation land of at least
equal fair market value at the time of conversion and of as nearly as feasible
equivalent usefulness and location.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.99.080 was recodified
as RCW 79A.25.080 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
76. RCW
79A.25.180 and 1989 c 237 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall periodically review and have updated the guide authorized by RCW
((43.99.142)) 79A.25.170.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.99.142 was recodified
as RCW 79A.25.170 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
77. RCW
79A.25.200 and 1995 c 166 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
recreation resource account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in this
account are subject to legislative appropriation. The committee shall
administer the account in accordance with this chapter and chapter ((67.32))
79A.35 RCW and shall hold it separate and apart from all other money,
funds, and accounts of the committee. Moneys received from the marine fuel tax
refund account under RCW ((43.99.070)) 79A.25.070 shall be
deposited into the account. Grants, gifts, or other financial assistance,
proceeds received from public bodies as administrative cost contributions, and
moneys made available to the state of Washington by the federal government for
outdoor recreation may be deposited into the account.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
Chapter 67.32 RCW was recodified as chapter 79A.35 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249 s
1601.

(2) RCW 43.99.070 was
recodified as RCW 79A.25.070 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
78. RCW
79A.25.240 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 13 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall provide necessary grants and
loan administration support to the salmon recovery funding board as provided in
RCW 75.46.160. The committee shall also be responsible for tracking salmon
recovery expenditures under RCW 75.46.180. The committee shall provide all
necessary administrative support to the board, and the board shall be located
with the committee. The committee shall ((coordinate its activities under
this section with the salmon recovery technical review team created in section
7 of this act and)) provide necessary information to the salmon recovery
office.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Section 7, chapter 13, Laws
of 1999 1st sp. sess. was vetoed by the governor.

Sec.
79. RCW
79A.25.250 and 1980 c 89 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Recognizing
the fact that the demand for park services is greatest in our urban areas, that
parks should be accessible to all Washington citizens, that the urban poor
cannot afford to travel to remotely located parks, that few state parks are
located in or near urban areas, that a need exists to conserve energy, and that
local governments having jurisdiction in urban areas cannot afford the costs of
maintaining and operating the extensive park systems needed to service their
large populations, the legislature hereby directs the interagency committee for
outdoor recreation to place a high priority on the acquisition, development,
redevelopment, and renovation of parks to be located in or near urban areas and
to be particularly accessible to and used by the populations of those areas.
For purposes of RCW ((43.51.380 and 43.51.385)) 79A.25.250 and
79A.05.300, "urban areas" means any incorporated city with
a population of five thousand persons or greater or any county with a
population density of two hundred fifty persons per square mile or greater.
This section shall be implemented by January 1, 1981.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.51.380 and 43.51.385
were recodified as RCW 79A.25.250 and 79A.05.300 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
80. RCW
79A.25.800 and 1998 c 264 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that coordinated funding efforts are needed to
maintain, develop, and improve the state's community outdoor athletic fields.
Rapid population growth and increased urbanization have caused a decline in
suitable outdoor fields for community athletic activities and has resulted in
overcrowding and deterioration of existing surfaces. Lack of adequate
community outdoor athletic fields directly affects the health and well-being of
all citizens of the state, reduces the state's economic viability, and prevents
Washington from maintaining and achieving the quality of life that it
deserves. Therefore, it is the policy of the state and its agencies to
maintain, develop, fund, and improve youth or community athletic facilities,
including but not limited to community outdoor athletic fields.

(2)
In carrying out this policy, the legislature intends to promote the building of
new community outdoor athletic fields, the upgrading of existing community
outdoor athletic fields, and the maintenance of existing community outdoor athletic
fields across the state of Washington. The purpose of RCW ((43.99.800
through 43.99.830)) 79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830 is to create an
advisory council to provide information and advice to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation in the distribution of the funds in the youth athletic
facility grant account established in RCW 43.99N.060(4).

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.99.800 through
43.99.830 were recodified as RCW 79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
81. RCW
79A.25.820 and 1998 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to available resources, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, in
consultation with the community outdoor athletic fields advisory council may:

(1)
Prepare and update a strategic plan for the development, maintenance, and
improvement of community outdoor athletic fields in the state. In the
preparation of such plan, the interagency committee for outdoor recreation may
use available data from federal, state, and local agencies having community
outdoor athletic responsibilities, user groups, private sector interests, and
the general public. The plan may include, but is not limited to:

(a)
An inventory of current community outdoor athletic fields;

(b)
A forecast of demand for these fields;

(c)
An identification and analysis of actual and potential funding sources; and

(d)
Other information the interagency committee for outdoor recreation deems
appropriate to carry out the purposes of RCW ((43.99.800 through 43.99.830))
79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830;

(2)
Determine the eligibility requirements for cities, counties, and qualified
nonprofit organizations to access funding from the youth athletic facility
grant account created in RCW 43.99N.060(4);

(3)
Encourage and provide opportunities for interagency and regional coordination
and cooperative efforts between public agencies and between public entities and
nonprofit organizations involved in the maintenance, development, and
improvement of community outdoor athletic fields; and

(4)
Create and maintain data, studies, research, and other information relating to
community outdoor athletic fields in the state, and to encourage the exchange
of this information.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.99.800 through 43.99.830
were recodified as RCW 79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s
1601.

Sec.
82. RCW
79A.25.830 and 1998 c 264 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
interagency committee for outdoor recreation may receive gifts, grants, or
endowments from public and private sources that are made from time to time, in
trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of RCW ((43.99.800
through 43.99.830)) 79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830 and spend gifts,
grants, or endowments or income from the public or private sources according to
their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or endowments violates
RCW 42.17.710.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 43.99.800 through
43.99.830 were recodified as RCW 79A.25.800 through 79A.25.830 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
83. RCW
79A.30.010 and 1995 c 200 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Authority" means the Washington state horse park authority
authorized to be created in RCW ((67.18.030)) 79A.30.030.

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state parks and recreation
commission.

(3)
"Horses" includes all domesticated members of the taxonomic family
Equidae, including but not limited to horses, donkeys, and mules.

(4)
"State horse park" means the Washington state horse park established
in RCW ((67.18.020)) 79A.30.020.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 67.18.030 and 67.18.020
were recodified as RCW 79A.30.030 and 79A.30.020, respectively, pursuant to
1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
84. RCW
79A.30.020 and 1995 c 200 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington state horse park is hereby established, to be located at a site
approved by the commission. In approving a site for the state horse park, the
commission shall consider areas with large blocks of land suitable for park
development, the distance to various population centers in the state, the ease
of transportation to the site for large vehicles traveling along either a
north-south or an east-west corridor, and other factors deemed important by the
commission.

(2)
Ownership of land for the state horse park shall be as follows:

(a)
The commission is vested with and shall retain ownership of land provided by
the state for the state horse park. Any lands acquired by the commission after
July 23, 1995, for the state horse park shall be purchased under chapter ((43.98A))
79A.15 RCW. The legislature encourages the commission to provide a
long-term lease of the selected property to the Washington state horse park
authority at a minimal charge. The lease shall contain provisions ensuring
public access to and use of the horse park facilities, and generally maximizing
public recreation opportunities at the horse park, provided that the facility
remains available primarily for horse-related activities.

(b)
Land provided for the state horse park by the county in which the park is
located shall remain in the ownership of that county unless the county
determines otherwise. The legislature encourages the county to provide a
long-term lease of selected property to the Washington state horse park
authority at a minimal charge.

(c)
If the authority acquires additional lands through donations, grants, or other
means, or with funds generated from the operation of the state horse park, the
authority shall retain ownership of those lands. The authority shall also
retain ownership of horse park site improvements paid for by or through
donations or gifts to the authority.

(3)
Development, promotion, operation, management, and maintenance of the state
horse park is the responsibility of the authority created in RCW ((67.18.030))
79A.30.030.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
Chapter 43.98A RCW was recodified as chapter 79A.15 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249
s 1601.

(2) RCW 67.18.030 was
recodified as RCW 79A.30.030 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
85. RCW
79A.30.030 and 1995 c 200 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A nonprofit corporation may be formed under the nonprofit corporation
provisions of chapter 24.03 RCW to carry out the purposes of this chapter.
Except as provided in RCW ((67.18.040)) 79A.30.040, the
corporation shall have all the powers and be subject to the same restrictions
as are permitted or prescribed to nonprofit corporations and shall exercise
those powers only for carrying out the purposes of this chapter and those
purposes necessarily implied therefrom. The nonprofit corporation shall be
known as the Washington state horse park authority. The articles of
incorporation shall provide that it is the responsibility of the authority to
develop, promote, operate, manage, and maintain the Washington state horse
park. The articles of incorporation shall provide for appointment of directors
and other conduct of business consistent with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)(a)
The articles of incorporation shall provide for a seven-member board of
directors for the authority, all appointed by the governor. Board members
shall serve three-year terms, except that two of the original appointees shall
serve one-year terms, and two of the original appointees shall serve two-year
terms. A board member may serve consecutive terms.

(b)
The articles of incorporation shall provide that the governor appoint board
members as follows:

(i)
One board member shall represent the interests of the commission. In making
this appointment, the governor shall solicit recommendations from the
commission;

(ii)
One board member shall represent the interests of the county in which the park
is located. In making this appointment, the governor shall solicit
recommendations from the county legislative authority; and

(iii)
Five board members shall represent the geographic and sports discipline
diversity of equestrian interests in the state, and at least one of these
members shall have business experience relevant to the organization of horse
shows or operation of a horse show facility. In making these appointments, the
governor shall solicit recommendations from a variety of active horse-related
organizations in the state.

(3)
The articles of incorporation shall include a policy that provides for the
preferential use of a specific area of the horse park facilities at nominal
cost for horse groups associated with youth groups and the disabled.

(4)
The governor shall make appointments to fill board vacancies for positions
authorized under subsection (2) of this section, upon additional solicitation
of recommendations from the board of directors.

(5)
The board of directors shall perform their duties in the best interests of the
authority, consistent with the standards applicable to directors of nonprofit
corporations under RCW 24.03.127.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 67.18.040 was recodified
as RCW 79A.30.040 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
86. RCW
79A.35.030 and 1970 ex.s. c 76 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The system shall be composed of trails as designated by the IAC. Such trails
shall meet the conditions established in this chapter and such supplementary
criteria as the IAC may prescribe.

(2)
The IAC shall establish a procedure whereby federal, state, and local
governmental agencies and/or public and private organizations may propose
trails for inclusion within the system. Such proposals will comply with the
proposal requirements contained in RCW ((67.32.060)) 79A.35.050.

(3)
In consultation with appropriate federal, state, and local governmental
agencies and public and private organizations, the IAC shall establish a
procedure for public review of the proposals considered appropriate for
inclusion in the state-wide trails system.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 67.32.060 was recodified
as RCW 79A.35.050 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
87. RCW
79A.40.020 and 1959 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful after June 10, 1959, to construct or install any such
recreational device as set forth in RCW ((70.88.010)) 79A.40.010
without first submitting plans and specifications for such device to the state
parks and recreation commission and receiving the approval of the commission
for such construction or installation. Violation of this section shall be a
misdemeanor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 70.88.010 was recodified
as RCW 79A.40.010 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
88. RCW
79A.40.030 and 1959 c 327 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state parks and recreation commission shall have the authority and the
responsibility for the inspection of the devices set forth in RCW ((70.88.010))
79A.40.010 and in addition shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)
Whenever the commission, after hearing called upon its own motion or upon
complaint, finds that additional apparatus, equipment, facilities or devices
for use or in connection with the transportation or conveyance of persons upon
the devices set forth in RCW ((70.88.010)) 79A.40.010, ought
reasonably to be provided, or any repairs or improvements to, or changes in,
any theretofore in use ought reasonably to be made, or any additions or changes
in construction should reasonably be made thereto, in order to promote the
security and safety of the public or employees, it may make and serve an order
directing such repairs, improvements, changes, or additions to be made.

(2)
If the commission finds that the equipment, or appliances in connection
therewith, or the apparatus, or other structures of the recreational device set
forth in RCW ((70.88.010)) 79A.40.010 are defective, and that the
operation thereof is dangerous to the employees of the owner or operator of
such device or to the public, it shall immediately give notice to the owner or
operator of such device of the repairs or reconstruction necessary to place the
same in a safe condition, and may prescribe the time within which they shall be
made. If, in its opinion, it is needful or proper, the commission may forbid
the operation of the device until it is repaired and placed in a safe
condition.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 70.88.010 was recodified
as RCW 79A.40.010 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
89. RCW
79A.40.060 and 1959 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
inspector of recreational devices and his or her assistants shall
inspect all equipment and appliances connected with the recreational devices set
forth in RCW ((70.88.010)) 79A.40.010 and make such reports of
his or her inspection to the commission as may be required. He or
she shall, on discovering any defective equipment, or appliances connected
therewith, rendering the use of the equipment dangerous, immediately report the
same to the owner or operator of the device on which it is found, and in
addition report it to the commission. If in the opinion of the inspector the
continued operation of the defective equipment constitutes an immediate danger
to the safety of the persons operating or being conveyed by such equipment, the
inspector may condemn such equipment and shall immediately notify the
commission of his or her action in this respect: PROVIDED, That
inspection required by this chapter must be conducted at least once each year.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 70.88.010 was recodified as RCW 79A.40.010 pursuant
to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Also makes the section gender
neutral.

Sec.
90. RCW
79A.40.080 and 1991 c 75 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Inspections,
rules, and orders of the state parks and recreation commission resulting from
the exercise of the provisions of this chapter and chapter ((70.117)) 79A.45
RCW shall not in any manner be deemed to impose liability upon the state for
any injury or damage resulting from the operation or signing of the facilities
regulated by this chapter, and all actions of the state parks and recreation
commission and its personnel shall be deemed to be an exercise of the police
power of the state.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter 70.117 RCW was
recodified as chapter 79A.45 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
91. RCW
79A.45.040 and 1989 c 81 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Ski
area operators shall place a notice of the provisions of RCW ((70.117.020(7)))
79A.45.030(7) on their trail maps, at or near the ticket booth, and at
the bottom of each ski lift or similar device.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 70.117.020 was recodified
as RCW 79A.45.030 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
92. RCW
79A.60.010 and 1998 c 219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Boat wastes" includes, but is not limited to, sewage, garbage,
marine debris, plastics, contaminated bilge water, cleaning solvents, paint
scrapings, or discarded petroleum products associated with the use of vessels.

(2)
"Boater" means any person on a vessel on waters of the state of
Washington.

(3)
"Carrying passengers for hire" means carrying passengers in a vessel
on waters of the state for valuable consideration, whether given directly or
indirectly or received by the owner, agent, operator, or other person having an
interest in the vessel. This shall not include trips where expenses for food,
transportation, or incidentals are shared by participants on an even basis.
Anyone receiving compensation for skills or money for amortization of equipment
and carrying passengers shall be considered to be carrying passengers for hire
on waters of the state.

(4)
"Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.

(5)
"Darkness" means that period between sunset and sunrise.

(6)
"Environmentally sensitive area" means a restricted body of water
where discharge of untreated sewage from boats is especially detrimental
because of limited flushing, shallow water, commercial or recreational
shellfish, swimming areas, diversity of species, the absence of other pollution
sources, or other characteristics.

(7)
"Guide" means any individual, including but not limited to
subcontractors and independent contractors, engaged for compensation or other
consideration by a whitewater river outfitter for the purpose of operating
vessels. A person licensed under RCW 77.32.211 or 75.28.780 and acting as a
fishing guide is not considered a guide for the purposes of this chapter.

(8)
"Marina" means a facility providing boat moorage space, fuel, or
commercial services. Commercial services include but are not limited to
overnight or live‑aboard boating accommodations.

(9)
"Motor driven boats and vessels" means all boats and vessels which are
self propelled.

(10)
"Muffler" or "muffler system" means a sound suppression
device or system, including an underwater exhaust system, designed and
installed to abate the sound of exhaust gases emitted from an internal
combustion engine and that prevents excessive or unusual noise.

(11)
"Operate" means to steer, direct, or otherwise have physical control
of a vessel that is underway.

(12)
"Operator" means an individual who steers, directs, or otherwise has
physical control of a vessel that is underway or exercises actual authority to
control the person at the helm.

(13)
"Observer" means the individual riding in a vessel who is responsible
for observing a water skier at all times.

(14)
"Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of a vessel
by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action whether or not
the vessel is subject to a security interest.

(15)
"Person" means any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, nonprofit corporation or organization, limited liability company,
firm, association, or other legal entity located within or outside this state.

(16)
"Personal flotation device" means a buoyancy device, life preserver,
buoyant vest, ring buoy, or buoy cushion that is designed to float a person in
the water and that is approved by the commission.

(17)
"Personal watercraft" means a vessel of less than sixteen feet that
uses a motor powering a water jet pump, as its primary source of motive power
and that is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling
on, or being towed behind the vessel, rather than in the conventional manner of
sitting or standing inside the vessel.

(18)
"Polluted area" means a body of water used by boaters that is
contaminated by boat wastes at unacceptable levels, based on applicable water
quality and shellfish standards.

(19)
"Public entities" means all elected or appointed bodies, including
tribal governments, responsible for collecting and spending public funds.

(20)
"Reckless" or "recklessly" means acting carelessly and
heedlessly in a willful and wanton disregard of the rights, safety, or property
of another.

(21)
"Sewage pumpout or dump unit" means:

(a)
A receiving chamber or tank designed to receive vessel sewage from a
"porta‑potty" or a portable container; and

(b)
A stationary or portable mechanical device on land, a dock, pier, float, barge,
vessel, or other location convenient to boaters, designed to remove sewage
waste from holding tanks on vessels.

(22)
"Underway" means that a vessel is not at anchor, or made fast to the
shore, or aground.

(23)
"Vessel" includes every description of watercraft on the water, other
than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on
the water. However, it does not include inner tubes, air mattresses,
sailboards, and small rafts or flotation devices or toys customarily used by
swimmers.

(24)
"Water skiing" means the physical act of being towed behind a vessel
on, but not limited to, any skis, aquaplane, kneeboard, tube, or any other
similar device.

(25)
"Waters of the state" means any waters within the territorial limits
of Washington state.

(26)
"Whitewater river outfitter" means any person who is advertising to
carry or carries passengers for hire on any whitewater river of the state, but
does not include any person whose only service on a given trip is providing
instruction in canoeing or kayaking skills.

(27)
"Whitewater rivers of the state" means those rivers and streams, or
parts thereof, within the boundaries of the state as listed in RCW ((88.12.265))
79A.60.470 or as designated by the commission under RCW ((88.12.279))
79A.60.495.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.265 and 88.12.279
were recodified as RCW 79A.60.470 and 79A.60.495, respectively, pursuant to
1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
93. RCW
79A.60.030 and 1993 c 244 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall not operate a vessel in a negligent manner. For the purposes of
this section, to "operate in a negligent manner" means operating a
vessel in disregard of careful and prudent operation, or in disregard of
careful and prudent rates of speed that are no greater than is reasonable and
proper under the conditions existing at the point of operation, taking into
account the amount and character of traffic, size of the lake or body of water,
freedom from obstruction to view ahead, effects of vessel wake, and so as not
to unduly or unreasonably endanger life, limb, property or other rights of any
person entitled to the use of such waters. Except as provided in RCW ((88.12.015))
79A.60.020, a violation of this section is an infraction under chapter
7.84 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.015 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
94. RCW
79A.60.050 and 1998 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When the death of any person ensues within three years as a proximate result of
injury proximately caused by the operating of any vessel by any person, the
operator is guilty of homicide by watercraft if he or she was operating the
vessel:

(a)
While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW
((88.12.025)) 79A.60.040;

(b)
In a reckless manner; or

(c)
With disregard for the safety of others.

(2)
When the death is caused by a skier towed by a vessel, the operator of the
vessel is not guilty of homicide by watercraft.

(3)
A violation of this section is punishable as a class A felony according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.025 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.040 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
95. RCW
79A.60.060 and 1998 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a substantial
risk of death, serious permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or
impairment of the function of any part or organ of the body.

(2)
A person is guilty of assault by watercraft if he or she operates any vessel:

(a)
In a reckless manner, and this conduct is the proximate cause of serious bodily
injury to another; or

(b)
While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW
((88.12.025)) 79A.60.040, and this conduct is the proximate cause
of serious bodily injury to another.

(3)
When the injury is caused by a skier towed by a vessel, the operator of the
vessel is not guilty of assault by watercraft.

(4)
A violation of this section is punishable as a class B felony according to
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.025 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.040 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
96. RCW
79A.60.070 and 1998 c 219 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person convicted under RCW ((88.12.029 or 88.12.032)) 79A.60.050 or
79A.60.060 shall, as a condition of community ((supervision)) custody
imposed under RCW 9.94A.383 or community placement imposed under RCW
9.94A.120(9), complete a diagnostic evaluation by an alcohol or drug dependency
agency approved by the department of social and health services or a qualified
probation department, defined under RCW 46.61.516, that has been approved by
the department of social and health services. If the person is found to have
an alcohol or drug problem that requires treatment, the person shall complete
treatment in a program approved by the department of social and health services
under chapter 70.96A RCW. If the person is found not to have an alcohol or
drug problem that requires treatment, he or she shall complete a course in an information
school approved by the department of social and health services under chapter
70.96A RCW. The convicted person shall pay all costs for any evaluation,
education, or treatment required by this section, unless the person is eligible
for an existing program offered or approved by the department of social and
health services. Nothing in chapter 219, Laws of 1998 requires the addition of
new treatment or assessment facilities nor affects the department of social and
health services use of existing programs and facilities authorized by law.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
RCW 88.12.029 and 88.12.032 were recodified as RCW 79A.60.050 and 79A.60.060
pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

(2) RCW 9.94A.383 was amended
by 1999 c 196 s 10, changing the term "community supervision" to
"community custody."

Sec.
97. RCW
79A.60.130 and 1993 c 244 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All motor-propelled vessels shall be equipped and maintained with an effective
muffler that is in good working order and in constant use. For the purpose of
this section, an effective muffler or underwater exhaust system does not
produce sound levels in excess of ninety decibels when subjected to a
stationary sound level test that shall be prescribed by rules adopted by the
commission, as of July 25, 1993, and for engines manufactured on or after
January 1, 1994, a noise level of eighty-eight decibels when subjected to a
stationary sound level test that shall be prescribed by rules adopted by the
commission.

(2)
A vessel that does not meet the requirements of subsection (1) of this section
shall not be operated on the waters of this state.

(3)
No person may operate a vessel on waters of the state in such a manner as to
exceed a noise level of seventy-five decibels measured from any point on the
shoreline of the body of water on which the vessel is being operated that shall
be specified by rules adopted by the commission, as of July 25, 1993. Such
measurement shall not preclude a stationary sound level test that shall be
prescribed by rules adopted by the commission.

(4)
This section does not apply to: (a) A vessel tuning up, testing for, or
participating in official trials for speed records or a sanctioned race
conducted pursuant to a permit issued by an appropriate governmental agency; or
(b) a vessel being operated by a vessel or marine engine manufacturer for the
purpose of testing or development. Nothing in this subsection prevents local
governments from adopting ordinances to control the frequency, duration, and
location of vessel testing, tune-up, and racing.

(5)
Any officer authorized to enforce this section who has reason to believe that a
vessel is not in compliance with the noise levels established in this section
may direct the operator of the vessel to submit the vessel to an on-site test
to measure noise level, with the officer on board if the officer chooses, and
the operator shall comply with such request. If the vessel exceeds the decibel
levels established in this section, the officer may direct the operator to take
immediate and reasonable measures to correct the violation.

(6)
Any officer who conducts vessel sound level tests as provided in this section
shall be qualified in vessel noise testing. Qualifications shall include but
may not be limited to the ability to select the appropriate measurement site
and the calibration and use of noise testing equipment.

(7)
A person shall not remove, alter, or otherwise modify in any way a muffler or
muffler system in a manner that will prevent it from being operated in
accordance with this chapter.

(8)
A person shall not manufacture, sell, or offer for sale any vessel that is not
equipped with a muffler or muffler system that does not comply with this
chapter. This subsection shall not apply to power vessels designed,
manufactured, and sold for the sole purpose of competing in racing events and
for no other purpose. Any such exemption or exception shall be documented in
any and every sale agreement and shall be formally acknowledged by signature on
the part of both the buyer and the seller. Copies of the agreement shall be
maintained by both parties. A copy shall be kept on board whenever the vessel
is operated.

(9)
Except as provided in RCW ((88.12.015)) 79A.60.020, a violation
of this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.

(10)
Vessels that are equipped with an engine modified to increase performance
beyond the engine manufacturer's stock configuration shall have an exhaust
system that complies with the standards in this section after January 1, 1994.
Until that date, operators or owners, or both, of such vessels with engines
that are out of compliance shall be issued a warning and be given educational
materials about types of muffling systems available to muffle noise from such
high performance engines.

(11)
Nothing in this section preempts a local government from exercising any power
that it possesses under the laws or Constitution of the state of Washington to
adopt more stringent regulations.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.015 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
98. RCW
79A.60.160 and 1999 c 310 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may operate or permit the operation of a vessel on the waters of the
state without a personal flotation device on board for each person on the
vessel. Each personal flotation device shall be in serviceable condition, of
an appropriate size, and readily accessible.

(2)
Except as provided in RCW ((88.12.015)) 79A.60.020, a violation
of subsection (1) of this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW if
the vessel is not carrying passengers for hire.

(3)
A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a misdemeanor punishable under
RCW 9.92.030, if the vessel is carrying passengers for hire.

(4)
No person shall operate a vessel under nineteen feet in length on the waters of
this state with a child twelve years old and under, unless the child is wearing
a personal flotation device that meets or exceeds the United States coast guard
approval standards of the appropriate size, while the vessel is underway. For
the purposes of this section, a personal flotation device is not considered readily
accessible for children twelve years old and under unless the device is worn by
the child while the vessel is underway. The personal flotation device must be
worn at all times by a child twelve years old and under whenever the vessel is
underway and the child is on an open deck or open cockpit of the vessel. The
following circumstances are excepted:

(a)
While a child is below deck or in the cabin of a boat with an enclosed cabin;

(b)
While a child is on a United States coast guard inspected passenger-carrying
vessel operating on the navigable waters of the United States; or

(c)
While on board a vessel at a time and place where no person would reasonably
expect a danger of drowning to occur.

(5)
Except as provided in RCW ((88.12.015)) 79A.60.020, a violation
of subsection (4) of this section is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.
Enforcement of subsection (4) of this section by law enforcement officers may
be accomplished as a primary action, and need not be accompanied by the
suspected violation of some other offense.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.015 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
99. RCW
79A.60.170 and 1993 c 244 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of this section is to promote safety in water skiing on the waters
of Washington state, provide a means of ensuring safe water skiing and promote
the enjoyment of water skiing.

(2)
No vessel operator may tow or attempt to tow a water skier on any waters of
Washington state unless such craft shall be occupied by at least an operator
and an observer. The observer shall continuously observe the person or persons
being towed and shall display a flag immediately after the towed person or persons
fall into the water, and during the time preparatory to skiing while the person
or persons are still in the water. Such flag shall be a bright red or
brilliant orange color, measuring at least twelve inches square, mounted on a
pole not less than twenty-four inches long and displayed as to be visible from
every direction. This subsection does not apply to a personal watercraft, the
design of which makes no provision for carrying an operator or any other person
on board, and that is actually operated by the person or persons being towed.
Every remote-operated personal watercraft shall have a flag attached which
meets the requirements of this subsection. Except as provided under RCW ((88.12.015))
79A.60.020, a violation of this subsection is an infraction under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

(3)
The observer and the operator shall not be the same person. The observer shall
be an individual who meets the minimum qualifications for an observer
established by rules of the commission. Except as provided under RCW ((88.12.015))
79A.60.020, a violation of this subsection is an infraction under
chapter 7.84 RCW.

(4)
No person shall engage or attempt to engage in water skiing without wearing a
personal flotation device. Except as provided under RCW ((88.12.015)) 79A.60.020,
a violation of this subsection is an infraction under chapter 7.84 RCW.

(5)
No person shall engage or attempt to engage in water skiing, or operate any
vessel to tow a water skier, on the waters of Washington state during the
period from one hour after sunset until one hour prior to sunrise. A violation
of this subsection is a misdemeanor, punishable as provided under RCW 9.92.030.

(6)
No person engaged in water skiing either as operator, observer, or skier, shall
conduct himself or herself in a reckless manner that willfully or wantonly
endangers, or is likely to endanger, any person or property. A violation of
this subsection is a misdemeanor as provided under RCW 9.92.030.

(7)
The requirements of subsections (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section shall
not apply to persons engaged in tournaments, competitions, or exhibitions that
have been authorized or otherwise permitted by the appropriate agency having
jurisdiction and authority to authorize such events.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.015 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
100. RCW
79A.60.180 and 1993 c 244 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not load or permit to be loaded a vessel with passengers or
cargo beyond its safe carrying ability or carry passengers or cargo in an
unsafe manner taking into consideration weather and other existing operating
conditions.

(2)
A person shall not operate or permit to be operated a vessel equipped with a
motor or other propulsion machinery of a power beyond the vessel's ability to
operate safely, taking into consideration the vessel's type, use, and
construction, the weather conditions, and other existing operating conditions.

(3)
A violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section is an infraction
punishable as provided under chapter 7.84 RCW except as provided under RCW ((88.12.015))
79A.60.020 or where the overloading or overpowering is reasonably
advisable to effect a rescue or for some similar emergency purpose.

(4)
If it appears reasonably certain to any law enforcement officer that a person
is operating a vessel clearly loaded or powered beyond its safe operating
ability and in the judgment of that officer the operation creates an especially
hazardous condition, the officer may direct the operator to take immediate and
reasonable steps necessary for the safety of the individuals on board the
vessel, including directing the operator to return to shore or a mooring and to
remain there until the situation creating the hazard is corrected or ended.
Failure to follow the direction of an officer under this subsection is a
misdemeanor punishable as provided under RCW 9.92.030.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.015 was recodified as
RCW 79A.60.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
101. RCW
79A.60.190 and 1993 c 244 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft unless each person aboard the
personal watercraft is wearing a personal flotation device approved by the
commission. Except as provided for in RCW ((88.12.015)) 79A.60.020,
a violation of this subsection is a civil infraction punishable under RCW
7.84.100.

(2)
A person operating a personal watercraft equipped by the manufacturer with a
lanyard‑type engine cutoff switch shall attach the lanyard to his or her
person, clothing, or personal flotation device as appropriate for the specific
vessel. It is unlawful for any person to remove or disable a cutoff switch
that was installed by the manufacturer.

(3)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft during darkness.

(4)
A person under the age of fourteen shall not operate a personal watercraft on
the waters of this state.

(5)
A person shall not operate a personal watercraft in a reckless manner,
including recklessly weaving through congested vessel traffic, recklessly
jumping the wake of another vessel unreasonably or unnecessarily close to the
vessel or when visibility around the vessel is obstructed, or recklessly
swerving at the last possible moment to avoid collision.

(6)
A person shall not lease, hire, or rent a personal watercraft to a person under
the age of sixteen.

(7)
Subsections (1) through (6) of this section shall not apply to a performer
engaged in a professional exhibition or a person participating in a regatta,
race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition authorized or otherwise
permitted by the appropriate agency having jurisdiction and authority to
authorize such events.

(8)
Violations of subsections (2) through (6) of this section constitute a
misdemeanor under RCW 9.92.030.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.015 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
102. RCW
79A.60.200 and 1996 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The operator of a vessel involved in a collision, accident, or other casualty,
to the extent the operator can do so without serious danger to the operator's
own vessel or persons aboard, shall render all practical and necessary
assistance to persons affected by the collision, accident, or casualty to save
them from danger caused by the incident. Under no circumstances may the
rendering of assistance or other compliance with this section be evidence of
the liability of such operator for the collision, accident, or casualty. The
operator shall also give all pertinent accident information, as specified by
rule by the commission, to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction: PROVIDED,
That this requirement shall not apply to operators of vessels when they are
participating in an organized competitive event authorized or otherwise
permitted by the appropriate agency having jurisdiction and authority to
authorize such events. These duties are in addition to any duties otherwise
imposed by law. Except as provided for in RCW ((88.12.015)) 79A.60.020
and subsection (3) of this section, a violation of this subsection is a civil
infraction punishable under RCW 7.84.100.

(2)
Any person who complies with subsection (1) of this section or who gratuitously
and in good faith renders assistance at the scene of a vessel collision,
accident, or other casualty, without objection of the person assisted, shall
not be held liable for any civil damages as a result of the rendering of
assistance or for any act or omission in providing or arranging salvage,
towage, medical treatment, or other assistance, where the assisting person acts
as any reasonably prudent person would have acted under the same or similar
circumstances.

(3)
An operator of a vessel is guilty of a class C felony and is punishable
pursuant to RCW 9A.20.021 if the operator: (a) Is involved in a collision that
results in injury to a person; (b) knew or reasonably should have known that a
person was injured in the collision; and (c) leaves the scene of the collision
without rendering all practical and necessary assistance to the injured person
as required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, under circumstances in
which the operator could have rendered assistance without serious danger to the
operator's own vessel or persons aboard. This subsection (3) does not apply to
vessels involved in commerce, including but not limited to tugs, barges, cargo
vessels, commercial passenger vessels, fishing vessels, and processing vessels.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.015 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
103. RCW
79A.60.300 and 1994 c 51 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of RCW ((88.12.185 through 88.12.225)) 79A.60.230 through
79A.60.290 do not apply to vessels secured pursuant to chapter ((88.27))
79A.65 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
Chapter 88.27 RCW was recodified as chapter 79A.65 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249 s
1601.

(2) RCW 88.12.185 through
88.12.225 were recodified as RCW 79A.60.230 through 79A.60.290 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
104. RCW
79A.60.400 and 1993 c 244 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of RCW ((88.12.250 through 88.12.275)) 79A.60.440 through
79A.60.480 is to further the public interest, welfare, and safety by
providing for the protection and promotion of safety in the operation of
vessels carrying passengers for hire on the whitewater rivers of this state.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.250 through
88.12.275 were recodified as RCW 79A.60.440 through 79A.60.480 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
105. RCW
79A.60.410 and 1997 c 391 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall act in the capacity of a paid whitewater river outfitter, or
advertise in any newspaper or magazine or any other trade publication, or
represent himself or herself as a whitewater river outfitter in the state,
without first obtaining a whitewater river outfitter's license from the
department of licensing in accordance with RCW ((88.12.275)) 79A.60.480.

(2)
Every whitewater river outfitter's license must, at all times, be conspicuously
placed on the premises set forth in the license.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.275 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.480 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
106. RCW
79A.60.420 and 1997 c 391 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW ((88.12.275)) 79A.60.480, the commission of a
prohibited act or the omission of a required act under RCW ((88.12.245
through 88.12.275)) 79A.60.430 through 79A.60.480 constitutes a
misdemeanor, punishable as provided under RCW 9.92.030.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
RCW 88.12.275 was recodified as RCW 79A.60.480 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

(2) RCW 88.12.245 through
88.12.275 were recodified as RCW 79A.60.430 through 79A.60.480 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
107. RCW
79A.60.440 and 1993 c 244 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may operate any vessel carrying passengers for hire on whitewater
rivers in a manner that interferes with other vessels or with the free and
proper navigation of the rivers of this state.

(2)
Every operator of a vessel carrying passengers for hire on whitewater rivers
shall at all times operate the vessel in a careful and prudent manner and at
such a speed as to not endanger the life, limb, or property of any person.

(3)
No vessel carrying passengers for hire on whitewater rivers may be loaded with
passengers or cargo beyond its safe carrying capacity taking into consideration
the type and construction of the vessel and other existing operating
conditions. In the case of inflatable vessels, safe carrying capacity in
whitewater shall be considered as less than the United States coast guard
capacity rating for each vessel. This subsection shall not apply in cases of
an unexpected emergency on the river.

(4)
Individuals licensed under chapter 77.32 RCW and acting as fishing guides are
exempt from RCW ((88.12.235)) 79A.60.420 and ((88.12.260
through 88.12.275)) 79A.60.460 through 79A.60.480.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1)
RCW 88.12.235 was recodified as RCW 79A.60.420 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

(2) RCW 88.12.260 through
88.12.275 were recodified as RCW 79A.60.460 through 79A.60.480 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
108. RCW
79A.60.470 and 1997 c 391 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Whitewater
river sections include but are not limited to:

(1)
Green river above Flaming Geyser state park;

(2)
Klickitat river above the confluence with Summit creek;

(3)
Methow river below the town of Carlton;

(4)
Sauk river above the town of Darrington;

(5)
Skagit river above Bacon creek;

(6)
Suiattle river;

(7)
Tieton river below Rimrock dam;

(8)
Skykomish river below Sunset Falls and above the Highway 2 bridge one mile east
of the town of Gold Bar;

(9)
Wenatchee river above the Wenatchee county park at the town of Monitor;

(10)
White Salmon river; and

(11)
Any other section of river designated a "whitewater river section" by
the commission under RCW ((88.12.279)) 79A.60.495.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.279 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.495 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
109. RCW
79A.60.480 and 1997 c 391 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of licensing shall issue a whitewater river outfitter's license
to an applicant who submits a completed application, pays the required fee, and
complies with the requirements of this section.

(2)
An applicant for a whitewater river outfitter's license shall make application
upon a form provided by the department of licensing. The form must be
submitted annually and include the following information:

(a)
The name, residence address, and residence telephone number, and the business
name, address, and telephone number of the applicant;

(b)
Certification that all employees, subcontractors, or independent contractors
hired as guides meet training standards under RCW ((88.12.245(2))) 79A.60.430
before carrying any passengers for hire;

(c)
Proof that the applicant has liability insurance for a minimum of three hundred
thousand dollars per claim for occurrences by the applicant and the applicant's
employees that result in bodily injury or property damage. All guides must be
covered by the applicant's insurance policy;

(d)
Certification that the applicant will maintain the insurance for a period of
not less than one year from the date of issuance of the license; and

(e)
Certification by the applicant that for a period of not less than twenty-four
months immediately preceding the application the applicant:

(i)
Has not had a license, permit, or certificate to carry passengers for hire on a
river revoked by another state or by an agency of the government of the United
States due to a conviction for a violation of safety or insurance coverage
requirements no more stringent than the requirements of this chapter; and

(ii)
Has not been denied the right to apply for a license, permit, or certificate to
carry passengers for hire on a river by another state.

(3)
The department of licensing shall charge a fee for each application, to be set
in accordance with RCW 43.24.086.

(4)
Any person advertising or representing himself or herself as a whitewater river
outfitter who is not currently licensed is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(5)
The department of licensing shall submit annually a list of licensed persons
and companies to the department of community, trade, and economic development,
tourism promotion division.

(6)
If an insurance company cancels or refuses to renew insurance for a licensee,
the insurance company shall notify the department of licensing in writing of
the termination of coverage and its effective date not less than thirty days
before the effective date of termination.

(a)
Upon receipt of an insurance company termination notice, the department of
licensing shall send written notice to the licensee that on the effective date
of termination the department of licensing will suspend the license unless
proof of insurance as required by this section is filed with the department of
licensing before the effective date of the termination.

(b)
If an insurance company fails to give notice of coverage termination, this
failure shall not have the effect of continuing the coverage.

(c)
The department of licensing may suspend a license under this section if the
licensee fails to maintain in full force and effect the insurance required by
this section.

(7)
The state of Washington shall be immune from any civil action arising from the
issuance of a license under this section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.245 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.430 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
110. RCW
79A.60.485 and 1997 c 391 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of licensing may adopt and enforce such rules, including the setting
of fees, as may be consistent with and necessary to implement RCW ((88.12.275))
79A.60.480. The fees must approximate the cost of administration. The
fees must be deposited in the master license account.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.275 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.480 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
111. RCW
79A.60.490 and 1997 c 391 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
five days after conviction for any of the provisions of RCW ((88.12.245
through 88.12.275)) 79A.60.430 through 79A.60.480, the court shall
forward a copy of the judgment to the department of licensing. After receiving
proof of conviction, the department of licensing may suspend the license of any
whitewater river outfitter for a period not to exceed one year or until proof
of compliance with all licensing requirements and correction of the violation
under which the whitewater river outfitter was convicted.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.245 through
88.12.275 were recodified as RCW 79A.60.430 through 79A.60.480 pursuant to 1999
c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
112. RCW
79A.60.540 and 1993 c 244 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Marinas and boat launches designated as appropriate for installation of a
sewage pumpout or dump unit under RCW ((88.12.315)) 79A.60.530
shall be eligible for funding support for installation of such facilities from
funds specified in RCW ((88.12.375)) 79A.60.590. The commission
shall notify owners or operators of all designated marinas and boat launches of
the designation, and of the availability of funding to support installation of
appropriate sewage disposal facilities. The commission shall encourage the
owners and operators to apply for available funding.

(2)
The commission shall seek to provide the most cost-efficient and accessible
facilities possible for reducing the amount of boat waste entering the state's
waters. The commission shall consider providing funding support for portable
pumpout facilities in this effort.

(3)
The commission shall contract with, or enter into an interagency agreement with
another state agency to contract with, applicants based on the criteria
specified below:

(a)(i)
Contracts may be awarded to publicly owned, tribal, or privately owned marinas
or boat launches.

(ii)
Contracts may provide for state reimbursement to cover eligible costs as deemed
reasonable by commission rule. Eligible costs include purchase, installation,
or major renovation of the sewage pumpout or dump units, including sewer,
water, electrical connections, and those costs attendant to the purchase,
installation, and other necessary appurtenances, such as required pier space,
as determined by the commission.

(iii)
Ownership of the sewage pumpout or dump unit will be retained by the state
through the commission in privately owned marinas. Ownership of the sewage
pumpout or dump unit in publicly owned marinas will be held by the public
entity.

(iv)
Operation, normal and expected maintenance, and ongoing utility costs will be
the responsibility of the contract recipient. The sewage pumpout or dump unit
shall be kept in operating condition and available for public use at all times
during operating hours of the facility, excluding necessary maintenance
periods.

(v)
The contract recipient agrees to allow the installation, existence and use of
the sewage pumpout or dump unit by granting an irrevocable license for a
minimum of ten years at no cost to the commission.

(b)
Contracts awarded pursuant to (a) of this subsection shall be subject, for a
period of at least ten years, to the following conditions:

(i)
Any contract recipient entering into a contract under this section must allow
the boating public access to the sewage pumpout or dump unit during operating
hours.

(ii)
The contract recipient must agree to monitor and encourage the use of the
sewage pumpout or dump unit, and to cooperate in any related boater
environmental education program administered or approved by the commission.

(iii)
The contract recipient must agree not to charge a fee for the use of the sewage
pumpout or dump unit.

(iv)
The contract recipient must agree to arrange and pay a reasonable fee for a
periodic inspection of the sewage pumpout or dump unit by the local health
department or appropriate authority.

(v)
Use of a free sewage pumpout or dump unit by the boating public shall be deemed
to be included in the term "outdoor recreation" for the purposes of
chapter 4.24 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.315 and 88.12.375
were recodified as RCW 79A.60.530 and 79A.60.590, respectively, pursuant to
1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
113. RCW
79A.60.590 and 1993 c 244 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

The
amounts allocated in accordance with RCW 82.49.030(3) shall be expended upon
appropriation in accordance with the following limitations:

(1)
Thirty percent of the funds shall be appropriated to the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation and be expended for use by state and local government
for public recreational waterway boater access and boater destination sites.
Priority shall be given to critical site acquisition. The interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall administer such funds as a competitive
grants program. The amounts provided for in this subsection shall be evenly
divided between state and local governments.

(2)
Thirty percent of the funds shall be expended by the commission exclusively for
sewage pumpout or dump units at publicly and privately owned marinas as
provided for in RCW ((88.12.315 and 88.12.325)) 79A.60.530 and
79A.60.540.

(3)
Twenty-five percent of the funds shall be expended for grants to state agencies
and other public entities to enforce boating safety and registration laws and
to carry out boating safety programs. The commission shall administer such
grant program.

(4)
Fifteen percent shall be expended for instructional materials, programs or
grants to the public school system, public entities, or other nonprofit
community organizations to support boating safety and boater environmental
education or boat waste management planning. The commission shall administer
this program.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.12.315 and 88.12.325
were recodified as RCW 79A.60.530 and 79A.60.540 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
114. RCW
79A.60.620 and 1991 c 200 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington sea grant program, in consultation with the department (([of
ecology])) of ecology, shall develop and conduct a voluntary spill
prevention education program that targets small spills from commercial fishing
vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas. Washington sea grant shall
coordinate the spill prevention education program with recreational boater
education performed by the state parks and recreation commission.

(2)
The spill prevention education program shall illustrate ways to reduce oil
contamination of bilge water, accidental spills of hydraulic fluid and other
hazardous substances during routine maintenance, and reduce spillage during
refueling. The program shall illustrate proper disposal of oil and hazardous
substances and promote strategies to meet shoreside oil and hazardous substance
handling, and disposal needs of the targeted groups. The program shall include
a series of training workshops and the development of educational materials.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 90.56.090 was recodified
as RCW 79A.60.620 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601. This amendment clarifies that
the department referred to is the department of ecology.

Sec.
115. RCW
79A.65.010 and 1994 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Charges" means charges of the commission for moorage and storage,
and all other charges related to the vessel and owing to or that become owing
to the commission, including but not limited to costs of securing, disposing,
or removing vessels, damages to any commission facility, and any costs of sale
and related legal expenses for implementing RCW ((88.27.020 and 88.27.030))
79A.65.020 and 79A.65.030.

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state parks and recreation
commission.

(3)
"Commission facility" means any property or facility owned, leased,
operated, managed, or otherwise controlled by the commission or by a person
pursuant to a contract with the commission.

(4)
"Owner" means a person who has a lawful right to possession of a
vessel by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, inheritance, or legal action whether
or not the vessel is subject to a security interest, and shall not include the
holder of a bona fide security interest.

(5)
"Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, corporation,
association, organization, or any other entity.

(6)(a)
"Registered owner" means any person that is either: (i) Shown as the
owner in a vessel certificate of documentation issued by the secretary of the
United States department of transportation under 46 U.S.C. Sec. 12103; or (ii)
the registered owner or legal owner of a vessel for which a certificate of
title has been issued under chapter 88.02 RCW; or (iii) the owner of a vessel
registered under the vessel registration laws of another state under which laws
the commission can readily identify the ownership of vessels registered with
that state.

(b)
"Registered owner" also includes: (i) Any holder of a security
interest or lien recorded with the United States department of transportation
with respect to a vessel on which a certificate of documentation has been
issued; (ii) any holder of a security interest identified in a certificate of
title for a vessel registered under chapter 88.02 RCW; or (iii) any holder of a
security interest in a vessel where the holder is identified in vessel
registration information of a state with vessel registration laws that fall
within (a)(iii) of this subsection and under which laws the commission can
readily determine the identity of the holder.

(c)
"Registered owner" does not include any vessel owner or holder of a
lien or security interest in a vessel if the vessel does not have visible
information affixed to it (such as name and hailing port or registration
numbers) that will enable the commission to obtain ownership information for
the vessel without incurring unreasonable expense.

(7)
"Registered vessel" means a vessel having a registered owner.

(8)
"Secured vessel" means any vessel that has been secured by the
commission that remains in the commission's possession and control.

(9)
"Unauthorized vessel" means a vessel using a commission facility of
any type whose owner has not paid the required moorage fees or has left the
vessel beyond the posted time limits, or a vessel otherwise present without
permission of the commission.

(10)
"Vessel" means every watercraft or part thereof constructed, used, or
capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water. It includes
any equipment or personal property on the vessel that is used or capable of
being used for the operation, navigation, or maintenance of the vessel.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.27.020 and 88.27.030
were recodified as RCW 79A.65.020 and 79A.65.030 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
116. RCW
79A.65.030 and 1994 c 51 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may provide for the public sale of vessels considered abandoned
under RCW ((88.27.020)) 79A.65.020. At such sales, the vessels
shall be sold for cash to the highest and best bidder.

(2)
Before a vessel is sold, the commission shall make a reasonable effort to
provide notice of sale, at least twenty days before the day of the sale, to
each registered owner of a registered vessel and each owner of an unregistered
vessel. The notice shall contain the time and place of the sale, a reasonable
description of the vessel to be sold, and the amount of charges then owing with
respect to the vessel, and a summary of the rights and procedures under this
chapter. A notice of sale shall be published at least once, more than ten but
not more than twenty days before the sale, in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the commission facility is located. This
notice shall include: (a) If known, the name of the vessel and the last owner
and the owner's address; and (b) a reasonable description of the vessel. The
commission may bid all or part of its charges at the sale and may become a
purchaser at the sale.

(3)
Before a vessel is sold, any person seeking to redeem a secured vessel may
commence a lawsuit in the superior court for the county in which the vessel was
secured to contest the commission's decision to secure the vessel or the amount
of charges owing. This lawsuit shall be commenced within fifteen days of the
date the notification was posted under RCW ((88.27.020(3))) 79A.65.020(3),
or the right to a hearing is deemed waived and the owner is liable for any
charges owing the commission. In the event of litigation, the prevailing party
is entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(4)
The proceeds of a sale under this section shall be applied first to the payment
of the amount of the reasonable charges incurred by the commission and moorage
fees owed to the commission, then to the owner or to satisfy any liens of
record or security interests of record on the vessel in the order of their
priority. If an owner cannot in the exercise of due diligence be located by
the commission within one year of the date of the sale, any excess funds from
the sale, following the satisfaction of any bona fide security interest, shall
revert to the department of revenue under chapter 63.29 RCW. If the sale is
for a sum less than the applicable charges, the commission is entitled to
assert a claim for the deficiency against the vessel owner. Nothing in this
section prevents any lien holder or secured party from asserting a claim for
any deficiency owed the lien holder or secured party.

(5)
If no one purchases the vessel at a sale, the commission may proceed to
properly dispose of the vessel in any way the commission considers appropriate,
including, but not limited to, destruction of the vessel or by negotiated
sale. The commission may assert a claim against the owner for any charges
incurred thereby. If the vessel, or any part of the vessel, or any rights to
the vessel, are sold under this subsection, any proceeds from the sale shall be
distributed in the manner provided in subsection (4) of this section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.27.020 was recodified
as RCW 79A.65.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

Sec.
117. RCW
79A.65.040 and 1994 c 51 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the full amount of all charges due the commission on an unauthorized vessel is
not paid to the commission within thirty days after the date on which notice is
affixed or posted under RCW ((88.27.020(3))) 79A.65.020(3), the
commission may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to
recover the charges, plus reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred by the
commission.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 88.27.020 was recodified
as RCW 79A.65.020 pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 118. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
75.08.274 (Taking food fish for propagation or scientific
purposes--Permit authorized by rule) and 1998 c 190 s 72, 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s
15, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 28, 1971 c 35 s 1, & 1955 c 12 s 75.16.010;

(2) RCW
75.25.090 (Personal use fishing licenses--Fees) and 1993 c 215 s
1, 1989 c 305 s 5, & 1987 c 87 s 1;

(3) RCW
75.28.012 (Licensing districts‑-Created) and 1993 c 20 s 3,
1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 102, 1971 ex.s. c 283 s 2, & 1957 c 171 s 1;

(4) RCW
76.12.200 (Reserved timber--Report to legislature) and 1989 c 424
s 3; and

(5) RCW
77.32.060 (Licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and raffle
tickets--Amount of fees to be retained by license dealers) and 1998 c 245 s
160, 1996 c 101 s 9, 1995 c 116 s 2, 1987 c 506 s 78, 1985 c 464 s 1, 1981 c
310 s 17, 1980 c 78 s 107, 1979 ex.s. c 3 s 3, 1970 ex.s. c 29 s 2, 1957 c 176
s 2, & 1955 c 36 s 77.32.060.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

(1) RCW 75.08.274 was repealed by 1998 c 191 s 46,
effective April 1, 1999, without cognizance of its amendment by 1998 c 190 s
72. Repealing this section removes the decodified section from the code.

(2) RCW 75.25.090 was amended by 1993 c 215 s 1 without
reference to its repeal by 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 31, effective January 1, 1994.
Repealing this section removes the decodified section from the code.

(3) RCW 75.28.012 was amended by 1993 c 20 s 3 without
reference to its repeal by 1993 c 340 s 56, effective January 1, 1994.
Repealing this section removes the decodified section from the code.

(4) RCW 76.12.200 requires reporting pursuant to RCW
76.12.190 which expired June 30, 1994, making this section obsolete.

(5) RCW 77.32.060 was amended by 1998 c 245 s 160
without reference to its repeal by 1998 c 191 s 45. Repealing this section
removes the decodified section from the code.

---
END ---