BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.04.295 and 1992 c 103 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of accountancy shall have the power to revoke, suspend, (([or])) or
refuse to renew a certificate or license, and may impose a fine in an amount
not to exceed one thousand dollars plus the board's investigative and legal
costs in bringing charges against a certified public accountant, or impose
conditions precedent to renewal of the certificate or license of any certified
public accountant for any of the following causes:

(1)
Fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate as a certified public accountant, or
in obtaining a license;

(2)
Dishonesty, fraud, or negligence while representing oneself as a CPA;

(3)
A violation of any provision of this chapter;

(4)
A violation of a rule of professional conduct promulgated by the board under
the authority granted by this chapter;

(5)
Conviction of a crime or an act constituting a crime under:

(a)
The laws of this state;

(b)
The laws of another state, and which, if committed within this state, would
have constituted a crime under the laws of this state; or

(c)
Federal law;

(6)
Cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the authority to
practice as a certified public accountant by any other state for any cause
other than failure to pay a fee or to meet the requirements of continuing
education in the other state;

(7)
Suspension or revocation of the right to practice matters relating to public
accounting before any state or federal agency;

For
purposes of subsections (6) and (7) of this section, a certified copy of such
revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew shall be prima facie evidence;

(8)
Failure to maintain compliance with the requirements for issuance, renewal, or
reinstatement of the certificate or license, or to report changes to the board;

(9)
Failure to cooperate with the board by:

(a)
Failure to furnish any papers or documents requested or ordered by the board;

(b)
Failure to furnish in writing a full and complete explanation covering the
matter contained in the complaint filed with the board or the inquiry of the
board;

(c)
Failure to respond to subpoenas issued by the board, whether or not the
recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.20.010 and 1985 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development, establishment, and
enforcement of standards for the maintenance and operation of boarding homes,
which, in the light of advancing knowledge, will promote safe and adequate care
of the individuals therein. It is further the intent of the legislature that
boarding homes be available to meet the needs of those for whom they care by
recognizing the capabilities of individuals to direct their self-medication or
to use supervised self-medication techniques when ordered and approved by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW or a ((podiatrist)) podiatric
physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
term "podiatrist" was changed to "podiatric physician and
surgeon" by 1990 c 147.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.22.040 and 1993 c 29 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
any person may take an examination for the issuance of a podiatric physician
and surgeon license, the applicant shall submit a completed application and a
fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250. The applicant
shall also furnish the secretary and the board with satisfactory proof that:

(1)
The applicant has not engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in chapter
18.130 RCW and is not unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as a
result of a physical or mental impairment;

(2)
The applicant has satisfactorily completed a course in an approved school of
podiatric medicine and surgery;

(3)
The applicant has completed one year (([of])) of postgraduate
podiatric medical training in a program approved by the board, provided that
applicants graduating before July 1, 1993, shall be exempt from the
postgraduate training requirement.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.25.0151 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state chiropractic quality assurance commission is established,
consisting of fourteen members appointed by the governor to four-year terms,
and including eleven practicing chiropractors and three public members. No
member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. In appointing the
initial members of the commission, it is the intent of the legislature that, to
the extent possible, the governor appoint members of the previous boards and
committees regulating this profession to the commission. Members of the
commission hold office until their successors are appointed. The governor may
appoint the members of the initial ((commissions [commission])) commission
to staggered terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be
appointed to full four-year terms. The governor may consider persons who are
recommended for appointment by chiropractic associations of this state.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.25.0196 and 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, for the purpose of RCW ((8.25.120 through
18.25.150 and 18.25.170)) 18.25.0192 through 18.25.0195 and 18.25.0197
it is immaterial whether the cost of any policy, plan, agreement, or contract
be deemed additional compensation for services, or otherwise.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.25.120 through 18.25.150 and 18.25.170 were recodified as RCW 18.25.0192
through 18.25.0195 and 18.25.0197 by 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 120, effective July 1,
1994.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.25.0197 and 1974 ex.s. c 97 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
((18.25.120 through 18.25.160)) 18.25.0192 through 18.25.0196
shall apply to all agreements, renewals, or contracts issued on or after July
24, 1974.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.25.120 through 18.25.160 were recodified as RCW 18.25.0192 through
18.25.0196 by 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 120, effective July 1, 1994.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.25.190 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 118 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit:

(1)
The temporary practice in this state of chiropractic by any chiropractor
licensed by another state, territory, or country in which he or she resides.
However, the chiropractor shall not establish a practice open to the general
public and shall not engage in temporary practice under this section for a
period longer than thirty days. The chiropractor shall register his or her
intention to engage in the temporary practice of chiropractic in this state
with the commission before engaging in the practice of chiropractic, and shall
agree to be bound by such conditions as may be prescribed by rule by the
commission.

(2)
The practice of chiropractic, except the administration of a chiropractic
adjustment, by a person who is a regular senior student in an accredited school
of chiropractic approved by the commission if the practice is part of a regular
course of instruction offered by the school and the student is under the direct
supervision and control of a chiropractor duly licensed pursuant to this
chapter and approved by the commission.

(3)
The practice of chiropractic by a person serving a period of postgraduate
chiropractic training in a program of clinical chiropractic training sponsored
by a school of chiropractic accredited in this state if the practice is part of
his or her duties as a clinical postgraduate trainee and the trainee is under
the direct supervision and control of a chiropractor duly licensed pursuant to
this chapter and approved by the commission.

(4)
The practice of chiropractic by a person who is eligible and has applied to
take the next available examination for licensing offered by the commission,
except that the unlicensed chiropractor must provide all services under the
direct control and supervision of a licensed chiropractor approved by the
commission. The unlicensed chiropractor may continue to practice as provided
by this subsection until the results of the next available examination are
published, but in no case for a period longer than six months. The commission
shall adopt rules necessary to effectuate the intent of this subsection.

Any
provision of chiropractic services by any individual under subsection (1), (2),
(3), or (4) of this section shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the
commission as provided in chapter((s 18.26 and)) 18.130 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter
18.26 RCW was repealed by 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 121, effective July 1, 1994.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.27.270 and 1997 c 314 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A contractor who is issued a notice of infraction shall respond within twenty
days of the date of issuance of the notice of infraction.

(2)
If the contractor named in the notice of infraction does not elect to contest
the notice of infraction, then the contractor shall pay to the department, by
check or money order, the amount of the penalty prescribed for the infraction.
When a response which does not contest the notice of infraction is received by
the department with the appropriate penalty, the department shall make the
appropriate entry in its records.

(3)
If the contractor named in the notice of infraction elects to contest the
notice of infraction, the contractor shall respond by filing an answer of
protest with the department specifying the grounds of protest.

(4)
If any contractor issued a notice of infraction fails to respond within the
prescribed response period, the contractor shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and
prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurred.

(5)
After final determination by an administrative law judge that an infraction has
been committed, a contractor who fails to pay a monetary penalty within thirty
days, that is not waived((, reduced, or suspended)) pursuant to RCW
18.27.340(2), and who fails to file an appeal pursuant to RCW 18.27.310(4),
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the county where the
infraction occurred.

(6)
A contractor who fails to pay a monetary penalty within thirty days after
exhausting appellate remedies pursuant to RCW 18.27.310(4), shall be guilty of
a misdemeanor and be prosecuted in the county where the infraction occurred.

(7)
If a contractor who is issued a notice of infraction is a contractor who has
failed to register as a contractor under this chapter, the contractor is
subject to a monetary penalty per infraction as provided in the schedule of
penalties established by the department, and each day the person works without
becoming registered is a separate infraction.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.27.340(2) was amended by 1997 c 314 s 17, removing the reference to a
reduced or suspended monetary penalty.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.39.010 and 1989 c 390 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Funeral director" means a person engaged in the profession or
business of conducting funerals and supervising or directing the burial and
disposal of dead human bodies.

(2)
"Embalmer" means a person engaged in the profession or business of
disinfecting, preserving or preparing for disposal or transportation of dead
human bodies.

(3)
"Two-year college course" means the completion of sixty semester
hours or ninety quarter hours of college credit, including the satisfactory
completion of certain college courses, as set forth in this chapter.

(4)
"Funeral establishment" means a place of business licensed in
accordance with RCW 18.39.145, conducted at a specific street address or
location, and devoted to the care and preparation for burial or disposal of
dead human bodies and includes all areas of such business premises and all
tools, instruments, and supplies used in preparation and embalming of dead
human bodies for burial or disposal.

(5)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(6)
"Board" means the state board of funeral directors and embalmers
created pursuant to RCW 18.39.173.

(7)
"Prearrangement funeral service contract" means any contract under
which, for a specified consideration, a funeral establishment promises, upon
the death of the person named or implied in the contract, to furnish funeral
merchandise or services.

(8)
"Funeral merchandise or services" means those services normally
performed and merchandise normally provided by funeral establishments,
including the sale of burial supplies and equipment, but excluding the sale by a
cemetery of lands or interests therein, services incidental thereto, markers,
memorials, monuments, equipment, crypts, niches, or vaults.

(9)
"Qualified public depositary" means a public depositary
defined by RCW 39.58.010, a credit union as governed by chapter 31.12 RCW, a
mutual savings bank as governed by Title 32 RCW, a savings and loan association
as governed by Title 33 RCW, or a federal credit union or a federal savings and
loan association organized, operated, and governed by any act of congress, in
which prearrangement funeral service contract funds are deposited by any
funeral establishment.

Words
used in this chapter importing the singular may be applied to the plural of the
person or thing, words importing the plural may be applied to the singular, and
words importing the masculine gender may be applied to the female.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
term "depositary" was redefined as "public depositary" by
1996 c 256 s 1.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.39.510 and 1994 c 17 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Prior to serving a statement of charges, the board may furnish a statement of
allegations to the licensee, registrant, endorsement or permit holder, or
applicant along with a detailed summary of the evidence relied upon to
establish the allegations and a proposed stipulation for informal resolution of
the allegations. These documents shall be exempt from public disclosure until
such time as the allegations are resolved either by stipulation or otherwise.

(2)
The board and the licensee, registrant, endorsement or permit holder, or
applicant may stipulate that the allegations may be disposed of informally in
accordance with this subsection. The stipulation shall contain a statement of
the facts leading to the filing of the complaint; the act or acts of
unprofessional conduct alleged to have been committed or the alleged basis for
determining that the licensee, registrant, endorsement or permit holder, or
applicant is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety; a statement
that the stipulation is not to be construed as a finding of either
unprofessional conduct or inability to practice; an acknowledgement that a
finding of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, if proven,
constitutes grounds for discipline under this chapter; an agreement on the part
of the licensee, registrant, endorsement or permit holder, or applicant that
the sanctions set forth in this chapter, except for revocation, suspension,
censure, or reprimand of a licensee, registrant, endorsement ((of [or]))
or permit holder, or applicant may be imposed as part of the
stipulation, except that no fine may be imposed but the licensee, registrant,
endorsement or permit holder, or applicant may agree to reimburse the board the
costs of investigation and processing the complaint up to an amount not
exceeding one thousand dollars per allegation; and an agreement on the part of
the board to forego further disciplinary proceedings concerning the
allegations. A stipulation entered into pursuant to this subsection shall not
be considered formal disciplinary action.

(3)
If the licensee, registrant, endorsement or permit holder, or applicant
declines to agree to disposition of the charges by means of a stipulation pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section, the board may proceed to formal disciplinary
action pursuant to this chapter.

(4)
Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this section by both
the licensee, registrant, endorsement or permit holder, or applicant and the
board, the complaint is deemed disposed of and shall become subject to public
disclosure on the same basis and to the same extent as other records of the
board. Should the licensee, registrant, endorsement or permit ((holer
[holder])) holder, or applicant fail to pay any agreed reimbursement
within thirty days of the date specified in the stipulation for payment, the
board may seek collection of the amount agreed to be paid in the same manner as
enforcement of a fine under this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
manifest drafting errors.

Sec.
11. RCW
18.44.241 and 1987 c 471 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following criteria will be considered by the director when deciding whether to
grant a licensed escrow agent a waiver from the errors and omissions policy
requirement under RCW ((18.44.050)) 18.44.201:

(1)
Whether the director has determined pursuant to RCW ((18.44.360)) 18.44.221
that an errors and omissions policy is not reasonably available to a
substantial number of licensed escrow agents;

(2)
Whether purchasing an errors and omissions policy would be cost-prohibitive for
the licensed escrow agent requesting the exemption;

(3)
Whether a licensed escrow agent has wilfully violated the provisions of chapter
18.44 RCW, which violation thereby resulted in the termination of the agent's
certificate, or engaged in any other conduct resulting in the termination of
the escrow certificate;

(4)
Whether a licensed escrow agent has paid claims directly or through an errors
and omissions carrier, exclusive of costs and attorney fees, in excess of ten
thousand dollars in the calendar year preceding the year for which the waiver
is requested;

(5)
Whether a licensed escrow agent has paid claims directly or through an errors
or omissions insurance carrier, exclusive of costs and attorney fees, totaling
in excess of twenty thousand dollars in the three calendar years preceding the
calendar year for which the exemption is requested; and

(6)
Whether the licensed escrow agent has been convicted of a crime involving
honesty or moral turpitude.

These
criteria are not intended to be a wholly inclusive list of factors to be
applied by the director when considering the merits of a licensed escrow
agent's request for a waiver of the required errors and omissions policy.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.44.050 and 18.44.360 were recodified as RCW 18.44.201 and 18.44.221 pursuant
to 1999 c 30 s 37.

Sec.
12. RCW
18.44.261 and 1987 c 471 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall, within thirty days following submission of a written petition
for waiver of the insurance requirements found in RCW ((18.44.050)) 18.44.201,
issue a written determination granting or rejecting an applicant's request for
waiver.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.44.050 was recodified as RCW 18.44.201 pursuant to 1999 c 30 s 37.

Sec.
13. RCW
18.44.271 and 1987 c 471 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
granting a waiver of insurance requirements found in RCW ((18.44.050)) 18.44.201,
the director shall issue a certificate of waiver, which certificate shall be
mailed to the escrow agent who requested the waiver.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.44.050 was recodified as RCW 18.44.201 pursuant to 1999 c 30 s 37.

Sec.
14. RCW
18.44.281 and 1987 c 471 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
determining that a licensed escrow agent is to be denied a waiver of the errors
and omissions policy requirements of RCW ((18.44.050)) 18.44.201,
the director shall within thirty days of the denial of an escrow agent's
request for same, provide to the escrow agent a written explanation of the
reasons for the director's decision to deny the requested waiver.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.44.050 was recodified as RCW 18.44.201 pursuant to 1999 c 30 s 37.

Sec.
15. RCW
18.44.291 and 1987 c 471 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in RCW ((18.44.050 and 18.44.375 through 18.44.395)) 18.44.201,
18.44.241 through 18.44.261, 18.44.271, and 18.44.281 shall be construed as
prohibiting a person applying for an escrow license from applying for a
certificate of waiver of the errors and omissions policy requirement when
seeking an escrow license.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.44.050 and 18.44.375 through 18.44.395 were recodified as RCW 18.44.201,
18.44.241 through 18.44.261, 18.44.271, and 18.44.281, respectively, pursuant
to 1999 c 30 s 37.

Sec.
16. RCW
18.44.450 and 1999 c 30 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Real property lender" as used in this section means a bank, savings
bank, savings and loan association, credit union, mortgage company, or other
corporation, association, or partnership that makes loans secured by real
property located in this state.

(2)
No real property lender, escrow agent, or officer or employee of any escrow
agent or real property lender may give or agree to pay or give any money,
service, or object of value to any real estate agent or broker, to any real
property lender, or to any officer or employee of any agent, broker, or lender
in return for the referral of any real estate escrow services. Nothing in this
subsection prohibits the payment of fees or other compensation permitted under
the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act as amended (12 U.S.C.
sections 2601 through 2617).

(3)
The legislature finds that the practices governed by this subsection are
matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the
consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Any violation of this section is
not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and
is an unfair and deceptive act or practice and (([an])) an unfair
method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of RCW 19.86.020.
Remedies provided by chapter 19.86 RCW are cumulative and not exclusive.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
17. RCW
18.48.060 and 1998 c 272 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary, in consultation with the secretary of social and health
services, shall appoint an advisory committee on matters relating to the
regulation, administrative rules, enforcement process, staffing, and training
requirements of adult family homes. The advisory committee shall be composed
of six members, of which two members shall be resident advocates, three members
shall represent adult family home providers, and one member shall represent the
public and serve as chair. The members shall generally represent the interests
of aging residents, residents with dementia, residents with mental illness, and
residents with developmental disabilities(([,])), respectively.
Members representing adult family home providers must have at least two years' experience
as licensees. The membership must generally reflect urban and rural areas and
western and eastern parts of the state. A member may not serve more than two
consecutive terms.

(2)
The secretary may remove a member of the advisory committee for cause as
specified by rule adopted by the department. If there is a vacancy, the
secretary shall appoint a member to serve for the remainder of the unexpired
term.

(3)
The advisory committee shall meet at the times and places designated by the
secretary and shall hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide
advice to the secretary on matters relating to the regulation of adult family
homes. A majority of the members may request a meeting of the committee for
any express purpose directly related to the regulation of adult family homes.
A majority of members currently serving shall constitute a quorum.

(4)
Establishment of the advisory committee shall not prohibit the department of
health from utilizing other advisory activities that the department of health
deems necessary for program development.

(5)
Each member of the advisory committee shall serve without compensation but may
be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.060.

(6)
The secretary, members of the advisory committee, or individuals acting on
their behalf are immune from civil liability for official acts performed in the
course of their duties.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest error in punctuation.

Sec.
18. RCW
18.53.040 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to pertain in any manner to the practice of
any regularly qualified oculist or physician, who is regularly licensed to
practice medicine in the state of Washington, or to any person who is regularly
licensed to practice as a dispensing optician in the state of Washington, nor
to any person who in the regular course of trade, sells or offers for sale,
spectacles or eyeglasses as regular merchandise without pretense of adapting
them to the eyes of the purchaser, and not in evasion of this chapter:
PROVIDED, That any such regularly qualified oculist or physician or other
person shall be subject to the provisions of ((subdivisions (10) through
(15) of)) RCW 18.53.140 (9) through (14), in connection with the
performance of any function coming within the definition of the practice of
optometry as defined in this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, HOWEVER, That in no
way shall this section be construed to permit a dispensing optician to practice
optometry as defined in this 1975 amendatory act.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.53.140 was amended by 1986 c 259 s 82, changing subsections (10) through
(15) to subsections (9) through (14), respectively.

Sec.
19. RCW
18.57.174 and 1986 c 300 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(([(1)]))
(1) A health care professional licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW shall
report to the board when he or she has personal knowledge that a practicing
osteopathic physician has either committed an act or acts which may constitute
statutorily defined unprofessional conduct or that a practicing osteopathic
physician may be unable to practice osteopathic medicine with reasonable skill
and safety to patients by reason of illness, drunkenness, excessive use of
drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material, or as a result of
any impairing mental or physical conditions.

(2)
Reporting under this section is not required by:

(a)
An appropriately appointed peer review committee member of a licensed hospital
or by an appropriately designated professional review committee member of an
osteopathic medical society during the investigative phase of their respective
operations if these investigations are completed in a timely manner; or

(b)
A treating licensed health care professional of an osteopathic physician
currently involved in a treatment program as long as the physician patient
actively participates in the treatment program and the physician patient's
impairment does not constitute a clear and present danger to the public health,
safety, or welfare.

(3)
The board may impose disciplinary sanctions, including license suspension or
revocation, on any health care professional subject to the jurisdiction of the
board who has failed to comply with this section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest clerical error.

Sec.
20. RCW
18.57A.060 and 1973 c 77 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

No
health care services may be performed under this chapter in any of the
following areas:

(1)
The measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the determination of
the accommodation and refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its
functions in general, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses or frames for the
aid thereof.

(2)
The prescribing or directing the use of, or using, any optical device in
connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision training or
orthoptics.

(3)
The prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting or adaptation of contact
lenses to, the human eye.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall preclude the performance of routine visual
screening.

(5)
The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in chapter 18.32 and
18.29 RCW respectively. The exemptions set forth in RCW 18.32.030, paragraphs
(1) and (8), shall not apply to a physician's assistant.

(6)
The practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter 18.25 RCW including the
adjustment or manipulation of the articulations of the spine.

(7)
The practice of ((podiatry)) podiatric medicine and surgery as
defined in chapter 18.22 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
term "podiatry" was changed to "podiatric medicine and
surgery" by 1990 c 147.

Sec.
21. RCW
18.64.430 and 1993 c 492 s 267 are each amended to read as follows:

The
registered or licensed pharmacist ((of [under])) under this
chapter shall establish and maintain a procedure for disclosing to physicians
and other health care providers with prescriptive authority information
detailed by prescriber, of the cost and dispensation of all prescriptive
medications prescribed by him or her for his or her patients on request. These
charges should be made available on at least a quarterly basis for all
requested patients and should include medication, dosage, number dispensed, and
the cost of the prescription. Pharmacies may provide this information in a
summary form for each prescribing physician for all patients rather than as
individually itemized reports. All efforts should be made to utilize the
existing computerized records and software to provide this information in the
least costly format.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a grammatical deficiency.

Sec.
22. RCW
18.71.017 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((board [commission])) commission may adopt such rules as are not
inconsistent with the laws of this state as may be determined necessary or proper
to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The commission is the successor in
interest of the board of medical examiners and the medical disciplinary board.
All contracts, undertakings, agreements, rules, regulations, and policies
continue in full force and effect on July 1, 1994, unless otherwise repealed or
rejected by this chapter or by the commission.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
the reference to the Washington state medical quality assurance commission.

Sec.
23. RCW
18.74.012 and 1991 c 12 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 18.74.010(((4))) (3), a consultation and
periodic review by an authorized health care practitioner is not required for
treatment of neuromuscular or musculoskeletal conditions: PROVIDED, That a
physical therapist may only provide treatment utilizing orthoses that support, align,
prevent, or correct any structural problems intrinsic to the foot or ankle by
referral or consultation from an authorized health care practitioner.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.74.010 was amended by 1991 c 12 s 1 and subsection (4) was renumbered as
subsection (3).

Sec.
24. RCW
18.88A.140 and 1991 c 16 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter may be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1)
The practice by an individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws
of this state and performing services within their authorized scope of
practice;

(2)
The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States
while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United
States;

(3)
The practice by a person who is a regular student in an educational program
approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services (([is])) is
pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor
and under the general supervision of the instructor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
25. RCW
18.104.020 and 1993 c 387 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless a
different meaning is plainly required by the context.

(1)
"Abandoned well" means a well that is unused, unmaintained, and is in
such disrepair as to be unusable.

(2)
"Constructing a well" or "construct a well" means:

(a)
Boring, digging, drilling, or excavating a well;

(b)
Installing casing, sheeting, lining, or well screens, in a well; or

(c)
Drilling a geotechnical soil boring.

"Constructing
a well" or "construct a well" includes the alteration of an
existing well.

(3)
"Decommission" means to fill or plug a well so that it will not
produce water, serve as a channel for movement of water or pollution, or allow
the entry of pollutants into the well or aquifers.

(4)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(5)
"Dewatering well" means a cased or lined excavation or boring that is
intended to withdraw or divert ground water for the purpose of facilitating
construction, stabilizing a landslide, or protecting an aquifer.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(7)
"Geotechnical soil boring" or "boring" means an uncased
well drilled for purpose of obtaining soil samples to ascertain structural
properties of the subsurface. Geotechnical soil boring includes auger borings,
rotary borings, cone penetrometer probes and vane shear probes, or any other
uncased ground penetration for geotechnical information.

(8)
"Ground water" means and includes ground waters as defined in RCW
90.44.035.

(9)
"Instrumentation well" means a well in which pneumatic or electric
geotechnical or hydrological instrumentation is permanently or periodically
installed to measure or monitor subsurface strength and movement.
Instrumentation well includes borehole extensometers, slope indicators,
pneumatic or electric pore pressure transducers, and load cells.

(10)
"Monitoring well" means a well designed to obtain a representative
ground water sample or designed to measure the water level elevation in either
clean or contaminated water or soil.

(11)
"Observation well" means a well designed to measure the depth to the
water level elevation in either clean or contaminated water or soil.

(12)
"Operator" means a person who (a) is employed by a well contractor;
(b) is licensed under this chapter; or (c) who controls, supervises, or
oversees the construction of a well or who operates well construction
equipment.

(13)
"Owner" or "well owner" means the person, firm,
partnership, copartnership, corporation(([,])), association, or
other entity who owns the property on which the well is or will be constructed.

(14)
"Pollution" and "contamination" have the meanings provided
in RCW 90.48.020.

(15)
"Resource protection well" means a cased boring used to determine the
existence or migration of pollutants within an underground formation. Resource
protection wells include monitoring wells, observation wells, piezometers,
spill response wells, vapor extraction wells, and instrumentation wells.

(16)
"Resource protection well contractor" means any person, firm,
partnership, copartnership, corporation, association, or other entity, licensed
and bonded under chapter 18.27 RCW, engaged in the business of constructing
resource protection wells or geotechnical soil borings.

(17)
"Water well" means any excavation that is constructed when the
intended use of the well is for the location, diversion, artificial recharge,
observation, monitoring, dewatering, or withdrawal of ground water.

(18)
"Water well contractor" means any person, firm, partnership,
copartnership, corporation, association, or other entity, licensed and bonded
under chapter 18.27 RCW, engaged in the business of constructing water wells.

(19)
"Well" means water wells, resource protection wells, instrumentation
wells, dewatering wells, and geotechnical soil borings. Well does not mean an
excavation made for the purpose of obtaining or prospecting for oil, natural
gas, geothermal resources, minerals, or products of mining, or quarrying, or
for inserting media to repressure oil or natural gas bearing formations, or for
storing petroleum, natural gas, or other products.

(20)
"Well contractor" means a resource protection well contractor and a
water well contractor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest error in punctuation.

Sec.
26. RCW
18.106.180 and 1996 c 147 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

An
authorized representative of the department may issue a notice of infraction as
specified in RCW 18.106.020(((3))) (4) if a person who is doing
plumbing work or who is offering to do plumbing work fails to produce evidence
of having a certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with
this chapter or of being supervised by a person who has such a certificate or
permit. A notice of infraction issued under this section shall be personally
served on the person named in the notice by an authorized representative of the
department or sent by certified mail to the last known address provided to the
department of the person named in the notice.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.106.020 was amended by 1997 c 326 s 3, changing subsection (3) to subsection
(4).

Sec.
27. RCW
18.106.250 and 1994 c 174 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The administrative law judge shall conduct notice of infraction cases under
this chapter pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2)
The burden of proof is on the department to establish the commission of the
infraction by a preponderance of the evidence. The notice of infraction shall
be dismissed if the defendant establishes that, at the time the notice was
issued:

(a)
The defendant who was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW
18.106.020(((3)(a))) (4)(a) had a certificate or permit issued by
the department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a person who
has such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this chapter under RCW
18.106.150; or

(b)
For the defendant who was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW
18.106.020(((3))) (4) (b) or (c), the person employed or
supervised by the defendant has a certificate or permit issued by the
department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a person who had
such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this chapter under RCW
18.106.150.

(3)
After consideration of the evidence and argument, the administrative law judge
shall determine whether the infraction was committed. If it has not been
established that the infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice
shall be entered in the record of the proceedings. If it has been established
that the infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order determining
whether the infraction was committed.

(4)
An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or order shall be
to the superior court. The decision of the superior court is subject only to
discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
18.106.020 was amended by 1997 c 326 s 3, changing subsection (3) to subsection
(4).

Sec.
28. RCW
18.130.172 and 1993 c 367 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Prior to serving a statement of charges under RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170, the
disciplinary authority may furnish a statement of allegations to the licensee
or applicant along with a detailed summary of the evidence relied upon to
establish the allegations and a proposed stipulation for informal resolution of
the allegations. These documents shall be exempt from public disclosure until
such time as the allegations are resolved either by stipulation or otherwise.

(2)
The disciplinary authority and the applicant or licensee may stipulate that the
allegations may be disposed of informally in accordance with this subsection.
The stipulation shall contain a statement of the facts leading to the filing of
the complaint; the act or acts of unprofessional ((conducted [conduct]))
conduct alleged to have been committed or the alleged basis for
determining that the applicant or licensee is unable to practice with
reasonable skill and safety; a statement that the stipulation is not to be
construed as a finding of either unprofessional conduct or inability to
practice; an acknowledgement that a finding of unprofessional conduct or
inability to practice, if proven, constitutes grounds for discipline under this
chapter; and an agreement on the part of the licensee or applicant that the
sanctions set forth in RCW 18.130.160, except RCW 18.130.160 (1), (2), (6), and
(8), may be imposed as part of the stipulation, except that no fine may be
imposed but the licensee or applicant may agree to reimburse the disciplinary
authority the costs of investigation and processing the complaint up to an
amount not exceeding one thousand dollars per allegation; and an agreement on
the part of the disciplinary authority to forego further disciplinary
proceedings concerning the allegations. A stipulation entered into pursuant to
this subsection shall not be considered formal disciplinary action.

(3)
If the licensee or applicant declines to agree to disposition of the charges by
means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the
disciplinary authority may proceed to formal disciplinary action pursuant to
RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170.

(4)
Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this section by both
the licensee or applicant and the disciplinary authority, the complaint is
deemed disposed of and shall become subject to public disclosure on the same
basis and to the same extent as other records of the disciplinary authority.
Should the licensee or applicant fail to pay any agreed reimbursement within
thirty days of the date specified in the stipulation for payment, the
disciplinary authority may seek collection of the amount agreed to be paid in
the same manner as enforcement of a fine under RCW 18.130.165.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
29. RCW
18.135.060 and 1993 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section:

(a)
Any health care assistant certified pursuant to this chapter shall perform the
functions authorized in this chapter only by delegation of authority from the
health care practitioner and under the supervision of a health care
practitioner acting within the scope of his or her license. In the case of
subcutaneous, intradermal and intramuscular and intravenous injections, a
health care assistant may perform such functions only under the supervision of
a health care practitioner having authority, within the scope of his or her
license, to order such procedures.

(b)
The health care practitioner who ordered the procedure or a health care
practitioner who could order the procedure under his or her license shall be
physically present in the immediate area of a hospital or nursing home where
the injection is administered. Sensitivity agents being administered
intradermally or by the scratch method are excluded from this requirement.

(2)
A health care assistant trained by a federally approved end-stage renal disease
facility may perform venipuncture for blood withdrawal, administration of
oxygen as necessary by cannula or mask, venipuncture for placement of fistula
needles, intravenous administration of heparin and sodium chloride solutions as
an integral part of dialysis treatment, and intradermal, subcutaneous, or
topical administration of local anesthetics in conjunction with placement of
fistula needles, and intraperitoneal administration of sterile electrolyte
solutions and heparin for peritoneal dialysis: (a) In the center or health
care facility if a registered nurse licensed under chapter ((18.88)) 18.79
RCW is physically present and immediately available in such center or health
care facility; or (b) in the patient's home if a physician and a registered nurse
are available for consultation during the dialysis.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter
18.88 RCW was repealed by 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 433, effective July 1, 1994, and
replaced by chapter 18.79 RCW.

Sec.
30. RCW
18.145.010 and 1989 c 382 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may represent himself or herself as a ((shorthand reporter or a))
court reporter without first obtaining a certificate as required by this
chapter.

(2)
A person represents himself or herself to be a ((shorthand reporter or))
court reporter when the person adopts or uses any title or description of
services that incorporates one or more of the following terms: "Shorthand
reporter," "court reporter," "certified shorthand
reporter," or "certified court reporter."

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

"Shorthand
reporter" or "court reporter" now just "court
reporter" pursuant to 1995 c 27.

Sec.
31. RCW
18.155.010 and 1990 c 3 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that sex offender therapists who examine and treat sex
offenders pursuant to the special sexual offender sentencing alternative under
RCW 9.94A.120(((7)(a))) (8)(a) and who may treat juvenile sex
offenders pursuant to RCW 13.40.160, play a vital role in protecting the public
from sex offenders who remain in the community following conviction. The
legislature finds that the qualifications, practices, techniques, and
effectiveness of sex offender treatment providers vary widely and that the
court's ability to effectively determine the appropriateness of granting the
sentencing alternative and monitoring the offender to ensure continued
protection of the community is undermined by a lack of regulated practices.
The legislature recognizes the right of sex offender therapists to practice,
consistent with the paramount requirements of public safety. Public safety is
best served by regulating sex offender therapists whose clients are being
evaluated and being treated pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(((7)(a))) (8)(a)
and 13.40.160. This chapter shall be construed to require only those sex
offender therapists who examine and treat sex offenders pursuant to RCW
9.94A.120(((7)(a))) (8)(a) and 13.40.160 to obtain a sexual
offender treatment certification as provided in this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
9.94A.120 was amended by 1995 c 108 s 3, changing subsection (7) to subsection
(8).

Sec.
32. RCW
18.155.020 and 1990 c 3 s 802 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Certified sex offender treatment provider" means a licensed, certified,
or registered health professional who is certified to examine and treat sex
offenders pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(((7)(a))) (8)(a) and
13.40.160.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(4)
"Sex offender treatment provider" means a person who counsels or
treats sex offenders accused of or convicted of a sex offense as defined by RCW
9.94A.030.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
9.94A.120 was amended by 1995 c 108 s 3, changing subsection (7) to subsection
(8).

Sec.
33. RCW
18.155.030 and 1990 c 3 s 803 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall represent himself or herself as a certified sex offender
treatment provider without first applying for and receiving a certificate
pursuant to this chapter.

(2)
Only a certified sex offender treatment provider may perform or provide the
following services:

(a)
Evaluations conducted for the purposes of and pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(((7)(a)))
(8)(a) and 13.40.160;

(b)
Treatment of convicted sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into
treatment pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(((7)(a))) (8)(a) and
adjudicated juvenile sex offenders who are ordered into treatment pursuant to
RCW 13.40.160.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
9.94A.120 was amended by 1995 c 108 s 3, changing subsection (7) to subsection
(8).

Sec.
34. RCW
18.160.030 and 1992 c 116 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter shall be administered by the state director of fire protection.

(2)
The state director of fire protection shall have the authority, and it shall be
his or her duty to:

(a)
Issue such administrative regulations as necessary for the administration of
this chapter;

(b)(i)
Set reasonable fees for licenses, certificates, testing, and other aspects of
the administration of this chapter. However, the license fee for fire
protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation,
inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-D fire protection sprinkler
systems shall not exceed one hundred dollars, and the license fee for fire
protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation,
inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-R fire protection sprinkler
systems shall not exceed three hundred dollars;

(ii)
Adopt rules establishing a special category restricted to contractors registered
under chapter 18.27 RCW who install underground systems that service fire
protection sprinkler systems. The rules shall be adopted within ninety days of
March 31, 1992;

(c)
Enforce the provisions of this chapter;

(d)
Conduct investigations of complaints to determine if any infractions of this
chapter or the regulations developed under this chapter have occurred;

(e)
((Work with the fire sprinkler advisory committee consisting of fire
protection sprinkler system contractors and other related officials;

(f)))
Assign a certificate number to each certificate of competency holder; and

(((g)))
(f) Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer a program which
requires the affixation of a seal any time a fire protection sprinkler system
is installed, which seal shall include the certificate number of any
certificate of competency holder who installs, in whole or in part, the fire
protection sprinkler system.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
section creating the fire sprinkler advisory committee, 1990 c 177 s 9, was
vetoed by the governor.

Sec.
35. RCW
18.160.040 and 1990 c 177 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To become a certificate of competency holder under this chapter, an applicant
must have satisfactorily passed an examination administered by the state
director of fire protection. A certificate of competency holder can satisfy
this examination requirement by presenting a copy of a current certificate of
competency from the national institute for certification in engineering
technologies showing that the applicant has achieved the classification of
engineering technician level 3 or senior engineering technician level 4 in the
field of fire protection, automatic sprinkler system layout. The state
director of fire protection may accept equivalent proof of qualification in
lieu of examination((, as recommended by the fire sprinkler advisory
committee)). This examination requirement is mandatory except as otherwise
provided in this chapter.

(2)
Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall fulfill the requirements
established by the state director of fire protection ((and the fire
protection sprinkler system technical advisory committee)) under chapter
34.05 RCW.

(3)
Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall make application to the
state director of fire protection and pay the fees required.

(4)
Provided the application for the certificate of competency is made prior to
ninety days after May 1, 1991, the state director of fire protection, in lieu
of the examination requirements of the applicant for a certificate of
competency, may accept as satisfactory evidence of competency and
qualification, affidavits attesting that the applicant has had a minimum of
three years' experience.

(5)
The state director of fire protection may((, after consultation with the
fire sprinkler advisory committee,)) issue a temporary certificate of
competency to an applicant who, in his or her judgment, will satisfactorily
perform as a certificate of competency holder under the provisions of this
chapter. The temporary certificate of competency shall remain in effect for a
period of up to three years. The temporary certificate of competency holder shall,
within the three-year period, complete the examination requirements specified
in subsection (1) of this section. There shall be no examination exemption for
an individual issued a temporary certificate of competency. Prior to the
expiration of the three-year period, the temporary certificate of competency
holder shall make application for a regular certificate of competency. The
procedures and qualifications for issuance of a regular certificate of
competency shall be applicable to the temporary certificate of competency
holder. When a temporary certificate of competency expires, the holder shall
cease all activities associated with the holding of a temporary certificate of
competency, subject to the penalties contained in this chapter.

(6)
To become a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor under this
chapter, a person or firm must comply with the following:

(a)
Must be or have in his or her full-time employ a holder of a valid certificate
of competency;

(b)
Comply with the minimum insurance requirements of this chapter; and

(c)
Make application to the state director of fire protection for a license and pay
the fees required.

(7)
Each license and certificate of competency issued under this chapter must be
posted in a conspicuous place in the fire protection sprinkler system
contractor's place of business.

(8)
All bids, advertisements, proposals, offers, and installation drawings for fire
protection sprinkler systems must prominently display the fire protection
sprinkler system contractor's license number.

(9)
A certificate of competency or license issued under this chapter is not
transferable.

(10)
In no case shall a certificate of competency holder be employed full time by
more than one fire protection sprinkler system contractor at the same time. If
the certificate of competency holder should leave the employment of the fire
protection sprinkler system contractor, he or she must notify the state
director of fire protection within thirty days. If the certificate of
competency holder should leave the employment of the fire protection sprinkler
system contractor, the contractor shall have six months or until the expiration
of the current license, whichever occurs last, to submit a new application
identifying another certificate of competency holder who is at the time of
application an owner of the fire protection sprinkler system business or a
full-time employee of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, in order
to be issued a new license. If such application is not received and a new
license issued within the allotted time, the state director of fire protection
shall revoke the license of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
section creating the fire sprinkler advisory committee, 1990 c 177 s 9, was
vetoed by the governor.

Sec.
36. RCW
18.165.020 and 1995 c 277 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The
requirements of this chapter do not apply to:

(1)
A person who is employed exclusively or regularly by one employer and performs
investigations solely in connection with the affairs of that employer, if the
employer is not a private investigator agency;

(2)
An officer or employee of the United States or of this state or a political
subdivision thereof, while engaged in the performance of the officer's official
duties;

(3)
A person engaged exclusively in the business of obtaining and furnishing information
about the financial rating of persons;

(4)
An attorney at law while performing the attorney's duties as an attorney;

(5)
A licensed collection agency or its employee, while acting within the scope of
that person's employment and making an investigation incidental to the business
of the agency;

(6)
Insurers, agents, and insurance brokers licensed by the state, while performing
duties in connection with insurance transacted by them;

(7)
A bank subject to the jurisdiction of the ((Washington state banking
commission)) department of financial institutions or the comptroller
of currency of the United States, or a savings and loan association subject to
the jurisdiction of this state or the federal home loan bank board;

(8)
A licensed insurance adjuster performing the adjuster's duties within the scope
of the adjuster's license;

(9)
A secured creditor engaged in the repossession of the creditor's collateral, or
a lessor engaged in the repossession of leased property in which it claims an
interest;

(10)
A person who is a forensic scientist, accident reconstructionist, or other
person who performs similar functions and does not hold himself or herself out
to be an investigator in any other capacity; or

(11)
A person solely engaged in the business of securing information about persons
or property from public records.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Powers,
duties, and functions of the department of general administration relating to
financial institutions were transferred to the department of financial
institutions by 1993 c 472, effective October 1, 1993. See chapter 43.320 RCW.

Sec.
37. RCW
18.165.130 and 1995 c 277 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A private investigator agency shall notify the director within thirty days
after the death or termination of employment of any employee who is a licensed
private investigator or armed private investigator by returning the license to
the department with the word ((["]terminated["])) "terminated"
written across the face of the license, the date of termination, and the
signature of the principal of the private investigator company.

(2)
A private investigator agency shall notify the director within seventy-two
hours and the chief law enforcement officer of the county, city, or town in
which the agency is located immediately upon receipt of information affecting a
licensed private investigator's or armed private investigator's continuing
eligibility to hold a license under the provisions of this chapter.

(3)
A private investigator company shall notify the local law enforcement agency
whenever an employee who is an armed private investigator discharges his or her
firearm while on duty other than on a supervised firearm range. The
notification shall be made within ten business days of the date the firearm is
discharged.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
38. RCW
18.170.110 and 1995 c 277 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A private security company shall notify the director within thirty days after
the death or termination of employment of any employee who is a licensed
private security guard or armed private security guard by returning the license
to the department with the word ((["]terminated["])) "terminated"
written across the face of the license, the date of termination, and the
signature of the principal or the principal's designee of the private security
guard company.

(2)
A private security company shall notify the department within seventy-two hours
and the chief law enforcement officer of the county, city, or town in which the
private security guard or armed private security guard was last employed
immediately upon receipt of information affecting his or her continuing
eligibility to hold a license under the provisions of this chapter.

(3)
A private security guard company shall notify the local law enforcement agency
whenever an employee who is an armed private security guard discharges his or
her firearm while on duty other than on a supervised firearm range. The
notification shall be made within ten business days of the date the firearm is
discharged.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
39. RCW
18.185.010 and 1996 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(2)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(3)
"Collateral or security" means property of any kind given as security
to obtain a bail bond.

(4)
"Bail bond agency" means a business that sells and issues corporate
surety bail bonds or that provides security in the form of personal or real
property to insure the appearance of a criminal defendant before the courts of
this state or the United States.

(5)
"Qualified agent" means an owner, sole proprietor, partner, manager,
officer, or chief operating officer of a corporation who meets the requirements
set forth in this chapter for obtaining a bail bond agency license.

(6)
"Bail bond agent" means a person who is employed by a bail bond
agency and engages in the sale or issuance of bail bonds, but does not mean a
clerical, secretarial, or other support person who does not participate in the
sale or issuance of bail bonds.

(7)
"Licensee" means a bail bond agency or a bail bond agent or both.

(8)
"Branch office" means any office physically separated from the
principal place of business of the licensee from which the licensee or an
employee or agents conduct any activity meeting the criteria of (([a])) a
bail bond agency.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
40. RCW
18.205.030 and 1998 c 243 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person may represent oneself as a certified chemical dependency professional or
use any title or description of services of (([a])) a certified
chemical dependency professional without applying for certification, meeting
the required qualifications, and being certified by the department of health,
unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
41. RCW
18.205.100 and 1998 c 243 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary may establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of
educational programs and alternative training. The secretary may utilize or
contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession
or in education to assist in the evaluations. The secretary shall establish by
rule the standards and procedures for revocation of approval of ((education
[educational])) educational programs. The standards and procedures
set shall apply equally to educational programs and training in the United
States and in foreign jurisdictions. The secretary may establish a fee for
educational program evaluations.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
42. RCW
19.02.110 and 1988 c 5 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the licenses processed under the master license system prior to
April 1, 1982, on July 1, 1982, use of the master license system shall be
expanded as provided by this section.

Applications
for the following shall be filed with the business license center and shall be
processed, and renewals shall be issued, under the master license system:

(1)
Nursery dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.13 RCW;

(2)
Seed dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.49 RCW;

(3)
Pesticide dealer's licenses required by chapter 15.58 RCW;

(4)
Shopkeeper's licenses required by chapter 18.64 RCW;

(5)
Refrigerated locker licenses required by chapter 19.32 RCW;

(6)
((Wholesalers licenses and retailers licenses required by chapter 19.91 RCW;

(7))) Egg
dealer's licenses required by chapter 69.25 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter
19.91 RCW was repealed by 1986 c 321 s 14, effective July 1, 1991.

Sec.
43. RCW
19.02.800 and 1982 c 182 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW 43.07.200, the provisions of this chapter regarding the
processing of license applications and renewals under a master license system
shall not apply to those business or professional activities that are licensed
or regulated under chapter 31.04, ((31.08,)) 31.12, 31.12A, or 31.13 RCW
or under Title 30, 32, 33, or 48 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter
31.08 RCW was repealed by 1991 c 208 s 24, effective January 1, 1993.

Sec.
44. RCW
19.27A.050 and 1985 c 144 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, references to the state building code ((advisory))
council shall be construed to include any successor agency.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
"state building code advisory council" was redesignated as the
"state building code council" by 1985 c 360 s 11.

Sec.
45. RCW
19.28.015 and 1988 c 81 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Disputes
arising under RCW 19.28.010(((2))) (3) regarding whether the city
or town's electrical rules, regulations, or ordinances are equal to the rules
adopted by the department shall be resolved by arbitration. The department
shall appoint two members of the board to serve on the arbitration panel, and
the city or town shall appoint two persons to serve on the arbitration panel.
These four persons shall choose a fifth person to serve. If the four persons
cannot agree on a fifth person, the presiding judge of the superior court of the
county in which the city or town is located shall choose a fifth person. A
decision of the arbitration panel may be appealed to the superior court of the
county in which the city or town is located within thirty days after the date
the panel issues its final decision.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
19.28.010 was reenacted and amended by 1992 c 79 s 2, changing subsection (2)
to subsection (3).

Sec.
46. RCW
19.28.370 and 1980 c 30 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of RCW 19.28.010 through ((19.28.380)) 19.28.360 shall
not apply to the work of installing, maintaining or repairing any and all
electrical wires, apparatus, installations or equipment used or to be used by a
telegraph company or a telephone company in the exercise of its functions and
located outdoors or in a building or buildings used exclusively for that
purpose.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
19.28.380 was repealed by 1986 c 156 s 18.

Sec.
47. RCW
19.30.200 and 1985 c 280 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person who knowingly uses the services of an unlicensed farm labor contractor
shall be personally, jointly, and severally liable with the person acting as a
farm labor contractor to the same extent and in the same manner as provided in
this chapter. In making determinations under this ((subsection [section]))
section, any user may rely upon either the license issued by the
director to the farm labor contractor under RCW 19.30.030 or the director's
representation that such contractor is licensed as required by this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
an inaccurate reference.

Sec.
48. RCW
19.32.150 and 1943 c 117 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of agriculture shall cause to be made periodically a thorough
inspection of each establishment licensed under this chapter to determine
whether or not the premises are constructed, equipped and operated in
accordance with the requirements of this chapter and of all other laws of this
state applicable to the operation either of refrigerated lockers or of the
handling of human food in connection therewith, and of all regulations
effective under this chapter relative to such operation. Such inspection shall
also be made of each vehicle used by (([an])) an operator of
refrigerated lockers or of an establishment handling human food in connection
therewith, when such vehicle is used in transporting or distributing human food
products to or from refrigerated lockers within this state.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
49. RCW
19.34.020 and 1999 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Accept a certificate" means to manifest approval of a certificate,
while knowing or having notice of its contents. Such approval may be manifested
by the use of the certificate.

(2)
"Accept a digital signature" means to verify a digital signature or
take an action in reliance on a digital signature.

(3)
"Asymmetric cryptosystem" means an algorithm or series of algorithms
that provide a secure key pair.

(4)
"Certificate" means a computer-based record that:

(a)
Identifies the certification authority issuing it;

(b)
Names or identifies its subscriber;

(c)
Contains the subscriber's public key; and

(d)
Is digitally signed by the certification authority issuing it.

(5)
"Certification authority" means a person who issues a certificate.

(6)
"Certification authority disclosure record" means an on-line,
publicly accessible record that concerns a licensed certification authority and
is kept by the secretary.

(7)
"Certification practice statement" means a declaration of the
practices that a certification authority employs in issuing certificates.

(8)
"Certify" means to declare with reference to a certificate, with
ample opportunity to reflect, and with a duty to apprise oneself of all
material facts.

(9)
"Confirm" means to ascertain through appropriate inquiry and
investigation.

(10)
"Correspond," with reference to keys, means to belong to the same key
pair.

(11)
"Digital signature" means an electronic signature that is a
transformation of a message using an asymmetric cryptosystem such that a person
having the initial message and the signer's public key can accurately
determine:

(a)
Whether the transformation was created using the private key that corresponds
to the signer's public key; and

(b)
Whether the initial message has been altered since the transformation was made.

(12)
"Electronic" means electrical, digital, magnetic, optical,
electromagnetic, or any other form of technology that entails capabilities
similar to these technologies.

(13)
"Electronic record" means a record generated, communicated, received,
or stored by electronic means for use in an information system or for
transmission from one information system to another.

(14)
"Electronic signature" means a signature in electronic form attached
to or logically associated with an electronic record, including but not limited
to a digital signature.

(15)
"Financial institution" means a national or state-chartered
commercial bank or trust company, savings bank, savings association, or credit
union authorized to do business in the state of Washington and the deposits of
which are federally insured.

(16)
"Forge a digital signature" means either:

(a)
To create a digital signature without the authorization of the rightful holder
of the private key; or

(b)
To create a digital signature verifiable by a certificate listing as subscriber
a person who either:

(i)
Does not exist; or

(ii)
Does not hold the private key corresponding to the public key listed in the
certificate.

(17)
"Hold a private key" means to be authorized to utilize a private key.

(18)
"Incorporate by reference" means to make one message a part of
another message by identifying the message to be incorporated and expressing
the intention that it be incorporated.

(19)
"Issue a certificate" means the acts of a certification authority in
creating a certificate and notifying the subscriber listed in the certificate
of the contents of the certificate.

(20)
"Key pair" means a private key and its corresponding public key in an
asymmetric cryptosystem, keys which have the property that the public key can
verify a digital signature that the private key creates.

(21)
"Licensed certification authority" means a certification authority to
whom a license has been issued by the secretary and whose license is in effect.

(22)
"Message" means a digital representation of information.

(23)
"Notify" means to communicate a fact to another person in a manner
reasonably likely under the circumstances to impart knowledge of the
information to the other person.

(24)
"Official public business" means any legally authorized transaction
or communication among state agencies, tribes, and local governments, or between
a state agency, tribe, or local government and a private person or entity.

(25)
"Operative personnel" means one or more natural persons acting as a
certification authority or its agent, or in the employment of, or under
contract with, a certification authority, and who have:

(a)
Duties directly involving the issuance of certificates, (([or])) or
creation of private keys;

(b)
Responsibility for the secure operation of the trustworthy system used by the
certification authority or any recognized repository;

(c)
Direct responsibility, beyond general supervisory authority, for establishing
or adopting policies regarding the operation and security of the certification
authority; or

(d)
Such other responsibilities or duties as the secretary may establish by rule.

(26)
"Person" means a human being or an organization capable of signing a
document, either legally or as a matter of fact.

(27)
"Private key" means the key of a key pair used to create a digital
signature.

(28)
"Public key" means the key of a key pair used to verify a digital
signature.

(29)
"Publish" means to make information publicly available.

(30)
"Qualified right to payment" means an award of damages against a
licensed certification authority by a court having jurisdiction over the
certification authority in a civil action for violation of this chapter.

(31)
"Recipient" means a person who has received a certificate and a
digital signature verifiable with reference to a public key listed in the
certificate and is in a position to rely on it.

(32)
"Recognized repository" means a repository recognized by the
secretary under RCW 19.34.400.

(33)
"Recommended reliance limit" means the monetary amount recommended
for reliance on a certificate under RCW 19.34.280(1).

(34)
"Repository" means a system for storing and retrieving certificates
and other information relevant to digital signatures.

(35)
"Revoke a certificate" means to make a certificate ineffective
permanently from a specified time forward. Revocation is effected by notation
or inclusion in a set of revoked certificates, and does not imply that a
revoked certificate is destroyed or made illegible.

(36)
"Rightfully hold a private key" means the authority to utilize a
private key:

(a)
That the holder or the holder's agents have not disclosed to a person in
violation of RCW 19.34.240(1); and

(b)
That the holder has not obtained through theft, deceit, eavesdropping, or other
unlawful means.

(37)
"Secretary" means the secretary of state.

(38)
"Subscriber" means a person who:

(a)
Is the subject listed in a certificate;

(b)
Applies for or accepts the certificate; and

(c)
Holds a private key that corresponds to a public key listed in that
certificate.

(39)
"Suitable guaranty" means either a surety bond executed by a surety
authorized by the insurance commissioner to do business in this state, or an
irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution authorized to do
business in this state, which, in either event, satisfies all of the following
requirements:

(a)
It is issued payable to the secretary for the benefit of persons holding
qualified rights of payment against the licensed certification authority named
as the principal of the bond or customer of the letter of credit;

(b)
It is in an amount specified by rule by the secretary under RCW 19.34.030;

(c)
It states that it is issued for filing under this chapter;

(d)
It specifies a term of effectiveness extending at least as long as the term of
the license to be issued to the certification authority; and

(e)
It is in a form prescribed or approved by rule by the secretary.

A
suitable guaranty may also provide that the total annual liability on the
guaranty to all persons making claims based on it may not exceed the face
amount of the guaranty.

(40)
"Suspend a certificate" means to make a certificate ineffective
temporarily for a specified time forward.

(41)
"Time stamp" means either:

(a)
To append or attach a digitally signed notation indicating at least the date,
time, and identity of the person appending or attaching the notation to a
message, digital signature, or certificate; or

(b)
The notation thus appended or attached.

(42)
"Transactional certificate" means a valid certificate incorporating
by reference one or more digital signatures.

(43)
"Trustworthy system" means computer hardware and software that:

(a)
Are reasonably secure from intrusion and misuse; and

(b)
Conform with the requirements established by the secretary by rule.

(44)
"Valid certificate" means a certificate that:

(a)
A licensed certification authority has issued;

(b)
The subscriber listed in it has accepted;

(c)
Has not been revoked or suspended; and

(d)
Has not expired.

However,
a transactional certificate is a valid certificate only in relation to the
digital signature incorporated in it by reference.

(45)
"Verify a digital signature" means, in relation to a given digital
signature, message, and public key, to determine accurately that:

(a)
The digital signature was created by the private key corresponding to the
public key; and

(b)
The message has not been altered since its digital signature was created.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
50. RCW
19.34.250 and 1999 c 287 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the certification authority provides otherwise in the certificate or its
certification practice statement, the licensed certification authority that
issued a certificate that is not a transactional certificate must suspend the
certificate for a period not to exceed five business days:

(a)
Upon request by a person whom the certification authority reasonably believes
to be: (i) The subscriber named in the certificate; (ii) a person duly
authorized to act for that subscriber; or (iii) a person acting on behalf of
the unavailable subscriber; or

(b)
By order of the secretary under RCW 19.34.210(((5))) (7).

The
certification authority need not confirm the identity or agency of the person
requesting suspension. The certification authority may require the person
requesting suspension to provide evidence, including a statement under oath or
affirmation, regarding the requestor's identity, authorization, or the
unavailability of the subscriber. Law enforcement agencies may investigate
suspensions for possible wrongdoing by persons requesting suspension.

(2)
Unless the certification authority provides otherwise in the certificate or its
certification practice statement, the secretary may suspend a certificate
issued by a licensed certification authority for a period not to exceed five
business days, if:

(a)
A person identifying himself or herself as the subscriber named in the
certificate, a person authorized to act for that subscriber, or a person acting
on behalf of that unavailable subscriber (([requests suspension])) requests
suspension; and

(b)
The requester represents that the certification authority that issued the
certificate is unavailable.

The
secretary may require the person requesting suspension to provide evidence,
including a statement under oath or affirmation, regarding his or her identity,
authorization, or the unavailability of the issuing certification authority,
and may decline to suspend the certificate in its discretion. Law enforcement
agencies may investigate suspensions by the secretary for possible wrongdoing
by persons requesting suspension.

(3)
Immediately upon suspension of a certificate by a licensed certification authority,
the licensed certification authority must give notice of the suspension
according to the specification in the certificate. If one or more repositories
are specified, then the licensed certification authority must publish a signed
notice of the suspension in all the repositories. If a repository no longer
exists or refuses to accept publication, or if no repository is recognized
under RCW 19.34.400, the licensed certification authority must also publish the
notice in a recognized repository. If a certificate is suspended by the
secretary, the secretary must give notice as required in this subsection for a
licensed certification authority, provided that the person requesting
suspension pays in advance any fee required by a repository for publication of
the notice of suspension.

(4)
A certification authority must terminate a suspension initiated by request
only:

(a)
If the subscriber named in the suspended certificate requests termination of
the suspension, the certification authority has confirmed that the person
requesting suspension is the subscriber or an agent of the subscriber
authorized to terminate the suspension; or

(b)
When the certification authority discovers and confirms that the request for
the suspension was made without authorization by the subscriber. However, this
subsection (4)(b) does not require the certification authority to confirm a
request for suspension.

(5)
The contract between a subscriber and a licensed certification authority may
limit or preclude requested suspension by the certification authority, or may
provide otherwise for termination of a requested suspension. However, if the
contract limits or precludes suspension by the secretary when the issuing
certification authority is unavailable, the limitation or preclusion is
effective only if notice of it is published in the certificate.

(6)
No person may knowingly or intentionally misrepresent to a certification
authority his or her identity or authorization in requesting suspension of a
certificate. Violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

(7)
The secretary may authorize other state or local governmental agencies to
perform any of the functions of the secretary under this section upon a
regional basis. The authorization must be formalized by an agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW. The secretary may provide by rule the terms and conditions
of the regional services.

(8)
A suspension under this section must be completed within twenty-four hours of
receipt of all information required in this section.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
19.34.210 was amended by 1999 c 287 s 11, changing subsection (5) to subsection
(7). Also corrects an apparent drafting error.

Sec.
51. RCW
19.34.901 and 1997 c 27 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Sections ((1 [101])) 101 through 601, 604, and 605, chapter 250,
Laws of 1996 take effect January 1, 1998.

(2)
Sections 602 and 603, chapter 250, Laws of 1996 take effect July 27, 1997.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest drafting error.

Sec.
52. RCW
19.36.100 and 1990 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Credit
agreement" means an agreement, promise, or commitment to lend money, to
otherwise extend credit, to forbear with respect to the repayment of any debt
or the exercise of any remedy, to modify or amend the terms under which the
creditor has lent money or otherwise extended credit, to release any guarantor
or ((consigner [cosigner])) cosigner, or to make any other
financial accommodation pertaining to a debt or other extension of credit.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
an apparent typographical error.

Sec.
53. RCW
19.40.071 and 1987 c 444 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(a)
In an action for relief against a transfer or obligation under this chapter, a
creditor, subject to the limitations in RCW 19.40.081, may obtain:

(1)
Avoidance of the transfer or obligation to the extent necessary to satisfy the
creditor's claim;

(2)
An attachment or other provisional remedy against the asset transferred or
other property of the transferee in accordance with the procedure prescribed by
chapter ((7.12)) 6.25 RCW;

(3)
Subject to applicable principles of equity and in accordance with applicable
rules of civil procedure:

(i)
An injunction against further disposition by the debtor or a transferee, or
both, of the asset transferred or of other property;

(ii)
Appointment of a receiver to take charge of the asset transferred or of other
property of the transferee; or

(iii)
Any other relief the circumstances may require.

(b)
If a creditor has obtained a judgment on a claim against the debtor, the
creditor, if the court so orders, may levy execution on the asset transferred
or its proceeds.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Chapter
7.12 RCW was recodified by 1987 c 442 s 1121. Of the thirty-two sections that
previously comprised chapter 7.12 RCW, twenty-four sections were recodified in
chapter 6.25 RCW, seven sections were repealed, and one section was recodified
in chapter 6.17 RCW.

Sec.
54. RCW
19.56.010 and 1890 p 460 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
any person, company or corporation owning or controlling any newspaper or
periodical of any kind, or whenever any editor or proprietor of any such
newspaper or periodical shall mail or send any such newspaper or periodical to
any person or persons in this state without first receiving an order for said
newspaper or periodical from such person or persons to whom said newspaper or
periodical is mailed or sent, (([it])) it shall be deemed to be a
gift, and no debt or obligation shall accrue against such person or persons,
whether said newspaper or periodical is received by the person or persons to
whom it is sent or not.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
55. RCW
19.60.085 and 1985 c 70 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply to transactions conducted by the
following:

(1)
Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW;

(2)
((Motor)) Vehicle wreckers or hulk haulers licensed under chapter
46.79 or 46.80 RCW;

(3)
Persons giving an allowance for the trade-in or exchange of second-hand
property on the purchase of other merchandise of the same kind of greater
value; and

(4)
Persons in the business of buying or selling empty food and beverage containers
or metal or nonmetal junk.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

"Motor
vehicle wrecker" redesignated "vehicle wrecker" by 1995 c 256.

Sec.
56. RCW
19.68.040 and 1949 c 204 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of this ((article [chapter])) chapter, and this ((article
[chapter])) chapter shall be so construed, that persons so licensed
shall only be authorized by law to charge or receive compensation for
professional services rendered if such services are actually rendered by the
licensee and not otherwise: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That it is not intended to
prohibit two or more licensees who practice their profession as copartners to
charge or collect compensation for any professional services by any member of
the firm, or to prohibit a licensee who employs another licensee to charge or
collect compensation for professional services rendered by the employee
licensee.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
an inaccurate reference.

Sec.
57. RCW
19.72.040 and 1987 c 202 s 186 are each amended to read as follows:

In
case such bond or recognizance is given in any action or proceeding commenced
or pending in any court, the judge or clerk of any court of record or district
court, or any party to the action or proceeding for the security or protection
of which such bond or recognizance is made may, upon notice, require any of
such sureties to attend before the judge at a time and place specified and to
be examined under oath touching the surety's qualifications both as to
residence and property as such surety, in such manner as the judge, in the
judge's discretion, may think proper. If the party demanding the examination
require it, the examination shall be reduced to writing and subscribed by the
surety. If the judge ((find[s])) finds the surety possesses the
requisite qualifications and property, the judge shall endorse the allowance
thereof on the bond or recognizance, and cause it to be filed as provided by
law, otherwise it shall be of no effect.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
58. RCW
19.80.065 and 1984 c 130 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
42.17.260(((5))) (9) does not apply to registrations made under
this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
42.17.260 was amended by 1989 c 175 s 36, changing subsection (5) to subsection
(6). RCW 42.17.260 was subsequently amended by 1992 c 139 s 3, changing
subsection (6) to subsection (7). RCW 42.17.260 was subsequently amended by
1995 c 341 s 1, changing subsection (7) to subsection (9).

Sec.
59. RCW
19.85.030 and 1995 c 403 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the adoption of a rule under chapter 34.05 RCW, an agency shall prepare a
small business economic impact statement: (a) If the proposed rule will impose
more than minor costs on businesses in an industry; or (b) if requested to do
so by a majority vote of the joint administrative rules review committee within
forty-five days of receiving the notice of proposed rule making under RCW
34.05.320. However, if the agency has completed the pilot rule process as
defined by RCW 34.05.313 before filing the notice of a proposed rule, the
agency is not required to prepare a small business economic impact statement.

An
agency shall prepare the small business economic impact statement in accordance
with RCW 19.85.040, and file it with the code reviser along with the notice
required under RCW 34.05.320. An agency shall file a statement prepared at the
request of the joint administrative rules review committee with the code
reviser upon its completion before the adoption of the rule. An agency shall
provide a copy of the small business economic impact statement to any person
requesting it.

((An
agency may request assistance from the business assistance center in the
preparation of the small business economic impact statement.))

(2)
((The business assistance center shall develop guidelines to assist agencies
in determining whether a proposed rule will impose more than minor costs on
businesses in an industry and therefore require preparation of a small business
economic impact statement. The business assistance center may review an agency
determination that a proposed rule will not impose such costs, and shall advise
the joint administrative rules review committee on disputes involving agency
determinations under this section.

(3)))
Based upon the extent of disproportionate impact on small business identified
in the statement prepared under RCW 19.85.040, the agency shall, where legal
and feasible in meeting the stated objectives of the statutes upon which the
rule is based, reduce the costs imposed by the rule on small businesses.
Methods to reduce the costs on small businesses may include:

(a)
Reducing, modifying, or eliminating substantive regulatory requirements;

(b)
Simplifying, reducing, or eliminating recordkeeping and reporting requirements;

(c)
Reducing the frequency of inspections;

(d)
Delaying compliance timetables;

(e)
Reducing or modifying fine schedules for noncompliance; or

(f)
Any other mitigation techniques.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
business assistance center and its powers and duties were terminated June 30,
1995. See 1993 c 280 ss 80 and 81.

Sec.
60. RCW
19.94.258 and 1995 c 355 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized by the department, a service agent who intends to provide
the examination that permits a weighing or measuring instrument or device to be
placed back into commercial service under RCW 19.94.255(3) shall receive an
official registration certificate from the director prior to performing such a
service. This registration requirement does not apply to the department or a
city sealer.

(2)
Except as provided in RCW ((19.94.035)) 19.94.2584, a
registration certificate is valid for one year. It may be renewed by submitting
a request for renewal to the department.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
19.94.035 was recodified as RCW 19.94.2584 pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k),
September 1996.

Sec.
61. RCW
19.94.2584 and 1995 c 355 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall have the power to revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the
official registration certificate of any service agent for any of the following
reasons:

(a)
Fraud or deceit in obtaining an official registration certificate under this
chapter;

(b)
A finding by the department of a pattern of intentional fraudulent or negligent
activities in the installation, inspection, testing, checking, adjusting, or
systematically standardizing and approving the graduations of any weighing or
measuring instrument or device;

(c)
Knowingly placing back into commercial service any weighing or measuring
instrument or device that is incorrect;

(d)
A violation of any provision of this chapter; or

(e)
Conviction of a crime or an act constituting a crime under the laws of this
state, the laws of another state, or federal law.

(2)
Upon the department's revocation of, suspension of, or refusal to ((renewal
[renew])) renew an official registration certificate, an individual
shall have the right to appeal this decision in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
62. RCW
19.94.310 and 1992 c 237 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of each city for which a city sealer has been appointed as
provided for by RCW 19.94.280 shall:

(a)
Procure at the expense of the city the official weights and measures standards
and any field weights and measures standards necessary for the administration
and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or any rule that may be
prescribed by the director;

(b)
Provide a suitable office for the city sealer and any deputies that have been
duly appointed; and

(c)
Make provision for the necessary clerical services, supplies, transportation
and for defraying contingent expenses incidental to the official activities of
the city sealer and his or her deputies in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter.

(2)
When the acquisition of the official weights and measures standards required
under subsection (1)(a) of this section has been made and such weights and
measures standards have been examined and approved by the director, they shall
be the certified weights and measures standards for such city.

(3)
In order to maintain field weights and ((measure[s])) measures
standards in accurate condition, the city sealer shall, at least once every two
years, compare the field weights and measures standards used within his or her
city to the certified weights and measures standards of such city or to the
official weights and measures standards of this state.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest typographical error.

Sec.
63. RCW
19.94.390 and 1995 c 355 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever any commodity or service is sold, or is offered, exposed, or
advertised for sale, by weight, measure, or count, the price shall not be
misrepresented, nor shall the price be represented in any manner calculated or
tending to mislead or deceive an actual or prospective purchaser. Whenever an
advertised, ((poster [posted])) posted or labeled price per unit
of weight, measure, or count includes a fraction of a cent, all elements of the
fraction shall be prominently displayed and the numeral or numerals expressing
the fraction shall be immediately adjacent to, of the same general design and
style as, and at least one-half the height and one-half the width of the
numerals representing the whole cents.

(2)
The examination procedure recommended for price verification by the price
verification working group of the laws and regulations committee of the
national conference on weights and measures (as reflected in the fourth draft,
dated November 1, 1994) for devices such as electronic scanners shall govern
such examinations conducted under this chapter. The procedure shall be deemed
to be adopted under this chapter. However, the department may revise the
procedure as follows: The department shall provide notice of and conduct a
public hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW to determine whether any revisions
to this procedure made by the national institute of standards and technology or
its successor organization for incorporating the examination procedure into an
official handbook of the institute or its successor, or any subsequent
revisions of the handbook regarding such procedures shall also be adopted under
this chapter. If the department determines that the procedure should be so
revised, it may adopt the revisions. Violations of this section regarding the
use of devices such as electronic scanners may be found only as provided by the
examination procedures adopted by or under this subsection.

(3)
Electronic scanner screens installed after January 1, 1996, and used in retail
establishments must be visible to the consumer at the checkout line.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest typographical error.

Sec.
64. RCW
19.94.505 and 1992 c 237 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any dealer ((or service station)), as ((both are))
defined in RCW 82.36.010, to sell ethanol and/or methanol at one percent, by
volume, or greater in gasoline for use as motor vehicle fuel unless the
dispensing device has a label stating the type and maximum percentage of
alcohol contained in the motor vehicle fuel.

(2)
In any county, city, or other political subdivision designated as a carbon
monoxide nonattainment area pursuant to the provisions of subchapter I of the
clean air act amendments of 1990, P.L. 101-549, and in which the sale of
oxygenated petroleum products is required by section 211(m) of the clean air
act amendments of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 7545(m), any dealer ((or service station)),
as ((both are)) defined in RCW 82.36.010, who sells or dispenses a
petroleum product that contains at least one percent, by volume, ethanol,
methanol, or other oxygenate, shall post only such label or notice as may be
required pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 7545(m)(4) or any amendments thereto or any
successor provision thereof. This provision shall be applicable only during
such portion of the year as oxygenated petroleum product sales are required
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 7545(m).

(3)
Any person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of no more
than five hundred dollars.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
82.36.010 was amended by 1998 c 176 s 6, deleting the definition of
"service station."

Sec.
65. RCW
19.98.020 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 277 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All
repurchase payments to retailers and sellers made pursuant to RCW 19.98.010
shall be less amounts owed on any lien or claim then outstanding upon such
items covered by this section. Any wholesaler, manufacturer, or distributor
making repurchase payments covered by this chapter to any retailer or seller
shall satisfy such secured liens or claims pursuant to ((chapter [article]))
Article 62A.9 RCW less any interest owed to the lienholder arising from
the financing of such items which shall be paid to any such secured lienholder
by the retailer or seller. In no case shall the wholesaler, manufacturer, or
distributor, in making payments covered by RCW 19.98.010, pay in excess of
those amounts prescribed therein.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
an inaccurate reference.

Sec.
66. RCW
19.98.110 and 1990 c 124 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 19.98.100 through 19.98.150 and 19.98.911:

(1)
"Equipment" means machinery consisting of a framework, various fixed
and moving parts, driven by an internal combustion engine, and all other
implements associated with this machinery that are designed for or adapted and
used for agriculture, horticulture, livestock, or grazing use.

(2)
"Equipment dealer" or "equipment dealership" means any
person, partnership, corporation, association, or other form of business
enterprise, primarily engaged in retail sale or service of equipment in this
state, pursuant to any oral or written agreement for a definite or indefinite
period of time in which there is a continuing commercial relationship in the
marketing of the equipment or related services, but does not include dealers
covered by chapter 46.70 or 46.94 RCW.

(3)
"Supplier" means the manufacturer, wholesaler, or distributor of the
equipment to be sold by the equipment dealer.

(4)
"Dealer agreement" means a contract or agreement, either expressed or
implied, whether oral or written, between a supplier and an equipment dealer,
by which the equipment dealer is granted the right to sell, distribute, or
service the supplier's equipment where there is a continuing commercial
relationship between the supplier and the equipment dealer.

(5)
"Continuing commercial relationship" means any relationship in which
the equipment dealer has been granted the right to sell or service equipment
manufactured by (([the])) the supplier.

(6)
"Good cause" means failure by an equipment dealer to substantially
comply with essential and reasonable requirements imposed upon the equipment
dealer by the dealer agreement, provided such requirements are not different
from those requirements imposed on other similarly situated equipment dealers
in the state either by their terms or in the manner of their enforcement.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
67. RCW
19.105.330 and 1988 c 159 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(([(1)]))
(1) Unless an order denying effectiveness under RCW 19.105.380 is in
effect, or unless declared effective by order of the director prior thereto,
the application for registration shall automatically become effective upon the
expiration of the twentieth full business day following a filing with the
director in complete and proper form, but an applicant may consent to the delay
of effectiveness until such time as the director may by order declare
registration effective or issue a permit to market.

(2)
An application for registration, renewal of registration, or amendment is not
in completed form and shall not be deemed a statutory filing until such time as
all required fees, completed application forms, and the information and
documents required pursuant to RCW 19.105.320(1) and departmental rules have
been filed.

It
is the operator's responsibility to see that required filing materials and fees
arrive at the appropriate mailing address of the department. Within seven
business days, excluding the date of receipt, of receiving an application or
initial request for registration and the filing fees, the department shall
notify the applicant of receipt of the application and whether or not the
application is complete and in proper form. If the application is incomplete,
the department shall at the same time inform the applicant what additional
documents or information is required.

If
the application is not in a completed form, the department shall give immediate
notice to the applicant. On the date the application is complete and properly
filed, the statutory period for an in-depth examination of the filing,
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section, shall begin to run, unless the
applicant and the department have agreed to a stay of effectiveness or the
department has issued a denial of the application or a permit to market.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest clerical error.

Sec.
68. RCW
19.105.470 and 1988 c 159 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever it appears to the director that any person has engaged or is about to
engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this
chapter, any withdrawal of a camping resort property in violation of RCW
19.105.380(((1)(j))) (1)(q), or any rule, order, or permit issued
under this chapter, the director may in his or her discretion issue an order
directing the person to cease and desist from continuing the act or practice.
Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing shall be given. However,
the director may issue a temporary order pending the hearing which shall be
effective immediately upon delivery to the person affected and which shall
remain in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and which shall
become final if the person to whom notice is addressed does not request a
hearing within fifteen days after receipt of notice.

(2)
If it appears necessary in order to protect the interests of members and
purchasers, whether or not the director has issued a cease and desist order,
the attorney general in the name of the state, the director, the proper
prosecuting attorney, an affiliated members' common-interest association, or a
group of members as a class, may bring an action in any court of competent
jurisdiction to enjoin any such acts or practices and to enforce compliance
with this chapter or any rule, order, or permit under this chapter. Upon a
proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ
of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for
the defendant, for the defendant's assets, or to protect the interests or
assets of a members' common-interest association or the members of a camping
resort as a class. The state, the director, a members' common-interest
association, or members as a class shall not be required to post a bond in such
proceedings.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

The
reference to RCW 19.105.380(1)(j) appears to be erroneous. Before March 20,
1988, the reference was to RCW 19.105.380(9). Chapter 159, Laws of 1988 placed
the text of RCW 19.105.380(9) in RCW 19.105.380(1)(q), effective March 20,
1988.

Sec.
69. RCW
19.116.030 and 1990 c 44 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unlawful
subleasing or unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in motor vehicles ((are
[is])) is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business. A violation of this chapter is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
70. RCW
19.116.050 and 1990 c 44 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
dealer engages in an act of unlawful transfer of ownership interest in motor
vehicles when all of the following circumstances are met:

(1)
The dealer does not pay off any balance due to the secured party on a vehicle
acquired by the dealer, no later than the close of the second business day
after the acquisition date of the vehicle; and

(2)
The dealer does not obtain a certificate of ownership under RCW ((46.12.140))
46.70.124 for each used vehicle kept in his or her possession unless
that certificate is in the possession of the person holding a security interest
in the dealer's inventory; and

(3)
The dealer does not transfer the certificate of ownership after the transferee
has taken possession of the motor vehicle.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
46.12.140 was recodified as RCW 46.70.124 pursuant to 1993 c 307 s 18.

Sec.
71. RCW
19.120.080 and 1986 c 320 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Without
limiting the other provisions of this chapter, the following specific rights
and prohibitions shall govern the relation between the motor fuel
refiner-supplier and the motor fuel retailers:

(1)
The parties shall deal with each other in good faith.

(2)
For the purposes of this chapter and without limiting its general application,
it shall be an unfair or deceptive act or practice or an unfair method of
competition and therefore unlawful and a violation of this chapter for any
person to:

(a)
Require a motor fuel retailer to purchase or lease goods or services of the
motor fuel refiner-supplier or from approved sources of supply unless and to
the extent that the motor fuel refiner-supplier satisfies the burden of proving
that such restrictive purchasing agreements are reasonably necessary for a
lawful purpose justified on business grounds, and do not substantially affect
competition: PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to the initial
inventory of the motor fuel franchise. In determining whether a requirement to
purchase or lease goods or services constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or
practice or an unfair method of competition the courts shall be guided by the decisions
of the courts of the United States interpreting and applying the anti-trust
laws of the United States.

(b)
Discriminate between motor fuel retailers in the charges offered or made for
royalties, goods, services, equipment, rentals, advertising services, or in any
other business dealing, unless and to the extent that the motor fuel
refiner-supplier satisfies the burden of proving that any classification of or
discrimination between motor fuel retailers is reasonable, is based on motor
fuel franchises granted at materially different times and such discrimination
is reasonably related to such difference in time or on other proper and
justifiable distinctions considering the purposes of this chapter, and is not
arbitrary.

(c)
Sell, rent, or offer to sell to a motor fuel retailer any product or service
for more than a fair and reasonable price.

(d)
Require (([a])) a motor fuel retailer to assent to a release,
assignment, novation, or waiver which would relieve any person from liability
imposed by this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
72. RCW
19.138.021 and 1996 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(2)
"Director" means the director of licensing or the director's
designee.

(3)
"Seller of travel" means a person, firm, or corporation both inside
and outside the state of Washington, who transacts business with Washington
consumers for travel services.

(a)
"Seller of travel" includes a travel agent and any person who is an
independent contractor or outside agent for a travel agency or other seller of
travel whose principal duties include consulting with and advising persons
concerning travel arrangements or accommodations in the conduct or
administration of its business. If a seller of travel is employed by a seller
of travel who is registered under this chapter, the employee need not also be
registered.

(b)
"Seller of travel" does not include:

(i)
An air carrier;

(ii)
An owner or operator of a vessel, including an ocean common carrier as defined
in 46 U.S.C. App. 1702(18), an owner or charterer of a vessel that is required
to establish its financial responsibility in accordance with the requirements
of the federal maritime commission, 46 U.S.C. App. 817 (e), and a steamboat
company ((as defined in RCW 84.12.200)) whether or not operating over
and upon the waters of this state;

(iii)
A motor carrier;

(iv)
A rail carrier;

(v)
A charter party carrier of passengers as defined in RCW 81.70.020;

(vi)
An auto transportation company as defined in RCW 81.68.010;

(vii)
A hotel or other lodging accommodation;

(viii)
An affiliate of any person or entity described in (i) through (vii) of this
subsection (3)(b) that is primarily engaged in the sale of travel services
provided by the person or entity. For purposes of this subsection
(3)(b)(viii), an "affiliate" means a person or entity owning, owned
by, or under common ownership, with "owning," "owned," and
"ownership" referring to equity holdings of at least eighty percent;

(ix)
Direct providers of transportation by air, sea, or ground, or hotel or other
lodging accommodations who do not book or arrange any other travel services.

(4)
"Travel services" includes transportation by air, sea, or ground,
hotel or any lodging accommodations, package tours, or vouchers or coupons to
be redeemed for future travel or accommodations for a fee, commission, or other
valuable consideration.

(5)
"Advertisement" includes, but is not limited to, a written or graphic
representation in a card, brochure, newspaper, magazine, directory listing, or
display, and oral, written, or graphic representations made by radio,
television, or cable transmission that relates to travel services.

(6)
"Transacts business with Washington consumers" means to directly
offer or sell travel services to Washington consumers, including the placement
of advertising in media based in the state of Washington or that is primarily
directed to Washington residents. Advertising placed in national print or
electronic media alone does not constitute "transacting business with
Washington consumers." Those entities who only wholesale travel services
are not "transacting business with Washington consumers" for the
purposes of this chapter.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW
84.12.200 was amended by 1998 c 335 s 1, removing the definition of steamboat
company.

Sec.
73. RCW
19.146.260 and 1997 c 106 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
licensed mortgage broker that does not maintain a physical office within the
state must maintain a registered agent within the state to receive service of
any lawful process in any judicial or administrative noncriminal suit, action,
or proceeding against the licensed mortgage broker which arises under this
chapter or any rule or order under this chapter, with the same force and
validity as if served personally on the licensed mortgage broker. Service upon
the registered agent shall not be effective unless the plaintiff, who may be
the director in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by him or her, no
later than the next business day sends notice of the service and a copy of the
process by registered mail to the defendant or respondent at the last address
of the respondent or defendant on file with the director. In any judicial
action, suit, or proceeding arising under this chapter or any rule or order
adopted under this chapter between the department or director and a licensed
mortgage broker who does not maintain a physical office in this state, venue
shall be exclusively in the superior court of ((the [of])) Thurston
county.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest grammatical error.

Sec.
74. RCW
19.166.090 and 1991 c 128 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person who violates any provision of this chapter or who willfully and
knowingly gives false or incorrect information to the secretary (([of state]))
of state, attorney general, or county prosecuting attorney in filing
statements required by this chapter, whether or not such statement or report is
verified, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Clarifies
that the reference is to the secretary of state.

Sec.
75. RCW
19.174.020 and 1993 c 324 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Access area" means a paved walkway or sidewalk that is within fifty
feet of an automated teller machine or night deposit facility. "Access
area" does not include publicly maintained sidewalks or roads.

(2)
"Access device" means:

(a)
"Access device" as defined in federal reserve board Regulation E, 12
C.F.R. Part 205, promulgated under the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1601, et seq.; or

(b)
A key or other mechanism issued by a banking institution to its customer to
give the customer access to the banking institution's night deposit facility.

(3)
"Automated teller machine" means an electronic information processing
device located in this state that accepts or dispenses cash in connection with
a credit, deposit, or convenience account. (("Automatic [automated]))
"Automated teller machine" does not include a device used
primarily to facilitate check guarantees or check authorizations, used in
connection with the acceptance or dispensing of cash on a person-to-person
basis such as by a store cashier, or used for payment of goods and services.

(4)
"Banking institution" means a state or federally chartered bank,
trust company, savings bank, savings and loan association, and credit union.

(5)
"Candle-foot power" means a light intensity of candles on a
horizontal plane at thirty-six inches above ground level and five feet in front
of the area to be measured.

(6)
"Control of an access area or defined parking area" means to have the
present authority to determine how, when, and by whom it is to be used, and how
it is to be maintained, lighted, and landscaped.

(7)
"Defined parking area" means that portion of a parking area open for
customer parking that is:

(a)
Contiguous to an access area with respect to an automated teller machine or
night deposit facility;

(b)
Regularly, principally, and lawfully used for parking by users of the automated
teller machine or night deposit facility while conducting transactions during
hours of darkness; and

(c)
Owned or leased by the operator of the automated teller machine or night
deposit facility or owned or controlled by the party leasing the automated
teller machine or night deposit facility site to the operator. "Defined
parking area" does not include a parking area that is not open or
regularly used for parking by users of the automated teller machine or night
deposit facility who are conducting transactions during hours of darkness. A
parking area is not open if it is physically closed to access or if conspicuous
signs indicate that it is closed. If a multiple level parking area satisfies
the conditions of this subsection (7)(c) and would therefore otherwise be a
defined parking area, only the single parking level deemed by the operator of
the automated teller machine and night deposit facility to be the most directly
accessible to the users of the automated teller machine and night deposit
facility is a defined parking area.

(8)
"Hours of darkness" means the period that commences thirty minutes
after sunset and ends thirty minutes before sunrise.

(9)
"Night deposit facility" means a receptacle that is provided by a
banking institution for the use of its customers in delivering cash, checks,
and other items to the banking institution.

(10)
"Operator" means a banking institution or other business entity or a
person who operates an automated teller machine or night deposit facility.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

Corrects
a manifest drafting error.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 76. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
18.08.150 (Application for examination--Fee) and 1985 c 7 s 5;

(2) RCW
18.08.190 (Expiration of certificate--Renewal--Fee--Withdrawal of
registrant) and 1985 c 7 s 6;

(3) RCW
18.08.220 (Reinstatement of certificate--Replacement of lost or
destroyed certificate, charge) and 1985 c 7 s 7;

(4) RCW
18.25.050 (Revocation or refusal of licenses--Hearing--Restoration)
and 1985 c 7 s 16;

(5) RCW
18.32.326 (Identification of dental prostheses--Technical
assistance);

(6) RCW
18.45.010 (Definitions) and 1979 c 141 s 27;

(7) RCW
18.45.020 (Administration of chapter) and 1979 c 141 s 28;

(8) RCW
18.45.440 (Inspection of premises, records, materials--Powers of
secretary) and 1979 c 141 s 29;

(9) RCW
18.45.450 (Condemnation of articles,
materials--Grounds--Disposition) and 1979 c 141 s 30;

(10) RCW
18.45.470 (Condemned articles--Failure to relinquish--Penalty)
and 1979 c 141 s 31; and

(11) RCW
18.90.010 (Definitions) and 1979 c 158 s 70.

EXPLANATORY
NOTE

RCW 18.08.150 was amended by 1985 c 7 s 5 without
reference to its repeal by 1985 c 37 s 18. Repealing this section removes the
decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.08.190 was amended by 1985 c 7 s 6 without
reference to its repeal by 1985 c 37 s 18. Repealing this section removes the
decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.08.220 was amended by 1985 c 7 s 7 without
reference to its repeal by 1985 c 37 s 18. Repealing this section removes the
decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.25.050 was amended by 1985 c 7 s 16 without
reference to its repeal by 1986 c 259 s 27. Repealing this section removes the
decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.32.326 was both recodified and repealed during
the 1989 legislative sessions, each without reference to the other. Repealing
this section removes the decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.45.010 was amended by 1979 c 141 s 27 without
reference to its repeal by 1979 c 99 s 1, effective June 30, 1982. Repealing
this section removes the decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.45.020 was amended by 1979 c 141 s 28 without
reference to its repeal by 1979 c 99 s 51, effective June 30, 1982. Repealing
this section removes the decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.45.440 was amended by 1979 c 141 s 29 without
reference to its repeal by 1979 c 99 s 51, effective June 30, 1982. Repealing
this section removes the decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.45.450 was amended by 1979 c 141 s 30 without
reference to its repeal by 1979 c 99 s 51, effective June 30, 1982. Repealing
this section removes the decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.45.470 was amended by 1979 c 141 s 31 without
reference to its repeal by 1979 c 99 s 51, effective June 30, 1982. Repealing
this section removes the decodified section from the code.

RCW 18.90.010 was amended by
1979 c 158 s 70 without reference to its repeal by 1979 c 99 s 60, effective
June 30, 1982. Repealing this section removes the decodified section from the
code.

---
END ---