BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.34.230 and 1995 c 318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of acquiring conservation futures as well as other
rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220,
a county may levy an amount not to exceed ((six and one-quarter)) ten
cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation against the assessed
valuation of all taxable property within the county. The limitations in RCW
84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized in this section.

---
END ---