BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 3.62 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
When any person is found guilty, in any court organized under Title 3 or 35
RCW, of a domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020, or of a
violation of a similar municipal ordinance, the court shall impose upon the
person a penalty assessment in addition to any other penalty or fine imposed or
authorized by law. The amount of the penalty assessment shall be five hundred
dollars for each case or cause of action that includes one or more convictions
of a gross misdemeanor, and two hundred fifty dollars for each case or cause of
action that includes one or more convictions of only one or more misdemeanors.
The court may not suspend or waive the penalty assessment.

(2)
The court shall remit the assessments imposed and collected under this section
to the city treasurer, in the case of a municipal court, or the county
treasurer, in the case of a district court. The city or county treasurer shall
monthly remit one-half of the funds received under this section to the state
treasurer for deposit in the domestic violence reduction account under this
section.

(3)
The domestic violence reduction account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from domestic violence penalty assessments remitted to the state
treasurer under this section shall be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account
may be used only for programs and services to prevent domestic violence,
services to victims of domestic violence and their children, and improvements
in law enforcement relating to domestic violence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 26.50 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services, in its discretion, may seek the
relief provided in this chapter on behalf of and with the consent of any
vulnerable adult as those persons are defined in RCW 74.34.020. Neither the
department nor the state of Washington shall be liable for failure to seek
relief on behalf of any persons under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An order for protection of a vulnerable adult issued under this chapter which
restrains the respondent or another person from committing acts of abuse,
prohibits contact with the petitioner, excludes the person from any specified
location, or prohibits the person from coming within a specified distance from
a location or another person, shall prominently bear on the front page of the
order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A
CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(2)
Whenever an order for protection of a vulnerable adult is issued under this
chapter, and the respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order, a
violation of a provision restraining the person from committing acts of abuse,
prohibiting contact with the petitioner, excluding the person from any
specified location, or prohibiting the person from coming within a specified
distance of a location or another person, shall be punishable under RCW
26.50.110, regardless of whether the person is a family or household member as
defined in RCW 26.50.010.

Sec.
4. RCW
10.31.100 and 1999 c 184 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

A
police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or
is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest the person without a
warrant. A police officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing
a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the
presence of the officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of
this section.

(1)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or
threats of harm to any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or
involving the use or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition,
possession, or consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one
years under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2)
A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a)
An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under RCW ((10.99.040(2),
10.99.050, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115,)) 26.44.063, or
chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26 ((RCW, or chapter)),
26.50, or 74.34 RCW restraining the person and the person has violated
the terms of the order restraining the person from acts or threats of violence,
or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of or entering a
residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from
coming within a specified distance of a location or another person, or, in
the case of an order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other
restrictions or conditions upon the person; or

(b)
A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has been issued of
which the person under restraint has knowledge and the person under restraint
has violated a provision of the foreign protection order prohibiting the person
under restraint from contacting or communicating with another person, or ((of
a provision)) excluding the person under restraint from a residence,
workplace, school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from coming within
a specified distance of a location or another person, or a violation of any
provision for which the foreign protection order specifically indicates that a
violation will be a crime; or

(c)
The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding four hours has
assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the
officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has
occurred which has resulted in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury
is observable by the responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical
action has occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to
fear imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the officer has
probable cause to believe that family or household members have assaulted each
other, the officer is not required to arrest both persons. The officer shall
arrest the person whom the officer believes to be the primary physical
aggressor. In making this determination, the officer shall make every
reasonable effort to consider: (i) The intent to protect victims of domestic
violence under RCW 10.99.010; (ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted
or serious threats creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of
domestic violence between the persons involved.

(3)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have
the authority to arrest the person:

(a)
RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other
property;

(b)
RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(c)
RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d)
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(e)
RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is
suspended or revoked;

(f)
RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4)
A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident if
the officer has probable cause to believe that the driver has committed in
connection with the accident a violation of any traffic law or regulation.

(5)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a violation of RCW ((88.12.025)) 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(6)
An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose
presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue
a notice of traffic infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed
the infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an officer
the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the state of
Washington.

(7)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may
arrest the person.

(8)
A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which
the person has knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated
the terms of that order.

(9)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has, within
twenty-four hours of the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW
9A.50.020 may arrest such person.

(10)
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person illegally
possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on
private or public elementary or secondary school premises shall have the
authority to arrest the person.

For
purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the
meaning defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(11)
Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (6) of this
section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of
arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(12)
No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest
pursuant to RCW 10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police officer acts in good faith
and without malice.

Sec.
5. RCW
10.99.020 and 1997 c 338 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Family or household members" means spouses, former spouses, persons
who have a child in common regardless of whether they have been married or have
lived together at any time, adult persons related by blood or marriage, adult
persons who are presently residing together or who have resided together in the
past, persons sixteen years of age or older who are presently residing together
or who have resided together in the past and who have or have had a dating
relationship, persons sixteen years of age or older with whom a person sixteen
years of age or older has or has had a dating relationship, and persons who
have a biological or legal parent-child relationship, including stepparents and
stepchildren and grandparents and grandchildren.

(2)
"Dating relationship" has the same meaning as in RCW 26.50.010.

(3)
"Domestic violence" includes but is not limited to any of the
following crimes when committed by one family or household member against
another:

(a)
Assault in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.011);

(b)
Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021);

(c)
Assault in the third degree (RCW 9A.36.031);

(d)
Assault in the fourth degree (RCW 9A.36.041);

(e)
Drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045);

(f)
Reckless endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);

(g)
Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);

(h)
Burglary in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.020);

(i)
Burglary in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.030);

(j)
Criminal trespass in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.070);

(k)
Criminal trespass in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.080);

(l)
Malicious mischief in the first degree (RCW 9A.48.070);

(m)
Malicious mischief in the second degree (RCW 9A.48.080);

(n)
Malicious mischief in the third degree (RCW 9A.48.090);

(o)
Kidnapping in the first degree (RCW 9A.40.020);

(p)
Kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030);

(q)
Unlawful imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040);

(r)
Violation of the provisions of a restraining order, no-contact order, or
protection order restraining or enjoining the person or restraining
the person from going onto the grounds of or entering a residence, workplace,
school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from coming within a
specified distance of a location or another person (RCW 10.99.040,
10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, ((or)) 26.26.138, 26.50.060,
26.50.070, 26.50.130, 26.52.070, or section 3 of this act);

(s)
((Violation of the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order
restraining the person or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of
or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care (RCW 26.50.060,
26.50.070, 26.50.130, 10.99.040, or 10.99.050);

(t))) Rape
in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040);

(((u)))
(t) Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050);

(((v)))
(u) Residential burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);

(((w)))
(v) Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110); and

(((x)))
(w) Interference with the reporting of domestic violence (RCW
9A.36.150).

(4)
"Victim" means a family or household member who has been subjected to
domestic violence.

Sec.
6. RCW
26.09.050 and 1995 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In entering a decree of dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or
declaration of invalidity, the court shall determine the marital status of the
parties, make provision for a parenting plan for any minor child of the
marriage, make provision for the support of any child of the marriage entitled
to support, consider or approve provision for the maintenance of either spouse,
make provision for the disposition of property and liabilities of the parties,
make provision for the allocation of the children as federal tax exemptions,
make provision for any necessary continuing restraining orders including the
provisions contained in RCW 9.41.800, make provision for the issuance within
this action of the restraint provisions of a domestic violence protection order
under chapter 26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter
10.14 RCW, and make provision for the change of name of any party.

(2)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party, or from going
onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other
party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting the person from
coming within a specified distance of a location or another party, shall
prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER ((26.09))
26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(3)
The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a criminal offense
legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section, in addition to the law enforcement
information sheet or proof of service of the order, be forwarded by the clerk
of the court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law
enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law
enforcement agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any
computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state
used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is
fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(4)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
7. RCW
26.09.060 and 1995 c 246 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In a proceeding for:

(a)
Dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or a declaration of invalidity; or

(b)
Disposition of property or liabilities, maintenance, or support following
dissolution of the marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over
the absent spouse; either party may move for temporary maintenance or for
temporary support of children entitled to support. The motion shall be
accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and
the amounts requested.

(2)
As a part of a motion for temporary maintenance or support or by independent
motion accompanied by affidavit, either party may request the court to issue a
temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, providing relief proper
in the circumstances, and restraining or enjoining any person from:

(a)
Transferring, removing, encumbering, concealing, or in any way disposing of any
property except in the usual course of business or for the necessities of life,
and, if so restrained or enjoined, requiring him or her to notify the moving
party of any proposed extraordinary expenditures made after the order is
issued;

(b)
Molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

(c)
Going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the
other party or the day care or school of any child upon a showing of the
necessity therefor;

(d)
Coming within a specified distance from a specified location, or within a
specified distance from a specified other person;

(e)
Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3)
Either party may request a domestic violence protection order under chapter
26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a
temporary basis. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW
26.50.060 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children
which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the
relief provided in RCW 10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection
shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon
court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all
temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4)
In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(5)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to
the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other
evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until
the time for responding has elapsed.

(6)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction and
an order for temporary maintenance or support in such amounts and on such terms
as are just and proper in the circumstances. The court may in its discretion
waive the filing of the bond or the posting of security.

(7)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining the person from
molesting or disturbing another party, or from going onto the grounds of
or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other party or the day care
or school of any child, or prohibiting the person from coming within a
specified distance of a location or another party, shall prominently bear
on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL
NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER ((26.09)) 26.50
RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(8)
The court shall order that any temporary restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any computer-based
criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the ((law
enforcement)) computer-based criminal intelligence information
system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of
the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(9)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

(10)
A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary injunction:

(a)
Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be
adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b)
May be revoked or modified;

(c)
Terminates when the final decree is entered, except as provided under
subsection (((10))) (11) of this section, or when the petition
for dissolution, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity is dismissed;

(d)
May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing decree.

(((10)))
(11) Delinquent support payments accrued under an order for temporary
support remain collectible and are not extinguished when a final decree is
entered unless the decree contains specific language to the contrary. A
support debt under a temporary order owed to the state for public assistance
expenditures shall not be extinguished by the final decree if:

(a)
The obligor was given notice of the state's interest under chapter 74.20A RCW;
or

(b)
The temporary order directs the obligor to make support payments to the office
of support enforcement or the Washington state support registry.

Sec.
8. RCW
26.10.040 and 1995 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In entering an order under this chapter, the court shall consider, approve, or
make provision for:

(((1)))
(a) Child custody, visitation, and the support of any child entitled to
support;

(((2)))
(b) The allocation of the children as a federal tax exemption;

(((3)))
(c) Any necessary continuing restraining orders, including the
provisions contained in RCW 9.41.800;

(((4)))
(d) A domestic violence protection order under chapter 26.50 RCW or an
antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW. The court may grant
any of the relief provided in RCW 26.50.060 except relief pertaining to
residential provisions for the children which provisions shall be provided for
under this chapter, and any of the relief provided in RCW 10.14.080;

(((5)))
(e) Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or
enjoining the person from molesting or disturbing another party, or
from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the
other party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting the
person from coming within a specified distance of a location or another person,
shall prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF
THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER
((26.10)) 26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST((;)).

(((6)))
(2) The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section, in addition to the law enforcement
information sheet or proof of service of the order, be forwarded by the clerk
of the court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law
enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law
enforcement agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any
computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state
used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is
fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(3)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall remove
the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
9. RCW
26.10.115 and 1995 c 246 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for temporary
support of children entitled to support. The motion shall be accompanied by an
affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amount
requested.

(2)
In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for a
temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, providing relief proper
in the circumstances, and restraining or enjoining any person from:

(a)
Molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

(b)
Entering the family home or the home of the other party upon a showing of the
necessity therefor;

(c)
Coming within a specified distance from a specified location, or within a
specified distance from a specified other person;

(d)
Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3)
Either party may request a domestic violence protection order under chapter
26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a
temporary basis. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW
26.50.060 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children
which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the
relief provided in RCW 10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection
shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon
court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all
temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4)
In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(5)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to
the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other
evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until
the time for responding has elapsed.

(6)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction and
an order for temporary support in such amounts and on such terms as are just
and proper in the circumstances.

(7)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party, or from going
onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other
party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting the person from
coming within a specified distance of a location or another person, shall
prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER ((26.10))
26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(8)
The court shall order that any temporary restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any computer-based
criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the ((law
enforcement)) computer-based criminal intelligence information
system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of
the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(9)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

(10)
A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary injunction:

(a)
Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be
adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b)
May be revoked or modified;

(c)
Terminates when the final order is entered or when the motion is dismissed;

(d)
May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing order.

(((10)))
(11) A support debt owed to the state for public assistance expenditures
which has been charged against a party pursuant to RCW 74.20A.040 and/or
74.20A.055 shall not be merged in, or otherwise extinguished by, the final
decree or order, unless the office of support enforcement has been given notice
of the final proceeding and an opportunity to present its claim for the support
debt to the court and has failed to file an affidavit as provided in this
subsection. Notice of the proceeding shall be served upon the office of
support enforcement personally, or by certified mail, and shall be given no
fewer than thirty days prior to the date of the final proceeding. An original
copy of the notice shall be filed with the court either before service or
within a reasonable time thereafter. The office of support enforcement may
present its claim, and thereby preserve the support debt, by filing an
affidavit setting forth the amount of the debt with the court, and by mailing a
copy of the affidavit to the parties or their attorney prior to the date of the
final proceeding.

Sec.
10. RCW
26.26.130 and 1997 c 58 s 947 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The judgment and order of the court determining the existence or nonexistence
of the parent and child relationship shall be determinative for all purposes.

(2)
If the judgment and order of the court is at variance with the child's birth
certificate, the court shall order that an amended birth certificate be issued.

(3)
The judgment and order shall contain other appropriate provisions directed to
the appropriate parties to the proceeding, concerning the duty of current and
future support, the extent of any liability for past support furnished to the
child if that issue is before the court, the furnishing of bond or other
security for the payment of the judgment, or any other matter in the best
interest of the child. The judgment and order may direct the father to pay the
reasonable expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement. The judgment
and order may include a continuing restraining order or injunction. In issuing
the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(4)
The judgment and order shall contain the social security numbers of all parties
to the order.

(5)
Support judgment and orders shall be for periodic payments which may vary in
amount. The court may limit the father's liability for the past support to the
child to the proportion of the expenses already incurred as the court deems
just. The court shall not limit or affect in any manner the right of
nonparties including the state of Washington to seek reimbursement for support
and other services previously furnished to the child.

(6)
After considering all relevant factors, the court shall order either or both
parents to pay an amount determined pursuant to the schedule and standards
contained in chapter 26.19 RCW.

(7)
On the same basis as provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the court shall make
residential provisions with regard to minor children of the parties, except
that a parenting plan shall not be required unless requested by a party.

(8)
In any dispute between the natural parents of a child and a person or persons
who have (a) commenced adoption proceedings or who have been granted an order
of adoption, and (b) pursuant to a court order, or placement by the department
of social and health services or by a licensed agency, have had actual custody
of the child for a period of one year or more before court action is commenced
by the natural parent or parents, the court shall consider the best welfare and
interests of the child, including the child's need for situation stability, in
determining the matter of custody, and the parent or person who is more fit
shall have the superior right to custody.

(9)
In entering an order under this chapter, the court may issue any necessary
continuing restraining orders, including the restraint provisions of domestic
violence protection orders under chapter 26.50 RCW or antiharassment protection
orders under chapter 10.14 RCW.

(10)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party, or from going
onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other
party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting the person from
coming within a specified distance of a location or another person, shall
prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER ((26.26))
26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(11)
The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a criminal offense
legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall forthwith enter the order into any computer-based criminal
intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is fully enforceable in any
county in the state.

(12)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
11. RCW
26.26.137 and 1995 c 246 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the court has made a finding as to the paternity of a child, or if a party's
acknowledgment of paternity has been filed with the court, or a party alleges
he is the father of the child, any party may move for temporary support for the
child prior to the date of entry of the final order. The motion shall be
accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and
the amounts requested.

(2)
Any party may request the court to issue a temporary restraining order or
preliminary injunction, providing relief proper in the circumstances, and
restraining or enjoining any party from:

(a)
Molesting or disturbing the peace of another party;

(b)
Going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of another
party or the day care or school of any child; or

(c)
Coming within a specified distance from a specified location, or within a
specified distance from a specified other person; or

(d)
Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3)
Either party may request a domestic violence protection order under chapter
26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a
temporary basis. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW
26.50.060 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children
which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the
relief provided in RCW 10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection
shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon
court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all
temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party, or from going
onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other
party or the day care or school of any child, or prohibiting the person from
coming within a specified distance of a location or another person, shall prominently
bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH
ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER ((26.26))
26.50 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(5)
The court shall order that any temporary restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any computer-based
criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is fully
enforceable in any county in the state.

(6)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

(7)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to
the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other
evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until
the time for responding has elapsed.

(((7)))
(8) The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction and an order for temporary support in such amounts and on such terms
as are just and proper in the circumstances. In issuing the order, the court
shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(((8)))
(9) A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary
injunction:

(a)
Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be
adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b)
May be revoked or modified;

(c)
Terminates when the final order is entered or when the petition is dismissed;
and

(d)
May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing order.

(((9)))
(10) A support debt owed to the state for public assistance expenditures
which has been charged against a party pursuant to RCW 74.20A.040 and/or
74.20A.055 shall not be merged in, or otherwise extinguished by, the final
decree or order, unless the office of support enforcement has been given notice
of the final proceeding and an opportunity to present its claim for the support
debt to the court and has failed to file an affidavit as provided in this
subsection. Notice of the proceeding shall be served upon the office of
support enforcement personally, or by certified mail, and shall be given no
fewer than thirty days prior to the date of the final proceeding. An original
copy of the notice shall be filed with the court either before service or
within a reasonable time thereafter. The office of support enforcement may
present its claim, and thereby preserve the support debt, by filing an
affidavit setting forth the amount of the debt with the court, and by mailing a
copy of the affidavit to the parties or their attorney prior to the date of the
final proceeding.

Sec.
12. RCW
26.50.060 and 1999 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon notice and after hearing, the court may provide relief as follows:

(a)
Restrain the respondent from committing acts of domestic violence;

(b)
Exclude the respondent from the dwelling ((which)) that the
parties share, from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner, or
from the day care or school of a child;

(c)
Prohibit the respondent from coming within a specified distance from a
specified location;

(d)
On the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the court shall make
residential provision with regard to minor children of the parties. However,
parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09 RCW shall not be required under
this chapter;

(((d)))
(e) Order the respondent to participate in a domestic violence
perpetrator treatment program approved under RCW 26.50.150;

(((e)))
(f) Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of the
petitioner and other family or household members sought to be protected,
including orders or directives to a peace officer, as allowed under this
chapter;

(((f)))
(g) Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs and
service fees, as established by the county or municipality incurring the
expense and to reimburse the petitioner for costs incurred in bringing the
action, including ((a)) reasonable ((attorney's fee)) attorneys'
fees;

(((g)))
(h) Restrain the respondent from having any contact with the victim of
domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the victim's household
or from coming within a specified distance from the victim or the victim's
children or members of the victim's household;

(((h)))
(i) Require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The
order shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services and
the terms under which the monitoring must be performed. The order also may
include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The
court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for electronic
monitoring;

(((i)))
(j) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800;

(((j)))
(k) Order possession and use of essential personal effects. The court
shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient specificity to make
it clear which property is included; and

(((k)))
(l) Order use of a vehicle.

(2)
If a ((restraining)) protection order restrains the respondent
from contacting the respondent's minor children the restraint shall be for a
fixed period not to exceed one year. This limitation is not applicable to
orders for protection issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26 RCW. With
regard to other relief, if the petitioner has petitioned for relief on his or
her own behalf or on behalf of the petitioner's family or household members or
minor children, and the court finds that the respondent is likely to resume
acts of domestic violence against the petitioner or the petitioner's family or
household members or minor children when the order expires, the court may
either grant relief for a fixed period or enter a permanent order of
protection.

If
the petitioner has petitioned for relief on behalf of the respondent's minor
children, the court shall advise the petitioner that if the petitioner wants to
continue protection for a period beyond one year the petitioner may either
petition for renewal pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or may seek
relief pursuant to the provisions of chapter 26.09 or 26.26 RCW.

(3)
If the court grants an order for a fixed time period, the petitioner may apply
for renewal of the order by filing a petition for renewal at any time within
the three months before the order expires. The petition for renewal shall
state the reasons why the petitioner seeks to renew the protection order. Upon
receipt of the petition for renewal the court shall order a hearing which shall
be not later than fourteen days from the date of the order. Except as provided
in RCW 26.50.085, personal service shall be made on the respondent not less
than five days before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made the court
shall set a new hearing date and shall either require additional attempts at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided in RCW
26.50.085 or by mail as provided in RCW 26.50.123. If the court permits
service by publication or mail, the court shall set the new hearing date not
later than twenty-four days from the date of the order. If the order expires
because timely service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte order
of protection as provided in RCW 26.50.070. The court shall grant the petition
for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence
that the respondent will not resume acts of domestic violence against the
petitioner or the petitioner's children or family or household members when the
order expires. The court may renew the protection order for another fixed time
period or may enter a permanent order as provided in this section. The court
may award court costs, service fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees as provided
in subsection (1)(f) of this section.

(4)
In providing relief under this chapter, the court may realign the designation
of the parties as "petitioner" and "respondent" where the
court finds that the original petitioner is the abuser and the original
respondent is the victim of domestic violence and may issue an ex parte
temporary order for protection in accordance with RCW 26.50.070 on behalf of
the victim until the victim is able to prepare a petition for an order for
protection in accordance with RCW 26.50.030.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no order for protection
shall grant relief to any party except upon notice to the respondent and
hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition filed and served by the
party seeking relief in accordance with RCW 26.50.050.

(6)
The court order shall specify the date the order expires if any. The court
order shall also state whether the court issued the protection order following
personal service, service by publication, or service by mail and whether the
court has approved service by publication or mail of an order issued under this
section.

(7)
If the court declines to issue an order for protection or declines to renew an
order for protection, the court shall state in writing on the order the
particular reasons for the court's denial.

Sec.
13. RCW
26.50.070 and 1996 c 248 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where an application under this section alleges that irreparable injury could
result from domestic violence if an order is not issued immediately without
prior notice to the respondent, the court may grant an ex parte temporary order
for protection, pending a full hearing, and grant relief as the court deems
proper, including an order:

(a)
Restraining any party from committing acts of domestic violence;

(b)
Restraining any party from going onto the grounds of or entering the dwelling
that the parties share, from the residence, workplace, or school of the other,
or from the day care or school of a child until further order of the court;

(c)
Prohibiting any party from coming within a specified distance from a
specified location;

(d)
Restraining any party from interfering with the other's custody of the minor
children or from removing the children from the jurisdiction of the court;

(((d)))
(e) Restraining any party from having any contact with the victim of
domestic violence or the victim's children or members of the victim's household,
or from coming within a specified distance of the victim or the victim's
children or members of the victim's household; and

(e)
Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(2)
Irreparable injury under this section includes but is not limited to situations
in which the respondent has recently threatened petitioner with bodily injury
or has engaged in acts of domestic violence against the petitioner.

(3)
The court shall hold an ex parte hearing in person or by telephone on the day
the petition is filed or on the following judicial day.

(4)
An ex parte temporary order for protection shall be effective for a fixed
period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if the court has
permitted service by publication under RCW 26.50.085 or by mail under RCW
26.50.123. The ex parte order may be reissued. A full hearing, as provided in
this chapter, shall be set for not later than fourteen days from the issuance
of the temporary order or not later than twenty-four days if service by
publication or by mail is permitted. Except as provided in RCW 26.50.050,
26.50.085, and 26.50.123, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy
of the ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and notice of the date
set for the hearing.

(5)
Any order issued under this section shall contain the date and time of issuance
and the expiration date and shall be entered into a state-wide judicial
information system by the clerk of the court within one judicial day after
issuance.

(6)
If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary order for protection the
court shall state the particular reasons for the court's denial. The court's
denial of a motion for an ex parte order of protection shall be filed with the
court.

Sec.
14. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a narcotic
from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18
(RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV, or
V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule I-V
to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel
in a reckless manner (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with intent
to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in
a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or flunitrazepam
from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension
of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW
10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220, 26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or
section 3 of this act)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

((On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW ((88.12.032)) 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW 46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW ((88.12.155(3)))
79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except
marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080
(1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled
Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or
Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat
of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec.
15. RCW
10.99.040 and 1997 c 338 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court in domestic
violence actions:

(a)
Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of concurrent
dissolution or other civil proceedings;

(b)
Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a dissolution of marriage
prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;

(c)
Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be disclosed to any
person, other than the attorney of a criminal defendant, upon a showing that
there is a possibility of further violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order
a criminal defense attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's
location; and

(d)
Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those criminal actions
arising from acts of domestic violence.

(2)(a)
Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at those who have been
victims of domestic violence in the past, when any person charged with or
arrested for a crime involving domestic violence is released from custody before
arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court authorizing
the release may prohibit that person from having any contact with the victim.
The jurisdiction authorizing the release shall determine whether that person
should be prohibited from having any contact with the victim. If there is no
outstanding restraining or protective order prohibiting that person from having
contact with the victim, the court authorizing release may issue, by telephone,
a no-contact order prohibiting the person charged or arrested from having
contact with the victim or from coming within a specified distance of a
location or another person.

(b)
In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(c)
The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as possible.

(3)
At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a no-contact order
shall be issued or extended. The no-contact order shall terminate if the
defendant is acquitted or the charges are dismissed. If a no-contact order
is issued or extended, the court may also include in the conditions of release
a requirement that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If
electronic monitoring is ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed. Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the
sentence that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the
electronic monitoring.

(4)(a)
Willful violation of a court order issued under subsection (2) or (3) of this
section is ((a gross misdemeanor except as provided in (b) and (c) of this
subsection (4). Upon conviction and in addition to other penalties provided by
law, the court may require that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring.
The court shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services
and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed. The court also may
include a requirement that the defendant pay the costs of the monitoring. The
court shall consider the ability of the convicted person to pay for electronic
monitoring.

(b)
Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this section and that
does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under RCW 9A.36.011 or
9A.36.021 is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW, and any
conduct in violation of a protective order issued under this section that is
reckless and creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to
another person is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c)
A willful violation of a court order issued under this section is a class C
felony if the offender has at least two previous convictions for violating the
provisions of a no-contact order issued under this chapter, a domestic violence
protection order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or any
federal or out-of-state order that is comparable to a no-contact order or
protection order issued under Washington law. The previous convictions may
involve the same victim or other victims specifically protected by the
no-contact orders or protection orders the offender violated)) punishable
under RCW 26.50.110.

(((d)))
(b) The written order releasing the person charged or arrested shall
contain the court's directives and shall bear the legend: "Violation of
this order is a criminal offense under chapter ((10.99)) 26.50
RCW and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or
reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony. You can
be arrested even if any person protected by the order invites or allows you to
violate the order's prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or
refrain from violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the
order."

(c)
A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.

(5)
If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that order shall
expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if charges are not filed.
Such orders need not be entered into the computer-based criminal intelligence
information system in this state which is used by law enforcement agencies to
list outstanding warrants.

(((5)))
(6) Whenever ((an)) a no-contact order ((prohibiting
contact)) is issued, modified, or terminated under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or
before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency
specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law
enforcement agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order for one year or
until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based
criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the ((law
enforcement)) computer-based criminal intelligence information
system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of
the order. The order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon
receipt of notice that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of
this section, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

Sec.
16. RCW
10.99.045 and 1998 c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A defendant arrested for an offense involving domestic violence as defined by
RCW 10.99.020 shall be required to appear in person before a magistrate within
one judicial day after the arrest.

(2)
A defendant who is charged by citation, complaint, or information with an
offense involving domestic violence as defined by RCW 10.99.020 and not
arrested shall appear in court for arraignment in person as soon as
practicable, but in no event later than fourteen days after the next day on
which court is in session following the issuance of the citation or the filing
of the complaint or information.

(3)
At the time of the appearances provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the court shall determine the necessity of imposing a no-contact order
or other conditions of pretrial release according to the procedures established
by court rule for a preliminary appearance or an arraignment. The court may
include in the order any conditions authorized under RCW 9.41.800 and
10.99.040.

(4)
Appearances required pursuant to this section are mandatory and cannot be
waived.

(5)
The no-contact order shall be issued and entered with the appropriate law
enforcement agency pursuant to the procedures outlined in RCW 10.99.040 (2) and
(4).

Sec.
17. RCW
10.99.050 and 1997 c 338 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When a defendant is found guilty of a crime and a condition of the sentence
restricts the defendant's ability to have contact with the victim, such
condition shall be recorded and a written certified copy of that order shall be
provided to the victim.

(2)(a)
Willful violation of a court order issued under this section is ((a gross
misdemeanor. Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this
section and that does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under
RCW 9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021 is a class C felony, and any conduct in violation of
a protective order issued under this section that is reckless and creates a
substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person is a
class C felony. A willful violation of a court order issued under this section
is also a class C felony if the offender has at least two previous convictions
for violating the provisions of a no-contact order issued under this chapter,
or a domestic violence protection order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10,
26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or any federal or out-of-state order that is comparable to
a no-contact order or protection order that is issued under Washington law.
The previous convictions may involve the same victim or other victims
specifically protected by the no-contact orders or protection orders the
offender violated)) punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

(b)
The written order shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the
legend: Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter ((10.99))
26.50 RCW and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by
shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a
felony.

(3)
Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued pursuant to this section, the
clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next
judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order.
Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall ((forthwith))
enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the
order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system
available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding
warrants. Entry into the ((law enforcement)) computer-based criminal
intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement
agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any
jurisdiction in the state.

(4)
If an order prohibiting contact issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
18. RCW
26.09.300 and 1996 c 248 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a restraining order is issued under this chapter, and the person to be
restrained knows of the order, a violation of the provisions restricting the
person from acts or threats of violence or of a provision restraining the
person from going onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace,
school, or day care of another, or prohibiting the person from coming within
a specified distance of a location or another person, is ((a misdemeanor))
punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

(2)
A person is deemed to have notice of a restraining order if:

(a)
The person to be restrained or the person's attorney signed the order;

(b)
The order recites that the person to be restrained or the person's attorney
appeared in person before the court;

(c)
The order was served upon the person to be restrained; or

(d)
The peace officer gives the person oral or written evidence of the order by
reading from it or handing to the person a certified copy of the original
order, certified to be an accurate copy of the original by a notary public or
by the clerk of the court.

(3)
A peace officer shall verify the existence of a restraining order by:

(a)
Obtaining information confirming the existence and terms of the order from a
law enforcement agency; or

(b)
Obtaining a certified copy of the order, certified to be an accurate copy of
the original by a notary public or by the clerk of the court.

(4)
A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a)
A restraining order has been issued under this chapter;

(b)
The respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order; and

(c)
The person to be arrested has violated the terms of the order restraining the
person from acts or threats of violence or restraining the person from going
onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace, school, or day care
of another, or prohibiting the person from coming within a specified
distance of a location or another person.

(5)
It is a defense to prosecution under subsection (1) of this section that the
court order was issued contrary to law or court rule.

(6)
No peace officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest
under subsection (4) of this section if the officer acts in good faith and
without malice.

Sec.
19. RCW
26.10.220 and 1999 c 184 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a restraining order is issued under this chapter, and the person to be
restrained knows of the order, a violation of the provisions restricting the
person from acts or threats of violence or of a provision restraining the
person from going onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace,
school, or day care of another, or prohibiting the person from coming within
a specified distance of a location or another person, is ((a gross
misdemeanor)) punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

(2)
A person is deemed to have notice of a restraining order if:

(a)
The person to be restrained or the person's attorney signed the order;

(b)
The order recites that the person to be restrained or the person's attorney
appeared in person before the court;

(c)
The order was served upon the person to be restrained; or

(d)
The peace officer gives the person oral or written evidence of the order by
reading from it or handing to the person a certified copy of the original
order, certified to be an accurate copy of the original by a notary public or
by the clerk of the court.

(3)
A peace officer shall verify the existence of a restraining order by:

(a)
Obtaining information confirming the existence and terms of the order from a
law enforcement agency; or

(b)
Obtaining a certified copy of the order, certified to be an accurate copy of
the original by a notary public or by the clerk of the court.

(4)
A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a)
A restraining order has been issued under this chapter;

(b)
The respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order; and

(c)
The person to be arrested has violated the terms of the order restraining the
person from acts or threats of violence or restraining the person from going
onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace, school, or day care
of another, or prohibiting the person from coming within a specified
distance of a location or another person.

(5)
It is a defense to prosecution under subsection (1) of this section that the
court order was issued contrary to law or court rule.

(6)
No peace officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest
under subsection (4) of this section if the officer acts in good faith and
without malice.

Sec.
20. RCW
26.26.138 and 1999 c 184 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a restraining order is issued under this chapter, and the person to be
restrained knows of the order, a violation of the provisions restricting the
person from acts or threats of violence or of a provision restraining the
person from going onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace,
school, or day care of another, or prohibiting the person from coming within
a specified distance of a location or another person, is ((a gross
misdemeanor)) punishable under RCW 26.50.110.

(2)
A person is deemed to have notice of a restraining order if:

(a)
The person to be restrained or the person's attorney signed the order;

(b)
The order recites that the person to be restrained or the person's attorney
appeared in person before the court;

(c)
The order was served upon the person to be restrained; or

(d)
The peace officer gives the person oral or written evidence of the order by
reading from it or handing to the person a certified copy of the original
order, certified to be an accurate copy of the original by a notary public or
by the clerk of the court.

(3)
A peace officer shall verify the existence of a restraining order by:

(a)
Obtaining information confirming the existence and terms of the order from a
law enforcement agency; or

(b)
Obtaining a certified copy of the order, certified to be an accurate copy of
the original by a notary public or by the clerk of the court.

(4)
A peace officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a)
A restraining order has been issued under this chapter;

(b)
The respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order; and

(c)
The person to be arrested has violated the terms of the order restraining the
person from acts or threats of violence or restraining the person from going
onto the grounds of or entering the residence, workplace, school, or day care
of another, or prohibiting the person from coming within a specified
distance of a location or another person.

(5)
It is a defense to prosecution under subsection (1) of this section that the
court order was issued contrary to law or court rule.

(6)
No peace officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest
under subsection (4) of this section if the officer acts in good faith and
without malice.

Sec.
21. RCW
26.50.110 and 1996 c 248 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever an order ((for protection)) is granted under this chapter,
chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or there is a valid foreign
protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, and the respondent or person
to be restrained knows of the order, a violation of the restraint provisions,
or of a provision excluding the person from a residence, workplace, school, or
day care, or of a provision prohibiting a person from coming within a
specified distance of a location or another person, or of a provision of a
foreign protection order specifically indicating that a violation will be a
crime, is a gross misdemeanor except as provided in subsections (4) and (5)
of this section. Upon conviction, and in addition to any other penalties
provided by law, the court may require that the respondent submit to electronic
monitoring. The court shall specify who shall provide the electronic
monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed. The order also may include a requirement that the respondent pay
the costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the ability of the
convicted person to pay for electronic monitoring.

(2)
A peace officer shall arrest without a warrant and take into custody a person
whom the peace officer has probable cause to believe has violated an order
issued under this chapter, chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW,
or a valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, that
restrains the person or excludes the person from a residence, workplace,
school, or day care, or prohibits the person from coming within a specified
distance of a location or another person, if the person restrained knows of
the order. Presence of the order in the law enforcement computer-based
criminal intelligence information system is not the only means of establishing
knowledge of the order.

(3)
A violation of an order ((for protection)) issued under this chapter,
chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign
protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, shall also constitute
contempt of court, and is subject to the penalties prescribed by law.

(4)
Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this chapter,
chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign
protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, and that does not amount to
assault in the first or second degree under RCW 9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021 is a
class C felony, and any conduct in violation of ((a protective)) such
an order ((issued under this chapter)) that is reckless and creates
a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person is a
class C felony.

(5)
A violation of a court order issued under this chapter, chapter 10.99,
26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or of a valid foreign protection order as
defined in RCW 26.52.020, is a class C felony if the offender has at least
two previous convictions for violating the provisions of ((a no-contact))
an order issued under chapter 10.99 ((RCW, a domestic violence
protection order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26 RCW or this
chapter, or any federal or out-of-state order that is comparable to a
no-contact or protection order issued under Washington law)), 26.09,
26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a valid foreign protection order as defined in
RCW 26.52.020. The previous convictions may involve the same victim or
other victims specifically protected by the ((no-contact orders or
protection)) orders the offender violated.

(6)
Upon the filing of an affidavit by the petitioner or any peace officer alleging
that the respondent has violated an order ((for protection)) granted
under this chapter, chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 74.34 RCW, or a
valid foreign protection order as defined in RCW 26.52.020, the court may
issue an order to the respondent, requiring the respondent to appear and show
cause within fourteen days why the respondent should not be found in contempt of
court and punished accordingly. The hearing may be held in the court of any
county or municipality in which the petitioner or respondent temporarily or
permanently resides at the time of the alleged violation.

Sec. 22. RCW 26.50.150
and 1999 c 147 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services shall adopt rules for standards of
approval of domestic violence perpetrator programs that accept perpetrators of
domestic violence into treatment to satisfy court orders or that represent the
programs as ones that treat domestic violence perpetrators. The treatment must
meet the following minimum qualifications:

(((1)))
(a) All treatment must be based upon a full, complete clinical intake including:
Current and past violence history; a lethality risk assessment; a complete
diagnostic evaluation; a substance abuse assessment; criminal history;
assessment of cultural issues, learning disabilities, literacy, and special
language needs; and a treatment plan that adequately and appropriately
addresses the treatment needs of the individual.

(((2)))
(b) To facilitate communication necessary for periodic safety checks and
case monitoring, the program must require the perpetrator to sign the following
releases:

(((a)))
(i) A release for the program to inform the victim and victim's
community and legal advocates that the perpetrator is in treatment with the
program, and to provide information, for safety purposes, to the victim and
victim's community and legal advocates;

(((b)))
(ii) A release to prior and current treatment agencies to provide
information on the perpetrator to the program; and

(((c)))
(iii) A release for the program to provide information on the
perpetrator to relevant legal entities including: Lawyers, courts, parole,
probation, child protective services, and child welfare services.

(((3)))
(c) Treatment must be for a minimum treatment period defined by the
secretary of the department by rule. The weekly treatment sessions must be in
a group unless there is a documented, clinical reason for another modality.
Any other therapies, such as individual, marital, or family therapy, substance
abuse evaluations or therapy, medication reviews, or psychiatric interviews,
may be concomitant with the weekly group treatment sessions described in this
section but not a substitute for it.

(((4)))
(d) The treatment must focus primarily on ending the violence, holding
the perpetrator accountable for his or her violence, and changing his or her
behavior. The treatment must be based on nonvictim-blaming strategies and
philosophies and shall include education about the individual, family, and
cultural dynamics of domestic violence. If the perpetrator or the victim has a
minor child, treatment must specifically include education regarding the
effects of domestic violence on children, such as the emotional impacts of
domestic violence on children and the long-term consequences that exposure to
incidents of domestic violence may have on children.

(((5)))
(e) Satisfactory completion of treatment must be contingent upon the
perpetrator meeting specific criteria, defined by rule by the secretary of the
department, and not just upon the end of a certain period of time or a certain
number of sessions.

(((6)))
(f) The program must have policies and procedures for dealing with
reoffenses and noncompliance.

(((7)))
(g) All evaluation and treatment services must be provided by, or under
the supervision of, qualified personnel.

(2)
The department shall conduct periodic evaluations of programs that have been
approved under this section, to determine whether they are in compliance with
the standards adopted under this section.

(((8)))
(3) The secretary of the department may adopt rules and establish fees
as necessary to implement this section.

Sec. 23. RCW
26.50.160 and 1995 c 246 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

To
prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different courts and to
give courts needed information for issuance of orders, the judicial information
system shall be available in each district, municipal, and superior court by
July 1, 1997, and shall include a data base containing the following
information:

(1)
The names of the parties and the cause number for every order of protection
issued under this title, every criminal no-contact order issued under chapter 10.99
RCW, every antiharassment order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, every
dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every third-party custody action
under chapter 26.10 RCW, ((and)) every parentage action under chapter ((26.10))
26.26 RCW, every foreign protection order filed under chapter 26.52
RCW, and every order for protection of a vulnerable adult under chapter 74.34
RCW. When a guardian or the department of social and health services has
petitioned for relief on behalf of a vulnerable adult, the name of the
vulnerable adult shall be included in the data base as a party rather than the
guardian or department;

(2)
A criminal history of the parties; and

(3)
Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in issuing orders under
this chapter as determined by the judicial information system committee.

Sec. 24. RCW
26.52.070 and 1999 c 184 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a foreign protection order is granted to a person entitled to
protection and the person under restraint knows of the foreign protection
order, a violation of a provision prohibiting the person under restraint from
contacting or communicating with another person, or of a provision excluding
the person under restraint from a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or
of a provision prohibiting a person from coming within a specified distance of
a location or another person, or a violation of any provision for which the
foreign protection order specifically indicates that a violation will be a
crime, is ((a gross misdemeanor except as provided in subsections (3) and
(4) of this section. Upon conviction, and in addition to any other penalties
provided by law, the court may require the person under restraint to submit to
electronic monitoring. The court shall specify who will provide the electronic
monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring will be
performed. The order also may include a requirement that the person under
restraint pay the costs of the monitoring. The court shall consider the
ability of the convicted person to pay for electronic monitoring)) punishable
under RCW 26.50.110.

(2)
A peace officer shall arrest without a warrant and take into custody a person
when the peace officer has probable cause to believe that a foreign protection
order has been issued of which the person under restraint has knowledge and the
person under restraint has violated a provision of the foreign protection order
that prohibits the person under restraint from contacting or communicating with
another person, or a provision that excludes the person under restraint from a
residence, workplace, school, or day care, or of a provision prohibiting a
person from coming within a specified distance of a location or another person,
or a violation of any provision for which the foreign protection order
specifically indicates that a violation will be a crime. Presence of the order
in the law enforcement computer‑based criminal intelligence information
system is not the only means of establishing knowledge of the order.

(((3)
An assault that is a violation of a valid foreign protection order that does
not amount to assault in the first or second degree under RCW 9A.36.011 or
9A.36.021 is a class C felony, and conduct in violation of a valid foreign
protection order issued under this chapter that is reckless and creates a
substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person is a
class C felony.

(4)
A violation of a valid foreign protection order is a class C felony if the
offender has at least two previous convictions for violating the provisions of
a no‑contact order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW, a domestic violence
protection order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or a
federal or out‑of‑state order that is comparable to a no‑contact
or protection order issued under Washington law. The previous convictions may
involve the same person entitled to protection or other person entitled to
protection specifically protected by the no‑contact orders or protection
orders the offender violated.))

Sec.
25. RCW
70.123.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 245 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall contract, where appropriate, with public or private nonprofit
groups or organizations with experience and expertise in the field of domestic
violence to:

(1)
Develop and implement an educational program designed to promote public and professional
awareness of the problems of domestic violence and of the availability of
services for victims of domestic violence. Particular emphasis should be given
to the education needs of law enforcement agencies, the legal system, the
medical profession, and other relevant professions that are engaged in the
prevention, identification, and treatment of domestic violence;

(2)
Maintain a directory of temporary shelters and other direct service facilities
for the victims of domestic violence which is current, complete, detailed, and
available, as necessary, to provide useful referral services to persons seeking
help on an emergency basis;

(3)
Create a state-wide toll-free telephone number that would provide information
and referral to victims of domestic violence;

(4)
Provide opportunities to persons working in the area of domestic violence to
exchange information; ((and))

(5)
Provide training opportunities for both volunteer workers and staff personnel;
and

(6) Develop and provide advocacy, community education, and
specialized services to underserved victims of domestic violence.

Sec.
26. RCW
74.34.130 and 1999 c 176 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The court may order relief as it deems necessary for the protection
of the petitioner, including, but not limited to the following:

(1)
Restraining respondent from committing acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or
financial exploitation;

(2)
Excluding the respondent from petitioner's residence for a specified period or
until further order of the court;

(3)
Prohibiting contact by respondent for a specified period or until further order
of the court;

(4)
Prohibiting the respondent from coming within a specified distance from a
specified location, or within a specified distance from a specified other
person;

(5)
Requiring an accounting by respondent of the disposition of petitioner's income
or other resources;

(((5)))
(6) Restraining the transfer of property for a specified period not
exceeding ninety days;

(((6)))
(7) Requiring the respondent to pay the filing fee and court costs,
including service fees, and to reimburse the petitioner for costs incurred in
bringing the action, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

Any
relief granted by an order for protection, other than a judgment for costs,
shall be for a fixed period not to exceed one year.

Sec.
27. RCW
9.94A.440 and 1999 c 322 s 6 and 1999 c 196 s 11 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Decision not to prosecute.

STANDARD:
A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question or would result in decreased respect for the law.

GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The
following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the
standard.

(a)
Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where
the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent
of the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b)
Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in
question is antiquated in that:

(i)
It has not been enforced for many years; and

(ii)
Most members of society act as if it were no longer in existence; and

(iii)
It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv)
The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This
reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law
in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c)
De Minimus Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where no public
interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d)
Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of
confinement; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iii)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(e)
Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge
because the accused is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another
county; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iv)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(f)
High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on,
prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of
prosecuting the offense in question. This reason should be limited to minor
cases and should not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g)
Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because
the motives of the complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no
public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or
would result in decreased respect for the law.

(h)
Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given
to an accused in order to prosecute another where the accused's information or
testimony will reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible
for more serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the
public interest.

(i)
Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because the victim
requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case involves the following
crimes or situations:

(i)
Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii)
Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no major loss was
suffered;

(iii)
Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care
should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not
the product of threats or pressure by the accused.

The
presence of these factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a
prosecution which has been commenced.

Notification

The
prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law
enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2)
Decision to prosecute.

(a)
STANDARD:

Crimes
against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which,
when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that
could be raised under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable
and objective fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW
9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be provided
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(8).

Crimes
against property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of
such convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

See
table below for the crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES AGAINST PERSONS

Aggravated Murder

1st
Degree Murder

2nd
Degree Murder

1st
Degree Kidnaping

1st
Degree Assault

1st
Degree Assault of a Child

1st
Degree Rape

1st
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Arson

2nd
Degree Kidnaping

2nd
Degree Assault

2nd
Degree Assault of a Child

2nd
Degree Rape

2nd
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Manslaughter

2nd
Degree Manslaughter

1st
Degree Extortion

Indecent
Liberties

Incest

2nd
Degree Rape of a Child

Vehicular
Homicide

Vehicular
Assault

3rd
Degree Rape

3rd
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Child Molestation

3rd
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Extortion

1st
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Intimidating
a Juror

Communication
with a Minor

Intimidating
a Witness

Intimidating
a Public Servant

Bomb
Threat (if against person)

3rd
Degree Assault

3rd
Degree Assault of a Child

Unlawful
Imprisonment

Promoting
a Suicide Attempt

Riot
(if against person)

Stalking

Custodial
Assault

((No-Contact Order-Domestic Violence Pretrial (RCW 10.99.040(4)
(b) and (c))

No-Contact Order-Domestic Violence Sentence (RCW 10.99.050(2))

Protection
Order-Domestic Violence Civil (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5)))) Domestic
Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.10.220,
26.26.138, 26.50.110, 26.52.070, or section 3 of this act)

Counterfeiting
(if a violation of RCW 9.16.035(4))

CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES

2nd Degree Arson

1st
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Theft

1st
Degree Perjury

1st
Degree Introducing Contraband

1st
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

Bribery

Bribing
a Witness

Bribe
received by a Witness

Bomb
Threat (if against property)

1st
Degree Malicious Mischief

2nd
Degree Theft

2nd
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Introducing Contraband

2nd
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

2nd
Degree Malicious Mischief

1st
Degree Reckless Burning

Taking
a Motor Vehicle without Authorization

Forgery

2nd
Degree Perjury

2nd
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Tampering
with a Witness

Trading
in Public Office

Trading
in Special Influence

Receiving/Granting
Unlawful Compensation

Bigamy

Eluding
a Pursuing Police Vehicle

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough

Escape
from Community Custody

Riot
(if against property)

Thefts
of Livestock

ALL
OTHER UNCLASSIFIED FELONIES

Selection
of Charges/Degree of Charge

(i)
The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe the nature of
defendant's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary
to ensure that the charges:

(A)
Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(B)
Will result in restitution to all victims.

(ii) The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea.
Overcharging includes:

(A) Charging a higher degree;

(B)
Charging additional counts.

This
standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which
demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a defendant's criminal conduct, but
to decline to charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication.
Crimes which do not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same
course of conduct, do not all have to be charged.

(b) GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

(i) Police Investigation

A
prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the
necessary factual investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute.
The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has
been conducted before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary
circumstances the investigation should include the following:

(A)
The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of
written statements whenever possible;

(B)
The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and

(C)
The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's
version of the events.

If
the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist
upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify
what the investigation needs to include.

(ii)
Exceptions

In
certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal
complaint before the investigation is complete if:

(A)
Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(B)
The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not
apprehended; or

(C)
The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the
crime.

In
the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting
attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to
complete the investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation
does not produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the
complaint should be dismissed.

(iii)
Investigation Techniques

The
prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were
used in the case investigation including:

(A)
Polygraph testing;

(B)
Hypnosis;

(C)
Electronic surveillance;

(D)
Use of informants.

(iv)
Pre-Filing Discussions with Defendant

Discussions
with the defendant or his/her representative regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential
agreements can be reached.

(v)
Pre-Filing Discussions with Victim(s)

Discussions
with the victim(s) or victims' representatives regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur before the filing of charges. The discussions
may be considered by the prosecutor in charging and disposition decisions, and
should be considered before reaching any agreement with the defendant regarding
these decisions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28.
Section 14 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29.
Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30. (1)
The penalties prescribed in section 1 of this act apply to violations of court
orders which occur on or after the effective date of section 1 of this act,
regardless of the date the court issued the order.

(2) The penalties prescribed in this act, other than in section 1
of this act, apply to violations of court orders which occur on or after July
1, 2000, regardless of the date the court issued the order.

---
END ---