BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.380 and 1999 c 197 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Alternatives
to total confinement are available for offenders with sentences of one year or
less. These alternatives include the following sentence conditions that the
court may order as substitutes for total confinement:

(1)
((One day)) Up to two days of partial confinement may be
substituted for one day of total confinement;

(2)
In addition, for offenders convicted of nonviolent offenses only, eight hours
of community service may be substituted for one day of total confinement, with
a maximum conversion limit of two hundred forty hours or thirty days.
Community service hours must be completed within the period of community
supervision or a time period specified by the court, which shall not exceed
twenty-four months, pursuant to a schedule determined by the department; and

(3)
For offenders convicted of nonviolent and nonsex offenses, the court may
authorize county jails to convert jail confinement to an available county
supervised community option and may require the offender to perform affirmative
conduct pursuant to RCW 9.94A.129.

For sentences of nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the
court shall consider and give priority to available alternatives to total
confinement and shall state its reasons in writing on the judgment and sentence
form if the alternatives are not used.

---
END ---