BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.13.020 and 1994 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All city, town, and district general elections shall be held throughout the
state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November
in the odd-numbered years.

This
section shall not apply to:

(a)
Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;

(b)
Public utility districts or district elections at which the ownership of
property within those districts is a prerequisite to voting, all of which elections
shall be held at the times prescribed in the laws specifically applicable
thereto;

(c)
Consolidation proposals as provided for in RCW 28A.315.280 and nonhigh capital
fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW.

(2)
The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon request in the
form of a resolution of the governing body of a city, town, or district,
presented to the auditor at least forty-five days prior to the proposed
election date, may, if the county auditor deems an emergency to exist, call a
special election in such city, town, or district, and for the purpose of such
special election he or she may combine, unite, or divide precincts. Except as
provided in subsection (((3))) (4) of this section, such a
special election shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by the
governing body:

(a)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;

(b)
The second Tuesday in March;

(c)
The fourth Tuesday in April;

(d)
The third Tuesday in May;

(e)
The day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29.13.070; or

(f)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3)
The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon request in
the form of a resolution of the governing body of a first class city, presented
to the auditor at least forty-five days prior to the proposed election date,
may call a special election on one of the dates described in subsection (2) of
this section as decided by the governing body in such city, for the purpose of
electing new municipal officers as a result of an election to change its form
of government.

(4)
In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference primary is
conducted in February, March, April, or May under chapter 29.19 RCW, the date
on which a special election may be called under subsection (2) of this section
during the month of that primary is the date of the presidential primary.

(((4)))
(5) In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section, a
special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be called at any
time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of
God, except that no special election may be held between the first day for
candidates to file for public office and the last day to certify the returns of
the general election other than as provided in subsection (2)(e) and (f) of
this section. Such special election shall be conducted and notice thereof
given in the manner provided by law.

(((5))) (6) This section shall supersede the
provisions of any and all other statutes, whether general or special in nature,
having different dates for such city, town, and district elections, the purpose
of this section being to establish mandatory dates for holding elections.

---
END ---