BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
75.46.010 and 1998 c 246 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Adaptive management" means reliance on scientific methods to test
the results of actions taken so that the management and related policy can be
changed promptly and appropriately.

(2)
"Critical pathways methodology" means a project scheduling and
management process for examining interactions between habitat projects and
salmonid species, prioritizing habitat projects, and assuring positive benefits
from habitat projects.

(3)
"Habitat project list" is the list of projects resulting from the
critical pathways methodology under RCW 75.46.070(2) that shall receive
consideration for funding by the salmon recovery funding board. Each
project on the list must have a written agreement from the landowner on whose
land the project will be implemented, and must be based on the limiting
factors analysis conducted in RCW 75.46.070 when completed.

(4)
"Habitat projects" or "projects" include but
are not limited to habitat restoration projects, habitat protection
projects, habitat projects that improve water quality, habitat projects that
protect water quality, habitat-related mitigation projects, fish passage
barrier correction projects, fish screening projects, projects that accelerate
the recovery process such as supplementation of wild stocks, and habitat
project corrective maintenance and monitoring activities. Projects
that include the use of side channels, off-stream rearing enhancement,
improvement in overwintering habitat, or use of acclimation ponds shall receive
consideration for funding.

(((4)))
(5) "Habitat work schedule" means ((those projects from the
habitat project list that will be implemented during the current funding cycle))
development of a table of completed, active, and potential projects as a
basis for critical pathways methodology analysis. The schedule shall also
include ((a list of the entities and individuals implementing projects,))
the estimated start date, duration, ((estimated)) date of
completion, ((estimated)) cost, affected salmonid species, and
funding sources for the projects.

(((5)))
(6) "Limiting factors" means conditions that limit the ability
of habitat to fully sustain populations of salmon. ((These factors are
primarily fish passage barriers and degraded estuarine areas, riparian
corridors, stream channels, and wetlands.

(6))) (7)
"Project sponsor" is a county, city, special district, tribal
government, state agency, a combination of such governments through
interlocal or interagency agreement((s provided under chapter 39.34
RCW)), a nonprofit organization, or one or more private citizens.

(((7)))
(8) "Salmon" includes all species of the family Salmonidae
which are capable of self-sustaining, natural production except for Atlantic
salmon.

(((8)))
(9) "Salmon recovery plan" means a state plan developed in
response to a proposed or actual listing under the federal endangered species
act that addresses limiting factors including, but not limited to harvest,
hatchery, hydropower, habitat, and other factors of decline.

(((9)))
(10) "Tribe" or "tribes" means federally recognized
Indian tribes.

(((10)))
(11) "WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established
in chapter 173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

(((11)))
(12) "Owner" means the person holding title to the land or the
person under contract with the owner to lease or manage the legal owner's
property.

(13)
"Board" means the salmon recovery funding board created in RCW
75.46.150.

(14)
"Listed stocks" means salmon and trout stocks that are listed or
proposed for listing as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered
species act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.

(15)
"SASSI" means the salmon and steelhead stock inventory report and
appendices.

(16)
"SSHIAP" means the salmon and steelhead habitat inventory and
assessment project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

Any
salmon recovery activities funded by the board must have as a principle purpose
the protection and restoration of salmonid populations. Salmon recovery
activities may be conducted by local governments, tribes, other public
entities, and private entities. Salmon recovery activities may include, but
are not limited to: Preparation of stream corridor guidelines; programmatic
permitting; project scoping, predesign, and engineering for fish passage,
screening, habitat restoration, and acquisition; preparation of geographic
information system protocols; and the development of baseline hydrological data
in areas in which at least one fish species is listed as endangered under the
federal endangered species act due to the lack of sufficient flows, and the
development of this baseline data is necessary for local governments and
private citizens to respond effectively to the listing.

Sec.
3. RCW
75.46.170 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The (([salmon recovery funding])) board shall develop procedures and
criteria for allocation of funds for salmon habitat projects and salmon
recovery activities on a state-wide basis to address the highest priorities for
salmon habitat protection and restoration. To the extent practicable the board
shall adopt an annual allocation of funding. The allocation should address
both protection and restoration of habitat, and should recognize the varying
needs in each area of the state on an equitable basis. The board has the
discretion to partially fund, or to fund in phases, salmon habitat projects.
The board may annually establish a maximum amount of funding available for any
individual project, subject to available funding. No projects required solely
as a mitigation or a condition of permitting are eligible for funding.

(2)(a)
In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and activities the
board shall give preference to projects that:

(i)
Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under RCW 75.46.070;

(ii)
Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the stock status
information contained in the department of fish and wildlife salmonid stock
inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead habitat inventory and assessment
project (SSHIAP), and any comparable science-based assessment when available;

(iii)
Will benefit listed species and other fish species; and

(iv)
Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat.

(b)
In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and activities the
board shall also give consideration to projects that:

(i)
Are the most cost-effective;

(ii)
Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; and

(iii)
Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of project
implementation.

(3)
The board may reject, but not add, projects from a habitat project list
submitted by a lead entity for funding.

(4)
For fiscal year 2000, the board may authorize the interagency review team to
evaluate, rank, and make funding decisions for categories of projects or
activities or from funding sources provided for categories of projects or
activities. In delegating such authority the board shall consider the review
team's staff resources, procedures, and technical capacity to meet the purposes
and objectives of this chapter. The board shall maintain general oversight of
the team's exercise of such authority.

(5)
The board shall seek the guidance of the technical review team to ensure that
scientific principles and information are incorporated into the allocation
standards and into proposed projects and activities. If the technical review
team determines that a habitat project list complies with the critical pathways
methodology under RCW 75.46.070, it shall provide substantial weight to the
list's project priorities when making determinations among applications for
funding of projects within the area covered by the list.

(6)
The board shall establish criteria for determining when block grants may be
made to a lead entity or other recognized regional recovery entity consistent
with one or more habitat project lists developed for that region. Where a lead
entity has been established pursuant to RCW 75.46.060, the board may provide
grants to the lead entity to assist in carrying out lead entity functions under
this chapter, subject to available funding. The board shall determine an
equitable minimum amount of funds for each region, and shall distribute the
remainder of funds on a competitive basis.

(7)
The board may waive or modify portions of the allocation procedures and
standards adopted under this section in the award of grants or loans to conform
to legislative appropriations directing an alternative award procedure or when
the funds to be awarded are from federal or other sources requiring other
allocation procedures or standards as a condition of the board's receipt of the
funds. The board shall develop an integrated process to manage the allocation
of funding from federal and state sources to minimize delays in the award of
funding while recognizing the differences in state and legislative
appropriation timing.

(8) The board shall establish a time limit for the completion of
projects that are awarded funds under this section. The time limit imposed by
the board for completing projects shall provide for timely completion of projects
but allow adequate time for projects that by their nature require multiple
years to accomplish. The time limit may not exceed five years from the time
the funds are awarded. The board shall not require the project sponsor to
reapply to the board for these same funds in subsequent funding cycles within
the time limit imposed by the board.

---
END ---