BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW to read as follows:

A
judge pro tempore may be authorized under RCW 2.06.150 or 2.08.180 whenever a
judge of the court of appeals or the superior court serves on a judicial
commission, board, or committee established by the legislature or the chief
justice of the supreme court. The judge pro tempore shall be compensated as
specified in RCW 2.06.160 or 2.08.180.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 3.02 RCW to read as follows:

A judge pro tempore may be authorized under RCW 3.50.090 or
35.20.200 whenever a judge of the municipal court serves on a judicial
commission, board, or committee established by the legislature or the chief
justice of the supreme court. The judge pro tempore shall be compensated as
specified in RCW 3.50.090 or 35.20.200.

---
END ---