BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.86A.030 and 1993 c 512 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Funds held in public depositaries not as demand deposits as provided in RCW
43.86A.020 and 43.86A.030, shall be available for a time certificate of deposit
investment program according to the following formula: The state treasurer
shall apportion to all participating depositaries an amount equal to five
percent of the three year average mean of general state revenues as certified
in accordance with Article VIII, section 1(b) of the state Constitution, or
fifty percent of the total surplus treasury investment availability, whichever
is less. Within thirty days after certification, those funds determined to be
available according to this formula for the time certificate of deposit
investment program shall be deposited in qualified public depositaries. These
deposits shall be allocated among the participating depositaries on a basis to
be determined by the state treasurer.

(2)
The state treasurer may use up to ((fifty)) sixty million dollars
per year of all funds available under this section for the purposes of RCW
43.86A.060. The amounts made available to these public depositaries shall be
equal to the amounts of outstanding loans made under RCW 43.86A.060.

(3)
The formula so devised shall be a matter of public record giving consideration
to, but not limited to deposits, assets, loans, capital structure, investments
or some combination of these factors. However, if in the judgment of the state
treasurer the amount of allocation for certificates of deposit as determined by
this section will impair the cash flow needs of the state treasury, the state
treasurer may adjust the amount of the allocation accordingly.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.86A.060 and 1993 c 512 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state treasurer shall establish a linked deposit program for investment of
deposits in qualified public depositaries. As a condition of participating in
the program, qualified public depositaries must make qualifying loans as
provided in this section. The state treasurer may purchase a certificate of
deposit that is equal to the amount of the qualifying loan made by the
qualified public depositary or may purchase a certificate of deposit that is
equal to the aggregate amount of two or more qualifying loans made by one or
more qualified public depositaries.

(2)
Qualifying loans made under this section are those ((that)):

(a)
((Are loans that have)) Having terms that do not exceed ten
years;

(b)
Where the total amount of the loan or loans per minority or women's business
enterprises does not exceed one million dollars;

((Are))
(c) Made to a minority or women's business enterprise that has received
state certification under chapter 39.19 RCW;

(((c)
Are made to minority or women's business enterprises that are considered a
small business as defined in RCW 43.31.025;))

(d)
((Are made)) Where the interest rate on the loan to the minority
or women's business enterprise does not exceed ((an interest rate that is
two hundred basis points below the interest rate)) the qualified public ((depositary
would charge for a loan for a similar purpose and a similar term)) depositary's
prime interest rate; and

(e)
((Are made)) Where the points or fees charged at loan closing do
not exceed one percent of the loan amount.

(3)
In setting interest rates of time certificate of deposits, the state treasurer
shall offer rates so that a two hundred basis point preference will be given to
the qualified public depositary.

(4)
Upon notification by the state treasurer that a minority or women's business
enterprise is no longer certified under chapter 39.19 RCW, the qualified public
depositary shall reduce the amount of qualifying loans by the outstanding
balance of the loan made under this section to the minority or women's business
enterprise.

(5)
As used in this section, "prime interest rate" means the interest
rate that a qualified public depositary charges to its lowest credit risk
commercial customer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 39.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The office shall, in consultation with the state treasurer and the department
of community, trade, and economic development, compile information on minority
and women's business enterprises that have requested financial assistance
through a qualified public depositary under the provisions of RCW 43.86A.060.
The information shall include, but is not limited to:

(a)
Name of the qualified public depositary;

(b)
Geographic location of the minority or women's business enterprise;

(c)
Name of the minority or women's business enterprise;

(d)
Date of last certification by the office and certification number;

(e)
Type of business;

(f)
Race and ownership status of the minority or women's business enterprise;

(g)
Amount and term of the loan to the minority or women's business enterprise; and

(h)
Other information the office deems necessary for the implementation of this
section.

(2)
The office shall notify the state treasurer of minority or women's business
enterprises that are no longer certified under the provisions of this chapter.
The written notification shall contain information regarding the reason for the
decertification and information on financing provided to the minority or
women's business enterprise under RCW 43.86A.060.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.63A.690 and 1993 c 512 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall provide technical assistance and loan packaging services
that enable minority and women-owned business enterprises to obtain financing
under the linked deposit program created under RCW 43.86A.060.

(2)
The department shall, in consultation with the state treasurer and office of
minority and women's business enterprise, monitor the performance of loans
made to minority and women-owned business enterprises under RCW 43.86A.060.

(3)
The department, in consultation with the office of minority and women's
business enterprise, shall develop indicators to measure the performance of the
linked deposit program in the areas of job creation or retention and providing
access to capital to minority or women's business enterprises.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.381 (Linked deposit program--Termination) and 1994 c 126 s
2 & 1993 c 512 s 35; and

(2) RCW
43.131.382 (Linked deposit program--Repeal) and 1994 c 126 s 3
& 1993 c 512 s 36.

---
END ---