BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that academic success rests on a foundation of character.
The legislature further finds that parents are the first and primary moral
educators of children, and that schools have a role in reinforcing the
character traits and values deemed important by parents and the local community.
The legislature further finds that when character education is integrated into
a school's curriculum there is a decline of incidences involving violence,
bullying, and harassment. The legislature intends to encourage school
districts to integrate character education into each school's curriculum. The
legislature further intends that local communities, in partnership with schools
or school districts, will have the responsibility for determining which
character traits and values are included in each district or school's character
education program.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.150.211 and 1994 c 245 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature also recognizes that certain basic values and character traits
are essential to individual liberty, fulfillment, and happiness. However,
these values and traits are not intended to be assessed or be standards for
graduation. The legislature intends that local communities have the
responsibility for determining how these values and character traits are
learned as determined by consensus at the local level. These values and traits
include the importance of:

(((1)))
(a) Honesty, integrity, and trust;

(((2)))
(b) Respect for self and others;

(((3)))
(c) Responsibility for personal actions and commitments;

(((4)))
(d) Self-discipline and moderation;

(((5)))
(e) Diligence and a positive work ethic;

(((6)))
(f) Respect for law and authority;

(((7)))
(g) Healthy and positive behavior; and

(((8)))
(h) Family as the basis of society.

(2)
Each school district is strongly encouraged to develop and implement a
character education program that incorporates into its curriculum the character
traits and values included in subsection (1) of this section. Each school
district is also strongly encouraged to develop its character education program
in partnership with parents and all interested stakeholders in its local
community. When developing a character education program, school districts
shall comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide to each school
district that develops and implements a character education program, in
partnership with parents and all interested stakeholders in its local community
under the provisions of RCW 28A.150.211, an equal amount per full-time
equivalent elementary school student for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001.
However, the minimum allocation to a district shall be two hundred dollars for
each elementary school operated by the district.

(2)
A school district that receives funding in accordance with this section shall
certify to the superintendent of public instruction that funds received were
expended for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---