BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that credit is an important tool for consumers in today's
economy, particularly the use of credit cards. The legislature also finds that
unscrupulous persons often fraudulently use the credit card accounts of others
by stealing the credit card itself or by obtaining the necessary information to
fraudulently charge the purchase of goods and services to another person's
credit card account. The legislature intends to provide some protection for
consumers from the latter by limiting the information that can appear on a
credit card receipt.

(2)
No person that accepts credit cards for the transaction of business shall print
more than the last five digits of the credit card account number or print the
credit card expiration date on a credit card receipt to the cardholder.

(3)
This section shall apply only to receipts that are electronically printed and
shall not apply to transactions in which the sole means of recording the credit
card number is by handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the credit card.

(4)
For purposes of this act, "credit card" means a card or device
existing for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on
credit.

(5)
This section applies on July 1, 2001, to any cash register or other machine or
device that electronically prints receipts on credit card transactions and is
placed into service on or after July 1, 2001, and on July 1, 2004, to any cash
register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts on
credit card transactions and is placed into service prior to July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 63.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A retailer shall not print more than the last five digits of the credit card
account number or print the credit card expiration date on a credit card
receipt to the cardholder.

(2)
This section shall apply only to receipts that are electronically printed and
shall not apply to transactions in which the sole means of recording the credit
card number is by handwriting or by an imprint or copy of the credit card.

(3)
This section applies on July 1, 2001, to any cash register or other machine or
device that electronically prints receipts on credit card transactions and is
placed into service on or after July 1, 2001, and on July 1, 2004, to any cash
register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts on
credit card transactions and is placed into service prior to July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---