BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.522 and 1996 c 199 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A person is guilty of vehicular assault in the first degree if he or
she operates or drives any vehicle:

(((a)))
(i) In a reckless manner, and this conduct is the proximate cause of
serious bodily injury to another; or

(((b)))
(ii) While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, and this conduct is the proximate cause of serious
bodily injury to another.

(((2)))
(b) "Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves
a substantial risk of death, serious permanent disfigurement, or protracted
loss or impairment of the function of any part or organ of the body.

(((3)))
(c) Vehicular assault in the first degree is a class B felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)(a)
A person is guilty of vehicular assault in the second degree if he or she,
under circumstances not amounting to assault in the first degree, operates or
drives any vehicle:

(i)
In a reckless manner, and this conduct is the proximate cause of substantial
bodily injury to another; or

(ii)
While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW
46.61.502, and this conduct is the proximate cause of substantial bodily injury
to another.

(b)
"Substantial bodily injury" means bodily injury that involves a
temporary but substantial disfigurement, or that causes a temporary but
substantial loss or impairment of the function of a part or organ of the body,
or that causes a fracture of a part of the body.

(c)
Vehicular assault in the second degree is a class C felony punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW
9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW
9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with
forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a
narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule
I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW
9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW
9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1
(RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW
9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for extortionate extension
of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW
9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Vehicular Assault 1 (RCW 46.61.522(1))

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW ((88.12.032)) 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW 46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW ((88.12.155(3)))
79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V (except
marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080
(1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault 2 (RCW 46.61.522(2))

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW 72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances
(RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to deliver
marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun or
Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat
of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW 9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and (3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW
9A.52.095)

---
END ---