BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.04.355 and 1977 ex.s. c 33 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

On
or before the fifteenth day of June of each year, an "average
annual wage", an "average weekly wage", and an "average
annual wage for contributions purposes" shall be computed from information
for the specified preceding calendar years including corrections
thereof reported within three months after the close of ((that)) the
final year of the specified years by all employers as defined in RCW
50.04.080.

(1)
The "average annual wage" is the quotient derived by dividing the
total remuneration reported by all employers for the preceding calendar year
and dividing this amount by the average number of workers reported for all
months of the preceding calendar year and if the result is not a
multiple of one dollar, rounding the result to the next lower multiple of one
dollar.

(2)
The "average weekly wage" is the quotient derived by dividing the
"average annual wage" ((thus)) obtained ((shall be divided))
under (1) of this subsection by fifty-two and if the result is not a
multiple of one dollar, rounding the result to the next lower multiple of one
dollar ((to determine the "average weekly wage")).

(3)
The "average annual wage((")) for contribution purposes"
is the quotient derived by dividing by three the total remuneration
reported by all employers subject to contributions for the preceding three
consecutive calendar years and dividing this amount by the average number
of workers reported for all months of these three years by these same
employers and if the result is not a multiple of one dollar, rounding the
result to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.24.010 and 1984 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Contributions
shall accrue and become payable by each employer (except employers as described
in RCW 50.44.010 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions and those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of
contributions) for each calendar year in which the employer is subject to this
title at the rate established pursuant to chapter 50.29 RCW.

In
each rate year, the amount of wages subject to tax for each individual shall be
one hundred fifteen percent of the amount of wages subject to tax for the
previous year rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars((: PROVIDED)),
except that the amount of wages subject to tax in any rate year shall
not exceed eighty percent of the "average annual wage for contributions purposes"
for the second preceding calendar year rounded to the next lower one hundred
dollars((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). However, the amount
subject to tax shall be ((twelve)) twenty-four thousand three
hundred dollars for rate year ((1984 and ten thousand dollars for rate
year 1985)) 2000.

In
making computations under this section and RCW 50.29.010, wages paid based on
services for employers making payments in lieu of contributions shall not be
considered remuneration. Moneys paid from the fund, based on services
performed for employers who make payments in lieu of contributions, which have
not been reimbursed to the fund as of any June 30 shall be deemed an asset of
the unemployment compensation fund, to the extent that such moneys exceed the
amount of payments in lieu of contributions which the commissioner has
previously determined to be uncollectible: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the amount
attributable to employment with the state shall also include interest as
provided for in RCW 50.44.020.

Contributions
shall become due and be paid by each employer to the treasurer for the
unemployment compensation fund in accordance with such regulations as the
commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part,
from the remuneration of individuals in employment of the employer. Any
deduction in violation of the provisions of this section shall be unlawful.

In
the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be
disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall
be increased to one cent.

Sec.
3. RCW
50.29.020 and 1995 c 57 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An experience rating account shall be established and maintained for each
employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have
properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local
government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are
required to make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records
of the employment security department. Benefits paid to any eligible
individuals shall be charged to the experience rating accounts of each of such
individual's employers during the individual's base year in the same ratio that
the wages paid by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to
the wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2)
The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole or in part,
should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of employers except
those employers described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly
elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government employers
described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to make
payments in lieu of contributions, as follows:

(a)
Benefits paid to any individuals later determined to be ineligible shall not be
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.

(b)
Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of chapter 50.06 RCW
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution
paying employer only if:

(i)
The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving crime victims'
compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or

(ii)
The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).

(c)
Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits payable as
extended benefits defined under ((chapter 50.22)) RCW 50.22.010(6)
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution
paying employer.

(d)
In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW 50.20.050 or
50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to the disqualifying
separation shall not be charged to the experience rating account of the
contribution paying employer from whom that separation took place.

(e)
In the case of individuals identified under RCW 50.20.015, benefits paid with
respect to a calendar quarter, which exceed the total amount of wages earned in
the state of Washington in the higher of two corresponding calendar quarters
included within the individual's determination period, as defined in RCW
50.20.015, shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.

(f)
Benefits paid under section 8 of this act shall not be charged to the
experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.

(3)(a)
((Beginning July 1, 1985,)) A contribution-paying base year
employer, not otherwise eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this
section, may receive such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to
an individual who:

(i)
Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons not attributable
to the employer;

(ii)
Was discharged for misconduct connected with his or her work not a result of inability
to meet the minimum job requirements;

(iii)
Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of operation at the
employer's plant, building, work site, or other facility. This closure must be
for reasons directly attributable to a catastrophic occurrence such as fire,
flood, or other natural disaster; or

(iv)
Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent part-time basis by
a base year employer and who at some time during the base year was concurrently
employed and subsequently separated from at least one other base year
employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when the employment relationship
between the employer requesting relief and the claimant is terminated. This
subsection does not apply to shared work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.

(b)
The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection must request
relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to the last known
address of the notification of the valid initial determination of such claim,
stating the date and reason for the separation or the circumstances of
continued employment. The commissioner, upon investigation of the request,
shall determine whether relief should be granted.

Sec.
4. RCW
50.29.025 and 1995 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be determined under this section.

(1)
A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the
unemployment compensation fund as of the ((June)) September 30th
immediately preceding the rate year by the total remuneration paid by all
employers subject to contributions during the second calendar year preceding
the rate year and reported to the department by the following March 31st. The
division shall be carried to the fourth decimal place with the remaining
fraction, if any, disregarded. The fund balance ratio shall be expressed as a
percentage.

(2)
The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall determine
which tax schedule in subsection (5) of this section shall be in effect for
assigning tax rates for the rate year. The intervals for determining the
effective tax schedule shall be:

Interval of the

Fund Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

((2.50))
2.10 to 2.89 A

((2.10
to 2.49)) 1.70 to 2.09 B

((1.70
to 2.09)) 1.40 to 1.69 C

((1.30 to 1.69)) 1.00 to 1.39 D

((1.00 to 1.29)) 0.70 to 0.99 E

Less
than ((1.00)) 0.70 F

(3)
An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order
of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer:
(a) Identification number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four
calendar quarters immediately preceding the computation date and reported to
the department by the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls
consisting of the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all
other employers preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4)
Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes
according to the percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth
in subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable
payroll falls within two or more rate classes, the employer and any other
employer with the same benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class
which includes any portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5)
Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for each
employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following tables for
the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as determined under
subsection (4) of this section, within the tax schedule which is to be in
effect during the rate year:

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

((Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.48 0.48 0.58 0.98 1.48 1.88 2.48

5.01 10.00 2 0.48 0.48 0.78 1.18 1.68 2.08 2.68

10.01 15.00 3 0.58 0.58 0.98 1.38 1.78 2.28 2.88

15.01 20.00 4 0.58 0.78 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.48 3.08

20.01 25.00 5 0.78 0.98 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.68 3.18

25.01 30.00 6 0.98 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.28

30.01 35.00 7 1.08 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38

35.01 40.00 8 1.28 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58

40.01 45.00 9 1.48 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.78

45.01 50.00 10 1.68 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.98

50.01 55.00 11 1.98 2.28 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.08

55.01 60.00 12 2.18 2.48 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.28

60.01 65.00 13 2.38 2.68 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.48

65.01 70.00 14 2.58 2.88 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.38 4.68

70.01 75.00 15 2.88 3.08 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.58 4.78

75.01 80.00 16 3.08 3.28 3.58 3.98 4.38 4.68 4.88

80.01 85.00 17 3.28 3.48 3.78 4.18 4.58 4.88 4.98

85.01 90.00 18 3.68 3.88 4.18 4.58 4.88 4.98 5.18

90.01 95.00 19 4.08 4.28 4.58 4.98 5.08 5.18 5.38

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40))

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.40 0.40 0.50 0.90 1.40 1.80 2.40

5.01 10.00 2 0.40 0.40 0.70 1.10 1.60 2.00 2.60

10.01 15.00 3 0.50 0.50 0.90 1.30 1.70 2.20 2.80

15.01 20.00 4 0.50 0.70 1.10 1.50 1.90 2.40 3.00

20.01 25.00 5 0.70 0.90 1.30 1.70 2.10 2.60 3.10

25.01 30.00 6 0.90 1.10 1.50 1.90 2.30 2.70 3.20

30.01 35.00 7 1.00 1.30 1.70 2.10 2.50 2.90 3.30

35.01 40.00 8 1.20 1.50 1.90 2.30 2.70 3.10 3.50

40.01 45.00 9 1.40 1.70 2.10 2.50 2.90 3.30 3.70

45.01 50.00 10 1.60 1.90 2.30 2.70 3.10 3.50 3.90

50.01 55.00 11 1.90 2.20 2.50 2.90 3.30 3.70 4.00

55.01 60.00 12 2.10 2.40 2.70 3.10 3.50 3.90 4.20

60.01 65.00 13 2.30 2.60 2.90 3.30 3.70 4.10 4.40

65.01 70.00 14 2.50 2.80 3.10 3.50 3.90 4.30 4.60

70.01 75.00 15 2.80 3.00 3.30 3.70 4.10 4.50 4.70

75.01 80.00 16 3.00 3.20 3.50 3.90 4.30 4.60 4.80

80.01 85.00 17 3.20 3.40 3.70 4.10 4.50 4.80 4.91

85.01 90.00 18 3.60 3.80 4.10 4.50 4.80 4.90 5.10

90.01 95.00 19 4.08 4.28 4.58 4.98 5.08 5.18 5.38

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(6)
The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in the array shall
be as follows:

(a)
Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by
reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be assigned ((the))
a contribution rate ((of five and six-tenths percent)) two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year, except
employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment contract by September 30
of the previous rate year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred
payment contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the
employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to ((five and six-tenths percent
for the current)) a contribution rate two-tenths higher than that in
rate class 20 for the applicable rate year; and

(b)
((The contribution rate for employers exempt as of December 31, 1989, who
are newly covered under the section 78, chapter 380, Laws of 1989 amendment to
RCW 50.04.150 and not yet qualified to be in the array shall be 2.5 percent for
employers whose standard industrial code is "013", "016",
"017", "018", "019", "021", or "081";
and

(c))) For
all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate
shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the
commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than one percent. Assignment
of employers by the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of
this ((subsection)) section, shall be in accordance with
established classification practices found in the "Standard Industrial
Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of management and
budget to the third digit provided in the standard industrial classification
code, or in the North American industrial classification system code.

Sec.
5. RCW
50.29.026 and 1995 c 322 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning with contributions assessed for rate year 1996, a qualified
employer's contribution rate determined under RCW 50.29.025 may be modified as
follows:

(a)
Subject to the limitations of this subsection, an employer may make a voluntary
contribution of an amount equal to part or all of the benefits charged to the
employer's account during the two years most recently ended on June 30th that
were used for the purpose of computing the employer's contribution rate. On
receiving timely payment of a voluntary contribution, plus a surcharge of ten
percent of the amount of the voluntary contribution, the commissioner shall
cancel the benefits equal to the amount of the voluntary contribution,
excluding the surcharge, and compute a new benefit ratio for the employer. The
employer shall then be assigned the contribution rate applicable to the rate
class within which the recomputed benefit ratio is included. The minimum
amount of a voluntary contribution, excluding the surcharge, must be an amount
that will result in a recomputed benefit ratio that is in a rate class at least
two rate classes lower than the rate class that included the employer's
original benefit ratio.

(b)
Payment of a voluntary contribution is considered timely if received by the
department during the period beginning on the date of mailing to the employer
the notice of contribution rate required under this title for the rate year for
which the employer is seeking a modification of his or her contribution rate
and ending on February 15th of that rate year or, for voluntary
contributions for rate year 2000, ending on March 31, 2000.

(c)
A benefit ratio may not be recomputed nor a contribution rate be reduced under
this section as a result of a voluntary contribution received after the payment
period prescribed in (b) of this subsection.

(2)
This section does not apply to any employer who has not had an increase of at
least six rate classes from the previous tax rate year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 50.22 RCW to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature that a training benefits program be
established to provide unemployment insurance benefits to unemployed
individuals who participate in training programs necessary for their
reemployment.

The
legislature further intends that this program serve the following goals:

(1)
Retraining should be available for those unemployed individuals whose skills
are no longer in demand;

(2)
To be eligible for retraining, an individual must have a long-term attachment
to the labor force;

(3)
Training must enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power; and

(4)
Retraining must be targeted to those industries or skills that are in high
demand within the labor market.

Individuals
unemployed as a result of structural changes in the economy and technological
advances rendering their skills obsolete must receive the highest priority for
participation in this program. It is the further intent of the legislature
that individuals for whom suitable employment is available are not eligible for
additional benefits while participating in training.

The
legislature further intends that funding for this program be limited by a
specified maximum amount each fiscal year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 50.22 RCW to read as follows:

The
employment security department is authorized to pay training benefits under
section 8 of this act, but may not obligate expenditures beyond the limits
specified in this section or as otherwise set by the legislature. Beginning
with expenditures for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, and including
expenditures for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2002, the commissioner may
not obligate more than sixty million dollars for training benefits. Any funds
not obligated in one fiscal year may be carried forward to the next fiscal
year. For each fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2002, the commissioner may
not obligate more than twenty million dollars annually in addition to any funds
carried over from previous fiscal years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 50.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to availability of funds, training benefits are available for an
individual who is eligible for or has exhausted entitlement to unemployment
compensation benefits and who:

(a)
Is a dislocated worker as defined in RCW 50.04.075;

(b)
Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, has demonstrated,
through a work history, sufficient tenure in an occupation or in work with a
particular skill set. This screening will take place during the assessment
process;

(c)
Is, after assessment of demand for the individual's occupation or skills in the
individual's labor market, determined to need job-related training to find
suitable employment in his or her labor market;

(d)
Develops an individual training program that is submitted to the commissioner
for approval within sixty days after the individual is notified by the
employment security department of the requirements of this section;

(e)
Enters the approved training program by ninety days after the date of the
notification, unless the employment security department determines that the
training is not available during the ninety-day period, in which case the
individual enters training as soon as it is available; and

(f)
Is enrolled in training approved under this section on a full-time basis as
determined by the educational institution, and is making satisfactory progress
in the training as certified by the educational institution.

(2)
Until June 30, 2002, the following individuals who meet the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section may, without regard to the tenure requirements
under subsection (1)(b) of this section, receive training benefits as provided
in this section:

(a)
An exhaustee who has base year employment in the aerospace industry assigned
the standard industrial classification code "372" or the North
American industrial classification system code "336411";

(b)
An exhaustee who has base year employment in the forest products industry,
determined by the department, but including the industries assigned the major
group standard industrial classification codes "24" and
"26" or any equivalent codes in the North American industrial
classification system code, and the industries involved in the harvesting and
management of logs, transportation of logs and wood products, processing of
wood products, and the manufacturing and distribution of wood processing and
logging equipment; or

(c)
An exhaustee who has base year employment in the fishing industry assigned the
standard industrial classification code "0912" or any equivalent
codes in the North American industrial classification system code.

(3)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Educational institution" means an institution of higher education as
defined in RCW 28B.10.016 or an educational institution as defined in RCW
28C.04.410, including equivalent educational institutions in other states.

(b)
"Sufficient tenure" means earning a plurality of wages in a
particular occupation or using a particular skill set during the base year and
at least two of the four twelve-month periods immediately preceding the base
year.

(c)
"Training benefits" means additional benefits paid under this
section.

(d)
"Training program" means:

(i)
An education program determined to be necessary as a prerequisite to vocational
training after counseling at the educational institution in which the
individual enrolls under his or her approved training program; or

(ii)
A vocational training program at an educational institution:

(A)
That is targeted to training for a high demand occupation;

(B)
That is likely to enhance the individual's marketable skills and earning power;
and

(C)
That meets the criteria for performance developed by the work force training
and education coordinating board for the purpose of determining those training
programs eligible for funding under Title I of P.L. 105-220.

"Training
program" does not include any course of education primarily intended to
meet the requirements of a baccalaureate or higher degree, unless the training
meets specific requirements for certification, licensing, or for specific
skills necessary for the occupation.

(4)
Benefits shall be paid as follows:

(a)(i)
For exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (1) of this section, the total
training benefit amount shall be fifty-two times the individual's weekly
benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and extended
benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year; or

(ii)
For exhaustees who are eligible under subsection (2) of this section, the total
training benefit amount shall be seventy-four times the individual's weekly
benefit amount, reduced by the total amount of regular benefits and extended
benefits paid, or deemed paid, with respect to the benefit year. Beginning
with new claims filed after June 30, 2002, for exhaustees eligible under
subsection (2) of this section, the total training benefit amount shall be
fifty-two times the individual's weekly benefit amount, reduced by the total
amount of regular benefits and extended benefits paid, or deemed paid, with
respect to the benefit year.

(b)
The weekly benefit amount shall be the same as the regular weekly amount
payable during the applicable benefit year and shall be paid under the same
terms and conditions as regular benefits. The training benefits shall be paid
before any extended benefits but not before any similar federally funded
program.

(c)
Training benefits are not payable for weeks more than two years beyond the end
of the benefit year of the regular claim.

(5)
The requirement under RCW 50.22.010(10) relating to exhausting regular benefits
does not apply to an individual otherwise eligible for training benefits under
this section when the individual's benefit year ends before his or her training
benefits are exhausted and the individual is eligible for a new benefit year.
These individuals will have the option of remaining on the original claim or
filing a new claim.

(6)
Individuals who receive training benefits under this section or under any previous
additional benefits program for training are not eligible for training benefits
under this section for five years from the last receipt of training benefits
under this section or under any previous additional benefits program for
training.

(7)
All base year employers are interested parties to the approval of training and
the granting of training benefits.

(8)
The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
work force training and education coordinating board, with the cooperation and
assistance of the state board for community and technical colleges and the
employment security department, shall review the participation in the training
benefits program under section 8 of this act and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2002, on the following:

(1)
A demographic analysis of participants in the training benefits program under
this section including the number of claimants per standard industrial
classification code and the geographic representation of participants;

(2)
The duration of training benefits claimed per claimant;

(3)
An analysis of the training provided to participants including the occupational
category supported by the training, those participants who complete training in
relationship to those that do not, and the reasons for noncompletion of
approved training programs;

(4)
The employment and wage history of participants, including the pretraining and
posttraining wage and whether those participating in training return to their
previous employer after training terminates; and

(5)
The impact of training benefits paid from the unemployment compensation fund on
employers' unemployment insurance contributions. The review shall include the
impact by rate class, industry and business size, and overall impact.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
Sections 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this act apply to rate years beginning on or after
January 1, 2000.

(2)(a) Except as provided under (b) of this subsection (2), section
8 of this act applies beginning with weeks of unemployment that begin on or
after the Sunday following the day on which the governor signs chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (this act).

(b)
For individuals eligible under section 8(2)(a) of this act who are enrolled in
a national reserve grant on the effective date of this act, section 8 of this
act applies beginning with weeks of unemployment that begin after the
termination of their needs-related payments under a national reserve grant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---