BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that schools are not always the havens of safety and
learning that they ought to be. In recent years, serious violence has erupted
at schools both in the state of Washington and across the nation.

(2)
The legislature finds that school employees who entered the field of education
did not choose the profession knowing their lives could be at risk by virtue of
being on school grounds performing their normal duties.

(3)
The legislature recognizes that all school employees, whether they are
principals and other administrators, teachers, or classified employees, have
had their lives threatened, have been in harm's way, and in some cases have
been killed due to working with students who possess firearms and due to other
dangerous circumstances and conditions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3" to read as
follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the estate,
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, of a member of any plan under
this chapter who is an employee in the common school system of the state and
who is killed in the course of employment. The determination of eligibility
for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

(2)
If it is determined that the benefit applies under subsection (1) of this
section, the benefit shall be paid to such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's death
benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such
surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan 3" to read as follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the estate,
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, of a member of any plan under
this chapter who is an employee in the common school system of the state and
who is killed in the course of employment. The determination of eligibility
for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

(2)
If it is determined that the benefit applies under subsection (1) of this
section, the benefit shall be paid to such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's death
benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such
surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to plan 1 and plan 2" to read as follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the estate,
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, of a member of any plan under
this chapter who is an employee in the common school system of the state and
who is killed in the course of employment. The determination of eligibility
for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of
labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the
department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

(2)
If it is determined that the benefit applies under subsection (1) of this
section, the benefit shall be paid to such person or persons, trust, or
organization as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department. If there be no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the member's death, such member's death
benefit shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such
spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such
surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. 1999
c 309 s 718 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1, 2, 4, and 5 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Section 3 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---