BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.24.010 and 1984 c 205 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Contributions
shall accrue and become payable by each employer (except employers as described
in RCW 50.44.010 who have properly elected to make payments in lieu of
contributions and those employers who are required to make payments in lieu of
contributions) for each calendar year in which the employer is subject to this
title at the rate established pursuant to chapter 50.29 RCW.

In
each rate year, the amount of wages subject to tax for each individual shall be
one hundred fifteen percent of the amount of wages subject to tax for the
previous year rounded to the next lower one hundred dollars((: PROVIDED)),
except that the amount of wages subject to tax in any rate year shall
not exceed eighty percent of the "average annual wage for contributions
purposes" for the second preceding calendar year rounded to the next lower
one hundred dollars((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). However, the
amount subject to tax shall be ((twelve)) twenty-four thousand three
hundred dollars for rate ((year 1984 and ten thousand dollars for rate
year 1985)) year 2000, and the first calendar quarter of rate year 2001.

In
making computations under this section and RCW 50.29.010, wages paid based on
services for employers making payments in lieu of contributions shall not be
considered remuneration. Moneys paid from the fund, based on services
performed for employers who make payments in lieu of contributions, which have
not been reimbursed to the fund as of any June 30 shall be deemed an asset of
the unemployment compensation fund, to the extent that such moneys exceed the
amount of payments in lieu of contributions which the commissioner has
previously determined to be uncollectible: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the amount
attributable to employment with the state shall also include interest as
provided for in RCW 50.44.020.

Contributions
shall become due and be paid by each employer to the treasurer for the
unemployment compensation fund in accordance with such regulations as the
commissioner may prescribe, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part,
from the remuneration of individuals in employment of the employer. Any
deduction in violation of the provisions of this section shall be unlawful.

In
the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be
disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent or more, in which case it shall
be increased to one cent.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.29.025 and 1995 c 4 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
contribution rate for each employer subject to contributions under RCW
50.24.010 shall be determined under this section.

(1)
A fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the balance in the
unemployment compensation fund as of the June 30th immediately preceding the
rate year by the total remuneration paid by all employers subject to
contributions during the second calendar year preceding the rate year and
reported to the department by the following March 31st. The division shall be
carried to the fourth decimal place with the remaining fraction, if any,
disregarded. The fund balance ratio shall be expressed as a percentage.

(2)
The interval of the fund balance ratio, expressed as a percentage, shall
determine which tax schedule in subsection (5) of this section shall be in
effect for assigning tax rates for the rate year, except that during rate
year 2000, and the first calendar quarter of rate year 2001, tax schedule A
shall be in effect. The intervals for determining the effective tax
schedule shall be:

Interval of the

Fund Balance Ratio Effective

Expressed as a Percentage Tax Schedule

2.90 and above AA

2.50
to 2.89 A

2.10
to 2.49 B

1.70
to 2.09 C

1.30 to 1.69 D

1.00 to 1.29 E

Less
than 1.00 F

(3)
An array shall be prepared, listing all qualified employers in ascending order
of their benefit ratios. The array shall show for each qualified employer:
(a) Identification number; (b) benefit ratio; (c) taxable payrolls for the four
calendar quarters immediately preceding the computation date and reported to
the department by the cut-off date; (d) a cumulative total of taxable payrolls
consisting of the employer's taxable payroll plus the taxable payrolls of all
other employers preceding him or her in the array; and (e) the percentage
equivalent of the cumulative total of taxable payrolls.

(4)
Each employer in the array shall be assigned to one of twenty rate classes
according to the percentage intervals of cumulative taxable payrolls set forth
in subsection (5) of this section: PROVIDED, That if an employer's taxable
payroll falls within two or more rate classes, the employer and any other
employer with the same benefit ratio shall be assigned to the lowest rate class
which includes any portion of the employer's taxable payroll.

(5)
Except as provided in RCW 50.29.026, the contribution rate for each
employer in the array shall be the rate specified in the following tables for
the rate class to which he or she has been assigned, as determined under
subsection (4) of this section, within the tax schedule which is to be in
effect during the rate year:

Percent of

Cumulative Schedules of Contributions
Rates

Taxable Payrolls for Effective Tax Schedule

Rate

From To Class AA A B C D E F

0.00 5.00 1 0.48 0.48 0.58 0.98 1.48 1.88 2.48

5.01 10.00 2 0.48 0.48 0.78 1.18 1.68 2.08 2.68

10.01 15.00 3 0.58 0.58 0.98 1.38 1.78 2.28 2.88

15.01 20.00 4 0.58 0.78 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.48 3.08

20.01 25.00 5 0.78 0.98 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.68 3.18

25.01 30.00 6 0.98 1.18 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.28

30.01 35.00 7 1.08 1.38 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38

35.01 40.00 8 1.28 1.58 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58

40.01 45.00 9 1.48 1.78 2.18 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.78

45.01 50.00 10 1.68 1.98 2.38 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.98

50.01 55.00 11 1.98 2.28 2.58 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.08

55.01 60.00 12 2.18 2.48 2.78 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.28

60.01 65.00 13 2.38 2.68 2.98 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.48

65.01 70.00 14 2.58 2.88 3.18 3.58 3.98 4.38 4.68

70.01 75.00 15 2.88 3.08 3.38 3.78 4.18 4.58 4.78

75.01 80.00 16 3.08 3.28 3.58 3.98 4.38 4.68 4.88

80.01 85.00 17 3.28 3.48 3.78 4.18 4.58 4.88 4.98

85.01 90.00 18 3.68 3.88 4.18 4.58 4.88 4.98 5.18

90.01 95.00 19 4.08 4.28 4.58 4.98 5.08 5.18 5.38

95.01 100.00 20 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40 5.40

(6)
The contribution rate for each employer not qualified to be in the array shall
be as follows:

(a)
Employers who do not meet the definition of "qualified employer" by
reason of failure to pay contributions when due shall be assigned ((the))
a contribution rate ((of five and six-tenths percent)) two-tenths
higher than that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year, except
employers who have an approved agency-deferred payment contract by September 30
of the previous rate year. If any employer with an approved agency-deferred
payment contract fails to make any one of the succeeding deferred payments or
fails to submit any succeeding tax report and payment in a timely manner, the
employer's tax rate shall immediately revert to ((five and six-tenths
percent for the current)) a contribution rate two-tenths higher than
that in rate class 20 for the applicable rate year; and

(b)
((The contribution rate for employers exempt as of December 31, 1989, who
are newly covered under the section 78, chapter 380, Laws of 1989 amendment to
RCW 50.04.150 and not yet qualified to be in the array shall be 2.5 percent for
employers whose standard industrial code is "013", "016",
"017", "018", "019", "021", or
"081"; and

(c))) For
all other employers not qualified to be in the array, the contribution rate
shall be a rate equal to the average industry rate as determined by the
commissioner; however, the rate may not be less than one percent. Assignment
of employers by the commissioner to industrial classification, for purposes of
this ((subsection)) section, shall be in accordance with
established classification practices found in the "Standard Industrial
Classification Manual" issued by the federal office of management and
budget to the third digit provided in the Standard Industrial Classification
code, or as found in a successor code recognized by the commissioner.

Sec.
3. RCW
50.20.120 and 1993 c 483 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits shall be payable to any
eligible individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount
equal to the lesser of thirty times the weekly benefit amount (determined
hereinafter) or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title: PROVIDED, That as to any week beginning on and after March 31, 1981,
which falls in an extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), ((as
now or hereafter amended,)) an individual's eligibility for maximum
benefits in excess of twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount will be
subject to the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020((, as now or
hereafter amended)).

(2)(a)
An individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages
during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages
were highest.

(b)
The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be determined as of each
June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in the twelve-month period
immediately following such June 30th. Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection: (i) The maximum amount payable weekly shall be seventy percent
of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year preceding such
June 30th((.)); and (ii) the minimum amount payable weekly shall
be fifteen percent of the "average weekly wage" for the calendar year
preceding such June 30th. For benefit years beginning after June 30, 2000,
but before April 1, 2001, the maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall
be the amounts determined as of June 30, 1999. For benefit years beginning on
or after April 1, 2001, but before July 1, 2001, the maximum and minimum
amounts payable weekly shall be the amounts determined as of June 30, 2000.

(c)
If any weekly benefit, maximum benefit, or minimum benefit amount computed
herein is not a multiple of one dollar, it shall be reduced to the next lower
multiple of one dollar.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
legislative task force is established to undertake a comprehensive review of
unemployment insurance benefits and contributions, including the impact of the
benefits and contributions freeze under RCW 50.24.010, 50.29.025, and
50.20.120. The task force shall consist of nine members as follows:

(a)
One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by
the president of the senate;

(b)
One member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(c)
Two members representing business, one representing seasonal businesses and one
representing nonseasonal businesses, and two members representing labor,
appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the co-speakers of the
house of representatives; and

(d)
One member representing the governor, appointed by the governor.

(2)
The employment security department shall cooperate with the task force and
provide such reasonable technical support as the task force chair may request.

(3)
The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from senate committee
services and the office of program research, but may hire additional staff with
specific technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out the
mandates of this study. Each nonlegislative member of the task force shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.
All expenses of the task force, including travel, shall be paid jointly by the
senate and the house of representatives.

(4)
The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by October 1, 2000.

(5)
This section expires July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---