BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.20.120 and 1993 c 483 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits shall be payable to any
eligible individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount
equal to the lesser of thirty times the weekly benefit amount (determined
hereinafter) or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title((: PROVIDED, That as to)). However, maximum benefits may
exceed this amount if the eligible individual's unemployment is due to a
lockout by his or her employer, in which case benefits shall be payable until
the lockout is terminated.

(b)
For any week beginning on and after March 31, 1981, which falls in an
extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), ((as now or
hereafter amended,)) an individual's eligibility for maximum benefits in
excess of twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount will be subject to
the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020((, as now or hereafter
amended)).

(2)
An individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages
during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages
were highest. The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be
determined as of each June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in the
twelve-month period immediately following such June 30th. The maximum amount
payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the "average weekly wage"
for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. The minimum amount payable
weekly shall be fifteen percent of the "average weekly wage" for the
calendar year preceding such June 30th. If any weekly benefit, maximum
benefit, or minimum benefit amount computed herein is not a multiple of one
dollar, it shall be reduced to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.04.030 and 1991 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Benefit year" with respect to each individual, means the fifty-two
consecutive week period beginning with the first day of the calendar week in
which the individual files an application for an initial determination and
thereafter the fifty-two consecutive week period beginning with the first day
of the calendar week in which the individual next files an application for an
initial determination after the expiration of the individual's last preceding
benefit year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the foregoing limitation shall not be
deemed to preclude the establishment of a new benefit year under the laws of
another state pursuant to any agreement providing for the interstate combining
of employment and wages and the interstate payment of benefits nor shall this
limitation be deemed to preclude the commissioner from backdating an initial
application at the request of the claimant either for the convenience of the
department of employment security or for any other reason deemed by the
commissioner to be good cause.

(2)
An individual's benefit year shall be extended to:

(a)
Be fifty-three weeks when at the expiration of fifty-two weeks the
establishment of a new benefit year would result in the use of a quarter of
wages in the new base year that had been included in the individual's prior
base year; or

(b)
The termination of the lockout if, at the expiration of fifty-two weeks, the
individual's benefits continue to be payable under RCW 50.20.120(1)(a) until
the lockout is terminated.

(3)(a) No
benefit year will be established unless it is determined that the individual
earned wages in "employment" in not less than six hundred eighty
hours of the individual's base year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a benefit year
cannot be established if the base year wages include wages earned prior to the
establishment of a prior benefit year unless the individual worked and earned
wages since the last separation from employment immediately before the
application for initial determination in the previous benefit year if the
applicant was an unemployed individual at the time of application, or since the
initial separation in the previous benefit year if the applicant was not an
unemployed individual at the time of filing an application for initial
determination for the previous benefit year, of not less than six times the
weekly benefit amount computed for the individual's new benefit year.

(b)
If an individual's prior benefit year was based on the last four completed
calendar quarters, a new benefit year shall not be established until the new
base year does not include any hours used in the establishment of the prior
benefit year.

(4)
If the wages of an individual are not based upon a fixed duration of time or if
the individual's wages are paid at irregular intervals or in such manner as not
to extend regularly over the period of employment, the wages for any week shall
be determined in such manner as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe.
Such regulation shall, so far as possible, secure results reasonably similar to
those which would prevail if the individual were paid his or her wages at
regular intervals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act applies beginning with weeks of unemployment of claimants who were locked
out by their employers after January 13, 1999. A claimant who exhausted
benefits before the effective date of this section has the option of remaining
on the original claim or filing a new claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---