BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The intent of this act is to protect the health and safety of the citizens of
the state of Washington and the quality of the state's environment by
developing and implementing environmental and public safety measures applicable
to persons transporting hazardous liquids and gas by pipeline within the state
of Washington. The legislature finds that public safety and the environment
may best be protected by adopting standards that are equal to, or more
stringent than, those adopted by the federal government.

(2)
It is the further intent of this act to ensure that the state of Washington
fully activate the authority it is currently provided under the federal
pipeline safety act (49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101 et seq., as amended). In addition,
it is the intent of this act to provide policy direction for the development of
state pipeline safety programs in the event of a delegation of authority, or
the provision of direct authority, to the state for inspection of interstate
pipelines and enforcement of state and federal pipeline safety requirements.

(3)
It is also the intent of the legislature that the governor work with the state
congressional delegation in seeking the following improvements to the federal
pipeline safety act when it is being reauthorized:

(a)
The elimination of federal preemption; or

(b)
Amendments that direct the federal office of pipeline safety to delegate
authority to qualified states for:

(i)
The regulation of interstate hazardous liquid and gas pipelines using standards
equal to or more stringent than federal standards; and

(ii)
The enforcement of state and federal requirements related to pipeline safety.

(4)
In working with the state congressional delegation on reauthorization of the
federal pipeline safety act, it is the intent of the legislature that the
governor also seek the following:

(a)
Requirements for rapid shutdown of ruptured hazardous liquid pipelines;

(b)
Periodic inspection and testing of pipelines; and

(c)
Continuing education and certification of pipeline operators.

(5)
In addition, it is the intent of the legislature that the governor work with
the state congressional delegation in seeking higher levels of funding for
state pipeline safety activities.

(6)
While the legislature acknowledges that serious accidents have occurred for
hazardous liquid and gas pipelines in this nation and elsewhere, it recognizes
that there are fundamental differences between hazardous liquid pipelines and
gas pipelines and that a different system of safety regulations must be applied
for each kind of pipeline.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3)
"Failsafe system" means a system or device that prevents a pipeline
from exceeding its maximum operating pressure.

(4)
"Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or toxic or corrosive gas.

(5)
"Hazardous liquid" means: (a) Petroleum, petroleum products, or
anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195 in effect
March 1, 1998; and (b) carbon dioxide. The department by rule may incorporate
by reference other substances designated as hazardous by the secretary of
transportation under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101(a)(4).

(6)
"Local government" means a subdivision of the state or a city or
town.

(7)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision or
instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.

(8)
"Pipeline" or "pipeline system" means all parts of a
pipeline facility through which hazardous liquid or gas moves in
transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, pumping units,
fabricated assemblies associated with pumping units, metering and delivery
stations and fabricated assemblies therein, breakout tanks, and excluding
process pipelines and transfer pipelines as defined in chapter 173-180A WAC, as
it exists on the effective date of this act.

(9)
"Pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing, owning, or
operating a pipeline for transporting hazardous liquid or gas. For the
purposes of this act, a pipeline company does not include: (a) Distribution
systems owned and operated under franchise for the sale, delivery, or
distribution of natural gas at retail; or (b) excavation contractors or other
contractors that contract with a pipeline company.

(10)
"Reportable release" means a spilling, leaking, pouring, emitting,
discharging, or any other uncontrolled escape of a hazardous liquid in excess
of one barrel, or forty-two gallons.

(11)
"Safety management systems" means management systems that include
coordinated interdisciplinary evaluations of the effect of significant changes
to a pipeline system before such changes are implemented.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
hazardous liquid pipeline safety account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from the federal office of pipeline safety and any
other state or federal funds provided for hazardous liquid pipeline safety must
be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding the
pipeline safety program within the department of ecology. Only the director of
the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the
account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The department is responsible for the administration and enforcement of all
laws related to hazardous liquid pipeline safety to the extent not prohibited
by federal law. Hazardous liquid process pipelines and transfer pipelines will
continue to be regulated by the utilities and transportation commission. The
department shall immediately seek federal certification in order to administer
and enforce all laws related to hazardous liquids pipeline safety. When
federal certification is received by the department, authority for the
hazardous liquid pipeline safety program as authorized under RCW 81.88.040
shall transfer from the commission to the department. When the department
becomes certified to regulate intrastate hazardous liquid pipeline safety, it
shall apply the existing federal pipeline safety standards. Upon exercising
delegated or direct authority to regulate interstate pipeline safety, the
department shall ensure that intrastate and interstate pipelines are regulated
to the same safety standards.

(2)
By December 1, 2000, the department shall develop for the review of the
legislature in the 2001 session a pipeline safety program that promotes
protection of public health and the environment. This program shall include
the following elements:

(a)
Requirements for operators of pipelines to develop and implement structural
integrity management plans;

(b)
A schedule of inspection and testing within the pipeline system of:

(i)
All mechanical components;

(ii)
All electronic components; and

(iii)
The structural integrity of all pipelines as determined through either pressure
testing, internal inspection tool surveys, or a combination of techniques;

(c)
Failsafe systems;

(d)
Safety management systems;

(e)
Requirements related to the rapid location and isolation of all reportable
releases from pipelines;

(f)
Emergency response procedures and emergency response training;

(g)
Reporting requirements related to emergency situations, including emergency
shutdowns;

(h)
Requirements related to the training and certification of personnel who operate
pipelines and pipeline systems;

(i)
Measures aimed at the prevention of third-party excavation damage to pipelines
through the establishment and required use of a one-number locator system and
through development of a training program available to municipal workers and
construction workers employed by a pipeline company or employed by a
construction company working under contract to a pipeline company.

(j)
Recommendations for funding and potential fund sources for implementing the
entire program and each program element.

(3)
In providing this program to the legislature for review as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, the department shall clearly indicate whether
federal authority for each program element exists or must be delegated. The
department shall also develop a legislative proposal for consideration by the
legislature that authorizes the state to implement the program elements for
which it has received delegation of authority from the federal office of
pipeline safety or direct authority under the federal pipeline safety act.
Upon review of the department's program by the legislature in the 2001 session,
the department shall implement the program elements for which it has authority.

(4)
After the state has received delegation of authority or direct authority to
regulate interstate pipeline safety, the program elements in subsection (2) of
this section shall be implemented through operations safety plans submitted by
operators of pipelines to the department for approval. The department shall
approve such plans after they have been deemed fit for service. A plan shall
be deemed fit for service when it results in pipelines that are designed,
developed, constructed, operated, and periodically modified to provide
protection of public safety and the environment.

(5)
The department shall serve as the single point of contact within the state for
information related to hazardous liquid pipeline safety and shall provide
technical assistance on hazardous liquid pipeline safety to local government
authorities upon request.

(6)
The department shall evaluate proposals developed by the federal office of
pipeline safety and other agencies and organizations related to methods and
technologies for testing the integrity of hazardous liquid pipeline structure,
leak detection, and other elements of pipeline operation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The department and the commission shall jointly support the governor in seeking
delegation of federal authority to inspect hazardous liquid and gas interstate
pipelines and enforce state and federal pipeline safety requirements. The
department and the commission shall establish and submit to the United States
secretary of transportation an inspection program that complies with
requirements for delegated interstate agent authority. If the secretary of
transportation delegates authority to the state as provided in this subsection,
the department and the commission, at a minimum, shall do the following to
carry out the delegated federal authority:

(a)
Inspect hazardous liquid and gas pipelines periodically as specified in the
inspection program;

(b)
Provide for the testing of hazardous liquid and gas pipelines as authorized by
federal law and regulation; and

(c)
File reports with the United States secretary of transportation as required to
maintain the delegated authority.

(2)
In addition, the department and commission shall inspect any record, map, or
written procedure required by federal law to be kept by a pipeline company
concerning reportable releases of hazardous liquid, or of gas releases as
defined under state regulation, and the design, construction, testing, or
operation and maintenance of pipelines.

Sec.
6. RCW
81.88.040 and 1998 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing, owning, or
operating an intrastate pipeline for transporting hazardous liquid or gas,
whether or not such a person or entity is a public service company otherwise
regulated by the commission. For the purposes of this section, a pipeline
company does not include: (i) Distribution systems owned and operated under
franchise for the sale, delivery, or distribution of natural gas at retail; or
(ii) excavation contractors or other contractors that contract with a pipeline
company.

(b)
"Hazardous liquid" means: (i) Petroleum, petroleum products, or
anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195 in effect
March 1, 1998; and (ii) carbon dioxide. The commission by rule may incorporate
by reference other substances designated as hazardous by the secretary of
transportation under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101(a)(4).

(c)
"Gas" means natural gas, flammable gas, or gas which is toxic or
corrosive.

(2)
The commission shall adopt by rule intrastate pipeline safety standards for
pipeline transportation and pipeline facilities that: (a) Apply to pipeline
companies transporting hazardous liquids or gas; (b) cover the design,
construction, and operation of pipelines transporting hazardous liquids or
gas; and (c) require pipeline companies to design, construct, and maintain
their pipeline facilities so they are safe and efficient. The commission
shall only adopt rules pertaining to interstate pipeline safety standards if it
is delegated authority or provided direct authority by the federal government
to adopt such rules.

(3)
A person, officer, agent, or employee of a pipeline company who, as an
individual or acting as an officer, agent, or employee of such a company,
violates or fails to comply with this section or a rule adopted under this
section, or who procures, aids, or abets another person or entity in the violation
of or noncompliance with this section or a rule adopted under this section, is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(4)(a)
A pipeline company, or any person, officer, agent, or employee of a pipeline
company that violates a provision of this section, or a rule adopted under this
section, is subject to a civil penalty to be assessed by the commission.

(b)
The commission shall adopt rules: (i) Setting penalty amounts, but may not
exceed the penalties specified in the federal pipeline safety laws, 49 U.S.C. Sec.
60101 et seq.; (ii) establishing procedures for mitigating penalties assessed;
and (iii) incorporating by reference other substances designated as hazardous
by the secretary of transportation under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101(a)(4).

(c)
In determining the amount of the penalty, the commission shall consider: (i)
The appropriateness of the penalty in relation to the position of the person
charged with the violation; (ii) the gravity of the violation; and (iii) the
good faith of the person or company charged in attempting to achieve compliance
after notification of the violation.

(d)
The amount of the penalty may be recovered in a civil action in the superior
court of Thurston county or of some other county in which the violator may do
business. In all actions for recovery, the rules of evidence shall be the same
as in ordinary civil actions. All penalties recovered under this section must
be paid into the state treasury and credited to the public service revolving
fund.

(5)
Nothing in this section duplicates the authority of the energy facility site
evaluation council under chapter 80.50 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Upon receipt of federal certification for hazardous liquids and natural gas
pipeline safety, all powers, duties, and functions of the utilities and
transportation commission pertaining to hazardous liquid pipeline safety are
transferred to the department of ecology. Responsibilities for the safety of
gas pipelines shall remain with the commission. Such powers, duties, and
functions transferred to the department of ecology do not include rate setting
as provided in chapters 80.28, 80.24, and 81.24 RCW. All references to the
commission or the utilities and transportation commission in the Revised Code
of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of
ecology when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the utilities and transportation commission
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered
to the custody of the department of ecology. All cabinets, furniture, office
equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
utilities and transportation commission in carrying out the powers, functions,
and duties pertinent to hazardous liquid pipeline safety transferred shall be
made available to the department of ecology. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be assigned to the department of ecology.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the utilities and transportation commission for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties pertinent to hazardous liquid
pipeline safety transferred shall, on the effective date of this section, be
divided proportionally based on program responsibilities and shared with the
department of ecology.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the utilities and transportation commission engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties relative to hazardous liquid
pipeline safety are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of
ecology. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the department of ecology to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to
any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the utilities and transportation
commission pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties pertinent to
hazardous liquid pipeline safety transferred shall be continued and acted upon
by the department of ecology. All existing contracts and obligations shall
remain in full force and shall be performed by the department of ecology.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the utilities
and transportation commission shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1) A
pipeline safety committee is established to advise the department, the
commission, and other appropriate federal, state, and local government agencies
and officials on matters relating to hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety,
routing, construction, operation, and maintenance. The committee shall not
exceed fifteen members, exclusive of nonvoting state agency representatives.
Members of the committee shall be appointed by the governor to staggered
three-year terms and shall consist of members of the general public, elected
officials from cities and counties in which pipelines are located, and the
hazardous liquid and gas pipeline industry. A representative of the department
of ecology and of the utilities and transportation commission shall each sit on
the committee as nonvoting members. The governor may designate other nonvoting
representatives of state agencies to serve on the committee as needed. The
chair of the committee shall be appointed by the governor from among the
members of the general public. The committee shall review and comment on
proposed rules and on the operation of the state pipeline safety program.

(2)
All necessary staff support for the committee shall be provided by the
department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 48.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In consultation with the emergency management program within the state military
department, the department of ecology, the commission, and local emergency
services organizations, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection or his or her authorized deputy, shall:

(a)
Evaluate the preparedness of local first responders in meeting emergency
management demands under subsection (2) of this section; and

(b)
Conduct an assessment of the equipment and personnel needed by local first
responders to meet emergency management demands related to pipelines.

(2)
The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection or his or her deputy, shall develop curricula for training local
first responders to deal with pipeline accidents. The curricula shall be
developed in conjunction with pipeline companies and local first responders,
and shall include a timetable and costs for providing training as defined in
the curricula to all communities housing pipelines. Separate curricula shall
be developed for hazardous liquid and gas pipelines so that the differences
between pipelines may be recognized and appropriate accident responses provided.
The need for a training program for regional incident management teams shall
also be evaluated.

(3)
In consultation with other relevant agencies, the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her deputy, shall
identify the need and means for achieving consistent application of the
national interagency incident management system.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "local first responders" means
police, fire, emergency medical staff, and volunteers.

Sec.
10. RCW
19.122.020 and 1984 c 144 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Business day" means any day other than Saturday, Sunday, or a legal
local, state, or federal holiday.

(2)
"Damage" includes the substantial weakening of structural or lateral
support of an underground facility, penetration, impairment, or destruction of
any underground protective coating, housing, or other protective device, or the
severance, partial or complete, of any underground facility to the extent that
the project owner or the affected utility owner determines that repairs are
required.

(3)
"Emergency" means any condition constituting a clear and present
danger to life or property, or a customer service outage.

(4)
"Excavation" means any operation in which earth, rock, or other
material on or below the ground is moved or otherwise displaced by any means,
except the tilling of soil less than twelve inches in depth for agricultural
purposes, or road and ditch maintenance that does not change the original road
grade or ditch flowline.

(5)
"Excavator" means any person who engages directly in excavation.

(6)
"Identified facility" means any underground facility which is
indicated in the project plans as being located within the area of proposed
excavation.

(7)
"Identified but unlocatable underground facility" means an
underground facility which has been identified but cannot be located with
reasonable accuracy.

(8)
"Locatable underground facility" means an underground facility which
can be field-marked with reasonable accuracy.

(9)
"Marking" means the use of stakes, paint, or other clearly
identifiable materials to show the field location of underground facilities, in
accordance with the current color code standard of the American public works
association. Markings shall include identification letters indicating the
specific type of the underground facility.

(10)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision or
instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.

(11)
"Pipeline" or "pipeline system" means all parts of a
pipeline facility through which hazardous liquid or gas moves in
transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, pumping units,
fabricated assemblies associated with pumping units, metering and delivery
stations and fabricated assemblies therein, and breakout tanks, and excluding
process pipelines and transfer pipelines as defined in chapter 173-180A WAC, as
it exists on the effective date of this act.

(12)
"Pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing, owning, or
operating a pipeline for transporting hazardous liquid or gas. For the
purposes of this section, a pipeline company does not include: (a)
Distribution systems owned and operated under franchise for the sale, delivery,
or distribution of natural gas at retail; or (b) excavation contractors or
other contractors that contract with a pipeline company.

(13)
"Reasonable accuracy" means location within twenty-four inches of the
outside dimensions of both sides of an underground facility.

(((12)))
(14) "Underground facility" means any item buried or placed
below ground for use in connection with the storage or conveyance of water,
sewage, electronic, telephonic or telegraphic communications, cablevision,
electric energy, petroleum products, gas, gaseous vapors, hazardous liquids, or
other substances and including but not limited to pipes, sewers, conduits,
cables, valves, lines, wires, manholes, attachments, and those parts of poles
or anchors below ground. This definition does not apply to hazardous liquid
or gas pipelines as defined in subsection (11) of this section.

(((13)))
(15) "One-number locator service" means a service through
which a person can notify utilities and request field-marking of underground
facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 19.122 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By December 31, 2000, the utilities and transportation commission shall
establish or cause to be established a single state-wide toll-free telephone
number to be used for referring excavators to the appropriate one-number
locator service.

(2)
The utilities and transportation commission, in consultation with the
Washington utilities coordinating council, shall establish minimum standards
and best management practices for one-number locator services consistent with
the recommendations of the governor's fuel accident prevention and response
team issued in December 1999. By December 31, 2000, the commission shall
provide its recommendations to the appropriate standing committees of the house
of representatives and the senate.

(3)
One-number locator services shall be operated by nongovernmental agencies.

Sec.
12. RCW
19.122.030 and 1988 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
commencing any excavation, excluding agricultural tilling of soil as defined
in RCW 19.122.020, the excavator shall provide notice of the scheduled
commencement of excavation to all owners of underground facilities and to
all pipeline companies through a one-number locator service. All owners of
underground facilities and all pipeline companies within a one-number
locator service area shall subscribe to the service. One number locator
service rates for cable television companies will be based on the amount of
their underground facilities. If no one-number locator service is available,
notice shall be provided individually to those owners of underground facilities
and to those pipeline companies known to or suspected of having
underground facilities or pipelines within the area of proposed
excavation. The notice shall be communicated to the owners of underground
facilities and to pipeline companies not less than two business days or
more than ten business days before the scheduled date for commencement of excavation,
unless otherwise agreed by the parties.

Upon
receipt of the notice provided for in this section, the owner of the
underground facility and the pipeline company shall provide the
excavator with reasonably accurate information as to its locatable underground
facilities and the pipeline by surface-marking the location of the
facilities or pipeline. If there are identified but unlocatable
underground facilities or pipeline, the owner of such facilities and
the pipeline company shall provide the excavator with the best available
information as to their locations. The owner of the underground facility and
the pipeline company providing the information shall respond no later than
two business days after the receipt of the notice or before the excavation
time, at the option of the owner or pipeline company, unless otherwise
agreed by the parties. Excavators shall not excavate until all known
facilities and pipelines have been marked. Once marked by the owner of
the underground facility and pipeline company, the excavator is
responsible for maintaining the markings. Excavators shall have the right to
receive compensation from the owner of the underground facility or the
pipeline company for costs incurred if the owner of the underground facility
or the pipeline company does not locate its facilities in accordance
with this section.

The
owner of the underground facility and the pipeline company shall have
the right to receive compensation for costs incurred in responding to
excavation notices given less than two business days prior to the excavation
from the excavator.

An
owner of underground facilities ((is)) and the pipeline company are
not required to indicate the presence of existing service laterals or
appurtenances if the presence of existing service laterals or appurtenances on
the site of the construction project can be determined from the presence of
other visible facilities, such as buildings, manholes, or meter and junction
boxes on or adjacent to the construction site.

Emergency
excavations are exempt from the time requirements for notification provided in
this section.

If the excavator, while performing the contract, discovers
underground facilities which are not identified, the excavator shall cease
excavating in the vicinity of the facility and immediately notify the owner or
operator of such facilities, or the one-number locator service. If the
excavator, while performing the contract, discovers an underground pipeline
which is not identified, the excavator shall cease excavating in the vicinity
of the pipeline and immediately notify the pipeline company and the one-number
locator service.

Sec.
13. RCW
19.122.040 and 1984 c 144 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Project owners shall indicate in bid or contract documents the existence of
underground facilities and pipelines known by the project owner to be
located within the proposed area of excavation. The following shall be deemed
changed or differing site conditions:

(a)
An underground facility or pipeline not identified as required by this
chapter or other provision of law; and

(b)
An underground facility or pipeline not located, as required by this
chapter or other provision of law, by the project owner or excavator if the
project owner or excavator is also a utility.

(2)
An excavator shall use reasonable care to avoid damaging underground facilities
and pipelines. An excavator shall:

(a)
Determine the precise location of underground facilities and pipelines
which have been marked;

(b)
Plan the excavation to avoid damage to or minimize interference with
underground facilities and pipelines in and near the excavation area;
and

(c)
Provide such support for underground facilities and pipelines in and near
the construction area, including during backfill operations, as may be
reasonably necessary for the protection of such facilities and pipelines.

(3)
If an underground facility or pipeline is damaged and such damage is the
consequence of the failure to fulfill an obligation under this chapter, the
party failing to perform that obligation shall be liable for any damages. Any
clause in an excavation contract which attempts to allocate liability, or
requires indemnification to shift the economic consequences of liability,
different from the provisions of this chapter is against public policy and
unenforceable. Nothing in this chapter prevents the parties to an excavation
contract from contracting with respect to the allocation of risk for changed or
differing site conditions.

(4)
In any action brought under this section, the prevailing party is entitled to
reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. By
September 1, 2000, the utilities and transportation commission and the
department of ecology shall jointly provide notice to all appropriate
contractors about new hazardous liquid and gas pipeline safety and excavation
requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
After a pipeline company has been notified by an excavator pursuant to RCW
19.122.030 that excavation work will uncover any portion of the pipeline, the
pipeline company shall ensure that the pipeline section in the vicinity of the
excavation is examined for damage prior to being reburied.

(2)
An excavator who, in the course of excavation, contacts or damages a hazardous
liquid or gas pipeline, shall immediately notify the pipeline company and the
one-number locator service. The notice shall also specify, to the best of the
excavator's knowledge, whether the damage has resulted in a release of
hazardous liquid or gas. If the damage causes an emergency condition, the
excavator causing the damage shall also immediately alert the appropriate local
public safety agencies and take all appropriate steps to ensure the public
safety. No damaged hazardous liquid or gas pipeline may be buried until it is
repaired or relocated by the pipeline operator.

(3)
Immediately upon receiving information of third-party damage to a hazardous
liquid or gas pipeline that does not result in a reportable release of
hazardous liquid or gas release as defined in state regulation, the company
that owns or operates the pipeline shall immediately conduct a visual
inspection of the damaged pipeline to determine whether flow through the
pipeline should be terminated. After visual inspection, a pipeline company
shall determine whether the damaged pipeline section should be replaced or
repaired, or whether pipeline operation may be safely resumed. A record of the
company's inspection report and test results shall be provided to the
department or the commission consistent with reporting requirements under 49
C.F.R. 195 Subpart B.

(4)
Immediately upon receiving information of third-party damage to a hazardous
liquid pipeline that results in a reportable release of hazardous liquid
release as defined in state regulation, the company that owns or operates the
pipeline shall immediately terminate the flow of hazardous liquid until it has
visually inspected the damaged pipeline, determined and addressed the cause of
the release, and determined that pipeline operation may be safely resumed.
Pipeline companies shall immediately notify local first responders and the
department of any reportable release of a hazardous liquid from a pipeline.
Pipeline companies shall immediately notify first responders and the commission
of any gas release as defined in state regulation from a pipeline.

Sec.
16. RCW
19.122.070 and 1984 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, and which violation
results in damage to underground facilities, is subject to a civil penalty of
not more than one thousand dollars for each violation. All penalties recovered
in such actions shall be deposited in the general fund.

(2)
Any excavator who wilfully or maliciously damages a field-marked underground
facility shall be liable for treble the costs incurred in repairing or
relocating the facility. In those cases in which an excavator fails to notify
known underground facility owners or the one-number locator service, any damage
to the underground facility shall be deemed wilful and malicious and shall be
subject to treble damages for costs incurred in repairing or relocating the
facility.

(3)
This chapter does not affect any civil remedies for personal injury or for
property damage, including that to underground facilities, nor does this
chapter create any new civil remedies for such damage.

(4)
This section does not apply to damages to a hazardous liquid or gas pipeline.
Damages to a hazardous liquid or gas pipeline are subject to the provisions of
section 17 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 19.122 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any excavator, except a person engaged in the agricultural tillage of soil as
defined in RCW 19.122.020, who fails to notify a one-number locator service as
required by RCW 19.122.030 and causes damage to a hazardous liquids pipeline or
gas pipeline is subject to a civil penalty of not less than one thousand
dollars for the first violation. The maximum civil penalty under this section
for multiple violations may not exceed ten thousand dollars for each
violation. In determining the amount of the penalty for multiple violations,
the department shall consider:

(a)
The appropriateness of the penalty in relation to the position of the person
charged with the violation;

(b)
The gravity of the violation; and

(c)
The good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance with
the requirements of the law.

(2)
All penalties under this section shall be deposited into the hazardous liquid
pipeline safety account established in section 3 of this act.

(3)
Any person who willfully or maliciously damages a hazardous liquids pipeline or
gas pipeline, or any person who fails to notify a one-number locator service as
required by RCW 19.122.030 and causes damage to a hazardous liquids pipeline or
gas pipeline, is liable for treble damages for costs incurred in repairing or
relocating the pipeline.

(4)
This section does not affect any civil remedies for personal injury or for
property damage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. Upon
receiving delegated or direct authority for pipeline safety, the department
shall adopt rules: (1) Setting penalty amounts not in excess of the penalties
specified in the federal pipeline safety laws, 49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101 et seq.;
(2) establishing procedures for mitigating penalties assessed; and (3)
incorporating by reference other substances designated as hazardous by the
secretary of transportation under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101(a)(4).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. This
act may be known and cited as the Washington state pipeline safety act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
Sections 1 through 5, 7, 8, 14, 15, and 18 through 20 of this act constitute a
new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---