BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that the December 20, 1993, Washington state
conveyance of the Mt. St. Helens recovery program, CR601F site, to the city of
Castle Rock, should be amended to enable the city to use dredge spoil revenues
for recreational purposes adjacent to the Cowlitz river in the city limits of
Castle Rock, and also those other properties owned by the city of Castle Rock
that are adjacent to the Cowlitz river.

The
legislature further declares that the department of transportation shall execute
sufficient legal release to accomplish the following:

(1)
Dredge spoil revenues from the CR601F site must be dedicated for recreational
facilities and recreational administration cost throughout the defined area
listed above;

(2)
Any mining excavation must meet the requirements of the shoreline management
act of 1971 as identified in chapter 90.58 RCW;

(3)
All other requirements in the December 20, 1993, conveyance between the state
of Washington and the city of Castle Rock will remain in effect; and

(4)
The CR601F site remains subject to any agreements with the United States army
corps of engineers and other agencies of the federal government.

Sec.
2. RCW
79.90.160 and 1989 c 213 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that, due to the extraordinary volume of
material washed down onto state-owned beds and shorelands in the Toutle river,
Coweeman river, and portions of the Cowlitz river, the dredge spoils placed
upon adjacent publicly and privately owned property in such areas, if
further disposed, will be of nominal value to the state and that it is in the
best interests of the state to allow further disposal without charge.

All dredge spoil or materials removed from the state-owned beds and
shores of the Toutle river, Coweeman river and that portion of the Cowlitz
river from two miles above the confluence of the Toutle river to its mouth
deposited on adjacent public and private lands during the years 1980
through December 31, 1995, as a result of dredging of these rivers for
navigation and flood control purposes may be sold, transferred, or otherwise
disposed of by owners of such lands without the necessity of any charge by the
department of natural resources and free and clear of any interest of the
department of natural resources of the state of Washington.

---
END ---