BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.36.130 and 1992 c 145 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person eighteen years of age or older is guilty of the crime of assault of a
child in the second degree if the child is under the age of thirteen and the
person:

(a)
Commits the crime of assault in the second degree, as defined in RCW 9A.36.021,
against a child; ((or))

(b)
Intentionally assaults the child and causes bodily harm that is greater than
transient physical pain or minor temporary marks, and the person has previously
engaged in a pattern or practice either of (i) assaulting the child which has
resulted in bodily harm that is greater than transient pain or minor temporary
marks, or (ii) causing the child physical pain or agony that is equivalent to
that produced by torture; or

(c)
Knowingly manufactures methamphetamine, or knowingly possesses ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine with intent to manufacture methamphetamine, in or within one
hundred feet of a residence where the child resides. For the purposes of this
subsection, "child" includes an unborn quick child.

(2) Assault of a child in the second degree is a class B felony.

---
END ---