BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
c 379 s 384 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES

Trust
Land Transfer (00-2-001)

The
state building construction account appropriation in this section is subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from
trust status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest restrictive easements for
certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate for state
park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources
conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2)
Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at
fair market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by
the department to the common school construction account in the same manner as
timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be
made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value
of the land transferred shall be deposited in the natural resources real
property replacement account. These funds shall be expended by the department
for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.

(3)
Property subject to easement agreements under this section shall be appraised
at fair market value both with and without the imposition of the easement. The
entire difference in appraised value shall be deposited by the department to
the common school construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from
other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource
management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.

(4)
All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section are
authorized to be paid out of this appropriation. Authorized costs include the
actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews, surveys, and
other similar costs.

(5)
Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value
may occur if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by
the board of natural resources.

(6)
Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department,
with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a
real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the
purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of
thirty years. The department of natural resources, in consultation with the
receiving state agencies, shall develop policy to address requests to replace
transferred properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no
longer deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(7)
The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the
intent of this section. However, the department or receiving agencies may
remove a property from the transfer list in subsection (8) of this section if,
based on new, substantive information, it is determined that transfer of the
property is not in the state-wide interest of either the common school trust or
the receiving agency.

(8)
The appropriation in this section is provided to execute transfers or easements
for the list of properties identified in LEAP capital document No. 99-3, as
developed on April 8, 1999, as follows: Projects in category A shall be
transferred; to the extent that local funding is provided for the land value of
the property, projects in category B shall be transferred; ((and))
projects in category C and remaining projects in category B may be transferred
or leased as funding allows; and for the property identified in subsection
(10) of this section.

(9)
The department shall execute trust land transfers and easements for the
properties identified in LEAP capital document No. 99-3 such that 90
percent of the appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school
construction fund. To achieve the 90:10 ratio, the department may offset
transfers of property with low timber-to-land ratios with easements on other
properties.

(10)
Goss lake, approximately 600 acres in Island county, is transferred to
Island county for open space and recreation purposes.

(11)
On June 30, 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted
funds from this appropriation to the common school construction fund and the
appropriation in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement‑-

State.................................... $ 6,200,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 66,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 72,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 34,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 220,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 326,700,000

---
END ---