BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW to read as follows:

An
individual shall not be considered to have left work voluntarily or to have
been discharged for misconduct when:

(1)
The employer takes the first action by announcing to its employees that the
employer plans to reduce its work force and that employees can offer to be one
of the workers who will be laid off; and

(2)
The individual offers to be one of the employees included in the layoff or
reduction-in-force; and

(3)
The employer determines which individuals are laid off or released through a
reduction-in-force; and

(4)
The employer takes the final action by terminating the employer-employee
relationship with that individual.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---