BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.29.020 and 1995 c 57 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An experience rating account shall be established and maintained for each
employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have
properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local
government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are
required to make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records
of the employment security department. Benefits paid to any eligible
individuals shall be charged to the experience rating accounts of each of such
individual's employers during the individual's base year in the same ratio that
the wages paid by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to
the wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2)
The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole or in part,
should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of employers except
those employers described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly
elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, as follows:

(a)
Benefits paid to any individuals later determined to be ineligible shall not be
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.

(b)
Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of chapter 50.06 RCW
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution
paying employer only if:

(i)
The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving crime victims'
compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or

(ii)
The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).

(c)
Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits payable under
chapter 50.22 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.

(d)
In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW 50.20.050 or
50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to the disqualifying
separation shall not be charged to the experience rating account of the
contribution paying employer from whom that separation took place.

(e)
In the case of individuals identified under RCW 50.20.015, benefits paid with
respect to a calendar quarter, which exceed the total amount of wages earned in
the state of Washington in the higher of two corresponding calendar quarters
included within the individual's determination period, as defined in RCW
50.20.015, shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.

(3)(a)
Beginning July 1, 1985, a contribution-paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may receive
such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an individual who:

(i)
Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons not attributable
to the employer;

(ii)
Was discharged for misconduct connected with his or her work not a result of
inability to meet the minimum job requirements;

(iii)
Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of operation at the
employer's plant, building, work site, or other facility. This closure must be
for reasons directly attributable to a catastrophic occurrence such as fire,
flood, or other natural disaster; or

(iv)
Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent part-time basis by
a base year employer and who at some time during the base year was concurrently
employed and subsequently separated from at least one other base year
employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when the employment relationship
between the employer requesting relief and the claimant is terminated. This
subsection does not apply to shared work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.

(b)
The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection must request
relief in writing within thirty days ((following mailing to the last known
address of the notification of the valid initial determination of such claim,
stating)) of the date on which the first notice was mailed to the
employer's address of record with the department. The first notice is the
notice reasonably calculated to be the first time the employer is informed that
benefit payments may be charged to the experience rating account of that
employer. In the case of a subsequent situation that may qualify for relief of
charges, the first notice is the first notice mailed to the employer after a
subsequent situation occurs. The written request for relief of charges must
include all pertinent facts including, but not limited to, the date and
reason for the separation or the circumstances of continued employment. The
commissioner, upon investigation of the request, shall determine whether relief
should be granted. The commissioner may consider a request for benefit
charge relief not received or postmarked within the thirty-day period if the
employer establishes good cause for not requesting relief in a timely manner.
Any denial of a request for noncharging relief must be in writing and will be
the basis of appeal pursuant to RCW 50.32.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
This act takes effect July 1, 2000.

(2) This act applies to benefit charging relief situations, as
defined in RCW 50.29.020(3)(a), occurring on or after July 1, 2000.

---
END ---