BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to:

(1)
Provide all employers in this state with a choice of insurance carriers from
whom industrial insurance may be purchased;

(2)
Provide employers and their employees the benefits of a competitive industrial
insurance system;

(3)
Provide workers the benefits of safety systems developed by private enterprise,
as well as those provided by government;

(4)
Provide private industry in this state the opportunity to engage in industrial
insurance business, with government regulation;

(5)
Eliminate a government monopoly with respect to choices for small employers;
and

(6)
Increase the operating skills of this state's government-run industrial
insurance program by introducing competition into the business of workers'
compensation insurance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW to read as follows:

Effective
January 1, 2002, employers subject to this title may purchase industrial
insurance coverage from any insurer holding a certificate of authority under
Title 48 RCW and certified by the department of labor and industries to provide
industrial insurance in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
task force on competitive industrial insurance is established to develop
proposed legislation to implement section 2 of this act. The task force shall
report its recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2001.

(2)
The task force shall consist of the following:

(a)
Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus to be appointed by the
president of the senate;

(b)
Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus to be
appointed jointly by the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(c)
A representative of employers, a representative of workers, a representative of
the insurance industry, a representative of the Washington state bar
association, and a representative of the Washington state medical association,
each of whom shall be appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the
co-speakers of the house of representatives.

(3)
Voting procedures of the task force shall include the following:

(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, each task force member shall have
one vote.

(b)
The task force may add up to three members ex officio, who shall have the right
to speak and make motions, but shall have no vote.

(c)
The actions and recommendations of the task force must be approved by a
majority of the task force's voting members.

(4)
The task force shall employ staff as necessary to carry out its mission.

(5)
The task force members shall receive no compensation. Legislative members
shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses as provided in RCW 44.04.120.
Other members of the task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as
provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. All expenses of the task force,
including travel, shall be paid jointly by the senate and the house of
representatives.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2001.

---
END ---