BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The board may provide a reward up to the maximum amount determined under
subsection (2) of this section to any person who provides information leading
to the seizure and forfeiture of any property subject to seizure and forfeiture
under RCW 82.24.130(1).

(2)
The maximum amount of any reward provided by the board under this section shall
be calculated as follows: Five cents per package of cigarettes forfeited and
sold by the seizing agency as a result of information provided by the
individual.

(3)
The board shall adopt rules to implement the reward program.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.24.145 and 1999 c 193 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When
property is forfeited under this chapter the department or board may:

(1)
Retain the property or any part thereof for official use or upon application by
any law enforcement agency of this state, another state, or the District of
Columbia, or of the United States for the exclusive use of enforcing the
provisions of this chapter or the laws of any other state or the District of
Columbia or of the United States.

(2)
Sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder after due
advertisement, but the department before delivering any of the goods so seized
shall require the person to whom the property is sold to affix the proper
amount of stamps. The proceeds of the sale and all moneys forfeited under this
chapter shall be first applied to the payment of all proper expenses of any
investigation leading to the seizure and of the proceedings for forfeiture and
sale, including expenses of seizure, maintenance of custody, advertising, any
reward provided under section 1 of this act, and court costs. The balance
of the proceeds and all moneys shall be deposited in the general fund of the
state. Proper expenses of investigation includes costs incurred by any law enforcement
agency or any federal, state, or local agency.

(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, cigarettes seized for a violation of RCW 82.24.035 shall be
destroyed.

---
END ---