BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Governmental entities must annually compile and publish a list of all taxes and
fees currently being imposed. Any taxes or fees imposed during the previous
year must be separately identified in the list. The list must include: (a) A
general description of the base, rate, administration, and distribution of
receipts of the tax or fee; (b) the total revenue collected or forecasted to be
collected from the tax or fee; and (c) the specific legal authority authorizing
the tax or fee.

(2)
The list required under subsection (1) of this section must be published by
September 1, 2000, and every year thereafter. A copy of this list must be
provided to the legislative fiscal committees.

(3) "Governmental entity" means an agency of the state,
cities, counties, special districts, or any other municipal corporation with
taxing authority.

---
END ---