BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.66.020 and 1997 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Regardless of the value of the claim or the amount at issue, the district court
shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of civil actions and proceedings for
damages for injuries to the person, or for taking or detaining personal
property, or for injuring personal property, or for injuring real property when
no issue raised by the answer involves the plaintiff's title to or possession
of the same, or for recovering possession of personal property. An appeal from
a decision of the district court in an action or proceeding under this
subsection shall be to the court of appeals pursuant to court rules.

(2)
If the value of the claim or the amount at issue does not exceed thirty-five
thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorneys' fees, the
district court shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of the following civil
actions and proceedings:

(((1)))
(a) Actions arising on contract for the recovery of money;

(((2)
Actions for damages for injuries to the person, or for taking or detaining
personal property, or for injuring personal property, or for an injury to real
property when no issue raised by the answer involves the plaintiff's title to
or possession of the same and actions to recover the possession of personal
property;

(3))) (b)
Actions for a penalty;

(((4)))
(c) Actions upon a bond conditioned for the payment of money, when the
amount claimed does not exceed thirty-five thousand dollars, though the penalty
of the bond exceeds that sum, the judgment to be given for the sum actually
due, not exceeding the amount claimed in the complaint;

(((5)))
(d) Actions on an undertaking or surety bond taken by the court;

(((6)))
(e) Actions for damages for fraud in the sale, purchase, or exchange of
personal property;

(((7)))
(f) Proceedings to take and enter judgment on confession of a defendant;

(((8)))
(g) Proceedings to issue writs of attachment, garnishment and replevin
upon goods, chattels, moneys, and effects; and

(((9))) (h) All other actions and proceedings of
which jurisdiction is specially conferred by statute, when the title to, or
right of possession of real property is not involved.

---
END ---