BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.200 and 1979 ex.s. c 70 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
When premises are rented for an indefinite time, with monthly or other periodic
rent reserved, such tenancy shall be construed to be a tenancy from month to
month, or from period to period on which rent is payable, and shall not
be terminated by ((written notice of twenty days or more, preceding the end
of any of said months or periods, given by either party to the other.

(2))) the
owner except for one or more of the following reasons:

(1)
The tenant fails to comply with a three-day notice to pay rent or vacate
pursuant to RCW 59.12.030(3); a ten-day notice to comply or vacate pursuant to
RCW 59.12.030(4); or a three-day notice to vacate for waste, nuisance, or
maintenance of an unlawful business or conduct pursuant to RCW 59.12.030(5);

(2)
The tenant habitually fails to pay rent when due which causes the owner to
notify the tenant in writing of late rent four or more times in a twelve-month
period;

(3)
The tenant fails to comply with a ten-day notice to comply or vacate that
requires compliance with a material term of the rental agreement or that
requires compliance with a material obligation under this chapter;

(4)
The tenant habitually fails to comply with the material terms of the rental
agreement which causes the owner to serve a ten-day notice to comply or vacate
three or more times in a twelve-month period;

(5)
The owner seeks possession so that the owner or a member of his or her
immediate family may occupy the unit as that person's principal residence and
no substantially equivalent unit is vacant and available in the same building.
For purposes of this subsection, "immediate family" means the owner's
spouse, parents, grandparents, children, brothers, and sisters of the owner, or
of the owner's spouse. There shall be a rebuttable presumption of a violation
of this subsection if the owner or a member of the owner's immediate family
fails to occupy the unit as that person's principal residence for at least
sixty consecutive days during the ninety days immediately after the tenant
vacated the unit pursuant to a notice of termination or eviction using this
subsection as the cause for eviction;

(6)
The owner elects to sell a single-family dwelling unit and gives the tenant at
least sixty days' written notice prior to the date set for vacating, which date
shall coincide with the end of the term of a rental agreement, or if the
agreement is month-to-month, with the last day of a monthly period. For
purposes of this subsection, an owner "elects to sell" when the owner
makes reasonable attempts to sell the dwelling within thirty days after the
tenant has vacated, including, at a minimum, listing it for sale at a
reasonable price with a realty agency or advertising it for sale at a
reasonable price in a newspaper of general circulation. There shall be a
rebuttable presumption that the owner did not intend to sell the unit if (a)
within thirty days after the tenant has vacated, the owner does not list the
single-family dwelling unit for sale at a reasonable price with a realty agency
or advertise it for sale at a reasonable price in a newspaper of general
circulation, or (b) within ninety days after the date the tenant vacated or the
date the property was listed for sale, whichever is later, the owner withdraws
the rental unit from the market, rents the unit to someone other than the
former tenant, or otherwise indicates that the owner does not intend to sell
the unit;

(7)
The tenant's occupancy is conditioned upon employment on the property and the
employment relationship is terminated;

(8)
The owner seeks to do substantial rehabilitation on the dwelling that causes
the unit to be unhabitable during the rehabilitation, provided that the owner
must obtain necessary permits from the applicable governmental entity, before
terminating the tenancy. Any tenants dispossessed pursuant to this subsection
shall be notified in writing by the owner at the time of vacating the unit that
the tenant has a right of first refusal for the rehabilitated unit. The owner
shall notify the tenant in writing, mailed by regular mail to the last address
provided by the tenant, when the unit is ready to be reoccupied, and the tenant
shall exercise such right of first refusal within ten days of the owner's
notice;

(9)
Whenever a landlord plans to change any apartment or apartments to a
condominium form of ownership ((or plans to change to a policy of excluding
children)), the landlord shall give a written notice to a tenant at least
ninety days before termination of the tenancy ((to effectuate such change in
policy. Such ninety-day notice shall be in lieu of the notice required by
subsection (1) of this section: PROVIDED, That if after giving the ninety-day
notice the change in policy is delayed, the notice requirements of subsection
(1) of this section shall apply unless waived by the tenant));

(10)
An emergency order requiring that the housing unit be vacated and closed that
has been issued pursuant to an order by a governmental entity; or

(11) The tenant engages in "criminal activity." For
purposes of this subsection, "criminal activity" means a criminal act
defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health, safety, or welfare
of the tenants. An owner seeking to evict a tenant under this subsection need
not produce evidence of a criminal conviction, even if the alleged misconduct
constitutes a criminal offense. Notice from a law enforcement agency of
criminal activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not the only grounds, for
an eviction under this subsection.

---
END ---