BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.305 and 1997 c 291 s 6 and 1997 c 241 s 10 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
department shall continue to issue the categories of special plates issued by
the department under the sections repealed under section 12 (1) through (7),
chapter 250, Laws of 1990. Special license plates issued under those repealed
sections before January 1, 1991, are valid to the extent and under the
conditions provided in those repealed sections. The following conditions,
limitations, or requirements apply to certain special license plates issued
after January 1, 1991:

(1)
A horseless carriage plate and a plate or plates issued for collectors'
vehicles more than thirty years old, upon payment of the initial fees required
by law and the additional special license plate fee established by the
department, are valid for the life of the vehicle for which application is
approved by the department. When a single plate is issued, it shall be
displayed on the rear of the vehicle.

(2)
The department may issue special license plates denoting amateur radio operator
status only to persons having a valid official radio operator license issued by
the federal communications commission.

(3)
The department shall issue one set of special license plates to each resident
of this state who has been awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor for use on
a passenger vehicle registered to that person. The department shall issue the
plate without the payment of licensing fees ((and motor vehicle excise tax)).

(4)
The department may issue for use on only one motor vehicle owned by the
qualified applicant special license plates denoting that the recipient of the
plate is a survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor on December 7, 1941, to
persons meeting all of the following criteria:

(a)
Is a resident of this state;

(b)
Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941;

(c)
Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m.
Hawaii time at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not
to exceed three miles;

(d)
Received an honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces; and

(e)
Is certified by a Washington state chapter of the Pearl Harbor survivors
association as satisfying the qualifications in (c) of this subsection.

The
department may issue such plates to the surviving spouse of any deceased Pearl
Harbor survivor who met the requirements of this subsection. If the surviving
spouse remarries, he or she shall return the special plates to the department
within fifteen days and apply for regular plates. The surviving spouse must be
a resident of this state.

The
department shall issue these plates upon payment by the applicant of all other
license fees, but the department may not set or charge an additional fee for
these special license plates.

(5)
The department may issue for use on only one motor vehicle owned by the
qualified applicant special license plates denoting that the recipient is an
honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces.

(6) The department shall replace, free of charge, special
license plates issued under subsections (3) and (4) of this section if they are
lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. Such plates shall remain with
the persons upon transfer or other disposition of the vehicle for which they
were initially issued, and may be used on another vehicle registered to the
recipient in accordance with the provisions of RCW 46.16.316(1).

---
END ---