BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.55.085 and 1993 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A law enforcement officer discovering an unauthorized vehicle left within a
highway right of way shall attach to the vehicle a readily visible notification
sticker. The sticker shall contain the following information:

(a)
The date and time the sticker was attached;

(b)
The identity of the officer;

(c)
A statement that if the vehicle is not removed within twenty-four hours from
the time the sticker is attached, the registered owner will have committed a
traffic infraction with a mandatory fine of $250 and a court appearance and
the vehicle may be taken into custody and stored at the owner's expense; and

(d)
The address and telephone number where additional information may be obtained.

(2)
If the vehicle has current Washington registration plates, the officer shall
check the records to learn the identity of the last owner of record. The
officer or his department shall make a reasonable effort to contact the owner
by telephone in order to give the owner the information on the notification
sticker.

(3)
If the vehicle is not removed within twenty-four hours from the time the
notification sticker is attached, the law enforcement officer may take custody
of the vehicle and provide for the vehicle's removal to a place of safety. A
vehicle that does not pose a safety hazard may remain on the roadside for more
than twenty-four hours if the owner or operator is unable to remove it from the
place where it is located and so notifies law enforcement officials and
requests assistance.

(4)
For the purposes of this section a place of safety includes the business
location of a registered tow truck operator.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.55.105 and 1999 c 86 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The abandonment of any vehicle creates a prima facie presumption that the last
registered owner of record is responsible for the abandonment and is liable for
costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle,
less amounts realized at auction.

(2)
If an unauthorized vehicle is found abandoned under subsection (1) of this
section and removed at the direction of law enforcement, the last registered
owner of record is guilty of ((a)) the traffic infraction of
"littering‑-abandoned vehicle," unless the vehicle
is redeemed as provided in RCW 46.55.120. In addition to any other monetary
penalty payable under chapter 46.63 RCW, the court shall not consider all
monetary penalties as having been paid until the court is satisfied that the
person found to have committed the infraction has made restitution in the amount
of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the vehicle under RCW 46.55.140.

(3)
A vehicle theft report filed with a law enforcement agency relieves the last
registered owner of liability under subsection (2) of this section for failure
to redeem the vehicle. However, the last registered owner remains liable for
the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle
under subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section limits in any
way the registered owner's rights in a civil action or as restitution in a
criminal action against a person responsible for the theft of the vehicle.

(4)
Properly filing a report of sale or transfer regarding the vehicle involved in
accordance with RCW 46.12.101(1) relieves the last registered owner of
liability under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If the date of sale
as indicated on the report of sale is on or before the date of impoundment, the
buyer identified on the latest properly filed report of sale with the
department is assumed liable for the costs incurred in removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less amounts realized at auction. If the
date of sale is after the date of impoundment, the previous registered owner is
assumed to be liable for such costs. A licensed vehicle dealer is not liable
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section if the dealer, as transferee or
assignee of the last registered owner of the vehicle involved, has complied
with the requirements of RCW 46.70.122 upon selling or otherwise disposing of
the vehicle, or if the dealer has timely filed a transitional ownership record
or report of sale under RCW 46.12.103. In that case the person to whom the
licensed vehicle dealer has sold or transferred the vehicle is assumed liable for
the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned
vehicle, less amounts realized at auction.

(5)
For the purposes of reporting notices of traffic infraction to the department
under RCW 46.20.270 and 46.52.101, and for purposes of reporting notices of
failure to appear, respond, or comply regarding a notice of traffic infraction
to the department under RCW 46.63.070(5), a traffic infraction under subsection
(2) of this section is not considered to be a standing, stopping, or parking violation.

(6)
A notice of infraction for a violation of this section may be filed with a
court of limited jurisdiction organized under Title 3, 35, or 35A RCW, or with
a violations bureau subject to the court's jurisdiction.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.55.110 and 1999 c 398 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall
notify the legal and registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized
vehicle and the owners of any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. The notification shall be sent by first-class mail
within twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and
legal owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal
property registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law
enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the person
or agency authorizing the impound. The notification shall include the name of
the impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall
also include the location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the
vehicle was impounded. The notice shall also include the written notice of the
right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of
the impoundment pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2)
In addition, if a suspended license impound has been ordered, the notice must
state the length of the impound, the requirement of the posting of a security
deposit to ensure payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
notification that if the security deposit is not posted the vehicle will
immediately be processed and sold at auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the
requirements set out in RCW 46.55.120(1)(b) regarding the payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage as well as providing proof of satisfaction of
any penalties, fines, or forfeitures before redemption. The notice must also
state that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase the vehicle at the
abandoned vehicle auction, if held.

(3)
In the case of an abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, within twenty-four hours after
receiving information on the owners from the department through the abandoned
vehicle report, the tow truck operator shall send by certified mail, with
return receipt requested, a notice of custody and sale to the legal and
registered owners and of the penalties for the traffic infraction
"littering‑-abandoned vehicle."

(4)
If the date on which a notice required by subsection (3) of this section is to
be mailed falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, the notice may be
mailed on the next day that is neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal
holiday.

(5) No notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an
impounded vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, if the vehicle or personal property has been redeemed.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.63.030 and 1995 c 219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic
infraction:

(a)
When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;

(b)
When the officer is acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in
whose presence the traffic infraction was committed; or

(c)
If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has
reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the
accident has committed a traffic infraction.

(2)
A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written
statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to believe that an
infraction was committed.

(3)
If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in
violation of this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle
shall take its registration number and may take any other information displayed
on the vehicle which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to
the vehicle a notice of traffic infraction. In the case of an abandoned
vehicle, the notice must be entitled "Littering‑-Abandoned
vehicle," and give notice of the monetary penalty and mandatory court
appearance by the registered owner.

(4)
In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon
receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred
costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer
of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the
vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known
address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append to
the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing,
a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing,
storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be
considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this
chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the
vehicle.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.63.060 and 1993 c 501 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A notice of traffic infraction represents a determination that an infraction
has been committed. The determination will be final unless contested as
provided in this chapter.

(2)
The form for the notice of traffic infraction shall be prescribed by rule of
the supreme court and shall include the following:

(a)
A statement that the notice represents a determination that a traffic
infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and that the
determination shall be final unless contested as provided in this chapter;

(b)
A statement that a traffic infraction is a noncriminal offense for which
imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction; that the penalty for a traffic
infraction may include sanctions against the person's driver's license
including suspension, revocation, or denial; that the penalty for a traffic
infraction related to standing, stopping, or parking may include nonrenewal of
the vehicle license;

(c)
A statement of the specific traffic infraction for which the notice was issued;

(d)
A statement of the monetary penalty established for the traffic infraction;

(e)
A statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the
notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these options;

(f)
A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination the state has the
burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the infraction was
committed; and that the person may subpoena witnesses including the officer who
issued the notice of infraction;

(g)
A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of explaining
mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the infraction the
person will be deemed to have committed the infraction and may not subpoena
witnesses;

(h)
A statement that the person must respond to the notice as provided in this
chapter within fifteen days or the person's driver's license or driving
privilege will be suspended by the department until any penalties imposed
pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied;

(i)
A statement that failure to appear at a hearing requested for the purpose of
contesting the determination or for the purpose of explaining mitigating
circumstances will result in the suspension of the person's driver's license or
driving privilege((,)); or in the case of a standing, stopping,
or parking violation, refusal of the department to renew the vehicle license,
until any penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied; or
in the case of an abandoned vehicle, suspension of the person's driver's license,
until any penalties imposed under this chapter have been satisfied;

(j)
A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person promises to respond
to the notice of infraction in one of the ways provided in this chapter.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.63.070 and 1993 c 501 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who receives a notice of traffic infraction shall respond to such
notice as provided in this section within fifteen days of the date of the
notice.

(2)
If the person determined to have committed the infraction does not contest the
determination the person shall respond by completing the appropriate portion of
the notice of infraction and submitting it, either by mail or in person, to the
court specified on the notice. A check or money order in the amount of the
penalty prescribed for the infraction must be submitted with the response.
When a response which does not contest the determination is received, an
appropriate order shall be entered in the court's records, and a record of the
response and order shall be furnished to the department in accordance with RCW
46.20.270. However, a court appearance is required for a person determined
to have committed the infraction of "Littering‑-Abandoned
vehicle" under RCW 46.55.105(2) regardless of whether the person contests
the determination.

(3)
If the person determined to have committed the infraction wishes to contest the
determination the person shall respond by completing the portion of the notice
of infraction requesting a hearing and submitting it, either by mail or in
person, to the court specified on the notice. The court shall notify the
person in writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing, and that date
shall not be sooner than seven days from the date of the notice, except by
agreement, or in the case of a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2), not sooner
than sixty days from the date of the notice, except by agreement.

(4)
If the person determined to have committed the infraction does not contest the
determination but wishes to explain mitigating circumstances surrounding the
infraction the person shall respond by completing the portion of the notice of
infraction requesting a hearing for that purpose and submitting it, either by
mail or in person, to the court specified on the notice. The court shall
notify the person in writing of the time, place, and date of the hearing. In
the case of a violation of RCW 46.55.105(2), the hearing may not be sooner
than sixty days from the date of the notice, except by agreement.

(5)
If any person issued a notice of traffic infraction:

(a)
Fails to respond to the notice of traffic infraction as provided in subsection
(2) of this section; or

(b)
Fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of
this section;

the
court shall enter an appropriate order assessing the monetary penalty
prescribed for the traffic infraction and any other penalty authorized by this
chapter and shall notify the department in accordance with RCW 46.20.270, of
the failure to respond to the notice of infraction or to appear at a requested
hearing.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a
monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each
offense unless authorized by this chapter or title. The mandatory penalty
for "Littering‑-Abandoned vehicle" under RCW 46.55.105(2) is
two hundred fifty dollars, no part of which may be suspended, waived, or
reduced, and the court shall also suspend the driver's license of the person
for ninety days or until all penalties are paid, whichever is later.

(2)
The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for
designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions
under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and
penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the
supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3)
There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as
defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a
monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. The mandatory penalty
for failure to respond to an infraction under RCW 46.55.105(2) is two hundred
fifty dollars, no part of which may be suspended, waived, or reduced, and the
court shall also suspend the driver's license of the person for ninety days or
until all penalties are paid, whichever is later. A local legislative body
may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by
the local legislative body.

(4)
Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature
and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW
relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the
limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this chapter.

(5)
Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court
may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty
may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for
payment the court shall notify the department of the failure to pay the
penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privilege until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in
subsection (3) of this section has been paid.

(6) In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section
and not subject to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person
found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a fee of five
dollars per infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or
waived. Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for
deposit in the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account
under RCW 70.168.040.

---
END ---