BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.32A.030 and 1997 c 146 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the
context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Administrator" means the individual who has the daily administrative
responsibility of a crisis residential center, or his or her designee.

(2)
(("At-risk youth" means a juvenile:

(a)
Who is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive hours without
consent of his or her parent;

(b)
Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior
endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; or

(c)
Who has a substance abuse problem for which there are no pending criminal
charges related to the substance abuse.

(3)))
"Child," "juvenile," and "youth" mean any
unemancipated individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years.

(((4)
"Child in need of services" means a juvenile:

(a)
Who is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior
endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child or other person;

(b)
Who has been reported to law enforcement as absent without consent for at least
twenty-four consecutive hours from the parent's home, a crisis residential
center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement on two or more
separate occasions; and

(i)
Has exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or

(ii)
Has exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to the health,
safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; or

(c)(i)
Who is in need of necessary services, including food, shelter, health care,
clothing, educational, or services designed to maintain or reunite the family;

(ii)
Who lacks access, or has declined, to utilize these services; and

(iii)
Whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful efforts to maintain
the family structure or are unable or unwilling to continue efforts to maintain
the family structure.

(5)
"Child in need of services petition" means a petition filed in
juvenile court by a parent, child, or the department seeking adjudication of
placement of the child.

(6))) (3)
"Crisis residential center" means a secure or semi-secure facility
established pursuant to chapter 74.13 RCW.

(((7)))
(4) "Custodian" means the person or entity who has the legal
right to the custody of the child.

(((8)))
(5) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.

(((9)))
(6) "Extended family member" means an adult who is a
grandparent, brother, sister, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, or first
cousin with whom the child has a relationship and is comfortable, and who is
willing and available to care for the child.

(((10)))
(7) "Guardian" means that person or agency that (a) has been
appointed as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, and (b) has the right to legal custody of
the child pursuant to such appointment. The term "guardian" does not
include a "dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding
under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(((11)))
(8) "Multidisciplinary team" means a group formed to provide
assistance and support to a child ((who is an at-risk youth or a child in
need of services)) and his or her parent who receive services under this
chapter. The team shall include the parent, a department case worker, a
local government representative when authorized by the local government, and
when appropriate, members from the mental health and substance abuse
disciplines. The team may also include, but is not limited to, the following
persons: Educators, law enforcement personnel, probation officers, employers,
church persons, tribal members, therapists, medical personnel, social service
providers, placement providers, and extended family members. The team members
shall be volunteers who do not receive compensation while acting in a capacity
as a team member, unless the member's employer chooses to provide compensation
or the member is a state employee.

(((12)))
(9) "Out-of-home placement" means a placement in a foster
family home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or
placement in a home, other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, not required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(((13)))
(10) "Parent" means the parent or parents who have the legal
right to custody of the child. "Parent" includes custodian or
guardian.

(((14)))
(11) "Secure facility" means a crisis residential center, or
portion thereof, that has locking doors, locking windows, or a secured
perimeter, designed and operated to prevent a child from leaving without
permission of the facility staff.

(((15)))
(12) "Semi-secure facility" means any facility, including but
not limited to crisis residential centers or specialized foster family homes,
operated in a manner to reasonably assure that youth placed there will not run
away. Pursuant to rules established by the department, the facility
administrator shall establish reasonable hours for residents to come and go
from the facility such that no residents are free to come and go at all hours
of the day and night. To prevent residents from taking unreasonable actions, the
facility administrator, where appropriate, may condition a resident's leaving
the facility upon the resident being accompanied by the administrator or the
administrator's designee and the resident may be required to notify the
administrator or the administrator's designee of any intent to leave, his or
her intended destination, and the probable time of his or her return to the
center.

(((16)))
(13) "Staff secure facility" means a structured group care
facility licensed under rules adopted by the department with a ratio of at
least one adult staff member to every two children.

(((17)))
(14) "Temporary out-of-home placement" means an out-of-home
placement of not more than fourteen days ordered by the court at a fact-finding
hearing on ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk youth
petition.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.32A.040 and 1995 c 312 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Families
who are in conflict or who ((are experiencing problems with at-risk youth or
a child who may be in need of)) receive services under this
chapter may request family reconciliation services from the department.
The department may involve a local multidisciplinary team in its response in
determining the services to be provided and in providing those services. Such
services shall be provided to alleviate personal or family situations which
present a serious and imminent threat to the health or stability of the child
or family and to maintain families intact wherever possible. Family
reconciliation services shall be designed to develop skills and supports within
families to resolve problems related to ((at-risk youth,)) children ((in
need of services,)) or family conflicts and may include but are not limited
to referral to services for suicide prevention, psychiatric or other medical
care, or psychological, mental health, drug or alcohol treatment, welfare,
legal, educational, or other social services, as appropriate to the needs of
the child and the family. Family reconciliation services may also include
training in parenting, conflict management, and dispute resolution skills.

The
department shall publish a manual designed to inform and assist parents and
children who may be in need of family reconciliation services and at-risk youth
petition proceedings. The manual shall describe the services, processes, and
rules. The manual shall be made available to the public at no cost, and shall
be available at community services offices, law enforcement entity offices,
judicial offices, schools, and other appropriate locations.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.32A.042 and 1995 c 312 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The administrator of a crisis residential center may convene a
multidisciplinary team, which is to be locally based and administered, at the
request of a child placed at the center or the child's parent.

(b)
If the administrator has reasonable cause to believe that a child ((is a
child in need of services)) meets one or more of the criteria as
identified in RCW 13.32A.150(2) and the parent is unavailable or unwilling
to continue efforts to maintain the family structure, the administrator shall
immediately convene a multidisciplinary team.

(c)
A parent may disband a team twenty-four hours, excluding weekends and holidays,
after receiving notice of formation of the team under (b) of this subsection
unless ((a)) an at-risk youth petition has been filed ((under
RCW 13.32A.140)) by the child or the department. If a petition has
been filed by the child or the department, the parent may not disband
the team until the fact-finding and disposition hearings ((is))
are held ((under RCW 13.32A.179)). The court may allow the team
to continue if, pursuant to the disposition hearing, an out-of-home
placement is ordered ((under RCW 13.32A.179(3))). Upon the parent
filing ((of)) an at-risk youth petition or the filing of a
dependency petition the team shall cease to exist, unless the parent requests
continuation of the team or unless ((the)) an out-of-home
placement was ordered ((under RCW 13.32A.179(3))) pursuant to the
disposition of the at-risk youth proceeding.

(2)
The secretary shall request participation of appropriate state agencies to
assist in the coordination and delivery of services through the
multidisciplinary teams. Those agencies that agree to participate shall
provide the secretary all information necessary to facilitate forming a
multidisciplinary team and the secretary shall provide this information to the
administrator of each crisis residential center.

(3)
The secretary shall designate within each region a department employee who
shall have responsibility for coordination of the state response to a request
for creation of a multidisciplinary team. The secretary shall advise the
administrator of each crisis residential center of the name of the appropriate
employee. Upon a request of the administrator to form a multidisciplinary team
the employee shall provide a list of the agencies that have agreed to
participate in the multidisciplinary team.

(4)
The administrator shall also seek participation from representatives of mental
health and drug and alcohol treatment providers as appropriate.

(5)
A parent shall be advised of the request to form a multidisciplinary team and
may select additional members of the multidisciplinary team. The parent or
child may request any person or persons to participate including, but not
limited to, educators, law enforcement personnel, court personnel, family
therapists, licensed health care practitioners, social service providers, youth
residential placement providers, other family members, church representatives,
and members of their own community. The administrator shall assist in
obtaining the prompt participation of persons requested by the parent or child.

(6)
When an administrator of a crisis residential center requests the formation of
a team, the state agencies must respond as soon as possible. The team shall
have the authority to evaluate the juvenile, and family members, if appropriate
and agreed to by the parent, and shall:

(a)
With parental input, develop a plan of appropriate available services and
assist the family in obtaining those services;

(b)
Make a referral to the designated chemical dependency specialist or the county
designated mental health professional, if appropriate;

(c)
Recommend no further intervention because the juvenile and his or her family
have resolved the problem causing the family conflict; or

(d) With the parent's consent, work with them to achieve
reconciliation of the child and family.

Sec.
4. RCW
13.32A.044 and 1995 c 312 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of the multidisciplinary team is to assist in a coordinated
referral of the family to available social and health-related services.

(2)
At the first meeting of the multidisciplinary team, it shall choose a member to
coordinate the team's efforts. The parent member of the multidisciplinary team
must agree with the choice of coordinator. The team shall meet or communicate
as often as necessary to assist the family.

(3)
The coordinator of the multidisciplinary team may assist in filing ((a child
in need of services petition when requested by the parent or child or)) an
at-risk youth petition when requested by the parent or child. The multidisciplinary
team shall have no standing as a party in any action under this title.

(4)
If the administrator is unable to contact the child's parent, the
multidisciplinary team may be used for assistance. If the parent has not been
contacted within five days the administrator shall contact the department and
request the case be reviewed for a dependency filing under chapter 13.34 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
13.32A.120 and 1996 c 133 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where either a child or the child's parent or the person or facility currently
providing shelter to the child notifies the center that such individual or
individuals cannot agree to the continuation of an out-of-home placement
arrived at pursuant to RCW 13.32A.090(2)(e), the administrator of the center
shall immediately contact the remaining party or parties to the agreement and
shall attempt to bring about the child's return home or to an alternative
living arrangement agreeable to the child and the parent as soon as
practicable.

(2)
If a child and his or her parent cannot agree to an out-of-home placement under
RCW 13.32A.090(2)(e), either the child or parent may file with the juvenile
court ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk youth petition
((to approve an out-of-home placement or the parent may file with the
juvenile court a petition in the interest of a child alleged to be an at-risk
youth under this chapter)).

(3)
If a child and his or her parent cannot agree to the continuation of an
out-of-home placement arrived at under RCW 13.32A.090(2)(e), either the child
or parent may file with the juvenile court ((a child in need of services))
an at-risk youth petition ((to approve an out-of-home placement or
the parent may file with the juvenile court a petition in the interest of a
child alleged to be an at-risk youth under this chapter)).

Sec.
6. RCW
13.32A.130 and 1997 c 146 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A child admitted to a secure facility within a crisis residential center shall
remain in the facility for not more than five consecutive days, but for at
least twenty-four hours after admission. If the child admitted under this
section is transferred between centers or between secure and semi-secure
facilities, the aggregate length of time spent in all such centers or
facilities may not exceed five consecutive days.

(2)(a)(i)
The facility administrator shall determine within twenty-four hours after a
child's admission to a secure facility whether the child is likely to remain in
a semi-secure facility and may transfer the child to a semi-secure facility or
release the child to the department. The determination shall be based on: (A)
The need for continued assessment, protection, and treatment of the child in a
secure facility; and (B) the likelihood the child would remain at a semi-secure
facility until his or her parents can take the child home or a petition can be
filed under this title.

(ii)
In making the determination the administrator shall consider the following
information if known: (A) The child's age and maturity; (B) the child's
condition upon arrival at the center; (C) the circumstances that led to the
child's being taken to the center; (D) whether the child's behavior endangers
the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person; (E) the
child's history of running away which has endangered the health, safety, and
welfare of the child; and (F) the child's willingness to cooperate in the
assessment.

(b)
If the administrator of a secure facility determines the child is unlikely to
remain in a semi-secure facility, the administrator shall keep the child in the
secure facility pursuant to this chapter and in order to provide for space for
the child may transfer another child who has been in the facility for at least
seventy-two hours to a semi-secure facility. The administrator shall only make
a transfer of a child after determining that the child who may be transferred
is likely to remain at the semi-secure facility.

(c)
A crisis residential center administrator is authorized to transfer a child to
a crisis residential center in the area where the child's parents reside or
where the child's lawfully prescribed residence is located.

(d)
An administrator may transfer a child from a semi-secure facility to a secure
facility whenever he or she reasonably believes that the child is likely to
leave the semi-secure facility and not return and after full consideration of
all factors in (a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection.

(3)
If no parent is available or willing to remove the child during the first
seventy-two hours following admission, the department shall consider the filing
of a petition under RCW 13.32A.140.

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the parents
may remove the child at any time during the five-day period unless the staff of
the crisis residential center has reasonable cause to believe that the child is
absent from the home because he or she is abused or neglected or if allegations
of abuse or neglect have been made against the parents. The department or any
agency legally charged with the supervision of a child may remove a child from
a crisis residential center at any time after the first twenty-four-hour period
after admission has elapsed and only after full consideration by all parties of
the factors in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(5)
Crisis residential center staff shall make reasonable efforts to protect the
child and achieve a reconciliation of the family. If a reconciliation and
voluntary return of the child has not been achieved within forty-eight hours
from the time of intake, and if the administrator of the center does not
consider it likely that reconciliation will be achieved within the five-day
period, then the administrator shall inform the parent and child of: (a) The
availability of counseling services; (b) the right to file ((a child in need
of services petition for an out-of-home placement, the right of a parent to
file)) an at-risk youth petition, and the right of the parent and child to
obtain assistance in filing the petition; (c) the right to request the facility
administrator or his or her designee to form a multidisciplinary team; (d) the
right to request a review of any out-of-home placement; (e) the right to
request a mental health or chemical dependency evaluation by a
county-designated professional or a private treatment facility; and (f) the
right to request treatment in a program to address the child's ((at-risk))
behavior under ((RCW 13.32A.197)) section 15 of this act.

(6)
At no time shall information regarding a parent's or child's rights be
withheld. The department shall develop and distribute to all law enforcement
agencies and to each crisis residential center administrator a written
statement delineating the services and rights. Every officer taking a child
into custody shall provide the child and his or her parent(s) or responsible
adult with whom the child is placed with a copy of the statement. In addition,
the administrator of the facility or his or her designee shall provide every
resident and parent with a copy of the statement.

(7)
A crisis residential center and its administrator or his or her designee acting
in good faith in carrying out the provisions of this section are immune from
criminal or civil liability for such actions.

Sec.
7. RCW
13.32A.140 and 1997 c 146 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the department files a dependency petition, the department shall file ((a
child in need of services)) an at-risk youth petition ((to
approve an out-of-home placement)) on behalf of a child under any of the
following sets of circumstances:

(((1)))
(a) The child has been admitted to a crisis residential center or has
been placed by the department in an out-of-home placement, and:

(((a)))
(i) The parent has been notified that the child was so admitted or
placed;

(((b)))
(ii) The child cannot return home, and legal authorization is needed for
out-of-home placement beyond seventy-two hours;

(((c)))
(iii) No agreement between the parent and the child as to where the
child shall live has been reached;

(((d)))
(iv) No ((child in need of services)) at-risk youth
petition has been filed by either the child or parent;

(((e)
The parent has not filed an at-risk youth petition;)) and

(((f)))
(v) The child has no suitable place to live other than the home of his
or her parent.

(((2)))
(b) The child has been admitted to a crisis residential center and:

(((a)))
(i) Seventy-two hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, have
passed since such placement;

(((b)))
(ii) The staff, after searching with due diligence, have been unable to
contact the parent of such child; and

(((c)))
(iii) The child has no suitable place to live other than the home of his
or her parent.

(((3)))
(c) An agreement between parent and child made pursuant to RCW
13.32A.090(2)(e) or pursuant to RCW 13.32A.120(1) is no longer acceptable to
parent or child, and:

(((a)))
(i) The party to whom the arrangement is no longer acceptable has so
notified the department;

(((b)))
(ii) Seventy-two hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, have
passed since such notification;

(((c)))
(iii) No new agreement between parent and child as to where the child
shall live has been reached;

(((d)))
(iv) No ((child in need of services)) at-risk youth
petition has been filed by either the child or the parent;

(((e)
The parent has not filed an at-risk youth petition;)) and

(((f)))
(v) The child has no suitable place to live other than the home of his
or her parent.

(2)
An at-risk youth petition filed by the department may only include those
allegations listed under RCW 13.32A.150(2)(b).

(3)
Under the circumstances of subsection((s)) (1)(a), (((2)))
(b), or (((3))) (c) of this section, the child shall
remain in an out-of-home placement until ((a child in need of services))
an at-risk youth petition filed by the department on behalf of the child
is reviewed by the juvenile court and is resolved by the court. The department
may authorize emergency medical or dental care for a child admitted to a crisis
residential center or placed in an out-of-home placement by the department.
The state, when the department files ((a child in need of services)) an
at-risk youth petition under this section, shall be represented as provided
for in RCW 13.04.093.

Sec.
8. RCW
13.32A.150 and 1996 c 133 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the juvenile court shall not
accept the filing of ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk youth
petition by the child or the parents ((or the filing of an at-risk youth
petition by the parent,)) unless verification is provided that a family
assessment has been completed by the department. The family assessment
provided by the department shall involve the multidisciplinary team as provided
in RCW 13.32A.040, if one exists. The family assessment or plan of services
developed by the multidisciplinary team shall be aimed at family
reconciliation, reunification, and avoidance of the out-of-home placement of
the child. If the department is unable to complete an assessment within two
working days following a request for assessment the child or the parents may
proceed under subsection (2) of this section ((or the parent may proceed
under RCW 13.32A.191)).

(2)
A child or a child's parent may file with the juvenile court ((a child in
need of services)) an at-risk youth petition ((to approve an
out-of-home placement for the child)). The department shall, when
requested, assist either a parent or child in the filing of the petition. The
petition must be filed in the county where the parent resides. The petition shall
allege that ((the child is a child in need of services and shall ask only
that the placement of a child outside the home of his or her parent be approved)):

(a)
Court supervision and intervention are necessary to assist the parent to
maintain the care, custody, and control of the child and alternatives to court
intervention have been attempted or there is good cause why such alternatives
have not been attempted and that the child:

(i)
Is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior
endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person;

(ii)
Is absent from home for at least seventy-two consecutive hours without the
consent of his or her parent; or

(iii)
Has a substance abuse problem for which there are no pending criminal charges
related to the substance abuse; or

(b)
The child:

(i)
Is beyond the control of his or her parent such that the child's behavior
endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the child or any other person;

(ii)
Has been reported to law enforcement as absent without consent for at least
twenty-four consecutive hours from the parent's home, a crisis residential
center, an out-of-home placement, or a court-ordered placement on two or more
separate occasions; and exhibited a serious substance abuse problem; or
exhibited behaviors that create a serious risk of harm to the health, safety,
or welfare of the child or any other person; or

(iii)
Is in need of necessary services, including food, shelter, health care,
clothing, or educational services, or services designed to maintain or reunite
the family; who lack access to, or has declined to utilize, these services; and
whose parents have evidenced continuing but unsuccessful efforts to maintain
the family structure or are unable or unwilling to continue efforts to maintain
the family structure.

The
filing of a petition to approve the placement is not dependent upon the court's
having obtained any prior jurisdiction over the child or his or her parent, and
confers upon the court a special jurisdiction to approve or disapprove an
out-of-home placement.

(3)
A petition may not be filed if the child is the subject of a proceeding under
chapter 13.34 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 13.32A RCW to read as follows:

No
superior court may refuse to accept for filing a properly completed and
presented at-risk youth petition. To be properly presented, the petitioner
shall verify that the family assessment required under RCW 13.32A.150 has been
completed. If the department has failed to complete the required family
assessment within the prescribed two working days after the request for the
assessment, the court shall not refuse to accept the petition because of the
lack of verification of the completed family assessment. In the event of an
improper refusal that is appealed and reversed, the petitioner shall be awarded
actual damages, costs, and attorneys' fees.

Sec.
10. RCW
13.32A.152 and 1996 c 133 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk youth
petition is filed by a youth pursuant to RCW 13.32A.150, or the department
pursuant to RCW 13.32A.140, the filing party shall have a copy of the petition
served on the parents of the youth. Service shall first be attempted in person
and if unsuccessful, then by certified mail with return receipt.

(2)
Whenever ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk youth
petition is filed by a youth or parent pursuant to RCW 13.32A.150, the court
shall immediately notify the department that a petition has been filed.

Sec.
11. RCW
13.32A.160 and 1997 c 146 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When a proper ((child in need of services)) at-risk youth
petition ((to approve an out-of-home placement)) is filed under RCW
13.32A.120, 13.32A.140, or 13.32A.150 the juvenile court shall: (a)(i)
Schedule a fact-finding hearing to be held: (A) For a child who resides in a
place other than his or her parent's home and other than an out-of-home
placement, within five calendar days unless the last calendar day is a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, in which case the hearing shall be held on the
preceding judicial day; or (B) for a child living at home or in an out-of-home
placement, within ten days; and (ii) notify the parent, child, and the
department of such date; (b) notify the parent of the right to be represented
by counsel and, if indigent and not the petitioner, to have counsel
appointed for him or her by the court; (c) appoint legal counsel for the child;
(d) inform the child and his or her parent of the legal consequences of the
court approving or disapproving ((a child in need of services)) an
at-risk youth petition; (e) notify the parents of their rights under this
chapter and chapters 11.88, 13.34, 70.96A, and 71.34 RCW, including the right
to ((file an at-risk youth petition, the right to)) submit an
application for admission of their child to a treatment facility for alcohol,
chemical dependency, or mental health treatment, and the right to file a
guardianship petition; and (f) notify all parties, including the department, of
their right to present evidence at the fact-finding hearing.

(2)
Unless an out-of-home placement of the child is provided for pursuant to
subsection (3) or (4) of this section, or otherwise authorized or required by
law, the child shall reside in the home of his or her parent.

(3)
Upon filing of ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk youth
petition, the child may be placed, if not already placed, in an out-of-home
placement requested by the parent or child and approved by the parent; by
the department in a crisis residential center, foster family home, group home
facility licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW((,)); or any other
suitable residence to be determined by the department. The court may place a
child in a crisis residential center for a temporary out-of-home placement as
long as the requirements of RCW 13.32A.125 are met.

(((3)))
(4) If the child has been placed in a foster family home or group care
facility under chapter 74.15 RCW, the child shall remain there, or in any other
suitable residence as determined by the department, pending resolution of the
petition by the court. Any placement may be reviewed by the court within three
judicial days upon the request of the juvenile or the juvenile's parent.

(5)
If upon sworn written or oral declaration of the parent or the department, the
court has reason to believe that a child has willfully and knowingly violated a
court order issued pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the court
may issue an order directing law enforcement to take the child into custody and
place the child in a juvenile detention facility or in a secure facility within
a crisis residential center. If the child is placed in detention, a review
shall be held as provided in RCW 13.32A.065.

Sec.
12. RCW
13.32A.170 and 1996 c 133 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court shall hold a fact-finding hearing to consider a proper ((child in
need of services)) at-risk youth petition, giving due weight to the
intent of the legislature that families have the right to place reasonable
restrictions and rules upon their children, appropriate to the individual
child's developmental level. The court may appoint legal counsel and/or a
guardian ad litem to represent the child and advise parents of their right to
be represented by legal counsel. At the commencement of the hearing, the court
shall advise the parents of their rights as set forth in RCW 13.32A.160(1). ((If
the court approves or denies a child in need of services petition, a written
statement of the reasons must be filed.))

(2)
If the allegations have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence, the
court shall approve an at-risk youth petition and, if appropriate, enter a
temporary out-of-home placement for a period not to exceed fourteen days
pending the disposition hearing. The court may not grant a petition filed by
the child or the department if it is established that the petition is based
only upon a dislike of reasonable rules or reasonable discipline established by
the parent. The court may not grant the petition if the child is the subject
of a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW. If the court grants or denies the
petition, a statement of the written reasons shall be entered into the
records. If the court denies the petition, the court shall verbally advise the
parties that the child is required to remain within the care, custody, and
control of his or her parent.

(3)
The court may approve ((an order stating that the child shall be placed in a
residence other than the home of his or her parent)) a temporary
out-of-home placement only if it is established by a preponderance of the
evidence, including a departmental recommendation for approval or dismissal of
the petition, that:

(a)
((The child is a child in need of services as defined in RCW 13.32A.030(4);

(b))) If
the petitioner is a child, he or she has made a reasonable effort to resolve
the conflict;

(((c)))
(b) Reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need
for removal of the child from the child's home and to make it possible for the
child to return home; and

(((d)))
(c) A suitable out-of-home placement resource is available.

((The
court may not grant a petition filed by the child or the department if it is
established that the petition is based only upon a dislike of reasonable rules
or reasonable discipline established by the parent. The court may not grant
the petition if the child is the subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34
RCW.

(3)
Following the fact-finding hearing the court shall: (a) Approve a child in
need of services petition and, if appropriate, enter a temporary out-of-home
placement for a period not to exceed fourteen days pending approval of a
disposition decision to be made under RCW 13.32A.179(2); (b) approve an at-risk
youth petition filed by the parents and dismiss the child in need of services
petition; (c) dismiss the petition; or (d) order the department to review the
case to determine whether the case is appropriate for a dependency petition
under chapter 13.34 RCW.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 13.32A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The court may order the department to submit a dispositional plan if such a
plan would assist the court in ordering a suitable disposition in the case. If
the court orders the department to prepare a plan, the department shall provide
copies of the plan to the parent, the child, and the court. The plan shall
address the needs of the child and the perceived needs of the parents and
include recommendations with regard to placement of the child, counseling
services and other services for the child, and counseling services or any other
services for the child requiring parental participation.

(2)
Prior to disposition, or at any time thereafter, subject to available
resources, the court may order that a risk and needs assessment of the child be
conducted.

Sec.
14. RCW
13.32A.179 and 1997 c 146 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A disposition hearing shall be held no later than fourteen days after the approval
of the ((temporary out-of-home placement)) at-risk youth petition.
The parents, child, and department shall be notified by the court of the time
and place of the hearing.

(2)
At the conclusion of the disposition hearing, the court may: (a) Reunite the
family and dismiss the petition; (b) ((approve an at-risk youth petition
filed by the parents and dismiss the child in need of services petition; (c)
approve an out-of-home placement requested in the child in need of services
petition by the parents; (d))) enter a dispositional order that will
assist the parent in maintaining the care, custody, and control of the child
and assist the family to resolve family conflicts or problems; (c) order
conditions of supervision for the child which may include: (i) Regular school
attendance; (ii) counseling; (iii) participation in a substance abuse or mental
health outpatient treatment program; (iv) reporting on a regular basis to the
department or any other designated person or agency; and (v) any other condition
the court deems an appropriate condition of supervision; (d) order the parent
to participate in counseling services or any other services for the child
requiring parental participation; (e) order that the child be placed in
an out-of-home placement ((at the request of the child or the department not
to exceed ninety days)); or (((e))) (f) order the department
to review the matter for purposes of filing a dependency petition under chapter
13.34 RCW. ((Whether or not the court approves or orders an out-of-home
placement, the court may also order any conditions of supervision as set forth
in RCW 13.32A.196(2).))

(3)
Unless agreed to by the parent, the court may only enter an order under
subsection (2)(d) of this section if it finds by clear and convincing evidence
that: (a) The order is in the best interests of the family; (b) the parents
have not agreed to counseling services or any other services for the child
requiring parental participation; (c) the problems can not be resolved by
delivery of counseling services or other services solely to the child; and (d)
counseling services or other services for the child requiring parental
participation are available.

(4)
Unless agreed to by the parent the court may only enter an order under
subsection (2)(((d))) (e) of this section if it finds by clear((,
cogent,)) and convincing evidence that: (a)(i) The order is in the best
interest of the family; (ii) the parents have not requested an out-of-home
placement; (iii) the parents have not exercised any other right listed in RCW
13.32A.160(1)(e); (iv) the child has made reasonable efforts to resolve the
problems that led to the filing of the petition; (v) the problems cannot be
resolved by delivery of services to the family during continued placement of
the child in the parental home; (vi) reasonable efforts have been made to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home
and to make it possible for the child to return home; and (vii) a suitable
out-of-home placement resource is available; (b)(i) the order is in the best
interest of the child; and (ii) the parents are unavailable; or (c) the
parent's actions cause an imminent threat to the child's health or safety.

(((4)))
(5) The parent shall be financially responsible for costs related to the
court-ordered plan. However, this requirement shall not affect the eligibility
of the parent or child for public assistance or other benefits to which the
parent or child may otherwise be entitled.

(6)
The court may order the department to ((submit a dispositional plan if such
a plan would assist the court in ordering a suitable disposition in the case.
The plan, if ordered, shall address the needs of the child, and the perceived
needs of the parents if the order was entered under subsection (2)(d) of this
section or if specifically agreed to by the parents. If the parents do not
agree or the order was not entered under subsection (2)(d) of this section the
plan may only make recommendations regarding services in which the parents may
voluntarily participate. If the court orders the department to prepare a plan,
the department shall provide copies of the plan to the parent, the child, and
the court)) monitor compliance with the dispositional order, assist in
coordinating the provisions of court-ordered services, and submit reports to
subsequent review hearings regarding the status of the case. If ((the
parties or)) the court ((desire)) orders the department to be
involved in ((any future proceedings or case plan development)) the
case, the department shall be provided with timely notification of all
court hearings.

(((5)
A child who fails to comply with a court order issued under this section shall
be subject to contempt proceedings, as provided in this chapter, but only if
the noncompliance occurs within one year after the entry of the order.

(6)
After the court approves or orders an out-of-home placement)) (7)
In all at-risk youth proceedings, the court shall verbally notify the parents
and the child of the possibility of a finding of contempt for failure to comply
with the terms of a court order entered pursuant to this chapter.

(8)
Subsequent to the disposition hearing, the parents or the department may
request, and the court may grant, dismissal of the ((child in need of
services)) at-risk youth proceeding when it is not feasible for the
department to provide services due to one or more of the following
circumstances:

(a)
The child has been absent from court approved placement for thirty consecutive
days or more;

(b)
The parents or the child, or all of them, refuse to cooperate in available,
appropriate intervention aimed at reunifying the family or aimed at
eliminating the conditions resulting in the filing of the petition; or

(c)
The department has exhausted all available and appropriate resources that would
result in reunification or eliminate the conditions resulting in the filing
of the petition.

(((7)))
(9) Upon the request of the parents, the court shall dismiss ((a
placement made under subsection (2)(c) of this section upon the request of the
parents)) an at-risk youth proceeding unless: (a) A contempt action is
pending in the case; or (b) the disposition order is pursuant to a clear and
convincing finding as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(10)
No dispositional order or condition of supervision ordered by a court pursuant
to this section shall include involuntary commitment of a child for substance
abuse or mental health treatment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. A
new section is added to chapter 13.32A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In the disposition hearing, the court may adopt the additional orders
authorized under this section if it finds that the child involved in the
proceedings is not eligible for inpatient treatment for a mental health or
substance abuse condition and requires specialized treatment. The court may
order that a child be placed in a staff secure facility, other than a crisis
residential center, that will provide for the child's participation in a
program designed to remedy his or her behavioral difficulties or needs. The
court may not enter this order unless, at the disposition hearing, it finds
that the placement is clearly necessary to protect the child and that a less
restrictive order would be inadequate to protect the child, given the child's
age, maturity, propensity to run away from home, past exposure to serious risk
when the child ran away from home, and possible future exposure to serious risk
should the child run away from home again.

(2)
The order shall require periodic court review of the placement, with the first
review hearing conducted not more than thirty days after the date of the
placement. At each review hearing the court shall advise the parents of their
rights under RCW 13.32A.160(1), review the progress of the child, and determine
whether the orders are still necessary for the protection of the child or a
less restrictive placement would be adequate. The court shall modify its
orders as it finds necessary to protect the child. Reviews of orders adopted
under this section are subject to the review provisions under RCW 13.32A.190.

(3)
State funds may only be used to pay for placements under this section if, and
to the extent that, such funds are appropriated to expressly pay for them.

Sec.
16. RCW
13.32A.190 and 1996 c 133 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon making a dispositional order under RCW 13.32A.179, the court shall
schedule the matter on the calendar for review within three months, advise the
parties of the date thereof, appoint legal counsel and/or a guardian ad litem
to represent the child at the review hearing, advise parents of their right to
be represented by legal counsel at the review hearing, and notify the parties
of their rights to present evidence at the hearing. Where resources are
available, the court shall encourage the parent and child to participate in
programs for reconciliation of their conflict.

(2)
At the review hearing, the court shall approve or disapprove the continuation
of the dispositional plan in accordance with this chapter. If the order
provides for an out-of-home placement, the court shall determine whether
reasonable efforts have been made to reunify the family and make it possible
for the child to return home. The court shall discontinue the placement and
order that the child return home if the court has reasonable grounds to believe
that the parents have made reasonable efforts to resolve the conflict and the
court has reason to believe that the child's refusal to return home is
capricious. If out-of-home placement is continued, the court may modify the
dispositional plan.

(3)
Court supervision of the child may not be continued past one hundred eighty
days from the day the review hearing commenced unless the court finds, and the
parent agrees, that there are compelling reasons for an extension of
supervision.

(4)
Out-of-home placement may not be continued past one hundred eighty days from
the day the review hearing commenced. The court shall order the child to
return to the home of the parent at the expiration of the placement. If an
out-of-home placement is disapproved prior to one hundred eighty days, the
court shall enter an order requiring the child to return to the home of the
child's parent.

(((4)))
(5) The parents and the department may request, and the juvenile court
may grant, dismissal of ((an out-of-home placement order)) the
at-risk youth proceeding when it is not feasible for the department to
provide services due to one or more of the following circumstances:

(a)
The child has been absent from court approved placement for thirty consecutive
days or more;

(b)
The parents or the child, or all of them, refuse to cooperate in available,
appropriate intervention ((aimed at reunifying the family)); or

(c)
The department has exhausted all available and appropriate resources ((that
would result in reunification)).

(((5)
The court shall terminate a placement made under this section upon the request
of a parent unless the placement is made pursuant to RCW 13.32A.179(3).))

(6)
The court may dismiss ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk
youth petition filed by a parent at any time if the court finds good cause
to believe that continuation of ((out-of-home placement)) the
proceeding would serve no useful purpose.

(7)
The court shall dismiss ((a child in need of services)) an at-risk
youth proceeding if the child is the subject of a proceeding under chapter
13.34 RCW.

(8)
At its discretion, the court may hold a hearing to review an at-risk youth
matter at any time throughout the duration of the proceeding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 13.32A RCW to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in this section, the court shall treat the parents and
the child equally for the purposes of applying contempt of court processes and
penalties under this section.

(1)
Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this chapter is a
civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), subject to the
limitations of subsection (3) of this section.

(2)
The court may impose remedial sanctions including a fine of up to one hundred
dollars and confinement for up to seven days, or both for contempt of court
under this section.

(3)
A child placed in confinement for contempt under this section shall be placed
in confinement only in a secure juvenile detention facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with a county.

(4)
A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, a child, juvenile court
personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of
the child under a court order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(5)
Whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of
a motion for contempt and the information set forth in a supporting
declaration, that a child has violated a placement order entered under this
chapter, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and
take the child to detention. The order may be entered ex parte without prior
notice to the child or other parties. Following the child's admission to
detention, a detention review hearing must be held in accordance with RCW
13.32A.065.

Sec.
18. RCW
28A.225.035 and 1999 c 319 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015 shall
consist of a written notification to the court alleging that:

(a)
The child has unexcused absences during the current school year;

(b)
Actions taken by the school district have not been successful in substantially
reducing the child's absences from school; and

(c)
Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the school district
or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.

(2)
The petition shall set forth the name, age, school, and residence of the child
and the names and residence of the child's parents.

(3)
The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations in this section
and shall generally request relief available under this chapter and provide
information about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4)
When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015, the juvenile
court shall schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition,
or if the court determines that a referral to an available community truancy
board would substantially reduce the child's unexcused absences, the court may
refer the case to a community truancy board under the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court.

(5)
If a referral is made to a community truancy board, the truancy board must meet
with the child, a parent, and the school district representative and enter into
an agreement with the petitioner and respondent regarding expectations and any
actions necessary to address the child's truancy within thirty days of the
referral. If the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, the child shall not be
required to attend and the agreement under this subsection shall be between the
truancy board, the school district, and the child's parent. The agreement
shall be presented to the juvenile court for its approval.

(6)
The court shall approve the agreement by order or schedule a hearing. The
court may, if the school district and community truancy board agree, permit the
truancy board to provide continued supervision over the student, or parent if
the petition is based on RCW 28A.225.015, and report on compliance with the
order.

(7)
If the truancy board fails to reach an agreement, the truancy board shall return
the case to the juvenile court for a hearing.

(8)
Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (4) of this section, a hearing
shall not be required if other actions by the court would substantially reduce
the child's unexcused absences. When a juvenile court hearing is held, the
court shall:

(a)
Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the school district
of the hearing;

(b)
Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the
hearing; and

(c)
Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights available under
chapter 13.32A RCW.

(9)
The court may require the attendance of the child if eight years old or older,
the parents, and the school district at any hearing on a petition filed under
RCW 28A.225.030.

(10)
A school district is responsible for determining who shall represent the school
district at hearings on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030 or 28A.225.015.

(11)
The court may permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either
party be represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad
litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district,
the court shall permit a school district representative who is not an attorney
to represent the school district at any future hearings.

(12)
If the allegations in the petition are established by a preponderance of the
evidence, the court shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming
jurisdiction to intervene for the period of time determined by the court, after
considering the facts alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the
juvenile, to most likely cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school
while the juvenile is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire
before the end of the school year in which it is entered.

(13)
If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall regularly report
to the court any additional unexcused absences by the child.

(14)
Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to the extent
possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who are subject to
truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions ((in RCW 13.32A.191 or child
in need of services petitions)) in RCW 13.32A.140.

(15)
If after a juvenile court assumes jurisdiction in one county the child
relocates to another county, the juvenile court in the receiving county shall,
upon the request of a school district or parent, assume jurisdiction of the
petition filed in the previous county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
13.32A.191 (At-risk youth--Petition by parent) and 1995 c 312 s
25;

(2) RCW
13.32A.192 (At-risk youth petition--Prehearing procedures) and
1997 c 146 s 8, 1996 c 133 s 26, 1995 c 312 s 26, & 1990 c 276 s 12;

(3) RCW
13.32A.194 (At-risk youth petition--Court procedures) and 1996 c
133 s 27, 1995 c 312 s 27, & 1990 c 276 s 13;

(4) RCW
13.32A.196 (At-risk youth petition--Dispositional hearing) and
1995 c 312 s 28, 1991 c 364 s 14, & 1990 c 276 s 14;

(5) RCW
13.32A.197 (Disposition hearing--Additional orders for specialized
treatment--Review hearings--Limitation--Use of state funds) and 1996 c 133 s 3;

(6) RCW
13.32A.198 (At-risk youth--Review by court) and 1990 c 276 s 15;

(7) RCW
13.32A.205 (Acceptance of petitions by court--Damages) and 1995 c
312 s 32; and

(8) RCW
13.32A.250 (Failure to comply with order as civil contempt‑-Motion--Penalties)
and 1998 c 296 s 37, 1996 c 133 s 28, 1995 c 312 s 29, & 1990 c 276 s 16.

---
END ---