BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.41.098 and 1996 c 295 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superior courts and the courts of limited jurisdiction of the state may
order forfeiture of a firearm ((which)) that is proven to be:

(a)
Found concealed on a person not authorized by RCW 9.41.060 or 9.41.070 to carry
a concealed pistol: PROVIDED, That it is an absolute defense to forfeiture if
the person possessed a valid Washington concealed pistol license within the
preceding two years and has not become ineligible for a concealed pistol
license in the interim. Before the firearm may be returned, the person must
pay the past due renewal fee and the current renewal fee;

(b)
Commercially sold to any person without an application as required by RCW
9.41.090;

(c)
In the possession of a person prohibited from possessing the firearm under RCW
9.41.040 or 9.41.045;

(d)
In the possession or under the control of a person at the time the person
committed or was arrested for committing a felony or committing a nonfelony
crime in which a firearm was used or displayed;

(e)
In the possession of a person who is in any place in which a concealed pistol
license is required, and who is under the influence of any drug or under the
influence of intoxicating liquor, as defined in chapter 46.61 RCW;

(f)
In the possession of a person free on bail or personal recognizance pending trial,
appeal, or sentencing for a felony or for a nonfelony crime in which a firearm
was used or displayed, except that violations of Title 77 RCW shall not result
in forfeiture under this section;

(g)
In the possession of a person found to have been mentally incompetent while in
possession of a firearm when apprehended or who is thereafter committed
pursuant to chapter 10.77 or 71.05 RCW;

(h)
Used or displayed by a person in the violation of a proper written order of a
court of general jurisdiction; ((or))

(i)
Used in the commission of a felony or of a nonfelony crime in which a firearm
was used or displayed; or

(j)
In the possession of a person arrested for violating RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503,
46.61.504, 46.61.520(1)(a), or 46.61.522(1)(b).

(2)
Upon order of forfeiture, the court in its discretion may order destruction of
any forfeited firearm. A court may temporarily retain forfeited firearms
needed for evidence.

(a)
Except as provided in (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, firearms that are:
(i) Judicially forfeited and no longer needed for evidence; or (ii) forfeited
due to a failure to make a claim under RCW 63.32.010 or 63.40.010; may be
disposed of in any manner determined by the local legislative authority. Any
proceeds of an auction or trade may be retained by the legislative authority.
This subsection (2)(a) applies only to firearms that come into the possession
of the law enforcement agency after June 30, 1993.

By
midnight, June 30, 1993, every law enforcement agency shall prepare an inventory,
under oath, of every firearm that has been judicially forfeited, has been
seized and may be subject to judicial forfeiture, or that has been, or may be,
forfeited due to a failure to make a claim under RCW 63.32.010 or 63.40.010.

(b)
Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, of the inventoried firearms a law
enforcement agency shall destroy illegal firearms, may retain a maximum of ten
percent of legal forfeited firearms for agency use, and shall either:

(i)
Comply with the provisions for the auction of firearms in RCW 9.41.098 that
were in effect immediately preceding May 7, 1993; or

(ii)
Trade, auction, or arrange for the auction of, rifles and shotguns. In
addition, the law enforcement agency shall either trade, auction, or arrange
for the auction of, short firearms, or shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars
to the state treasurer for every short firearm neither auctioned nor traded, to
a maximum of fifty thousand dollars. The fees shall be accompanied by an
inventory, under oath, of every short firearm listed in the inventory required
by (a) of this subsection, that has been neither traded nor auctioned. The
state treasurer shall credit the fees to the firearms range account established
in RCW ((77.12.720)) 79A.25.210. All trades or auctions of
firearms under this subsection shall be to licensed dealers. Proceeds of any
auction less costs, including actual costs of storage and sale, shall be
forwarded to the firearms range account established in RCW ((77.12.720))
79A.25.210.

(c)
Antique firearms and firearms recognized as curios, relics, and firearms of
particular historical significance by the United States treasury department
bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms are exempt from destruction and shall
be disposed of by auction or trade to licensed dealers.

(d)
Firearms in the possession of the Washington state patrol on or after May 7,
1993, that are judicially forfeited and no longer needed for evidence, or
forfeited due to a failure to make a claim under RCW 63.35.020, must be disposed
of as follows: (i) Firearms illegal for any person to possess must be
destroyed; (ii) the Washington state patrol may retain a maximum of ten percent
of legal firearms for agency use; and (iii) all other legal firearms must be
auctioned or traded to licensed dealers. The Washington state patrol may
retain any proceeds of an auction or trade.

(3)
The court shall order the firearm returned to the owner upon a showing that
there is no probable cause to believe a violation of subsection (1) of this
section existed or the firearm was stolen from the owner or the owner neither
had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission involving the firearm
which resulted in its forfeiture.

(4) A law enforcement officer of the state or of any county or
municipality may confiscate a firearm found to be in the possession of a person
under circumstances specified in subsection (1) of this section. After
confiscation, the firearm shall not be surrendered except: (a) To the
prosecuting attorney for use in subsequent legal proceedings; (b) for
disposition according to an order of a court having jurisdiction as provided in
subsection (1) of this section; or (c) to the owner if the proceedings are
dismissed or as directed in subsection (3) of this section.

---
END ---