BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that the quality of the classroom teacher is a pivotal
factor in the degree to which students successfully achieve high academic
standards.

(2)
The legislature recognizes widespread concerns about the potential for teacher
shortages and finds that classified instructional staff in public schools
represent a great untapped resource for recruiting the teachers of the future.

(3)
The legislature finds that tuition assistance for teachers who are required by
state rules to take college courses in order to continue teaching and tuition
assistance for classified instructional staff seeking to become certificated
teachers will help enhance the quality of teaching and improve student
learning.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Any teacher employed in the common school system of Washington who takes a
course from a regionally accredited institution of higher education may apply
to the superintendent of public instruction for reimbursement of tuition
expenses for the course if the teacher took the course in order to meet state
continuing education requirements imposed as a condition for continuing to hold
a teaching certificate. A teacher may apply for tuition assistance under this
chapter only for courses necessary to continue to hold a teaching certificate.

(2)
For purposes of this chapter, "courses necessary to continue to hold a
teaching certificate" means courses which both:

(a)
Contribute toward the minimum number of continuing education credit hours a
teaching certificate holder must earn prior to the earliest date on which the
certificate held would otherwise lapse or be subject to nonrenewal due to
failure to meet continuing education requirements; and

(b)
Are taken at least in part for the purpose of meeting the minimum state
continuing education requirements necessary to avoid the lapsing or nonrenewal
of the certificate or in order to obtain the next required type of
certification.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall pay teachers who submit a valid
application for tuition assistance a reimbursement of the cost of tuition for
any course necessary to continue to hold a teaching certificate up to a maximum
amount of the average cost of tuition at public baccalaureate institutions in
the state of Washington, provided all other requirements of this chapter are
also fulfilled.

(2)
A valid application for tuition assistance for teachers must include, but is
not limited to:

(a)
Documentation concerning the specific course taken, and identification of which
portion of state minimum continuing education requirements is fulfilled by the
course;

(b)
College and university grade sheets or transcripts that indicate completion of courses;
or if the course was structured in a pass/fail format, whether the applicant
received a passing grade; and

(c)
A signed statement indicating the applicant understands and agrees that any
intentional misrepresentation of a material fact on the application subjects
the certificate holder to revocation of his or her certificate pursuant to
established rules and procedures of chapter 180-86 WAC and other applicable
provisions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Any classified instructional staff employed in the common school system of
Washington who takes a course from a regionally accredited institution of
higher education may apply to the superintendent of public instruction for
reimbursement of a portion of the tuition expense for the course if the
classified instructional staff member took the course in order to become
certified to teach in Washington public schools. A classified instructional
staff member may apply for tuition assistance under this chapter only for
courses that are necessary for and applicable to academic credits needed to
qualify for a teaching certificate in Washington.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall pay classified instructional
staff who submit a valid application for tuition assistance a reimbursement for
the cost of tuition for any course from a regionally accredited institution of
higher education that is applicable toward academic credits needed to qualify
for a teaching certificate in Washington public schools. The maximum amount of
the tuition assistance is the average cost of tuition at public baccalaureate
institutions in the state of Washington.

(3)
A valid application for tuition assistance for classified instructional staff
must include, but is not limited to:

(a)
Documentation concerning the specific course taken, and a description of how
the course is applicable toward requirements that must be met in order to
receive a teaching certificate in Washington;

(b)
College and university grade sheets or transcripts that indicate completion of
courses; or if the course was structured in a pass/fail format, whether the
applicant received a passing grade;

(c)
A signed statement indicating the applicant understands and agrees that any
intentional misrepresentation of a material fact on the application subjects
the applicant to:

(i)
Future revocation of his or her certificate if a certificate is granted; and

(ii)
An order that may be issued by the superintendent to repay the superintendent
any tuition assistance previously provided, with interest.

(4)
If a classified instructional staff member who receives tuition assistance
under this chapter is granted a teaching certificate and does not teach in the
common school system of Washington for at least two years within five years of
being granted the certificate, the superintendent may seek repayment, with
interest, of the full amount of tuition assistance provided, if the
superintendent deems repayment is appropriate under the circumstances of a
particular case.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. To be
eligible to receive tuition assistance under this chapter, an applicant must
receive a grade of "B" or better or, in the case of a course
structured in a pass-fail format, a grade of "pass."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a form which applicants
may submit to seek tuition assistance under this chapter. The form must be
integrated to the extent possible with verification forms already developed by
the superintendent to implement existing requirements that certificate holders
report how they have complied with continuing education requirements.

(2)
The superintendent shall provide tuition assistance payments to qualified
applicants within ninety days of the receipt of a complete and valid
application, subject to the availability of funds appropriated by the
legislature for implementation of this program.

(3)
The superintendent may require applicants to retain records of their
application for tuition assistance and any payments received under this
chapter. If the superintendent deems that applicants must retain records relevant
to the tuition assistance program, the superintendent shall provide timely
notification to applicants of such requirements. The superintendent shall
maintain records and retain documents related to the tuition assistance program
established by this chapter in such a manner that the program may be audited.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---