BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)(a)
"Unused property market" means an event, for which the resale of new,
unused, and used personal property is the primary purpose of the event, at which
two or more persons offer tangible personal property for sale or exchange and
(i) at which a fee is charged by the event sponsor for sale or exchange of
personal property, or (ii) at which a fee is charged to prospective buyers for
admission to the area in which personal property is offered or displayed for
sale or exchange.

(b)
The term unused property market does not include:

(i)
An event that is organized for the exclusive benefit of a community chest,
fund, foundation, association, or corporation organized and operated for
religious, educational, or charitable purposes, so long as no part of an
admission fee or parking fee charged vendors or prospective purchasers or the
gross receipts or net earnings from the sale or exchange of personal property,
whether in the form of a percentage of the receipts or earnings, as salary, or
otherwise, inures to the benefit of a private shareholder or person
participating in the organization or conduct of the event; or

(ii)
An event at which all of the personal property offered for sale or displayed is
new, and all persons selling, exchanging, or offering or displaying personal
property for sale or exchange are manufacturers or authorized representatives
of manufacturers or distributors.

(2)
"Unused property merchant" means a person, other than a vendor or
merchant with an established retail store in the county, who transports an
inventory of goods to a building, vacant lot, or other unused property market
location and who, at that location, displays new and unused goods for sale
where at least five new or unused items are identical and sells the goods at
retail or offers the goods for sale at retail where the total inventory of new
or unused goods offered for sale by the merchant at the event exceeds five
hundred dollars in retail value.

(3)
"New and unused property" means tangible personal property that was
acquired by the unused property merchant directly from the producer,
manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer in the ordinary course of business that
has never been used since its production or manufacturing or that is in its
original and unopened package or container, if the personal property was so
packaged when originally produced or manufactured.

(4)
"Baby food" or "infant formula" means food manufactured,
packaged, and labeled specifically for sale for consumption by a child under
the age of two years.

(5)
"Nonprescription drug," which may also be referred to as an
"over the counter drug," means a nonnarcotic medicine or drug that
may be sold without a prescription and is prepackaged for use by the consumer,
prepared by the manufacturer or producer for use by the consumer, properly
labeled and unadulterated in accordance with the requirements of the state food
and drug laws and the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. The term
"nonprescription drug" does not include herbal products, dietary
supplements, botanical extracts, or vitamins.

(6)
"Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine,
contrivance, implant, in vitro reagent, tool, or other similar or related
article, including a component part or accessory, required under federal law to
bear the label "Caution: Federal law requires dispensing by or on the
order of a physician"; or that is defined by federal law as a medical
device and that is intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other
conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in
man or other animals or is intended to affect the structure or a function of
the body of man or other animals, that does not achieve any of its principal
intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body of man or other
animals, and that is not dependent upon being metabolized for achievement of
any of its principal intended purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. An
unused property merchant may not offer at an unused property market for sale or
knowingly permit the sale of baby food, infant formula, cosmetics or personal
care products, or any nonprescription drug or medical device. This section
does not apply to a person who keeps available for public inspection a written
authorization identifying that person as an authorized representative of the
manufacturer or distributor of such a product, as long as the authorization is
not false, fraudulent, or fraudulently obtained.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
An unused property merchant shall maintain receipts for the purchase of new and
unused property at a location accessible to law enforcement officials.
Receipts must contain all of the following information or the information must
be discernible when used in conjunction with other readily accessible
information:

(a)
Date of the transaction;

(b)
Name and address of the person, corporation, or entity from whom the new and
unused property was acquired;

(c)
An identification and description of the new and unused property acquired;

(d)
The price paid for the new and unused property.

(2)
It is a violation of this chapter for an unused property merchant required to
maintain receipts under this section to knowingly:

(a)
Falsify, obliterate, or destroy the receipts;

(b)
Refuse or fail upon request to make the receipts available for inspection
within a period of time that is reasonable under the individual circumstances
surrounding the request; however, nothing contained in this subsection requires
the unused property merchant to possess the receipt on or about his or her
person without reasonable notice; or

(c)
Fail to maintain the receipts required by this section for at least two years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
chapter does not apply to:

(1)
The sale of a motor vehicle or trailer that is required to be registered or is
subject to the certificate of ownership laws of this state;

(2)
The sale of wood for fuel, ice, or livestock;

(3)
Business conducted at an industry or association trade show;

(4)
Property, although never used, whose style, packaging, or material clearly
indicates that the property was not produced or manufactured within recent
times;

(5)
Anyone who sells by sample, catalog, or brochure for future delivery;

(6)
The sale of arts or crafts by the person who produced the arts or crafts;

(7)
Persons who make sales presentations under a prior, individualized invitation
issued to the consumer by the owner or legal occupant of the premises; and

(8)
The sale of firearms as defined under RCW 9.41.010 or business conducted at a
gun show.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The first violation of this chapter is a misdemeanor.

(2)
A second violation of this chapter is a gross misdemeanor.

(3)
A third or subsequent violation of this chapter is a class C felony.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---