BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of food products for
human consumption.

"Food
products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine, meat and meat
products including livestock sold for personal consumption, fish and fish
products, eggs and egg products, vegetables and vegetable products, fruit and
fruit products, spices and salt, sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee
substitutes, tea, cocoa and cocoa products.

"Food
products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted milks, and
any other similar type beverages which are composed at least in part of milk or
a milk product and which require the use of milk or a milk product in their preparation.

"Food
products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and other beverages
except bottled water in containers of one gallon or less, spirituous,
malt or vinous liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.

"Food
products" do not include medicines and preparations in liquid, powdered,
granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form sold as dietary supplements
or adjuncts.

(2)
The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1) of
this section shall not apply: (a) When the food products are ordinarily sold
for immediate consumption on or near a location at which parking facilities are
provided primarily for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased
at the location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or
"to go" order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the
premises of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for
consumption within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission charge,
except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food product,
when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the vendor's
premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit under RCW
69.06.010, including but not be limited to sandwiches prepared or chicken
cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and salad
bars but excluding:

(i)
Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including fish and fowl, or
dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish mongers, butchers, or meat
wrappers;

(ii)
Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity determined by the buyer,
sold by vendors such as meat markets, delicatessens, and grocery stores;

(iii)
Bakeries which only sell baked goods;

(iv)
Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the department, to the
extent that sales of baked goods are separately accounted for and the baked
goods claimed for exemption are not sold as part of meals or with beverages in
unsealed containers; or

(v)
Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not limited to
flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, candy, chips, and cocoa.

(3)
Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of
"food products" provided in this section shall apply to food products
which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a)
Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in
the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6); or

(b)
Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or low-income persons
by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

(4)
Subsection (1) of this section notwithstanding, the retail sale of food
products is subject to sales tax under RCW 82.08.020 if the food products are
sold through a vending machine, and in this case the selling price for purposes
of RCW 82.08.020 is fifty-seven percent of the gross receipts.

This
subsection does not apply to hot prepared food products, other than food
products which are heated after they have been dispensed from the vending
machine.

For
tax collected under this subsection, the requirements that the tax be collected
from the buyer and that the amount of tax be stated as a separate item are
waived.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.12.0293 and 1988 c 103 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of food
products for human consumption.

"Food
products" include cereals and cereal products, oleomargarine, meat and
meat products including livestock sold for personal consumption, fish and fish
products, eggs and egg products, vegetables and vegetable products, fruit and
fruit products, spices and salt, sugar and sugar products, coffee and coffee
substitutes, tea, cocoa and cocoa products.

"Food
products" include milk and milk products, milk shakes, malted milks, and
any other similar type beverages which are composed at least in part of milk or
a milk product and which require the use of milk or a milk product in their
preparation.

"Food
products" include all fruit juices, vegetable juices, and other beverages
except bottled water in containers of one gallon or less, spirituous,
malt or vinous liquors or carbonated beverages, whether liquid or frozen.

"Food
products" do not include medicines and preparations in liquid, powdered,
granular, tablet, capsule, lozenge, and pill form sold as dietary supplements
or adjuncts.

(2)
The exemption of "food products" provided for in subsection (1) of
this section shall not apply: (a) When the food products are ordinarily sold
for immediate consumption on or near a location at which parking facilities are
provided primarily for the use of patrons in consuming the products purchased
at the location, even though such products are sold on a "takeout" or
"to go" order and are actually packaged or wrapped and taken from the
premises of the retailer, or (b) when the food products are sold for
consumption within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission
charge, except for national and state parks and monuments, or (c) to a food
product, when sold by the retail vendor, which by law must be handled on the
vendor's premises by a person with a food and beverage service worker's permit
under RCW 69.06.010, including but not be limited to sandwiches prepared or
chicken cooked on the premises, deli trays, home-delivered pizzas or meals, and
salad bars but excluding:

(i)
Raw meat prepared by persons who slaughter animals, including fish and fowl, or
dress or wrap slaughtered raw meat such as fish mongers, butchers, or meat
wrappers;

(ii)
Meat and cheese sliced and/or wrapped, in any quantity determined by the buyer,
sold by vendors such as meat markets, delicatessens, and grocery stores;

(iii)
Bakeries which only sell baked goods;

(iv)
Combination bakery businesses, as prescribed by rule of the department, to the
extent that sales of baked goods are separately accounted for and the baked
goods claimed for exemption are not sold as part of meals or with beverages in
unsealed containers; or

(v)
Bulk food products sold from bins or barrels, including but not limited to
flour, fruits, vegetables, sugar, salt, candy, chips, and cocoa.

(3)
Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the exemption of
"food products" provided in this section shall apply to food products
which are furnished, prepared, or served as meals:

(a)
Under a state administered nutrition program for the aged as provided for in
the Older Americans Act (P.L. 95-478 Title III) and RCW 74.38.040(6); or

(b)
Which are provided to senior citizens, disabled persons, or low-income persons
by a not-for-profit organization organized under chapter 24.03 or 24.12 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---