BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.82.160 and 1988 c 202 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superior court of the county in which the officer subject to recall resides
has original jurisdiction to compel the performance of any act required of any
public officer or to prevent the performance by any such officer of any act in
relation to the recall not in compliance with law.

(2)
The supreme court has like original jurisdiction in relation to state officers
and revisory jurisdiction over the decisions of the superior courts. Any
proceeding to compel or prevent the performance of any such act shall be begun
within ten days from the time the cause of complaint arises, and shall be
considered an emergency matter of public concern and take precedence over other
cases, and be speedily heard and determined. Appellate review of a decision of
any superior court shall be begun and perfected within fifteen days after its
decision in a recall election case and shall be considered an emergency matter
of public concern by the supreme court, and heard and determined within thirty
days after the decision of the superior court.

(3) To the extent this section conflicts with the provisions of
RAP 2.1(b), RAP 16.2, and RAP 18.22, this section shall supersede the
conflicting rules on and after the effective date of this act.

---
END ---