BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 59.20 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter
are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying
the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is
not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and
is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

---
END ---