BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that counties are regional governments within their
boundaries, and cities are primary providers of urban governmental services
within urban growth areas. For the purposes of this section, a
"county-wide planning policy" is a written policy statement or
statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which
county and city comprehensive plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this
chapter. This framework shall ensure that city and county comprehensive plans
are consistent as required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to alter the land-use powers of cities.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in
whole or in part within the county as follows:

(a)
No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority
of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with representatives of each city located
within the county for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that
will provide a framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In
other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county
adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial
management.

(b)
The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide planning policy
specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner in which the
county and the cities agree to all procedures and provisions including but not
limited to desired planning policies, deadlines, ratification of final
agreements and demonstration thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities
associated therewith.

(c)
If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of
cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately
impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d)
If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no
agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management
in any other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or
reasons for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it
appropriate, the governor may immediately request the assistance of the
department of community, trade, and economic development to mediate any
disputes that preclude agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving
all disputes that will lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate
sanctions from those specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or
cities for failure to reach an agreement as provided in this section. The governor
shall specify the reason or reasons for the imposition of any sanction.

(e)
No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later
than fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management the county
legislative authority of any other county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to
the process provided under this section and that is consistent with the
agreement pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public
hearing or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.

(3)
A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a)
Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of
urban services to such development;

(c)
Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide or state-wide
nature, including transportation facilities of state-wide significance as
defined in RCW 47.06.140;

(d)
Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e)
Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all
economic segments of the population and parameters for its distribution;

(f)
Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth areas,
including policies to encourage agreements on allowed land uses between cities
and the portions of unincorporated urban growth areas that are contiguous or in
close proximity to cities;

(g)
Policies for county-wide economic development and employment; and

(h)
An analysis of the fiscal impact.

(4)
Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the
county-wide planning policy adoption process. Adopted county-wide planning
policies shall be adhered to by state agencies.

(5)
Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the requirements of
this section may result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a
county or city within the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing
a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to
adopt a county-wide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or
sanctions are fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a
county-wide planning policy.

(6)
Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide planning policy to
the growth management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the
county-wide planning policy.

(7)
Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each
with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban
areas and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process established
under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties and cities
within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

No
local government operating or maintaining a public water system may condition
water service to any property outside its jurisdictional limits but within its
service area on any of the following:

(1)
The present or future execution of any annexation petition for the property to
be served;

(2)
Support for or acquiescence to any annexation proposal for the property to be
served; or

(3)
Compliance with the local government's land use regulations if the current or
proposed use of the property to be served complies with the land use
regulations of the local government in which the property is located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 35.92 RCW to read as follows:

No
local government operating or maintaining a public water system may condition
water service to any property outside its jurisdictional limits but within its
service area on any of the following:

(1)
The present or future execution of any annexation petition for the property to
be served;

(2)
Support for or acquiescence to any annexation proposal for the property to be
served; or

(3)
Compliance with the local government's land use regulations if the current or
proposed use of the property to be served complies with the land use
regulations of the local government in which the property is located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 70.116 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No local government operating or maintaining a public water system may
condition water service to any property outside its jurisdictional limits but
within its service area on any of the following:

(a)
The present or future execution of any annexation petition for the property to
be served;

(b)
Support for or acquiescence to any annexation proposal for the property to be
served; or

(c)
Compliance with the local government's land use regulations if the current or
proposed use of the property to be served complies with the land use
regulations of the local government in which the property is located.

(2) A local government shall identify in its coordinated water
system plan any conditions imposed on water service to any property outside its
jurisdictional limits but within its service area.

---
END ---