BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
72.09.190 and 1981 c 136 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature that reasonable legal services be provided
to persons committed to the custody of the department of corrections. Except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the department shall
contract with persons or organizations to provide legal services. The
secretary shall adopt procedures designed to minimize any conflict of interest,
or appearance thereof, in respect to the provision of legal services and the
department's administration of such contracts.

(2)
Persons who contract to provide legal services are expressly forbidden to
solicit plaintiffs or promote litigation which has not been pursued initially
by a person entitled to such services under this section.

(3)
Persons who contract to provide legal services shall exhaust all informal means
of resolving a legal complaint or dispute prior to the filing of any court
proceeding.

(4)
Nothing in this section forbids the secretary to supplement contracted legal
services with any of the following: (a) Law libraries, (b) law student
interns, and (c) volunteer attorneys.

(5)
The secretary may not contract with attorneys to provide legal services at a
correctional facility if any of the services specified in subsection (4) of
this section are available at that facility.

(6) The total due a contractor as compensation, fees, or
reimbursement under the terms of the contract shall be reduced by the total of
any other compensation, fees, or reimbursement received by or due the
contractor for the performance of any legal service to inmates during the
contract period. Any amount received by a contractor under contract which is
not due under this section shall be immediately returned by the contractor.

---
END ---