BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
72.01.370 and 1992 c 7 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of any state correctional facility may, subject to the approval
of the secretary and under RCW 72.01.375, grant escorted leaves of absence to
inmates confined in such institutions to:

(1)
Go to the bedside of the inmate's wife, husband, child, mother or father, or
other member of the inmate's immediate family who is seriously ill;

(2)
Attend the funeral of a member of the inmate's immediate family listed in
subsection (1) of this section;

(3)
Participate in ((athletic contests)) prerelease planning;

(4)
Perform work in connection with the industrial, educational, or agricultural
programs of the department;

(5)
Receive necessary medical or dental care which is not available in the
institution; and

(6) Participate as a volunteer in community service work projects
which are approved by the superintendent, but only inmates who are nonviolent
offenders may participate in these projects. Such community service work
projects shall only be instigated at the request of a local community.

---
END ---