BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79A.05.255 and 1994 c 264 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created a winter recreation advisory committee to advise the parks and
recreation commission in the administration of this chapter and to assist and
advise the commission in the development of winter recreation facilities and
programs.

(2)
The committee shall consist of:

(a)
Six representatives of the nonsnowmobiling winter recreation public appointed
by the commission, including a resident of each of the six geographical areas
of this state where nonsnowmobiling winter recreation activity occurs, as
defined by the commission.

(b)
Three representatives of the snowmobiling public appointed by the commission.

(c)
One representative of the department of natural resources, one representative
of the department of fish and wildlife, and one representative of the
Washington state association of counties, each of whom shall be appointed by
the director of the particular department or association.

(3)
The terms of the members appointed under subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this
section shall begin on October 1st of the year of appointment and shall be for
three years or until a successor is appointed, except in the case of
appointments to fill vacancies for the remainder of the unexpired term:
PROVIDED, That the first of these members shall be appointed for terms as
follows: Three members shall be appointed for one year, three members shall be
appointed for two years, and three members shall be appointed for three years.

(4)
Members of the committee shall be reimbursed from the winter recreational
program account created by RCW ((43.51.310)) 79A.05.235 for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
The committee shall meet at times and places it determines not less than twice
each year and additionally as required by the committee ((chairman)) chair
or by majority vote of the committee. The ((chairman)) chair of the
committee shall be chosen under procedures adopted by the committee. The
committee shall adopt any other procedures necessary to govern its proceedings.

(6)
The director of parks and recreation or the director's designee shall serve as
secretary to the committee and shall be a nonvoting member.

(((7) The winter recreation advisory committee and its powers
and duties shall terminate on June 30, 2001.))

---
END ---