BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.56.100 and 1997 c 358 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When any judgment for the payment of money only shall have been paid or
satisfied, the judgment creditor shall file with the clerk of the court in
which the judgment was rendered an acknowledgment of satisfaction if payment
was made to a person other than the clerk. The clerk of the court in which
such judgment was rendered shall note upon the record in the execution docket
satisfaction thereof giving the date of such satisfaction upon either the
payment to such clerk of the amount of such judgment, costs and interest and
any accrued costs by reason of the issuance of any execution, or the filing
with such clerk of a satisfaction entitled in such action and identifying the
same executed by the judgment creditor or his or her attorney of record in such
action or his or her assignee acknowledged as deeds are acknowledged. The
clerk has the authority to note the satisfaction of judgments for criminal and
juvenile legal financial obligations when the clerk's record indicates payment
in full or as directed by the court. Every satisfaction of judgment and every
partial satisfaction of judgment which provides for the payment of money shall
clearly designate the judgment creditor and his or her attorney if any, the
judgment debtor, the amount or type of satisfaction, whether the satisfaction
is full or partial, the cause number, and the date of entry of the judgment. A
certificate by such clerk of the entry of such satisfaction by him or her may
be filed in the office of the clerk of any county in which an abstract of such
judgment has been filed. When so satisfied by the clerk or the filing of such
certificate the lien of such judgment shall be discharged.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall file a satisfaction of
judgment for welfare fraud conviction if a person does not pay money through
the clerk as ((required)) allowed under subsection (1) of this
section.

(3)
The department of corrections shall file a satisfaction of judgment if a person
does not pay money through the clerk's office as ((required)) allowed
under subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
If the judgment creditor fails to file an acknowledgment of satisfaction of the
judgment with the court as required under subsection (1) of this section within
sixty days of receiving payment when the judgment debtor pays the judgment
creditor rather than the court, the judgment creditor shall be liable:

(a)
For an amount equal to interest on the amount of such judgment computed at
twelve percent per year from the sixty-first day after the payment of the
judgment by the judgment debtor until the judgment creditor acknowledges the
satisfaction with the court as required under subsection (1) of this section;
and

(b) For actual damages or two hundred fifty dollars, whichever
is greater, and any costs and attorneys' fees associated with actions taken by
the judgment debtor to get the satisfaction properly acknowledged by the court
under subsection (1) of this section.

---
END ---