BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. In
accordance with this act, it is the intent of the legislature to require water
purveyors, public utility districts, counties, and cities and towns that
monitor surface waters to provide notification to area residents through
postings of water bodies when monitoring of water quality shows these water
bodies to exceed the state's criteria for primary contact recreation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.119A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a purveyor monitors the quality of the untreated surface waters within
its service area boundaries, the purveyor shall determine whether the water
exceeds the criteria established by the department of ecology for primary
contact recreation as defined in WAC 173-201A-020 as it exists on the effective
date of this act. If the water exceeds these criteria, the purveyor shall
notify the local health jurisdiction.

(2)
The purveyor, in cooperation with the local health jurisdiction, shall develop
and provide a notice for customers of the water system pertaining to the water
quality of source waters used by the purveyor. Such notice shall contain a
brief summary of the representative water quality in the water sources used by
the purveyor and shall also describe any exceedances of criteria established by
the department of ecology for primary contact recreation as defined in WAC
173-201A-020 discovered in the course of routine water quality monitoring.
Such notices shall be provided in mailings to customers on a semiannual basis.
In addition to this information, the purveyor shall provide and keep current,
to the extent practicable, water quality information through internet web
sites, public service announcements, or other news media releases.

(3)
This section applies only to water samples taken in the months of April through
September, inclusive. Nothing in this section may be construed to impose new
or additional liability on purveyors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a public utility district monitors the quality of the untreated
surface waters within its service area boundaries, the district shall determine
whether the water exceeds the criteria established by the department of ecology
for primary contact recreation as defined in WAC 173-201A-020 as it exists on
the effective date of this act. If the water exceeds these criteria, the
public utility district shall notify the local health jurisdiction.

(2)
The district, in cooperation with the local health jurisdiction, shall develop
and provide a notice for customers of the district pertaining to the water
quality of source waters used by the district. Such notice shall contain a
brief summary of the representative water quality in the water sources used by
the district and shall also describe any exceedances of criteria established by
the department of ecology for primary contact recreation as defined in WAC
173-201A-020 discovered in the course of routine water quality monitoring.
Such notices shall be provided in mailings to customers on a semiannual basis.
In addition to this information, the district shall provide and keep current,
to the extent practicable, water quality information through internet web sites,
public service announcements, or other news media releases.

(3)
This section applies only to water samples taken in the months of April through
September, inclusive. Nothing in this section may be construed to impose new
or additional liability on public utility districts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 35.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a city or town monitors the quality of the untreated surface waters
within its boundaries, the city or town shall determine whether the water
exceeds the criteria established by the department of ecology for primary
contact recreation as defined in WAC 173-201A-020 as it exists on the effective
date of this act. If the water exceeds these criteria, the city or town shall
notify the local health jurisdiction.

(2)
The city or town, in cooperation with the local health jurisdiction, shall
develop and provide a notice for customers of the city or town pertaining to
the water quality of source waters used by the city or town. Such notice shall
contain a brief summary of the representative water quality in the water
sources used by the city or town and shall also describe any exceedances of
criteria established by the department of ecology for primary contact recreation
as defined in WAC 173-201A-020 discovered in the course of routine water
quality monitoring. Such notices shall be provided in mailings to water
utility customers on a semiannual basis. In addition to this information, the
city or town shall provide and keep current, to the extent practicable, water
quality information through internet web sites, public service announcements,
or other news media releases.

(3)
This section applies only to water samples taken in the months of April through
September, inclusive. Nothing in this section may be construed to impose new
or additional liability on cities and towns.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 36.94 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a county monitors the quality of the untreated surface waters within
its boundaries, the county shall determine whether the water exceeds the
criteria established by the department of ecology for primary contact
recreation as defined in WAC 173-201A-020 as it exists on the effective date of
this act. If the water exceeds these criteria, the county shall notify the
local health jurisdiction.

(2)
The county, in cooperation with the local health jurisdiction, shall develop
and provide a notice for customers of the county pertaining to the water
quality of source waters used by the county. Such notice shall contain a brief
summary of the representative water quality in the water sources used by the
county and shall also describe any exceedances of criteria established by the
department of ecology for primary contact recreation as defined in WAC
173-201A-020 discovered in the course of routine water quality monitoring.
Such notices shall be provided in mailings to water utility customers on a
semiannual basis. In addition to this information, the county shall provide
and keep current, to the extent practicable, water quality information through
internet web sites, public service announcements, or other news media releases.

(3)
This section applies only to water samples taken in the months of April through
September, inclusive. Nothing in this section may be construed to impose new
or additional liability on cities and towns.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 70.05 RCW to read as follows:

After a local health district has been advised of exceedances of
water quality criteria for primary contact recreation by a water purveyor,
public utility district, city or town, or county, the district shall ensure
that publicly accessible points of entry to the water body that fail to meet
the criteria are posted with durable signs along the water body warning the
public of water contamination and advising the public not to enter or ingest
the water. Information content for the signs shall be developed by local
health districts, in conjunction with cities and towns, counties, water
purveyors, and public utility districts. Health districts shall use the
methods developed by the department of health under WAC 246-280-080 to advise
the public in the vicinity of the contaminated water not to enter or ingest the
water. Warning signs shall remain in place until the causes of the
contamination have been addressed and the water bodies are in attainment with
water quality criteria for primary contact recreation for a period of at least
two years.

---
END ---