BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.106.010 and 1997 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and
phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meaning:

(1)
"Advisory board" means the state advisory board of plumbers;

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries;

(3)
"Director" means the director of department of labor and industries;

(4)
"Fuel gas piping" means the craft involved in installing,
altering, and repairing natural gas, manufactured gas, liquefied petroleum, or
a mixture of these gas piping systems. "Fuel gas piping" is not
restricted to activities occurring only within a building;

(5)
"Journeyman fuel gas fitter" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency by the department as a journeyman fuel gas fitter;

(6)
"Journeyman pipefitter" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency as a journeyman pipefitter by the department;

(7)
"Journeyman plumber" means any person who has been issued a
certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber by the department of
labor and industries as provided in this chapter;

(((5)))
(8) "Medical gas piping" means oxygen, nitrous oxide, high
pressure nitrogen, medical compressed air, and medical vacuum systems;

(((6)))
(9) "Medical gas piping installer" means a journeyman plumber
who has been issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement;

(((7)))
(10) "Pipefitting" means the craft involved in installing,
altering, repairing, and renovating all hydronic heating, steam piping systems,
and fuel gas piping systems. "Pipefitting" is not restricted to
activities occurring only within a building;

(11)
"Plumbing" means that craft involved in installing, altering,
repairing and renovating potable water systems, liquid waste systems, and
medical gas piping systems within a building. The installation, repair, or
alteration of fuel gas piping systems is not restricted to activities occurring
only within a building. Installation in a water system of water softening
or water treatment equipment is not within the meaning of plumbing as used in
this chapter;

(((8)))
(12) "Specialty plumber" means anyone who has been issued a
specialty certificate of competency limited to installation, maintenance, and
repair of the plumbing or pipefitting of single-family dwellings,
duplexes, and apartment buildings that do not exceed three stories.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.106.020 and 1997 c 326 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may engage in or offer to engage in the trade of plumbing without
having a journeyman plumbing certificate, specialty certificate,
temporary permit, or trainee certificate. A trainee must be supervised by a
person who has a journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, or temporary
permit, as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No contractor may employ a person to
engage in or offer to engage in the trade of plumbing unless the person
employed has a journeyman certificate, specialty certificate, temporary permit,
or trainee certificate. For the purposes of this section,
"contractor" means any person or body of persons, corporate or
otherwise, engaged in any work covered by the provisions of this chapter,
chapter 18.27 RCW, or chapter 19.28 RCW, by way of trade or business. However,
in no case shall this section apply to a contractor who is contracting for work
on his or her own residence.

(2)
No person may engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping installation
without having a certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber and a
medical gas piping installer endorsement. A trainee may engage in medical gas
piping installation if he or she has a training certificate and is supervised
by a person with a medical gas piping installer endorsement. No contractor may
employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in medical gas piping
installation unless the person employed has a certificate of competency as a
journeyman plumber and a medical gas piping installer endorsement.

(3)
No person may engage in or offer to engage in the trade of pipefitting
without having a certificate of competency as a journeyman pipefitter. A
trainee may engage in pipefitting if he or she is supervised as specified in
RCW 18.106.070. No contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to
engage in the trade of pipefitting unless the person employed has a certificate
of competency as a journeyman pipefitter.

(4)
No person may engage in or offer to engage in fuel gas fitting without having a
certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber, specialty plumber,
journeyman pipefitter, or journeyman fuel gas fitter. A trainee may engage in
fuel gas fitting if he or she is supervised as specified in RCW 18.106.070. No
contractor may employ a person to engage in or offer to engage in fuel gas
fitting unless the person employed has a certificate of competency as a
journeyman plumber, specialty plumber, journeyman pipefitter, or journeyman
fuel gas fitter.

(5)
Violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of
this section is an infraction. Each day in which a person engages in the trade
of plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas piping, in violation of subsection
(1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of this section or employs a
person in violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4)
of this section is a separate infraction. Each worksite at which a person
engages in the trade of plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas piping, in
violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of
this section or at which a person is employed in violation of subsection (1) ((or)),
(2), (3), or (4) of this section is a separate infraction.

(((4)))
(6) Notices of infractions for violations of subsection (1) ((or)),
(2), (3), or (4) of this section may be issued to:

(a)
The person engaging in or offering to engage in the trade of plumbing in
violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or (4) of
this section;

(b)
The contractor in violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2),
(3), or (4) of this section; and

(c)
The contractor's employee who authorized the work assignment of the person
employed in violation of subsection (1) ((or)), (2), (3), or
(4) of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.106.030 and 1997 c 326 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as provided in this
chapter shall deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming
that ((said)) the person has had sufficient experience in as well
as demonstrated general competency in the trade of plumbing or specialty
plumbing so as to qualify him or her to make an application for a
certificate of competency as a journeyman plumber or specialty plumber.
Completion of a course of study in the plumbing trade in the armed services of
the United States or at a school accredited by the work force training and
education coordinating board shall constitute sufficient evidence of experience
and competency to enable such person to make application for a certificate of
competency.

Any
person desiring to be issued a medical gas piping installer endorsement shall
deliver evidence in a form prescribed by the department affirming that the
person has met the requirements established by the department for a medical gas
piping installer endorsement.

Any
person desiring to be issued a certificate of competency as a journeyman
pipefitter or as a journeyman fuel gas fitter shall deliver evidence in a form
prescribed by the department affirming that the person has met the requirements
established by the department for a certificate of competency as a journeyman
pipefitter or as a journeyman fuel gas fitter.

In
addition to supplying the evidence as prescribed in this section, each
applicant for a certificate of competency shall submit an application for such
certificate on such form and in such manner as shall be prescribed by the
director of the department.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.106.050 and 1997 c 326 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department, with the advice of the advisory board, shall prepare a written
examination to be administered to applicants for certificates of competency for
journeyman plumber ((and)), specialty plumber, journeyman
pipefitter, and journeyman fuel gas fitter. The examination shall be
constructed to determine:

(a)
Whether the applicant possesses varied general knowledge of the technical
information and practical procedures that are identified with the trade of
journeyman plumber ((or)), specialty plumber, journeyman
pipefitter, or journeyman fuel gas fitter; and

(b)
Whether the applicant is familiar with the applicable ((plumbing)) codes
and the administrative rules of the department pertaining to ((plumbing and))
plumbers, pipefitters, and fuel gas fitters.

The
department shall administer the examination to eligible persons. All
applicants shall, before taking the examination, pay to the department a fee.

(2)
For purposes of the medical gas piping installer endorsement, the department
may enter into a contract with a nationally recognized testing agency to
develop, administer, and score medical gas piping installer examinations. All
applicants shall, before taking an examination for a medical gas piping
installer endorsement, pay the required examination fee. The department shall
set the examination fee by contract with a nationally recognized testing
agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and
administering the examination and the materials necessary to conduct the
practical elements of the examination. The department shall approve training
courses and set the fees for training courses for the medical gas piping
installer endorsement.

The
department shall certify the results of the examination, and shall notify the
applicant in writing whether he or she has passed or failed. Any applicant who
has failed the examination may retake the examination, upon the terms and after
a period of time that the director shall set by rule. The director may not
limit the number of times that a person may take the examination.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.106.070 and 1997 c 326 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall issue a certificate of competency to all applicants who
have passed the examination and have paid the fee for the certificate. The
certificate shall bear the date of issuance, and shall expire on the birthdate
of the holder immediately following the date of issuance. The certificate
shall be renewable every other year, upon application, on or before the
birthdate of the holder. A renewal fee shall be assessed for each
certificate. If a person fails to renew the certificate by the renewal date,
he or she must pay a doubled fee. If the person does not renew the certificate
within ninety days of the renewal date, he or she must retake the examination
and pay the examination fee.

The
journeyman plumber ((and)), specialty plumber, journeyman
pipefitter, and journeyman fuel gas fitter certificates of competency, the
medical gas piping installer endorsement, and the temporary permits
provided for in this chapter grant the holder the right to engage in the work
of plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting, as a journeyman plumber,
specialty plumber, journeyman pipefitter, journeyman fuel gas fitter, or
medical gas piping installer, in accordance with their provisions throughout
the state and within any of its political subdivisions on any job or any
employment without additional proof of competency or any other license or
permit or fee to engage in the work. This section does not preclude employees
from adhering to a union security clause in any employment where such a
requirement exists.

(2)
A person who is indentured in an apprenticeship program approved under chapter
49.04 RCW for the plumbing ((construction)), pipefitting, or fuel gas
fitting trade or who is learning the plumbing ((construction)),
pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting trade may work in the plumbing ((construction)),
pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting trade if supervised by ((a)) an
appropriate certified journeyman plumber, journeyman pipefitter,
journeyman fuel gas fitter, or ((a)) certified specialty plumber in
that plumber's specialty. All apprentices and individuals learning the
plumbing ((construction)) trade shall obtain a plumbing training
certificate from the department. The certificate shall authorize the holder to
learn the plumbing ((construction)) trade while under the direct
supervision of a journeyman plumber or a specialty plumber working in his or
her specialty. All apprentices and individuals learning the pipefitting
trade shall obtain a pipefitting training certificate from the department. The
certificate shall authorize the holder to learn the pipefitting trade while
under the direct supervision of a journeyman pipefitter. All apprentices and
individuals learning the fuel gas fitting trade shall obtain a fuel gas fitter
installation training certificate from the department. The certificate shall
authorize the holder to learn the fuel gas fitting trade while under the direct
supervision of a journeyman fuel gas fitter, journeyman pipefitter, or
journeyman plumber. The holder of the ((plumbing)) training
certificate shall renew the certificate annually. At the time of renewal, the
holder shall provide the department with an accurate list of the holder's
employers in the ((plumbing construction)) industry for the previous
year and the number of hours worked for each employer. An annual fee shall be
charged for the issuance or renewal of the certificate. The department shall
set the fee by rule. The fee shall cover but not exceed the cost of
administering and enforcing the trainee certification and supervision
requirements of this chapter. Apprentices and individuals learning the
plumbing ((construction)), pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting trade
shall have their ((plumbing)) training certificates in their possession
at all times that they are performing plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas
fitting work. They shall show their certificates to an authorized
representative of the department at the representative's request.

(3)
Any person who has been issued a ((plumbing)) training certificate under
this chapter may work if that person is under supervision. Supervision shall
consist of a person being on the same job site and under the control of ((either
a)) an appropriate journeyman ((plumber)) or an appropriate
specialty plumber who has an applicable certificate of competency issued under
this chapter. ((Either a)) An appropriate journeyman ((plumber))
or an appropriate specialty plumber shall be on the same job site as the
noncertified individual for a minimum of seventy-five percent of each working
day unless otherwise provided in this chapter. The ratio of noncertified
individuals to certified journeymen or specialty plumbers working on a job site
shall be: (a) ((From July 28, 1985, through June 30, 1988, not more than
three noncertified plumbers working on any one job site for every certified
journeyman or specialty plumber; (b))) Effective July 1, 1988, not
more than two noncertified plumbers working on any one job site for every
certified specialty plumber or journeyman plumber working as a specialty plumber;
((and (c))) (b) effective July 1, 1988, not more than one
noncertified plumber working on any one job site for every certified journeyman
plumber working as a journeyman plumber; and (c) effective the effective
date of this section, not more than one noncertified pipefitter for every
journeyman pipefitter, and not more than one noncertified fuel gas fitter for
each fuel gas fitter, journeyman pipefitter, or journeyman plumber.

An
individual who has a current training certificate and who has successfully
completed or is currently enrolled in an approved apprenticeship program or in
a technical school program in the plumbing ((construction)),
pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting trade in a school approved by the work
force training and education coordinating board, may work without direct
on-site supervision during the last six months of meeting the practical
experience requirements of this chapter.

(4)
An individual who has a current training certificate and who has successfully
completed or is currently enrolled in a medical gas piping installer training
course approved by the department may work on medical gas piping systems if the
individual is under the direct supervision of a certified medical gas piping
installer who holds a medical gas piping installer endorsement one hundred
percent of a working day on a one-to-one ratio.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.106.090 and 1985 c 7 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department is authorized to grant and issue temporary permits in lieu of
certificates of competency whenever: (a) A plumber coming into the
state of Washington from another state requests the department for a temporary
permit to engage in the trade of plumbing as a journeyman plumber or as a
specialty plumber; (b) a journeyman pipefitter coming into the state of
Washington from another state requests the department for a temporary permit to
engage in the trade of pipefitting as a journeyman pipefitter; or (c) a fuel
gas fitter coming into the state of Washington from another state requests the
department for a temporary permit to engage in fuel gas fitting, during the
period of time between filing of an application for a certificate as provided
in RCW 18.106.030 ((as now or hereafter amended)) and taking the
examination provided for in RCW 18.106.050((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2)
No temporary permit shall be issued to:

(((1)))
(a) Any person who has failed to pass the examination for a certificate
of competency;

(((2)))
(b) Any applicant under this section who has not furnished the
department with such evidence required under RCW 18.106.030;

(((3)))
(c) To any apprentice plumber or pipefitter.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.106.155 and 1977 ex.s. c 149 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director may, upon payment of the appropriate fees, grant a certificate of
competency without examination to any applicant who is a registered journeyman
plumber, journeyman pipefitter, journeyman fuel gas fitter, or specialty
plumber in any other state whose requirements for registration are at least
substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state, and which extends
the same privileges of reciprocity to journeymen plumbers, journeymen pipefitters,
journeyman fuel gas fitters, or specialty plumbers registered in this
state.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.106.170 and 1983 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

An
authorized representative of the department may investigate alleged or apparent
violations of this chapter. An authorized representative of the department
upon presentation of credentials may inspect sites at which a person is doing
plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting work for the purpose of
determining whether that person has ((a)) an appropriate
certificate or permit issued by the department in accordance with this chapter
or has an appropriate training certificate and is supervised by a person
who has such a certificate or permit. Upon request of the authorized
representative of the department, a person doing plumbing, pipefitting, or
fuel gas fitting work shall produce evidence that the person has ((a))
an appropriate certificate or permit issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter or has an appropriate training certificate and
is supervised by a person who has such a certificate or permit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. No
examination is required of an applicant for a certificate of competency as a
journeyman pipefitter or as a journeyman fuel gas fitter if the applicant was
engaged in a bona fide business or trade of pipefitting or fuel gas fitting and
has accumulated a minimum of ten thousand hours of experience as a pipefitter
or fuel gas fitter prior to July 1, 2001. Applicants qualifying under this
section shall be issued a certificate by the department of labor and industries
upon making an application as provided in RCW 18.106.030 and paying the fee
required under RCW 18.106.050.

This
section expires one year after the effective date of this act.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.106.180 and 1996 c 147 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

An
authorized representative of the department may issue a notice of infraction as
specified in RCW 18.106.020(((3))) (6) if a person who is doing
plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting work or who is offering to do
plumbing, pipefitting, or fuel gas fitting work fails to produce
evidence of having a certificate or permit issued by the department in
accordance with this chapter or of being supervised by a person who has such a
certificate or permit. A notice of infraction issued under this section shall
be personally served on the person named in the notice by an authorized
representative of the department or sent by certified mail to the last known
address provided to the department of the person named in the notice.

Sec.
11. RCW
18.106.250 and 1994 c 174 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The administrative law judge shall conduct notice of infraction cases under
this chapter pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2)
The burden of proof is on the department to establish the commission of the
infraction by a preponderance of the evidence. The notice of infraction shall
be dismissed if the defendant establishes that, at the time the notice was
issued:

(a)
The defendant who was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW
18.106.020(((3)(a))) (6)(a) had a certificate or permit issued by
the department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a person who
has such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this chapter under RCW
18.106.150; or

(b)
For the defendant who was issued a notice of infraction authorized by RCW
18.106.020(((3) (b) or (c))) (6) (b) or (c), the person employed
or supervised by the defendant has a certificate or permit issued by the
department in accordance with this chapter, was supervised by a person who had
such a certificate or permit, or was exempt from this chapter under RCW
18.106.150.

(3)
After consideration of the evidence and argument, the administrative law judge
shall determine whether the infraction was committed. If it has not been
established that the infraction was committed, an order dismissing the notice
shall be entered in the record of the proceedings. If it has been established
that the infraction was committed, the administrative law judge shall issue
findings of fact and conclusions of law in its decision and order determining
whether the infraction was committed.

(4) An appeal from the administrative law judge's determination or
order shall be to the superior court. The decision of the superior court is
subject only to discretionary review pursuant to Rule 2.3 of the Rules of
Appellate Procedure.

---
END ---