BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities
of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of a person to an office, for the purpose of assisting the
appointment of a person to a vacancy in an elective office, or for the
promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a
person with authority to direct, control, or influence the actions of the state
officer or state employee using public resources in violation of this section
constitutes a violation of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but
are not limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of
state employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the
agency.

(2)
This section shall not apply to the following activities:

(a)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition as long as (i) required notice of the meeting includes the title
and number of the ballot proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body
or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for
the expression of an opposing view;

(b)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry.
For the purposes of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for
an elected official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to
make incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual,
measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule
a definition of measurable expenditure;

(c)
Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency; and

(d)
De minimis use of public facilities by state-wide elected officials and
legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible
communications, including written and verbal communications initiated by them
of their views on ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that
falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities.

(3)
As to state officers and employees, this section operates to the exclusion of
RCW 42.17.130 and 42.17.190.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
elective official nor any employee of his or her office nor any person
appointed to or employed by any public office or agency may use or authorize
the use of any of the facilities of a public office or agency, directly or
indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign for election of any person
to any office, for the purpose of assisting the appointment of a person to a
vacancy in an elective office, or for the promotion of or opposition to any
ballot proposition. Facilities of public office or agency include, but are not
limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of
employees of the office or agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the office or agency, and clientele lists of persons served by
the office or agency: PROVIDED, That the foregoing provisions of this section
shall not apply to the following activities:

(1)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition so long as (a) any required notice of the meeting includes the
title and number of the ballot proposition, and (b) members of the legislative
body or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity
for the expression of an opposing view;

(2)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry;

(3) Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of
the office or agency.

---
END ---