BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that some nonindigenous species have the potential to cause
economic and environmental damage to the state and that current efforts to stop
the introduction of nonindigenous species from shipping vessels do not
adequately reduce the risk of new introductions into Washington waters.

The
legislature recognizes the international and rapidly changing dimensions of
this issue, and the difficulty that any one state has in either legally or
practically managing this issue. Recognizing the possible limits of state
jurisdiction over international issues, the state declares its support for the
international maritime organization and United States coast guard efforts, and
the state intends to complement, to the extent its powers allow it, the United
States coast guard's ballast water management program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Ballast tank" means any tank or hold on a vessel used for carrying
ballast water, whether or not the tank or hold was designed for that purpose.

(2)
"Ballast water" means any water and matter taken on board a vessel to
control or maintain trim, draft, stability, or stresses of the vessel, without
regard to the manner in which it is carried.

(3)
"Empty/refill exchange" means to pump out, until the tank is empty or
as close to empty as the master or operator determines is safe, the ballast
water taken on in ports, estuarine, or territorial waters, and then refilling
the tank with open sea waters.

(4)
"Exchange" means to replace the water in a ballast tank using either
flow through exchange, empty/refill exchange, or other exchange methodology
recommended or required by the United States coast guard.

(5)
"Flow through exchange" means to flush out ballast water by pumping
in midocean water at the bottom of the tank and continuously overflowing the
tank from the top until three full volumes of water have been changed to
minimize the number of original organisms remaining in the tank.

(6)
"Nonindigenous species" means any species or other viable biological
material that enters an ecosystem beyond its natural range.

(7)
"Open sea exchange" means an exchange that occurs fifty or more
nautical miles offshore. If the United States coast guard requires a vessel to
conduct an exchange further offshore, then that distance is the required distance
for purposes of compliance with this chapter.

(8)
"Recognized marine trade association" means those trade associations
in Washington state that promote improved ballast water management practices by
educating their members on the provisions of this chapter, participating in
regional ballast water coordination through the Pacific ballast water group,
assisting the department in the collection of ballast water exchange forms, and
the monitoring of ballast water. This includes members of the Puget Sound
marine committee for Puget Sound and the Columbia river steamship operators
association for the Columbia river.

(9)
"Sediments" means any matter settled out of ballast water within a
vessel.

(10)
"Treated ballast water" means ballast water that has undergone some
form of treatment to remove or reduce the number of viable biological
organisms.

(11)
"Untreated ballast water" includes exchanged or unexchanged ballast
water that has not undergone treatment.

(12)
"Vessel" means a self-propelled ship in commerce of three hundred
gross tons or more.

(13)
"Voyage" means any transit by a vessel destined for any Washington
port.

(14)
"Waters of the state" means any surface waters, including internal
waters contiguous to state shorelines within the boundaries of the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
This chapter applies to all vessels carrying ballast water into the waters of
the state from a voyage, except:

(a)
A vessel of the United States department of defense or United States coast
guard subject to the requirements of section 1103 of the national invasive
species act of 1996, or any vessel of the armed forces, as defined in 33 U.S.C.
Sec. 1322(a)(14), that is subject to the uniform national discharge standards
for vessels of the armed forces under 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1322(n);

(b)
A vessel (i) that discharges ballast water or sediments only at the location
where the ballast water or sediments originated, if the ballast water or
sediments do not mix with ballast water or sediments from areas other than open
sea waters; or (ii) that does not discharge ballast water in Washington waters;

(c)
A vessel traversing the internal waters of Washington in the Strait of Juan de
Fuca, bound for a port in Canada, and not entering or departing a United States
port, or a vessel in innocent passage, which is a vessel merely traversing the
territorial sea of the United States and not entering or departing a United
States port, or not navigating the internal waters of the United States; and

(d)
A crude oil tanker engaged in coast-wide trade that does not exchange or
discharge ballast water into the waters of the state.

(2)
This chapter does not authorize the discharge of oil or noxious liquid
substances in a manner prohibited by state, federal, or international laws or
regulations. Ballast water containing oil, noxious liquid substances, or any
other pollutant shall be discharged in accordance with the applicable
requirements.

(3)
The master or operator in charge of a vessel is responsible for the safety of
the vessel, its crew, and its passengers. Nothing in this chapter relieves the
master or operator in charge of a vessel of the responsibility for ensuring the
safety and stability of the vessel or the safety of the crew and passengers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
owner or operator in charge of any vessel covered by this chapter is required
to ensure that the vessel under their ownership or control does not discharge
ballast water into the waters of the state except as authorized by this
section.

(1)
Discharge into waters of the state is authorized if the vessel has conducted an
open sea exchange of ballast water. A vessel is exempt from this requirement
if the vessel's master reasonably determines that such a ballast water exchange
operation will threaten the safety of the vessel or the vessel's crew, or is
not feasible due to vessel design limitations or equipment failure. If a
vessel relies on this exemption, then it may discharge ballast water into
waters of the state, subject to any requirements of treatment under subsection
(2) of this section and subject to section 5 of this act.

(2)
After July 1, 2002, discharge of ballast water into waters of the state is
authorized only if there has been an open sea exchange or if the vessel has
treated its ballast water to meet standards set by the department. When
weather or extraordinary circumstances make access to treatment unsafe to the
vessel or crew, the master of a vessel may delay compliance with any treatment
required under this subsection until it is safe to complete the treatment.

(3)
The requirements of this section do not apply to a vessel discharging ballast
water or sediments that originated solely within the waters of Washington state,
the Columbia river system, or the internal waters of British Columbia south of
latitude fifty degrees north, including the waters of the Straits of Georgia
and Juan de Fuca.

(4)
Open sea exchange is an exchange that occurs fifty or more nautical miles
offshore. If the United States coast guard requires a vessel to conduct an
exchange further offshore, then that distance is the required distance for
purposes of compliance with this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
owner or operator in charge of any vessel covered by this chapter is required
to ensure that the vessel under their ownership or control complies with the
reporting and sampling requirements of this section.

(1)
Vessels covered by this chapter must report ballast water management
information to the department for each voyage using ballast water management
forms that are acceptable to the United States coast guard. Any vessel may
rely on a recognized marine trade association to forward this information to
the department or directly submit the report to the department. The report
shall be submitted before the vessel departs its port of call in Washington.

(2)
In order to monitor the effectiveness of national and international efforts to
prevent the introduction of nonindigenous species, all vessels covered by this
chapter must submit monitoring data describing nonindigenous species that might
be present in the vessel's ballast. A vessel covered by this chapter may
contract with a recognized marine trade association to randomly sample vessels
within that association's membership, and provide data to the department.
Vessels that do not belong to a recognized marine trade association must submit
ballast tank sample data to the department for each voyage. The department may
require monitoring data from any vessel that exempts itself from ballast water
exchange under section 4(1) of this act.

(3)
All data submitted to the department under subsection (2) of this section shall
be consistent with sampling and testing protocols as adopted by rule by the
department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The shipping vessel industry and the department shall promote the creation of a
pilot project to establish a private sector ballast water treatment operation
that is capable of servicing vessels at all Washington ports. Federal and
state agencies and private industries shall be invited to participate. The
project will develop equipment to treat ballast water and establish operational
methods that do not increase the cost of ballast water treatment at smaller
ports. The legislature intends that the cost of treatment required by this
chapter is substantially equivalent among large and small ports in Washington.

(2)
The department shall adopt rules to implement (a) and (b) of this subsection.
The rules and recommendations shall be developed in consultation with advisors
from regulated industries and the potentially affected parties, including but
not limited to shipping interests, ports, shellfish growers, fisheries,
environmental interests, interested citizens who have knowledge of the issues,
and appropriate governmental representatives including the United States coast
guard.

(a)
The department shall set standards for the discharge of treated ballast water
into the waters of the state. The rules are intended to ensure that the
discharge of treated ballast water poses minimal risk of introducing
nonindigenous species. In developing this standard, the department shall
consider the extent to which the requirement is technologically and practically
feasible. Where practical and appropriate, the standards shall be compatible
with standards set by the United States coast guard and shall be developed in
consultation with federal and state agencies to ensure consistency with the
federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251-1387.

(b)
The department shall adopt ballast water sampling and testing protocols for
monitoring the biological components of ballast water that may be discharged
into the waters of the state under this chapter. Monitoring data is intended
to assist the department in evaluating the risk of new, nonindigenous species
introductions from the discharge of ballast water, and to evaluate the accuracy
of ballast water exchange practices. The sampling and testing protocols must
consist of cost-effective, scientifically verifiable methods that, to the
extent practical and without compromising the purposes of this chapter, utilize
easily measured indices, such as salinity, or check for species that indicate
the potential presence of nonindigenous species or pathogenic species. The
department shall specify appropriate quality assurance and quality control for
the sampling and testing protocols.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
legislature recognizes that international and national laws relating to this
chapter are changing and that state law must adapt accordingly. The department
shall submit to the legislature, and make available to the public, a report
that summarizes the results of this chapter and makes recommendations for
improvement to this chapter on or before December 1, 2001, and a second report
on or before December 1, 2004. The 2001 report shall describe how the costs of
treatment required as of July 1, 2002, will be substantially equivalent among
ports where treatment is required. The department shall strive to fund the
provisions of this chapter through existing resources, cooperative agreements
with the maritime industry, and federal funding sources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
Except as limited by subsection (2) or (3) of this section, the director or the
director's designee may impose a civil penalty or warning for a violation of
the requirements of this chapter on the owner or operator in charge of a vessel
who fails to comply with the requirements imposed under sections 4 and 5 of
this act. The penalty shall not exceed five thousand dollars for each
violation. In determining the amount of a civil penalty, the department shall
consider if the violation was intentional, negligent, or without any fault, and
shall consider the quality and nature of risks created by the violation. The
owner or operator subject to such a penalty may contest the determination by
requesting an adjudicative proceeding within twenty days. Any determination
not timely contested is final and may be reduced to a judgment enforceable in
any court with jurisdiction. If the department prevails using any judicial
process to collect a penalty under this section, the department shall also be
awarded its costs and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(2)
The civil penalty for a violation of reporting requirements of section 5 of
this act shall not exceed five hundred dollars per violation.

(3)
Any owner or operator who knowingly, and with intent to deceive, falsifies a
ballast water management report form is liable for a civil penalty in an amount
not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation, in addition to any criminal
liability that may attach to the filing of false documents.

(4)
The department, in cooperation with the United States coast guard, may enforce
the requirements of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. By
December 31, 2005, the natural resources committees of the legislature must
review this chapter and its implementation and make recommendations if needed
to the 2006 regular session of the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 75 RCW.

---
END ---