BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that this chapter is intended to recognize the importance of
rural lands and rural character to Washington's economy, its people, and its
environment, while respecting regional differences. Rural lands and rural‑based
economies enhance the economic desirability of the state, help to preserve
traditional economic activities, and contribute to the state's overall quality
of life.

The
legislature finds that to retain and enhance the job base in rural areas, rural
counties must have flexibility to create opportunities for business
development. Further, the legislature finds that rural counties must have the
flexibility to retain existing businesses and allow them to expand. The
legislature recognizes that not all business developments in rural counties
require an urban level of services; and that many businesses in rural areas fit
within the definition of rural character identified by the local planning unit.

Finally,
the legislature finds that in defining its rural element under RCW
36.70A.070(5), a county should foster land use patterns and develop a local
vision of rural character that will: Help preserve rural‑based economies
and traditional rural lifestyles; encourage the economic prosperity of rural
residents; foster opportunities for small-scale, rural-based employment and
self‑employment; permit the operation of rural-based agricultural, commercial,
recreational, and tourist businesses that are consistent with existing and
planned land use patterns; be compatible with the use of the land by wildlife
and for fish and wildlife habitat; foster the private stewardship of the land
and preservation of open space; and enhance the rural sense of community and
quality of life.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use
plan.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial
production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary,
vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed,
Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term
commercial significance for agricultural production.

(3)
"City" means any city or town, including a code city.

(4)
"Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or
"plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of
the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(5)
"Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a)
Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for
potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently
flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(7)
"Development regulations" or "regulation" means the
controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances,
shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development ordinances,
subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together with any
amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a decision to
approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020, even though
the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the legislative
body of the county or city.

(8)
"Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and
practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to
the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has
long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is
primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production
on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production,
the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to
urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9)
"Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their
susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are
not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development
consistent with public health or safety concerns.

(10)
"Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity,
productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial
production, in consideration with the land's proximity to population areas,
and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(13)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(14)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a)
In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the
built environment;

(b)
That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and
opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;

(c)
That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and
communities;

(d)
That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and
wildlife habitat;

(e)
That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low‑density development;

(f)
That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g)
That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and
ground water and surface water recharge and discharge areas.

(15)
"Rural counties" means counties with population densities of less
than one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of
financial management and published each year by the department for the period
from July 1st to June 30th.

(16)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16)))
(17) "Rural governmental services" or "rural
services" include those public services and public facilities historically
and typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may
include domestic water systems, fire and police protection services,
transportation and public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with rural development and normally not associated with urban
areas. Rural services do not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as
otherwise authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).

(((17)))
(18) "Small-scale business" means any business entity, including a
sole proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity, that is
owned and operated independently from all other businesses, that has the
purpose of making a profit, and that has fifty or fewer employees.

(19)
"Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for
the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a
degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of
food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral
resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as
provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread
over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18)))
(20) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a
county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19)))
(21) "Urban governmental services" or "urban services"
include those public services and public facilities at an intensity
historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and
sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire
and police protection services, public transit services, and other public
utilities associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural
areas.

(((20)))
(22) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and
duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.70A.070 and 1998 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
comprehensive plan of a county or city that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040 shall consist of a map or maps, and descriptive text
covering objectives, principles, and standards used to develop the
comprehensive plan. The plan shall be an internally consistent document and
all elements shall be consistent with the future land use map. A comprehensive
plan shall be adopted and amended with public participation as provided in RCW
36.70A.140.

Each
comprehensive plan shall include a plan, scheme, or design for each of the
following:

(1)
A land use element designating the proposed general distribution and general
location and extent of the uses of land, where appropriate, for agriculture,
timber production, housing, commerce, industry, recreation, open spaces,
general aviation airports, public utilities, public facilities, and other land
uses. The land use element shall include population densities, building
intensities, and estimates of future population growth. The land use element
shall provide for protection of the quality and quantity of ground water used
for public water supplies. Where applicable, the land use element shall review
drainage, flooding, and storm water run-off in the area and nearby
jurisdictions and provide guidance for corrective actions to mitigate or
cleanse those discharges that pollute waters of the state, including Puget
Sound or waters entering Puget Sound.

(2)
A housing element ensuring the vitality and character of established
residential neighborhoods that: (a) Includes an inventory and analysis of existing
and projected housing needs; (b) includes a statement of goals, policies,
objectives, and mandatory provisions for the preservation, improvement, and
development of housing, including single-family residences; (c) identifies
sufficient land for housing, including, but not limited to, government-assisted
housing, housing for low-income families, manufactured housing, multifamily
housing, and group homes and foster care facilities; and (d) makes adequate
provisions for existing and projected needs of all economic segments of the
community.

(3)
A capital facilities plan element consisting of: (a) An inventory of existing
capital facilities owned by public entities, showing the locations and
capacities of the capital facilities; (b) a forecast of the future needs for
such capital facilities; (c) the proposed locations and capacities of expanded
or new capital facilities; (d) at least a six-year plan that will finance such
capital facilities within projected funding capacities and clearly identifies
sources of public money for such purposes; and (e) a requirement to reassess
the land use element if probable funding falls short of meeting existing needs
and to ensure that the land use element, capital facilities plan element, and
financing plan within the capital facilities plan element are coordinated and
consistent.

(4)
A utilities element consisting of the general location, proposed location, and
capacity of all existing and proposed utilities, including, but not limited to,
electrical lines, telecommunication lines, and natural gas lines.

(5)
Rural element. Counties shall include a rural element including lands that are
not designated for urban growth, agriculture, forest, or mineral resources.
The following provisions shall apply to the rural element:

(a)
Growth management act goals and local circumstances. Because circumstances
vary from county to county, in establishing patterns of rural densities and
uses, a county may consider local circumstances, but shall develop a written
record explaining how the rural element harmonizes the planning goals in RCW
36.70A.020 and meets the requirements of this chapter.

(b)
Rural development. The rural element shall permit rural development, forestry,
and agriculture in rural areas. The rural element shall provide for a variety
of rural densities, uses, essential public facilities, and rural governmental
services needed to serve the permitted densities and uses. In order to achieve
a variety of rural densities and uses, counties may provide for clustering, density
transfer, design guidelines, conservation easements, and other innovative
techniques that will accommodate appropriate rural densities and uses that are
not characterized by urban growth and that are consistent with rural character.

(c)
Measures governing rural development. The rural element shall include measures
that apply to rural development and protect the rural character of the area, as
established by the county, by:

(i)
Containing or otherwise controlling rural development;

(ii)
Assuring visual compatibility of rural development with the surrounding rural
area;

(iii)
Reducing the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low-density development in the rural area;

(iv)
Protecting critical areas, as provided in RCW 36.70A.060, and surface water and
ground water resources; and

(v)
Protecting against conflicts with the use of agricultural, forest, and mineral
resource lands designated under RCW 36.70A.170.

(d)
Limited areas of more intensive rural development. Subject to the requirements
of this subsection and except as otherwise specifically provided in this
subsection (5)(d), the rural element may allow for limited areas of more
intensive rural development, including necessary public facilities and public
services to serve the limited area as follows:

(i)
Rural development consisting of the infill, development, or redevelopment of
existing commercial, industrial, residential, or mixed-use areas, whether
characterized as shoreline development, villages, hamlets, rural activity
centers, or crossroads developments. A commercial, industrial, residential,
shoreline, or mixed-use area shall be subject to the requirements of (d)(iv) of
this subsection, but shall not be subject to the requirements of (c)(ii) and
(iii) of this subsection. An industrial area is not required to be principally
designed to serve the existing and projected rural population;

(ii)
The intensification of development on lots containing, or new development of,
small-scale recreational or tourist uses, including commercial facilities to
serve those recreational or tourist uses, that rely on a rural location and
setting, but that do not include new residential development. A small-scale
recreation or tourist use is not required to be principally designed to serve
the existing and projected rural population. Public services and public
facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the recreation or
tourist use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit low-density
sprawl;

(iii)
The intensification of development on lots containing isolated nonresidential
uses or new development of isolated cottage industries and isolated small-scale
businesses that are not principally designed to serve the existing and
projected rural population and nonresidential uses, but do provide job
opportunities for rural residents. Rural counties may allow the expansion
of small-scale businesses as long as those small-scale businesses conform with
the rural character of the area. Rural counties may also allow new businesses
to utilize sites previously occupied by an existing business as long as the new
business conforms to the rural character of the area. Public services and
public facilities shall be limited to those necessary to serve the isolated
nonresidential use and shall be provided in a manner that does not permit
low-density sprawl;

(iv)
A county shall adopt measures to minimize and contain the existing areas or
uses of more intensive rural development, as appropriate, authorized under this
subsection. Lands included in such existing areas or uses shall not extend
beyond the logical outer boundary of the existing area or use, thereby allowing
a new pattern of low-density sprawl. Existing areas are those that are clearly
identifiable and contained and where there is a logical boundary delineated
predominately by the built environment, but that may also include undeveloped
lands if limited as provided in this subsection. The county shall establish
the logical outer boundary of an area of more intensive rural development. In
establishing the logical outer boundary the county shall address (A) the need
to preserve the character of existing natural neighborhoods and communities,
(B) physical boundaries such as bodies of water, streets and highways, and land
forms and contours, (C) the prevention of abnormally irregular boundaries, and
(D) the ability to provide public facilities and public services in a manner
that does not permit low-density sprawl;

(v)
For purposes of (d) of this subsection, an existing area or existing use is one
that was in existence:

(A)
On July 1, 1990, in a county that was initially required to plan under all of
the provisions of this chapter;

(B)
On the date the county adopted a resolution under RCW 36.70A.040(2), in a
county that is planning under all of the provisions of this chapter under RCW
36.70A.040(2); or

(C)
On the date the office of financial management certifies the county's
population as provided in RCW 36.70A.040(5), in a county that is planning under
all of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to RCW 36.70A.040(5).

(e)
Exception. This subsection shall not be interpreted to permit in the rural
area a major industrial development or a master planned resort unless otherwise
specifically permitted under RCW 36.70A.360 and 36.70A.365.

(6)
A transportation element that implements, and is consistent with, the land use
element.

(a)
The transportation element shall include the following subelements:

(i)
Land use assumptions used in estimating travel;

(ii)
Estimated traffic impacts to state-owned transportation facilities resulting
from land use assumptions to assist the department of transportation in
monitoring the performance of state facilities, to plan improvements for the
facilities, and to assess the impact of land-use decisions on state-owned
transportation facilities;

(iii)
Facilities and services needs, including:

(A)
An inventory of air, water, and ground transportation facilities and services,
including transit alignments and general aviation airport facilities, to define
existing capital facilities and travel levels as a basis for future planning.
This inventory must include state-owned transportation facilities within the
city or county's jurisdiction boundaries;

(B)
Level of service standards for all locally owned arterials and transit routes
to serve as a gauge to judge performance of the system. These standards should
be regionally coordinated;

(C)
For state-owned transportation facilities, level of service standards for
highways, as prescribed in chapters 47.06 and 47.80 RCW, to gauge the
performance of the system. The purposes of reflecting level of service
standards for state highways in the local comprehensive plan are to monitor the
performance of the system, to evaluate improvement strategies, and to
facilitate coordination between the county's or city's six-year street, road,
or transit program and the department of transportation's six-year investment
program. The concurrency requirements of (b) of this subsection do not apply
to transportation facilities and services of state-wide significance except for
counties consisting of islands whose only connection to the mainland are state
highways or ferry routes. In these island counties, state highways and ferry
route capacity must be a factor in meeting the concurrency requirements in (b)
of this subsection;

(D)
Specific actions and requirements for bringing into compliance locally owned
transportation facilities or services that are below an established level of
service standard;

(E)
Forecasts of traffic for at least ten years based on the adopted land use plan
to provide information on the location, timing, and capacity needs of future
growth;

(F)
Identification of state and local system needs to meet current and future demands.
Identified needs on state-owned transportation facilities must be consistent
with the state-wide multimodal transportation plan required under chapter 47.06
RCW;

(iv)
Finance, including:

(A)
An analysis of funding capability to judge needs against probable funding
resources;

(B)
A multiyear financing plan based on the needs identified in the comprehensive
plan, the appropriate parts of which shall serve as the basis for the six-year
street, road, or transit program required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW
36.81.121 for counties, and RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems.
The multiyear financing plan should be coordinated with the six-year
improvement program developed by the department of transportation as required
by RCW 47.05.030;

(C)
If probable funding falls short of meeting identified needs, a discussion of
how additional funding will be raised, or how land use assumptions will be
reassessed to ensure that level of service standards will be met;

(v)
Intergovernmental coordination efforts, including an assessment of the impacts
of the transportation plan and land use assumptions on the transportation
systems of adjacent jurisdictions;

(vi)
Demand-management strategies.

(b)
After adoption of the comprehensive plan by jurisdictions required to plan or
who choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, local jurisdictions must adopt and
enforce ordinances which prohibit development approval if the development
causes the level of service on a locally owned transportation facility to
decline below the standards adopted in the transportation element of the
comprehensive plan, unless transportation improvements or strategies to
accommodate the impacts of development are made concurrent with the
development. These strategies may include increased public transportation
service, ride sharing programs, demand management, and other transportation
systems management strategies. For the purposes of this subsection (6)
"concurrent with the development" shall mean that improvements or
strategies are in place at the time of development, or that a financial
commitment is in place to complete the improvements or strategies within six
years.

(c) The transportation element described in this subsection (6),
and the six-year plans required by RCW 35.77.010 for cities, RCW 36.81.121 for
counties, RCW 35.58.2795 for public transportation systems, and RCW 47.05.030
for the state, must be consistent.

---
END ---