BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.168.020 and 1999 c 164 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Distressed area" means: (a) A rural county; (b) a county that
has experienced a loss of more than three thousand jobs during the previous
five-year period due to military base restructuring and where military
employment in the county exceeds fifteen percent of the total employment in the
county; (c) a county which has an unemployment rate which is twenty percent
above the state average for the immediately previous three years; (((c)))
(d) a county that has a median household income that is less than
seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the previous
three years; (((d))) (e) a metropolitan statistical area, as
defined by the office of federal statistical policy and standards, United
States department of commerce, in which the average level of unemployment for
the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which an application is
filed under this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for such
calendar year by twenty percent; (((e))) (f) an area within a
county, which area: (i) Is composed of contiguous census tracts; (ii) has a
minimum population of five thousand persons; (iii) has at least seventy percent
of its families and unrelated individuals with incomes below eighty percent of
the county's median income for families and unrelated individuals; and (iv) has
an unemployment rate which is at least forty percent higher than the county's
unemployment rate; or (((f))) (g) a county designated as a rural
natural resources impact area under RCW 43.31.601 if an application is filed by
July 1, 1997. For purposes of this definition, "families and unrelated
individuals" has the same meaning that is ascribed to that term by the federal
department of housing and urban development in its regulations authorizing
action grants for economic development and neighborhood revitalization
projects.

(4)
"Fund" means the rural Washington loan fund.

(5)
"Local development organization" means a nonprofit organization which
is organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a commitment to a
long-standing effort for an economic development program, and makes a
demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed or underemployed
residents in an area.

(6)
"Project" means the establishment of a new or expanded business in an
area which when completed will provide employment opportunities.
"Project" also means the retention of an existing business in an area
which when completed will provide employment opportunities.

(7)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer that
one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial
management.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.60.020 and 1999 sp.s. c 9 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3)
"Eligible area" means (a) a county with fewer than one hundred
persons per square mile as determined annually by the office of financial
management and published by the department of revenue effective for the period
July 1st through June 30th; or (b)(i) a county that has experienced a loss
of more than three thousand jobs during the previous five-year period due to
military base restructuring; and (ii) military employment in the county exceeds
fifteen percent of the total employment in the county.

(4)(a)
"Eligible investment project" means an investment project in an
eligible area as defined in subsection (3) of this section.

(b)
The lessor/owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless
the underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests
exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees
to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of
reduced rent payments.

(c)
"Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of an
investment project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW
82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to
generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the
cogeneration project is an integral part, or investment projects which have
already received deferrals under this chapter.

(5)
"Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or
qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction of the project.

(6)
"Manufacturing" means the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories.

(7)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(8)
"Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing
floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing and research and
development activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other
facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such facilities
are an essential or an integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory
used for manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used
partly for manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of
the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.

(9)
"Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial and
research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and
necessary part of a manufacturing or research and development operation.
"Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software;
data processing equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating
structures; and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.

(10)
"Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(11) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection,
"commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market
testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or
process do not exceed one million dollars.

---
END ---