BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.71.310 and 1998 c 132 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall enter into a contract with the entity to implement an
impaired physician program. The commission may enter into a contract with the
entity for up to six years in length. The impaired physician program may
include any or all of the following:

(a)
Entering into relationships supportive of the impaired physician program with
professionals who provide either evaluation or treatment services, or both;

(b)
Receiving and assessing reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c)
Intervening in cases of verified impairment, or in cases where there is
reasonable cause to suspect impairment;

(d)
Upon reasonable cause, referring suspected or verified impaired physicians for
evaluation or treatment;

(e)
Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired physicians including
those ordered by the commission;

(f)
Providing monitoring and continuing treatment and rehabilitative support of
physicians;

(g)
Performing such other activities as agreed upon by the commission and the
entity; and

(h)
Providing prevention and education services.

(2)
A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed
by a surcharge of ((twenty-five)) thirty-five dollars per year on
each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the
department of health from every physician and surgeon licensed under this
chapter in addition to other license fees. The surcharge under this
subsection may be increased annually to coincide with the consumer price index
for the Seattle, Washington area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics
of the United States department of labor. These moneys shall be placed in
the impaired physician account to be used solely for the implementation of the
impaired physician program.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.71A.020 and 1999 c 127 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational
and training requirements for licensure as a physician assistant or for those
enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall
include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program
approved by the commission and within one year successfully take and pass an
examination approved by the commission, if the examination tests subjects
substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant
training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department of health
for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician
assistants licensed by the board of medical examiners, or the medical quality
assurance commission as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a)
The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i)
Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii)
Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a physician
assistant training course.

(b)
Such rules shall provide:

(i)
That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to the performance
of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii)
That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only under the supervision
and control of a physician licensed in this state, but such supervision and
control shall not be construed to necessarily require the personal presence of
the supervising physician or physicians at the place where services are
rendered.

(3)
Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the commission on a
form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission, detailing
the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such
other information as the commission may require. The application shall be
accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280. A surcharge of ((twenty-five)) thirty-five
dollars per year shall be charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new
license to be collected by the department and deposited into the impaired
physician account for physician assistant participation in the impaired
physician program. The surcharge under this subsection may be increased
annually to coincide with the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington
area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States
department of labor. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to
the commission of the following:

(a)
That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program
approved by the commission and is eligible to take the examination approved by
the commission;

(b)
That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c)
That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing medicine as
a physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The commission may
require an applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems
necessary to determine an applicant's physical or mental capability, or both, to
safely practice as a physician assistant.

(4)
The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the
application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter
18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280. The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who
are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.57A.020 and 1999 c 127 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and
training requirements for licensure as an osteopathic physician assistant or
for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The
requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant
training program approved by the board and within one year successfully take
and pass an examination approved by the board, providing such examination tests
subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician
assistant training program. An interim permit may be granted by the department
of health for one year provided the applicant meets all other requirements.
Physician assistants licensed by the board of osteopathic medicine as of July
1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a)
The board shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i)
Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii)
Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a training
course.

(b)
Such rules shall provide:

(i)
That the practice of an osteopathic physician assistant shall be limited to the
performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii)
That each osteopathic physician assistant shall practice osteopathic medicine
only under the supervision and control of an osteopathic physician licensed in
this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to
necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physicians at the
place where services are rendered. The board may authorize the use of
alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71
RCW.

(3)
Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the board on a form prepared
by the secretary with the approval of the board, detailing the education,
training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other information
as the board may require. The application shall be accompanied by a fee
determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A
surcharge of ((twenty-five)) thirty-five dollars per year may be
charged on each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by
the department of health for physician assistant participation in an impaired
practitioner program. The surcharge under this subsection may be increased
annually to coincide with the consumer price index for the Seattle, Washington
area as compiled by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States
department of labor. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to
the board of the following:

(a)
That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program
approved by the board and is eligible to take the examination approved by the
board;

(b)
That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c)
That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing osteopathic
medicine as an osteopathic physician assistant with reasonable skill and
safety. The board may require any applicant to submit to such examination or
examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or
mental capability to safely practice as an osteopathic physician assistant.

(4) The board may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action
upon the application for a license as provided in the uniform disciplinary act,
chapter 18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

---
END ---