BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95.215 and 1985 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By July 1, 1987, each holder or applicant of a permit for a landfill disposal
facility issued under this chapter shall establish a reserve account or
other approved form of financial assurance to cover the costs of closing
the facility in accordance with state and federal regulations. The account
shall be designed to ensure that there will be adequate revenue or an
alternative funding mechanism available by the projected date of closure. A
landfill disposal ((facilities)) facility maintained on
private property for the sole use of the entity owning the site and a
landfill disposal facility maintained by a local government shall not be
required to establish a reserve account if, to the satisfaction of the
department, ((they)) the entity or local government provides
another form of financial assurance adequate to comply with the requirements of
this section.

(2)
By July 1, 1986, the department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to
implement subsection (1) of this section. The rules shall include but not be
limited to:

(a)
Methods to estimate closure costs, including postclosure monitoring, pollution
prevention measures, and any other procedures required under state and federal
regulations;

(b)
Methods to ensure that reserve accounts receive adequate funds, including:

(i)
Requirements that the reserve account be generated by user fees. However, the
department may waive this requirement for existing landfills if user fees would
be prohibitively high;

(ii)
Requirements that moneys be placed in the reserve account on a regular basis
and that the reserve account be kept separate from all other accounts; and

(iii)
Procedures for the department to verify that adequate sums are deposited in the
reserve account; and

(c) Methods to ensure that other types of financial assurance
provided in accordance with subsection (1) of this section are adequate to
cover the costs of closing the facility.

---
END ---