BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.21.021 and 1998 c 124 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a mobile home park is closed or converted to another use after December 31,
1995, eligible tenants shall be entitled to assistance on a first-come,
first-serve basis. Payments shall be made upon the department's verification
of eligibility, subject to the availability of remaining funds.

(2)
Assistance for closures occurring after December 31, 1995, is limited to
persons who maintain ownership of and relocate their mobile home.

(3)
Persons who maintained ownership of and relocated their mobile homes are
entitled to up to seven thousand dollars for a double-wide home and up to three
thousand five hundred dollars for a single-wide home.

(4)
Any organization may apply to receive funds from the mobile home park
relocation fund, for use in combination with funds from public or private
sources, toward relocation of tenants eligible under this section. Funds
received from the mobile home park relocation fund shall only be used for
relocation assistance expenses or other home ownership expenses, that include
downpayment assistance, if the owners are not planning to relocate their mobile
home.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 59.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A fee is imposed equal to one percent of the sale price on every transfer of
title issued under chapter 46.12 RCW on a mobile home where (a) the ownership
of the mobile home changes; and (b) the mobile home is located in a mobile home
park. A transfer of title does not include the addition or deletion of a
spouse co-owner or secured interest.

(2)
Mobile homes with a sale price of less than one thousand dollars are not
subject to the fee imposed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The department of licensing or its agents shall collect the fee when processing
an application for transfer of title. The fee collected under this section
shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit into the mobile home park
relocation fund created in this chapter.

(4)
The department of licensing and the state treasurer may adopt rules necessary
to carry out this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
secretary of state shall submit section 2 of this act to the people for their
adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be
held in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state
Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

---
END ---