BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this chapter is to establish a certification program for managers of
mobile home parks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Advisory council" means the advisory council on mobile home park
manager training and certification created in section 7 of this act.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(4)
"Mobile home park" has the same meaning as in RCW 59.20.030.

(5)
"Mobile home park management" means those actions, functions, or
duties related to the management of a mobile home park.

(6)
"Mobile home park manager" means a person who performs mobile home
park management duties and is required to be certified under this chapter to
perform mobile home park management services and includes resident owners of
mobile home parks who perform management duties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
person shall not manage a mobile home park in this state for any mobile home
park with more than twenty-five mobile home lots until a certificate of
registration certifying him or her as a mobile home park manager has been
issued to him or her by the director in accordance with this chapter.

(2)
A corporation, partnership, trust, association, sole proprietor, or other like
organization may own or operate a mobile home park or engage in the business of
mobile home park management without being certified if it employs, retains, or
contracts with certified natural persons who are registered mobile home park
managers subject to this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The director shall not issue an initial certificate of registration to any
person to act as a mobile home park manager until that person has:

(a)
Executed a written application on a form prescribed by the director, subscribed
and sworn to by the applicant;

(b)
Attended and completed a department-approved training course for mobile home
park managers;

(c)
Passed an examination approved by the department which demonstrates that the
applicant has a fundamental knowledge of the mobile home landlord-tenant act
under chapter 59.20 RCW; and

(d)
Paid to the director a fee as prescribed in section 8 of this act.

(2)
Certificates of registration are effective on the date issued by the department
and must be renewed annually.

(3)
A certificate of registration may be renewed annually provided the applicant
provides evidence of continuing education as approved by the department. This
evidence must be submitted with an application to renew certification. A
maximum of four hours of continuing education annually may be required by the
department for renewal of certification.

(4)
As of the effective date of this section, mobile home park managers may present
a verification of having successfully completed a training course conducted by
a state-wide trade association of mobile home parks, which will satisfy the
initial training requirement for one year and entitle the park manager to
certification for that year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department shall contract with a state-wide trade association exclusively
representing mobile home parks for the delivery of training courses required by
this chapter. The trade association may charge a fee for delivery of the
training courses. The department, in consultation with the advisory council
created under section 7 of this act, shall approve the curriculum of the
training program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The department, in consultation with the advisory council created in section 7
of this act, shall administer, coordinate, and enforce this chapter, develop
the examination of applicants, and be responsible for the granting of
certificates to qualified persons.

(2)
The department is authorized to adopt rules that are necessary to implement,
enforce, and interpret this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
An advisory council on mobile home park manager training and certification is
created. The council shall consist of five members as follows: Two members of
the council shall be residents of mobile home parks; two members shall be
owners of mobile home parks; and one member shall be the director or the
director's designee, who shall serve as chair of the council. The resident
members of the council shall be selected from nominees submitted by mobile home
owners associations. The park owner members of the council shall be selected
from nominees submitted by the manufactured housing communities of Washington.
The director shall appoint the members for terms of two years.

(2)
Members of the council shall serve without compensation, but are entitled to
receive reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(3)
The functions of the advisory council are to:

(a)
Review, evaluate, and advise the department concerning revisions and adoption
of rules affecting certification of mobile home park managers and the fees to
be charged under section 8 of this act; and

(b)
Develop, review, revise, and approve, in consultation with the department, the
program for certification of mobile home park managers.

(4)
The advisory council shall meet at the call of its chair, at the request of a
majority of its membership, at the request of the department, or at times
prescribed by rule.

(5)
The department shall provide adequate staff support to the advisory council to
assist it in fulfilling its duties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
department, by rule, shall set and charge fees for the application, issuance,
and renewal of certificates of registration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
violation of this chapter is a class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
secretary of state shall submit section 8 of this act to the people for their
adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be
held in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state
Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---