BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that certain individuals may be deterred from defending
against civil lawsuits, or pursuing legal action against the unreasonable
actions of others, because they do not possess the required financial resources
to retain an attorney for defending or pursuing litigation.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.84.185 and 1991 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In any civil action, the court having jurisdiction may, upon written findings
by the judge that the action, counterclaim, cross-claim, third party claim, or
defense was frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause, require the
nonprevailing party to pay the prevailing party the reasonable expenses,
including fees of attorneys, incurred in opposing such action, counterclaim,
cross-claim, third party claim, or defense. This determination shall be made
upon motion by the prevailing party after a voluntary or involuntary order of
dismissal, order on summary judgment, final judgment after trial, or other
final order terminating the action as to the prevailing party. The judge shall
consider all evidence presented at the time of the motion to determine whether
the position of the nonprevailing party was frivolous and advanced without
reasonable cause. In no event may such motion be filed more than thirty days
after entry of the order.

(2)
A party who is representing himself or herself is entitled to attorneys' fees
under this section if such fees would have been awarded to a party represented
by an attorney. Fees awarded under this subsection shall be based on the
prevailing local hourly rate charged by attorneys practicing within the area of
law that was the subject of the frivolous action or defense. The number of
hours the party shall be compensated for shall be based on the number of hours
that an attorney would have needed to accomplish the results obtained by the
party.

(3) The provisions of this section apply unless otherwise
specifically provided by statute.

---
END ---