BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds and declares that:

(a)
The relocation of children after dissolution is an issue that has been heavily
litigated and has caused much confusion in the courts and for families;

(b)
The parenting act recognizes the fundamental importance of the parent-child
relationship to the welfare of the child and that the relationship between the
child and each parent should be fostered in parenting plans tailored to involve
the child in both parents' lives unless inconsistent with the child's best
interest;

(c)
The December 1999 decision by the state supreme court, In re the Marriage of
Pape, is contrary to the overall policy of the parenting act;

(d)
The best interest of the child is generally served when the existing patterns
between the child and each parent remain stable and predictable;

(e)
Changing the geographic location of a child after dissolution may have
significant impacts on the relationship between the child and the nonmoving
parent, and such a decision is not minor and should not be made without careful
consideration; and

(f)
The scope of the minor modification statute was not intended to permit a
change in the child's residence, when such relocation would significantly
disrupt the relationship between the nonrelocating parent and the child.

(2)
By this act, the legislature intends to override the court's policy and
standards articulated in Pape.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.09.260 and 1999 c 174 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsections (4), (5), (7), and (9) of this
section, the court shall not modify a prior custody decree or a parenting plan
unless it finds, upon the basis of facts that have arisen since the prior
decree or plan or that were unknown to the court at the time of the prior
decree or plan, that a substantial change has occurred in the circumstances of
the child or the nonmoving party and that the modification is in the best
interest of the child and is necessary to serve the best interests of the
child.

(2)
In applying these standards, the court shall retain the residential schedule
established by the decree or parenting plan unless:

(a)
The parents agree to the modification;

(b)
The child has been integrated into the family of the petitioner with the
consent of the other parent in substantial deviation from the parenting plan;

(c)
The child's present environment is detrimental to the child's physical, mental,
or emotional health and the harm likely to be caused by a change of environment
is outweighed by the advantage of a change to the child; or

(d)
The court has found the nonmoving parent in contempt of court at least twice
within three years because the parent failed to comply with the residential
time provisions in the court-ordered parenting plan, or the parent has been
convicted of custodial interference in the first or second degree under RCW
9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.

(3)
A conviction of custodial interference in the first or second degree under RCW
9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070 shall constitute a substantial change of circumstances
for the purposes of this section.

(4)
The court may reduce or restrict contact between ((the nonprimary
residential)) a parent and a child if it finds that the reduction or
restriction would serve and protect the best interests of the child using the
criteria in RCW 26.09.191.

(5)
The court may order adjustments to the residential aspects of a parenting plan
upon a showing of a substantial change in circumstances of either parent or of
the child, and without consideration of the factors set forth in subsection (2)
of this section, if the proposed modification is only a minor modification in
the residential schedule that does not change the residence the child is
scheduled to reside in the majority of the time and:

(a)
Does not exceed twenty-four full days in a calendar year; or

(b)
Is based on a change of residence or an involuntary change in work schedule by
a parent which:

(i)
Makes the residential schedule in the parenting plan impractical to follow;
and

(ii)
Does not result in a significant geographical relocation of the child away from
the other parent; or

(c)
Does not result in a schedule that exceeds ninety overnights per year in total,
if the court finds that, at the time the petition for modification is filed,
the decree of dissolution or parenting plan does not provide reasonable time
with the ((nonprimary residential parent at the time the petition for
modification is filed)) parent whom the child resides with a minority of
the time, and further, the court finds that it is in the best interests of
the child to increase residential time with the ((nonprimary residential))
other parent in excess of the residential time period in (a) of this
subsection. However, any motion under this subsection (5)(c) is subject to the
factors established in subsection (2) of this section if the party bringing the
motion has previously been granted a modification under this same subsection
within twenty-four months of the current motion. Relief granted under this
section shall not be the sole basis for adjusting or modifying child support.

(6)
A ((nonprimary residential)) parent with whom the child resides the
minority of the time whose residential time with the child is subject to
limitations pursuant to RCW 26.09.191 (2) or (3) may not seek expansion of
residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section unless that parent
demonstrates a substantial change in circumstances specifically related to the
basis for the limitation.

(7)
If a ((nonprimary residential)) parent with whom the child resides
the minority of the time voluntarily fails to exercise residential time for
an extended period, that is, one year or longer, the court upon proper motion
may make adjustments to the parenting plan in keeping with the best interests
of the minor child.

(8)
A ((nonprimary parent)) parent with whom the child resides a minority
of the time who is required by the existing parenting plan to complete
evaluations, treatment, parenting, or other classes may not seek expansion of
residential time under subsection (5)(c) of this section unless that parent has
fully complied with such requirements.

(9)
The court may order adjustments to any of the nonresidential aspects of a
parenting plan upon a showing of a substantial change of circumstances of
either parent or of a child, and the adjustment is in the best interest of the
child. Adjustments ordered under this section may be made without
consideration of the factors set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

(10) If the court finds that a motion to modify a prior decree or
parenting plan has been brought in bad faith, the court shall assess the
attorney's fees and court costs of the nonmoving parent against the moving
party.

---
END ---