BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that a pilot project to allow a county to administer
hydraulic permits will increase government efficiency, citizen satisfaction,
and compliance with state and local environmental requirements. The
legislature further finds that a pilot project will not compromise thorough and
competent environmental review.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department may develop a pilot project to allow a county to administer
hydraulic permits. The department has discretion to determine which county may
participate in the pilot project. No county is obligated to participate in the
pilot project program. The pilot project shall be established by written
agreement between the department and the participating county. The department
shall retain full oversight authority and shall not delegate rule-making authority
during the pilot project.

(2)
The agreement shall specify the types of hydraulic permits the participating
county may administer. However, the county may not administer hydraulic
permits associated with forest practices. The agreement shall incorporate, at
a minimum, the regulatory standards of this chapter and Title 220 WAC,
provisions for a local appeals process equivalent to that provided by this
chapter and Title 220 WAC, and provisions for effective monitoring and
enforcement of the hydraulic permits issued by the participating county. In
addition, the agreement shall incorporate the following guidelines:

(a)
There shall be no decrease in protection of fish habitat;

(b)
There shall be no full-time equivalent or funding shift from the department to
the participating county; and

(c)
The department shall retain authority to develop programmatic permits and
habitat conservation plans.

(3)
The participating county may charge permit applicants to cover any additional
cost of processing hydraulic permit applications, including inspection and
monitoring, consistent with the county's fee ordinance. The department shall
not seek any contribution from fees collected by the participating county for
services performed under the agreement.

(a)
The department and the participating county shall assemble a citizen advisory
panel including, at a minimum, representatives of the building industry,
environmental groups, and permit applicants.

(b) The department, with the advice and assistance of the citizen
advisory panel, shall analyze the development and implementation of the pilot
project and assess whether it merits continued and expanded application to
additional jurisdictions. This analysis shall consider whether the pilot
project results in enhanced environmental protection, cost-effectiveness to
both the state and the participating county, and efficient service delivery to
applicants. The department and the advisory panel shall deliver the analysis
and recommendations to the legislature not more than two years after
implementation of the agreement.

---
END ---