BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that sport fishing is a wonderful family activity that is
enjoyed by many people in this state. The legislature further finds that one
of the most abundant steelhead runs in Washington state is on the Snohomish
river, and this run is of great significance to the local economy and the
economy of the state of Washington. The legislature further finds that the
economic benefits derived directly through fishing license sales and indirectly
through the purchase of gear, tackle, food, and lodging far exceeds the cost of
operating the Reiter pond hatchery.

Therefore,
the legislature declares that proper management of the hatchery is essential to
maintaining the abundant fish runs and the maximum recreational enjoyment
potential of the river. The legislature further declares that Reiter pond must
be maintained as a hatchery for this purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of ninety thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the state wildlife
account to the department of fish and wildlife solely to operate Reiter pond
hatchery.

---
END ---