BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.82.010 and 1997 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of general administration, on behalf of the agency involved, shall
purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or otherwise acquire all real estate,
improved or unimproved, as may be required by elected state officials,
institutions, departments, commissions, boards, and other state agencies, or
federal agencies where joint state and federal activities are undertaken and
may grant easements and transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or
part of any surplus real estate for those state agencies which do not otherwise
have the specific authority to dispose of real estate. This section does not
transfer financial liability for the acquired property to the department of
general administration.

(2)
Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the director shall
determine the location, size, and design of any real estate or improvements
thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this chapter, and any improvements thereon,
shall conform to standards adopted by the director and approved by the office
of financial management governing facility efficiency unless a specific
exemption from such standards is provided by the director of general
administration. The director of general administration shall report to the
office of financial management annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to
this subsection.

(3)
The director of general administration may fix the terms and conditions of each
lease entered into under this chapter, except that no lease shall extend
greater than twenty years in duration. The director of general administration
may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration upon a
determination by the director of the office of financial management that the
long-term lease provides a more favorable rate than would otherwise be
available, it appears to a substantial certainty that the facility is necessary
for use by the state for the full length of the lease term, and the facility
meets the standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease greater
than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that the life-cycle cost of
leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle cost of purchasing or
constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the facility.

(4)
Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on behalf of any
state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or security for the
payment of securities offered for sale through a public offering. Except as
permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on behalf of any state
agency may be used or referred to as collateral or security for the payment of
securities offered for sale through a private placement without the prior
written approval of the state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not
prevent a lessor from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as
security for the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction
would otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any such
approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state treasurer
shall give primary consideration to the protection of the state's credit rating
and the integrity of the state's debt management program. If it appears to the
state treasurer that any lease has been used or referred to in violation of
this subsection or rules adopted under this subsection, then he or she may
recommend that the governor cause such lease to be terminated. The department
of general administration shall promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it
may appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred to in
violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this subsection.

(5)
It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and consolidation of
state services into single or adjacent facilities, whenever appropriate, to
improve public service delivery, minimize duplication of facilities, increase
efficiency of operations, and promote sound growth management planning.

(6)
The director of general administration shall provide coordinated long-range
planning services to identify and evaluate opportunities for colocating and
consolidating state facilities. Upon the renewal of any lease, the inception
of a new lease, or the purchase of a facility, the director of general
administration shall determine whether an opportunity exists for colocating the
agency or agencies in a single facility with other agencies located in the same
geographic area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director of general
administration shall consult with the affected state agencies and the office of
financial management to evaluate the impact colocation would have on the cost
and delivery of agency programs, including whether program delivery would be
enhanced due to the centralization of services. The director of general
administration, in consultation with the office of financial management, shall
develop procedures for implementing colocation and consolidation of state
facilities.

(7)
The director of general administration is authorized to purchase, lease, rent,
or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real estate as owner or lessee and
to lease or sublet all or a part of such real estate to state or federal
agencies. The director of general administration shall charge each using
agency its proportionate rental which shall include an amount sufficient to pay
all costs, including, but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and
accounting services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which shall
not exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen
expenses incident to management of the real estate.

(8)
If the director of general administration determines that it is necessary or
advisable to undertake any work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant to subsection (1) or (7) of
this section, the director shall cause plans and specifications thereof and an
estimate of the cost of such work to be made and filed in his or her office and
the state agency benefiting thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work
out of any available funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of executing such work
shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. Work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars,
other than that done by the owner of the property if other than the state,
shall be performed in accordance with the public works law of this state.

(9)
In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director of general
administration shall make space utilization studies, and shall establish
standards for use of space by state agencies. Such studies shall include the
identification of opportunities for colocation and consolidation of state
agency office and support facilities.

(10)
The director of general administration may construct new buildings on, or
improve existing facilities, and furnish and equip, all real estate under his
or her management.

(a)
A predesign shall be developed for all major capital projects in accordance
with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. In
the predesign phase of major capital projects involving construction of new
office or warehouse buildings or acquisition of office or warehouse facilities
using a lease purchase contract, the director of general administration shall conduct
an evaluation of the facility using a financial life-cycle cost analysis as
approved by the joint legislative audit and review committee, including an
assessment of leasing comparable space. The definition of a major capital
project shall be specified in the governor's capital budget instruction
document pursuant to RCW 43.88.030.

(b)
Prior to the construction of new buildings or major improvements to existing
facilities or acquisition of facilities using a lease purchase contract, the
director of general administration shall conduct an evaluation of the facility
design and budget using life-cycle cost analysis, value-engineering, and other
techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness and efficiency of the
facility or improvement.

(11)
All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent, transfer, exchange, or
sell real estate and to grant and accept easements shall be approved as to form
by the attorney general, signed by the director of general administration or
the director's designee, and recorded with the county auditor of the county in
which the property is located.

(12)
The director of general administration may delegate any or all of the functions
specified in this section to any agency upon such terms and conditions as the
director deems advisable.

(13)
This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate by:

(a)
The state college and universities for research or experimental purposes;

(b)
The state liquor control board for liquor stores and warehouses; and

(c)
The department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of transportation, and the state parks and recreation commission for
purposes other than the leasing of offices, warehouses, and real estate for
similar purposes.

(14) Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary,
the department of general administration may negotiate ground leases for public
lands on which property is to be acquired under a financing contract pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW under terms approved by the state finance committee.

---
END ---