BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.24.550 and 1998 c 220 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public agencies are authorized to release information to the public regarding
sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when the agency determines that disclosure
of the information is relevant and necessary to protect the public and
counteract the danger created by the particular offender. This authorization
applies to information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a
sex offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense as defined by
RCW 9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense; (c)
any person committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or
as a sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d) any person found not guilty
of a sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of insanity under chapter
10.77 RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand trial for a sex
offense or kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or
71.34 RCW.

(2)
The extent of the public disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall
be rationally related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the
community; (b) the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or
is regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for
information to enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3)
Local law enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in
determining the extent of a public disclosure made under this section: (a) For
offenders classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with
other appropriate law enforcement agencies and may disclose, upon request,
relevant, necessary, and accurate information to any victim or witness to the
offense and to any individual community member who lives near the residence
where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; (b) for
offenders classified as risk level II, the agency may also disclose relevant,
necessary, and accurate information to public and private schools, child day
care centers, family day care providers, businesses and organizations that
serve primarily children, women, or vulnerable adults, and neighbors and
community groups near the residence where the offender resides, expects to
reside, or is regularly found; and (c) for offenders classified as risk level
III, the agency may also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information
to the public at large.

(4)
Local law enforcement agencies that disseminate information pursuant to this
section shall: (a) Review available risk level classifications made by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and
the indeterminate sentence review board; (b) assign risk level classifications
to all offenders about whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a
good faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days
before the offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves
from another jurisdiction, or moves after notification is made under
subsection (5) of this section, as soon as possible after the agency learns
of the offender's move, except that in no case may this notification provision
be construed to require an extension of an offender's release date. The
juvenile court shall provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant
information on offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely manner.

(5)
The department of corrections is responsible for public notification under
this section with respect to an offender classified as level II or III who is
being released from a state correctional facility. The department of social
and health services is responsible for public notification under this section
with respect to an offender classified as level II or III who is being released
from a juvenile rehabilitation administration facility. In carrying out such
notification, the agencies shall follow the guidelines set forth in subsection
(3) of this section and shall make a good faith effort to accomplish such
notification at least fourteen days before the offender is released from
confinement. In no case may this notification provision be construed to
require an extension of an offender's release date.

(6)
An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as
defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability for damages for any
discretionary risk level classification decisions or release of relevant and
necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or
agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this
section applies to risk level classification decisions and the release of
relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure
is authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or official to
classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by the department
of corrections, the department of social and health services, or the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and
necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by
itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided
under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information
to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.

(((6)))
(7) Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section
shall impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public
agency for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(((7)))
(8) Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons
designated in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may
otherwise be provided by law.

(((8)))
(9) When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an
offender differently than the offender is classified by the department of
corrections, the department of social and health services, or the indeterminate
sentence review board, the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the
appropriate department or the board and submit its reasons supporting the
change in classification.

Sec.
2. RCW
72.09.340 and 1996 c 215 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In making all discretionary decisions regarding release plans for and
supervision of sex offenders, the department shall set priorities and make
decisions based on an assessment of public safety risks. In approving
residence locations for level II and III sex offenders, the department shall
take into consideration the proximity of the residence locations of other level
II and III sex offenders, with the intention of limiting the number of such
offenders living in any one area.

(2)
The department shall, no later than September 1, 1996, implement a policy
governing the department's evaluation and approval of release plans for sex
offenders. The policy shall include, at a minimum, a formal process by which
victims, witnesses, and other interested people may provide information and
comments to the department on potential safety risks to specific individuals or
classes of individuals posed by a specific sex offender. The department shall
make all reasonable efforts to publicize the availability of this process
through currently existing mechanisms and shall seek the assistance of courts,
prosecutors, law enforcement, and victims' advocacy groups in doing so. Notice
of an offender's proposed residence shall be provided to all people registered
to receive notice of an offender's release under RCW 9.94A.155(2), except that
in no case may this notification requirement be construed to require an
extension of an offender's release date.

(3)
For any offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the department shall not approve a residence location if the
proposed residence: (a) Includes a minor victim or child of similar age or
circumstance as a previous victim who the department determines may be put at
substantial risk of harm by the offender's residence in the household; or (b)
is within close proximity of the current residence of a minor victim, unless
the whereabouts of the minor victim cannot be determined or unless such a
restriction would impede family reunification efforts ordered by the court or
directed by the department of social and health services. The department is
further authorized to reject a residence location if the proposed residence is
within close proximity to schools, child care centers, playgrounds, or other
grounds or facilities where children of similar age or circumstance as a
previous victim are present who the department determines may be put at
substantial risk of harm by the sex offender's residence at that location.

(4)
When the department requires supervised visitation as a term or condition of a
sex offender's community placement under RCW 9.94A.120(9)(c)(vi), the department
shall, prior to approving a supervisor, consider the following:

(a) The relationships between the proposed supervisor, the
offender, and the minor; (b) the proposed supervisor's acknowledgment and
understanding of the offender's prior criminal conduct, general knowledge of
the dynamics of child sexual abuse, and willingness and ability to protect the
minor from the potential risks posed by contact with the offender; and (c)
recommendations made by the department of social and health services about the
best interests of the child.

---
END ---