BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
5.60.060 and 1998 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A husband shall not be examined for or against his wife, without the consent of
the wife, nor a wife for or against her husband without the consent of the
husband; nor can either during marriage or afterward, be without the consent of
the other, examined as to any communication made by one to the other during
marriage. But this exception shall not apply to a civil action or proceeding
by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a crime
committed by one against the other, nor to a criminal action or proceeding
against a spouse if the marriage occurred subsequent to the filing of formal
charges against the defendant, nor to a criminal action or proceeding for a
crime committed by said husband or wife against any child of whom said husband
or wife is the parent or guardian, nor to a proceeding under chapter 70.96A or
71.05 RCW: PROVIDED, That the spouse of a person sought to be detained under
chapter 70.96A or 71.05 RCW may not be compelled to testify and shall be so
informed by the court prior to being called as a witness.

(2)(a)
An attorney or counselor shall not, without the consent of his or her client,
be examined as to any communication made by the client to him or her, or his or
her advice given thereon in the course of professional employment.

(b)
A parent or guardian of a minor child arrested on a criminal charge may not be
examined as to a communication between the child and his or her attorney if the
communication was made in the presence of the parent or guardian. This
privilege does not extend to communications made prior to the arrest.

(3)
A member of the clergy or a priest shall not, without the consent of a person
making the confession, be examined as to any confession made to him or her in
his or her professional character, in the course of discipline enjoined by the
church to which he or she belongs.

(4)
Subject to the limitations under RCW 70.96A.140 or 71.05.250, a physician or
surgeon or osteopathic physician or surgeon or podiatric physician or surgeon
shall not, without the consent of his or her patient, be examined in a civil
action as to any information acquired in attending such patient, which was
necessary to enable him or her to prescribe or act for the patient, except as
follows:

(a)
In any judicial proceedings regarding a child's injury, neglect, or sexual
abuse or the cause thereof; and

(b)
Ninety days after filing an action for personal injuries or wrongful death, the
claimant shall be deemed to waive the physician-patient privilege. Waiver of
the physician-patient privilege for any one physician or condition constitutes
a waiver of the privilege as to all physicians or conditions, subject to such
limitations as a court may impose pursuant to court rules.

(5)
A public officer shall not be examined as a witness as to communications made
to him or her in official confidence, when the public interest would suffer by
the disclosure.

(6)(a)
A trained peer ((support group counselor)) supporter shall
not, without consent of the law enforcement officer making the communication,
be compelled to testify about any communication made to the ((counselor))
trained peer supporter by the officer while receiving ((counseling))
peer support services. The ((counselor)) trained peer
supporter must be designated as such by the sheriff, police chief, or chief
of the Washington state patrol, prior to the incident that results in ((counseling))
receiving peer support services. The privilege only applies when the
communication was made to the ((counselor)) trained peer supporter
while acting in his or her capacity as a trained peer ((support group
counselor)) supporter. The privilege does not apply if the ((counselor))
trained peer supporter was an initial responding officer, a witness, or
a party to the incident which prompted the delivery of peer support ((group
counseling)) services to the law enforcement officer.

(b)
For purposes of this section, "trained peer ((support group
counselor)) supporter" means a:

(i)
Law enforcement officer, or civilian employee of a law enforcement agency, who
has received training to provide emotional and moral support ((and
counseling)) to an officer who needs those services as a result of an
incident in which the officer was involved while acting in his or her official
capacity; or

(ii)
Nonemployee counselor or other mental health services provider who has
been designated by the sheriff, police chief, or chief of the Washington state
patrol to provide emotional and moral support and counseling to an officer who
needs those services as a result of an incident in which the officer was
involved while acting in his or her official capacity.

(7)
A sexual assault advocate may not, without the consent of the victim, be
examined as to any communication made by the victim to the sexual assault advocate.

(a)
For purposes of this section, "sexual assault advocate" means the
employee or volunteer from a rape crisis center, victim assistance unit,
program, or association, that provides information, medical or legal advocacy,
counseling, or support to victims of sexual assault, who is designated by the
victim to accompany the victim to the hospital or other health care facility
and to proceedings concerning the alleged assault, including police and
prosecution interviews and court proceedings.

(b)
A sexual assault advocate may disclose a confidential communication without the
consent of the victim if failure to disclose is likely to result in a clear,
imminent risk of serious physical injury or death of the victim or another
person. Any sexual assault advocate participating in good faith in the
disclosing of records and communications under this section shall have immunity
from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result from the
action. In any proceeding, civil or criminal, arising out of a disclosure
under this section, the good faith of the sexual assault advocate who disclosed
the confidential communication shall be presumed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Pursuant to the provisions of this section, any communication made by an
emergency service provider participating in a peer support session conducted by
a trained peer supporter is confidential and shall not be disclosed by the
trained peer supporter or an emergency service provider participating in the
session. A peer support session may consist of a trained peer supporter and
one or more emergency service providers.

(2)
The confidentiality provisions in this section apply when:

(a)
The trained peer supporter was designated as such by the emergency service
provider agency or entity prior to the incident that prompted the delivery of
peer support services;

(b)
The emergency service provider participating in the peer support session was part
of the emergency service provider personnel involved in responding to, or
rendering assistance during, the incident which prompted the delivery of peer
support services; and

(c)
The communication was made to the trained peer supporter while acting in his or
her capacity as a trained peer supporter or to another emergency service
provider during the peer support session.

(3)
A trained peer supporter or emergency service provider participating in a peer
support session shall not disclose any communication made to the trained peer
supporter or participant by the emergency service provider during the peer
support session, unless:

(a)
The disclosure is necessary to provide assistance pursuant to the peer support
session;

(b)
The emergency service provider making the communication consents to the
disclosure; or

(c)(i)
The person seeking disclosure of the communication makes a written motion to
the court requesting disclosure of the communication, and states in an
affidavit the reasons why the person is seeking disclosure; and (ii) the court
finds, after an in-camera review of the communication, that the communication
is material and relevant and the probative value of the communication outweighs
the emergency service provider's privacy interest in the communication, and the
court orders disclosure.

(4)
Any communication made during a peer support session is not subject to the
confidentiality provisions in this section merely because it is made during the
session if the communication is otherwise not confidential.

(5)
For purposes of this section, "trained peer supporter" means:

(a)
An emergency service provider, or a civilian employee of an emergency service
provider agency or entity, who has received training to provide emotional and
moral support to an emergency service provider who needs those services as a
result of an incident in which the emergency service provider was involved
while acting in his or her official capacity; or

(b)
A nonemployee counselor or mental health service provider who has been
designated by the emergency service provider agency or entity to provide
emotional and moral support and counseling to an emergency service provider who
needs those services as a result of an incident in which the emergency service
provider was involved while acting in his or her official capacity.

(6) For purposes of this section, "emergency service
provider" means a law enforcement officer, fire fighter, emergency medical
technician as defined in RCW 18.73.030, emergency worker as defined in RCW
38.52.010, or ambulance or aid vehicle services personnel. The provisions in
this section are intended to supplement the provisions granted to law
enforcement officers under RCW 5.60.060, and if a conflict exists, the statute
granting the greater protection against disclosure shall apply. However, any
communication made in a peer support session consisting of a trained peer
supporter and more than one law enforcement officer is governed under this
section.

---
END ---