BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.43.930 and 1995 c 369 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that fire protection services at the state level are provided
by different, independent state agencies. This has resulted in a lack of a
comprehensive state-level focus for state fire protection services, funding,
and policy. The legislature further finds that the paramount duty of the state
in fire protection services is to enhance the capacity of all local
jurisdictions to assure that their personnel with fire suppression, prevention,
inspection, origin and cause, and arson investigation responsibilities are
adequately trained to discharge their responsibilities. It is the intent of
the legislature to consolidate fire protection services into a single state
agency and to create a state board with the responsibility of (1) establishing
a comprehensive state policy regarding fire protection services and (2)
advising the chief of the Washington state patrol and the director of fire
protection on matters relating to their duties under state law. It is also the
intent of the legislature that the fire protection services program created
herein will assist local fire protection agencies in program development
without encroaching upon their historic autonomy and will promote the
cost-effective and efficient delivery of fire protection services by state and
local fire protection agencies. It is the further intent of the
legislature that the fire protection services program be implemented
incrementally to assure a smooth transition, to build local, regional, and
state capacity, and to avoid undue burdens on jurisdictions with limited
resources.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.43.934 and 1999 c 117 s 1 and 1999 c 24 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Except
for matters relating to the statutory duties of the chief of the Washington
state patrol that are to be carried out through the director of fire
protection, the board shall have the responsibility of developing a
comprehensive state policy regarding fire protection services. In carrying out
its duties, the board shall:

(1)(a)
Adopt a state fire training and education master plan that allows to the
maximum feasible extent for negotiated agreements: (i) With the state board
for community and technical colleges to provide academic, vocational, and field
training programs for the fire service and (ii) with the higher education coordinating
board and the state colleges and universities to provide instructional programs
requiring advanced training, especially in command and management skills;

(b)
Adopt minimum standards for each level of responsibility among personnel with
fire suppression, prevention, inspection, and investigation responsibilities
that assure continuing assessment of skills and are flexible enough to meet
emerging technologies. With particular respect to training for fire
investigations, the master plan shall encourage cross training in appropriate
law enforcement skills. To meet special local needs, fire agencies may adopt
more stringent requirements than those adopted by the state;

(c)
Cooperate with the common schools, technical and community colleges,
institutions of higher education, and any department or division of the state,
or of any county or municipal corporation in establishing and maintaining
instruction in fire service training and education in accordance with any act
of congress and legislation enacted by the legislature in pursuance thereof and
in establishing, building, and operating training and education facilities.

Industrial
fire departments and private fire investigators may participate in training and
education programs under this chapter for a reasonable fee established by rule;

(d)
Develop and adopt a master plan for constructing, equipping, maintaining, and
operating necessary fire service training and education facilities subject to
the provisions of chapter 43.19 RCW;

(e)
Develop and adopt a master plan for the purchase, lease, or other acquisition
of real estate necessary for fire service training and education facilities in
a manner provided by law; and

(f)
Develop and adopt a plan with a goal of providing training at the level of fire
fighter one, as defined by the board, to all fire fighters in the state. The
plan will include a reimbursement for fire protection districts and city fire
departments of not less than two dollars for every hour of fire fighter one
training. The Washington state patrol shall not provide reimbursement for more
than one hundred fifty hours of fire fighter one training for each fire fighter
trained.

(2)
In addition to its responsibilities for fire service training, the board shall:

(a)
Adopt a state fire protection master plan;

(b)
Monitor fire protection in the state and develop objectives and priorities to
improve fire protection for the state's citizens including: (i) The
comprehensiveness of state and local inspections required by law for fire and
life safety; (ii) the level of skills and training of inspectors, as well as
needs for additional training; ((and)) (iii) the efforts of local,
regional, and state inspection agencies to improve coordination and reduce
duplication among inspection efforts; and (iv) programs or processes to
improve the cost-effective and efficient delivery of fire protection services;

(c)
Establish and promote state arson control programs and ensure development of
local arson control programs;

(d)
Provide representation for local fire protection services to the governor in
state-level fire protection planning matters such as, but not limited to,
hazardous materials control;

(e)
Recommend to the adjutant general rules on minimum information requirements of
automatic location identification for the purposes of enhanced 911 emergency
service;

(f)
Seek and solicit grants, gifts, bequests, devises, and matching funds for use
in furthering the objectives and duties of the board, and establish procedures
for administering them;

(g)
Promote mutual aid and disaster planning for fire services in this state;

(h)
Assure the dissemination of information concerning the amount of fire damage
including that damage caused by arson, and its causes and prevention; and

(i)
Implement any legislation enacted by the legislature to meet the requirements
of any acts of congress that apply to this section.

(3)
In carrying out its statutory duties, the board shall give particular
consideration to the appropriate roles to be played by the state and by local
jurisdictions with fire protection responsibilities. Any determinations on the
division of responsibility shall be made in consultation with local fire
officials and their representatives.

To
the extent possible, the board shall encourage development of regional units
along compatible geographic, population, economic, and fire risk dimensions.
Such regional units may serve to: (a) Reinforce coordination among state and
local activities in fire service training, reporting, inspections, and
investigations; (b) identify areas of special need, particularly in smaller
jurisdictions with inadequate resources; (c) assist the state in its oversight
responsibilities; (d) identify funding needs and options at both the state and
local levels; and (e) provide models for building local capacity in fire
protection programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the duties specified in RCW 43.43.934, the state fire protection
policy board shall develop, in conjunction with representatives of state and
local fire protection agencies, uniform standards for fire protection vehicles
and equipment.

(2)
After establishing the uniform standards required by subsection (1) of this
section, the state fire protection policy board shall develop, in conjunction
with representatives of state and local fire protection agencies, a proposal or
proposals for consolidated purchases of fire protection vehicles and equipment
based on the uniform standards. The state fire protection policy board's
proposal or proposals shall:

(a)
Create a mechanism for the state to coordinate purchases by state and local fire
protection agencies of fire protection vehicles and equipment based on the
uniform standards; and

(b)
Allow for consolidated purchases of fire protection vehicles and equipment
based on the uniform standards to reduce costs for purchases by individual
state and local fire protection agencies.

(3)
By January 1, 2001, the state fire protection policy board shall submit to the
legislature:

(a)
A report on the development of uniform standards and proposals for consolidated
purchases as required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section; and

(b)
Recommendations for any legislative changes necessary to implement programs or
processes establishing uniform standards and consolidated purchases as
specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2001.

---
END ---