BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Before January 1st of each year the department shall determine the total and
the per capita levels of revenues for each city and the state-wide weighted
average per capita level of revenues for all cities imposing the sales and use
tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(2)
Each city imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum
rate and receiving less than seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average
per capita level of revenues for all cities as determined by the department
under subsection (1) of this section may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the city. The rate of tax shall be six and one-half percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax. For calendar year 2000, the tax shall take effect April
1st. For subsequent calendar years, the tax shall take effect January 1st of
each year. For a city that does not impose the sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate, the tax shall expire for the year when the
revenue from the tax is sufficient, when added to the per capita level of
revenues received the previous calendar year by the city, to equal seventy
percent of the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all
cities determined under subsection (1) of this section, but not later than the
end of the calendar year. For a city imposing the sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate, the tax shall expire for the year when the
revenue from the tax is sufficient, when added to the per capita level of
revenues received the previous calendar year by the city, to equal one hundred
forty percent of the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues
for all cities determined under subsection (1) of this section, but not later
than the end of the calendar year.

(3)
Any city ordinance or resolution adopted under this section shall contain a
provision allowing a credit against the tax imposed under this section for the
full amount of any tax imposed upon the same taxable event under RCW 67.28.180,
82.14.0485, 82.14.0494, or 82.14.370.

(4)
The tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection
of such taxes on behalf of the city at no cost to the city.

(5)(a)
For a city with an official incorporation date after January 1st of a year, the
department shall:

(i)
Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received had the city received
revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;

(ii)
Calculate the amount of tax that would have been received under subsection (2)
of this section based on the per capita revenues determined under (a)(i) of
this subsection;

(iii)
Prorate the amount determined under (a)(ii) of this subsection by the number of
months the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) is imposed.

(b)
If the amount determined under (a)(iii) of this subsection is greater than
zero, the city may impose a tax under subsection (2) of this section, effective
on or after the date of incorporation. The tax shall expire when the revenue
from the tax is equal to the amount determined under (a)(iii) of this
subsection, but not later than the end of the calendar year.

(c)
Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the calculation of
the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities
made under subsection (1) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Before January 1st of each year the department shall determine the total and
the per capita levels of revenues for each county and the state-wide weighted
average per capita level of revenues for all counties imposing the sales and
use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year. For
the purposes of this section, per capita calculations shall be based on the
population in the unincorporated area of the county.

(2)
Each county imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the
maximum rate and receiving less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars from
the tax for the previous calendar year may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with this chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized
by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the county. The rate of tax shall be six and one-half percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax. For calendar year 2000, the tax shall take effect April
1st. For subsequent calendar years, the tax shall take effect January 1st of
each year. For a county that does not impose the sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate, the tax shall expire for the year when the
revenue from the tax is sufficient, when added to revenues received the
previous calendar year by the county, to equal the greater of one hundred fifty
thousand dollars or seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for all counties, but not later than the end of the
calendar year. For a county imposing the sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate, the tax shall expire for the year when the revenue
from the tax is sufficient, when added to revenues received the previous
calendar year by the county, to equal the greater of three hundred thousand
dollars or one hundred forty percent of the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for all counties, but not later than the end of the
calendar year.

(3)
The department shall establish a governmental price index as provided in this
subsection. The base year for the index shall be the end of the third quarter
of 1982. Before November 1st of each year, the department shall establish
another index figure for the third quarter of that year. The department may
use the implicit price deflators for state and local government purchases of
goods and services calculated by the United States department of commerce to
establish the governmental price index. On January 1st of each year, the one
hundred fifty thousand dollar and three hundred thousand dollar base figures in
subsection (2) of this section shall be adjusted in direct proportion to the
percentage change in the governmental price index from 1982 until the year
before the adjustment. Calculations made under this subsection (3) shall use
this adjusted base amount figure.

(4)
Any county ordinance or resolution adopted under this section shall contain a
provision allowing a credit against the tax imposed under this section for the
full amount of any tax imposed upon the same taxable event under RCW 67.28.180,
section 1 of this act, 82.14.0485, 82.14.0494, or 82.14.370.

(5)
Taxes imposed under this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection of such taxes
on behalf of the county at no cost to the county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Any
amounts received during calendar year 2000 by a city under RCW 82.14.210 or a
county under RCW 82.14.200 shall be treated as revenue received during the
previous calendar year for the purposes of determining an expiration date under
section 1 or 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.14.200 (County sales and use tax equalization
account--Allocation procedure) and 1998 c 321 s 8 (Referendum Bill No. 49),
1997 c 333 s 2, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 15, 1990 c 42 s 313, 1985 c 57 s 82, 1984 c
225 s 5, 1983 c 99 s 1, & 1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 21; and

(2) RCW
82.14.210 (Municipal sales and use tax equalization
account--Allocation procedure) and 1996 c 64 s 1, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 16, 1990
2nd ex.s. c 1 s 701, 1990 c 42 s 314, 1985 c 57 s 83, 1984 c 225 s 2, &
1982 1st ex.s. c 49 s 22.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect April 1, 2000.

---
END ---