BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the
amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year
following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance
with the following:

(1)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied
by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of
the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person who sells, transfers, or is
displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to
a replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an exemption on more
than one residence in any year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the
person to a hospital or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of
exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital
costs;

(2)
The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in
fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the
property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such person
must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in
which he or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each
spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3)
The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of age or older on
December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason
of physical disability: PROVIDED, That any surviving spouse of a person who
was receiving an exemption at the time of the person's death shall qualify if
the surviving spouse is fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets
the requirements of this section;

(4)
The amount that the person shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be
calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW
84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or
more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of such person
shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable
income of such person during the months such person was retired by twelve. If
the income of the person claiming exemption is reduced for two or more months
of the assessment year by reason of the death of the person's spouse, or when
other substantial changes occur in disposable income that are likely to
continue for an indefinite period of time, the combined disposable income of
such person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable income of such person after such occurrences by twelve. If it is
necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor may
require confirming documentation of such income prior to May 31 of the year
following application;

(5)(a)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
excess property taxes; and

(b)(i)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less but greater than
eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
the greater of forty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation
of his or her residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand dollars of the
valuation of his or her residence; or

(ii)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or sixty
percent of the valuation of his or her residence; and

(6)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less, the valuation of the
residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on the later of January
1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under
this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this ((section))
subsection only for one year because of high income, this same valuation
shall be used upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more
than one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any
other reason, the valuation upon requalification under this subsection
shall be the assessed value on January 1st of the assessment year in which the
person requalifies.

(7)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of fifty thousand dollars or less but greater than thirty
thousand dollars, the valuation of the residence shall be the assessed value of
the residence for the previous year, plus two percent. For counties that do
not revalue property annually, the valuation of the residence shall be the
previous assessed value plus two percent for each year since the previous
revaluation of the residence. If the person subsequently fails to qualify
under this subsection only for one year because of high income, the valuation
of the residence upon requalification shall be calculated as if the person had
been qualified the previous year. If the person fails to qualify for more than
one year in succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other
reason, the valuation upon requalification shall be the assessed value on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person requalifies.

(8)
If the person transfers the exemption under this section to a different
residence, the valuation of the different residence, for the purposes of
subsection (6) or (7) of this section, shall be the assessed value of the
different residence on January 1st of the assessment year in which the person
transfers the exemption.

(9)(a)
In no event may the valuation under ((this)) subsection (6) or (7) of
this section be greater than the true and fair value of the residence on
January 1st of the assessment year.

((This
subsection does)) (b) Subsections (6) and (7) of this section do not
apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the year in which the
improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the property shall be added
to the value otherwise determined under this subsection at their true and fair
value in the year in which they are made.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
valuation of a residence determined under RCW 84.36.381(7) shall apply for the
levies of all taxing districts, unless the legislative authority of a county
adopts an ordinance or resolution providing that valuations under RCW
84.36.381(7) do not apply within the county. If such an ordinance or
resolution is adopted, valuations under RCW 84.36.381(7) shall not apply to the
levy of any taxing district upon property within the county, except the levy by
the state. If the ordinance or resolution is repealed, valuation of a
residence determined under RCW 84.36.381(7) shall apply for the levies of all
taxing districts upon property within the county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
levy for a taxing district in any year shall be reduced as necessary to prevent
exemptions under RCW 84.36.381(7) from resulting in a higher tax rate than
would have occurred in the absence of the exemptions under RCW 84.36.381(7).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that large and unanticipated increases in taxes on
residential property, usually attributable to rapid increases in property
values, cause undue and excessive hardships for many homeowners. These
increased tax burdens put many of these homeowners at risk of being unable to
remain in their residences and maintain their property. Temporary financial
hardships, such as unemployment or medical costs, may also cause some
homeowners to have insufficient resources to pay property tax bills. The
deferral program created in section 5 of this act is intended to provide those
distressed taxpayers with the ability to defer taxes due so that they will be
able to remain in their homes while still paying an equitable share of the overall
property tax burden.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A claimant may defer payment of that amount of real property taxes that exceeds
six percent of the claimant's combined disposable income, but not to exceed two
thousand five hundred dollars per year. (2) Deferral of taxes under this
chapter is subject to the following conditions:

(a)
The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the
real property taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a
residence owned by a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to
be owned by each spouse or cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership
in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust
does not satisfy the ownership requirement.

(b)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence that was occupied by
the claimant as a principal place of residence.

(c)
A deferral is not allowed for taxes levied in the first full calendar year in
which the person owns the residence.

(d)
The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty insurance in
sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in the claimant's equity
value. If the claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to
the extent of the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount
deferred shall not exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in
the land or lot only.

(e)
The total amount of taxes deferred, including interest thereon, must not exceed
eighty percent of the claimant's equity value in the residence.

Sec.
6. RCW
84.38.010 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that savings once deemed adequate for retirement living
have been rendered inadequate by increased tax rates, increased property
values, and the failure of pension systems to adequately reflect such factors.
It is therefore deemed necessary that the legislature, in addition to that tax
exemption as provided for in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 as now or hereafter
amended, allow retired persons to defer payment of special assessments on their
residences, and to defer their real property tax obligations on their
residences, an amount of up to eighty percent of their equity in said
property. ((This deferral program)) The deferral provided under RCW
84.38.030 is intended to assist retired persons in maintaining their
dignity and a reasonable standard of living by residing in their own homes,
providing for their own needs, and managing their own affairs without requiring
assistance from public welfare programs.

Sec.
7. RCW
84.38.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 214 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Declarations to defer property taxes for all years following the first year under
RCW 84.38.030 may be made by filing with the county assessor no later than
thirty days before the tax is due a renewal form in duplicate, prescribed by
the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor, which affirms
the continued eligibility of the claimant.

(b)
In January of each year, the county assessor shall send to each claimant who
has been granted deferral of ad valorem taxes for the previous year under
RCW 84.38.030 renewal forms and notice to renew.

(2)
Declarations to defer special assessments shall be made by filing with the
assessor no later than thirty days before the special assessment is due on a
form to be prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the county
assessor. Upon approval, the full amount of special assessments upon such
claimant's residence shall be deferred but not to exceed an amount equal to
eighty percent of the claimant's equity value in said property.

Sec.
8. RCW
84.48.080 and 1997 c 3 s 112 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Annually during the months of September and October, the department of revenue
shall examine and compare the returns of the assessment of the property in the
several counties of the state, and the assessment of the property of railroad
and other companies assessed by the department, and proceed to equalize the
same, so that each county in the state shall pay its due and just proportion of
the taxes for state purposes for such assessment year, according to the ratio
the assessed valuation of the property in each county bears to the correct
total assessed valuation of all property in the state.

First.
The department shall classify all property, real and personal, and shall raise
and lower the assessed valuation of any class of property in any county to a
value that shall be equal, so far as possible, to the correct assessed value of
such class as of January 1st of the current year, after determining the correct
appraised value, and any adjustment applicable under RCW 84.40.0305 for the
property, for the purpose of ascertaining the just amount of tax due from each
county for state purposes. In equalizing personal property as of January 1st
of the current year, the department shall use the assessment level of the
preceding year. Such classification may be on the basis of types of property,
geographical areas, or both. For purposes of this section, for each county
that has not provided the department with an assessment return by December 1st,
the department shall proceed, using facts and information and in a manner it
deems appropriate, to estimate the value of each class of property in the
county.

Second.
The department shall keep a full record of its proceedings and the same shall
be published annually by the department.

(2)
The department shall levy the state taxes authorized by law. The amount levied
in any one year for general state purposes shall not exceed the lawful dollar
rate on the dollar of the assessed value of the property of the entire state as
equalized under this section. The department shall apportion the amount of tax
for state purposes levied by the department, among the several counties, in
proportion to the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the county for
the year as equalized by the department: PROVIDED, That for purposes of this
apportionment, the department shall recompute the previous year's levy and the
apportionment thereof to correct for changes and errors in taxable values
reported to the department after October 1 of the preceding year and shall
adjust the apportioned amount of the current year's state levy for each county
by the difference between the apportioned amounts established by the original
and revised levy computations for the previous year. For purposes of this
section, changes in taxable values mean a final adjustment made by a county
board of equalization, the state board of tax appeals, or a court of competent
jurisdiction and shall include additions of omitted property, other additions
or deletions from the assessment or tax rolls, any assessment return provided
by a county to the department subsequent to December 1st, or a change in the
indicated ratio of a county. Errors in taxable values mean errors corrected by
a final reviewing body.

In
addition to computing a levy under this subsection ((that is reduced under
RCW 84.55.012)), the department shall compute a hypothetical levy at the
rate authorized in RCW 84.52.065 without regard to ((the)) any
reduction under RCW ((84.55.012)) 84.55.010 and 84.55.0121. This
hypothetical levy shall also be apportioned among the several counties in
proportion to the valuation of the taxable property of the county for the year,
as equalized by the department, in the same manner as the actual levy and shall
be used by the county assessors for the purpose of recomputing and establishing
a consolidated levy under RCW 84.52.010.

(3)
The department shall have authority to adopt rules and regulations to enforce
obedience to its orders in all matters in relation to the returns of county assessments,
the equalization of values, and the apportionment of the state levy by the
department.

(4)
After the completion of the duties prescribed in this section, the director of
the department shall certify the record of the proceedings of the department
under this section, the tax levies made for state purposes and the
apportionment thereof among the counties, and the certification shall be
available for public inspection.

Sec.
9. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of
regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy
imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis until the
combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any
property or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate of regular
property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW
84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts,
and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public
hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to ((the)) any reduction under RCW ((84.55.012))
84.55.010 and 84.55.0121.

Sec.
10. RCW
84.55.005 and 1997 c 393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Adjusted inflation" means:

(a)
Ninety percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2001;

(b)
Eighty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2002;

(c)
Seventy percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2003;

(d)
Sixty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2004;

(e)
Fifty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2005;

(f)
Forty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2006;

(g)
Thirty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2007;

(h)
Twenty percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2008;

(i)
Ten percent of inflation for taxes levied for collection in 2009; and

(j)
Zero for taxes levied for collection in 2010 and thereafter;

(2)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(((2)))
(3) "Limit factor" means:

(a)
((For taxing districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the
calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred six percent)) For
the state one hundred percent plus adjusted inflation;

(b)
((For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW
84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one
hundred six percent;

(c))) For
all other districts, ((the lesser of one hundred six percent or)) one
hundred percent plus inflation; and

(((3)))
(4) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW
84.04.140.

Sec.
11. RCW
84.55.050 and 1989 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate limitations, regular
property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing district in an amount exceeding
the limitations provided for in this chapter if:

(a)
The legislative authority of the taxing district declares that exceeding the
limitations is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health, or safety, or support of government and its existing public
institutions; and

(b)
Such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the
voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election
held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district
called by the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the
voters.

(2)
Any election held pursuant to this section shall be held not more than twelve
months prior to the date on which the proposed levy is to be made. The ballot
of the proposition shall state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly state
any conditions which are applicable under subsection (3) of this section.

(((2)
After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the dollar amount of
such levy shall be used for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter, except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section.))

(3)
The period for which increased levies are made under this section shall not
exceed nine years. A proposition placed before the voters under this
section may:

(a)
Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made to less than nine
years;

(b)
Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made((, but if the
limited purpose includes making redemption payments on bonds, the period for
which the increased levies are made shall not exceed nine years));

(c)
Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate allowed for the district; or

(d)
Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.

(4)
After ((the expiration of a limited period or the satisfaction of a limited
purpose, whichever comes first)) a levy authorized under this section
expires, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:

(a)
The ((limited proposition under subsection (3) of)) levy authorized
under this section had not been approved; and

(b)
The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which would otherwise
have been allowed under this chapter during the years levies were made under ((the
limited proposition)) this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
amount calculated by multiplying the increase in assessed value in that
district resulting from new construction, improvements to property, and any
increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property by the regular
property tax levy rate of that district for the preceding year, may be spent
only for capital purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
department of revenue shall develop an assessment improvement plan with the
objective of improving the uniformity, accuracy, and accountability of property
assessments state-wide. The plan shall include the development of guidelines
and standards for assessment administration, including program management and property
classification and valuation. The plan shall provide recommendations on
processes and procedures that assure quality assessment administration in the
most efficient and cost‑effective manner. The plan shall also recommend
processes for reviewing and reporting on individual county performance, and
programs to assist counties to correct noncompliance. The department shall
estimate the cost and time required to implement the plan. The department
shall submit the plan to the committee on finance of the house of
representatives and the committee on ways and means of the senate before
January 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. RCW
84.55.0101 (Limit factor--Authorization for taxing district to use
one hundred six percent or less--Ordinance or resolution) and 1997 c 3 s 204
are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act apply to taxes levied for collection in 2001
and thereafter.

---
END ---