BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
72.09.100 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the power to provide
for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove statutory and other
restrictions which have limited work programs in the past. For purposes of
establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the
department consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:

(1)
CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. (a) The employer model industries in
this class shall be operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or
nonprofit organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and
the department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

Any
agreement between the organization and the department must be reviewed and
approved by the correctional industries board of directors. The review shall
include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed agreement on the
Washington state business community and labor market, and shall include a
public hearing. Public testimony shall be allowed at the hearing, and the
board shall notify each Washington business that has the same three-digit
standard industrial classification code as the organization seeking the
agreement of the date, time, and place of the hearing. The board may not
approve any agreement that will have an adverse economic impact on a Washington
business. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), "Washington
business" means a person subject to the provisions of chapter 82.04 RCW.

(b)
The customer model industries in this class shall be operated and managed by
the department to provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with
products or services currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign
suppliers. The correctional industries board of directors shall review these
proposed industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

(c)
The department of corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody
services without charge to the participating firms.

(d)
Inmates who work in free venture industries shall do so at their own choice.
They shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar
nature in the locality in which the industry is located, as determined by the director
of correctional industries. If the director cannot reasonably determine the
comparable wage, then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

(e)
An inmate who is employed in the class I program of correctional industries
shall not be eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of
the provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2)
CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The
industries selected for development within this class shall, as much as
possible, match the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the
work opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely
patterned after private sector industries but with the objective of reducing
public support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services of
this industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will be
ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing
manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit
organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
Correctional industries products and services shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct
a yearly marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of
the proposed products and services on the Washington state business community.
Industries in this class shall make every effort to eliminate the creation
of surpluses. However, to avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to
the state, when there is no public sector market for such goods, byproducts and
surpluses of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold
to private persons, at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of
timber, agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to
public agencies or to private persons may be donated to nonprofit
organizations. All sales of surplus products shall be carried out in
accordance with rules prescribed by the secretary.

Security
and custody services shall be provided without charge by the department of
corrections.

Inmates
working in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
be paid for their work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid
for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located
and which is approved by the director of correctional industries.

Subject
to approval of the correctional industries board, provisions of RCW 41.06.380
prohibiting contracting out work performed by classified employees shall not
apply to contracts with Washington state businesses entered into by the
department of corrections through class II industries.

(3)
CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall
be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and
managed to accomplish the following objectives:

(a)
Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and experience so that the
inmate will be able to qualify for better work both within correctional
industries and the free community. It is not intended that an inmate's work
within this class of industries should be his or her final and total work
experience as an inmate.

(b)
Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c)
Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All
able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in
other classes of industries shall work in this class.

Except
for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be
paid for their work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale
shall be adopted by the secretary of corrections.

(4)
CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed
to provide services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or
infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.

Inmates
in this program shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or
licensed by the department of corrections. A unit of local government shall
provide work supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the
inmate's wage.

The
department of corrections shall reimburse participating units of local government
for liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates
who work in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar
nature in the locality in which the industry is located.

(5)
CLASS V: COMMUNITY SERVICE PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall be subject
to supervision by the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of
industries is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off
all or part of a community service order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment
shall be in a community service program operated by the state, local units of
government, or a nonprofit agency.

To the extent that funds are specifically made available for such
purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for
workers compensation insurance costs.

---
END ---