BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any person sentenced to death or to life imprisonment without possibility of
release or parole may request the department to issue an order for DNA testing
of any appropriate evidence available for testing which may be a reasonable
basis for proving the person's innocence, if DNA test results were not
available at the time of conviction or were not allowed in the court in which
the conviction occurred.

(2)
The department may issue an order for DNA testing when DNA testing is
appropriate under rules adopted by the department and was not available or
allowed in the court in which the conviction occurred.

(3)
The order for DNA testing shall be served on the law enforcement agency holding
the evidence by personal service or by any form of mail requiring a return
receipt.

(4)
Within twenty days of the date of service of an order for DNA testing, any
party required to produce evidence for DNA testing may petition in superior
court to bar or postpone DNA testing.

(5)
The order for DNA testing shall contain:

(a)
An explanation of the right to proceed in superior court under subsection (4)
of this section; and

(b)
Notice that if no one proceeds under subsection (4) of this section, the agency
issuing the order will schedule DNA testing and will notify the producing law
enforcement agency of the time and place of testing by regular mail.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall adopt such administrative rules as are necessary to implement
this act. The rules shall define, at a minimum, the following terms:
Appropriate evidence available for testing, and reasonable basis for proving
the person's innocence. The rules shall also establish the procedure by which
offenders may request testing, the procedure by which these requests are
evaluated, the procedure by which an offender may appeal to the department for
reconsideration of a request that was denied, and the procedure by which any
testing will occur. In no case may the department adopt a rule that is
inconsistent with the need to maintain a chain of custody for any evidence
subject to testing.

The
department shall also, by rule, establish what costs it will incur and what
costs, if any, shall be the responsibility of the offender. The department is
specifically authorized to adopt, by rule, a lifetime limitation on the number
of evidence testing requests an offender may make or the total amount of public
funds spent per offender for testing, or both. The department is encouraged to
adopt a fee schedule that includes an offender copayment requirement that
balances the need to deter frivolous requests with the need to conduct tests
that may prove an offender innocent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

Nothing
in this act shall be construed to create a new or additional cause of action in
any court. Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit any rights offenders
might otherwise have to court access under any other statutory or
constitutional provision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---