BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that retailers have an important role in the state's tax
system by collecting sales or use tax from consumers and remitting it to the
state. Frequent changes to the tax system place a burden on these businesses.
To alleviate that burden and to improve the accuracy of tax collection, it is
the intent of the legislature to provide that changes to sales and use tax may
be made four times a year and that the department of revenue be provided
adequate time to give advance notice to retailers of any such change. Changes
in sales and use tax rates that are the result of annexation are also
restricted to this time period, for uniformity and simplification.
Additionally, retailers who rely on technology developed and provided by the
department of revenue, such as the department's geographic information system,
to calculate tax rates shall be held harmless from errors resulting from such
use.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A local sales and use tax change shall take effect (a) no sooner than
seventy-five days after the department receives notice of the change and (b)
only on the first day of January, April, July, or October.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "local sales and use tax change"
means enactment or revision of local sales and use taxes under this chapter or
any other statute, including changes resulting from referendum or annexation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A new
section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

A
sales and use tax rate change under this chapter or chapter 82.12 RCW shall be
imposed (1) no sooner than seventy-five days after its enactment into law and
(2) only on the first day of January, April, July, or October.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who collects and remits sales or use tax to the department and who
calculates the tax using technology developed and provided by the department
shall be held harmless and is not liable for the difference in amount due nor
subject to penalties or interest in regards to rate calculation errors
resulting from the proper use of such technology.

Sec.
5. RCW
82.14.070 and 1970 ex.s. c 94 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of this chapter that any local sales and use tax adopted pursuant
to this chapter be as consistent and uniform as possible with the state sales
and use tax and with other local sales and use taxes adopted pursuant to this
chapter. It is further the intent of this chapter that the local sales and use
tax shall be imposed upon an individual taxable event simultaneously with the
imposition of the state sales or use tax upon the same taxable event. The rule
making powers of the state department of revenue contained in RCW 82.08.060 and
82.32.300 shall be applicable to this chapter. The department shall, as soon
as practicable, and with the assistance of the appropriate associations of
county prosecutors and city attorneys, draft a model resolution and ordinance.
((No resolution or ordinance or any amendment thereto adopted pursuant to
this chapter shall be effective, except upon the first day of a calendar month.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
code reviser shall, as appropriate, place cross-reference sections to sections
2 and 4 of this act in chapters 36.100, 81.100, 81.104, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---