BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to provide improved means of review by which to
evaluate the budget requests of state agencies. The legislature establishes
the zero-base and modified zero-base budget review process to help the
legislature establish priorities in the expenditure of public resources for
state programs and services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Review" means a modified zero-base budget review or a zero-based
budget review, as appropriate.

(2)
"Committees" means the appropriations committee of the house of
representatives and the ways and means committee of the senate and the
committees' respective staffs.

(3)
"Modified zero-base budget review" means a written document prepared
by the staff to the committees that contains an analysis of the budget and the
programmatic and fiscal basis of the agency on which the review is conducted.
A modified zero-base budget review may consider the agency's past and current
incremental funding.

(4)
"Zero-base budget review" means a written document prepared by the
committees that contains an analysis of the budget and the programmatic and
fiscal basis of the agency on which the review is conducted. A zero-base
budget review shall undertake this analysis without regard to the agency's past
and current incremental funding.

(5)
"Program" means a group of agency services designed to accomplish
specific public goals and result in specific public benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
In the omnibus operating budget bill or in other legislation, the legislature
shall identify agencies on which a zero-base budget review or a modified
zero-base budget review shall be conducted during each fiscal year of the
biennium. When specifying agencies on which the review will be conducted, the
legislature shall seek to complement and avoid duplication of the activities of
the proposed activities of the joint legislative audit and review committee
under chapter 44.28 RCW.

(2)
The committees shall jointly conduct the reviews of state agencies and programs
as specified by the legislature under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The reviews shall be provided to the committees either by September 1st
following the fiscal year in which the review takes place, or as specified in
the omnibus operating budget bill or in other legislation.

(4)
The house of representatives and the senate may contract with public and
private independent professional and technical experts as necessary to complete
the review.

(5)
Each agency receiving appropriations in the omnibus operating budget bill shall
be reviewed at least once during the six-year period beginning on July 1, 2001,
and at least once every six years thereafter.

(6)
When conducting the review, the committees shall consult with the joint
legislative audit and review committee. The review is intended to complement,
and not to duplicate, performance audits and performance reviews conducted by
the joint legislative audit and review committee under chapter 44.28 RCW.

(7)
To facilitate the review, the director of financial management shall cooperate
with the committees to establish the method and format for the reporting of
agency information. The director of financial management and all agencies
shall comply in a timely manner with requests by the committees for information
related to the review.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
modified zero-base budget review shall include, but is not limited to, the
following:

(1)
A statement of the statutory basis and the history of each program within the
agency that is being reviewed, including the extent to which the program or
expenditures are required by state, federal, or local law;

(2)
A description, with supporting cost and full-time equivalent staff data, of the
activities performed in each program, the specific services provided, and the
populations served by those services;

(3)
An analysis of the major costs and benefits of operating each program within
the designated agency including subprograms within the programs where
applicable, and the rationale for specific expenditure and staffing levels;

(4)
An analysis estimating each program's administrative and other overhead costs;
and

(5)
Where applicable, an analysis estimating the amount of funds or benefits that
actually reach the intended recipients.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
zero-base budget review shall include, but is not limited to, each of the
components of the modified zero-base budget review in section 4 of this act in
addition to the following:

(1)
An analysis of the quantified objectives of each program within the agency;

(2)
An analysis of the activities that are intended to accomplish these objectives;

(3)
Indicators of quantified measures of effectiveness and efficiency of
achievement of these objectives;

(4)
The level of funding and full-time equivalent staff required to accomplish each
activity, without regard to past incremental levels of funding; and

(5)
If the legislation requiring the review specifies alternate levels of funding
for the agency, an analysis of the agency budget at the different level of
funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 44 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---