BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

Sec.
101. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade
Crossing Protective Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ ((111,000))

222,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(((1)))
The utilities and transportation commission shall develop a competitive rail
grade crossing safety grant program which will fully fund selected safety
projects to the extent allowable under chapter 81.53 RCW.

(((3) The appropriation in this section is for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000.))

(End
of part)

PART
II

TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES

Sec.
201. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COUNTY
ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural
Arterial Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((72,510,000))

60,663,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((9,546,000))

1,546,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 376,000

County
Arterial Preservation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 28,612,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((111,044,000))

91,197,000

((The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$8,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely
for projects on the freight and goods systems on county roads.))

Sec.
202. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Urban
Arterial Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 104,508,000

Transportation
Improvement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((99,414,000))

119,414,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((33,496,000))

20,396,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((237,418,000))

244,318,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: ((To
the extent practicable, the board shall give preference, for amounts which
would otherwise be granted to cities, to those projects which complement
projects funded under the county corridor congestion relief program contained
in section 231(8) of this act.)) The transportation improvement account‑-state
appropriation includes $30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds
authorized by RCW 47.26.500. The proceeds from the bonds will be used to fund
local agency transportation projects.

Sec.
203. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((807,000))

767,000

Sec.
204. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE FREIGHT
MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

((Transportation))
Motor Vehicle Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 600,000

Sec.
205. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS
BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((154,538,000))

165,699,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 6,153,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((160,860,000))

172,021,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The following amounts are provided solely for administration of the field
operations group subprogram: (($120,372,000)) $132,678,000 of
the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation; $2,854,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-federal appropriation; and $83,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-private/local appropriation.

(2)
The following amounts are provided solely for the administration of the
commercial vehicle division subprogram: (($26,367,000)) $24,362,500
of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation; $3,299,000 of
the state patrol highway account‑-federal appropriation; and $86,000 of
the state patrol highway account‑-private/local appropriation.

(3)
(($7,799,000)) $8,658,500 of the state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for the administration of the traffic
investigation division subprogram.

(4)
(($1,137,000)) $638,000 of the state patrol highway
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the license fraud task
force to begin on July 1, 1999. Positions funded are one sergeant/detective,
three Washington state patrol detectives, and one clerical support person, for
administrative support for the task force as a whole. (($115,400)) $61,500
of this amount is for reimbursement to the department of revenue and (($228,315))
$117,415 of this amount is for reimbursement to the attorney general's
office. If Senate Bill No. 5706 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Any funds
provided in this subsection not used to implement Senate Bill No. 5706 as
enacted by the legislature shall revert at the end of the 1999-01 biennium.

(5)
$1,435,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to the field operations group subprogram as a one-time
appropriation to begin funding phase III of the Washington state patrol's
upgrade to the state-wide emergency communication system. The Washington state
patrol shall provide a full analysis of the costs, benefits, and requirements
for completing all phases of the upgrade to the state-wide emergency
communication system to the senate transportation committee and the house of
representatives transportation committee by December 1, 1999.

(6)
The Washington state patrol is authorized to use the federal community-oriented
policing program (COPS) for 18 COPS troopers to begin in July 2000. The
troopers must be used on the state's highways and up to six may be utilized in
the Vancouver, Washington area.

(7)
$750,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for extraordinary costs incurred in response to natural
disasters, extraordinary weather events, or other emergent issues state-wide.
These funds shall be placed in reserve and only expended upon approval from the
office of financial management after consultation with the chairs of the house
of representatives and senate transportation committees. Any unexpended funds
shall revert to the state patrol highway account‑-state.

(8)
$2,300,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation is provided
solely for costs incurred by the patrol's participation in the world trade
organization conference. Upon final reconciliation of the costs incurred, any
unexpended funds shall revert to the state patrol highway account‑-state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. A
new section is added to 1999 1st sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL--INVESTIGATIVE SERVICES BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,860,000

Sec.
207. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((67,015,000))

65,827,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 104,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 743,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((67,862,000))

66,674,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$877,000 of the state patrol highway account‑‑state appropriation
is provided solely to maintain pursuit vehicles and provide for replacement of
the vehicles at 110,000 miles. The agency may purchase a total of 354 pursuit
vehicles during the biennium ending June 30, 2001. The appropriation in this
section reflects carry forward and new funding due to the consolidation of
gasoline, maintenance, parts, and pursuit vehicles into the fleet section of
the support services bureau.

Sec.
208. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT
AND SUPPORT SERVICES

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,000

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((118,000))

102,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((50,000))

80,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((6,578,000))

7,213,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((4,571,000))

4,101,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 123,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,317,000))

11,622,000

Sec.
209. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-INFORMATION
SYSTEMS

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((102,000))

44,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((46,000))

32,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((5,725,000))

6,158,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((3,651,000))

3,034,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 292,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,524,000))

9,562,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$745,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is a
reappropriation of funds originally appropriated for the document scanner
project in the 1997-99 biennium.

Sec.
210. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE SERVICES

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 26,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 556,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((56,137,000))

57,800,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 2,907,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((59,626,000))

61,289,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(((4)))
(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6009 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6009 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((5)))
(2) $15,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2201 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature.

Sec.
211. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER SERVICES

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,960,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((78,075,000))

78,147,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((80,035,000))

80,107,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
By September 1, 2000, the department of licensing in conjunction with the
office of the administrator for the courts and in cooperation with local
jurisdictions, shall provide a report to the governor and the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees on the feasibility, cost,
and timing for implementing electronic transfer of traffic citation data from
the office of the administrator for the courts and local courts throughout the
state to the department of licensing.

(2)
$2,880,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the department to enter into a contract for the implementation of an
improved state driver's license and identicard. The contract with the vendor
providing the improved license and identicard shall state that the license and
the identicard shall not contain: (a) The driver's social security number in
either visible or machine readable form; or (b) the driver's fingerprint or
thumbprint. Consistent with RCW 42.17.260(9) the department shall not sell or
otherwise make available any information that it gathers from citizens of the
state of Washington in administering the driver's licensing program except as
already authorized in Title 46 RCW.

(((2)))
(3) In September of 1999 the department of licensing shall report to the
senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee on:

(a)
The controls implemented by the department to ensure the integrity and
credibility of the written driver's license test administered by the
department; and

(b)
The policies and procedures implemented by the department to ensure that the
driver's manuals produced and distributed by the department contain correct
data based on current federal, state, and local statutes, ordinances, and
rules.

(4)
$17,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 1774 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 1774 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$130,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to implement House Bill No. 2259 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If House Bill No. 2259 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$34,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5374 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5374 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(((8)))
(7) $329,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5399 enacted as passed by the
legislature.

Sec.
212. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY
MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((44,508,000))

46,408,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,908,000))

46,808,000

Sec.
213. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics
Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((4,010,000))

5,047,000

Aircraft
Search and Rescue Safety and

Education
Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 159,000

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 247,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,416,000))

5,206,000

Sec.
214. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((630,010,000))

274,197,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((234,939,000))

202,347,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((43,344,000))

29,144,000

((High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 110,000))

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation $ 55,220,000

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 197,284,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... 56,808,000))

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 8,662,000

((Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,750,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 1,750,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,229,877,000))

569,570,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for the location, design, right of
way acquisition, or construction of state highway projects designated as
improvements under RCW 47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are
provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The special category C account‑-state appropriation of $55,220,000
includes $40,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate
Bill No. 5060 or House Bill No. 1203 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $1,285,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1) for match on
federal demonstration projects. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3)
The department shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the
senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee and the office of financial management on the timing and the scope of
work being performed for the regional transit authority known as sound
transit. This report shall provide a description of all department activities
related to the regional transit authority including investments in state‑owned
infrastructure.

(4)
((The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.

(5)
The north Sumner interchange project shall be funded entirely from the motor
vehicle account appropriation.)) $2,270,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the north
Sumner interchange project. The project shall no longer receive a portion
of its funding from the economic development account.

(((6)
$34,920,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. The amount provided in
this subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the freight
mobility strategic investment board.

(7)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $469,779,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(8)
$500,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for analysis and design of congestion solutions at the intersections of
the South Lake Union/Mercer corridor with Interstate 5 and SR 99. The amount
provided in this subsection shall be expended on the state's portion of the
project. The department's authority to expend the amount referenced in this
subsection is contingent on the city of Seattle appropriating $500,000 or more
toward design and analysis for the local street portion of the project.

(9)
$10,000,000)) (5) $50,000,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation ((and $40,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state
appropriation are)) is provided as a cash contribution for the
development of the public private initiatives project at Tacoma Narrows. State
funds shall be used initially for the acquisition of right of way and the
forensic studies of the existing bridge including purchase of equipment
necessary to conduct the studies. The balance of state funds not required for
acquisition of right of way and forensic studies shall be placed with the
designated bond trustee at the same time the privately secured debt proceeds
are deposited.

(((11)))
(6) $5,800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation
is provided solely for the completion of the weigh stations at Stanwood and Cle
Elum along with weigh in motion at those sites an weigh in motion at Fort Lewis
Northbound. The Washington state patrol and department of transportation shall
work cooperatively to complete these projects.

(((12)))
(7) $485,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
a reappropriation provided solely to enable the translake committee to finalize
and present its recommendations. Upon presentation of the recommendations, or
upon the expenditure of the appropriation provided by this subsection, the
department of transportation shall disband the committee.

(((13)))
(8) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to the Washington state department of transportation, office of
urban mobility, to advance the recommendations of the translake Washington
study committee. These funds shall be used to develop a scope of work for an
environmental impact statement and related engineering work, including an
environmental strategy, a decision process, a statement of purpose and need,
and a formal notice of intent. None of the appropriation for the scope of work
for the environmental impact statement shall be available to support any activities
of the translake Washington study committee.

(((14)
$500,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for predesign of the northeast 44th street interchange on I-405. The
department of transportation and the city of Renton shall develop a proposal
that includes a funding plan for the interchange that specifies the partner's
share of the cost. The department and the city shall report to the legislative
transportation committees by December 1, 1999.)) (9) The motor vehicle
fund‑-state appropriation includes $5,527,000 in proceeds from the sale
of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of cash contributions, or
the payment of other costs incident to the location, development, design, right
of way, and construction of the Tacoma narrows bridge improvements under the
public-private transportation initiative program authorized under chapter 47.46
RCW.

Sec.
215. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 1,212,000))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((10,162,000))

5,847,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,374,000))

5,847,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes (($10,162,000)) $4,635,000
in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of
cash contributions, or the payment of other costs incident to the location,
development, design, right of way, and construction of the Tacoma narrows
bridge improvements under the public-private transportation initiative program
authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW; and for support costs of the public-private
transportation initiatives program.

Sec.
216. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((251,426,000))

239,927,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((887,000))

486,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,417,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((255,730,000))

243,830,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
If portions of the appropriations in this section are required to fund
maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by federal
emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides, supplemental
appropriations will be requested to restore state funding for ongoing
maintenance activities.

(2)
The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys
received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of
the motor vehicle fund‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange
shall not affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

Sec.
217. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((318,691,000))

126,740,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((284,587,000))

373,987,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,117,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((121,000))

50,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((606,516,000))

503,894,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(((1)))
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $6,650,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for
emergency purposes. However, the transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(((2)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.))

Sec.
218. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC
OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM Q

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 221,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((37,085,000))

34,785,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 1,662,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 122,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((39,090,000))

36,790,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $4,324,000 for
state matching funds for federally selected competitive grant or congressional
earmark projects other than commercial vehicle information system and network
(CVISN). These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as
federal funds are secured and a state match is required. If matching federal
funds are not obtained by September 30, 2000, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $600,000 for a
two-year pilot program for contracted roving service patrols. The department
shall provide a progress report on this pilot program to the office of
financial management, the senate transportation committee, and the house of
representatives transportation committee on December 1, 2000. The pilot
program will be evaluated with future direction and funding to be determined by
the documented results and benefits of the pilot program.

Sec.
219. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((4,464,000))

2,989,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((98,390,000))

87,620,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 125,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((6,308,000))

6,233,000

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 1,517,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((110,804,000))

96,967,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:
$586,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to enable the secretary of transportation to implement a leadership
training program at the department of transportation. The program shall
include a mentoring component. The department shall develop performance
measures to evaluate the effectiveness of the program, including but not
limited to a performance measure to determine the effect of the program on
employee retention. The department shall provide a progress report on the
training program to the office of financial management, the senate
transportation committee, and the house of representatives transportation
committee by December 1, 2000.

Sec.
220. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM T

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((12,109,000))

12,480,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 17,000,000

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 1,371,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION......... ........ $ ((30,480,000))

29,480,000

Sec.
221. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

((Transportation
Account))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((2,595,000))

2,713,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,155,000))

1,355,000

(2)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 907,000

(3)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND
SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 3,743,000

(4)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((2,240,000))

1,990,000

(5)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

((Transportation
Account))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((12,039,000))

11,539,000

(6)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((3,462,000))

3,262,000

(7)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 158,000

(8)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION STATE PARKING
SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 90,000

(9)
FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS
SURCHARGE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 1,100,000

(10)
FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 392,000

Sec.
222. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM V

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((3,701,000))

2,201,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,253,000))

1,313,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((7,187,000))

777,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... ((7,345,000))

545,000

((Transportation
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 105,000))

Transportation
Programs Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,600,000

Transportation
Programs Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,800,000

Transportation
Programs Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 105,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((800,000))

50,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((24,391,000))

19,391,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After January 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the transportation account‑-state and the
transportation programs account‑-state appropriations. However, the
program shall not expend more than the total amount appropriated from these
accounts.

(2)
Up to (($750,000)) $250,000 of the transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for grants and activities relating to
coordinating special needs transportation among state and local providers.
When selecting grant recipients, the agency council on coordinated
transportation shall give priority to projects and programs that can be
accomplished in the 1999-2001 biennium. ((The department may expend up to
$250,000 without a matching appropriation. The department's authority to expend
more than that amount is conditioned upon the legislature authorizing a
matching appropriation equal to the total expenditure of the amount provided in
this subsection.

(2))) (3)
$50,000 of the public transportation systems account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to continue and enhance an existing pilot project between a
public transit provider and a school district expanding public transit service
to high school students in order to reduce the use of single occupancy
vehicles.

(((3)))
(4) The department shall assess its commute trip reduction program. The
assessment shall include an evaluation of tax credits or other incentives to
employers who reduce commute trips to their work sites by encouraging employees
to telecommute. Up to $50,000 of the air pollution control account--state
appropriation is provided for a pilot project implementing telecommuting as
part of the commute trip reduction program. The pilot project may include use
of tax credits or other financial incentives.

(((4)))
(5) In evaluating applications for rural mobility grants to public
transportation agencies, the department shall give added weight to projects
that improve connectivity among transit providers and across jurisdictional
boundaries.

(((5)))
(6) $4,900,000 of the transportation account‑‑federal
appropriation is provided solely for commute trip reduction programs
administered by the department of transportation. These funds come from the
TEA‑21 congestion mitigation air quality program. ((The office of
financial management shall place $1,000,000 of the air pollution control
account‑‑state appropriation in reserve status.))

Sec.
223. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM
W

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((140,135,000))

118,355,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ ((29,575,000))

42,466,000

Passenger
Ferry Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((789,000))

395,000

((Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 116,221,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.............. ... $ ((286,720,000))

161,216,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for improving the Washington state
ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction
and improvements. The appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section, unless otherwise specified, are provided to
carry out only the projects in the Washington state ferries capital program
plan - version ((3)) 1. The department shall reconcile the
1997-99 capital expenditures within ninety days of the end of the biennium and
submit a final report to the senate transportation committee, the house of
representatives transportation committee, and the office of financial
management.

(2)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $27,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.60.800 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements,
and long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the Puget Sound capital construction account in lieu of bond proceeds for
any part of the state appropriation.

(((4)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $110,729,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(5)
The department shall structure the request for proposal for the purchase of
passenger-only ferries authorized under RCW 47.60.652 to include the purchase
of a fifth back-up ferry to support maintenance schedules, emergency service
needs, and provide continuity of service on all passenger-only ferry routes.
The purchase of a fifth passenger-only ferry is subject to subsequent
legislative appropriation.))

Sec.
224. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Marine
Operating Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((303,014,000))

148,330,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 132,404,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 280,734,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After May 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the marine operating account‑-state and
the Puget Sound ferry operations account‑-state appropriations. However,
the program shall not expend more than the total amount appropriated from these
accounts.

(2)
The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of (($29,104,000))
$27,459,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 1999-2001 biennium. If the
actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may
not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall
request a supplemental appropriation.

(((2)))
(3) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry employees.
The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees during the 1999-2001
biennium may not exceed (($205,640,000)) $188,866,000 plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government employees in
excess of $341.75 a month annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by
the number of eligible marine employees for the respective fiscal year, a
dollar amount as prescribed by the office of financial management for costs
associated with pension amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by
the office of financial management for salary increases during the 1999-2001
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation
paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A"
and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The
prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that
shall be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used to
increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 1999, and
thereafter, as established in the 1999-2001 general fund operating budget.

(((3)
Up to $2,770,000 of the marine operating account‑-state appropriation may
be used for leasing and operating an appropriate passenger only ferry vessel
for the purpose of supporting existing, or testing new, passenger only service
while testing alternative vessel technologies.))

(4)
The department, when implementing ferry service reductions, shall, to the
extent possible, maintain peak hour vehicle and passenger service capacity,
summer tourist route capacity, and a fall/winter/spring presence on all
domestic auto ferry routes.

Sec.
225. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM
Y

Essential
Rail Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 85,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((15,094,000))

10,294,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((95,915,000))

7,515,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... ((10,000,000))

50,000

Transportation
Programs Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,441,000

Transportation
Programs Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,950,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((5,000,000))

8,544,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((126,094,000))

65,879,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After January 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the transportation account‑-state and the
transportation programs account‑-state appropriations. However, the
program shall not expend more than the total amount appropriated from these
accounts.

(2)
No appropriation in this section may be used to fund rail passenger service
south of Portland, Oregon.

(((2)))
(3) (($2,000,000)) $1,000,000 of the transportation programs
account‑-state appropriation and (($4,000,000)) $2,700,000
of the high capacity transportation account‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for the freight rail assistance program to provide grants and
loans for light density rail lines.

(((3)
$3,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for acquisition of up to six rail passenger
cars to add capacity to existing advanced technology train sets operating in
Washington state.))

(4)
$6,298,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided to fund the operation of a second train set providing
additional roundtrip service from Seattle to Vancouver, British Columbia. The
department's authority to expend the appropriation referenced in this
subsection for service north of Blaine is conditioned upon Canada, the province
of British Columbia, and/or private sources undertaking the capital
expenditures necessary to make the rail capital improvements required to
facilitate improved round trip rail service between Seattle and Vancouver, B.C.

(5)
(($10,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation and
$5,000,000)) $2,300,000 of the public transportation systems account‑-state
appropriation ((are)) is provided solely for the King street
maintenance facility to be built in partnership with Amtrak. The amount
referenced in this subsection is conditioned on the execution of agreements
between the department of transportation, Amtrak, sound transit, and other
participating parties which will assure that the maintenance and operation of
the maintenance facility will not require state funding, except for billings
for maintenance of state owned passenger trains.

(6)
To the greatest extent practicable, expenditure of funds shall maximize funds
from partnerships and coordinate with other agencies investing in track
improvements.

(7)
$5,000,000 of the transportation programs account‑-federal
appropriation is provided from TEA-21 surface transportation program
enhancement funds is provided solely for restoration of and improvements to the
King Street station.

Sec.
226. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 231 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((129,886,000))

13,283,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 8,040,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation ... $ ((10,767,000))

702,000

((Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,250,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 1,750,000))

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation...................... ........ $ 150,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((155,577,000))

23,909,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$300,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to establish alternatives for flood management and flood hazard
reduction projects in the Chehalis basin.

(a)
The department of transportation shall convene a technical committee to develop
watershed-based solutions to flooding within the Chehalis basin. The technical
committee shall be comprised of representatives of the department of
transportation, department of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the military
department's emergency management division, and affected counties and tribes.
The department of transportation shall also seek the participation of the
United States army corps of engineers, federal emergency management
administration, the United States geological survey, the United States fish and
wildlife service, the United States environmental protection agency, and other
entities with critical knowledge related to the structural or nonstructural
flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis basin. Funds shall be
distributed by the department of transportation for alternative analysis,
mapping, and model testing projects as recommended by the technical committee.
The solutions considered by the technical committee shall be consistent with
fish and habitat recovery efforts and avoid additional flood hazard to
downstream communities. The department of transportation shall present a
report to the senate transportation committee and the house of representatives
transportation committee by December 1, 1999, regarding findings and progress
made by funded projects.

(b)
If the federal government makes funds available to accomplish the project
described in (a) of this subsection, the department of transportation shall
place the appropriation identified in this section in reserve.

(2)
(($85,121,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as
identified by the freight mobility strategic investment board. The amount
provided in this subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the
freight mobility strategic investment board.)) $3,000,000 of the motor
vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the Allen
Street bridge freight mobility project. The amount for this project can only
be expended upon authorization of the freight mobility strategic investment
board.

(3)
$400,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a study by the senate transportation committee and the house of
representatives transportation committee in cooperation with the port of Benton
developing a strategic corridor feasibility and master site plan for the port
of Benton. If the port of Benton does not provide at least $200,000 to fund
the plan development, the transportation fund‑-state appropriation
referenced in this subsection shall lapse and this subsection shall be null and
void.

(4)
((The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $105,121,000
in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(5)
$10,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to fund the first phase of a multiphase cooperative project
with the state of Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The department shall
not expend the appropriation in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal
sites has been reached which protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon
appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.

(6))) The
motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $1,167,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1). The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(((7)
$5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a small city pavement preservation program, to be administered by
the department's TransAid division. The department, in consultation with
stakeholders, shall establish program guidelines. The guidelines should
include but not be limited to a provision limiting program eligibility to
cities with a population of 2,500 or less.

(8)
$20,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a county corridor congestion relief program, to be administered by
the department's TransAid division. The purpose of the program is to provide
funding for congested urban corridors, as defined and selected by the
department of transportation in consultation with counties, regional
transportation planning organizations, and the transportation improvement
board. At a minimum, project selection criteria should include: Consistency
with regional transportation plans; measurable improvements in mobility; cost effectiveness;
systemic corridor mobility improvements rather than isolated "spot"
improvements; and optimal timing for construction.

(9)
$5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for improving traffic and pedestrian safety near schools. The TransAid
division within the department of transportation shall administer this
program. Funds should be used for traffic and pedestrian improvements near
schools, including roadway channelization and signalization.

(10))) (5)
The ((TransAid)) highways and local programs division within the
department of transportation shall develop a prequalification procedure for
potential bidders on projects administered or approved by the transportation
improvement board. The board shall work with other interested parties
including but not limited to associations representing general contractors and
the office of minority and women's business enterprises. The prequalification
procedure's goal is to ascertain that bidders are qualified by experience,
financing, equipment, and organization to do the work called for in the
contract documents. The prequalification procedure may require a bidder to (1)
satisfy threshold requirements established by the board prior to being
furnished a proposal form on any contract; or (2) complete a preaward survey of
the bidder's qualification prior to award.

(((11)
Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for audits of city and county transportation funding to
determine whether any city or county has supplanted its local transportation
funding with state funding provided under sections 408 and 409 of this act.
The department shall report the results of this audit to the senate
transportation committee, the house of representatives transportation
committee, and the office of financial management by December 31, 2000.

(12) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for city fish passage barrier removal and
habitat restoration. Funds should be used for eliminating fish passage
barriers, including stormwater facilities, and providing for habitat
restoration for salmonid species that are listed as threatened or endangered.
The amount provided in this section may only be expended upon authorization
from the department of transportation's environmental affairs office.))

(End of part)

PART
III

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES

Sec.
301. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((26,147,000))

16,147,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Before any funds are expended for the transportation facility to be located in
Tumwater, Washington, the director of general administration shall conduct an
evaluation of the planned facility design and budget using life-cycle cost
analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques to maximize the long-term
effectiveness and efficiency of the facility or improvement as required under
RCW 43.82.010(10). Furthermore, the director shall present the findings of the
evaluation to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by December 31, 1999. Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation may be expended by the department of general administration to
conduct an analysis of future transportation-related facility office space
needs in Thurston county, by agency, for the next ten years. The analysis
shall consult with state agencies, private developers, and building owners to
determine the inventory of space available and planned over the next ten years
in government and nongovernment buildings, and the impact on current office
space. The analysis must be completed by January 31, 2000.

(2) The department of transportation is authorized to enter into a
financing contract using certificate of participation in the amount of
$14,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to acquire and remodel a regional complex in the department's
southwest region.

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS
AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec.
401. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Highway
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((184,810,000))

161,310,000

Ferry
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation.... $ ((53,353,000))

53,592,000

Transportation
Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((35,158,000))

35,909,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 270,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((6,543,000))

1,104,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation $ 405,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((280,539,000))

252,590,000

Sec.
402. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account
Appropriation...................... $ ((36,000))

137,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((811,000))

559,000

Special
Category C Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((53,000))

205,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((900,000))

901,000

Sec.
403. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor
Vehicle Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle fuel tax and overload

penalties
distribution..................... $ ((492,721,000))

481,375,000

Transportation
Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle excise tax distribution...... $ ((491,606,000))

237,644,000

Sec.
404. 1999
1st sp.s. c 1 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1)
RV Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State........ $........................................... ((1,590,000))

1,865,000

(2)
((Transportation Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Infrastructure

Account‑-State...................................... $ 5,000,000))

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account‑‑State.... $ 20,000,000

The
department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided under this
subsection on an as‑needed basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. A
new section is added to 1999 1st sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS

(1)
Motor Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account‑-State.................................. $ 49,456,000

(2)
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account‑‑State.................................. $ 30,100,000

The
department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided under this
subsection on an as-needed basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406. A
new section is added to 1999 1st sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS. The
balance remaining at the close of the 1999 calendar year in the transportation
account shall be transferred to the transportation programs account.

(End of part)

PART
VI

PROVISIONS NECESSARY
TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. A
new section is added to 1999 1st sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The
transportation programs account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in
the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the fund may
be used only for transportation purposes and activities and operations of the
Washington state patrol not directly related to the policing of public highways
and that are not authorized under Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 603. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

COUNTY
ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD................................ 3

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................. 8

INFORMATION SYSTEMS............................................. 7

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES................................. 7

VEHICLE SERVICES................................................ 8

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................ 10

CHARGES FROM OTHER
AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 17

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM
M................................. 14

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--OPERATING........ 10

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I........................................ 10

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 25

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 21

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 15

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)......... 30

PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V............................... 18

RAIL--PROGRAM Y................................................ 23

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 15

TRANSFERS.................................................. 32,
33

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 14

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 16

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING,
DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 17

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 20

FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD..................... 4

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 31

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION................................ 32

TRANSFERS...................................................... 32

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION....................................... 4

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD................................ 3

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION......................... 1

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU......................................... 4

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU......................................... 6

--- END ---