BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.160 and 1999 c 270 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A licensed vehicle dealer as defined under RCW 46.70.011 or the owner of
a commercial vehicle ((which under reciprocal relations with another
jurisdiction would be required to obtain a license registration in this state
or an unlicensed vehicle which would be required to obtain a license
registration for operation on public highways of this state may, as an
alternative to such license registration,)) or the owner of a vehicle
used primarily for agricultural purposes may secure and operate such
vehicle under authority of a trip permit issued by this state in lieu of a
Washington certificate of license registration, and licensed gross weight if
applicable. The licensed gross weight may not exceed eighty thousand pounds
for a combination of vehicles nor forty thousand pounds for a single unit
vehicle with three or more axles. Trip permits may also be issued for movement
of mobile homes pursuant to RCW 46.44.170. For the purpose of this section, a
vehicle is considered unlicensed if the licensed gross weight currently in
effect for the vehicle or combination of vehicles is not adequate for the load
being carried. Vehicles registered under RCW 46.16.135 shall not be operated
under authority of trip permits in lieu of further registration within the same
registration year.

(2)
Each trip permit shall authorize the operation of a single vehicle at the
maximum legal weight limit for such vehicle for a period of three consecutive
days commencing with the day of first use. No more than three such permits may
be used for any one vehicle in any period of thirty consecutive days((,
except that in the case of a recreational vehicle as defined in RCW 43.22.335,
no more than two trip permits may be used for any one vehicle in a one-year
period)). Every permit shall identify((, as the department may require,))
the vehicle for which it is issued and shall be completed in its entirety and
signed by the operator before operation of the vehicle on the public highways
of this state. Correction of data on the permit such as dates, license number,
or vehicle identification number invalidates the permit. The trip permit shall
be displayed on the vehicle to which it is issued as prescribed by the
department.

(3)
Vehicles operating under authority of trip permits are subject to all laws,
rules, and regulations affecting the operation of like vehicles in this state.

(4)
Prorate operators operating commercial vehicles on trip permits in Washington
shall retain the customer copy of such permit for four years.

(5)
Trip permits may be obtained from field offices of the department of
transportation, the Washington state patrol, the department of
licensing, ((or other agents appointed by the department)) and
licensing subagents. For each permit issued, there shall be collected a filing
fee as provided by RCW 46.01.140, an administrative fee of eight dollars, and
an excise tax of one dollar. If the filing fee amount of one dollar prescribed
by RCW 46.01.140 is increased or decreased after January 1, 1981, the
administrative fee shall be adjusted to compensate for such change to insure
that the total amount collected for the filing fee, administrative fee, and
excise tax remain at ten dollars. These fees and taxes are in lieu of all
other vehicle license fees and taxes. No exchange, credits, or refunds may be
given for trip permits after they have been purchased.

(6)
((The department may appoint county auditors or businesses as agents for the
purpose of selling trip permits to the public. County auditors or businesses
so appointed may retain the filing fee collected for each trip permit to defray
expenses incurred in handling and selling the permits.

(7))) A
violation of or a failure to comply with any provision of this section is a
gross misdemeanor.

(((8)))
(7) The department of licensing may adopt rules as it deems necessary to
administer this section.

(((9))) (8) A surcharge of five dollars is imposed on
the issuance of trip permits. The portion of the surcharge paid by motor
carriers must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of
supporting vehicle weigh stations, weigh-in-motion programs, and the commercial
vehicle information systems and networks program. The remaining portion of the
surcharge must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund for the purpose of supporting
congestion relief programs. All other administrative fees and excise taxes
collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be forwarded by the
department with proper identifying detailed report to the state treasurer who
shall deposit the administrative fees to the credit of the motor vehicle fund
and the excise taxes to the credit of the general fund. Filing fees will be
forwarded and reported to the state treasurer by the department as prescribed
in RCW 46.01.140.

---
END ---