BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that the safety of students, school employees, and
volunteers in schools is a vital concern. In order for students to achieve
high academic standards, schools must offer safe and civil learning
environments in which students and teachers can concentrate on learning.

(2)
The legislature finds that the presence of security personnel on school grounds
during school hours is no longer important only in rare cases or isolated
circumstances. Many schools, in all different types of communities throughout
Washington, could benefit significantly by the presence of security personnel
whenever school is in session.

(3)
Incidents of fatal shootings, intentional serious injuries, and weapons
possession at schools in Washington and across the nation in recent years, and
other indicators of rising levels of violence at schools, have demonstrated the
necessity for school administrators to reevaluate the staffing needs of schools
under their authority to determine whether security personnel are appropriate.

(4)
School security programs funded under this chapter are not basic education for
purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding duty
thereunder.

(5)
The legislature intends to provide a program of grants to enhance security in
schools throughout Washington within available funding, targeted to schools
with the greatest need for security personnel and with the most efficient and
effective proposals for making use of funding for security personnel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Grants provided under section 3 of this act may be used solely for matching
grants to enhance security in schools. The grants shall be expended solely for
the costs of employing or contracting for building security monitors in schools
during school hours and school events. The grants shall require local or other
nonstate matching funds so that the state grant amounts support a maximum of
seventy-five percent of the costs of the services funded.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall administer the school security
program and select grant recipients in accordance with the following criteria:

(a)
Applications shall document the need for school security services in the school
building or buildings;

(b)
Grant applicants shall:

(i)
Demonstrate that other existing programs and public and private funding sources
related to school safety have been reviewed;

(ii)
Demonstrate that the grant request would fund a program that is coordinated
with other local programs and funding sources that relate to school safety;

(iii)
Demonstrate that the grant for school security sought under this chapter fills
a void in a comprehensive school safety program that the applicant already has
in place or is in the process of implementing at the school building or school
district level; and

(iv)
Describe steps taken to hold costs of the proposed program as low as reasonably
possible and report whether any independent review by qualified auditors or
budget and finance experts of the proposed program budget has been conducted;

(c)
Priority shall be given in the selection of grant recipients to applications
displaying the following characteristics:

(i)
A high level of coordination with other programs in a comprehensive continuum
of school safety efforts, from early prevention to reactive enforcement of
safety rules and laws;

(ii)
Close collaboration between the school or school district and local public or
private individuals and organizations;

(iii)
Matching funds from sources other than local school district funds; and

(iv)
Applications from school districts or consortia of school districts that
received funding through the school security program established in the
biennial operating budget after July 1, 1995;

(d)
The maximum state grant to any school district under this chapter shall be five
hundred thousand dollars in fiscal years 2002 and 2003, four hundred thousand
dollars in fiscal years 2004 and 2005, and three hundred thousand dollars
thereafter. The superintendent shall carefully review all budgetary components
of applications and may award a grant amount of less than the amount requested
by the applicant if the superintendent deems that any portion of the grant
request is not sufficiently cost-effective or for other reasons does not merit
state grant support under this chapter.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall attempt to award grants as equitably
as possible among school districts in rural, suburban, and urban areas, in all
geographic parts of the state, and in districts representing the full range of
levels of student enrollment, from districts with fewer enrolled students to
those with the largest enrollments.

(3)
Each program granted funds under this chapter shall be evaluated by the
educational service district within which the school district receiving funds
is located. Educational service districts may contract with other entities to
conduct the evaluation. However, the educational service district may not
contract with a school district receiving a grant under this chapter to conduct
the evaluation. A school district receiving a grant under this chapter shall
submit to the educational service district for its region all available and
appropriate information concerning the impact and effectiveness of the school
security program. The superintendent of public instruction shall compile the
evaluations completed by educational service districts and report the findings,
along with any recommendations the superintendent may choose to make, to the
legislature by September 1st of even-numbered years beginning in 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
chapter applies to all new grants to enhance school safety that are made after
the effective date of this section. Until July 1, 2001, this chapter does not
apply to the renewal of a grant made before the effective date of this
section. This chapter applies to all grants to enhance school safety, both new
and renewals, made after July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
sum of five million two hundred five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the superintendent of public instruction for matching
grants to enhance security in schools. This appropriation is in addition to
the three million dollars appropriated in chapter 12, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.,
and shall be administered in accordance with this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---