BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the employment of fire fighters exposes them to smoke,
fumes, and toxic or chemical substances. The legislature recognizes that fire
fighters as a class have a higher rate of such exposure than the general public
subjecting them to heart problems, such as atrial fibrillations. The
legislature therefore declares that heart problems, including atrial
fibrillations, that are experienced within one day of exposure to smoke, fumes,
and toxic or chemical substances are presumed to be occupationally related for
industrial insurance purposes for fire fighters.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.32.185 and 1987 c 515 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the case of fire fighters as defined in RCW 41.26.030(4) (a), (b), and (c)
who are covered under Title 51 RCW, there shall exist a prima facie presumption
that (a) respiratory disease ((is an)) and (b) heart problems,
including atrial fibrillations, that are experienced within twenty-four hours
of exposure to smoke, fumes, and toxic or chemical substances are
occupational diseases under RCW 51.08.140. This presumption of
occupational disease may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence
controverting the presumption. Controverting evidence may include, but is not
limited to, use of tobacco products, physical fitness and weight, lifestyle,
hereditary factors, and exposure from other employment or nonemployment
activities.

(2) The presumption established in subsection (1)(a) of this
section shall be extended to an applicable member following termination of
service for a period of three calendar months for each year of requisite
service, but may not extend more than sixty months following the last date of
employment.

---
END ---