BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan 3" to read as follows:

All
classified employees who first become employed by an employer in an eligible
position on or after September 1, 2000, have the irrevocable option of
membership in plan 2 or plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
41.35.610 (Membership in plan III) and 1998 c 341 s 202 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---