BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The attorney general shall establish and maintain a no sales call list. The no
sales call list shall contain the name and telephone number or numbers of
residents who do not want to receive telephone solicitation calls. Residents
must register with, and pay a fee to, the attorney general to appear on the no
sales call list.

(2)
The attorney general shall:

(a)
Update the no sales call list twice yearly;

(b)
Determine the fee for a resident to register for the no sales call list. The
fee shall not be more than ten dollars per person, per year, nor shall the fee
be more than is required for the attorney general to create and administer the
list. Fees received under this section must be deposited in the attorney
general's no sales call list account, created in section 2 of this act; and

(c)
Provide the most up-to-date no sales call list to telephone solicitors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.10 RCW to read as follows:

The
attorney general's no sales call list account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from fees received under section 1 of this act
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for establishing and maintaining the no sales call list created in section
1 of this act. Only the attorney general or the attorney general's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who does not want to receive unsolicited telephone sales calls may
register and be placed on the attorney general's no sales call list, created in
section 1 of this act.

Sec.
4. RCW
19.158.110 and 1989 c 20 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within the first minute of the telephone call, a commercial telephone solicitor
or salesperson shall:

(a)
Identify himself or herself, the company on whose behalf the solicitation is
being made, the property, goods, or services being sold; and

(b)
Terminate the telephone call within ten seconds if the purchaser indicates he
or she does not wish to continue the conversation.

(2)
If at any time during the telephone contact, the purchaser states or indicates
that he or she does not wish to be called again by the commercial telephone
solicitor or wants to have his or her name and individual telephone number
removed from the telephone lists used by the commercial telephone solicitor:

(a)
The commercial telephone solicitor shall not make any additional commercial
telephone solicitation of the called party at that telephone number within a
period of at least one year; and

(b)
The commercial telephone solicitor shall not sell or give the called party's
name and telephone number to another commercial telephone solicitor: PROVIDED,
That the commercial telephone solicitor may return the list, including the
called party's name and telephone number, to the company or organization from
which it received the list.

(3)
No commercial telephone solicitor or salesperson may make or cause to be
made any unsolicited telephone call to a residential, mobile, or telephonic
paging device telephone number if the number for the telephone appears in the
current no sales call list published by the attorney general under the
authority of section 1 of this act.

(4)
The utilities and transportation commission shall by rule ensure that
telecommunications companies inform their residential customers of the
provisions of this section. The notification may be made by:

(a)
Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed to residential customers; or

(b)
Conspicuous publication of the notice in the consumer information pages of
local telephone directories.

(((4)))
(5) If a sale or an agreement to purchase is completed, the commercial
telephone solicitor must inform the purchaser of his or her cancellation rights
as enunciated in this chapter, state the registration number issued by the
department of licensing, and give the street address of the seller.

(((5)))
(6) If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to purchase, the
commercial telephone solicitor's registration number is requested by the
purchaser, it must be provided.

(((6)))
(7) All oral disclosures required by this section shall be made in a
clear and intelligible manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with RCW 43.135.090.

---
END ---