BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28C.18 RCW to read as follows:

The
board shall create a skills gap program for the purpose of promoting economic
development in Washington state by increasing the skills and productivity of
Washington workers. The program shall be used to create partnerships with
business, labor, and the work force employment and training system to close the
skills gap in Washington state. The grants shall be provided to a consortia
which include local work force development councils, community and technical
colleges, and industry associations. Other consortia partners may include
economic development councils, businesses, labor organizations, and other
employment and training providers. The purpose of the consortia is to
determine the future employment and training needs in high-demand industries
and occupations to:

(1)
Create partnerships with businesses, labor organizations, and industry
associations that share common occupations for the purpose of determining their
future employment and training needs;

(2)
Bring together community colleges and other employment and training providers
to develop programs that meet the employment training needs defined by the
above industry partnerships;

(3)
Expand the use of skills standards and customized training designed to meet the
specific needs of business;

(4)
Upgrade the skills of existing workers; and

(5)
Support increased use of on-the-job learning strategies among small and
medium-sized enterprises.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act expires June 30, 2003.

---
END ---