BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds that the number of
vulnerable adults is growing because of demographics and longer life
expectancies. Crimes against vulnerable adults, and neglect, exploitation,
abuse, and sexual abuse of vulnerable adults are increasing. The state has a
compelling interest in making it possible for the courts to adequately and
fairly conduct cases involving vulnerable adult victims.

The
legislature further finds that court proceedings involving vulnerable adults
may be hindered or precluded by memory problems associated with the length of
time between the act or crime and the related court proceedings, even though
the vulnerable adult made a reliable statement about the crime or event shortly
after it occurred. Court proceedings involving vulnerable adults may also be
hindered or precluded by the unavailability of the vulnerable adults as
witnesses because of their shorter life expectancy, their physical or mental
condition, or because their participation in the trial or proceeding has a
substantial likelihood of resulting in significant emotional, mental, or
physical harm.

The
legislature intends that this chapter make admissible as evidence the reliable
hearsay of vulnerable adults beyond what is currently admissible, while
respecting the constitutional rights of other parties. The legislature
recognizes that the courts have implemented the child hearsay statute, RCW
9A.44.120, to balance concerns about the reliability of children's hearsay
statements with the public interest in facilitating court cases involving the
protection of children. The legislature recognizes similar issues are present
in proceedings involving vulnerable adult victims. For that reason, courts may
find guidance in State v. Ryan, 103 Wn.2d 165 (1984), while recognizing the
different factors set forth in this chapter as well as other factors that may
apply to vulnerable adults. The legislature intends this chapter to facilitate
fair and just adjudication of criminal, juvenile, and civil cases involving
vulnerable adults in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter.

(1)
"Abuse" means willfully or negligently causing any bodily injury,
pain, or mental anguish to a vulnerable adult.

(2)
"Exploitation" means:

(a)
Obtaining, using, or attempting to obtain or use, the property or services of a
vulnerable adult for the benefit of someone other than the vulnerable adult,
by:

(i)
Deception, intimidation, or the use of undue influence; or

(ii)
A person who knows or reasonably should know that the vulnerable adult lacks
the capacity to consent; or

(b)
Forcing, compelling, or exerting undue influence over a vulnerable adult
causing the vulnerable adult to perform a service or act, or to refrain from
acting, in a way that benefits someone other than the vulnerable adult.

(3)
"Neglect" means the failure by one having a duty of care to a
vulnerable adult to provide the goods or services necessary to maintain the
physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult. Neglect may be based on
either repeated conduct, or on a single incident or omission that demonstrates
a serious disregard for the safety or welfare of a vulnerable adult.

(4)
"Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to indecent liberties, rape, sexual coercion,
sexually explicit photographing, and sexual harassment. Sexual abuse also
means any sexual contact, whether or not it is consensual, between:

(a)
Any person and a person who has a mental incapacity or is physically helpless,
both as defined in RCW 9A.44.010; or

(b)
A vulnerable adult living in a facility or receiving service from a program
authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a staff person of the facility or
employee of the program, unless the staff person is also a resident or client
of the facility or program.

(5)
"Sexual contact" means any touching of the sexual or other intimate
parts of a person done for the purpose of gratifying the sexual desire of
either party or a third party.

(6)
"Unavailable" means the vulnerable adult is unavailable under ER 804.

(7)
"Vulnerable adult" means a person:

(a)
Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical
inability to care for himself or herself, or his or her finances; or

(b)
Who is eighteen years of age or older and has been found by a court to be
incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or

(c)
Who is eighteen years of age or older and has a developmental disability as defined
under RCW 71A.10.020; or

(d)
Who is eighteen years of age or older and a resident of a facility for adults
licensed or required to be licensed by the department of social and health
services, including but not limited to nursing homes, adult family homes, and
boarding homes; or

(e)
Who is eighteen years of age or older and receives services from a home health,
hospice, or home care agency as defined in chapter 70.127 RCW, or receives
similar services from an individual.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
HEARSAY ADMISSIBLE. An out-of-court statement made by a vulnerable adult
describing a crime committed against, or neglect, exploitation, abuse, or
sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult declarant, is admissible in evidence in a
civil, criminal, or juvenile offense adjudication proceeding if:

(1)
The court finds in a hearing that the time, content, and circumstances of the
statement provide sufficient indicia of reliability. This hearing shall be
conducted outside the presence of a jury in the case of a jury trial. In
making its determination, the court may consider (a) the reliability of the
declarant; (b) the timing of the declaration; (c) whether the declarant had an
apparent motive to lie; (d) the relationship of the declarant to the witness;
(e) the relationship of the declarant to the actor; (f) whether the declarant
made the statement to more than one person; (g) the mental and physical
condition and cognitive ability of the vulnerable adult at the time the
statement was made; (h) the nature and duration of the crime, neglect, abuse,
sexual abuse, or exploitation; and (i) any other factor deemed appropriate; and

(2)
The vulnerable adult either:

(a)
Testifies; or

(b)
The court finds the vulnerable adult is unavailable as a witness, but when the
vulnerable adult is unavailable as a witness, the statement may be admitted
only if there is corroborative evidence of the act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
NOTICE REQUIRED. A statement may not be admitted under this chapter unless the
proponent of the statement gives notice to the adverse party of his or her
intention to offer the statement and the particulars of the statement
sufficiently in advance of the proceedings to provide the adverse party with a
fair opportunity to challenge the admissibility of the statement at a hearing.
The court shall state the basis for its ruling by making specific findings of
fact on the record.

Sec.
5. RCW
9.94A.030 and 1999 c 352 s 8, 1999 c 197 s 1, and 1999 c 196 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department
of corrections, means that the department, either directly or through a
collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.145, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial
obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with
current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk
without depositing it in a departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4)
"Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120
(5), (6), (7), (8), (10), or (11), or RCW 9.94A.383, served in the community
subject to controls placed on the offender's movement and activities by the
department of corrections. For offenders placed on community custody for
crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, the department shall assess the
offender's risk of reoffense and may establish and modify conditions of
community custody, in addition to those imposed by the court, based upon the
risk to community safety.

(5)
"Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of
community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.120(11), as
established by the sentencing guidelines commission or the legislature under
RCW 9.94A.040, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.

(6)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision,
which begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease
supervision) or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely
community custody, entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the
two.

(7)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(8)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence
conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or
46.61.524. For first-time offenders, the supervision may include crime-related
prohibitions and other conditions imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(5). Where
the court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency that has
contributed to his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may, subject
to available resources, include treatment. For purposes of the interstate
compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers, RCW
9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and
should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(9)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement as defined in this
section.

(10)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(11)
"Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that
is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial
obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed
crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court
costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and
costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to
the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an
emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to the
provisions in RCW 38.52.430.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing judge that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the defendant's daily activities and compliance with sentence
conditions, and in which the defendant is required to report daily to a
specific location designated by the department or the sentencing judge.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community service work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through "earned release" can reduce the
actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the
sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount
required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition,
"earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services,
whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from
garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal
financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to
pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not
include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020
and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(19)
"Drug offense" means:

(a)
Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance
(RCW 69.50.403);

(b)
Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the
possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance; or

(c)
Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(20)
"Escape" means:

(a)
Escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful
failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be
available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW
72.09.310); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this
subsection.

(21)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a)
Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding
a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW
46.52.020(4)); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(22)
"Fines" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific sum of
money over a specific period of time to the court.

(23)
"First-time offender" means any person who is convicted of a felony
(a) not classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter, or
(b) that is not the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II
that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, nor the
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine,
its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2),
nor the selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of
marihuana, who previously has never been convicted of a felony in this state,
federal court, or another state, and who has never participated in a program of
deferred prosecution for a felony offense.

(24)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

(25)
"Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or
hereafter amended:

(a)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation
of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b)
Assault in the second degree;

(c)
Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(e)
Controlled substance homicide;

(f)
Extortion in the first degree;

(g)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h)
Indecent liberties;

(i)
Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j)
Leading organized crime;

(k)
Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l)
Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n)
Rape in the third degree;

(o)
Robbery in the second degree;

(p)
Sexual exploitation;

(q)
Vehicular assault;

(r)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined
by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(s)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under this section;

(t)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and
(c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979,
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June
11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed
from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was committed
against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship between the
victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent liberties
under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through July 27,
1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993, through
July 27, 1997.

(26)
"Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(27)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(28)
"Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in
a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or
any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been
ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of
each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial confinement
includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination of work
crew and home detention as defined in this section.

(29)
"Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i)
Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious
offense; and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this
state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be
considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score
under RCW 9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at
least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the
other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i)
Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the
first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion; (B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the first degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of
sexual motivation; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (29)(b)(i); and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for
rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under subsection (29)(b)(i)
only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the offender
committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second degree
constitutes a conviction under subsection (29)(b)(i) only when the offender was
eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(30)
"Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's community
placement that is not community custody.

(31)
"Restitution" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific
sum of money over a specific period of time to the court as payment of
damages. The sum may include both public and private costs. The imposition of
a restitution order does not preclude civil redress.

(32)
"Risk assessment" means the application of an objective instrument
supported by research and adopted by the department for the purpose of
assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the nature
of the harm done by the offender, place and circumstances of the offender
related to risk, the offender's relationship to any victim, and any information
provided to the department by victims. The results of a risk assessment shall
not be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(33)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a)
Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or
hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b)
Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense
under (a) of this subsection.

(34)
"Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and
means:

(a)
Murder in the first degree, homicide by abuse, murder in the second degree,
manslaughter in the first degree, assault in the first degree, kidnapping in
the first degree, or rape in the first degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of these felonies; or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(35)
"Sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(36)
"Sex offense" means:

(a)
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW, other than RCW 9A.44.130(((10)))
(11), or RCW 9A.64.020 or 9.68A.090 or a felony that is, under chapter
9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit such crimes;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this
subsection;

(c)
A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135;
or

(d)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(37)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification.

(38)
"Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries
of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state
or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(39)
"Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and
assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks
prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program.
The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's
requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(40)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological,
physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the
crime charged.

(41)
"Violent offense" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, robbery
in the second degree, drive-by shooting, vehicular assault, and vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of
this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b)
of this subsection.

(42)
"Vulnerable adult" means a person:

(a)
Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical
inability to care for himself or herself, or his or her finances;

(b)
Eighteen years of age or older and has been found by a court to be
incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW;

(c)
Eighteen years of age or older and who has a developmental disability as
defined under RCW 71A.10.020;

(d)
Eighteen years of age or older and who is a resident of a facility for adults
licensed or required to be licensed by the department of social and health
services, including but not limited to nursing homes, adult family homes, and
boarding homes; or

(e)
Eighteen years of age or older and receives services from a home health,
hospice, or home care agency as defined in chapter 70.127 RCW, or receives
similar services from an individual.

(43)
"Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of
civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community of not less than
thirty-five hours per week that complies with RCW 9.94A.135. The civic improvement
tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private industries or the
labor force in the county where the service or labor is performed. The civic
improvement tasks shall not affect employment opportunities for people with
developmental disabilities contracted through sheltered workshops as defined in
RCW 82.04.385. Only those offenders sentenced to a facility operated or
utilized under contract by a county or the state, or sanctioned under RCW
9.94A.205, are eligible to participate on a work crew. Offenders sentenced for
a sex offense as defined in subsection (36) of this section are not eligible
for the work crew program.

(((43)))
(44) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(((44)))
(45) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular
course of study at school. Participation in work release shall be conditioned
upon the offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and
abiding by the rules of the work release facility.

Sec.
6. RCW
9.94A.310 and 1999 c 352 s 2 and 1999 c 324 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1) TABLE
1

Sentencing
Grid

SERIOUSNESS

LEVEL OFFENDER
SCORE

9
or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

XVI Life
Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m
36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320
333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136
147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102
114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14
20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3
8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6
9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

NOTE:
Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category represent
sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and
third rows represent presumptive sentencing ranges in months, or in days if so
designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.

(2)
For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the presumptive sentence
is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the
appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime,
and multiplying the range by 75 percent.

(3)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony crime.
If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the firearm
enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement
for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a
firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a firearm
as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following
additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence determined under
subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as
classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or
with a maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of
this subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b),
and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced
for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or
(c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section,
or both, any and all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice
the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all firearm enhancements
under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and
shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other
firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this
chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term has expired, an
offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be granted an
extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(f)
The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so
that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the
sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a deadly weapon as defined in this chapter other than a firearm
as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the
crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is
being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or
enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses,
regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon
enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon
other than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of
the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon
enhancements, the following additional times shall be added to the presumptive
sentence determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony
crime of conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously
been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under
(a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c)
of this section, or both, any and all deadly weapon enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions,
including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter. However, whether or not a mandatory minimum term
has expired, an offender serving a sentence under this subsection may be
granted an extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW
9.94A.150(4).

(f)
The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the
sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the
portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence if
the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or
state correctional facility as that term is defined in this chapter and the
offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection.
If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this
subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility as that term
is defined in this chapter, and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
presumptive sentence determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a)
Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or
69.50.410;

(b)
Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv),
and (v);

(c)
Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For
the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state
correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that
facility or county jail.

(6)
An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense
was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435.

(7)
An additional two years shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in
RCW 46.61.5055.

(8)
In a criminal case in which there has been a special allegation and evidence
establishing that the victim was a vulnerable adult at the time of the
commission of the crime, the court shall make a finding of fact of whether the
victim was a vulnerable adult at the time of the commission of the crime, or if
a jury trial is had, the jury shall, if it finds the defendant guilty, also
find a special verdict as to whether the victim was a vulnerable adult at the
time of the commission of the crime.

(a)
The following additional times must be added to the presumptive sentence if the
offender or an accomplice committed the offense against a vulnerable adult:

(i)
Twenty-four months for a felony defined by law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both;

(ii)
Eighteen months for a felony defined by law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both;

(iii)
Twelve months for a felony defined by law as a class C felony or with a maximum
sentence of five years, or both.

(b)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all enhancements under this
subsection are mandatory, must be served in total confinement, and must not run
concurrently with any other sentencing provisions.

(c)
Further, nothing in this subsection precludes the court from considering the
victim's vulnerability as an aggravating circumstance under RCW 9.94A.390(2)(b)
in imposing an exceptional sentence under RCW 9.94A.120(2).

Sec.
7. RCW
9.94A.370 and 1999 c 143 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The intersection of the column defined by the offender score and the row
defined by the offense seriousness score determines the presumptive sentencing
range (see RCW 9.94A.310, (Table 1)). The additional time for deadly weapon
findings, for crimes committed against vulnerable adults, or for those
offenses enumerated in RCW 9.94A.310(4) that were committed in a state
correctional facility or county jail shall be added to the entire presumptive
sentence range. The court may impose any sentence within the range that it
deems appropriate. All presumptive sentence ranges are expressed in terms of
total confinement.

(2)
In determining any sentence, the trial court may rely on no more information
than is admitted by the plea agreement, or admitted, acknowledged, or proved in
a trial or at the time of sentencing. Acknowledgement includes not objecting
to information stated in the presentence reports. Where the defendant disputes
material facts, the court must either not consider the fact or grant an evidentiary
hearing on the point. The facts shall be deemed proved at the hearing by a
preponderance of the evidence. Facts that establish the elements of a more
serious crime or additional crimes may not be used to go outside the
presumptive sentence range except upon stipulation or when specifically
provided for in RCW 9.94A.390(2) (d), (e), (g), and (h).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of the crime of criminal mistreatment in the third degree if
the person is the parent of a child, is a person entrusted with the physical
custody of a child or other dependent person, or is a person employed to
provide to the child or dependent person the basic necessities of life, and
either:

(a)
With criminal negligence, creates an imminent and substantial risk of
substantial bodily harm to a child or dependent person by withholding any of
the basic necessities of life; or

(b)
With criminal negligence, causes substantial bodily harm to a child or
dependent person by withholding any of the basic necessities of life.

(2)
Criminal mistreatment in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
9. RCW
9A.42.040 and 1986 c 250 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
9A.42.020 ((and)), 9A.42.030, and section 8 of this act do
not apply to ((a)) decisions to withdraw life support systems
made in accordance with ((law by a health care professional and family
members or others with a legal duty to care for the patient)) chapter
7.70 or 70.122 RCW by the dependent person, his or her legal surrogate, or
others with a legal duty to care for the dependent person.

Sec.
10. RCW
9A.42.045 and 1997 c 392 s 512 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
9A.42.020 ((and)), 9A.42.030, and section 8 of this act do
not apply when a terminally ill or permanently unconscious person or his
or her ((designee)) legal surrogate, as set forth in chapter 7.70
RCW, requests ((palliative care)), and the person receives,
palliative care from a licensed home health agency, hospice agency, nursing
home, or hospital ((who is)) providing care under the medical direction
of a physician. As used in this section, the terms "terminally
ill" and "permanently unconscious" have the same meaning as
"terminal condition" and "permanent unconscious condition"
in chapter 70.122 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Section captions used in sections 1 through 4 of this act are not part of the
law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 4 and 11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 5
RCW.

---
END ---