BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a need for the department of corrections to
establish an investigations unit to investigate and prevent crimes within
department of corrections facilities and to facilitate sharing and receiving of
information with other criminal justice agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created in the department of corrections a criminal
investigations unit.

(2)
The secretary shall commission investigators and such commission shall be
considered that of a limited authority Washington peace officer pursuant to RCW
10.93.020. This commission shall be limited to arrest and detention in state
correctional institutions as defined in RCW 9.94.049. Commission as an
investigator does not qualify the investigator as a law enforcement officer for
the purposes of membership in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system under chapter 41.26 RCW.

(3)
The criminal investigations unit is authorized to share with other criminal
justice agencies criminal history record information and other criminal justice
information that can be lawfully disseminated to a criminal justice agency and
may receive such information from other criminal justice agencies. The
criminal investigations unit shall be considered a law enforcement agency
authorized to receive investigative and intelligence information for the
purposes of RCW 43.43.854 and 43.43.856.

(4)
The criminal investigations unit shall, in cooperation with local law
enforcement, conduct investigations for the purposes of enforcing criminal
laws, conduct intelligence gathering within department facilities, and provide
assistance to other criminal justice agencies.

(5)
The criminal investigations unit shall:

(a)
Coordinate with other criminal justice agencies in the state concerning
violations of the criminal laws within department facilities;

(b)
Provide a communications network capable of interconnecting all offices and investigators
of the unit.

(6)
In order to maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of state resources, the
criminal investigations unit shall, where feasible, use existing facilities and
systems.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This act
is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---