BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to enhance and facilitate the ability of the
department of corrections to carry out its responsibility of planning and
ensuring community protection with respect to persons subject to sentencing
under chapter 9.94A RCW by authorizing access to, and release or disclosure of,
necessary information related to mental health services. This includes
accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received
mental health services as a minor. The legislature does not intend for this
act to readdress access to information and records regarding continuity of
care.

The
legislature recognizes that persons with mental illness have a right to the
confidentiality of information related to mental health services, including the
fact of their receiving such services, unless there is a state interest that
supersedes this right. It is the intent of the legislature to balance that
right of the individual with the state interest to enhance public safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 71.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Information related to mental health services" means all information
and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing
services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental
health service provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under
this chapter or chapter 71.05 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.

(b)
"Mental health service provider" means a public or private agency
that provides services to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW
71.34.020 and receives funding from public sources. This includes evaluation
and treatment facilities as defined in RCW 71.34.020, community mental health
service delivery systems, or community mental health programs, as defined in RCW
71.24.025, and facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration
under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(2)
Information related to mental health services delivered to a person subject to
chapter 9.94A RCW shall be released, upon request, by a mental health service
provider to department of corrections' personnel for whom the information is
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. The information
must be provided only for the purpose of completing presentence investigations,
supervision of an incarcerated person, planning for and provision of
supervision of a person, or assessment of a person's risk to the community.
The request shall be in writing and shall not require the consent of the
subject of the records.

(3)
The information to be released to the department of corrections shall include
all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the
department of corrections to carry out its duties, including those records and
reports identified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
The department and the department of corrections, in consultation with regional
support networks, mental health service providers as defined in subsection (1)
of this section, mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental
illness, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related
to the type and scope of information to be released. These rules shall:

(a)
Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry
out its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with
respect to persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A RCW, including
accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received
mental health services as a minor; and

(b)
Establish requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of
the department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(5)
The information received by the department of corrections under this section
shall remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined
in RCW 71.34.200, except as provided in section 4 of this act.

(6)
No mental health service provider or individual employed by a mental health
service provider shall be held responsible for information released to or used
by the department of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules
adopted under this section.

(7)
Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information
contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for
alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted
as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(8)
This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of
information related to sexually transmitted diseases under chapter 70.24 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 71.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Information related to mental health services" means all information
and records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing
services to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services by a mental
health service provider. This may include documents of legal proceedings under
this chapter or chapter 71.34 or 10.77 RCW, or somatic health care information.

(b)
"Mental health service provider" means a public or private agency
that provides services to persons with mental disorders as defined under RCW
71.05.020 and receives funding from public sources. This includes evaluation
and treatment facilities as defined in RCW 71.05.020, community mental health
service delivery systems, or community mental health programs as defined in RCW
71.24.025, and facilities conducting competency evaluations and restoration
under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(2)
Information related to mental health services delivered to a person subject to
chapter 9.94A RCW shall be released, upon request, by a mental health service
provider to department of corrections' personnel for whom the information is
necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their office. The information
must be provided only for the purpose of completing presentence investigations,
supervision of an incarcerated person, planning for and provision of
supervision of a person, or assessment of a person's risk to the community.
The request shall be in writing and shall not require the consent of the
subject of the records.

(3)
The information to be released to the department of corrections shall include
all relevant records and reports, as defined by rule, necessary for the
department of corrections to carry out its duties, including those records and
reports identified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
The department and the department of corrections, in consultation with regional
support networks, mental health service providers as defined in subsection (1)
of this section, mental health consumers, and advocates for persons with mental
illness, shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section related
to the type and scope of information to be released. These rules shall:

(a)
Enhance and facilitate the ability of the department of corrections to carry
out its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with
respect to persons subject to sentencing under chapter 9.94A RCW, including
accessing and releasing or disclosing information of persons who received
mental health services as a minor; and

(b)
Establish requirements for the notification of persons under the supervision of
the department of corrections regarding the provisions of this section.

(5)
The information received by the department of corrections under this section shall
remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure outlined in
this chapter, except as provided in section 4 of this act.

(6)
No mental health service provider or individual employed by a mental health
service provider shall be held responsible for information released to or used
by the department of corrections under the provisions of this section or rules
adopted under this section except under RCW 71.05.670 and 71.05.440.

(7)
Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information
contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for
alcoholism or drug dependency, the release of the information may be restricted
as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

(8)
This section does not modify the terms and conditions of disclosure of
information related to sexually transmitted diseases under chapter 70.24 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The information received by the department under section 2 or 3 of this act may
be released to the indeterminate sentence review board as relevant to carry out
its responsibility of planning and ensuring community protection with respect to
persons under its jurisdiction. Further disclosure by the indeterminate
sentence review board is subject to the limitations set forth in subsections
(3) and (4) of this section and must be consistent with the written policy of
the indeterminate sentence review board. The decision to disclose or not shall
not result in civil liability for the indeterminate sentence review board or
its employees provided that the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence.

(2)
The information received by the department under section 2 or 3 of this act may
be used to meet the statutory duties of the department to provide evidence or
report to the court. Disclosure to the public of information related to mental
health services provided to the court by the department may be limited in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.110 or this section.

(3)
The information received by the department under section 2 or 3 of this act may
be disclosed by the department to other state and local agencies as relevant to
plan for and provide offenders with transition, treatment, and supervision
services, or as relevant and necessary to protect the public and counteract the
danger created by a particular offender, and in a manner consistent with the
written policy established by the secretary. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the department or its employees so long
as the decision was reached in good faith and without gross negligence. The
information received by a state or local agency from the department shall
remain confidential and subject to the limitations on disclosure set forth in
chapters 70.02, 71.05, and 71.34 RCW and, subject to these limitations, may be
released only as relevant and necessary to counteract the danger created by a particular
offender.

(4)
The information received by the department under section 2 or 3 of this act may
be disclosed by the department to individuals only with respect to offenders
who have been determined by the department to have a high risk of reoffending
under chapter 9.94A RCW, and only as necessary for those individuals to take
reasonable steps for the purpose of self‑protection, or as provided in
RCW 72.09.370(2). The information may not be disclosed for the purpose of
engaging the public in a system of supervision, monitoring, and reporting
offender behavior to the department. The department must limit the disclosure
of information related to mental health services to the public to descriptions
of an offender's behavior, risk he or she may present to the community, and
need for mental health treatment, including medications, and shall not disclose
or release to the public copies of treatment documents or records, except as
otherwise provided by law. All disclosure of information to the public must be
done in a manner consistent with the written policy established by the
secretary. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil liability
for the department or its employees so long as the decision was reached in good
faith and without gross negligence. Nothing in this subsection prevents any
person from reporting to law enforcement or the department behavior that he or
she believes creates a public safety risk.

Sec.
5. RCW
71.05.630 and 1989 c 205 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided by law, all treatment records shall remain
confidential. Treatment records may be released only to the persons designated
in this section, or to other persons designated in an informed written consent
of the patient.

(2)
Treatment records of an individual may be released without informed written
consent in the following circumstances:

(a)
To an individual, organization, or agency as necessary for management or
financial audits, or program monitoring and evaluation. Information obtained
under this subsection shall remain confidential and may not be used in a manner
that discloses the name or other identifying information about the individual
whose records are being released.

(b)
To the department, the director of regional support networks, or a qualified
staff member designated by the director only when necessary to be used for
billing or collection purposes. The information shall remain confidential.

(c)
For purposes of research as permitted in chapter 42.48 RCW.

(d)
Pursuant to lawful order of a court.

(e)
To qualified staff members of the department, to the director of regional
support networks, to resource management services responsible for serving a
patient, or to service providers designated by resource management services as
necessary to determine the progress and adequacy of treatment and to determine
whether the person should be transferred to a less restrictive or more
appropriate treatment modality or facility. The information shall remain
confidential.

(f)
Within the treatment facility where the patient is receiving treatment,
confidential information may be disclosed to individuals employed, serving in
bona fide training programs, or participating in supervised volunteer programs,
at the facility when it is necessary to perform their duties.

(g)
Within the department as necessary to coordinate treatment for mental illness,
developmental disabilities, alcoholism, or drug abuse of individuals who are
under the supervision of the department.

(h)
To a licensed physician who has determined that the life or health of the
individual is in danger and that treatment without the information contained in
the treatment records could be injurious to the patient's health. Disclosure
shall be limited to the portions of the records necessary to meet the medical
emergency.

(i)
To a facility that is to receive an individual who is involuntarily committed
under chapter 71.05 RCW, or upon transfer of the individual from one treatment
facility to another. The release of records under this subsection shall be
limited to the treatment records required by law, a record or summary of all
somatic treatments, and a discharge summary. The discharge summary may include
a statement of the patient's problem, the treatment goals, the type of
treatment which has been provided, and recommendation for future treatment, but
may not include the patient's complete treatment record.

(j)
((Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 71.05.390(7), to a correctional facility
or a corrections officer who is responsible for the supervision of an
individual who is receiving inpatient or outpatient evaluation or treatment.
Every person who is under the supervision of the department of corrections who
receives evaluation or treatment under chapter 9.94A RCW shall be notified of
the provisions of this section by the individual's corrections officer.
Release of records under this section is limited to:

(i)
An evaluation report provided pursuant to a written supervision plan.

(ii)
The discharge summary, including a record or summary of all somatic treatments,
at the termination of any treatment provided as part of the supervision plan.

(iii)
When an individual is returned from a treatment facility to a correctional
facility, the information provided under (j)(iv) of this subsection.

(iv)
Any information necessary to establish or implement changes in the individual's
treatment plan or the level or kind of supervision as determined by resource
management services. In cases involving a person transferred back to a
correctional facility, disclosure shall be made to clinical staff only. In
cases involving a person under supervision of the department of corrections,
disclosure shall be made to the supervising corrections officer only.

(k))) To
the individual's counsel or guardian ad litem, without modification, at any
time in order to prepare for involuntary commitment or recommitment
proceedings, reexaminations, appeals, or other actions relating to detention,
admission, commitment, or patient's rights under chapter 71.05 RCW.

(((l)
To a corrections officer of the department who has custody of or is responsible
for the supervision of an individual who is transferred or discharged from a
treatment facility.

(m))) (k)
To staff members of the protection and advocacy agency or to staff members of a
private, nonprofit corporation for the purpose of protecting and advocating the
rights of persons with mental illness or developmental disabilities. Resource
management services may limit the release of information to the name,
birthdate, and county of residence of the patient, information regarding
whether the patient was voluntarily admitted, or involuntarily committed, the
date and place of admission, placement, or commitment, the name and address of
a guardian of the patient, and the date and place of the guardian's
appointment. Any staff member who wishes to obtain additional information
shall notify the patient's resource management services in writing of the
request and of the resource management services' right to object. The staff
member shall send the notice by mail to the guardian's address. If the
guardian does not object in writing within fifteen days after the notice is
mailed, the staff member may obtain the additional information. If the
guardian objects in writing within fifteen days after the notice is mailed, the
staff member may not obtain the additional information.

(3)
Whenever federal law or federal regulations restrict the release of information
contained in the treatment records of any patient who receives treatment for
alcoholism or drug dependency, the department may restrict the release of the
information as necessary to comply with federal law and regulations.

Sec.
6. RCW
71.05.390 and 1999 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in this section, the fact of admission and all information and
records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services
to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or private
agencies shall be confidential.

Information
and records may be disclosed only:

(1)
In communications between qualified professional persons to meet the
requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or appropriate
referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings. The consent of the
patient, or his or her guardian, shall be obtained before information or
records may be disclosed by a professional person employed by a facility unless
provided to a professional person: (a) Employed by the facility; (b) who has
medical responsibility for the patient's care; (c) who is a county designated
mental health professional; (d) who is providing services under chapter 71.24
RCW; (e) who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where the
person is confined; or (f) who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up
services under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(2)
When the communications regard the special needs of a patient and the necessary
circumstances giving rise to such needs and the disclosure is made by a
facility providing outpatient services to the operator of a care facility in
which the patient resides.

(3)
When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian, designates persons
to whom information or records may be released, or if the person is a minor,
when his or her parents make such designation.

(4)
To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for a claim to be
made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or medical assistance to
which he or she may be entitled.

(5)
For either program evaluation or research, or both: PROVIDED, That the
secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or research, or both.
Such rules shall include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all
evaluators and researchers must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially
as follows:

"As
a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have
received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I,
. . . . . . . . ., agree not to
divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public
any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding
persons who have received services such that the person who received such
services is identifiable.

I
recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me
to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/............................... "

(6)
To the courts as necessary to the administration of this chapter.

(7)
To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or personnel of the
department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board for
persons who are the subject of the records and who are committed to the custody
of the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which
information or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to RCW
71.05.425 and 4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this chapter under
RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of information that may be released is
limited as follows:

(a)
Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary admission, the fact and date of
discharge, and the last known address shall be disclosed upon request; and

(b)
The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board shall be obligated to
keep such information confidential in accordance with this chapter; and

(c)
Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving notice to said
person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of clear, cogent, and
convincing evidence that such information is necessary and that appropriate
safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be maintained. However, in
the event the said person has escaped from custody, said notice prior to disclosure
is not necessary and that the facility from which the person escaped shall
include an evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or
property and has a propensity toward violence.

(8)
To the attorney of the detained person.

(9)
To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of
the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and 71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The
prosecutor shall be provided access to records regarding the committed person's
treatment and prognosis, medication, behavior problems, and other records
relevant to the issue of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient
treatment is in the best interest of the committed person or others.
Information shall be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person
and the person's counsel.

(10)
To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of
the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety
has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the
patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure.
The disclosure shall be made by the professional person in charge of the public
or private agency or his or her designee and shall include the dates of
admission, discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's
facility, and only such other information that is pertinent to the threat or
harassment. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil
liability for the agency or its employees so long as the decision was reached
in good faith and without gross negligence.

(11)
To appropriate law enforcement agencies, upon request, all necessary and
relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses
a significant and imminent risk to the public. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the mental health service provider or
its employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence.

(12)
To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes described in that
section.

(((12)))
(13) Civil liability and immunity for the release of information about a
particular person who is committed to the department under RCW 71.05.280(3) and
71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030,
is governed by RCW 4.24.550.

(((13)))
(14) To a patient's next of kin, guardian, or conservator, if any, in
the event of death, as provided in RCW 71.05.400.

(((14)))
(15) To the department of health ((of)) for the purposes
of determining compliance with state or federal licensure, certification, or
registration rules or laws. However, the information and records obtained
under this subsection are exempt from public inspection and copying pursuant to
chapter 42.17 RCW.

The
fact of admission, as well as all records, files, evidence, findings, or orders
made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant to this chapter shall not be
admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside this chapter without the
written consent of the person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a
subsequent criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW
71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(2)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to
chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial or in a civil commitment
proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW. The records and files maintained in
any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential and
available subsequent to such proceedings only to the person who was the subject
of the proceeding or his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order the
subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good cause shown
if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are
and will be maintained.

Sec.
7. RCW
71.34.200 and 1985 c 354 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The
fact of admission and all information obtained through treatment under this
chapter is confidential. Confidential information may be disclosed only:

(1)
In communications between mental health professionals to meet the requirements
of this chapter, in the provision of services to the minor, or in making
appropriate referrals;

(2)
In the course of guardianship or dependency proceedings;

(3)
To persons with medical responsibility for the minor's care;

(4)
To the minor, the minor's parent, and the minor's attorney, subject to RCW
13.50.100;

(5)
When the minor or the minor's parent ((designate[s])) designates
in writing the persons to whom information or records may be released;

(6)
To the extent necessary to make a claim for financial aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which the minor may be entitled or for the collection of
fees or costs due to providers for services rendered under this chapter;

(7)
To the courts as necessary to the administration of this chapter;

(8)
To law enforcement officers or public health officers as necessary to carry out
the responsibilities of their office. However, only the fact and date of
admission, and the date of discharge, the name and address of the treatment
provider, if any, and the last known address shall be disclosed upon request;

(9)
To law enforcement officers, public health officers, relatives, and other
governmental law enforcement agencies, if a minor has escaped from custody,
disappeared from an evaluation and treatment facility, violated conditions of a
less restrictive treatment order, or failed to return from an authorized leave,
and then only such information as may be necessary to provide for public safety
or to assist in the apprehension of the minor. The officers are obligated to
keep the information confidential in accordance with this chapter;

(10)
To the secretary for assistance in data collection and program evaluation or
research, provided that the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of such
evaluation and research. The rules shall include, but need not be limited to,
the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of
confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As
a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have
received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I,
. . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information
obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding minors who have
received services in a manner such that the minor is identifiable.

I
recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me
to civil liability under state law.

/s/............................... "

(11)
To appropriate law enforcement agencies, upon request, all necessary and
relevant information in the event of a crisis or emergent situation that poses
a significant and imminent risk to the public. The decision to disclose or not
shall not result in civil liability for the mental health service provider or
its employees so long as the decision was reached in good faith and without
gross negligence;

(12)
To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of
the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety
has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the
patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure.
The disclosure shall be made by the professional person in charge of the public
or private agency or his or her designee and shall include the dates of
admission, discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's
facility, and only such other information that is pertinent to the threat or
harassment. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil
liability for the agency or its employees so long as the decision was reached
in good faith and without gross negligence;

(((12)))
(13) To a minor's next of kin, attorney, guardian, or conservator, if
any, the information that the minor is presently in the facility or that the
minor is seriously physically ill and a statement evaluating the mental and
physical condition of the minor as well as a statement of the probable duration
of the minor's confinement;

(((13)))
(14) Upon the death of a minor, to the minor's next of kin;

(((14)))
(15) To a facility in which the minor resides or will reside.

This
section shall not be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of
statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards,
including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the
secretary. The fact of admission and all information obtained pursuant to this
chapter are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside this
chapter, except guardianship or dependency, without the written consent of the
minor or the minor's parent.

Sec.
8. RCW
9.94A.110 and 1999 c 197 s 3 and 1999 c 196 s 4 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Before
imposing a sentence upon a defendant, the court shall conduct a sentencing
hearing. The sentencing hearing shall be held within forty court days
following conviction. Upon the motion of either party for good cause shown, or
on its own motion, the court may extend the time period for conducting the
sentencing hearing.

Except
in cases where the defendant shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
for life without the possibility of release or, when authorized by RCW
10.95.030 for the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to
death, the court may order the department to complete a risk assessment
report. If available before sentencing, the report shall be provided to the
court.

Unless
specifically waived by the court, the court shall order the department to
complete a chemical dependency screening report before imposing a sentence upon
a defendant who has been convicted of a violation of the uniform controlled
substances act under chapter 69.50 RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit
such a violation under chapter 9A.28 RCW where the court finds that the
offender has a chemical dependency that has contributed to his or her offense.
In addition, the court shall, at the time of plea or conviction, order the
department to complete a presentence report before imposing a sentence upon a
defendant who has been convicted of a felony sexual offense. The department of
corrections shall give priority to presentence investigations for sexual offenders.
If the court determines that the defendant may be a mentally ill person as
defined in RCW 71.24.025, although the defendant has not established that at
the time of the crime he or she lacked the capacity to commit the crime, was
incompetent to commit the crime, or was insane at the time of the crime, the
court shall order the department to complete a presentence report before
imposing a sentence.

The
court shall consider the risk assessment report and presentence reports, if
any, including any victim impact statement and criminal history, and allow
arguments from the prosecutor, the defense counsel, the offender, the victim,
the survivor of the victim, or a representative of the victim or survivor, and
an investigative law enforcement officer as to the sentence to be imposed.

If
the court is satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant
has a criminal history, the court shall specify the convictions it has found to
exist. All of this information shall be part of the record. Copies of all
risk assessment reports and presentence reports presented to the sentencing
court and all written findings of facts and conclusions of law as to sentencing
entered by the court shall be sent to the department by the clerk of the court
at the conclusion of the sentencing and shall accompany the offender if the
offender is committed to the custody of the department. Court clerks shall
provide, without charge, certified copies of documents relating to criminal
convictions requested by prosecuting attorneys.

In a sentencing hearing or any other hearing in which the
department may present a risk assessment or make a recommendation to the court,
on motion of the defendant, or on the court's own motion, the court may exclude
the public from the hearing, seal portions of the hearing record or court file,
or grant other relief as may be necessary to prevent disclosure to the public
of information related to mental health services as defined in either section 2
of this act, or section 3 of this act, or both. Such an order shall not
prevent the subsequent release of the underlying information as authorized in
sections 2 and 3 of this act.

---
END ---