BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
83.100.070 and 1997 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any tax due under this chapter which is not paid by the due date under RCW
83.100.060(1) shall bear interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum from
the date the tax is due until the date of payment.

(2)
Interest imposed under this section for periods after January 1, 1997, shall be
computed at the rate as computed under RCW 82.32.050(2). The rate so computed
shall be adjusted on the first day of January of each year.

(3)(a)
If the Washington return is not filed when due under RCW 83.100.050((, then))
and the person required to file the federal return ((shall pay, in
addition to interest, a penalty equal to five percent of the tax due for each
month after the date the return is due until filed. No penalty may exceed
twenty-five percent of the tax due)) voluntarily reports the filing and
files both the state and federal estate tax returns with the department, no
penalty is imposed on the person required to file the federal return.

(b)
If the Washington return is not filed when due under RCW 83.100.050 and the
person required to file the federal return does not file a return with the
department before the department notifies the person in writing that the
department has determined that the person has not filed a state estate tax
return, the person required to file the federal return shall pay, in addition
to interest, a penalty equal to five percent of the tax due for each month
after the date the return is due until filed. However, in no instance may the
penalty exceed the lesser of twenty-five percent of the tax due or one thousand
five hundred dollars.

(c)
If the department finds that a return due under this chapter has not been filed
by the due date, and the delinquency was the result of circumstances beyond the
control of the responsible person, the department shall waive or cancel any
penalties imposed under this chapter with respect to the filing of such a tax
return. The department shall adopt rules for the waiver or cancellation of the
penalties imposed by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---