BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
National data suggest that in any given year one in ten adult Americans
experiences a mental disorder, and one in five adult Americans will have a
mental disorder during his or her lifetime that requires treatment. For
children, data suggest that one in five may have a diagnosable mental
disorder. Mental disorders are just as preventable, controllable, or curable
as physical disorders.

The
legislature finds that the costs for leaving mental disorders untreated or
undertreated are enormous, and often include: Decreased job productivity,
increased job turnover, loss of employment, increased disability costs,
deteriorating school performance, increased use of other health care services,
treatment delays leading to more costly treatments, suicide, family breakdown
and impoverishment, and institutionalization, whether in hospitals, juvenile
detention, jails, or prisons.

Therefore,
the legislature declares that it is no longer cost-effective to treat persons
with mental disorders differently than persons with medical and surgical
disorders. The cost to our children, families, businesses, and society as a
whole is too high.

Therefore,
the legislature intends to require insurance coverage at parity for mental
health services, which means that this coverage be delivered under the same
terms and conditions as medical and surgical coverage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of this section, "mental health services" means: (a)
Outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders
covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of
this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the authority by
rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders,
291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this
section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the plan contract otherwise includes
coverage for prescription drugs.

(2)
Each health plan offered to public employees and their covered dependents under
this chapter that is not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW and is
established or renewed after July 1, 2001, and that provides coverage for
hospital or medical care, shall provide coverage for mental health services.
This coverage:

(a)
Shall only impose treatment limitations or financial requirements on coverage
for mental health services, if the same limitations or requirements are imposed
on coverage for medical and surgical services. This includes but is not
limited to copays, cost sharing, annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient
visit limits, outpatient day limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and
preventive services that are reimbursed at one hundred percent without
deductible, coinsurance, or other cost sharing are excluded from this
comparison; and

(b)
Shall require one single annual deductible, and one single annual maximum
out-of-pocket limit for medical and surgical and mental health services if
annual deductibles and maximum out-of-pocket limits are required by the
insuring entity. However, no plan is required to initiate the use of such a
deductible or limit.

(3)
Coverage shall be provided for mental health services under this section
whether services are rendered by any generally recognized medical specialty of
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW who provide mental
health services; psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; advanced
practice psychiatric nurses as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW; social workers, marriage and family
therapists, and mental health counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; or
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4)
This section does not prohibit an insuring entity from requiring the use of
preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health
services or the requirement that mental health services must be medically
necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of this section, "mental health services" means: (a)
Outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders
covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of
this section or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance commissioner
by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance abuse disorders,
291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the effective date of this
section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the insurance contract otherwise
includes coverage for prescription drugs.

(2)
All group disability insurance contracts and blanket disability insurance
contracts providing health care services to groups with more than fifty
persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2001, and for groups with fifty or
fewer persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2002, that provide coverage for
hospital or medical care shall provide coverage for mental health services.
This coverage:

(a)
Shall only impose treatment limitations or financial requirements on coverage
for mental health services, if the same limitations or requirements are imposed
on coverage for medical and surgical services. This includes but is not
limited to copays, cost sharing, annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient
visit limits, outpatient day limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and
preventive services that are reimbursed at one hundred percent without
deductible, coinsurance, or other cost sharing are excluded from this comparison;
and

(b)
Shall require one single annual deductible, and one single annual maximum
out-of-pocket limit for medical and surgical and mental health services if
annual deductibles and maximum out-of-pocket limits are required by the
insurer. However, no plan is required to initiate the use of such a deductible
or limit.

(3)
Coverage shall be provided for mental health services under this section
whether services are rendered by any generally recognized medical specialty of
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW who provide mental
health services; psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; advanced
practice psychiatric nurses as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW; social workers, marriage and family
therapists, and mental health counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; or
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4)
This section does not prohibit an insurer from requiring the use of
preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health
services or the requirement that mental health services must be medically
necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of this section, "mental health services" means: (a)
Outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders
covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of
this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the insurance
commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter . . .,
Laws of 2000 (this act), except V codes and those codes defining substance
abuse disorders, 291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9 as of the
effective date of this section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the contract
otherwise includes coverage for prescription drugs.

(2)
All health care service contracts for groups with more than fifty persons,
issued or renewed after July 1, 2001, and for groups with fifty or fewer
persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2002, that provide coverage for hospital
or medical care shall provide coverage for mental health services. This
coverage:

(a)
Shall only impose treatment limitations or financial requirements on coverage
for mental health services, if the same limitations or requirements are imposed
on coverage for medical and surgical services. This includes but is not
limited to copays, cost sharing, annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient
visit limits, outpatient day limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and
preventive services that are reimbursed at one hundred percent without
deductible, coinsurance, or other cost sharing are excluded from this
comparison; and

(b)
Shall require one single annual deductible, and one single annual maximum
out-of-pocket limit for medical and surgical and mental health services if
annual deductibles and maximum out-of-pocket limits are required by the health
care service contractor. However, no plan is required to initiate the use of
such a deductible or limit.

(3)
Coverage shall be provided for mental health services under this section
whether services are rendered by any generally recognized medical specialty of
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW who provide mental
health services; psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; advanced
practice psychiatric nurses as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW; social workers, marriage and family
therapists, and mental health counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; or
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4)
This section does not prohibit a health care service contractor from requiring
the use of preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of
mental health services or the requirement that mental health services must be
medically necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her
designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of this section, "mental health services" means:
(a) Outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental
disorders covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the most current
version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders on the
effective date of this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by
the insurance commissioner by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (this act), except V codes and those codes
defining substance abuse disorders, 291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9
as of the effective date of this section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the
plan contract otherwise includes coverage for prescription drugs.

(2)
All health benefit plans offered by health maintenance organizations to groups
with more than fifty persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2001, and for
groups with fifty or fewer persons, issued or renewed after July 1, 2002, that
provide coverage for hospital or medical care shall provide coverage for mental
health services. This coverage:

(a)
Shall only impose treatment limitations or financial requirements on coverage
for mental health services, if the same limitations or requirements are imposed
on coverage for medical and surgical services. This includes but is not
limited to copays, cost sharing, annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient
visit limits, outpatient day limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and
preventive services that are reimbursed at one hundred percent without
deductible, coinsurance, or other cost sharing are excluded from this
comparison; and

(b)
Shall require one single annual deductible, and one single annual maximum
out-of-pocket limit for medical and surgical and mental health services if
annual deductibles and maximum out-of-pocket limits are required by the health
maintenance organization. However, no plan is required to initiate the use of
such a deductible or limit.

(3)
Coverage shall be provided for mental health services under this section
whether services are rendered by any generally recognized medical specialty of
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW who provide mental
health services; psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; advanced
practice psychiatric nurses as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW; social workers, marriage and family
therapists, and mental health counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; or
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4)
This section does not prohibit a health maintenance organization from requiring
the use of preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of
mental health services or the requirement that mental health services must be
medically necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her
designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 70.47 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 70.47.060, this section governs the provision of mental
health services to subsidized enrollees in the basic health plan.

(1)
For the purpose of this section, "mental health services" means: (a)
Outpatient and inpatient services provided to treat any of the mental disorders
covered by the diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the
diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of
this section, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the Washington
state health care authority by rule, consistent with the purposes of chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (this act), except V codes and those codes
defining substance abuse disorders, 291.0 through 292.9 and 303.0 through 305.9
as of the effective date of this section; and (b) prescription drugs, if the
plan contract otherwise includes coverage for prescription drugs.

(2)
After July 1, 2002, the basic health plan shall provide coverage for mental
health services to subsidized children and adults. This coverage:

(a)
Shall only impose treatment limitations or financial requirements on coverage
for mental health services, if the same limitations or requirements are imposed
on coverage for medical and surgical services. This includes but is not
limited to copays, cost sharing, annual or lifetime dollar limits, outpatient
visit limits, outpatient day limits, and inpatient limits. Wellness and
preventive services that are reimbursed at one hundred percent without deductible,
coinsurance, or other cost sharing are excluded from this comparison; and

(b)
Shall require one single annual deductible, and one single annual maximum
out-of-pocket limit for medical and surgical and mental health services if
annual deductibles and maximum out-of-pocket limits are required by the
administrator. However, no plan is required to initiate the use of such a
deductible or limit.

(3)
Coverage shall be provided for mental health services under this section
whether services are rendered by any generally recognized medical specialty of
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW who provide mental
health services; psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; advanced
practice psychiatric nurses as authorized by the nursing care quality assurance
commission under chapter 18.79 RCW; social workers, marriage and family
therapists, and mental health counselors certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; or
community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW.

(4)
This section does not prohibit the administrator from requiring the use of
preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the delivery of mental health
services or the requirement that mental health services must be medically
necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her designee.

Sec.
7. RCW
48.21.240 and 1987 c 283 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each group insurer providing disability insurance coverage in this state for
hospital or medical care under contracts which are issued, delivered, or
renewed in this state on or after July 1, 1986, shall offer optional
supplemental coverage for mental health treatment for the insured and the
insured's covered dependents.

(2)
Benefits shall be provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental
health treatment whether treatment is rendered by: (a) A physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW; (c) a community mental health agency licensed by the department of
social and health services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state
hospital as defined in RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the
usual and customary rates for such treatment. The insurer, health care service
contractor, or health maintenance organization providing optional coverage
under the provisions of this section for mental health services may establish
separate usual and customary rates for services rendered by physicians licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83
RCW, and community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and
state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be
subject to contract provisions with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or
copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed
community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan for quality
assurance and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under
chapter 18.83 RCW.

(3)
The group disability insurance contract may provide that all the coverage for
mental health treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract
holder so states in advance in writing to the insurer.

(4)
This section shall not apply to a group disability insurance contract that has
been entered into in accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between
management and labor representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

(5)
This section does not apply to groups with more than fifty persons beginning
July 1, 2001.

Sec.
8. RCW
48.44.340 and 1987 c 283 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each health care service contractor providing hospital or medical services or
benefits in this state under group contracts for health care services under
this chapter which are issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after
July 1, 1986, shall offer optional supplemental coverage for mental health
treatment for the insured and the insured's covered dependents.

(2)
Benefits shall be provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental
health treatment whether treatment is rendered by: (a) A physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW; (c) a community mental health agency licensed by the department of
social and health services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW; or (d) a state
hospital as defined in RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be covered at the
usual and customary rates for such treatment. The insurer, health care service
contractor, or health maintenance organization providing optional coverage
under the provisions of this section for mental health services may establish
separate usual and customary rates for services rendered by physicians licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed under chapter 18.83
RCW, and community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.24 RCW and
state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However, the treatment may be
subject to contract provisions with respect to reasonable deductible amounts or
copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this section, a licensed
community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan for quality assurance
and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by a physician licensed
under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist licensed under chapter
18.83 RCW.

(3)
The group contract for health care services may provide that all the coverage
for mental health treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract
holder so states in advance in writing to the health care service contractor.

(4)
This section shall not apply to a group health care service contract that has
been entered into in accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between
management and labor representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

(5)
This section does not apply to groups with more than fifty persons beginning
July 1, 2001.

Sec.
9. RCW
48.46.290 and 1987 c 283 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each health maintenance organization providing services or benefits for
hospital or medical care coverage in this state under group health maintenance
agreements which are issued, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after
July 1, 1986, shall offer optional supplemental coverage for mental health
treatment to the enrolled participant and the enrolled participant's covered
dependents.

(2)
Benefits shall be provided under the optional supplemental coverage for mental
health treatment whether treatment is rendered by the health maintenance
organization or the health maintenance organization refers the enrolled
participant or the enrolled participant's covered dependents for treatment to:
(a) A physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW; (b) a psychologist
licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW; (c) a community mental health agency licensed
by the department of social and health services pursuant to chapter 71.24 RCW;
or (d) a state hospital as defined in RCW 72.23.010. The treatment shall be
covered at the usual and customary rates for such treatment. The insurer,
health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization providing
optional coverage under the provisions of this section for mental health
services may establish separate usual and customary rates for services rendered
by physicians licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, psychologists licensed
under chapter 18.83 RCW, and community mental health centers licensed under
chapter 71.24 RCW and state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010. However,
the treatment may be subject to contract provisions with respect to reasonable
deductible amounts or copayments. In order to qualify for coverage under this
section, a licensed community mental health agency shall have in effect a plan
for quality assurance and peer review, and the treatment shall be supervised by
a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW or by a psychologist
licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW.

(3)
The group health maintenance agreement may provide that all the coverage for
mental health treatment is waived for all covered members if the contract
holder so states in advance in writing to the health maintenance organization.

(4)
This section shall not apply to a group health maintenance agreement that has
been entered into in accordance with a collective bargaining agreement between
management and labor representatives prior to March 1, 1987.

(5)
This section does not apply to groups with more than fifty persons beginning
July 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed, effective July 1, 2002:

(1) RCW
48.21.240 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage--Waiver) and 2000 c . . . s 7 (section 7 of this act), 1987
c 283 s 3, 1986 c 184 s 2, & 1983 c 35 s 1;

(2) RCW
48.44.340 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental coverage--Waiver)
and 2000 c . . . s 8 (section 8 of this act), 1987 c 283 s 4, 1986 c
184 s 3, & 1983 c 35 s 2; and

(3) RCW
48.46.290 (Mental health treatment, optional supplemental
coverage--Waiver) and 2000 c . . . s 9 (section 9 of this act), 1987
c 283 s 5, 1986 c 184 s 4, & 1983 c 35 s 3.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---