BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.66.020 and 1997 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the value of the claim or the amount at issue does not exceed ((thirty-five))
fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorneys'
fees, the district court shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of the
following civil actions and proceedings:

(1)
Actions arising on contract for the recovery of money;

(2)
Actions for damages for injuries to the person, or for taking or detaining
personal property, or for injuring personal property, or for an injury to real
property when no issue raised by the answer involves the plaintiff's title to
or possession of the same and actions to recover the possession of personal
property;

(3)
Actions for a penalty;

(4)
Actions upon a bond conditioned for the payment of money, when the amount
claimed does not exceed ((thirty-five)) fifty thousand dollars,
though the penalty of the bond exceeds that sum, the judgment to be given for
the sum actually due, not exceeding the amount claimed in the complaint;

(5)
Actions on an undertaking or surety bond taken by the court;

(6)
Actions for damages for fraud in the sale, purchase, or exchange of personal
property;

(7)
Proceedings to take and enter judgment on confession of a defendant;

(8)
Proceedings to issue writs of attachment, garnishment and replevin upon goods,
chattels, moneys, and effects; and

(9) All other actions and proceedings of which jurisdiction is
specially conferred by statute, when the title to, or right of possession of
real property is not involved.

---
END ---