BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that:

(1)
Each common school age, special education student generates funding in a
district's basic education allocation;

(2)
Special education funding is provided on an excess cost basis for enhanced
services above the basic education allocation; and

(3)
Every common school age, special education student is considered a basic
education student first and should receive their appropriate share of basic
education allocations.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.150.390 and 1995 c 77 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction shall submit to each regular session of
the legislature during an odd-numbered year a programmed budget request for
special education programs for students with disabilities. Funding for
programs operated by local school districts shall be on an excess cost basis
from appropriations provided by the legislature for special education programs
for students with disabilities and shall take account of state funds accruing
through RCW 28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, federal medical assistance and private
funds accruing under RCW 74.09.5249 through 74.09.5253 and 74.09.5254 through
74.09.5256, and other state and local funds, excluding special excess levies. School
districts shall ensure, to the greatest extent possible, that special education
students receive their appropriate share of the basic education allocation
funds accruing through RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. To the extent a school
district cannot provide an appropriate education for special education students
under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the basic education allocation funds, it
shall provide services through the special education allocation funded in the
omnibus appropriations act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement section 2
of this act. These rules shall include accounting requirements to separate
basic education and special education expenditures within special education
programs, including examples of accepted excess cost accounting methodologies.
The excess cost accounting methodologies shall ensure that funding from the
basic education allocation is utilized for special education students.

---
END ---