BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that bail bond agents and bail bond recovery agents
serve a useful purpose in the criminal justice system by apprehending and
surrendering fugitives. The legislature also recognizes that locating,
apprehending, and surrendering fugitives require special skills and knowledge,
and that bail bond recovery agents are often required to perform their duties
under stressful and demanding conditions. Therefore, bail bond agencies who
use the services of bail bond recovery agents must be encouraged, in the
interest of public safety, to use bail bond recovery agents who possess the
training and experience necessary for the job.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.185.010 and 1996 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(2)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(3)
"Collateral or security" means property of any kind given as security
to obtain a bail bond.

(4)
"Bail bond agency" means a business that sells and issues corporate
surety bail bonds or that provides security in the form of personal or real
property to insure the appearance of a criminal defendant before the courts of
this state or the United States.

(5)
"Qualified agent" means an owner, sole proprietor, partner, manager,
officer, or chief operating officer of a corporation who meets the requirements
set forth in this chapter for obtaining a bail bond agency license.

(6)
"Bail bond agent" means a person who is employed by a bail bond
agency and engages in the sale or issuance of bail bonds, but does not mean a
clerical, secretarial, or other support person who does not participate in the
sale or issuance of bail bonds.

(7)
"Licensee" means a bail bond agency or a bail bond agent or both.

(8)
"Branch office" means any office physically separated from the
principal place of business of the licensee from which the licensee or an
employee or agents conduct any activity meeting the criteria of (([a])) a
bail bond agency.

(9)
"Bail bond recovery agent" means a person who receives compensation
or reward for apprehending and surrendering another person for whom a bail bond
has been posted. "Bail bond recovery agent" does not include any
bail bond agent or qualified agent licensed under this chapter or any law
enforcement officer.

(10)
"Certificate" means the document issued to a bail bond recovery agent
by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person may not perform the duties of a bail bond recovery agent in this state
unless he or she is certified by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed
in this state.

(2)
Any bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed in this state may certify a
person to perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent. A certificate
issued to a person under this section shall be authority for the person to
perform the functions of a bail bond recovery agent only for the bail bond
agency or bail bond agent issuing the certificate and only for the time period
specified in the certificate. The certified bail bond recovery agent is
subject to supervision of the bail bond agency or bail bond agent issuing the
certification. No certification made by one bail bond agency or bail bond
agent is transferrable to another bail bond agency or bail bond agent.

(3)
Before certifying the bail bond recovery agent, the bail bond agency or bail
bond agent shall verify that the bail bond recovery agent has met the minimum
standards established by the director pursuant to section 4 of this act. The
bail bond agent or bail bond agency may require any information and
documentation that reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the bail
bond recovery agent meets the standards. These standards shall not prevent the
certifying entity from imposing any additional standards or requirements as the
certifying entity considers appropriate. Nothing in this act gives a person
who has been denied a certificate from a bail bond agency or bail bond agent,
or whose certificate has been revoked by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent,
any right to appeal the denial or revocation or any cause of action against the
bail bond agency or bail bond agent or the department.

(4)
A bail bond recovery agent must keep the certificate with him or her when
apprehending and surrendering a person. A bail bond recovery agent must
exhibit the certificate upon request.

(5)
The bail bond agency or bail bond agent shall provide the department with a
roster of bail bond recovery agents who are certified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director or the director's designee, with the advice of designees of the
bail bond industry, law enforcement agencies and associations, and prosecutors'
associations, shall adopt rules necessary to administer, implement, and enforce
sections 2 through 5 of this act and shall establish minimum standards
necessary for a bail bond agency or qualified agent to certify a bail bond
recovery agent.

(2)
The standards shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a)
A minimum level of education or experience appropriate for performing the
duties of a bail bond recovery agent;

(b)
A minimum level of instruction in relevant areas of criminal and civil law;

(c)
A minimum level of instruction regarding appropriate use of force at different
levels;

(d)
The nonexistence of felony criminal history;

(e)
Adequate training of the use of firearms from the criminal justice training
commission; and

(f)
Possession of a concealed pistol license.

(3)
The director or the director's designee shall develop a format for the
certificate required under section 3 of this act. At a minimum, the
certificate must include the following:

(a)
The name, address, phone number, and license number of the bail bond agency or
bail bond agent certifying the bail bond recovery agent;

(b)
The name, address, and phone number of the bail bond recovery agent;

(c)
A statement that the bail bond agency or bail bond agent attests that the bail
bond recovery agent has met the minimum standards required by the director; and

(d)
The length of time the bail bond recovery agent will be providing services for
the bail bond agency or bail bond agent certifying the bail bond recovery
agent.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.185.110 and 1993 c 260 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following acts are prohibited and constitute grounds for disciplinary action or
denial, suspension, or revocation of any license under this chapter, as deemed
appropriate by the director:

(1)
Knowingly violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted
under this chapter;

(2)
Knowingly making a material misstatement or omission in the application for or
renewal of a license;

(3)
Failing to meet the qualifications set forth in RCW 18.185.020 and 18.185.030;

(4)
Conviction of a gross misdemeanor or felony or the commission of any act
involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption whether the act
constitutes a crime or not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a
criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon
such a conviction, however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at
the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or
applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and of the
person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of
this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or
nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which
the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates
rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;

(5)
Advertising that is false, fraudulent, or misleading;

(6)
Incompetence or negligence that results in injury to a person or that creates
an unreasonable risk that a person may be harmed;

(7)
Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice
the profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign
jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being
conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(8)
Failure to cooperate with the director by not:

(a)
Furnishing any necessary papers or documents requested by the director for
purposes of conducting an investigation for disciplinary action, denial,
suspension, or revocation of a license under this chapter;

(b)
Furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter
contained in a complaint filed with the department; or

(c)
Responding to subpoenas issued by the director, whether or not the recipient of
the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding;

(9)
Failure to comply with an order issued by the director or an assurance of
discontinuance entered into with the director;

(10)
Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice if a license is required;

(11)
Knowingly committing, or being a party to, any material fraud,
misrepresentation, concealment, conspiracy, collusion, trick, scheme, or device
whereby any other person lawfully relies upon the word, representation, or
conduct of the licensee;

(12)
Failure to adequately supervise employees to the extent that the client funds
are at risk;

(13)
Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful
misrepresentation of facts before the director or the director's authorized
representative, or by the use of threats or harassment against any client or
witness to prevent them from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or
any other legal action;

(14)
Assigning or transferring any license issued pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter, except as provided in RCW 18.185.030;

(15)
Conversion of any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of
title, to his or her own use or to the use of his or her principal or of any
other person, when delivered to him or her in trust or on condition, in
violation of the trust or before the happening of the condition; and failure to
return any money or contract, deed, note, mortgage, or other evidence of title
within thirty days after the owner is entitled to possession, and makes demand
for possession, shall be prima facie evidence of conversion;

(16)
Failing to keep records, maintain a trust account, or return collateral or
security, as required by RCW 18.185.100;

(17)
Any conduct in a bail bond transaction which demonstrates bad faith,
dishonesty, or untrustworthiness; ((or))

(18)
Violation of an order to cease and desist that is issued by the director under
this chapter; or

(19)
Using the services of a bail bond recovery agent without issuing the proper
certification to the bail bond recovery agent or certifying a bail bond
recovery agent who does not meet the minimum standards established by the
director under this chapter. Any costs associated with the department's
enforcement pursuant to this subsection shall be exempt from the fee policy
stated in RCW 43.24.086, and the department shall not use costs associated with
enforcement to increase the fees to bail bond agencies and bail bond agents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 18.185 RCW to read as follows:

Any person who performs the functions of a bail bond recovery agent
without first being certified by a bail bond agency or bail bond agent licensed
in this state commits a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---