BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 3.02 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Where approved by the local legislative body, courts of limited jurisdiction
may enter into agreements with one or more licensed bail bond agencies for the
purpose of executing bench warrants for an accused's failure to appear or
violation of a condition of release. These agreements may specify the scope of
work, remuneration for services, and other charges deemed appropriate.

(2)
Upon the release of an accused on bail or on his or her personal recognizance
pending trial, a court using licensed bail bond agencies shall advise the
accused that his or her failure to appear or violation of the conditions of
release may result in a warrant for the accused's arrest, that the warrant may
be executed by a bail bond agency, and that the accused will be financially
responsible for reimbursement costs to the bail bond agency.

(3)
When a warrant is executed by a licensed bail bond agency, the court shall
require the accused to pay the costs of executing the warrant. Costs shall be
limited to actual expenses incurred by the licensed bail bond agency in
seeking, apprehending, and transporting the accused. Such costs imposed
constitute a judgment against the accused and survive a dismissal or acquittal
of the underlying action against the accused. The court may assign to the
licensed bail bond agency any debt incurred by the accused for the bail bond
agency's costs of executing the warrant.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.20.270 and 1992 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The position of warrant officer is hereby created and shall be maintained by
the city within the city police department. The number and qualifications of
warrant officers shall be fixed by ordinance, and their compensation shall be
paid by the city.

(2)
Warrant officers shall be vested only with the special authority to make
arrests authorized by warrants and other arrests as are authorized by
ordinance.

(3)
All criminal and civil process issuing out of courts created under this title
shall be directed to the chief of police of the city served by the court and/or
to the sheriff of the county in which the court is held and/or the warrant
officers and be by them executed according to law in any county of this state.

(4)
No process of courts created under this title shall be executed outside the
corporate limits of the city served by the court unless the person authorized
by the process first contacts the applicable law enforcement agency in whose
jurisdiction the process is to be served.

(5)
Upon a defendant being arrested in another city or county the cost of arresting
or serving process thereon shall be borne by the court issuing the process
including the cost of returning the defendant from any county of the state to
the city.

(6)
Warrant officers shall not be entitled to death, disability, or retirement
benefits pursuant to chapter 41.26 RCW on the basis of service as a warrant
officer as described in this section.

(7)
Nothing in this section precludes a court of limited jurisdiction, upon the
approval of the local legislative body, to enter into agreements with licensed
bail bond agencies for the purposes of executing bench warrants for an
accused's failure to appear or violation of a condition of release as provided
for in section 1 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
3.62.020 and 1995 c 301 s 31 and 1995 c 291 s 5 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fees, fines,
forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected in whole or in part by
district courts, except costs, fines, forfeitures and penalties assessed and
collected, in whole or in part, because of the violation of city ordinances,
shall be remitted by the clerk of the district court to the county treasurer at
least monthly, together with a financial statement as required by the state
auditor, noting the information necessary for crediting of such funds as
required by law.

(2)
The county treasurer shall remit thirty-two percent of the noninterest money
received under subsection (1) of this section except certain costs to the state
treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those
costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or
36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal
actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes
if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded
for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the
prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted
under this subsection to the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in
RCW 43.08.250.

(3)
The balance of the noninterest money received by the county treasurer under
subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited in the county current expense
fund.

(4)
All money collected for county parking infractions shall be remitted by the
clerk of the district court at least monthly, with the information required
under subsection (1) of this section, to the county treasurer for deposit in
the county current expense fund. If the court uses licensed bail bond
agencies to execute warrants, as provided for in section 1 of this act, all
money collected for the reimbursement of bail bond agency expenses shall be
remitted by the clerk to the bail bond agency that incurred such expenses.

(5)
Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the
rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency.
Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(6)
Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and
costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in
the public safety and education account as provided in RCW 43.08.250,
twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the judicial
information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five percent to
the county current expense fund, and twenty-five percent to the county current
expense fund to fund local courts.

Sec.
4. RCW
3.62.040 and 1995 c 291 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all costs, fines,
forfeitures and penalties assessed and collected, in whole or in part, by
district courts because of violations of city ordinances shall be remitted by
the clerk of the district court at least monthly directly to the treasurer of
the city wherein the violation occurred.

(2)
The city treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the noninterest
money received under this section, other than for parking infractions and
certain costs, to the state treasurer. "Certain costs" as used in
this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil
actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against
convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or
36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically designated
as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs
incurred by the state, county, city, or town in the prosecution of the case,
including the fees of defense counsel. Money remitted under this subsection to
the state treasurer shall be deposited as provided in RCW 43.08.250.

(3)
The balance of the noninterest money received under this section shall be
retained by the city and deposited as provided by law.

(4)
All money collected for city parking infractions shall be remitted by the clerk
of the district court at least monthly to the city treasurer for deposit in the
city's general fund. If the court uses licensed bail bond agencies to
execute warrants, as provided for in section 1 of this act, all money collected
for the reimbursement of bail bond agency expenses shall be remitted by the
clerk to the bail bond agency that incurred such expenses.

(5)
Penalties, fines, bail forfeitures, fees, and costs may accrue interest at the
rate of twelve percent per annum, upon assignment to a collection agency.
Interest may accrue only while the case is in collection status.

(6) Interest retained by the court on penalties, fines, bail
forfeitures, fees, and costs shall be split twenty-five percent to the state
treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account as provided in
RCW 43.08.250, twenty-five percent to the state treasurer for deposit in the
judicial information system account as provided in RCW 2.68.020, twenty-five
percent to the city general fund, and twenty-five percent to the city general
fund to fund local courts.

---
END ---