BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.96 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the terms of a franchise agreement, a manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative, or an agent, officer,
parent company, wholly or partially owned subsidiary, affiliated entity, or
other person controlled by or under common control with a manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative, shall not:

(a)
Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or offering to sell a
like vehicle to one dealer at a lower actual price than the actual price
offered to another dealer for the same model similarly equipped;

(b)
Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by selling or offering to sell
parts or accessories to one dealer at a lower actual price than the actual
price offered to another dealer;

(c)
Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by using a promotion plan or
other similar device that results in a lower actual price on vehicles, parts,
or accessories being charged to one dealer over another dealer;

(d)
Discriminate between new motor vehicle dealers by adopting a method, or
changing an existing method, for the allocation, scheduling, or delivery of new
motor vehicles, parts, or accessories to its dealers that is not fair,
reasonable, and equitable. Upon the request of a dealer, a manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative shall disclose in
writing to the dealer the method by which new motor vehicles, parts, and
accessories are allocated, scheduled, or delivered to its dealers handling the
same line or make of vehicles;

(e)
Give preferential treatment to some new motor vehicle dealers over others by
refusing or failing to deliver, in reasonable quantities and within a
reasonable time after receipt of an order, to a dealer holding a franchise for
a line or make of motor vehicles sold or distributed by the manufacturer,
distributor, factory branch, or factory representative, a new vehicle, parts,
or accessories, if the vehicle, parts, or accessories are being delivered to
other dealers, or require a dealer to purchase unreasonable advertising
displays or other materials, or require a dealer to remodel or renovate
existing facilities as a prerequisite to receiving a model or series of vehicles;

(f)
Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer by acting in the capacity of a retail
dealer, or by owning, operating, or controlling, whether directly or
indirectly, a motor vehicle dealership in this state. It is not, however, a
violation of this subsection for:

(i)
A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative to own
or operate a dealership for a temporary period, not to exceed one year, during
the transition from one owner of the dealership to another where the dealership
was previously owned by a franchised dealer and is currently for sale to any
qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price;

(ii)
A manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative to own
or operate a dealership in conjunction with an independent person in a bona
fide business relationship as part of a "dealer development program"
for the purpose of broadening the diversity of its dealer body and enhancing
opportunities for qualified persons who are part of a group who have
historically been underrepresented in its dealer body, or other qualified
persons who lack the resources to purchase a dealership outright, and where the
independent person: (A) Has made a significant, bona fide capital investment
in the dealership that is subject to loss; (B) has an ownership interest in the
dealership; and (C) operates the dealership under a bona fide written agreement
with the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative
under which he or she will acquire all of the ownership interest in the
dealership within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable terms and
conditions. The manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative has the burden of proof of establishing that the acquisition of
the dealership by the independent person under a "dealer development
program" was made within a reasonable period of time and under reasonable
terms and conditions;

(iii)
A truck manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor vehicle dealership
that sells only trucks of that manufacturer's line make with a gross vehicle
weight rating of 12,500 pounds or more, and the truck manufacturer has been
continuously engaged in the retail sale of the trucks at least since January 1,
1993; or

(iv)
A manufacturer to own, operate, or control a new motor vehicle dealership that
sells only vehicles of that manufacturer's line make if, at least since January
1, 1993, the manufacturer has been continuously engaged in the retail sale of
motor vehicles of its own line make through the dealership, and if the
manufacturer does not own, directly or indirectly, in the aggregate in excess
of forty-five percent of the total ownership interest in the dealership;

(g)
Compete with a new motor vehicle dealer by owning, operating, or controlling,
whether directly or indirectly, a service facility in this state for the repair
or maintenance of motor vehicles. Nothing in this subsection (1)(g), however,
prohibits a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative
from owning or operating a service facility for the purpose of providing or
performing maintenance, repair, or service work on motor vehicles that are
owned by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative;

(h)
Use information regarding sales of new motor vehicles obtained as the
manufacturer from a new motor vehicle dealer to market products or services in
a manner that would create unfair competition in the new motor vehicle dealer's
relevant market area.

(2)
Subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section do not apply to sales to a
motor vehicle dealer: (a) For resale to a federal, state, or local government
agency; (b) where the vehicles will be sold or donated for use in a program of
driver's education; (c) where the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide
regional promotional program offering sales incentives or rebates; or (d) where
the sale is made under a manufacturer's bona fide fleet vehicle discount
program. For purposes of this subsection, "fleet" means a group of
fifteen or more new motor vehicles purchased or leased by a dealer at one time
under a single purchase or lease agreement for use as part of a fleet, and
where the dealer has been assigned a fleet identifier code by the department of
licensing.

(3)
The following definitions apply to this section:

(a)
"Actual price" means the price to be paid by the dealer less any
incentive paid by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative, whether paid to the dealer or the ultimate purchaser of the
vehicle.

(b)
"Control" or "controlling" means (i) the possession of,
title to, or control of ten percent or more of the voting equity interest in a
person, whether directly or indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or other
intermediary, or (ii) the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to
direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person,
whether through the ownership of voting securities, through director control,
by contract, or otherwise.

(c)
"Motor vehicles" does not include trucks that are 14,001 pounds gross
vehicle weight and above or recreational vehicles as defined in RCW 43.22.335.

(d)
"Operate" means to manage a dealership, whether directly or
indirectly.

(e)
"Own" or "ownership" means to hold the beneficial ownership
of one percent or more of any class of equity interest in a dealership, whether
the interest is that of a shareholder, partner, limited liability company
member, or otherwise. To hold an ownership interest means to have possession
of, title to, or control of the ownership interest, whether directly or
indirectly through a fiduciary, agent, or other intermediary.

(4) A violation of this section is deemed to affect the public
interest and constitutes an unlawful and unfair practice under chapter 19.86
RCW.

---
END ---