BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that middle school youth, grades six, seven, and eight, are
experiencing remarkable physical and emotional development. These changes
often affect how they perform in school and how they relate to parents and
others in the community. This is the age when adolescents crave excitement and
activities with their peers. Law enforcement officials affirm that if these
needs are not met in quality programs organized by responsible adults, the
adolescents become more likely to participate in unhealthy or criminal
activity.

The
legislature further finds that there is a lack of affordable, safe,
age-appropriate child care opportunities for middle school youth.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.215 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services shall establish a grant program to
be administered by the office of child care policy to provide funding for
after-school care for middle school youth. Under the grant program:

(a)
Public schools and other public, private, and nonprofit organizations may apply
for grants to provide after-school care to youth in sixth, seventh, and eighth
grades;

(b)
Grants may be awarded to provide funding to either supplement existing programs
or start new programs;

(c)
Applicants must provide twenty-five percent matching funds, either money or
in-kind;

(d)
Preference is to be given to providing grants to programs that will:

(i)
Serve low-income youth;

(ii)
Serve youth with special needs, including youth with developmental or physical
disabilities and youth in individualized educational programs;

(iii)
Serve economically depressed areas;

(iv)
Provide age-appropriate activities for the youth; and

(v)
Be geographically diverse.

(2)
In administering the grant program, the office of child care policy shall:

(a)
Establish an advisory board that includes representatives from middle schools,
parents of middle school youth, and providers from community-based
organizations and is geographically diverse. The advisory board shall review
and rate applications prior to selection by the office of child care policy;

(b)
Develop outcome measures with input from the advisory board and keep track of
program impact using developmental assets as performance measures; and

(c)
Encourage participating organizations to participate in federal food programs.

(3)
The department of social and health services shall adopt rules under chapter
34.05 RCW setting forth criteria, application procedures, and methods to
implement this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.13.0903 and 1997 c 58 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of child care policy is established to operate under the authority of
the department of social and health services. The duties and responsibilities
of the office include, but are not limited to, the following, within
appropriated funds:

(1)
Staff and assist the child care coordinating committee in the implementation of
its duties under RCW 74.13.090;

(2)
Work in conjunction with the state-wide child care resource and referral
network as well as local governments, nonprofit organizations, businesses, and
community child care advocates to create local child care resource and referral
organizations. These organizations may carry out needs assessments, resource
development, provider training, technical assistance, and parent information
and training;

(3)
Actively seek public and private money for distribution as grants to the
state-wide child care resource and referral network and to existing or
potential local child care resource and referral organizations;

(4)
Adopt rules regarding the application for and distribution of grants to local
child care resource and referral organizations. The rules shall, at a minimum,
require an applicant to submit a plan for achieving the following objectives:

(a)
Provide parents with information about child care resources, including location
of services and subsidies;

(b)
Carry out child care provider recruitment and training programs, including
training under RCW 74.25.040;

(c)
Offer support services, such as parent and provider seminars, toy-lending
libraries, and substitute banks;

(d)
Provide information for businesses regarding child care supply and demand;

(e)
Advocate for increased public and private sector resources devoted to child
care;

(f)
Provide technical assistance to employers regarding employee child care
services; and

(g)
Serve recipients of temporary assistance for needy families and working parents
with incomes at or below household incomes of one hundred seventy-five percent
of the federal poverty line;

(5)
Provide staff support and technical assistance to the state-wide child care
resource and referral network and local child care resource and referral
organizations;

(6)
Maintain a state-wide child care licensing data bank and work with department
of social and health services licensors to provide information to local child
care resource and referral organizations about licensed child care providers in
the state;

(7)
Through the state-wide child care resource and referral network and local
resource and referral organizations, compile data about local child care needs
and availability for future planning and development;

(8)
Coordinate with the state-wide child care resource and referral network and
local child care resource and referral organizations for the provision of
training and technical assistance to child care providers; ((and))

(9)
Collect and assemble information regarding the availability of insurance and of
federal and other child care funding to assist state and local agencies,
businesses, and other child care providers in offering child care services;

(10) Administer the after-school care for middle school youth
grant program established in section 2 of this act.

---
END ---