BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that career and technical student organizations:

(a)
Prepare students for career experiences beyond high school;

(b)
Help students develop personal, leadership, technical, and occupational skills;

(c)
Are an integral component of vocational technical instruction programs; and

(d)
Directly help students achieve state learning goals, especially goals three and
four with respect to critical thinking, problem solving, and decision-making
skills.

(2)
The legislature finds that career and technical student organizations are best
situated to fulfill their important purpose if they are in existence pursuant
to statute and receive ongoing assistance and support from the office of
superintendent of public instruction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain support for state-wide
coordination for career and technical student organizations by providing
program staff support that is available to assist in meeting the needs of
career and technical student organizations and their members and students. The
superintendent shall provide at least one full-time equivalent program staff
for purposes of implementing this section. The superintendent may provide
additional support to the organizations through contracting with independent
coordinators.

(2)
Career and technical student organizations eligible for technical assistance
and other support services under this section are organizations recognized as
career and technical student organizations by:

(a)
The United States department of education; or

(b)
The superintendent of public instruction, if such recognition is recommended by
the Washington association for career and technical education.

(3) Career and technical student organizations eligible for
technical assistance and other support services under this section include, but
are not limited to: The national FFA organization; family, career, and
community leaders of America; skillsUSA; distributive education clubs of
America; future business leaders of America; and the technology student
association.

---
END ---