BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Universal telephone service, which is the widespread availability of basic
telecommunications services at reasonably affordable rates, has long been the
policy of the state of Washington and is essential to the economic well-being
of the state. By this act, the legislature intends to establish a state
universal service program which replaces existing implicit intrastate universal
service support with explicit intrastate support to ensure that the
availability and rates for basic telecommunications services in rural and
high-cost locations of the state are reasonably comparable to the availability
and rates for basic telecommunications services in urban and lower-cost
locations of the state and, consistent with the program established by this
act, to minimize the shifting of contributions among customers, groups of
customers, and classes of customers.

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The commission shall implement a program for the preservation and advancement
of universal telecommunications services that is provided for in this act that
the legislature finds is consistent with the requirements of the federal
telecommunications act of 1996 (47 U.S.C. Sec. 254).

(2)
The purposes of the program are to:

(a)
Benefit all telecommunications ratepayers in the state by ensuring that there
exists a modern telecommunications network to which all citizens and businesses
have reasonable access; and

(b)
Provide specific, sufficient, and competitively neutral support for all
telecommunications lines used to provide basic telecommunications services for
customers of telecommunications companies in high-cost locations.

(3)
This section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this section and sections 1, 2, 4
through 11, and 13 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the state universal
service funds designated under sections 5 and 6 of this act.

(2)
"Benchmark" means an amount per high-cost location, determined by the
commission by rule or order for nonrural telephone companies, above which
universal service funds will be available to support the provision of service
in the high-cost location.

(3)
"Cost" means the cost determined using the cost proxy model,
methodology, and assumptions used by the federal communications commission in
determining cost for purposes of the federal high-cost universal service
program established under the federal telecommunications act of 1996 (47 U.S.C.
Sec. 254). Cost also means the federal communications commission model as may
be subsequently revised or replaced if the commission determines that doing so
would result in more accurate determinations of cost.

(4)
"Funds" means the rural state universal service fund and the nonrural
state universal service fund created by section 5 of this act.

(5)
"High-cost location" means an exchange or wire center service area,
as determined by the commission for nonrural telephone companies, where the
cost of providing basic telecommunications services is greater than the benchmark
established by the commission.

(6)
"Nonrural telephone company" means an incumbent local exchange
carrier that does not qualify as a rural telephone company as that term is
defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(37).

(7)
"Radio access line" means the telephone number assigned or used by a
customer for two-way local wireless voice service available to the public for
hire from a radio communications service company. Radio access lines include,
but are not limited to, radio-telephone communications lines used in cellular
telephone service, personal communications services, and network radio access
lines, or their functional and competitive equivalent. Radio access lines do
not include lines that provide access to one-way signaling service, such as
paging service, or to communications channels suitable only for data
transmission, or to nonlocal radio access line service, such as wireless
roaming service, or to a private telecommunications system.

(8)
"Radio communications service company" has the same meaning as in RCW
80.04.010.

(9)
"Rural telephone company" has the same meaning as that term is
defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(37).

(10)
"Switched access line" means the telephone service line which
connects a customer's telephone or equivalent telephones to the public switched
telephone network. In the case of lines which provide multichannel or the
equivalent access to the public switched telephone network, each voice-grade
channel or channel equivalent shall be considered a separate switched access
line for purposes of this act. In the case of blocked centrex service, the
number of switched access lines shall equal the number of lines capable of
accessing the public switched telephone network at any one time.

(11)
"Telecommunications carrier" has the same meaning as that term is
defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(44).

(12)
"Telecommunications services" has the same meaning as that term is
defined in 47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(46).

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
telecommunications services to be supported by the state universal service
program shall be limited to basic telecommunications services, which are the
following services:

(1)
Single-party service;

(2)
Voice-grade access to the public switched network;

(3)
Support for local usage;

(4)
Dual tone multifrequency signaling (touch-tone);

(5)
Access to emergency services (911);

(6)
Access to operator services;

(7)
Access to interexchange services;

(8)
Access to directory assistance; and

(9)
Toll blocking services and toll limitation services at such time as toll
limitation is technically feasible at a reasonable cost.

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The rural state universal service fund and the nonrural state universal service
fund are created. All receipts from contributions from telecommunications
carriers as provided in subsection (2) of this section and other moneys
authorized to be deposited in the funds by law or by order of any court with
proper jurisdiction must be deposited into the funds. Any interest earned on
moneys deposited in the funds shall be used for fund purposes. The funds shall
be outside the state treasury. An appropriation is not required for
expenditures from the funds. Amounts collected by carriers and deposited in
the funds shall not be treated as income or revenue for tax purposes.

(2)
The commission shall establish by rule flat rate amounts per line to fulfill
the directions set forth in this act, to be assessed per switched access line
and per radio access line served by each telecommunications carrier to provide
support for the funds not to exceed one dollar and seventy cents per month per
residential switched access line and per radio access line and not to exceed
three dollars and forty cents per month per business switched access line. The
rate per business switched access line shall be two times the rate per
residential switched access line and per radio access line. Beginning July 1,
2001, every telecommunications carrier providing switched access lines or radio
access lines in the state shall contribute to the funds on an equitable and
nondiscriminatory basis the amount per switched access line and radio access
line established by the commission. Each carrier shall establish a surcharge
to its customers in the amount per switched access line and per radio access
line established by the commission under this subsection. The surcharge shall
be shown on the customer's bill as a separate item identified as the
"state universal service charge." The rural fund shall not exceed
fifty-five million dollars per calendar year plus the cost of administration.
The nonrural fund shall not exceed fifty-seven million dollars per calendar
year plus the cost of administration.

(3)
Rural and nonrural telephone companies shall use moneys received from the funds
to first provide a bill credit to offset the residential per line charge
established under subsection (2) of this section, second to provide a bill
credit to offset the business per line charge established under subsection (2)
of this section, third to offset the costs of providing basic
telecommunications services to areas that are unserved as of the effective date
of this act in an amount for all telephone companies in total not to exceed two
million dollars in any one year, and then to reduce intrastate access charge
rate elements referred to in section 7 of this act. The commission shall
restructure the remaining access rates on a revenue neutral basis so that the
rates for originating and terminating access shall be equal. The commission
shall increase access charges or other rates to reflect reductions in universal
services support used to provide basic telecommunications services to areas
unserved as of the effective date of this act.

(4)
The funds shall be administered by a fund administrator, acting outside of the
commission, designated by the commission through a competitive bid process.
The commission shall establish and approve the budget for the administrator and
the administrative expenses shall be paid out of the funds. The administrator
may establish an account or accounts in one or more independent financial
institutions. Moneys in the state universal service funds shall be used only
for universal service support determined under this section, and to pay the
costs of administration of the state universal service program.

(5)
Any support provided by the funds to a rural telephone company or a nonrural
telephone company may be provided to another carrier designated as an eligible
telecommunications carrier for an area served by the rural telephone company or
nonrural telephone company if the carrier provides basic telecommunications
services throughout that area.

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
commission shall designate telecommunications carriers that are eligible to
receive support for their provision of service in high-cost locations as
eligible telecommunications carriers and establish criteria for making such
designations. In making such designations, the commission shall require the
carriers to serve all persons requesting service, who pay the lawful charges
therefor, with the basic telecommunications services within the geographic area
for which designation is made. Before granting a carrier status as an eligible
telecommunications carrier, the commission shall ensure that the carrier is
capable of providing basic telecommunications services to any customer that may
desire such services within the area the carrier seeks to serve as an eligible
telecommunications carrier. Support for service provided to any individual
customer shall be available for either wireline service or nonwireline service
radio access lines, but not both.

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Beginning July 1, 2001, the commission, consistent with the direction of
section 5(3) of this act, shall require that moneys from the rural universal
service fund be used to replace the rural companies' interim universal service
rate element to the extent possible. The commission shall also require that
moneys from the rural universal service fund also replace the universal service
rate element established by the commission in its U-85-23 docket to the extent
possible. The administrator shall determine each year the amount that would
have been raised by these rate elements and shall provide to each rural
telephone company an amount from the rural state universal service fund
equivalent to the amount that would have been raised had the rate elements
remained in effect.

(2)
The total amount calculated by the administrator for all companies shall be
used to calculate the per line amounts under section 5 of this act. The
amounts shall be calculated on an annual basis, but distributed monthly. If
the funds are insufficient, the administrator shall distribute moneys on a pro
rata basis, and the commission shall allow the rural telephone companies to
recover the difference through access or other rates as proposed by the
affected telephone company on a revenue-neutral basis.

(3)
Beginning January 1, 2003, the commission may, after hearing, replace the
universal service mechanism for rural telephone companies set out in subsection
(1) of this section with the universal service mechanism that has been adopted
by the federal communications commission for rural telephone companies, or
continue the mechanism set out in subsection (1) of this section. If the
commission chooses to implement the federal communications commission's
universal service mechanism adopted by the federal communications commission
for rural telephone companies, it shall do so using company specific inputs, as
appropriate for the mechanism, and shall implement the new mechanism only after
any court appeals concerning the federal communications commission's universal
service mechanism for rural telephone companies have become final. The first
year transition to the new mechanism shall be revenue neutral to the rural
telephone companies, with the rural telephone companies increasing or
decreasing, as appropriate, rates as proposed by the affected rural telephone
company for the first-year implementation of the new mechanism.

(4)
This section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Beginning July 1, 2001, the commission shall implement a program to provide
explicit support for basic telecommunications services in high-cost locations
served by nonrural telephone companies. The support shall be based on the
difference between the cost of providing basic telecommunications services and
a benchmark determined by the commission, less any financial support received
by the eligible carrier from any federal high-cost universal service support
program. A separate benchmark may be established by the commission: (1) For
residence lines and radio access lines; and (2) for business lines. Support
shall be available for all lines used to provide basic telecommunications
services in high-cost locations. If the nonrural state universal service fund
is insufficient to support the nonrural universal service program at the
commission-determined level of support, the commission shall adjust the
benchmark, or benchmarks, upward.

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
The administrator of the funds may request, and each telecommunications carrier
shall provide, information the commission or the administrator may reasonably
require for the implementation and operation of the program.

(2)
Any telecommunications carrier may submit such information, or any portion
thereof, under the protection of RCW 80.04.095 and the administrator shall
treat such information according to the terms of RCW 80.04.095.

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
In addition to any other penalties prescribed by law, the commission may impose
penalties for delays in making the required reports or contributions under the
program. The penalties shall be calculated as a percentage of the carrier's
required contribution for the previous calendar year, and may not exceed an
amount equal to the amount owed by the carrier.

(2)
Any penalties imposed by the commission under this section or imposed for
violation of rules adopted under sections 2 through 11 and 13 of this act, and
RCW 80.36.610 shall be payable to the universal service fund created by section
5 of this act.

(3)
In addition to any penalties imposed under this section, the administrator may
withhold payments to any eligible telecommunications carrier that fails to
submit information required to be submitted under sections 2 through 11 and 13
of this act, and RCW 80.36.610.

(4)
This section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
The commission may delegate to the secretary of the commission the authority to
resolve disputes, approve expenses of the administrator, and make other
administrative decisions necessary to the administration and supervision of the
program consistent with the relevant statutes and commission rules.

(2)
This section expires December 31, 2011.

Sec.
12. RCW
80.36.610 and 1998 c 337 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
The commission is authorized to take actions, conduct proceedings, and enter
orders as permitted or contemplated for a state commission under the federal
telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56), including
requiring contribution by commercial mobile service providers to the rural
state universal service fund and the nonrural state universal service fund as
provided in sections 1 through 11 and 13 of this act, but the commission's
authority to either establish a new state program or to adopt new rules to
preserve and advance universal service under section 254(f) of the federal act
is limited to the actions expressly authorized by ((RCW 80.36.600)) this
act. The commission may establish by rule fees to be paid by persons
seeking commission action under the federal act, and by parties to proceedings
under that act, to offset in whole or part the commission's expenses that are
not otherwise recovered through fees in implementing the act((, but new fees
or assessments charged telecommunications carriers to either establish a state
program or to adopt rules to preserve and advance universal service under
section 254(f) of the federal act do not take effect until the legislature has
approved a state universal service program.

(2)
The legislature intends that under the future universal service program
established in this state:

(a)
Every telecommunications carrier that provides intrastate telecommunications
services shall contribute, on an equitable and nondiscriminatory basis, to the
preservation and advancement of universal service in the state;

(b)
The contributions shall be competitively and technologically neutral; and

(c)
The universal service program to be established in accordance with RCW
80.36.600 shall not be inconsistent with the requirements of 47 U.S.C. Sec. 254)).

This
section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 80.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the commission from administering the
universal service fund created by this act, or from conducting arbitration or
other proceedings under the 1996 telecommunications act, P.L. 104-104 (110
Stat. 56).

(2)
This section expires December 31, 2011.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act are each added to chapter 80.36 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. RCW
80.36.600 (Universal service program--Planning and
preparation--Commission's duties--Approval of legislature
required--Definitions) and 1999 c 372 s 16 & 1998 c 337 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 17. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure No. 695).

---
END ---