BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that every student deserves to learn in an atmosphere free
from the disruptions caused by individual students and that teachers deserve to
have more authority over their classrooms. Parents need to know that teachers
have the authority to maintain discipline and to maintain a safe classroom
environment for every child.

Therefore,
teachers must be empowered to remove disruptive students from individual
classrooms and to bring to a parent's attention the behavior of a continually
disruptive student.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.600.020 and 1997 c 266 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The rules adopted pursuant to RCW 28A.600.010 shall be interpreted to insure
that the optimum learning atmosphere of the classroom is maintained, and that
the highest consideration is given to the judgment of qualified certificated
educators regarding conditions necessary to maintain the optimum learning
atmosphere.

(2)
Any student who creates a disruption of the educational process in violation of
the building disciplinary standards while under a teacher's immediate
supervision may be excluded by the teacher from his or her individual classroom
and instructional or activity area for all or any portion of the balance of the
school day, or up to the following two days((, or until the principal or
designee and teacher have conferred, whichever occurs first. Except in
emergency circumstances, the teacher first must attempt one or more alternative
forms of corrective action)). In no event without the consent of the
teacher may an excluded student return to the class during the balance of that
class or activity period or up to the following two days((, or until the
principal or his or her designee and the teacher have conferred)). Prior
to returning a student to a classroom, the school shall comply with a request
by the student's teacher for a conference with the principal or his or her
designee and the student's parent or guardian in order to determine the most
appropriate action to take in regard to providing the best learning environment
for the disruptive student and for the students remaining in the classroom.
The teacher may also require the parent or guardian, principal, and teacher to
agree to a corrective plan of action for the student before the student is
returned to the classroom.

(3)
In order to preserve a beneficial learning environment for all students and to
maintain good order and discipline in each classroom, every school district
board of directors shall provide that written procedures are developed for
administering discipline at each school within the district. Such procedures
shall be developed with the participation of parents and the community, and
shall provide that the teacher, principal or designee, and other authorities
designated by the board of directors, make every reasonable attempt to involve
the parent or guardian and the student in the resolution of student discipline
problems. Such procedures shall provide that students may be excluded from
their individual classes or activities for periods of time in excess of that
provided in subsection (2) of this section or that such students may be
placed in alternative learning environments for the benefit of the individual
student and those remaining in the classroom if such students have
repeatedly disrupted the learning of other students. The procedures must be
consistent with the rules of the state board of education and must provide for
early involvement of parents in attempts to improve the student's behavior.

(4)
The procedures shall assure, pursuant to RCW 28A.400.110, that all staff work
cooperatively toward consistent enforcement of proper student behavior
throughout each school as well as within each classroom.

(5)
A principal shall consider imposing long-term suspension or expulsion as a
sanction when deciding the appropriate disciplinary action for a student who,
after July 27, 1997:

(a)
Engages in two or more violations within a three-year period of RCW 9A.46.120,
28A.320.135, 28A.600.455, 28A.600.460, 28A.635.020, 28A.600.020, 28A.635.060,
9.41.280, or 28A.320.140; or

(b)
Engages in one or more of the offenses listed in RCW 13.04.155.

The
principal shall communicate the disciplinary action taken by the principal to
the school personnel who referred the student to the principal for disciplinary
action.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.600.460 and 1997 c 266 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
School district boards of directors shall adopt policies that restore
discipline to the classroom. Such policies must provide for at least the
following: Allowing each teacher to take disciplinary action to correct a
student who disrupts normal classroom activities, abuses or insults a teacher
as prohibited by RCW 28A.635.010, willfully disobeys a teacher, uses abusive or
foul language directed at a school district employee, school volunteer, or
another student, violates school rules, or who interferes with an orderly
education process. Disciplinary action may include but is not limited to:
Oral or written reprimands; written notification to parents of disruptive
behavior, a copy of which must be provided to the principal; exclusion of
the student by the teacher from his or her individual classroom and
instructional or activity area for all or any portion of the balance of the
school day, or up to the following two days. Prior to returning a student to a
classroom, the school shall comply with a request by the student's teacher for
a conference with the principal or his or her designee and the student's parent
or guardian in order to determine the most appropriate action to take in regard
to providing the best learning environment for the disruptive student and for
the students remaining in the classroom. The teacher may also require the
parent or guardian, principal, and teacher to agree to a corrective plan of
action for the student before the student is returned to the classroom.

(2)
A student committing an offense under chapter 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, or 9A.48 RCW
when the activity is directed toward the teacher, shall not be assigned to that
teacher's classroom for the duration of the student's attendance at that school
or any other school where the teacher is assigned.

(3)
A student who commits an offense under chapter 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, or 9A.48
RCW, when directed toward another student, may be removed from the classroom of
the victim for the duration of the student's attendance at that school or any
other school where the victim is enrolled. A student who commits an offense
under one of the chapters enumerated in this section against a student or
another school employee, may be expelled or suspended.

(4)
Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of a school under
existing law and rules to expel or suspend a student for misconduct or criminal
behavior.

(5) All school districts must collect data on disciplinary actions
taken in each school. The information shall be made available to the public
upon request. This collection of data shall not include personally
identifiable information including, but not limited to, a student's social
security number, name, or address.

---
END ---