BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.150.305 and 1997 c 265 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board of directors of school districts may contract with alternative
educational service providers for eligible students. Alternative educational
service providers that the school district may contract with include, but are
not limited to:

(a)
Other schools;

(b)
Alternative education programs not operated by the school district;

(c)
Education centers;

(d)
Skills centers;

(e)
Dropout prevention programs; or

(f)
Other public or private organizations, excluding sectarian or religious organizations.

(2)
School districts that contract with alternative education providers as
permitted under subsection (1) of this section shall provide to the contractor
an amount per contracted student of at least eighty-five percent of the state
general fund moneys generated by that student under RCW 28A.150.250 and
28A.150.260.

(3)
Eligible students include students who are likely to be expelled or who are
enrolled in the school district but have been suspended, are academically at
risk, or who have been subject to repeated disciplinary actions due to
behavioral problems.

(((3)))
(4) If a school district board of directors chooses to initiate
specialized programs for students at risk of expulsion or who are failing
academically by contracting out with alternative educational service providers
identified in subsection (1) of this section, the school district board of
directors and the organization must specify the specific learning standards
that students are expected to achieve. Placement of the student shall be
jointly determined by the school district, the student's parent or legal
guardian, and the alternative educational service provider.

(((4)))
(5) For the purpose of this section, the superintendent of public
instruction shall adopt rules for reporting and documenting enrollment.
Students may reenter at the grade level appropriate to the student's ability.
Students who are sixteen years of age or older may take the GED test.

(((5))) (6) The board of directors of school
districts may require that students who would otherwise be suspended or
expelled attend schools or programs listed in subsection (1) of this section as
a condition of continued enrollment in the school district.

---
END ---