BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 53.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The superior court of a county containing all or the largest portion of a port
district providing aircraft noise abatement under this chapter shall create a
noise abatement arbitration panel to arbitrate disputes between the port and
property owners over programs the port district offers as part of its aircraft
noise abatement efforts. The arbitration panel shall be composed of seven
members, appointed as follows: (a) Two members shall be appointed by the joint
action of the members of the house of representatives and senate whose
legislative districts include territory located within the noise impact area
served by one or more noise abatement programs; (b) three members shall be
appointed by the port commission from a list of citizens nominated by the
separate action of each council of a city or town, and the county legislative
authority of any county, with territory located within the noise impact area served
by one or more noise abatement programs; and (c) two members appointed by the
port commission on its own.

(2) Any property owner disputing the extent of the program, or
amount that a port district offers under a program, may request the panel to
arbitrate the dispute. The arbitration panel shall make periodic reports to
the superior court. The determination by the arbitration panel shall be
binding on the port district and enforceable in the superior court and shall
constitute an offer from the port district to the property owner. The panel
shall meet at least once every three months to arbitrate disputes. Each
dispute that is arbitrated shall be completed within sixty days of commencing
the arbitration. The expenses of the panel shall be paid by the port district,
including paying each member one hundred dollars per day and related expenses
for such work.

---
END ---