BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Carefully targeted professional development is a critical component of the
state's education reform efforts;

(b)
Washington's teachers are required by the state to fund and complete college
coursework in order to achieve and maintain professional certification;

(c)
Many public school teachers, especially beginning teachers who are at the
bottom of the salary schedule, need help funding the academic credits required
to achieve and maintain professional certification; and

(d)
Students, parents, and the local community benefit from the additional skills
and knowledge acquired by teachers, so public-private partnerships could help
teachers acquire the new skills and knowledge needed to enhance student
learning and maintain professional certification.

(2)
The legislature intends to assist the state's reform efforts and to help
educators fund their required studies through a tuition reimbursement program
targeted to coursework that helps a teacher gain skills and knowledge that
enhance student learning of the state's essential academic learning
requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
educator tuition reimbursement program is created. The purpose of the program
is to provide full or partial tuition reimbursement to public school teachers
who take, as a requirement of professional or continuing certification, college
courses designed to enhance student achievement of the state's essential
academic learning requirements. The program shall be administered by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. With
funds provided for this purpose through appropriation or private donations, or
provided through contributions to the fund established under section 4 of this
act, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide full
or partial tuition reimbursement to any teacher employed in the common school
system of the state, subject to the following requirements:

(1)
For coursework completed at an institution of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.10.016, reimbursement shall be based on actual tuition and fees paid by
the teacher for the coursework;

(2)
For coursework completed at an institution of higher education as defined in
RCW 28B.07.020(4), reimbursement shall be based on, and shall not exceed, the
tuition and fees charged for comparable coursework at the University of
Washington;

(3)
The coursework must either apply toward any continuing or professional
certification requirements adopted by the state board of education or be
designed to help the teacher enhance student achievement of the state's
academic learning requirements;

(4)
Full reimbursement may be provided for coursework completed with a grade of 3.0
or more on a four-point grading scale;

(5)
Partial reimbursement may be provided for coursework completed with a grade of
2.0 to 2.9 on a four-point grading scale and for coursework completed with a
pass on a pass-fail grading scale; and

(6)
No reimbursement may be provided for coursework that is not completed with at
least a 2.0 on a four-point grading scale, or a pass on a pass-fail grading
scale.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
teacher tuition reimbursement trust fund is established in the custody of the
state treasurer. The trust fund shall be administered by the state treasurer.
Funds donated to help teachers fund their continuing education shall be
deposited into the fund. All moneys deposited in the fund shall be invested by
the state treasurer. All earnings of investments of balances of the trust fund
shall be credited to the fund. At the request of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, the treasurer shall disburse moneys from
the trust fund to qualifying teachers. No appropriation is required for
expenditures from the trust fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added to chapter 28A.300 RCW.

---
END ---