BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.28.530 and 1997 c 309 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receipt of the application, the department shall review the application
and determine whether the applicant is eligible to take an examination for the
journeyman or specialty certificate of competency.

(a)
To be eligible to take the examination for a journeyman certificate the
applicant must have:

(i)
Worked in the electrical construction trade for a minimum of four years
employed full time, of which two years shall be in industrial or commercial
electrical installation under the supervision of a journeyman electrician and
not more than a total of two years in all specialties under the supervision of
a journeyman electrician or an appropriate specialty electrician; or

(ii)
Successfully completed an apprenticeship program approved under chapter 49.04
RCW for the electrical construction trade.

(b)
To be eligible to take the examination to become a specialty electrician the
applicant shall have:

(i)
Worked in that specialty of the electrical construction trade, under the
supervision of a journeyman electrician or an appropriate specialty
electrician, for a minimum of two years employed full time; ((or))

(ii)
Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program under chapter 49.04
RCW for the applicant's specialty in the electrical construction trade;

(iii)
Successfully completed an approved apprenticeship program that includes
curriculum in electrical maintenance; or

(iv)
Five years' employment in the trade of electrical maintenance, certified by the
applicant's employer or employers.

(c)
Any applicant who has successfully completed a two-year program in the
electrical construction trade at public community or technical colleges, or
not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the
work force training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW
may substitute up to two years of the technical or trade school program for two
years of work experience under a journeyman electrician. The applicant shall
obtain the additional two years of work experience required in industrial or
commercial electrical installation prior to the beginning, or after the
completion, of the technical school program. Any applicant who has received
training in the electrical construction trade in the armed service of the United
States may be eligible to take the examination for the certificate of
competency.

(d)
Any applicant who has successfully completed a two-year program that
includes curriculum in electrical maintenance or the applicant's specialty in
the electrical construction trade at public community or technical colleges, or
not-for-profit nationally accredited technical or trade schools licensed by the
work force training and education coordinating board under chapter 28C.10 RCW
may substitute up to two years of the technical or trade school program for two
years of work experience under the supervision of a journeyman electrician or
an appropriate specialty electrician.

(e)
No other requirement for eligibility may be imposed.

(2) The department shall establish reasonable rules for the
examinations to be given applicants for certificates of competency. In
establishing the rules, the department shall consult with the board. Upon
determination that the applicant is eligible to take the examination, the
department shall so notify the applicant, indicating the time and place for
taking the examination.

---
END ---