BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
REPORT TO THE LEGISLATURE REGARDING EARNINGS GAINED AS A RESULT OF INVESTMENTS
IN THE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES PROGRAM. (1)
The employment security department shall submit quarterly reports to the
legislature about the earnings of WorkFirst participants who have found
unsubsidized paid employment.

(2)
The reports shall contain the following information:

(a)
The median percentage earnings increase one year, two years, and three years
after leaving the temporary assistance for needy families program. The median
percentage earnings increase shall include both hourly wages and quarterly
earnings;

(b)
The percent with earnings above one hundred percent of the federal poverty
level;

(c)
The percent with earnings above two hundred percent of the federal poverty
level; and

(d)
For each quarter, the report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst.

(3)
The report shall include all former WorkFirst participants since July 1997 and
shall be submitted by December 1, 2000. Subsequent reports shall be submitted
yearly.

(4)
The hours worked and quarterly earnings used to measure earnings gains and job
retention shall be based on the wage files collected and maintained by the
employment security department. The hourly wage rate is defined as the
quarterly earnings divided by the number of hours worked in that quarter.
Participants for whom no earnings are reported shall be excluded from the
calculation. Median rather than average earnings gains shall be used.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
INFORMATION ABOUT RETURNS TO THE TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES
PROGRAM. (1) The department of social and health services shall submit to the
legislature, on a yearly basis, a report that details the percentage of people
who have returned to the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(2)
The report shall include the number of families who have left the temporary
assistance for needy families program now receiving unemployment compensation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
INFORMATION ABOUT WORK SUPPORT BENEFITS. (1) The department of social and
health services shall develop informational materials that educate families
about the difference between cash assistance and work support benefits. These
materials must explain, among other facts, that the benefits are designed to
support their employment; that there are no time limits on the receipts of work
support benefits; and that immigration or residency status will not be affected
by the receipt of benefits. These materials shall be posted in all community
service offices and distributed to families. Materials must be available in
multiple languages.

(2)
When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy families program,
receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a temporary assistance for
needy families application, the department of social and health services shall:

(a)
Conduct an in-person interview with the family, educating them about the
difference between cash assistance and work support benefits, and offering them
the opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work support benefits, so
long as they are eligible;

(b)
Contact the family by telephone and educate them about the differences between
cash assistance and work support benefits and offer them the opportunity to
begin or to continue receiving work support benefits, so long as they are
eligible; or

(c)
Mail the family educational materials about benefits, when the caseworker has
documented three unsuccessful attempts to reach them by telephone, and offer
them the opportunity to begin or to continue receiving work support benefits,
so long as they are eligible.

(3)
Work support benefits include food stamps, medicaid for all family members,
medicaid or state children's health insurance program for children, and child
care assistance.

(4)
The department shall report annually to the legislature the number of families
who have had exit interviews, been reached successfully by phone, and sent
mail. The report shall also include the percentage of families who elect to
continue each of the benefits and the percentage found ineligible by each
substantive reason code. A substantive reason code shall not be
"other." The report shall identify barriers to informing families
about work support benefits and describe existing and future actions to
overcome such barriers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
CUSTOMER SERVICE STANDARDS. (1) The department of social and health services
shall convene a working group that includes stakeholders and recipients of
public assistance to establish basic customer service performance measures and
goals. The customer service measures and goals will seek to make support for
working families a priority. Customer service measures may include, but are not
limited to:

(a)
Hours of operation that allow working families to get services without missing
work;

(b)
Streamlining requirements to make it easier for working families to begin and
continue to use supportive benefits;

(c)
Wait times;

(d)
Systems for answering and returning phone calls in a timely manner;

(e)
Access to benefits that support work;

(f)
Access to job training and education; and

(g)
Access to services for families with limited literacy or English skills, and
families with special needs.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall report to the legislature by
January 2001, and make available to the public, the establishment of customer
service measures and goals, and the departmental action to assure the goals are
being met. Twice a year, the department of social and health services shall
submit a written progress report to the legislature on the success of meeting
the customer service goals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

---
END ---