BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that welfare reform has increased the demand for accessible
and affordable child care. The legislature further finds that there is a
shortage of child care providers and facilities. The legislature further finds
that recipients of temporary assistance for needy families with young children
should be encouraged to provide care for their children while volunteering in
licensed child care facilities. The legislature further finds that recipients
of temporary assistance for needy families with young children who volunteer in
licensed child care facilities will develop positive work skills while
developing a healthy and nurturing relationship with their child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A recipient of temporary assistance for needy families with a child over three
months of age may volunteer to work in a child care facility licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW. Recipients who volunteer for twenty hours per week shall be
deemed to have met their work activity participation obligation under RCW
74.08A.260.

(2)
The volunteer recipient and his or her child shall not be counted for the
purpose of determining the licensed capacity or the staff to child ratio of the
facility.

(3)
The facility administrator shall supervise the recipient volunteer and shall
report the hours worked to the department.

(4) The department shall reimburse the child care facility for
children cared for under this section.

---
END ---