BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act shall be known as the shared parental responsibility act.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.09.004 and 1987 c 460 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Temporary parenting plan" means a plan for parenting of the child
pending final resolution of any action for dissolution of marriage, declaration
of invalidity, or legal separation which is incorporated in a temporary order.

(2)
"Permanent parenting plan" means a plan for parenting the child,
including allocation of parenting functions, which plan is incorporated in any
final decree or decree of modification in an action for dissolution of
marriage, declaration of invalidity, or legal separation.

(3)
"Parenting functions" means those aspects of the parent-child
relationship in which the parent makes decisions and performs functions
necessary for the care and growth of the child. Parenting functions include:

(a)
Maintaining a loving, stable, consistent, and nurturing relationship with the
child;

(b)
Attending to the daily needs of the child, such as feeding, clothing, physical
care and grooming, supervision, health care, and day care, and engaging in
other activities which are appropriate to the developmental level of the child
and that are within the social and economic circumstances of the particular
family;

(c)
Attending to adequate education for the child, including remedial or other
education essential to the best interests of the child;

(d)
Assisting the child in developing and maintaining appropriate interpersonal
relationships;

(e)
Exercising appropriate judgment regarding the child's welfare, consistent with
the child's developmental level and the family's social and economic
circumstances; and

(f)
Providing for the financial support of the child.

(4)
"Shared parental responsibility" means shared residential placement
and mutual decision-making authority.

(5)
"Shared residential placement" means an order awarding each of the
parents periods of time, amounting to at least one-third of a year, in which a
child resides with or is under the actual, direct, day-to-day care and
supervision of each of the parents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 26.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be a presumption that shared parental responsibility is in the best
interests of minor children unless:

(a)
The parents have agreed to an award of residential placement or decision-making
authority to only one parent; or

(b)
The court finds that shared parental responsibility would be detrimental to the
child or children.

(2)
A parent alleging that shared parental responsibility would be detrimental to
the child or children shall have the burden of establishing the allegation.

(3)
If a parent alleges that shared parental responsibility would be detrimental to
a particular child, the court, in making a determination whether a shared
parental responsibility order is appropriate, may direct that an investigation
be conducted in accordance with the provisions of RCW 26.09.220. If the court
declines to enter a shared parental responsibility order, the court shall enter
findings of fact and conclusions of law stating the reasons that shared
parental responsibility is detrimental to the child or children.

Sec.
4. RCW
26.09.187 and 1989 c 375 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCESS. The court shall not order a dispute resolution
process, except court action, when it finds that any limiting factor under RCW
26.09.191 applies, or when it finds that either parent is unable to afford the
cost of the proposed dispute resolution process. If a dispute resolution
process is not precluded or limited, then in designating such a process the
court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

(a)
Differences between the parents that would substantially inhibit their
effective participation in any designated process;

(b)
The parents' wishes or agreements and, if the parents have entered into
agreements, whether the agreements were made knowingly and voluntarily; and

(c)
Differences in the parents' financial circumstances that may affect their
ability to participate fully in a given dispute resolution process.

(2)
ALLOCATION OF DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY.

(a)
AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES. The court shall approve agreements of the
parties allocating decision-making authority, or specifying rules in the areas
listed in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a), when it finds that:

(i)
The agreement is consistent with any limitations on a parent's decision-making
authority mandated by RCW 26.09.191; and

(ii)
The agreement is knowing and voluntary.

(b)
SOLE DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. The court shall order sole decision-making to
one parent when it finds that:

(i)
A limitation on the other parent's decision-making authority is mandated by RCW
26.09.191;

(ii)
Both parents are opposed to mutual decision making;

(iii)
One parent is opposed to mutual decision making, and such opposition is
reasonable based on the criteria in (c) of this subsection;

(c)
MUTUAL DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY. Except as provided in (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the court shall consider the following criteria in allocating
decision-making authority:

(i)
The existence of a limitation under RCW 26.09.191;

(ii)
The history of participation of each parent in decision making in each of the
areas in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a);

(iii)
Whether the parents have a demonstrated ability and desire to cooperate with
one another in decision making in each of the areas in RCW 26.09.184(4)(a); and

(iv)
The parents' geographic proximity to one another, to the extent that it affects
their ability to make timely mutual decisions.

(3)
RESIDENTIAL PROVISIONS.

(a)
The court shall make residential provisions for each child which encourage each
parent to maintain a loving, stable, and nurturing relationship with the child,
consistent with the child's developmental level and the family's social and
economic circumstances. The child's residential schedule shall be consistent
with RCW 26.09.191. There is a presumption that the child's residential
schedule shall provide shared parental responsibility in accordance with
section 3 of this act. Where the limitations of RCW 26.09.191 ((are not
dispositive of the child's residential schedule)) do not apply, the
court shall consider the following factors:

(i)
The relative strength, nature, and stability of the child's relationship with
each parent, including whether a parent has taken greater responsibility for
performing parenting functions relating to the daily needs of the child;

(ii)
The agreements of the parties, provided they were entered into knowingly and
voluntarily;

(iii)
Each parent's past and potential for future performance of parenting functions;

(iv)
The emotional needs and developmental level of the child;

(v)
The child's relationship with siblings and with other significant adults, as
well as the child's involvement with his or her physical surroundings, school,
or other significant activities;

(vi)
The wishes of the parents and the wishes of a child who is sufficiently mature
to express reasoned and independent preferences as to his or her residential
schedule; and

(vii)
Each parent's employment schedule, and shall make accommodations consistent
with those schedules.

Factor
(i) shall be given the greatest weight.

(b)
The court may order that a child frequently alternate his or her residence
between the households of the parents for brief and substantially equal
intervals of time only if the court finds the following:

(i)
No limitation exists under RCW 26.09.191;

(ii)(A)
The parties have agreed to such provisions and the agreement was knowingly and
voluntarily entered into; or

(B)
The parties have a satisfactory history of cooperation and shared performance
of parenting functions; the parties are available to each other, especially in
geographic proximity, to the extent necessary to ensure their ability to share
performance of the parenting functions; and

(iii) The provisions are in the best interests of the child.

---
END ---