BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature believes that one of the most important responsibilities of the
Washington state government is to provide quick, accurate, and courteous
information to Washington citizens. The governor has also made customer
service a priority by including it in performance contracts with agency
directors. Washington citizens use various means to access information and
services including the telephone, the internet, the postal service, and office
visits. The Washington answers! program is intended to focus on improving the
ability of agencies to provide quick, courteous, and accurate information to
Washington citizens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Account" means the Washington answers! account in the state
treasury.

(2)
"Agency" means an office, department, board, commission, or other
separate unit or division, however designated, in the state government.

(3)
"Director" means the director of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The Washington answers! account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in
the account may be used only in a manner consistent with this chapter. Moneys
deposited in the account shall be administered by the director and subject to
legislative appropriation.

(2)
The director may use or permit the use of any moneys in the account to make
grants to agencies for the purpose of improving the ability of agencies to
provide quick, courteous, and accurate information to Washington citizens. No
more than three percent of the moneys deposited in the account may be used by
the director to pay for the administration of the grant program authorized by
this chapter.

(3)
An agency applying for grants shall submit a written proposal to the director.
The proposal must include a description of how the agency will use the grant
and other information relevant to the director's consideration of the agency's
proposal under section 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. When
making a grant under this chapter, the director shall consider the extent to
which the applicant agency's proposal:

(1)
Contains initiatives that will result in long-term improvement in customer
service;

(2)
Utilizes technology to improve and expand the avenues for citizens to access
information from the agency;

(3)
Reduces the time within which the agency responds to citizen requests;

(4)
Reduces telephone wait times for citizens calling for agency assistance;

(5)
Improves call centers to get information to callers more quickly;

(6)
Improves the agency's use of toll-free telephone numbers;

(7)
Demonstrates the agency's need to improve telephone service;

(8)
Uses electronic filing, electronic forms, and electronic commerce to improve
customer service;

(9)
Improves efficiency in collecting and utilizing state revenues;

(10)
Creates new efficiencies; and

(11)
Reduces the number of full-time employees within the agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. An
agency receiving a grant under this chapter shall:

(1)
Monitor wait times for citizens contacting the agency and the time within which
the agency responds to citizen requests;

(2)
Provide an opportunity for citizens to leave messages in the event that wait
times are too long; and

(3)
Provide an annual report on the results of the grant to the legislature, the
governor, and the director on or before December 1st in each of the five years
following receipt of the grant. The report must contain the following
information:

(a)
The average wait time for citizens contacting the agency during the preceding
calendar year;

(b)
The number of dropped telephone calls during the preceding calendar year;

(c)
The availability of more effective customer service technology;

(d)
The average time within which the agency responded to citizen requests during
the preceding calendar year;

(e)
A timetable of targets for meaningful reductions in citizen wait time; and

(f)
Beginning in the second year following the grant, a comparison of the
information from previous years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
director shall conduct an annual random survey of published agency access numbers.
The survey must include agencies with high volumes of citizen contact during
the preceding calendar year. The director shall report the results of the
survey to the legislature and the governor on or before December 1st of each
year. The survey must include the following information for each agency:

(1)
The number of times, if any, that the agency could not be contacted through the
published agency access number;

(2)
The responsiveness of the published agency access number;

(3)
The average amount of wait time; and

(4)
The availability of knowledgeable agency staff to answer citizen questions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
director shall make available to other agencies any innovative actions that the
director discovers while administering this chapter that may improve an
agency's ability to provide quick, courteous, and accurate information to
Washington citizens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the Washington answers! account for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---