BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.381 and 1998 c 333 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the
amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year
following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance
with the following:

(1)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied
by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of
the time of filing((: PROVIDED, That)). Any person who sells,
transfers, or is displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her
exemption status to a replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an
exemption on more than one residence in any year((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
Confinement of the person to a hospital or nursing home shall not
disqualify the claim of exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital
costs;

(2)
The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in
fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the
property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, ((such))
the person must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of
the structure in which ((he or she)) the person resides. For
purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by a marital community or owned
by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each spouse or cotenant, and any
lease for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3)
The person claiming the exemption must be sixty-one years of age or older on
December 31st of the year in which the exemption claim is filed, or must have
been, at the time of filing, retired from regular gainful employment by reason
of physical disability((: PROVIDED, That any)). A surviving
spouse of ((a)) the person who was receiving an exemption at the
time of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is fifty-seven
years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this section;

(4)
The amount that the person shall be exempt from an obligation to pay shall be
calculated on the basis of combined disposable income, as defined in RCW
84.36.383. If the person claiming the exemption was retired for two months or
more of the assessment year, the combined disposable income of ((such)) the
person shall be calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined
disposable income of ((such)) the person during the months ((such))
the person was retired by twelve. If the income of the person claiming
exemption is reduced for two or more months of the assessment year by reason of
the death of the person's spouse, or when other substantial changes occur in
disposable income that are likely to continue for an indefinite period of time,
the combined disposable income of ((such)) the person shall be
calculated by multiplying the average monthly combined disposable income of ((such))
the person after ((such)) the occurrences by twelve. If
it is necessary to estimate income to comply with this subsection, the assessor
may require confirming documentation of ((such)) the income prior
to May 31st of the year following application;

(5)(a)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
excess property taxes; and

(b)(i)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of twenty-four thousand dollars or less but greater than
eighteen thousand dollars shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
the greater of forty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the valuation
of ((his or her)) the residence, but not to exceed sixty thousand
dollars of the valuation of ((his or her)) the residence; or

(ii)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of eighteen thousand dollars or less shall be exempt from all
regular property taxes on the greater of fifty thousand dollars or sixty
percent of the valuation of ((his or her)) the residence; and

(6)
For a person who otherwise qualifies under this section and has a combined
disposable income of thirty thousand dollars or less, the valuation of the
residence shall be the assessed value of the residence on the later of January
1, 1995, or January 1st of the assessment year the person first qualifies under
this section. If the person subsequently fails to qualify under this section
only for one year because of high income, this same valuation shall be used
upon requalification. If the person fails to qualify for more than one year in
succession because of high income or fails to qualify for any other reason, the
valuation upon requalification shall be the assessed value on January 1st of
the assessment year in which the person requalifies. If the person transfers
the exemption under this section to a different residence, the valuation of the
different residence shall be the assessed value of the different residence on
January 1st of the assessment year in which the person transfers the exemption.

In
no event may the valuation under this subsection be greater than the true and
fair value of the residence on January 1st of the assessment year.

This
subsection does not apply to subsequent improvements to the property in the
year in which the improvements are made. Subsequent improvements to the
property shall be added to the value otherwise determined under this subsection
at their true and fair value in the year in which they are made.

All
taxpayers who qualify for exemption under this section shall be allowed a
credit against the state levy equal to the tax imposed on the assessed value of
the owner-occupied residential property for the state levy.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.387 and 1992 c 206 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All claims for exemption under RCW 84.36.381 shall be made and signed by
the person entitled to the exemption, by ((his or her)) the person's
attorney in fact or in the event the residence of ((such)) the
person is under mortgage or purchase contract requiring accumulation of
reserves out of which the holder of the mortgage or contract is required to pay
real estate taxes, by ((such)) the holder or by the owner, either
before two witnesses or the ((county)) assessor or ((his)) the
assessor's deputy in the county where the real property is located((:
PROVIDED, That)). If a claim for exemption is made by a person
living in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, ((such))
the claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the
exemption and by the authorized agent of ((such)) the cooperative.

(2)
If the taxpayer is unable to personally submit ((his own)) a
claim, the claim shall be submitted by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian
or other person charged with the care of the person or property of ((such))
the taxpayer.

(3)
All claims for exemption and renewal applications shall be accompanied by such
documented verification of income as shall be prescribed by rule adopted by the
department of revenue.

(4)
Any person signing a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the
payment of any tax shall be guilty of the offense of perjury.

(5)
The tax liability of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership shall be reduced by the amount of tax exemption to which a claimant
residing therein is entitled and ((such)) the cooperative shall
reduce any amount owed by the claimant to the cooperative by ((such)) the
exact amount of tax exemption or, if no amount be owed, the cooperative shall
make payment to the claimant of ((such)) the exact amount of
exemption.

(6)
A remainderman or other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real
property that is the subject of an exemption granted under RCW 84.36.381 for an
estate for life shall reduce the amount which would have been payable by the
life tenant to the remainderman or other person to the extent of the
exemption. If no amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation between
these persons, the remainderman or other person shall make payment to the life
tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.52.080 and 1989 c 378 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((county)) assessor shall extend the taxes upon the tax rolls in the
form herein prescribed. The rate percent necessary to raise the amounts of
taxes levied for state and county purposes, and for purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be computed upon the assessed
value of the property of the county; the rate percent necessary to raise the
amount of taxes levied for any taxing district within the county shall be
computed upon the assessed value of the property of the district; all taxes
assessed against any property shall be added together and extended on the rolls
in a column headed consolidated or total tax. In extending any tax, whenever
it amounts to a fractional part of a cent greater than five mills it shall be
made one cent, and whenever it amounts to five mills or less than five mills it
shall be dropped. The amount of all taxes shall be entered in the proper
columns, as shown by entering the rate percent necessary to raise the
consolidated or total tax and the total tax assessed against the property.

(2)
After entering the amounts under subsection (1) of this section, the
assessor shall compute the amount of credit authorized under RCW 84.36.381 for
each parcel of property owned and occupied by senior citizens or persons who
are retired from gainful employment by reason of disability receiving the
exemption authorized by RCW 84.36.381. The credit allowed on any property shall
be extended on the rolls in a column headed tax credit. The assessor shall
subtract the amount of the credit from the total tax and enter this amount in a
column headed tax payable.

(3)
For the purpose of computing the rate necessary to raise the amount of any
excess levy in a taxing district which has classified or designated forest land
under chapter 84.33 RCW, other than the state, the ((county)) assessor
shall add the district's timber assessed value, as defined in RCW 84.33.035, to
the assessed value of the property((: PROVIDED, That)). For
school districts maintenance and operations levies only one-half of the
district's timber assessed value or eighty percent of the timber roll of ((such))
the district in calendar year 1983 as determined under chapter 84.33
RCW, whichever is greater, shall be added.

(((3)))
(4) Upon the completion of ((such)) the tax extension, it
shall be the duty of the ((county)) assessor to make in each assessment
book, tax roll or list a certificate in the following form:

I,
. . . . . ., assessor of
. . . . . . county, state of Washington, do hereby
certify that the foregoing is a correct list of taxes levied on the real and
personal property in the county of . . . . . . for the
year ((one)) two thousand ((nine hundred and))
. . . . . .

Witness my hand this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., ((19)). . .

.............. ,
((County)) Assessor

(((4)))
(5) The ((county)) assessor shall deliver said tax rolls to the
((county)) treasurer, on or before the fifteenth day of January, taking
receipt therefor, and at the same time the ((county)) assessor shall
provide the ((county)) auditor with an abstract of the tax rolls showing
the total amount of taxes collectible in each of the taxing districts.

Sec.
4. RCW
84.56.050 and 1991 c 245 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
On receiving the tax rolls the treasurer shall post all real and personal
property taxes from the rolls to the treasurer's tax roll, and shall carry
forward to the current tax rolls a memorandum of all delinquent taxes on each
and every description of property, and enter the same on the property upon
which the taxes are delinquent showing the amounts for each year. The
treasurer shall notify each taxpayer in the county, at the expense of the
county, of the amount of the real and personal property((,)) and the
current and delinquent amount of tax due on the same((; and)). The
treasurer shall have printed on the notice the name of each tax and the levy
made on the same. The ((county)) treasurer shall be the sole collector
of all delinquent taxes and all other taxes due and collectible on the tax
rolls of the county((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2)
The term "taxpayer" as used in this section shall mean any person
charged, or whose property is charged, with property tax; and the person to be
notified is that person whose name appears on the tax roll herein mentioned((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That)). If no name so appears the person to be
notified is that person shown by the treasurer's tax rolls or duplicate tax
receipts of any preceding year as the payer of the tax last paid on the
property in question.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act applies to taxes levied in 2000 for collection in 2001 and thereafter.

---
END ---