BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. For
the purposes of this chapter, "candidate," "contribution,"
"expenditure," "lobbyist," and "political
committee" are each defined as provided in RCW 42.17.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The public disclosure account is created in the state treasury. Except for
unanticipated receipts under chapter 43.79 RCW, moneys in the account may be
spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for support of the public disclosure activities under chapter 42.17 RCW.

(2)
At the beginning of each fiscal biennium, the state treasurer shall determine
the balance in the public disclosure account. If the balance is less than the
threshold amount, the state treasurer shall transfer sufficient moneys from the
general fund to the public disclosure account to bring the balance up to the
threshold amount. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2001, the threshold
amount is four million dollars. At the beginning of each subsequent fiscal
biennium, the state treasurer shall adjust the threshold amount by the biennial
percentage change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures.
The state treasurer shall use published data or estimates for the implicit
price deflator that the state treasurer deems are suitable for the purposes of
this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
tax is imposed on each contribution reported by a candidate or political
committee under RCW 42.17.080, equal to four percent of the monetary value of
the contribution. The candidate or political committee shall pay the tax to
the department.

(2)
A contribution other than money or its equivalent is exempt from tax under this
section if received from an individual who is contributing his or her own
property.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the taxes imposed in this chapter. The tax due
dates, reporting periods, and return requirements applicable to chapter 82.04
RCW apply to the taxes imposed in this chapter. Moneys collected under this
chapter shall be deposited in the public disclosure account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

---
END ---