BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Parks
and playgrounds provide leisure time activities and recreational facilities as
a public service to families. However, the legislature recognizes that
high-risk homeless sex offenders, known to reside in public parks, often create
fear and pose a risk to those adults, children, and families alike who wish to
enjoy and participate in the recreational activities that parks and playgrounds
provide. The legislature understands that it is difficult to track the
whereabouts of every sex offender and that it is also impossible for law
enforcement and park rangers to notify every family when a sex offender enters
and maintains a dwelling or campsite within a public park. In response the
state will try to continue playing a vital role in protecting the public from
sex offenders who remain in the community following their conviction by
prohibiting the dwelling of sex offenders classified as moderate and high risk
in public family recreational areas. It is paramount to the state to ensure
public safety is best served to its citizens by continuing the upmost
protection to the community.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person classified as a risk level II or III sex offender may not camp,
maintain a camp or tent, be present, or sleep overnight between dusk and 6
a.m.; dwell; reside; or maintain a temporary or permanent residence of any kind
on the grounds of any public park or playground.

(2)
A person classified as a risk level II or III sex offender who dwells, resides,
sleeps, or maintains a temporary or permanent residence of any kind in a public
park or playground is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---