BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there may be increased efficiencies in the provision of
law library services through the use of available online electronic research
tools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 27.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state library shall investigate the possibility of contracting with a
vendor or vendors of online electronic legal research services for the
provision of such services state-wide through the county law library system.

(2)
If the state library determines that such a contract would be an improvement in
the efficiency of the delivery of law library services in the counties, after
June 30, 2001, the state library may enter into such a contract. If the state
library enters into a contract, the state library shall provide for the
availability of an online electronic research system at any county law library
that chooses to contract with the state library for such services. Any such
system shall allow for librarians and patrons to use the research services
either at the library facility or through electronic connection with the
library.

(3) As part of a contract with a county law library, the state
library may charge a fee to any county law library that chooses to use the
system made available by the state library. Subject to any applicable
provisions of chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure No. 695), a county
law library may charge a fee to any patron for the use of the system.

---
END ---