BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.60.015 and 1999 c 50 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the productivity board, which may also be known as
the employee involvement and recognition board. The board shall administer
the employee suggestion program and the teamwork incentive program under this
chapter.

(2)
The board shall be composed of:

(a)
The secretary of state who shall act as chairperson;

(b)
The director of personnel appointed under the provisions of RCW 41.06.130 or
the director's designee;

(c)
The director of financial management or the director's designee;

(d)
The director of general administration or the director's designee;

(e)
Three persons with experience in administering incentives such as those used by
industry, with the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of
representatives each appointing one person. The governor's appointee shall be
a representative of an employee organization certified as an exclusive
representative of at least one bargaining unit of classified employees((,
but no one organization may be represented for two consecutive terms));

(f)
((One)) Two persons representing state agencies and
institutions with employees subject to chapter 41.06 RCW, and one person
representing those subject to chapter 28B.16 RCW, both appointed by the
governor; and

(g)
In addition, the governor and board chairperson may jointly appoint persons to
the board on an ad hoc basis. Ad hoc members shall serve in an advisory
capacity and shall not have the right to vote.

Members
under subsection (2)(e) and (f) of this section shall be appointed to serve
three-year terms.

Members of the board appointed pursuant to subsection (2)(((f)
[(e)])) (e) of this section may be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240. Any board member who is not a state employee may be reimbursed
for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.60.150 and 1999 c 50 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Other than suggestion awards and incentive pay unit awards,
agencies shall have the authority to recognize employees, either individually
or as a class, for accomplishments including outstanding achievements, safety
performance, longevity, outstanding public service, or service as
employee suggestion evaluators and implementors. Recognition awards may not
exceed two hundred dollars in value per award. Such awards may include, but
not be limited to, cash or such items as pen and desk sets, plaques, pins, framed
certificates, clocks, and calculators. Award costs shall be paid by the agency
giving the award.

---
END ---