BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 67.16 RCW to read as follows:

The commission is authorized to receive criminal history record
information that includes nonconviction data for any purpose associated with
the investigation for suitability for involvement in horse racing activities
authorized under this chapter. The commission shall only disseminate
nonconviction data obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies.

---
END ---