BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may authorize and
designate national historic towns that may constitute urban growth outside of
urban growth areas as limited by this section. A national historic town means
a town or district that has been designated a national historic landmark by the
United States secretary of the interior pursuant to 16 U.S.C. 461 et seq., as
amended, based on its significant historic urban features, and which
historically contained a mix of residential and commercial or industrial uses.

A
national historic town may be designated under this chapter by a county only
if:

(1)
The comprehensive plan specifically identifies policies to guide the
preservation, redevelopment, infill, and development of the town;

(2)
The comprehensive plan and development regulations specify a mix of residential,
commercial, industrial, tourism-recreation, waterfront, or other historical
uses, along with other uses, infrastructure, and services which promote the
economic sustainability of the town and its historic character. To promote
historic preservation, redevelopment, and an economically sustainable
community, the town also may include the types of uses that existed at times
during its history and is not limited to those present at the time of the
historic designation. Portions of the town may include urban densities if they
reflect density patterns that existed at times during its history;

(3)
The boundaries of the town include all of the area contained in the national
historic landmark designation, along with any additional limited areas determined
by the county as appropriate for transitional uses and buffering. The
comprehensive plan and development regulations must include restrictions that
preclude new urban or suburban land uses in the vicinity of the town, except in
areas otherwise designated for urban growth under this chapter;

(4)
The development regulations provide for architectural controls and review
procedures applicable to the rehabilitation, redevelopment, infill, or new
development to promote the historic character of the town;

(5)
The county finds that the national historic town is consistent with the
development regulations established for critical areas; and

(6)
On-site and off-site infrastructure impacts are fully considered and mitigated
concurrent with development.

A county may allocate a portion of its twenty-year population
projection, prepared by the office of financial management, to the national
historic town corresponding to the projected number of permanent residents
within the national historic town.

---
END ---