BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall erect and maintain at each entrance to the state of Washington
on a highway that is part of the interstate system, signs stating the
following:

"WARNING

Possession of contraband
tobacco products in Washington is unlawful. You may be subject to criminal
prosecution, monetary penalties, and forfeiture of products and your
vehicle."

---
END ---