BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Public agencies that spend taxpayer dollars should provide the people of the
state of Washington the highest quality services attainable in the most
cost-effective manner, and use the most efficient means available when
purchasing materials, supplies, services, and equipment necessary for the
operation of the agencies.

(2)
Public agencies should use as often as possible, strategies that promote and
ensure cost control and innovation, and increase the quality of services
provided through the use of competition in the purchase or delivery of goods
and services.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.06.380 and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
contained in this chapter shall prohibit any department, as defined in RCW
41.06.020, from purchasing services by contract with individuals or business
entities ((if such services were regularly purchased by valid contract by
such department prior to April 23, 1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may
be executed or renewed if it would have the effect of terminating classified
employees or classified employee positions existing at the time of the
execution or renewal of the contract)).

Sec.
3. RCW
41.06.382 and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
contained in this chapter shall prohibit any institution of higher education,
as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or related board from purchasing services by
contract with individuals or business entities ((if such services were
regularly purchased by valid contract at such institution prior to April 23,
1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may be executed or renewed if it would
have the effect of terminating classified employees or classified employee positions
existing at the time of the execution or renewal of the contract)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
28A.400.285 (Contracts for services performed by classified
employees) and 1997 c 267 s 2 & 1993 c 349 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---