BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.12.370 and 1997 c 432 s 6 and 1997 c 33 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

In
addition to any other authority which it may have, the department of licensing
may furnish lists of registered and legal owners of motor vehicles only for the
purposes specified in this section to:

(1)
The manufacturers of motor vehicles, or their authorized agents, to be used to
enable those manufacturers to carry out the provisions of the National Traffic
and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966 (15 U.S.C. sec. 1382-1418), including
amendments or additions thereto, respecting safety-related defects in motor
vehicles;

(2)
Any governmental agency of the United States or Canada, or political
subdivisions thereof, to be used by it or by its authorized commercial agents
or contractors only in connection with the enforcement of motor vehicle or
traffic laws by, or programs related to traffic safety of, that government
agency. Only such parts of the list as are required for completion of the work
required of the agent or contractor shall be provided to such agent or
contractor;

(3)
A commercial parking company requiring the names and addresses of registered
owners to notify them of outstanding parking violations. Subject to the
disclosure agreement provisions of RCW 46.12.380 and the requirements of
Executive Order 97-01, the department may provide only the parts of the list
that are required for completion of the work required of the company;

(4)
An authorized agent or contractor of the department, to be used only in
connection with providing motor vehicle excise tax, licensing, title, and
registration information to motor vehicle dealers; ((or))

(5)
Any business regularly making loans to other persons to finance the purchase of
motor vehicles, to be used to assist the person requesting the list to
determine ownership of specific vehicles for the purpose of determining whether
or not to provide such financing; or

(6)
Any company building and operating a transportation toll facility under chapter
47.46 RCW, to be used to assist the company in determining ownership of
specific vehicles using the toll facility.

In the event a list of registered and legal owners of motor
vehicles is used for any purpose other than that authorized in this section,
the manufacturer, governmental agency, commercial parking company, authorized
agent, contractor, financial institution, toll facility operator, or
their authorized agents or contractors responsible for the unauthorized
disclosure or use will be denied further access to such information by the
department of licensing.

---
END ---