BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In an effort to ensure a cooperative process among the department, boarding
home provider representatives, and resident and family representatives on
matters pertaining to the boarding home program, the secretary, or his or her
designee, shall designate an advisory board. The advisory board must include
representatives of the state-wide boarding home associations, the state
long-term care ombudsman program, the state-wide resident council program, and
family representatives. Depending on the topic to be discussed, the department
may invite other representatives in addition to the named members of the
advisory board. The secretary, or his or her designee, shall periodically, but
not less than quarterly, convene a meeting of the advisory board to encourage
open dialogue on matters affecting the boarding home program. It is,
minimally, expected that the department will discuss with the advisory board
the department's inspection, enforcement, and quality improvement activities,
in addition to seeking their comments and recommendations on matters described
under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
The secretary, or his or her designee, shall seek comments and recommendations
from the advisory board prior to the promulgation of rules and standards,
implementation of programs or procedures, development of methods and rates of
payment, or the issuance of guidelines.

(3) For the purpose of implementing this section,
"department" means either the department of health or the department
of social and health services, depending on which department has the licensing
authority under this chapter.

---
END ---