BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.37.530 and 1997 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful:

(a)
For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle not equipped with
mirrors on the left and right sides of the motorcycle which shall be so located
as to give the driver a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least
two hundred feet to the rear of the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle:
PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be required on any motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle over twenty-five years old originally manufactured without mirrors and
which has been restored to its original condition and which is being ridden to
or from or otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle
contest, show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is
required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;

(b)
For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle which does not
have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a face shield of a type
conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol;

(c)
For any person to operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or
moped on a state highway, county road, or city street unless wearing upon his
or her head a ((protective)) motorcycle helmet ((of a type
conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol)) except when the vehicle
is an antique motor-driven cycle or automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle
or when the vehicle is equipped with seat belts and roll bars approved by the
state patrol. The motorcycle helmet ((must be equipped with either a))
neck or chin strap ((which shall)) must be fastened securely
while the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons operating
electric-assisted bicycles shall comply with all laws and regulations related
to the use of bicycle helmets;

(d)
For any person to transport a child under the age of five on a motorcycle or
motor-driven cycle;

(e)
For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet ((which)) that
does not meet the requirements established by ((the state patrol)) this
section.

(2)
The state patrol ((is hereby authorized and empowered to)) may
adopt and amend rules, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, concerning
((the)) standards ((and procedures for conformance of rules adopted))
for glasses, goggles, and face shields((, and protective helmets)).

(3) For purposes of this section, "motorcycle helmet"
means a protective covering for the head consisting of a hard outer shell,
padding adjacent to and inside the outer shell, and a neck or chin strap type
retention system that meets the requirements of federal motor vehicle safety
standard no. 218.

---
END ---