BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
72.09.010 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to establish a comprehensive system of
corrections for convicted law violators within the state of Washington to
accomplish the following objectives.

(1)
The system should ensure the public safety. The system should be designed and
managed to provide the maximum feasible safety for the persons and property of
the general public, the staff, and the inmates.

(2)
The system should punish the offender for violating the laws of the state of
Washington. This punishment should generally be limited to the denial of
liberty of the offender.

(3)
The system should positively impact offenders by stressing personal
responsibility and accountability and by discouraging recidivism.

(4)
The system should treat all offenders fairly and equitably without regard to
race, religion, sex, national origin, residence, or social condition.

(5)
The system, as much as possible, should reflect the values of the community
including:

(a)
Citizens who live and work in the community shall not be displaced from
their jobs by inmates.

(b)
Avoiding idleness. Idleness is not only wasteful but destructive to the
individual and to the community.

(((b)))
(c) Adoption of the work ethic. It is the community expectation that
all individuals should work and through their efforts benefit both themselves
and the community.

(((c)))
(d) Providing opportunities for self improvement. All individuals
should have opportunities to grow and expand their skills and abilities so as
to fulfill their role in the community.

(((d)))
(e) Linking the receipt or denial of privileges to responsible behavior
and accomplishments. The individual who works to improve himself or herself
and the community should be rewarded for these efforts. As a corollary, there
should be no rewards for no effort.

(((e)))
(f) Sharing in the obligations of the community. All citizens, the
public and inmates alike, have a personal and fiscal obligation in the
corrections system. All communities must share in the responsibility of the
corrections system.

(6)
The system should provide for prudent management of resources. The avoidance
of unnecessary or inefficient public expenditures on the part of offenders and
the department is essential. Offenders must be accountable to the department,
and the department to the public and the legislature. The human and fiscal
resources of the community are limited. The management and use of these
resources can be enhanced by wise investment, productive programs, the
reduction of duplication and waste, and the joining together of all involved
parties in a common endeavor. Since most offenders return to the community, it
is wise for the state and the communities to make an investment in effective
rehabilitation programs for offenders and the wise use of resources.

(7)
The system should provide for inmate work programs. Inmates shall be paid a
wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality
in which the industry is located.

(8)
The system should provide for restitution. Those who have damaged others,
persons or property, have a responsibility to make restitution for these
damages.

(((8)))
(9) The system should be accountable to the citizens of the state. In
return, the individual citizens and local units of government must meet their
responsibilities to make the corrections system effective.

(((9)))
(10) The system should meet those national standards which the state
determines to be appropriate.

Sec.
2. RCW
72.09.100 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the power to provide
for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove statutory and other
restrictions which have limited work programs in the past. For purposes of
establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the
department consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:

(1)
CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class
shall be operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

The
customer model industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the
department to provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with
products or services currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign
suppliers. The correctional industries board of directors shall review these
proposed industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The
department of corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody
services ((without charge)) to the participating firms. Participating
firms shall be responsible for liability and worker's compensation insurance
costs.

Inmates
who work in free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They
shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature
in the locality in which the industry is located, as determined by the director
of correctional industries in consultation with the director of employment
security. If the directors cannot reasonably determine the
comparable wage, then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

An
inmate who is employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall
not be eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2)
CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The
industries selected for development within this class shall, as much as
possible, match the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the
work opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely
patterned after private sector industries but with the objectives ((of
reducing public support costs rather than making a profit)) following
the legislative intent under RCW 72.09.010. The products and services of
this industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will be
ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing
manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit
organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
Correctional industries products and services shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct
a yearly marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of
the proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market. To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the state,
when there is no public sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses
of timber, agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to
private persons, at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to public
agencies or to private persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All
sales of surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules
prescribed by the secretary.

Security
and custody services shall be provided ((without charge)) by the
department of corrections.

Inmates
working in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
be paid ((for their work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage
paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is
located and which is approved by the director of correctional industries)) a
wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality
in which the industry is located as determined by the director of correctional
industries in consultation with the director of employment security. If the
directors cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then the pay shall
not be less than the federal minimum wage.

Subject
to approval of the correctional industries board, provisions of RCW 41.06.380
prohibiting contracting out work performed by classified employees shall not
apply to contracts with Washington state businesses entered into by the
department of corrections through class II industries. These businesses
shall be responsible for liability and workers' compensation insurance costs.

(3)
CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall
be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and
managed to accomplish the following objectives:

(a)
Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and experience so that the
inmate will be able to qualify for better work both within correctional
industries and the free community. It is not intended that an inmate's work
within this class of industries should be his or her final and total work
experience as an inmate.

(b)
Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c)
Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All
able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in
other classes of industries shall work in this class.

Except
for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be
paid ((for their work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The
scale shall be adopted by the secretary of corrections)) a wage
comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the locality in
which the industry is located, as determined by the director of correctional
industries in consultation with the director of employment security. If the
directors cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then the pay shall
not be less than the federal minimum wage.

(4)
CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed
to provide services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or
infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.

Inmates
in this program shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or
licensed by the department of corrections. A unit of local government shall
provide work supervision services ((without charge)) to the state and
shall pay the inmate's wage.

The
department of corrections shall reimburse participating units of local
government for liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates
who work in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
((receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a
similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located)) be
paid a wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature in the
locality in which the industry is located, as determined by the director of
correctional industries in consultation with the director of employment security.
If the directors cannot reasonably determine the comparable wage, then the pay
shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

(5)
CLASS V: COMMUNITY SERVICE PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall be subject
to supervision by the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of
industries is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off
all or part of a community service order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment
shall be in a community service program operated by the state, local units of
government, or a nonprofit agency.

To
the extent that funds are specifically made available for such purposes, the
department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers
compensation insurance costs.

Sec.
3. RCW
72.09.111 and 1999 c 325 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall deduct from the gross wages or gratuities of each inmate
working in correctional industries work programs, taxes and legal financial
obligations. The secretary shall develop a formula for the distribution of
offender wages and gratuities following the legislative intent under RCW
72.09.010.

(a)
The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class I gross
wages and from all others earning at least minimum wage:

(i)
Five percent to the public safety and education account for the purpose of
crime victims' compensation;

(ii)
Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii)
Twenty percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(b)
The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class II gross
gratuities:

(i)
Five percent to the public safety and education account for the purpose of
crime victims' compensation;

(ii)
Ten percent to a department personal inmate savings account; and

(iii)
Fifteen percent to the department to contribute to the cost of incarceration.

(c)
The formula shall include the following minimum deduction from class IV gross
gratuities: Five percent to the department to contribute to the cost of
incarceration.

(d)
The formula shall include the following minimum deductions from class III
gratuities: Five percent for the purpose of crime victims' compensation.

Any
person sentenced to life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole
under chapter 10.95 RCW or sentenced to death shall be exempt from the
requirement under (a)(ii) or (b)(ii) of this subsection.

The
department personal inmate savings account, together with any accrued interest,
shall only be available to an inmate at the time of his or her release from
confinement, unless the secretary determines that an emergency exists for the
inmate, at which time the funds can be made available to the inmate in an
amount determined by the secretary. The management of classes I, II, and IV
correctional industries may establish an incentive payment for offender workers
based on productivity criteria. This incentive shall be paid separately from
the hourly wage/gratuity rate and shall not be subject to the specified
deduction for cost of incarceration.

In
the event that the offender worker's wages or gratuity is subject to
garnishment for support enforcement, the crime victims' compensation, savings,
and cost of incarceration deductions shall be calculated on the net wages after
taxes, legal financial obligations, and garnishment.

(2)
The department shall explore other methods of recovering a portion of the cost
of the inmate's incarceration and for encouraging participation in work
programs, including development of incentive programs that offer inmates
benefits and amenities paid for only from wages earned while working in a
correctional industries work program.

(3)
The department shall develop the necessary administrative structure to recover
inmates' wages and keep records of the amount inmates pay for the costs of
incarceration and amenities. All funds deducted from inmate wages under
subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of contributions to the cost of
incarceration shall be deposited in a dedicated fund with the department and
shall be used only for the purpose of enhancing and maintaining correctional
industries work programs.

(4)
The expansion of inmate employment in class I and class II correctional
industries shall be implemented according to the following schedule, and
following the legislative intent under RCW 72.09.010:

(a)
Not later than June 30, 1995, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(b)
Not later than June 30, 1996, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least four hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(c)
Not later than June 30, 1997, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least six hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(d)
Not later than June 30, 1998, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least nine hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or class II
correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on June 30,
1994;

(e)
Not later than June 30, 1999, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least one thousand two hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or
class II correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on
June 30, 1994;

(f)
Not later than June 30, 2000, the secretary shall achieve a net increase of at
least one thousand five hundred in the number of inmates employed in class I or
class II correctional industries work programs above the number so employed on
June 30, 1994.

(5) It shall be in the discretion of the secretary to apportion the
inmates between class I and class II depending on available contracts and
resources.

---
END ---