BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the Washington state patrol's vehicle identification
number inspection program, in conjunction with other law enforcement automobile
theft detection and deterrence efforts, protects the buyers and sellers of
motor vehicles in Washington and, therefore, it is in the best interest of the
citizens of Washington to continue the program. The legislature further finds
that enhancing the Washington state patrol's efforts regarding automobile theft
detection by using automobile theft detectives, working in conjunction with a
fully staffed vehicle identification number inspection program, where the
personnel are full-time, permanent vehicle identification number inspectors and
specialists, will more effectively combat automobile theft throughout the
state.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.12.030 and 1995 c 274 s 1 and 1995 c 256 s 23 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
application for (([a])) a certificate of ownership shall be upon
a form furnished or approved by the department and shall contain:

(1)
A full description of the vehicle, which shall contain the proper vehicle
identification number, the number of miles indicated on the odometer at the
time of delivery of the vehicle, and any distinguishing marks of
identification;

(2)
The name and address of the person who is to be the registered owner of the
vehicle and, if the vehicle is subject to a security interest, the name and
address of the secured party;

(3)
Such other information as the department may require. The department may in
any instance, in addition to the information required on the application,
require additional information and, under the circumstances set forth in
this section, a physical examination of the vehicle or of any class of
vehicles, or either.

(a)
A physical examination of the vehicle is mandatory if it previously was
registered in any other state or country or if it has been rebuilt after
surrender of the certificate of ownership to the department under RCW 46.12.070
due to the vehicle's destruction or declaration as a total loss.

(b)
The physical inspection performed by the Washington state patrol
must verify that the vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with
the number shown on the foreign title and registration certificate. If the
vehicle is from a jurisdiction that does not issue titles, the inspection must
verify that the vehicle identification number is genuine and agrees with the
number shown on the registration certificate. The inspection must also confirm
that the license plates on the vehicle are those assigned to the vehicle by the
jurisdiction in which the vehicle was previously licensed. The inspection must
be made by a member of the Washington state patrol or other person authorized
by the department to make such inspections.

(c)
Motor vehicle dealers licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW may perform physical
inspections on vehicles previously registered in another state or country that
will be sold by the dealer. Dealers performing VIN inspections must have at
least one full-time employee whose primary responsibility is the maintenance
and repair of motor vehicles, to perform the VIN inspections on behalf of the
vehicle dealership. Dealers must complete a one-page vehicle identification
number inspection form designed and provided by the department and submit a
fifteen-dollar fee for titling purposes to the department. The right to
self-inspection does not include vehicles that are totaled, assembled,
constructed, replica vehicles, vehicles that appear to have been wrecked or
destroyed, or vehicles imported from another country and that have not been
certified as conforming to federal standards. Self-inspection by dealers is an
option, and does not preclude licensed dealers from using either in whole or in
part services provided by the Washington state patrol vehicle identification
number inspection unit. All other vehicle identification number inspections
will continue to be conducted at the Washington state patrol vehicle
identification number inspection locations.

(4)
The application shall be subscribed by the registered owner and be sworn to by
that applicant in the manner described by RCW 9A.72.085. The department shall
retain the application in either the original, computer, or photostatic form.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Washington state patrol must provide a report to the legislature by August 1,
2003, that includes:

(1)
The number of vehicles inspected at the Washington state patrol vehicle
identification number facilities subsequently determined to be stolen vehicles;

(2)
The number of vehicles inspected by Washington motor vehicle dealers
subsequently determined to be stolen vehicles; and

(3) A comparative analysis of those vehicles subsequently
determined to be stolen for the purpose of identifying any deficiencies in the
motor vehicle dealer self-inspection program.

---
END ---