BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1.
Washington is home to many of the nation's most successful math, science, and
technology experts. It is the intent of the legislature to attract career
professionals from diverse backgrounds into the teaching profession and prevent
teacher shortages by making teacher certification available to persons with
baccalaureate degrees and relevant work experience or sufficient knowledge of
the subject area to be taught. The intent of the legislature in establishing
the certification of specialists program is to allow eligible persons to enter
the classroom under the guidance and supervision of a school district and to
qualify for continuing teacher certification upon satisfactory completion of
three years of full-time teaching.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The certification of specialists program
is established.

(2) At the request of a local school
district or private school, the state board of education shall issue a one-year
provisional teaching certificate to individuals with at least five years' work
experience in math, science, technology, foreign language, or other area of
need identified by a local district or private school, under the following
conditions:

(a) The application contains documentation
of education and work experience including at least five years of work
experience in the area in which certification is being considered;

(b) The candidate holds a bachelor's degree
from a nationally or regionally accredited postsecondary institution;

(c) The candidate meets the age and
character requirements established by the state board of education for all
certificated school staff, including compliance with the background check
through the Washington state patrol criminal investigation system and the
federal bureau of investigation as required under RCW 28A.410.010; and

(d) The candidate has completed the training
program offered by the local district or private school.

(3) A local school district or private
school seeking to hire a teacher under the certification of specialists program
shall develop and file a plan for a training program with the state board of
education.

(a) The school district training program
must require that the teacher candidate pass a basic skills test selected by
the school district and any subject matter test required of all teacher
candidates in the subject area.

(b) The school district training program
must provide the teacher candidate with direct classroom experience supported
by skilled teachers and include but not be limited to the following components:

(i) A training program prior to the time the
candidate assumes responsibility for a classroom. The content and formal
instruction may include classroom safety and management, pedagogy, and state
requirements relating to child abuse reporting;

(ii) A period of at least eighteen weeks of
continued supervision of the teacher candidate, who may be assigned full-time
classroom duties. During this period, the teacher candidate must be critiqued
at least once per month and must be observed formally and evaluated at least
twice. No more than two months may pass without a formal observation of the
teacher candidate;

(iii) A teacher specialist certified under
this program shall continue in a formal mentorship for the first two years
after a certificate is awarded. The mentorship must include observations of
the teacher specialist by the mentor teacher and observations by the teacher
specialist of the mentor teacher in his or her own classroom.

(4) An individual employed under this
program shall be certified for one year and approved for subsequent one-year
renewals upon request of the local school district.

(5) A teacher specialist who successfully
completes three contract years under the provisions of this section shall be
awarded a regular continuing certificate subject to certificate renewal
requirements.

(6) A candidate pursuing certification
through the certification of specialists program shall be placed on the local
district salary schedule for the rank corresponding to the degree held by the
teacher. The candidate shall also receive one year of credit on the salary
schedule for every three years of documented work in the speciality area.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

(1) A local district may hire individuals
as part-time specialists to teach in public schools.

(2) For the purposes of this section,
"part-time specialist" means an individual who has expertise in areas
such as math, science, technology, foreign language, or other area of need
identified by a local district or private school.

(3) Part-time specialists must meet the age
and character requirements established by the state board of education for all
certificated school staff, including compliance with the background check
through the Washington state patrol criminal investigation system and the
federal bureau of investigation as required under RCW 28A.410.010.

(4) Local or private school boards may
contract with part-time specialists for part-time services on an hourly, daily,
or other periodic basis as best meets the needs of the board. A part-time
specialist shall not fill a position that will result in the displacement of a
qualified teacher with a regular certificate who is already employed in the
district or private school.

(5) An orientation and mentorship program
must be developed and implemented for part-time specialists by the local school
board, which may include classroom safety and management, pedagogy, and state
requirements relating to child abuse reporting.

(6) Local school boards
shall follow RCW 28A.400.285 when contracting with part-time specialists.

--- END ---