BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares:

(1)
Washington has been following a path of education reform since the
implementation of chapter 336, Laws of 1993;

(2)
Washington's students will be held to higher standards than ever before,
standards they must meet in order to receive a high school diploma;

(3)
Parents or guardians often have the strongest influence on a child's learning
and development and should be welcomed to participate in the education of their
child;

(4)
Parents or guardians should have access to the scored Washington assessment of
student learning booklet used by their child for this state-mandated test.
Giving parents or guardians access to the scored test booklets will allow
parents or guardians to be active participants in the education of their
child. Not only will parents or guardians have a better understanding of what
their child is learning in school, they will also have a clear picture of how
curriculum is being directed in their school building to meet the state's new
standards.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.230.195 and 1999 c 373 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If students' scores on the test or assessments under RCW 28A.230.190,
28A.230.230, and ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060 indicate that
students need help in identified areas, the school district shall evaluate its
instructional practices and make appropriate adjustments.

(2)
Each school district shall notify the parents of each student of their child's
performance on the test and assessments conducted under this chapter.

(3)
After data are complete and accurate, the writing portion of the Washington
assessment of student learning test booklets shall be redistributed to
schools. Schools shall make the writing portion of each student's test booklet
available to the student, the student's parent or guardian, and teacher.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.655.090 and 1999 c 388 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By September 10, 1998, and by September 10th each year thereafter, the
superintendent of public instruction shall report to schools, school districts,
and the legislature on the results of the Washington assessment of student
learning and state-mandated norm-referenced standardized tests.

(2)
The reports shall include the assessment results by school and school district,
and include changes over time. For the Washington assessment of student
learning, results shall be reported as follows:

(a)
The percentage of students meeting the standards;

(b)
The percentage of students performing at each level of the assessment; and

(c)
A learning improvement index that shows changes in student performance within
the different levels of student learning reported on the Washington assessment
of student learning.

(3)
The reports shall contain data regarding the different characteristics of
schools, such as poverty levels, percent of English as a second language
students, dropout rates, attendance, percent of students in special education,
and student mobility so that districts and schools can learn from the
improvement efforts of other schools and districts with similar
characteristics.

(4)
The reports shall contain student scores on mandated tests by comparable
Washington schools of similar characteristics.

(5)
The reports shall contain information on public school choice options available
to students, including vocational education.

(6)
The reports shall be posted on the superintendent of public instruction's
internet web site.

(7)
To protect the privacy of students, the results of schools and districts that
test fewer than ten students in a grade level shall not be reported. In
addition, in order to ensure that results are reported accurately, the
superintendent of public instruction shall maintain the confidentiality of
state-wide data files until the superintendent determines that the data are
complete and accurate.

(8)
After data are complete and accurate, the writing portion of the Washington
assessment of student learning test booklets shall be redistributed to
schools. Schools shall make the writing portion of each student's test booklet
available to the student, the student's parent or guardian, and teacher.

(9)
The superintendent of public instruction shall monitor the percentage and
number of special education and limited English-proficient students exempted
from taking the assessments by schools and school districts to ensure the
exemptions are in compliance with exemption guidelines.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. By
September 1, 2000, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
report to the governor and the fiscal and education committees of the
legislature on the estimated cost of returning the entire test booklet to
parents and teachers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect September 1, 2001.

---
END ---