BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.148.900 and 1995 c 12 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall expire June 1, ((2001)) 2007.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.149.900 and 1995 c 20 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Sections
1 through 11 of this act shall expire June 1, ((2001)) 2007.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.23A.902 and 1996 c 88 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall expire on June 1, ((2001)) 2007, coinciding with
the expiration of chapter 70.148 RCW.

Sec.
4. 1998
c 245 s 178 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Sections
114 and 115 of this act expire June 1, ((2001)) 2007.

Sec.
5. 1997
c 8 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

This act expires June 1, ((2001)) 2007.

---
END ---