BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The purpose of sections 1 through 9 of this act is to set forth the
compensation to be paid, and conditions to be met, by a utility for the
construction of new facilities or the maintenance of existing facilities within
a railroad right-of-way in cases where the utility and railroad cannot agree.

(2)
These rules shall be applicable to all future and existing facilities and,
except as provided in section 3 (1) through (5) of this act, shall be
applicable to all existing facilities if agreements concerning existing
facilities do not exist, expire, or are terminated.

(3)
These rules shall be applicable to utility facilities constructed within a
railroad right-of-way, whether on public or private property.

(4)
Nothing in this act shall impair property interests of persons who are not
railroads, and persons owning reversionary rights to rights-of-way.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 1 through 9 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Consumer-owned utility" means a municipal utility formed under Title
35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an irrigation
district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under chapter
23.86 RCW, or a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06
RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing electricity or providing
water or sewer services to more than one retail customer in the state.

(2)(a)
"Direct expenses" means:

(i)
The cost of inspecting the crossing site before, during, or after construction;

(ii)
Administrative costs, such as the costs of entering the new crossing on the
railroad's books, maps, and property records;

(iii)
The cost of flagging during construction; and

(iv)
Any other costs incurred due to actual construction.

(b)
"Direct expenses" does not include a contribution to profit.

(3)
"Facilities" means cables, conduits, wires, pipes, and structures
used by a utility to transmit utility service.

(4)
"Investor-owned utility" means a public service company that meets
the definition of RCW 80.04.010, and is engaged in distributing electricity,
telecommunications service, gas, or water to more than one retail customer in
the state.

(5)
"Railroad" means a carrier of persons or property upon vehicles,
other than street cars, operated upon stationary rails.

(6)
"Railroad right-of-way" means any ownership interest that a railroad
has in property on which stationary rails are located.

(7)
"Special circumstances" means unique characteristics of a parcel of
property which enhance its value above that of a typical parcel of railroad
right-of-way. "Special circumstances" may include the parcel's
relationship to other property, the existence of unique topography or natural
resources, or other unusual characteristics.

(8)
"Utility" means a consumer-owned utility or an investor-owned
utility.

(9)
"Within" means across, intersecting, on, over, perpendicular to,
under, along, or parallel to, a railroad right-of-way.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a utility which locates its
facilities within a railroad right-of-way shall compensate the railroad for all
reasonable direct expenses that are incurred by the railroad.

(2)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a utility shall also make a one-time
payment, in lieu of any license fee, for an easement to site facilities within
a railroad right-of-way to which the railroad holds title. Otherwise, the
one-time payment shall be for a license to maintain utility franchises within
the railroad right-of-way for as long as a railroad has use of or control over
the right-of-way. The amount of the one-time payment under this subsection
shall be sufficient to compensate the railroad for the diminution of property
value caused by the locating of utility facilities within the railroad
right-of-way, based upon the currently appraised fair market value of the
railroad right-of-way as a railroad right-of-way.

(3)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, the one-time payment requirement
under subsection (2) of this section applies to all utility facilities that
were located within the railroad right-of-way before the effective date of this
act and that are covered under an expired contract by that date.

(4)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, the one-time payment requirement
under subsection (2) of this section applies to all utility facilities that are
constructed within the railroad right-of-way after the effective date of this
act.

(5)
A railroad cannot require a utility to pay any compensation, including any
license fee, for facilities which cross a railroad right-of-way upon a public
right-of-way.

(6)
In the event of a dispute between a railroad and a utility, the parties shall
attempt to reach a compromise through mediation.

(7)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a property owner shall make a
payment of three hundred dollars every ten years to a railroad for the purpose
of gaining access to lands or structures owned, leased, or otherwise controlled
by the property owner. No license fee shall be owed to a railroad for cattle
or farm implement crossings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties:

(1)
A railroad and a utility shall each determine for itself the amount and scope
of insurance it shall carry to cover risks associated with the property of the
railroad or the facilities of the utility within a railroad right-of-way.

(2)
A railroad and a utility shall indemnify the other for damages resulting from
its own negligence related to the presence of utility facilities within the
railroad right-of-way.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a railroad or utility shall, at its
own expense:

(1)
Notify the other of emergencies, planned repair and construction, or similar
operations within a railroad right-of-way if the operation may affect the
other. Except for emergencies, initial notification of intent to construct shall
be made by twenty-one days before construction, and notification of actual
construction shall be made by three working days before construction begins;

(2)
Establish a mechanism for receiving notification of emergencies twenty-four
hours per day, seven days per week. For every utility having facilities
located within a railroad right-of-way, each utility and railroad shall inform
the other of an emergency telephone number, the name of a person responsible
for processing the notification, and any other information necessary for
dealing with an emergency situation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a railroad or utility shall
reimburse the other for:

(a)
Expenses reasonably incurred that result from emergencies caused by the
property or facilities of each that is located within the railroad
right-of-way; and

(b)
Reasonable miscellaneous expenses incurred by one party at the other's request.

(2)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a railroad or utility shall each
repair and maintain its own property or facilities located within a railroad
right-of-way, and may not perform regular or emergency maintenance or repair of
the other's property or facilities.

(3)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, a utility shall relocate its
facilities within a railroad right-of-way if the relocation is reasonably
necessary for railroad operations.

(4)
If grade crossing markings or signs are damaged during construction, the party
responsible for the damage shall pay the replacement costs, unless otherwise
agreed to by the parties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Upon placement of new facilities, a utility shall, at its own expense, provide
a railroad with a physical description of those new facilities and their
location within the railroad's right-of-way. The description shall include the
installed location and depth of any underground facilities.

(2)
A utility or railroad shall provide the other with a physical description of
any alterations or additions to its property or facilities located within the
railroad right-of-way in the area of the utility's facilities.

(3)
Utility facilities located within the railroad right-of-way shall be
constructed and maintained under applicable state and federal laws and
regulations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties:

(a)
A railroad may not refuse to permit a utility to construct, replace, maintain,
or repair facilities within a right-of-way solely because of a dispute between
the parties concerning compensation.

(b)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, a utility may proceed with
construction while the dispute is resolved under state law or another method
mutually selected by the parties.

(2)
If a utility constructs facilities within a railroad right-of-way while a
dispute is pending and, upon a petition by a railroad to the superior court for
expedited review, the superior court finds that the facilities are located in
an unreasonable location or constructed in an unsafe manner, the court may
order the utility to remove or modify the facilities at the utility's expense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act does not apply to a railroad operated by a municipal corporation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each added to chapter 43.10 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---