BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.20.010 and 1995 c 381 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

An
unemployed individual shall be eligible to receive waiting period credits or
benefits with respect to any week in his or her eligibility period only if the
commissioner finds that:

(1)
He or she has registered for work at, and thereafter has continued to report
at, an employment office in accordance with such regulation as the commissioner
may prescribe, except that the commissioner may by regulation waive or alter
either or both of the requirements of this subdivision as to individuals
attached to regular jobs and as to such other types of cases or situations with
respect to which the commissioner finds that the compliance with such
requirements would be oppressive, or would be inconsistent with the purposes of
this title;

(2)
He or she has filed an application for an initial determination and made a
claim for waiting period credit or for benefits in accordance with the
provisions of this title;

(3)
Except for a claimant who meets the criteria under subsection (7) of this
section, he or she is able to work, and is available for work in any trade,
occupation, profession, or business for which he or she is reasonably fitted.
To be available for work an individual must be ready, able, and willing,
immediately to accept any suitable work which may be offered to him or her and
must be actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade practices and through
other methods when so directed by the commissioner or the commissioner's
agents;

(4)
He or she has been unemployed for a waiting period of one week;

(5)
He or she participates in reemployment services if the individual has been
referred to reemployment services pursuant to the profiling system established
by the commissioner under RCW 50.20.011, unless the commissioner determines
that:

(a)
The individual has completed such services; or

(b)
There is justifiable cause for the claimant's failure to participate in such
services; ((and))

(6)
As to weeks beginning after March 31, 1981, which fall within an extended
benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010, the individual meets the terms and
conditions of RCW 50.22.020 with respect to benefits claimed in excess of
twenty-six times the individual's weekly benefit amount; and

(7)
The claimant has qualified under RCW 50.20.050(2)(d) and the claimant is
temporarily unable to actively search for employment because the claimant is
seeking safety or relief for the claimant or the claimant's immediate family
members from domestic violence or stalking. The claimant is deemed to have
fulfilled the requirements of subsection (3) of this section for up to twelve
weeks while seeking safety or relief by:

(a)
Obtaining or receiving medical treatment;

(b)
Going into hiding or relocating or attempting to do so;

(c)
Actively pursuing legal protection or remedies; or

(d)
Participating in psychological, social, or religious counseling or support
groups for victims of domestic violence or stalking to assist the claimant in
ending domestic violence or dealing with the results of stalking so as to
resume work.

An
individual's eligibility period for regular benefits shall be coincident to his
or her established benefit year. An individual's eligibility period for
additional or extended benefits shall be the periods prescribed elsewhere in
this title for such benefits.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.20.050 and 1993 c 483 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning with the first day
of the calendar week in which he or she has left work voluntarily without good
cause and thereafter for five calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained
bona fide work and earned wages equal to five times his or her weekly benefit
amount.

The
disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere sham to qualify
for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining whether work is of a
bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider factors including but not
limited to the following:

(a)
The duration of the work;

(b)
The extent of direction and control by the employer over the work; and

(c)
The level of skill required for the work in light of the individual's training
and experience.

(2)
An individual shall not be considered to have left work voluntarily without
good cause when:

(a)
He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona fide work as
described in subsection (1) of this section;

(b)
The separation was because of the illness or disability of the claimant or the
death, illness, or disability of a member of the claimant's immediate family if
the claimant took all reasonable precautions, in accordance with any
regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, to protect his or her
employment status by having promptly notified the employer of the reason for
the absence and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to
assume employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management dispatch
system; ((or))

(c)
He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's employment that is outside
the existing labor market area if the claimant remained employed as long as was
reasonable prior to the move; or

(d)
The separation was necessary to protect the claimant or the claimant's family
members from domestic violence, as defined in RCW 26.50.010, or stalking, as
defined in RCW 9A.46.110.

(3)
In determining under this section whether an individual has left work
voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only consider
work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to the individual's
health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical fitness for the work, the
individual's ability to perform the work, and such other work connected factors
as the commissioner may deem pertinent, including state and national
emergencies. Good cause shall not be established for voluntarily leaving work
because of its distance from an individual's residence where the distance was
known to the individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and
where, in the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled
by workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known and
present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the related
circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial involuntary
deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner determines that
other related circumstances would work an unreasonable hardship on the
individual were he or she required to continue in the employment.

(4)
Subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall not apply to an individual whose
marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him or her to leave
employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible for unemployment
insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which
he or she left work and thereafter for five calendar weeks and until he or she
has requalified, either by obtaining bona fide work and earning wages equal to
five times his or her weekly benefit amount or by reporting in person to the
department during ten different calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion
that he or she is ready, able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable
work which may be offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement services
as are available through the department. This subsection does not apply to
individuals covered by subsection (2)(b) or (c) of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
50.29.020 and 1995 c 57 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An experience rating account shall be established and maintained for each
employer, except employers as described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have
properly elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local
government employers as described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are
required to make payments in lieu of contributions, based on existing records
of the employment security department. Benefits paid to any eligible
individuals shall be charged to the experience rating accounts of each of such
individual's employers during the individual's base year in the same ratio that
the wages paid by each employer to the individual during the base year bear to
the wages paid by all employers to that individual during that base year,
except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2)
The legislature finds that certain benefit payments, in whole or in part,
should not be charged to the experience rating accounts of employers except
those employers described in RCW 50.44.010 and 50.44.030 who have properly
elected to make payments in lieu of contributions, taxable local government
employers described in RCW 50.44.035, and those employers who are required to
make payments in lieu of contributions, as follows:

(a)
Benefits paid to any individuals later determined to be ineligible shall not be
charged to the experience rating account of any contribution paying employer.

(b)
Benefits paid to an individual filing under the provisions of chapter 50.06 RCW
shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any contribution
paying employer only if:

(i)
The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(1) after receiving crime victims'
compensation for a disability resulting from a nonwork-related occurrence; or

(ii)
The individual files under RCW 50.06.020(2).

(c)
Benefits paid which represent the state's share of benefits payable under
chapter 50.22 RCW shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.

(d)
In the case of individuals who requalify for benefits under RCW 50.20.050 or
50.20.060, benefits based on wage credits earned prior to the disqualifying
separation shall not be charged to the experience rating account of the
contribution paying employer from whom that separation took place.

(e)
In the case of individuals identified under RCW 50.20.015, benefits paid with
respect to a calendar quarter, which exceed the total amount of wages earned in
the state of Washington in the higher of two corresponding calendar quarters
included within the individual's determination period, as defined in RCW
50.20.015, shall not be charged to the experience rating account of any
contribution paying employer.

(f)
Benefits paid to an individual who has established a domestic violence
qualification under RCW 50.20.010(7) shall not be charged to the experience
rating account of any contribution paying employer.

(3)(a)
Beginning July 1, 1985, a contribution-paying base year employer, not otherwise
eligible for relief of charges for benefits under this section, may receive
such relief if the benefit charges result from payment to an individual who:

(i)
Last left the employ of such employer voluntarily for reasons not attributable
to the employer;

(ii)
Was discharged for misconduct connected with his or her work not a result of
inability to meet the minimum job requirements;

(iii)
Is unemployed as a result of closure or severe curtailment of operation at the
employer's plant, building, work site, or other facility. This closure must be
for reasons directly attributable to a catastrophic occurrence such as fire,
flood, or other natural disaster; or

(iv)
Continues to be employed on a regularly scheduled permanent part-time basis by
a base year employer and who at some time during the base year was concurrently
employed and subsequently separated from at least one other base year
employer. Benefit charge relief ceases when the employment relationship
between the employer requesting relief and the claimant is terminated. This
subsection does not apply to shared work employers under chapter 50.60 RCW.

(b) The employer requesting relief of charges under this subsection
must request relief in writing within thirty days following mailing to the last
known address of the notification of the valid initial determination of such
claim, stating the date and reason for the separation or the circumstances of
continued employment. The commissioner, upon investigation of the request,
shall determine whether relief should be granted.

---
END ---