BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.36.100 and 1992 c 93 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for a person who is not qualified for jury service under RCW 2.36.070, and
except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, no person
may be excused from jury service by the court except upon a showing of undue
hardship, extreme inconvenience, public necessity, or any reason deemed
sufficient by the court for a period of time the court deems necessary.

(2)
At the discretion of the court's designee, after a request by a prospective
juror to be excused, a prospective juror excused from juror service for a
particular time may be assigned to another jury term within the twelve-month
period. If the assignment to another jury term is made at the time a juror is
excused from the jury term for which he or she was summoned, a second summons
under RCW 2.36.095 need not be issued.

(3)
When the jury source list has been fully summoned within a consecutive
twelve-month period and additional jurors are needed, jurors who have already
served during the consecutive twelve-month period may be summoned again for
service. A juror who has previously served may only be excused if he or she
served at least two weeks of juror service within the preceding twelve months.
An excuse for prior service shall be granted only upon the written request of
the prospective juror, which request shall certify the terms of prior service.
Prior jury service may include service in superior court, in a court of limited
jurisdiction, in the United States District Court, or on a jury of inquest.

(4) Beginning on the effective date of this act, and ending July
1, 2005, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW who practices in an area
that has been designated by the federal government as a health personnel
shortage area shall be excused from jury service upon the written request of
the physician. A request to be excused under this subsection shall be
accompanied by such documentation of licensure as the court may require.

---
END ---