BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I--LEGISLATIVE INTENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds:

(a)
The continued economic vitality of downtown and neighborhood commercial
districts in our state's cities is essential to community preservation, social
cohesion, and economic growth;

(b)
In recent years there has been a deterioration of downtown and neighborhood
commercial districts in both rural and urban communities due to a shifting
population base, changes in the marketplace, and greater competition from
suburban shopping malls, discount centers, and the internet;

(c)
This decline has eroded the ability of businesses and property owners to
renovate and enhance their commercial and residential properties; and

(d)
Business owners in these districts need to maintain their local economies in
order to provide goods and services to adjacent residents, to provide
employment opportunities, to avoid disinvestment and economic dislocations, and
to develop downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
programs to address these problems.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a program to:

(a)
Work in partnership with these organizations;

(b)
Provide technical assistance and training to local governments, business
organizations, downtown and neighborhood commercial district organizations, and
business and property owners to accomplish community and economic
revitalization and development of business districts; and

(c)
Certify a downtown or neighborhood commercial district organization's use of
available tax incentives.

PART
II--DOWNTOWN AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT

REVITALIZATION
INCENTIVES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credit against the tax imposed by this chapter for private
contributions that are designed to assist in the development and operation of a
downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization program.

(2)
The credit allowed under this section is limited to an amount equal to:

(a)
Seventy-five percent of the value of the contribution that is made directly, by
the business, to a downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program; or

(b)
Fifty percent of the value of the contribution that is made directly, by the
business, to the department of community, trade, and economic development for
distribution as financial or technical assistance under section 302 of this
act.

(3)
The total credits allowed under this section for an individual downtown and
neighborhood commercial district cannot exceed one hundred thousand dollars in
a calendar year. The total credits allowed under this section for a business
cannot exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars in a calendar year. The total
credits allowed on a state-wide basis cannot exceed two million dollars in a
calendar year.

(4)
Prior to making a contribution under this section, the business must obtain
approval from the department of community, trade, and economic development.
The business' request for approval must include the amount of the contribution.

(5)
This section applies only to contributions for which an application is approved
on or after the effective date of this act.

(6)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Contribution" means cash contributions.

(b)
"Downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program"
means a program designated by the department of community, trade, and economic
development under sections 101 and 301 through 306 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. A new
section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A physical improvement to a commercial building upon real property, that is
located within a downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program's boundaries identified and approved by the department of community,
trade, and economic development under section 303 of this act, is exempt from
taxation for the ten assessment years subsequent to the completion of the
improvement, if the improvement meets the guidelines established by the local
downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization program. In
addition, for buildings that meet the definition of historic property as
defined in RCW 84.26.020, the improvements must be consistent with the
definition of rehabilitation as defined in RCW 84.26.020, and adhere to the
historic preservation process and guidelines adopted by the community. A
taxpayer desiring to obtain the exemption granted by this section must file
notice of their intent to construct the improvement prior to the improvement
being made on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and furnished to
the taxpayer by the county assessor. This exemption cannot be claimed more
than once in a fifteen-year period. As used in this section, "downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program" has the same
meaning as in section 201 of this act.

(2)
The department of revenue shall adopt rules necessary to properly administer
the provisions of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of an eligible local government may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the boundaries of the eligible local
government. The rate of tax shall not exceed: (a) .035 of one percent of the
selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the
case of a use tax in those cities under one hundred thousand in population that
include a designated partner-level or associate-level program under the main
street program; and (b) .0095 of one percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax in cities
of over one hundred thousand in population.

The
total tax collected under this section for an eligible local government shall
not exceed four hundred thousand dollars in a calendar year.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid to the department of
revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of taxes on behalf of the local government at no cost to
the local government.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
paying the costs for a downtown or neighborhood commercial district
revitalization project that is located within the boundaries identified and
approved by the department of community, trade, and economic development under
section 303 of this act.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before January 1, 2001.

(5)
Moneys collected under this section shall not be used until two dollars of
moneys collected are matched with one dollar of local government or private
funds.

(6)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization project"
means: Public infrastructure improvements, including street and utility
improvements; professional management, planning, and promotion within the
eligible area, including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the eligible area; maintenance and security for common or public
areas in the eligible area; and historic preservation activities authorized
under RCW 35.21.395.

(b)
"Eligible local government" means: (i) A local government working in
conjunction with a downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program designated by the department of community, trade, and economic
development at the partner-level or associate-level under section 303 of this
act; or (ii) a city of over one hundred thousand in population working in
conjunction with a neighborhood commercial district that has been designated as
eligible by the legislative authority of the city.

(c)
"Local government" means a city, code city, or town.

PART
III--DOWNTOWN AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT

REVITALIZATION
PROGRAM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Area" means a geographic area within a local government that is
described by a closed perimeter boundary.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(4)
"Local government" means a city, code city, or town.

(5)
"Qualified levels of participation" means a local downtown or
neighborhood commercial district revitalization effort that has been designated
by the department, as being at the participant-level, associate-level, or
partner-level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. The
Washington main street program is created within the department. In order to
implement the Washington main street program, the department shall:

(1)
Provide technical assistance to businesses, property owners, organizations, and
local governments undertaking a comprehensive downtown and neighborhood
commercial district revitalization and management strategy within a specified
area. Technical assistance includes, but is not limited to, initial site
evaluations and assessments, training for local programs, training for local
program staff, site visits and assessments by technical specialists, local
program design assistance and evaluation, and continued local program on-site
assistance;

(2)
To the extent funds are made available, provide financial assistance to local
governments or local organizations to assist in initial program start-up costs,
specific project feasibility studies, market studies, and design assistance;

(3)
Develop objective criteria for selecting recipients of financial assistance
under subsection (1) of this section and providing designation of local programs
under section 303 of this act;

(4)
Operate the Washington main street program in accordance with the plan
developed by the department, in consultation with the Washington main street
advisory committee created under section 304 of this act; and

(5)
Consider other factors the department deems necessary for the implementation of
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. (1)
The department shall, by rule, adopt criteria for the designation of local
downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization programs and
official local main street programs. In establishing the criteria, the
department shall consider:

(a)
The degree of interest and commitment to downtown or neighborhood commercial
district revitalization and, where applicable, historic preservation by both
the public and private sectors;

(b)
The evidence of potential private sector investment in the downtown or
neighborhood commercial district;

(c)
Where applicable, a downtown or neighborhood commercial district with
sufficient historic fabric to become a foundation for an enhanced community
image;

(d)
The capacity of the organization to undertake a comprehensive program and the
financial commitment to implement a long-term downtown or neighborhood commercial
district revitalization program that includes a commitment to employ a
professional program manager and maintain a sufficient operating budget;

(e)
The department's existing downtown revitalization program's tier system;

(f)
The national main street center's criteria for designating official main street
cities; and

(g)
Other factors the department deems necessary for the designation of a local
program.

(2)
The department shall designate local downtown or neighborhood commercial
district revitalization programs and official local main street programs. The
programs shall be limited to the following three categories: Partner-level,
associate-level, and participant-level.

(3)
Sections 201, 202, and 203 of this act do not apply to any local downtown or neighborhood
commercial district revitalization program unless the boundaries of the program
have been identified and approved by the department. The boundaries of a local
downtown or neighborhood commercial district revitalization program are
typically limited to the pedestrian core area or the central commercial
district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. (1)
The Washington main street advisory committee is created within the
department. The members of the advisory committee are appointed by the
director and consist of:

(a)
The director, or the director's designee, who shall serve as chair;

(b)
Two representatives of local governments;

(c)
The chair of the governor's small business improvement council;

(d)
Five representatives from existing main street programs or downtown and
neighborhood commercial district programs; and

(e)
One representative of the Washington state office of archaeology and historic
preservation.

(2)
The department shall develop a plan for the Washington main street program, in
consultation with the Washington main street advisory committee. The plan must
describe:

(a)
The objectives and strategies of the Washington main street program;

(b)
How the Washington main street program will be coordinated with existing
federal, state, local, and private sector business development and historic
preservation efforts;

(c)
The means by which private investment will be solicited and employed;

(d)
The methods of selecting and providing assistance to participating local
programs; and

(e)
A means to solicit private contributions for state and local operations of the
Washington main street program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. The
Washington main street trust fund account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from private contributions, federal funds, legislative
appropriations, and fees for services, if levied, must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operation of the
Washington main street program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306.
Sections 101 and 301 through 306 of this act may be known and cited as the
Washington main street act.

PART IV--TECHNICAL
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401.
Sections 101 and 301 through 306 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title
43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 403. Part
headings used in this act constitute no part of the law.

---
END ---