BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.50.160 and 1995 c 246 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

To
prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different courts and to
give courts needed information for issuance of orders, the judicial information
system shall be available in each district, municipal, and superior court by
July 1, 1997, and shall include a data base containing the following
information:

(1)
The names of the parties and the cause number for every order of protection
issued under this title, every criminal no-contact order issued under chapter
10.99 RCW, every antiharassment order issued under chapter 10.14 RCW, every
dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every third-party custody action
under chapter 26.10 RCW, ((and)) every parentage action under chapter
26.10 RCW, and every order for protection issued under chapter 74.34 RCW;

(2)
A criminal history of the parties; and

(3) Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in
issuing orders under this chapter as determined by the judicial information
system committee.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.34.130 and 1999 c 176 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The court may order relief as it deems necessary for the protection
of the petitioner, including, but not limited to the following:

(1)
Restraining respondent from committing acts of abandonment, abuse, neglect, or
financial exploitation;

(2)
Excluding the respondent from petitioner's residence for a specified period or
until further order of the court;

(3)
Prohibiting contact by respondent for a specified period or until further order
of the court;

(4)
Requiring an accounting by respondent of the disposition of petitioner's income
or other resources;

(5)
Restraining the transfer of property for a specified period not exceeding
ninety days;

(6)
Requiring the respondent to pay the filing fee and court costs, including
service fees, and to reimburse the petitioner for costs incurred in bringing
the action, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

Any relief granted by an order for protection, other than a
judgment for costs, shall be for a fixed period not to exceed one year. The
clerk of the court shall enter any order for protection issued under this
section into the judicial information system.

---
END ---