BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
PURPOSE. The purpose of this act is to establish a system of
licensing interpreters for the deaf and hard of hearing that will enhance the
opportunities of persons who are deaf and hard of hearing to enjoy the fruits
of our society, increase their educational opportunities, enhance their public
safety and security, and allow them to more fully enjoy their constitutional
rights.

PART I - LICENSING
INTERPRETERS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Board" means the Washington board of interpreters for the deaf and
hard of hearing.

(2)
"Consumer" means a person who is deaf or hard of hearing or who
requires special communication techniques in order to communicate.

(3)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department of licensing.

(5)
"Interpreter" means a person who engages in the act or practice of
interpreting for gain in the state of Washington, but does not include an
intermediary interpreter, as defined under RCW 2.42.110.

(6)
"Interpreting" means the act of translating or transliterating
English concepts to any or all necessary specialized language used by a
consumer or the act of translating a consumer's specialized vocabulary to
English concepts.

(7)
"Specialized vocabulary" means manual signs and gestures operating as
visual or tactile ways of communicating thoughts, ideas, and feelings,
including but not limited to American sign language, English-based sign
language, cued speech, oral interpreting, manually coded English, and contact
sign language.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102.
LICENSE REQUIREMENT. Effective December 1, 2002, a person may not represent
himself or herself as an interpreter, or engage in the practice of
interpreting, for the deaf or hard of hearing, without applying for a license,
meeting the required qualifications, and being licensed as an interpreter,
except as exempted and provided by this chapter. Effective December 1, 2002, a
person or a public or private entity may not knowingly employ a person for
interpreting for the deaf or hard of hearing unless the person is licensed by
the department as an interpreter to engage in the act of interpreting for the
deaf or hard of hearing, except as exempted and provided by this chapter.

Interpreters
in judicial or administrative proceedings are governed by chapter 2.42 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103.
REQUIREMENTS FOR BEING LICENSED AS AN INTERPRETER. In addition to any other
requirements that may be established by departmental rule, a person may be
licensed as an interpreter for the deaf or hard of hearing only if he or she:
(1) Possesses current certification by the national association of the deaf or
the registry of interpreters for the deaf; or (2) has obtained a certificate of
completion of a deaf interpretation program from a community or technical
college in this state or an equivalent program.

A
licensed interpreter must also have adequate professional liability insurance
coverage and have passed a criminal background check through the Washington
state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.834, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050, but the criminal background check need not
include a fingerprint check. The department shall determine the adequacy of
professional liability insurance coverage and require each licensed interpreter
to submit proof of adequate professional liability insurance coverage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104.
EXCLUSIONS FROM CHAPTER. This chapter does not apply to:

(1)
Persons interpreting for religious activities;

(2)
Persons volunteering to interpret without compensation, but not including
persons volunteering to interpret for state agency offices and state agency
programs;

(3)
Persons interpreting during emergency situations. For purposes of this
section, "emergency situation" means a situation where an adult who
receives the interpretation services decides that the delay necessary to obtain
a licensed interpreter is likely to cause him or her injury or loss and signs a
waiver holding all persons harmless. The waiver must clearly state that the
adult who receives the interpretation services knows he or she has a right to
interpretation by a licensed interpreter and willingly waives this right;

(4)
Persons who interpret for family members and do not receive compensation for
this interpretation;

(5)
Residents of this state with current certification by the national association
of the deaf or the registry of interpreters for the deaf who interpret for
twenty or fewer days in any year;

(6)
Persons who interpret in public schools, except as provided under section 109
of this act;

(7)
Persons who are interns or students in training who are:

(a)
Enrolled in a program of study in interpreting at a recognized program of
interpreter training or who have graduated from a recognized program of
interpreter training within the previous two years;

(b)
Interpreting under the supervision of a licensed interpreter as part of a
supervised program of study; or

(c)
Otherwise identified as interpreter interns or students in training.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. BOARD
OF INTERPRETERS FOR THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING. (1) The Washington board of
interpreters for the deaf and hard of hearing is created, consisting of ten
members as follows:

(a)
The president of the Washington state association of the deaf or the
president's designee;

(b)
The director of the office of deaf and hard of hearing of the department of
social and health services or the director's designee;

(c)
A representative from the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
appointed by the superintendent of public instruction;

(d)
A consumer of interpreting services appointed by the secretary of the
department of social and health services; and

(e)
One representative appointed by each of the following groups:

(i)
The Washington state association of the deaf, interpreters chapter;

(ii)
The Washington state registry of interpreters for the deaf;

(iii)
The American sign language teachers association;

(iv)
The Washington school for the deaf;

(v)
The Washington deaf and blind citizens; and

(vi)
Self-help for the hard of hearing.

(2)
If one of these groups fails to appoint a person, the board shall select a
person from that group to represent the group. Board members shall serve
staggered three-year terms of office, except that the director shall determine
the staggering of terms by determining three initial members who have a
one-year term of office and three initial members who have two-year terms of
office, with the remaining three initial members having three-year terms of
office. If a vacancy arises, a person must be appointed by the appropriate
appointing authority to fill the remainder of the unexpired term of office.

(3)
The members of the board shall not receive compensation for their services on
the board. Members shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred
in the performance of their duties by, and the board shall receive
administrative services and staff support from, the office of deaf and hard of
hearing of the department of social and health services. Members of the board
are immune, collectively and individually, from suit in any action, criminal or
civil, based upon any official acts performed in the course of their duties
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106.
AUTHORITY OF THE DIRECTOR. The director shall:

(1)
In consultation with the board, adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to carry
out the provisions of this chapter, including qualifications required for a
person to be licensed as an interpreter;

(2)
Determine what education programs are equivalent to a deaf interpretation
program from a community or technical college in this state;

(3)
Establish a professional code of ethics for interpreters that is consistent
with the code of professional ethics for both the national association of the
deaf and the registry of interpreters for the deaf;

(4)
Issue licenses for interpreters, including the authority to issue licenses to
persons who hold licenses from other states with substantially equivalent
licensing standards as this state, with the normal authority that the director
possesses to regulate other licensed professions, including authorities
authorized under chapters 18.118 and 43.24 RCW;

(5)
Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter; and

(6)
Provide necessary clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as
needed to implement this chapter apart from the staffing and administrative
support for the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107.
RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE BOARD. The board shall advise the director and provide
the director with ongoing reviews of professional development and support
systems for interpreters, including a review of:

(1)
Existing public and private education programs and training resources for
interpretation that are provided in this state;

(2)
The current number of licensed interpreters; and

(3)
Areas of interpreter shortage based upon geographic areas and types of
interpreting, such as mental health, education, and ethnic diversity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108.
REVOKING OR SUSPENDING LICENSES. The director, in consultation with the board,
shall establish a system to suspend or revoke licenses issued under this
chapter and take other disciplinary action in the form of imposing a fine not
to exceed five hundred dollars for each offense, if a licensee is found to be
guilty of: (1) Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or
concealment; or (2) violating any of the provisions of this chapter, including
any rules adopted by the director to implement this chapter. A proceeding to
suspend or revoke a license, or take disciplinary action, must be initiated on
the motion of the director or a deputy appointed by the director. The director
or a deputy may preliminarily investigate a licensee on his or her own motion
or may investigate a licensee in response to a written complaint requesting
suspension or revocation, or the taking of disciplinary action, that is signed
and verified by a person or persons familiar with the facts. After the preliminary
investigation, the director or a deputy may initiate a formal proceeding for
the suspension or revocation of a license, or taking of disciplinary action,
before an administrative law judge of the office of administrative hearings.
The license must be suspended or revoked, or the disciplinary action taken, if,
by a preponderance of evidence, the administrative law judge determines that
the licensee does not meet the requirements necessary to be licensed as an
interpreter under this chapter or has violated the provisions of this chapter,
including any rules adopted by the director to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109.
EDUCATIONAL INTERPRETERS. Educational interpreters employed in, by, or for a
public school must have successfully completed a thirty-hour training course
offered through the office of the superintendent of public instruction.
Commencing in the year 2003, any person newly employed by or for a public
school as an educational interpreter must be a licensed interpreter and must
have completed the educational training offered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. If an educational interpreter for a
public school has been employed in that capacity for four or more years prior
to January 1, 2003, with satisfactory evaluations and without a period of more
than six months between employment in the public school, the employee may be
retained by the public school as an educational interpreter without meeting
these standards. If a public school is unable to find a licensed interpreter,
the public school may request a nonrenewable one-year waiver from the office of
the superintendent of public instruction and must demonstrate that efforts have
been made to seek an appropriately qualified person. The department shall
annually provide a list of licensed interpreters to the superintendent of
public instruction and shall make that list available upon request. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall send a list of all licensed
interpreters who have successfully completed the training to each school
district every year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110.
VIOLATIONS. Violation of or aiding in violation of any part of section 102 of
this act constitutes a class 1 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW.

PART II - INTERPRETERS IN
JUDICIAL OR ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS

Sec.
201. RCW
2.42.010 and 1989 c 358 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to secure the constitutional
rights of deaf persons and of other persons who, because of impairment of
hearing or speech, are unable to readily understand or communicate the spoken
English language, and who consequently cannot be fully protected in legal
proceedings unless ((qualified)) licensed interpreters are
available to assist them.

It is the intent of the legislature in the passage of this chapter
to provide for the appointment of ((such)) licensed interpreters.

Sec.
202. RCW
2.42.050 and 1989 c 358 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Every ((qualified)) licensed interpreter, or other
person, appointed under this chapter in a judicial or administrative
proceeding shall, before beginning to interpret, take an oath that a true
interpretation will be made to the person being examined of all the proceedings
in a manner which the person understands, and that the interpreter will repeat
the statements of the person being examined to the court or other agency
conducting the proceedings, to the best of the interpreter's skill and
judgment.

Sec.
203. RCW
2.42.110 and 1991 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
(("Impaired person" means a person who, because of a hearing or
speech impairment, cannot readily understand or communicate in spoken language;
and includes persons who are deaf, deaf and blind, speech impaired, or hard of
hearing.

(2)
"Qualified interpreter" means a visual language interpreter who is
certified by the state or is certified by the registry of interpreters for the
deaf to hold the comprehensive skills certificate or both certificates of
interpretation and transliteration, or an interpreter who can readily translate
statements of speech impaired persons into spoken language.

(3))) "Licensed
interpreter" or "licensed interpreter for the hearing impaired"
means a person licensed to engage in interpreting under chapter 18.-- RCW
(sections 101 through 110 of this act), but the exclusions from the requirements
of those provisions that are contained in chapter 18.-- RCW (sections 101
through 110 of this act) do not apply to this chapter unless expressly
permitted under the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
"Intermediary interpreter" means a hearing impaired interpreter who
holds a reverse skills certificate by the state or is certified by the registry
of interpreters for the deaf with a reverse skills certificate, who meets the
requirements of RCW 2.42.130, and who is able to assist in providing an
accurate interpretation between spoken and sign language or between variants of
sign language by acting as an intermediary between a hearing impaired person
and a ((qualified)) licensed hearing interpreter.

(((4)))
(3) "Appointing authority" means the presiding officer or
similar official of any court, department, board, commission, agency, licensing
authority, or legislative body of the state or of any political subdivision.

Sec.
204. RCW
2.42.120 and 1985 c 389 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a hearing impaired person is a party or witness at any stage of a judicial
or quasi-judicial proceeding in the state or in a political subdivision,
including but not limited to civil and criminal court proceedings, grand jury
proceedings, proceedings before a magistrate, juvenile proceedings, adoption
proceedings, mental health commitment proceedings, and any proceeding in which
a hearing impaired person may be subject to confinement or criminal sanction,
the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter to interpret the proceedings.

(2)
If the parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile brought before a court is
hearing impaired, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter to interpret the proceedings.

(3)
If a hearing impaired person participates in a program or activity ordered by a
court as part of the sentence or order of disposition, required as part of a
diversion agreement or deferred prosecution program, or required as a condition
of probation or parole, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter to interpret exchange of information during the
program or activity.

(4)
If a law enforcement agency conducts a criminal investigation involving the
interviewing of a hearing impaired person, whether as a victim, witness, or
suspect, the appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter throughout the investigation. Whenever a law
enforcement agency conducts a criminal investigation involving the interviewing
of a minor child whose parent, guardian, or custodian is hearing impaired,
whether as a victim, witness, or suspect, the appointing authority shall
appoint and pay for a ((qualified)) licensed interpreter
throughout the investigation. ((No)) An employee of the law
enforcement agency who has responsibilities other than interpreting may not
be appointed as the ((qualified)) licensed interpreter.

(5)
If a hearing impaired person is arrested for an alleged violation of a criminal
law the arresting officer or the officer's supervisor shall, at the earliest
possible time, procure and arrange payment for a ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter for any notification of rights, warning, interrogation, or taking
of a statement. ((No)) An employee of the law enforcement agency
who has responsibilities other than interpreting may not be appointed as
the ((qualified)) licensed interpreter.

(6)
Where it is the policy and practice of a court of this state or of a political
subdivision to appoint and pay counsel for persons who are indigent, the
appointing authority shall appoint and pay for a ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter for hearing impaired persons to facilitate communication with
counsel in all phases of the preparation and presentation of the case.

Sec.
205. RCW
2.42.130 and 1991 c 171 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a ((qualified)) licensed interpreter for a hearing impaired
person is required, the appointing authority shall request a ((qualified
interpreter and/or an intermediary)) licensed interpreter through
the department of social and health services, office of deaf services, or
through any community center for hearing impaired persons which operates an
interpreter referral service. The office of deaf services and these community
centers shall maintain an up-to-date list or lists of licensed
interpreters ((that are certified by the state and/or by the registry of
interpreters for the deaf)).

(2)
The appointing authority shall make a preliminary determination, on the basis
of testimony or stated needs of the hearing impaired person, that the licensed
interpreter is able in that particular proceeding, program, or activity to
interpret accurately all communication to and from the hearing impaired
person. If at any time during the proceeding, program, or activity, in the
opinion of the hearing impaired person or a qualified observer, the licensed
interpreter does not provide accurate, impartial, and effective communication
with the hearing impaired person the appointing authority shall appoint another
((qualified)) licensed interpreter. ((No otherwise qualified))
A licensed interpreter who is a relative of any participant in the
proceeding may not be appointed.

Sec.
206. RCW
2.42.140 and 1985 c 389 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the communication mode or language of the hearing impaired person is not
readily interpretable, the interpreter or hearing impaired person shall notify
the appointing authority who shall appoint and pay an intermediary interpreter
to assist the ((qualified)) licensed interpreter.

Sec.
207. RCW
2.42.150 and 1985 c 389 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The right to a ((qualified)) licensed interpreter may not be
waived except when:

(a)
A hearing impaired person requests a waiver through the use of a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter;

(b)
The counsel, if any, of the hearing impaired person consents; and

(c)
The appointing authority determines that the waiver has been made knowingly,
voluntarily, and intelligently.

(2)
Waiver of a ((qualified)) licensed interpreter shall not preclude
the hearing impaired person from claiming his or her right to a ((qualified))
licensed interpreter at a later time during the proceeding, program, or
activity.

Sec.
208. RCW
2.42.160 and 1991 c 171 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A ((qualified)) licensed and/or intermediary interpreter shall
not, without the written consent of the parties to the communication, be
examined as to any communication the interpreter interprets under circumstances
where the communication is privileged by law.

(2)
A ((qualified)) licensed and/or intermediary interpreter shall
not, without the written consent of the parties to the communication, be
examined as to any information the interpreter obtains while interpreting
pertaining to any proceeding then pending.

Sec.
209. RCW
2.42.170 and 1991 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
((qualified)) licensed and/or intermediary interpreter appointed
under this chapter is entitled to a reasonable fee for services, including
waiting time and reimbursement for actual necessary travel expenses. The fee
for services for interpreters for hearing impaired persons shall be in
accordance with standards established by the department of social and health
services, office of deaf services.

Sec.
210. RCW
2.42.180 and 1985 c 389 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

At
the request of any party to the proceeding or on the appointing authority's
initiative, the appointing authority may order that the testimony of the
hearing impaired person and the interpretation of the proceeding by the ((qualified))
licensed interpreter be visually recorded for use in verification of the
official transcript of the proceeding.

In
any judicial proceeding involving a capital offense, the appointing authority
shall order that the testimony of the hearing impaired person and the
interpretation of the proceeding by the ((qualified)) licensed
interpreter be visually recorded for use in verification of the official
transcript of the proceeding.

PART III
- MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. This
act takes effect December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302.
Sections 101 through 110 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 303.
Section captions and part headings used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---