BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 53.06 RCW to read as follows:

Port
districts are authorized to utilize the services of a nonprofit corporation for
the purposes of providing training, education, and general improvement to the
public sector management skills necessary to implement the economic development
programs of port districts. Actions taken under this section must be
implemented pursuant to the powers granted in chapter 39.84 RCW. Any nonprofit
corporation utilized pursuant to this section must be a tax exempt nonprofit
corporation, may be a nonprofit corporation created by the Washington public
ports association, and must be created for the sole purposes of education and
training for port district officials and employees. Port districts are
authorized to transfer to a qualified nonprofit corporation utilized pursuant
to this section any funds received from an industrial development corporation
created by a port district under RCW 39.84.130.

Nothing
in this section shall be construed to prohibit the receipt of additional public
or private funds by a nonprofit corporation established under this section.
The coordination of these programs and the transfers and expenditures of funds
shall be deemed to be for industrial development and trade promotion as
provided for in Article VIII, section 8 of the Washington state Constitution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 39.84 RCW to read as follows:

Funds
received by a port district under RCW 39.84.130 may be transferred to a
nonprofit corporation created or re-created for the exclusive purpose of
providing training, education, and general improvement to the public sector
management skills necessary to implement the economic development programs of
the port district. The nonprofit corporation selected for that purpose may be,
without limitation, a corporation formed by the Washington public ports association.

Any
nonprofit corporation selected for the purposes of this section must have tax
exempt status under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3).

Transfers
and expenditures of funds shall be deemed to be for industrial development and
trade promotion as provided in Article VIII, section 8 of the Washington state
Constitution.

Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the receipt of additional public
or private funds by a nonprofit corporation for the purposes described in this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 53.06 RCW to read as follows:

In
carrying out the purposes described in this and other chapters of this title,
the legislature recognizes that any nonprofit corporation created or re-created
for the purposes of this chapter, is a private nonprofit corporation
contracting to provide services to which port districts may subscribe.

Sec.
4. RCW
53.06.060 and 1995 c 301 s 74 are each amended to read as follows:

The financial records of the Washington public ports association,
and of any nonprofit corporation utilized by port districts under this chapter,
shall be subject to audit by the state auditor to determine compliance with
the contractual terms and conditions under which payments or reimbursements of
public funds are received under this chapter.

---
END ---