BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The joint legislative task force on energy facility siting reform is hereby
created. Membership of the task force shall consist of nine legislators. Five
members from the senate, including three members of the majority party and two
members from the minority party, will be appointed by the president of the
senate. Four members from the house of representatives, including two members
from each party, will be appointed by the co-speakers of the house of
representatives. Each body shall select representatives to the task force from
the committees with jurisdiction over energy, environmental or ecology, and
growth management or siting issues. The chair of the task force shall be
selected by the members of the task force.

(2)
The joint legislative task force on energy facility siting reform is charged
with reviewing the current siting process for energy facilities set forth in
chapter 80.50 RCW for the purpose of recommending statutory changes designed to
modernize the siting process to better respond to the significant regulatory,
environmental, technological, and economic changes affecting energy facility
siting decisions.

(3)
In conducting its review, the task force shall consider and address at least
the following issues:

(a)
The types and sizes of energy facilities regulated by the energy facility site
evaluation council, and recommendations of which types and sizes, if any,
should be sited and regulated by the state via the council or some other model
of state jurisdiction;

(b)
The membership of the council and whether changes to the membership or other
elements of the process would facilitate more effective coordination between
the relevant state and local agencies and more efficient communication and
utilization of expertise within the agencies;

(c)
The processes involved in reviewing and taking action on facility applications,
including recommendations to: (i) Ensure broad and meaningful public
participation; (ii) improve the coordination and reconciliation of the council
process with the review processes required under the state environmental policy
act and the growth management act; (iii) clarify the governor's role in
reviewing council recommendations or make the council decisions final
adjudications subject to direct review by the appropriate court; and (iv)
improve procedures and standards for amending site certification agreements to
address changes in the energy facility or use of all or a portion of the site
for nonenergy-related uses;

(d)
The scope of preemption exercised by the council, including whether and to what
extent the council should have the authority to preempt the proprietary and
regulatory functions of local governments and other state agencies;

(e)
The involvement of local jurisdictions in the council's proceedings, including
recommendations to enhance consistency between the state siting process and
local land use regulations and growth management siting processes;

(f)
The balancing responsibility the council performs with respect to determining
the need for proposed facilities and balancing the demand against the public
interest in protecting the environment, and whether clarification is needed to
ensure consistency with the state energy policy directives enacted subsequent
to the siting requirements;

(g)
The role of the counsel for the environment, and whether that role should be
expanded to include responsibilities for representing the public interest in
protecting public health and safety;

(h)
The adequacy of current funding mechanisms to support the participation of
local jurisdictions, intervenors, and other interested persons in council
proceedings, and recommendations for reducing the costs of participation or
increasing the support for such participation;

(i)
The monitoring and oversight of permitted sites, and recommendations whether
the council should retain sole responsibility for such activities or whether
another agency or agencies would more efficiently monitor and oversee permitted
sites; and

(j)
The location of facilities on public lands, including recommendations
identifying: (i) The appropriate public entity or entities to interpret the
applicable laws governing use of public lands; and (ii) changes to eminent
domain requirements that would allow for more efficient siting of projects that
are found to be in the public interest and are certified for location on public
land.

(4)
The task force shall complete its review and submit its recommendations in the
form of a report to the legislature by December 1, 2000.

(5)
This section expires June 30, 2001.

Sec.
2. RCW
80.50.060 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the construction of energy
facilities which includes the new construction of energy facilities and the
reconstruction or enlargement of existing energy facilities where the net
increase in physical capacity or dimensions resulting from such reconstruction
or enlargement meets or exceeds those capacities or dimensions set forth in RCW
80.50.020 (7) and (((17), as now or hereafter amended)) (14). No
construction of such energy facilities may be undertaken, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter, after July 15, 1977, without first obtaining
certification in the manner provided in this chapter.

(2)
The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to normal maintenance and repairs
which do not increase the capacity or dimensions beyond those set forth in RCW
80.50.020 (7) and (((17), as now or hereafter amended)) (14).

(3)
Applications for certification of energy facilities made ((prior to July 15,
1977 shall continue to be governed by the applicable provisions of law in
effect on the day immediately preceding July 15, 1977 with the exceptions of
RCW 80.50.190 and 80.50.071 which shall apply to such prior applications and to
site certifications prospectively from July 15, 1977)) after January 1,
2000, and prior to August 1, 2001, shall vest to any standards or requirements
in effect on August 1, 2001, or upon the issuance of a certificate by the
council, whichever comes first.

(4)
Applications for certification shall be upon forms prescribed by the council
and shall be supported by such information and technical studies as the council
may require.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 2 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---