BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.390 and 1999 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside the standard
range should be imposed in accordance with RCW 9.94A.120(2), the sentence is
subject to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.210(4).

The
following are illustrative factors which the court may consider in the exercise
of its discretion to impose an exceptional sentence. The following are
illustrative only and are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional
sentences.

(1)
Mitigating Circumstances

(a)
To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing participant,
aggressor, or provoker of the incident.

(b)
Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good faith effort to
compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any damage or injury
sustained.

(c)
The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion
insufficient to constitute a complete defense but which significantly affected
his or her conduct.

(d)
The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was induced by others
to participate in the crime.

(e)
The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct
or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, was
significantly impaired (voluntary use of drugs or alcohol is excluded).

(f)
The offense was principally accomplished by another person and the defendant
manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of
the victim.

(g)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of the purpose of this
chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(h)
The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of
physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a
response to that abuse.

(2)
Aggravating Circumstances

(a)
The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty to the victim.

(b)
The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the current offense
was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to extreme youth,
advanced age, disability, or ill health.

(c)
The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was a law
enforcement officer.

(d)
The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant knew that the
victim of the current offense was pregnant.

(((d)))
(e) The current offense was a major economic offense or series of
offenses, so identified by a consideration of any of the following factors:

(i)
The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;

(ii)
The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss substantially
greater than typical for the offense;

(iii)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time; or

(iv)
The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or fiduciary
responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current offense.

(((e)))
(f) The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to trafficking in controlled
substances, which was more onerous than the typical offense of its statutory
definition: The presence of ANY of the following may identify a current
offense as a major VUCSA:

(i)
The current offense involved at least three separate transactions in which
controlled substances were sold, transferred, or possessed with intent to do
so;

(ii)
The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or transfer of
controlled substances in quantities substantially larger than for personal use;

(iii)
The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled substances for use
by other parties;

(iv)
The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender to have occupied a
high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;

(v)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time or involved a broad geographic area of
disbursement; or

(vi)
The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate the commission of
the current offense, including positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary
responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

(((f)))
(g) The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.127.

(((g)))
(h) The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of the
same victim under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple incidents
over a prolonged period of time.

(((h)))
(i) The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in RCW
10.99.020 and one or more of the following was present:

(i)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or
sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged
period of time;

(ii)
The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's
minor children under the age of eighteen years; or

(iii)
The offender's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.

(((i)))
(j) The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400
results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the
purpose of this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(((j)))
(k) The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored foreign
criminal history results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient
in light of the purpose of this chapter as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(((k)))
(l) The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of rape.

(((l)))
(m) The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was a
youth who was not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant established
or promoted the relationship for the primary purpose of victimization.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.36.031 and 1999 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of assault in the third degree if he or she, under
circumstances not amounting to assault in the first or second degree:

(a)
With intent to prevent or resist the execution of any lawful process or mandate
of any court officer or the lawful apprehension or detention of himself or
another person, assaults another; or

(b)
Assaults a person employed as a transit operator or driver, the immediate
supervisor of a transit operator or driver, a mechanic, or a security officer,
by a public or private transit company or a contracted transit service
provider, while that person is performing his or her official duties at the
time of the assault; or

(c)
Assaults a school bus driver, the immediate supervisor of a driver, a mechanic,
or a security officer, employed by a school district transportation service or
a private company under contract for transportation services with a school
district, while the person is performing his or her official duties at the time
of the assault; or

(d)
With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm to another person by means of a
weapon or other instrument or thing likely to produce bodily harm; or

(e)
Assaults a fire fighter or other employee of a fire department, county fire
marshal's office, county fire prevention bureau, or fire protection district
who was performing his or her official duties at the time of the assault; or

(f)
With criminal negligence, causes bodily harm accompanied by substantial pain
that extends for a period sufficient to cause considerable suffering; or

(g)
Assaults a law enforcement officer or other employee of a law enforcement
agency who was performing his or her official duties at the time of the
assault; or

(h)
Assaults a person knowing the person is a law enforcement officer; or

(i)
Assaults a nurse, physician, or health care provider who was performing his or
her nursing or health care duties at the time of the assault. For purposes of
this subsection: "Nurse" means a person licensed under chapter 18.79
RCW; "physician" means a person licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71
RCW; and "health care provider" means a person certified under
chapter 18.71 or 18.73 RCW who performs emergency medical services or a person
regulated under Title 18 RCW and employed by, or contracting with, a hospital
licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW.

(2)
Assault in the third degree is a class C felony.

Sec.
3. RCW
9A.48.070 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the first degree if he knowingly
and maliciously:

(a)
Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding one
thousand five hundred dollars, except as provided in (b) of this subsection;

(b)
Causes physical damage to the property of another person, knowing the person
is a law enforcement officer, in an amount exceeding two hundred fifty dollars;

(c)
Causes an interruption or impairment of service rendered to the public by
physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or property of the
state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public utility or mode of public
transportation, power, or communication; or

(((c)))
(d) Causes an impairment of the safety, efficiency, or operation of an
aircraft by physically damaging or tampering with the aircraft or aircraft
equipment, fuel, lubricant, or parts.

(2)
Malicious mischief in the first degree is a class B felony.

Sec.
4. RCW
9A.48.080 and 1994 c 261 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of malicious mischief in the second degree if he or she knowingly
and maliciously:

(a)
Causes physical damage to the property of another in an amount exceeding two
hundred fifty dollars((; or

(b))),
except as provided in (b) of this subsection;

(b)
Causes physical damage to the property of another person, knowing the person is
a law enforcement officer, in an amount less than two hundred fifty dollars; or

(c)
Creates a substantial risk of interruption or impairment of service rendered to
the public, by physically damaging or tampering with an emergency vehicle or
property of the state, a political subdivision thereof, or a public utility or
mode of public transportation, power, or communication.

(2) Malicious mischief in the second degree is a class C felony.

---
END ---