BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature declares that if it becomes necessary for significant downsizing in
a state facility, whether for fiscal reasons, obsolescence, or other
extraordinary reasons, the state has a responsibility to provide certain
benefits to affected employees.

It
is the purpose of this chapter to establish an economic impact act for the
state of Washington to meet the emergency situation in existence for state
employees affected by the significant downsizing of state facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Significant downsizing of a state facility" means those state agencies,
or divisions or programs within an agency, specifically designated by the
legislature for a reduction in staffing under section 3 of this act.

(2)
"Affected employees" includes those persons who are members of the
public employees' retirement system performing services for the state on a
salaried or hourly basis including, but not limited to, persons in classified
service as defined in RCW 41.06.020(3) and those persons defined as exempt from
the state civil service laws under RCW 41.06.070 employed by the agencies, or
divisions of agencies, under section 3 of this act on the effective date of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. For
the period ending June 30, 2001, those agencies designated for a reduction in
staffing include:

(1)
The department of transportation, limited to affected employees working in
programs I, P, Q, W, and X; and

(2)
The department of social and health services, limited to affected employees
working within the economic services administration, the developmental
disabilities division of the health and rehabilitative services administration,
and the juvenile rehabilitation administration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. In
order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the state shall take every
reasonable step at its disposal to provide alternative employment and to
minimize the economic loss of state employees affected by the significant
downsizing of a state facility. Affected state employees shall be provided
benefits as specified in this section.

As
an option for leaving state employment an affected employee may elect early
retirement under the following conditions:

(1)
Notwithstanding the age requirements of RCW 41.40.180, any affected employee
under this chapter who is a member of the public employees' retirement system,
plan 1 and has: (a) Attained the age of fifty-five years, and completed five
service credit years of service; (b) completed twenty-five service credit
years; or (c) attained the age of fifty years and completed twenty service
credit years of service is immediately eligible to retire, with no actuarial
reduction in the amount of the member's pension benefit.

(2)
Notwithstanding the age requirements of RCW 41.40.630, any affected employee
under this chapter who is a member of the public employees' retirement system,
plan 2 and has attained the age of fifty-five years, with at least fifteen
years creditable service, is immediately eligible to retire with an actuarial
reduction in the amount of the member's pension benefit of two percent for each
complete year that the employee is under sixty-five years of age.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In
order to assure that the state derives the expected benefits from the early
retirement provisions of this chapter, no state agency may engage through
personal service contracts persons who retire from state service under the
provisions of this chapter. Exceptions to this section may be granted by
written approval from the director of financial management, if the director
finds that the temporary or project employment of a retiree is necessary to
protect the public safety, protect against the loss of federal certification or
loss of critical federal funds, or carry out functions so essential to the
agency that even temporary suspension or delay of services would have a
significant impact on the public. At the end of each three-month period in
which exceptions are approved, the director shall forward a copy of any
approvals, together with justification for the exceptions, to the fiscal
committees of the legislature. Each forwarded approval shall include the name
of the temporary or project employee, the agency and division or department
requesting the employment, duration and cost of the proposed employment, and
specific functions and duties to be carried out during the employment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
order to assure that the state derives the expected benefits from the early
retirement provisions of this chapter, no state agency may hire persons who
retire from state service under the provisions of this chapter as temporary or
project employees, as defined by the state personnel board for employees
covered under chapter 41.06 RCW. Exceptions to this section may be granted by
written approval from the director of financial management, if the director
finds that the temporary or project employment of a retiree is necessary to
protect the public safety, protect against the loss of federal certification or
loss of critical federal funds, or carry out functions so essential to the
agency that even temporary suspension or delay of services would have a significant
impact on the public. At the end of each three-month period in which
exceptions are approved, the director shall forward a copy of any approvals,
together with justification for the exceptions, to the fiscal committees of the
legislature. Each forwarded approval shall include the name of the temporary
or project employee, the agency and division or department requesting the
employment, duration and cost of the proposed employment, and specific
functions and duties to be carried out during the employment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

---
END ---