BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.400.210 and 1997 c 13 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
school district board of directors may, in accordance with chapters 41.56 and
41.59 RCW, establish an attendance incentive program for all certificated and
classified employees in the following manner, including covering persons who
were employed during the 1982‑'83 school year:

(1)
In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of sixty days of
leave for illness or injury is accrued, and each January thereafter, any
eligible employee may exercise an option to receive remuneration for unused
leave for illness or injury accumulated in the previous year at a rate equal to
one day's monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days of
accrued leave for illness or injury in excess of sixty days. Leave for illness
or injury for which compensation has been received shall be deducted from
accrued leave for illness or injury at the rate of four days for every one
day's monetary compensation. No employee may receive compensation under this
section for any portion of leave for illness or injury accumulated at a rate in
excess of one day per month.

(2)
Except as provided in RCW 28A.400.212, at the time of separation from school
district employment ((due to retirement or death)) an eligible employee
or the employee's estate shall receive remuneration at a rate equal to one
day's current monetary compensation of the employee for each four full days
accrued leave for illness or injury. For purposes of this subsection,
"eligible employee" means (a) employees who separate from employment
due to retirement or death; (b) employees who separate from employment and who
are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the
teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40), or under
the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.35.010(31); or (c) employees who separate from employment and who are at
least age fifty-five and have at least fifteen years of service under the
teachers' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(39), under the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2 as defined in RCW
41.35.010(30), or under the public employees' retirement system plan 2 as
defined in RCW 41.40.010(34).

(3)
In lieu of remuneration for unused leave for illness or injury as provided in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a school district board of directors
may, with equivalent funds, provide eligible employees a benefit plan that
provides reimbursement for medical expenses. Any benefit plan adopted after July
28, 1991, shall require, as a condition of participation under the plan, that
the employee sign an agreement with the district to hold the district harmless
should the United States government find that the district or the employee is
in debt to the United States as a result of the employee not paying income
taxes due on the equivalent funds placed into the plan, or as a result of the
district not withholding or deducting any tax, assessment, or other payment on
such funds as required under federal law.

Moneys
or benefits received under this section shall not be included for the purposes
of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement system in this
state.

The
superintendent of public instruction in its administration hereof, shall promulgate
uniform rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section.

Should the legislature revoke any benefits granted under this
section, no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such
benefits as a matter of contractual right.

---
END ---