BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The Washington institute for public policy shall conduct a study of the types
of residential services provided to certain children in the care of the
department of social and health services. The review shall include residential
services provided to children served by the children's administration of the
department of social and health services.

(2)
The study shall determine, for the total children served in residential
settings through the children's administration: The numbers and percentages of
children served in each type of residential setting, including but not limited
to foster care, group care, institutional care, relative placement, and
transitional living services for older teens, and the expenditures and unit
cost for each type of residential setting.

(3)
The study shall describe: The established criteria and process for placement
decisions and the actual process for these decisions, including the extent to
which the best interests of the child are considered.

(4)
The study shall include a review of best practices in other states for
residential placement decision making, including total expenditures and unit
costs, and distribution data as described in subsection (2) of this section.
The study also shall review best practices promoted by national organizations
with expertise in this area of public policy.

(5)
The study shall recommend changes to the current established criteria and
actual processes of residential decision making as described in subsection (3)
of this section, based on the review of best practices in other states, and
practices promoted by national organizations with expertise in this area of
public policy.

(6)
The study shall determine the total expenditures and unit costs of residential
placement services and the percentage distribution for each in Washington state
as compared to the states selected for their best practices. The study shall
review current funding methodologies for residential placement services and
make recommendations for changes if appropriate.

(7)
The study shall determine the total expenditures and unit costs of prevention
services in Washington state as compared to the states selected for their best
practices. The study shall review current funding methodologies for prevention
services and make recommendations for changes if appropriate.

(8)
The Washington institute for public policy shall report the results of the
study to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature by December 1,
2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the Washington institute
for public policy for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---