BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to amounts received from the department of social and
health services for the specific purpose of providing division of developmental
disabilities contracted and certified nonfacility based residential services to
a person with a developmental disability as defined in RCW 71A.10.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---