BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that certain evidence, such as statements, admissions, or
confessions by a defendant, and evidence that flows from such statements,
admissions, or confessions, is necessary for truth and justice to prevail but
that it may be excluded at trial solely because the defendant was provided
inadequate Miranda warnings. The legislature further finds that congress in
1968 enacted a law known as Section 3501 that provides that a failure to issue
Miranda warnings does not require automatic exclusion of evidence in federal
prosecutions and that the failure to give Miranda warnings is just one of
several factors to be considered in deciding whether statements to law
enforcement were made voluntarily.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW to read as follows:

In determining whether or not any statement, admission, or
confession of a defendant was voluntarily made, the presence or absence of any
Miranda warning is not conclusive on the issue of voluntariness but is one of
several factors to be considered in determining the voluntariness of the
defendant's statement, admission, or confession. Only if a court determines
that any statement, admission, or confession of a defendant was, in fact,
objectively and wrongfully coerced and was, therefore, not sufficiently
voluntary, may the court exclude such statement, admission, or confession and
any evidence that directly flows from the statement, admission, or confession,
that cannot be independently established.

---
END ---