BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purpose of paying contributions in tax rate years beginning on or after
January 1, 2000, and for the purpose of paying benefits to claimants with base
years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, the term "wages" does
not include an employee's income from the transfer of shares of stock to the
employee pursuant to his or her exercise of a stock option granted for any
reason connected with his or her employment in a disqualifying disposition
under section 421 of the federal internal revenue code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---