BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1995
c 361 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

Effective
((January 1, 2001)) July 1, 2002, the following acts or parts of
acts are each repealed:

(1) ((Section
1 of this act)) RCW 81.84.005 and 1995 c 361 s 1;

(2) ((Section
2 of this act)) RCW 81.84.007 and 1995 c 361 s 3; and

(3) ((Section
3 of this act)) RCW 81.84.015 and 1995 c 361 s 2.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. As
part of the work of the legislative transportation committee task force on the
utilities and transportation commission, the task force shall review vessel
service conveying persons, excursion classification, and general issues
regarding the distinction of the two classifications. To the greatest degree
possible, the task force shall encourage input from interested or affected
parties, and consider the impact of various regulatory classifications on
tourism and trade.

---
END ---