BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The body tissue, organs, parts, or fluids of a human embryo or fetus shall not
be sold or otherwise transferred for any use or purpose for valuable
consideration.

(2)
The donor or transferor of any body tissue, organs, parts, or fluids of a human
embryo or fetus donated or transferred for any use or purpose shall assume all
direct and indirect costs pertaining to or necessitated by the donation or
transfer.

(3) For purposes of this section, "valuable
consideration" means the payment, exchange, reimbursement, or other
transfer of money, property, services, or any other form of consideration, and
includes actual monetary costs directly or indirectly incurred by any person,
organization, facility, agency, or other entity as a result of any involvement
in providing, inducing, procuring, collecting, referring, arranging,
distributing, or otherwise assisting in the donation or transfer of the body
tissue, organs, parts, or fluids of a human embryo or fetus for any use or
purpose.

---
END ---