BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.06.150 and 1999 c 297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this
chapter, as now or hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1)
The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2)
Certification of names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with
the number of names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be
filled, such names representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists:
PROVIDED, That when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score
among the names certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3)
Examinations for all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4)
Appointments;

(5)
Training and career development;

(6)
Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary
employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry
level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7)
Transfers;

(8)
Sick leaves and vacations;

(9)
Hours of work;

(10)
Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to
seniority;

(11)
Collective bargaining, including:

(a)
Determination of appropriate bargaining units within any agency((:
PROVIDED, That)). In making such determination the board shall
consider the duties, skills, and working conditions of the employees, the
history of collective bargaining by the employees and their bargaining
representatives, the extent of organization among the employees, and the
desires of the employees;

(((12)))
(b) Certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining
representatives((: PROVIDED, That)) subject to the following:

(i)
After certification of an exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's request, the director shall hold an election among employees
in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to require as a
condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive bargaining
representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(ii)
No more often than once in each twelve-month period after expiration of
twelve months following the date of the original election in a bargaining unit
and upon petition of thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the
director shall hold an election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind
such condition of employment((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(iii)
For purposes of this ((clause)) subsection (11)(b),
membership in the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by
the payment of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of
initiation, reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and
complete membership rights((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order));
and

(iv)
To safeguard the right of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona
fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
public employee is a member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for
purposes within the program of the union as designated by such employee that
would be in harmony with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money
equivalent to regular union dues minus any included monthly premiums for
union-sponsored insurance programs, and such employee shall not be a member of
the union but is entitled to all the representation rights of a union member;

(((13)))
(c)(i) Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining
representatives providing for grievance procedures and collective negotiations
on all personnel matters over which the appointing authority of the appropriate
bargaining unit of such agency may lawfully exercise discretion, except that
collective negotiation is not permitted over an agency's decision to purchase
services by contract; and

(((14)))
(ii) Written agreements may contain provisions for payroll deductions of
employee organization dues upon authorization by the employee member and for
the cancellation of such payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior
notice by the employee with the appointing authority and the employee
organization((: PROVIDED, That));

(d)
Nothing contained ((herein)) in this subsection permits or
grants to any employee the right to strike or refuse to perform his or her
official duties;

(((15)))
(12) Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan for
all positions in the classified service, based on investigation and analysis of
the duties and responsibilities of each such position.

(a)
The board shall not adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless
implementation of the proposed revision or study will result in net cost
savings, increased efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or
services, and the proposed revision or study has been approved by the director
of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b)
Beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the requirements
of (a) of this subsection:

(i)
The board may approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only
if:

(A)
The implementation will not result in additional net costs and the proposed
implementation has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B)
The implementation will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of
all such actions approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature
specifically for this purpose; or

(C)
The implementation is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are
defined as emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions
necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general
welfare, which do not exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section
718(2), chapter 18, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii)
The board shall approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments
to the classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and
retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii)
Adjustments made to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt
from (b)(i) through (ii) of this subsection.

(c)
Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented
during the 1997-99 and subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this
subsection and RCW 41.06.152;

(((16)))
(13) Allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification
plan;

(((17)))
(14) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the
prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental
units but the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if
necessary to attain comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW
41.06.155 and that, for institutions of higher education and related boards,
shall be competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the
locality in which an institution of higher education or related board is
located, such adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of
financial management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(((18)))
(15) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade
based on length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are
such as to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(((19)))
(16) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director,
whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in
accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must
provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person
receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the
state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good
cause as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the
employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation
from the person;

(((20)))
(17) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent
reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible
veterans and their surviving spouses additional credit in computing their
seniority by adding to their unbroken state service, as defined by the board,
the veteran's service in the military not to exceed five years. For the
purposes of this section, "veteran" means any person who has one or
more years of active military service in any branch of the armed forces of the
United States or who has less than one year's service and is discharged with a
disability incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of
the government and who, upon termination of such service has received an
honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record,
or a release from active military service with evidence of service other than
that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be
given: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled
to the benefits of this section regardless of the veteran's length of active
military service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section
"veteran" does not include any person who has voluntarily retired
with twenty or more years of active military service and whose military
retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month;

(((21)))
(18) Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint,
reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if such
agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to so delegate:
PROVIDED, That the board may not authorize such delegation to any position
lower than the head of a major subdivision of the agency;

(((22)))
(19) Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified
positions before July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment,
transfer, and promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this
chapter;

(((23)))
(20) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer,
recruitment, training, and career development; development and implementation
of affirmative action goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against
those goals and timetables.

The
board shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of
rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department of personnel shall
transmit a report annually to the human rights commission which states the
progress each state agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and
timetables.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter does not prohibit any agency, as defined in RCW 41.06.020, or
institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or related
board, from purchasing services, including services that have been customarily
and historically provided by employees in the classified service under this
chapter, by contracting with individuals, nonprofit organizations, businesses,
or other entities.

(2)(a)
At least ninety days before the date an agency or institution of higher
education requests bids for a contract to purchase services being provided by
classified employees, the agency or institution must notify an exclusive
bargaining representative who represents any employee whose employment status
will be directly affected by the contract. The exclusive bargaining
representative shall have sixty days from the date of notification to offer
alternatives to the proposed contract and such alternatives must be considered
by the agency or institution of higher education in making the final decision
to contract for services.

(b)
This subsection does not apply to the purchase of services or to any
contracting for services that was authorized by law before the effective date
of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
39.29.006 and 1998 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive and
judicial branches of state government, including state agencies, departments,
offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and educational, correctional, and
other types of institutions.

(2)
"Client services" means services provided directly to agency clients
including, but not limited to, medical and dental services, employment and
training programs, residential care, and subsidized housing.

(3)
"Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified parties and culminating in
a selection based on criteria which may include such factors as the
consultant's fees or costs, ability, capacity, experience, reputation,
responsiveness to time limitations, responsiveness to solicitation
requirements, quality of previous performance, and compliance with statutes and
rules relating to contracts or services.

(4)
"Consultant" means an independent individual or firm contracting with
an agency to perform a service or render an opinion or recommendation according
to the consultant's methods and without being subject to the control of the
agency except as to the result of the work. The agency monitors progress under
the contract and authorizes payment.

(5)
"Emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the
control of the agency that either:

(a)
Present a real, immediate threat to the proper performance of essential
functions; or

(b)
May result in material loss or damage to property, bodily injury, or loss of
life if immediate action is not taken.

(6)
"Evidence of competition" means documentation demonstrating that the
agency has solicited responses from multiple firms in selecting a consultant.

(7)
"Personal service" means professional or technical expertise provided
by a consultant to accomplish a specific study, project, task, or other work
statement. This term does not include purchased services as defined under
subsection (9) of this section. This term does include client services.

(8)
"Personal service contract" means an agreement, or any amendment
thereto, with a consultant for the rendering of personal services to the state
which is consistent with ((RCW 41.06.380)) section 2 of this act.

(9)
"Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing and necessary functions. This term includes,
but is not limited to, services acquired under RCW 43.19.190 or 43.105.041 for
equipment maintenance and repair; operation of a physical plant; security;
computer hardware and software maintenance; data entry; key punch services; and
computer time-sharing, contract programming, and analysis.

(10)
"Sole source" means a consultant providing professional or technical
expertise of such a unique nature that the consultant is clearly and
justifiably the only practicable source to provide the service. The
justification shall be based on either the uniqueness of the service or sole
availability at the location required.

Sec.
4. RCW
47.46.040 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All projects designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must
comply with all applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the
agreement is executed, including but not limited to the following provisions:
Chapter 39.12 RCW, this title, ((RCW 41.06.380)) section 2 of this
act, chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW 49.60.180, and 49 C.F.R. Part 21.

(2)
The secretary or a designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other
experts within and outside state government in the negotiation and development
of the agreements.

(3)
Agreements shall provide for private ownership of the projects during the
construction period. After completion and final acceptance of each project or
discrete segment thereof, the agreement shall provide for state ownership of
the transportation systems and facilities and lease to the private entity
unless the state elects to provide for ownership of the facility by the private
entity during the term of the agreement.

The
state shall lease each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project
segments, to the private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4)
The department may exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the
development, construction, financing operation, and maintenance of
transportation projects under this chapter. Agreements for maintenance
services entered into under this section shall provide for full reimbursement
for services rendered by the department or other state agencies. Agreements
for police services for projects, involving state highway routes, developed
under agreements shall be entered into with the Washington state patrol. The agreement
for police services shall provide that the state patrol will be reimbursed for
costs on a comparable basis with the costs incurred for comparable service on
other state highway routes. The department may provide services for which it
is reimbursed, including but not limited to preliminary planning, environmental
certification, and preliminary design of the demonstration projects.

(5)
The plans and specifications for each project constructed under this section
shall comply with the department's standards for state projects. A facility
constructed by and leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the
state highway system for purposes of identification, maintenance, and
enforcement of traffic laws and for the purposes of applicable sections of this
title. Upon reversion of the facility to the state, the project must meet all
applicable state standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for
reconstruction or renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet
all applicable state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6)
For the purpose of facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity
in the financing, development, construction, and operation of the
transportation systems and facilities, the agreements may include provisions
for the department to exercise its authority, including the lease of
facilities, rights of way, and airspace, exercise of the power of eminent
domain, granting of development rights and opportunities, granting of necessary
easements and rights of access, issuance of permits and other authorizations,
protection from competition, remedies in the event of default of either of the
parties, granting of contractual and real property rights, liability during
construction and the term of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of
rights of way in excess of appraised value, and any other provision deemed
necessary by the secretary.

(7)
The agreements entered into under this section may include provisions
authorizing the state to grant necessary easements and lease to a private
entity existing rights of way or rights of way subsequently acquired with
public or private financing. The agreements may also include provisions to
lease to the entity airspace above or below the right of way associated or to
be associated with the private entity's transportation facility. In
consideration for the reversion rights in these privately constructed
facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the lease of airspace
rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to exceed fifty
years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department continues to
lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so only at fair
market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity the right of
first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by the state in
the vicinity of the public-private project.

(8)
Agreements under this section may include any contractual provision that is
necessary to protect the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred
to study, plan, design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce
laws, and maintain toll highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not
unreasonably inhibit or prohibit the development of additional public
transportation systems and facilities. Agreements under this section must
secure and maintain liability insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to
protect the project's viability and may address state indemnification of the
private entity for design and construction liability where the state has
approved relevant design and construction plans.

(9)
Agreements shall include a process that provides for public involvement in
decision making with respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a)
In carrying out the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of
this section, the private entity shall proactively seek public participation
through a process appropriate to the characteristics of the project that
assesses and demonstrates public support among: Users of the project,
residents of communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of
communities impacted by the project.

(b)
The private entity shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process
that provides, periodically throughout the development and implementation of
the project, users and residents of communities in the affected project area an
opportunity to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not
limited to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi)
tolling or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project
cost; (viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other
salient characteristics.

(c)
If the affected project area has not been defined, the private entity shall
define the affected project area by conducting, at a minimum: (i) A comparison
of the estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the
project and in other communities impacted by the project who could be subject
to tolls or user fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient
traffic that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the
anticipated traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential
economic impact resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on
residents, commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the
vicinity of and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic
impact of tolls or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and
(v) an analysis of the relationship of the project to state transportation
needs and benefits.

The
agreement may require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the
affected project area.

(d)
In seeking public participation, the private entity shall establish a local
involvement committee or committees comprised of residents of the affected
project area, individuals who represent cities and counties in the affected
project area, organizations formed to support or oppose the project, if such
organizations exist, and users of the project. The private entity shall, at a
minimum, establish a committee as required under the specifications of RCW
47.46.030(((5)(b) (ii) and (iii))) (6)(b) (ii) and (iii) and
appointments to such committee shall be made no later than thirty days after
the project area is defined.

(e)
Local involvement committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the
department and the private entity on all issues related to the development and
implementation of the public involvement process established under this
section.

(f)
The department and the private entity shall provide the legislative
transportation committee and local involvement committees with progress reports
on the status of the public involvement process including the results of an
advisory vote, if any occurs.

(11)
Nothing in this chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents
to render such advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in
the best interests of the state and the public.

Sec.
5. RCW
72.09.100 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the power to provide
for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove statutory and other
restrictions which have limited work programs in the past. For purposes of
establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the
department consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:

(1)
CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class
shall be operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

The
customer model industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the
department to provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with
products or services currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign
suppliers. The correctional industries board of directors shall review these
proposed industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The
department of corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody
services without charge to the participating firms.

Inmates
who work in free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They
shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature
in the locality in which the industry is located, as determined by the director
of correctional industries. If the director cannot reasonably determine the
comparable wage, then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

An
inmate who is employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall
not be eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2)
CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The
industries selected for development within this class shall, as much as
possible, match the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the
work opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely
patterned after private sector industries but with the objective of reducing
public support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services of
this industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will be
ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing
manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit
organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
Correctional industries products and services shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct
a yearly marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of
the proposed products and services on the Washington state business community.
To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no
public sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private persons,
at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and
animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to
private persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by
the secretary.

Security
and custody services shall be provided without charge by the department of
corrections.

Inmates
working in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
be paid for their work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid
for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located
and which is approved by the director of correctional industries.

Subject
to approval of the correctional industries board, provisions of ((RCW
41.06.380 prohibiting contracting out work performed by classified employees))
section 2(2)(a) of this act shall not apply to contracts with Washington
state businesses entered into by the department of corrections through class II
industries.

(3)
CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall
be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and
managed to accomplish the following objectives:

(a)
Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and experience so that the
inmate will be able to qualify for better work both within correctional
industries and the free community. It is not intended that an inmate's work within
this class of industries should be his or her final and total work experience
as an inmate.

(b)
Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c)
Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All
able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in
other classes of industries shall work in this class.

Except
for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be
paid for their work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale
shall be adopted by the secretary of corrections.

(4)
CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed
to provide services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or
infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.

Inmates
in this program shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or
licensed by the department of corrections. A unit of local government shall
provide work supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the
inmate's wage.

The
department of corrections shall reimburse participating units of local
government for liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates
who work in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar
nature in the locality in which the industry is located.

(5)
CLASS V: COMMUNITY SERVICE PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall be subject
to supervision by the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of
industries is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off
all or part of a community service order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment
shall be in a community service program operated by the state, local units of
government, or a nonprofit agency.

To the extent that funds are specifically made available for such purposes,
the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers
compensation insurance costs.

Sec.
6. RCW
72.10.030 and 1989 c 157 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the secretary may enter into
contracts with health care practitioners, health care facilities, and other
entities or agents as may be necessary to provide basic medical care to
inmates. ((The contracts shall not cause the termination of classified
employees of the department rendering the services at the time the contract is
executed.))

(2)
In contracting for services, the secretary is authorized to provide for
indemnification of health care practitioners who cannot obtain professional liability
insurance through reasonable effort, from liability on any action, claim, or
proceeding instituted against them arising out of the good faith performance or
failure of performance of services on behalf of the department. The contracts
may provide that for the purposes of chapter 4.92 RCW only, those health care
practitioners with whom the department has contracted shall be considered state
employees.

Sec.
7. RCW
82.01.070 and 1997 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall have charge and general supervision of the department of
revenue. The director shall appoint an assistant director for administration,
hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the assistant
director, and subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW may appoint and
employ such clerical, technical and other personnel as may be necessary to
carry out the powers and duties of the department. The director may also enter
into personal service contracts with ((out-of-state)) individuals or
business entities for the performance of auditing services ((outside the
state of Washington when normal efforts to recruit classified employees are
unsuccessful)). The director may agree to pay to the department's
employees or contractors who reside out of state such amounts in addition to
their ordinary rate of compensation as are necessary to defray the extra costs
of facilities, living, and other costs reasonably related to the out-of-state
services, subject to legislative appropriation for those purposes. The special
allowances shall be in such amounts or at such rates as are approved by the
office of financial management. This section does not apply to audit functions
performed in states contiguous to the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
41.06.380 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2; and

(2) RCW
41.06.382 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Provisions of a collective bargaining agreement adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW
that are in effect on the effective date of this act and that conflict with
section 1 or 2 of this act shall continue in effect until contract expiration,
unless a superseding agreement resolving the conflict is executed by the
parties before expiration; after expiration, any new agreement executed between
the parties must be consistent with sections 1 and 2 of this act.

---
END ---