BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.55.060 and 1989 c 111 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The address that the tow truck operator lists on his or her application shall
be the business location of the firm where its files are kept. Each separate
business location requires a separate registration under this chapter. The
application shall also list all locations of secure areas for vehicle storage
and redemption.

(2)
Before an additional lot may be used for vehicle storage, it must be inspected
and approved by the state patrol. The lot must also be inspected and approved
on an annual basis for continued use.

(3)
Each business location must have a sign displaying the firm's name that is
readable from the street.

(4)
At the business locations listed where vehicles may be redeemed, the registered
operator shall post in a conspicuous and accessible location:

(a)
All pertinent licenses and permits to operate as a registered tow truck
operator;

(b)
The current towing and storage charges itemized on a form approved by the
department;

(c)
The vehicle redemption procedure and rights;

(d)
Information supplied by the department as to where complaints regarding either
equipment or service are to be directed;

(e)
Information concerning the acceptance of commercially reasonable tender as
defined in RCW 46.55.120(1)(((b))) (e).

(5)
The department shall adopt rules concerning fencing and security requirements
of storage areas, which may provide for modifications or exemptions where
needed to achieve compliance with local zoning laws.

(6)
On any day when the registered tow truck operator holds the towing services
open for business, the business office shall remain open with personnel present
who are able to release impounded vehicles in accordance with this chapter and
the rules adopted under it. The normal business hours of a towing service shall
be from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. on weekdays, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays.

(7)
A registered tow truck operator shall maintain personnel who can be contacted
twenty-four hours a day to release impounded vehicles within a reasonable time.

(8)
A registered operator shall provide access to a telephone for any person
redeeming a vehicle, at the time of redemption.

(9)
The business location established under this section serves as the business
location of the registered tow truck operator for all purposes, including
business licensure by counties, cities, towns, and all other political
subdivisions. Registered tow truck operators may be required to have a
business license for each separate business location, but they are exempt from
business licensure by a political subdivision based solely upon the operator
picking up or delivering a vehicle in the political subdivision.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.55.130 and 1998 c 203 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If, after the expiration of fifteen days from the date of mailing of notice of
custody and sale required in RCW 46.55.110(((2))) (3) to the registered
and legal owners, the vehicle remains unclaimed and has not been listed as a
stolen vehicle, or for which a suspended license impound has been directed
but no security paid under RCW 46.55.120, then the registered tow truck
operator having custody of the vehicle shall conduct a sale of the vehicle at
public auction after having first published a notice of the date, place, and
time of the auction in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the vehicle is located not less than three days and no more than ten days
before the date of the auction. The notice shall contain a description of the
vehicle including the make, model, year, and license number and a notification
that a three-hour public viewing period will be available before the auction.
The auction shall be held during daylight hours of a normal business day.

(2)
The following procedures are required in any public auction of such abandoned
vehicles:

(a)
The auction shall be held in such a manner that all persons present are given
an equal time and opportunity to bid;

(b)
All bidders must be present at the time of auction unless they have submitted
to the registered tow truck operator, who may or may not choose to use the
preauction bid method, a written bid on a specific vehicle. Written bids may
be submitted up to five days before the auction and shall clearly state which
vehicle is being bid upon, the amount of the bid, and who is submitting the
bid;

(c)
The open bid process, including all written bids, shall be used so that
everyone knows the dollar value that must be exceeded;

(d)
The highest two bids received shall be recorded in written form and shall
include the name, address, and telephone number of each such bidder;

(e)
In case the high bidder defaults, the next bidder has the right to purchase the
vehicle for the amount of his or her bid;

(f)
The successful bidder shall apply for title within fifteen days;

(g)
The registered tow truck operator shall post a copy of the auction procedure at
the bidding site. If the bidding site is different from the licensed office
location, the operator shall post a clearly visible sign at the office location
that describes in detail where the auction will be held. At the bidding site a
copy of the newspaper advertisement that lists the vehicles for sale shall be
posted;

(h)
All surplus moneys derived from the auction after satisfaction of the
registered tow truck operator's lien shall be remitted within thirty days to
the department for deposit in the state motor vehicle fund. A report
identifying the vehicles resulting in any surplus shall accompany the remitted
funds. If the director subsequently receives a valid claim from the registered
vehicle owner of record as determined by the department within one year from
the date of the auction, the surplus moneys shall be remitted to such owner;

(i)
If an operator receives no bid, or if the operator is the successful bidder at
auction, the operator shall, within forty-five days sell the vehicle to a
licensed vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap processor by use of the
abandoned vehicle report-affidavit of sale, or the operator shall apply for
title to the vehicle.

(3)
In no case may an operator hold a vehicle for longer than ninety days without
holding an auction on the vehicle, except for vehicles that are under a police
or judicial hold.

(4)(a)
In no case may the accumulation of storage charges exceed fifteen days from the
date of receipt of the information by the operator from the department as
provided by RCW 46.55.110(((2))) (3).

(b)
The failure of the registered tow truck operator to comply with the time limits
provided in this chapter limits the accumulation of storage charges to five
days except where delay is unavoidable. Providing incorrect or incomplete
identifying information to the department in the abandoned vehicle report shall
be considered a failure to comply with these time limits if correct information
is available. However, storage charges begin to accrue again on the date
the correct and complete information is provided to the department by the
registered tow truck operator.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.61.570 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic, or in compliance
with law or the directions of a police officer or official traffic control
device, no person shall:

(a)
Stop, stand, or park a vehicle:

(i)
On the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a
street;

(ii)
On a sidewalk or street planting strip;

(iii)
Within an intersection;

(iv)
On a crosswalk;

(v)
Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within thirty feet of points on
the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless official signs
or markings indicate a different no-parking area opposite the ends of a safety
zone;

(vi)
Alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping,
standing, or parking would obstruct traffic;

(vii)
Upon any bridge or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway
tunnel;

(viii)
On any railroad tracks;

(ix)
In the area between roadways of a divided highway including crossovers; or

(x)
At any place where official signs prohibit stopping.

(b)
Stand or park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except momentarily to pick up
or discharge a passenger or passengers:

(i)
In front of a public or private driveway or within five feet of the end of the
curb radius leading thereto;

(ii)
Within fifteen feet of a fire hydrant;

(iii)
Within twenty feet of a crosswalk;

(iv)
Within thirty feet upon the approach to any flashing signal, stop sign, yield
sign, or traffic control signal located at the side of a roadway;

(v)
Within twenty feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side
of a street opposite the entrance to any fire station within seventy-five feet
of said entrance when properly signposted; or

(vi)
At any place where official signs prohibit standing.

(c)
Park a vehicle, whether occupied or not, except temporarily for the purpose of
and while actually engaged in loading or unloading property or passengers:

(i)
Within fifty feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing; or

(ii)
At any place where official signs prohibit parking.

(2)
Parking or standing shall be permitted in the manner provided by law at all
other places except a time limit may be imposed or parking restricted at other
places but such limitation and restriction shall be by city ordinance or county
resolution or order of the secretary of transportation upon highways under
their respective jurisdictions.

(3)
No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under his or her control into any
such prohibited area or away from a curb such a distance as is unlawful.

(4)
It shall be unlawful for any person to reserve or attempt to reserve any
portion of a highway for the purpose of stopping, standing, or parking to the
exclusion of any other like person, nor shall any person be granted such right.

(5) This section does not apply to a registered tow truck
operator engaged in the recovery or removal of an abandoned or disabled
vehicle, or performing emergency service on a vehicle, when the stopping,
standing, or parking is reasonably necessary and for only a time as is
reasonably necessary.

---
END ---