BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.020 and 1994 c 124 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following real and personal property shall be exempt from taxation:

(1)
All lands, buildings, and personal property required for necessary
administration and maintenance, used, or to the extent used, exclusively for
public burying grounds or cemeteries without discrimination as to race, color,
national origin or ancestry;

(2)
All churches, personal property, and the ground((, not exceeding five acres
in area,)) upon which a church of any nonprofit recognized religious
denomination is or shall be built, together with a parsonage, convent, and
buildings and improvements required for the maintenance and safeguarding of
such property. The area exempted shall in any case include all ground covered
by the church, parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for
the maintenance and safeguarding of such property and the structures and ground
necessary for street access, parking, light, and ventilation((, but the area
of unoccupied ground exempted in such cases, in connection with church,
parsonage, convent, and buildings and improvements required for the maintenance
and safeguarding of such property, shall not exceed the equivalent of one
hundred twenty by one hundred twenty feet except where additional unoccupied
land may be required to conform with state or local codes, zoning, or licensing
requirements)). The parsonage and convent need not be on land contiguous
to the church property. To be exempt the property must be wholly used for
church purposes: PROVIDED, That the loan or rental of property otherwise
exempt under this ((paragraph)) subsection to a nonprofit
organization, association, or corporation, or school for use for an
eleemosynary activity shall not nullify the exemption provided in this ((paragraph))
subsection if the rental income, if any, is reasonable and is devoted
solely to the operation and maintenance of the property.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.805 and 1999 c 203 s 2 and 1999 c 139 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
In order to qualify for an exemption under this chapter and RCW 84.36.560, the
nonprofit organizations, associations, or corporations must satisfy the
conditions in this section.

(2)
The property must be used exclusively for the actual operation of the activity
for which exemption is granted, unless otherwise provided, and does not exceed
an amount reasonably necessary for that purpose, except:

(a)
The loan or rental of the property does not subject the property to tax if:

(i)
The rents and donations received for the use of the portion of the property are
reasonable and do not exceed the maintenance and operation expenses
attributable to the portion of the property loaned or rented; and

(ii)
Except for the exemptions under RCW 84.36.030(4) and 84.36.037, the property
would be exempt from tax if owned by the organization to which it is loaned or
rented;

(b)
The use of the property for fund-raising activities does not subject the
property to tax if the fund-raising activities are consistent with the purposes
for which the exemption is granted.

(3)
The property must be irrevocably dedicated to the purpose for which exemption
has been granted, and on the liquidation, dissolution, or abandonment by said
organization, association, or corporation, said property will not inure
directly or indirectly to the benefit of any shareholder or individual, except
a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation which too would be
entitled to property tax exemption. This property need not be irrevocably
dedicated if it is leased or rented to those qualified for exemption under this
chapter or RCW 84.36.560 for leased property, but only if under the terms of the
lease or rental agreement the nonprofit organization, association, or
corporation receives the benefit of the exemption.

(4)
The facilities and services must be available to all regardless of race, color,
national origin or ancestry.

(5)
The organization, association, or corporation must be duly licensed or
certified where such licensing or certification is required by law or
regulation.

(6)
Property sold to organizations, associations, or corporations with an option to
be repurchased by the seller shall not qualify for exempt status.

(7)
The department shall have access to its books in order to determine whether the
nonprofit organization, association, or corporation is exempt from taxes under
this chapter and RCW 84.36.560.

(8)
This section does not apply to exemptions granted under RCW 84.36.020(1),
84.36.032, 84.36.250, and 84.36.260.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.36.810 and 1999 c 203 s 3 and 1999 c 139 s 4 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been granted pursuant to
RCW 84.36.020(2), 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.042,
84.36.043, 84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550, 84.36.560, and
84.36.570, the county treasurer shall collect all taxes which would have been
paid had the property not been exempt during the three years preceding, or the
life of such exemption, if such be less, together with the interest at the same
rate and computed in the same way as that upon delinquent property taxes. If
the property has been granted an exemption for more than ten consecutive years,
taxes and interest shall not be assessed under this section.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of the property is
transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the area of the property loses
its exempt status. The additional tax under subsection (1) of this section
shall not be imposed if the cessation of use resulted solely from:

(a)
Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation for a use
which also qualifies and is granted exemption under this chapter;

(b)
A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or
transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the
exercise of such power;

(c)
Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or
city within which the property is located which disallows the present use of
such property;

(d)
A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such
calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the organization, association, or
corporation changing the use of such property;

(e)
Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site except for
undeveloped properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW 84.36.030;

(f)
Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt under this
chapter or RCW 84.36.560; or

(g) A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under
RCW 84.36.041(3), as long as some portion of the home remains exempt.

---
END ---