BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that decades of urban population growth, as well as
transportation, industrial, and commercial uses, are having detrimental impacts
on many of the state's harbors. These harbor areas are also important for
recreation, commerce, navigation, and habitat. The legislature also recognizes
that its estuaries and harbors are critical to the health of its aquatic
environment, including endangered species. Most of these submerged lands are
owned by the state and managed on behalf of all Washington citizens.

The
legislature also finds that many of these harbors have contaminated sediments.
Over five thousand acres of the Puget Sound's harbors are contaminated at more
than sixty sites. The legislature declares that these contaminated sites need
to be cleaned up and restored in order to protect the public health and
environment and to provide economic options for future generations.

Many
of these sites are designated by the environmental protection agency or the
department of ecology under the comprehensive, environmental, response,
compensation and liability act or the model toxics control act.

There
are several barriers in place that make cleanup and restoration of these
harbors difficult, including the ability for the state to pay for the public's
share of the cleanup and restoration. It has been estimated that up to four
hundred fifty million dollars might be needed to accomplish the cleanup in the
Puget Sound alone.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
Washington state institute for public policy is directed to research options
for funding of cleanup of contaminated sediments in the Puget Sound area. The
institute shall review and develop recommendations on the following subjects,
at a minimum:

(1)
Sources of existing funds and the balances and restrictions;

(2)
Amount of contamination, types of contamination, location and cost estimates
for the total cleanup, and the public's share of the cost;

(3)
New funding source options; and

(4)
Funding eligibility criteria.

The
institute shall involve the departments of ecology, natural resources, fish and
wildlife, and transportation and the Puget Sound action team. The institute
shall report back to the senate committee on natural resources, parks and
recreation and the house of representatives committee on natural resources no
later than December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act expires March 31, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the Washington state institute for public policy for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---