BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any provision in RCW 43.21C.030 and 43.21C.031 to the contrary, an
environmental impact statement shall be prepared for any new or expanded public
or private surface mine when all or part of the proposed mine falls within a
flood plain as defined in WAC 173‑22‑030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW to read as follows:

An environmental impact statement must be prepared for any new or
expanded public or private surface mine when all or part of the proposed mine
falls within a flood plain as defined in WAC 173-22-030.

---
END ---