BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
15.36.151 and 1999 c 291 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is unlawful to sell, offer for sale, or deliver:

(1)
Milk or products produced from milk from cows, goats, or other mammals affected
with disease or of which the owner thereof has refused official examination and
tests for disease; or

(2)
Colostrum milk for consumption by humans, except that this prohibition
regarding colostrum milk does not apply to:

(a)
Colostrum milk ((from cows that have been tested for brucellosis within
sixty days of parturition may)) made or to be made available to
persons having multiple sclerosis, or other persons acting on their behalf,
who, at the time of the initial sale, present a form, signed by a licensed
physician, certifying that the intended user has multiple sclerosis and that
the user releases the provider of the milk from liability resulting from the
consumption of the milk((. Colostrum milk provided under this section is
exempt from meeting the standards for grade A raw milk required by this chapter));
or

(b)
Colostrum milk processed or to be processed by a licensed food processing
facility or a milk processing plant as a nutritional supplement in accordance
with the federal dietary supplement health and education act. Colostrum milk
used for this purpose must be pasteurized or otherwise subjected to a heat
process or other treatment sufficient to kill harmful organisms.

Colostrum milk described in subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this section
is exempt from the prohibition provided by subsection (2) of this section if it
comes from a licensed producer. Such colostrum milk is also exempt from
meeting the standards for grade A raw milk required by this chapter.

---
END ---