BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.08.250 and 1979 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources may exchange surplus real property
previously acquired by the department as administrative sites. The property
may be exchanged for any public or private real property of equal value, to
preserve archeological sites on trust lands, to acquire land to be held in
natural preserves, to maintain habitats for endangered species, or to acquire
or enhance sites to be dedicated for recreational purposes.

(2) The department of natural resources may exchange the light
industrial facilities and land in Thurston county previously acquired by the
department as administrative sites for other lands and facilities in Thurston
county or counties adjacent to Thurston county for replacement as light
industrial facilities. The property may be exchanged for any public or private
real property of equal value for continued use as an administrative site.

---
END ---