BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that every entity has an
affirmative and continuing obligation to respect the privacy of its consumers
and to protect the security and confidentiality of consumers. The legislature
finds that Washington's citizens have a right to privacy and a reasonable
expectation that the personal information that they provide in commercial
transactions with financial institutions and others who maintain and transfer
information will be kept private and confidential. The legislature finds that
there is no existing uniform law that creates an appropriate standard of
conduct for disclosure of consumers' personal information and that Washington's
citizens need additional statutory protection from fraud, deception, nuisance,
invasion of privacy, and breach of confidentiality related to the disclosure of
personal information. The legislature intends to ensure that entities and
consumers work cooperatively to protect consumer information and enforce
sanctions when violations occur.

(2)
The legislature finds that the disclosure of personal information has caused
specific significant harms to Washington consumers, including the inability to
rectify erroneous information disclosed to others; charging consumers' credit
cards or debiting their accounts without authorization; subjecting consumers to
fraudulent, misleading, or deceptive telephone, direct mail, or Internet
solicitations; subjecting consumers to intimidation, intrusion, harassment, and
nuisance; undue embarrassment or ridicule; misappropriation of sensitive
information for the purpose of assuming a consumer's identity; and invasion of
privacy.

(3)
The legislature finds that the dissemination of certain sensitive information
causes a great risk of harm to the consumer, that it should be given a greater
level of protection under the law, and that requiring consumer authorization to
disseminate such sensitive information best balances the benefits and harms of
disclosure.

(4)
The legislature finds that the flow of less sensitive personal information has
resulted in a number of increased market efficiencies that are beneficial to
consumers. These include more rapid credit transactions and check
verifications, as well as an increased number of choices for products and
services. The legislature finds that these benefits can be maintained by
giving consumers the opportunity to choose whether their less sensitive
information will be shared. The legislature finds that giving consumers this
choice best balances the benefits and harms of disclosure of such information.

(5)
The legislature finds that the incidence of identify theft is rapidly growing,
and that victims of identity theft need further assistance in obtaining the
information necessary to the prosecution of their cases. The legislature finds
that requiring additional information sharing by merchants with victims will
result in greater protections for consumers and deter potential perpetrators.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Affiliate" means an entity that controls, is controlled by, or is
under common control or common ownership with another entity.

(2)
"Consumer" or "customer" means a natural person who
purchases, leases, or otherwise contracts for goods or services that are
primarily used for personal, family, or household purposes.

(3)
"Consumer-requested purpose" means that the consumer has requested
the information custodian to establish a business relationship, complete a
transaction, or provide a product or service.

(4)
"Information custodian" means all entities that maintain data
containing personal information or sensitive information and that sell, share,
or otherwise transfer the information to others, including affiliates or
nonaffiliates, for purposes other than customer-requested purposes, or that use
the information to engage in marketing.

(5)
"Marketing" or "marketing information" means a promotion,
solicitation, or advertisement made through written, telephonic, electronic, or
other means, offering goods or services, that is directed to a specific named
individual, and that is separate from a billing, promotion, solicitation, or
advertisement directed to all or substantially all of an information
custodian's customers for sale of its own goods or services.

(6)
"Personal information" means information that is provided by the
consumer in a commercial context, and is identifiable to the individual
consumer, that concerns the amount or condition of the consumer's assets,
liabilities, financial transactions, purchasing history, buying preferences,
business relationships, account existence or status, customer status,
demographic information, name, address, telephone number, or electronic mail
address.

(7)
"Sensitive information" means information obtained in a commercial
context, including account numbers, access codes or passwords, current or
historical account balances, purchase amounts, information gathered for account
security purposes, tax identification numbers, social security numbers,
driver's license or permit numbers, state identicard numbers issued by the
department of licensing, credit card numbers or expiration dates, or
information held for the purpose of account access or transaction initiation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
RESTRICTION ON CONSUMER INFORMATION. An information custodian may, in
performing a transaction, providing a service, or establishing a business
relationship, require only that the consumer provide information reasonably
necessary to perform the transaction, establish the relationship, or administer
or maintain the business relationship. Any optional information must be specified
as such, and the consumer must be given the option not to provide it.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
CONSUMER PRIVACY POLICIES. (1) An information custodian must have a consumer
privacy policy that discloses to existing and prospective consumers the
policies and practices of the information custodian regarding the use of
consumer personal information and sensitive information acquired or possessed
by the information custodian. Entities that maintain data containing personal
information or sensitive information but do not use the data to engage in
marketing or do not sell, share, or otherwise transfer the data, are not
required to have a privacy policy.

(2)
The consumer privacy policy, at a minimum, must summarize the information custodian's
responsibilities under this chapter and describe the consumer's rights and
remedies under it, and generally describe with whom the consumer's personal and
sensitive information will be shared or to whom it will be sold or transferred.

(3)
The consumer privacy policy must also provide a reasonable means for consumers
to access their personal and sensitive information that the information
custodian shares, sells, or transfers or uses for marketing purposes. The
policy must also provide a reasonable process to correct inaccurate or
incomplete information.

(4)
An information custodian must disclose its consumer privacy policy at least
once to each consumer no later than:

(a)
For existing customers on the effective date of this act, within sixty days
after the effective date of this act;

(b)
For prospective customers after the effective date of this act, within thirty
days after the consumer's initial request for the policy; and

(c)
For all new customers after the effective date of this act, at the time the
customer enters into a business relationship with the information custodian.

(5)
An information custodian must disclose its consumer privacy policy on an annual
basis to existing customers after the initial disclosure described in
subsection (4) of this section, and when material changes are made to the
policy.

(6)
The disclosure of the consumer privacy policy must be clearly and conspicuously
made in writing, in a document separate from all other documents or pages that
are provided to the consumer by the information custodian.

(7)
The consumer privacy policy must be clearly and conspicuously posted on the
information custodian's website, if a website exists, and must be readily
available for review at the information custodian's place of business.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
PERSONAL INFORMATION‑-CONSUMER CONTROL. (1) An information custodian may
share, sell, or otherwise transfer personal information for purposes other than
consumer-requested purposes, or may use personal information for marketing
purposes, only if it has clearly and conspicuously disclosed to the consumer
the following information in plain language:

(a)
That the consumer has the right to choose not to receive marketing information
or to have his or her personal information shared, sold, or otherwise
transferred for purposes other than consumer-requested purposes. The
disclosure must be made at the time the consumer privacy policy is provided to
the customer under section 4 of this act.

(b)
That the consumer may choose not to receive marketing information or have his
or her personal information shared, sold, or transferred for other than
consumer-requested purposes, by exercising his or her choice through a
cost-free method provided by the information custodian. Disclosure of the
existence of the cost-free method must be made at the time the consumer privacy
policy is provided to the customer under section 4 of this act. The information
custodian shall maintain adequate and reasonable access for consumers to the
cost-free method it has established.

(2)
If, under this section, a consumer chooses:

(a)
Not to receive marketing information, the information custodian must stop
marketing to the consumer within sixty days of receiving the consumer's
notice. Once a consumer has chosen to not receive marketing information, an
information custodian may not market to the consumer until the consumer
notifies the entity that he or she has affirmatively chosen to receive
marketing information;

(b)
Not to have his or her personal information shared, sold, or otherwise
transferred under subsection (1) of this section, the information custodian
must stop sharing, selling, or otherwise transferring the consumer's personal
information for purposes other than consumer-requested purposes, within thirty
days of receiving the consumer's notice. Once a consumer has chosen not to
have his or her personal information shared, sold, or otherwise transferred, an
information custodian may not share, sell, or otherwise transfer the
information for purposes other than consumer-requested purposes until the
consumer notifies the entity that he or she has chosen to have his or her
personal information shared, sold, or otherwise transferred under subsection
(1) of this section.

(3)
This section does not apply to disclosure of personal information under the
following circumstances:

(a)
Disclosure to the consumer upon his or her request and upon presentation of
proper identification;

(b)
Disclosure required by federal, state, or local law or regulation;

(c)
Disclosure made under a search warrant, court order, or subpoena, including an
administrative subpoena;

(d)
Use or disclosure of personal information by an information custodian to
perform services or functions on behalf of the information custodian in order
to fulfill the information custodian's obligation to provide services or
products to a consumer for a consumer-requested purpose;

(e)
Disclosure to a third party in the business of debt collection where necessary
to collect a debt or check returned for insufficient funds;

(f)
Disclosure to protect against or prevent actual or potential fraud or
unauthorized transactions; or

(g)
Disclosure by or to a consumer reporting agency as defined by the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) in a manner that complies
with the requirements of that act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
SENSITIVE INFORMATION‑-CONSUMER CONTROL. (1) An information custodian
may not disclose sensitive information to a third party or affiliate for
purposes other than consumer-requested purposes unless the consumer has
received written notification of the following:

(a)
The information to be disclosed;

(b)
The entity or entities authorized to receive the disclosure of information;

(c)
A specific description of the purpose for which the disclosure of information
will be made;

(d)
The expiration date for authorization for use of the information, which date is
no more than one year from the date of execution.

(2)
An information custodian may not disclose sensitive information to a third
party or affiliate for purposes other than consumer-requested purposes unless
the consumer, upon knowledge and affirmative consent, authorizes the disclosure
of the sensitive information sought to be disclosed, in a written statement
dated and executed by the consumer that is separate and distinct from any other
document, and that contains a description of the information sought to be
disclosed and the purpose for which the information will be disclosed.

(3)
This section does not apply to disclosure of sensitive information under the
following circumstances:

(a)
Disclosure to the consumer upon his or her request and upon presentation of
proper identification;

(b)
Disclosure required by federal, state, or local law or regulation;

(c)
Disclosure made under a search warrant, court order, or subpoena, including an
administrative subpoena;

(d)
Use or disclosure of sensitive information by an information custodian to
perform services or functions on behalf of the information custodian in order
to fulfill the information custodian's obligation to provide services or
products to a consumer for a consumer-requested purpose;

(e)
Disclosure to a third party in the business of debt collection where necessary
to collect a debt or check returned for insufficient funds;

(f)
Disclosure to protect against or prevent actual or potential fraud or
unauthorized transactions; and

(g)
Disclosure by or to a consumer reporting agency as defined by the federal Fair
Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.) in a manner that complies
with the requirements of that act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
CONFIDENTIALITY AND SECURITY OF INFORMATION. (1) Third parties or affiliates
that obtain personal information or sensitive information from information
custodians may not sell, share, or otherwise transfer the information for any
reason other than the original purpose for which the information was sold,
shared, or transferred to the third party or affiliate.

(2)
An information custodian, before sharing, selling, or otherwise transferring
personal information or sensitive information, must obtain a written agreement
from the third party or affiliate providing for the following:

(a)
To keep the information confidential;

(b)
To use the information only for the original purpose for which it has been shared,
sold, or provided; and

(c)
To safeguard the information from loss, misuse, theft, unauthorized access,
disclosure, defacement, or alteration.

(3)
Every information custodian must establish reasonable safeguards to ensure the
confidentiality and safety of personal information and sensitive information
and to protect them from loss, misuse, theft, unauthorized access, disclosure,
defacement, or alteration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
VIOLATION AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE ACT. (1) Unfair and deceptive invasion of
privacy rights is not reasonable in relation to the development and
preservation of business. The legislature finds that the practices covered by
this chapter are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose
of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of
this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose
of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2)
A person may not bring an action against an information custodian for a
violation of section 5(2)(a) of this act unless he or she has notified the
information custodian of a violation of the section, in writing, and the
information custodian has again violated section 5(2)(a) of this act after
having received the notification.

(3)
Damages to a person who has been the victim of a violation of this chapter are
five hundred dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater. A court may
increase the award of damages in an amount not more than three times the actual
damages sustained, or one thousand five hundred dollars, whichever is greater,
upon a demonstration that a violation of the chapter was willful.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 9.35 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a)
"Victim of identity theft" or "victim" means a person who
has had his or her means of identification taken or personal information or
sensitive information used without authorization when the person's means of
identification or personal information or sensitive information has been used
with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, an unlawful activity harming or
intending to harm the person whose identity is used, or for committing a
felony;

(b)
"Personal information" means information that is provided by the
consumer in a commercial context, and is identifiable to the individual
consumer, that concerns the amount or condition of the consumer's assets,
liabilities, financial transactions, purchasing history, buying preferences,
business relationships, account existence or status, customer status,
demographic information, name, address, telephone number, or electronic mail
address;

(c)
"Sensitive information" means information obtained in a commercial
context, including account numbers, access codes or passwords, current or
historical account balances, purchase amounts, information gathered for account
security purposes, tax identification numbers, social security numbers,
driver's license or permit numbers, state identicard numbers issued by the
department of licensing, credit card numbers or expiration dates, or
information held for the purpose of account access or transaction initiation.

(2)
A person, information repository, corporation, trust, partnership, or
unincorporated association possessing information relating to an actual or
potential violation of this chapter or chapter 19.--- RCW (sections 1 through 8
of this act), and who may have entered into a transaction, provided credit,
products, or services, accepted payment, or otherwise done business with a
person who has used the victim's means of identification, must, upon request of
the victim, provide copies of all information relevant to the potential or
actual violation of this chapter or chapter 19.--- RCW (sections 1 through 8 of
this act).

(3)
In providing the information required under subsection (2) of this section, the
provider may require the victim of identity theft to provide a copy of a police
report evidencing the victim's claim. The provider may also seek reasonable
compensation for the actual cost of providing the information requested, and
may also require the victim to provide positive identification before providing
the information.

(4)
No person, information repository, corporation, trust, partnership, or
unincorporated association may be held liable for an action voluntarily taken
in good faith to provide information regarding potential or actual violations
of this chapter or chapter 19.--- RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this act) to
other information repositories, merchants, or law enforcement authorities, for
the purpose of identification and prosecution of violators of this chapter or
chapter 19.--- RCW (sections 1 through 8 of this act).

Sec.
10. RCW
19.16.250 and 1983 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
licensee or employee of a licensee shall:

(1)
Directly or indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to engage in business
as a collection agency in this state or receive compensation from such
unlicensed person: PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall prevent a
licensee from accepting, as forwardee, claims for collection from a collection
agency or attorney whose place of business is outside the state.

(2)
Collect or attempt to collect a claim by the use of any means contrary to the
postal laws and regulations of the United States postal department.

(3)
Publish or post or cause to be published or posted, any list of debtors
commonly known as "bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For
purposes of this chapter, a "bad debt list" means any list of natural
persons alleged to fail to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing herein
shall be construed to prohibit a licensee from communicating to its customers
or clients by means of a coded list, the existence of a check dishonored
because of insufficient funds, not sufficient funds or closed account by the
financial institution servicing the debtor's checking account: PROVIDED, That
the debtor's identity is not readily apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
licensee complies with the requirements of subsection (9)(e) of this section.

(4)
Have in his possession or make use of any badge, use a uniform of any law
enforcement agency or any simulation thereof, or make any statements which
might be construed as indicating an official connection with any federal,
state, county, or city law enforcement agency, or any other governmental
agency, while engaged in collection agency business.

(5)
Perform any act or acts, either directly or indirectly, constituting the
practice of law.

(6)
Advertise for sale or threaten to advertise for sale any claim as a means of
endeavoring to enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do so for the purpose of
soliciting claims, except where the licensee has acquired claims as an assignee
for the benefit of creditors or where the licensee is acting under court order.

(7)
Use any name while engaged in the making of a demand for any claim other than
the name set forth on his or its current license issued hereunder.

(8)
Give or send to any debtor or cause to be given or sent to any debtor, any
notice, letter, message, or form which represents or implies that a claim
exists unless it shall indicate in clear and legible type:

(a)
The name of the licensee and the city, street, and number at which he is
licensed to do business;

(b)
The name of the original creditor to whom the debtor owed the claim if such
name is known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request
of the debtor, the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name
of such person and provide this name to the debtor;

(c)
If the notice, letter, message, or form is the first notice to the debtor or if
the licensee is attempting to collect a different amount than indicated in his
or its first notice to the debtor, an itemization of the claim asserted must be
made including:

(i)
Amount owing on the original obligation at the time it was received by the
licensee for collection or by assignment;

(ii)
Interest or service charge, collection costs, or late payment charges, if any,
added to the original obligation by the original creditor, customer or assignor
before it was received by the licensee for collection, if such information is
known by the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the
debtor, the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on
such items and provide this information to the debtor;

(iii)
Interest or service charge, if any, added by the licensee or customer or
assignor after the obligation was received by the licensee for collection;

(iv)
Collection costs, if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect;

(v)
Attorneys' fees, if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or
its behalf or on the behalf of a customer or assignor;

(vi)
Any other charge or fee that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or
its own behalf or on the behalf of a customer or assignor.

(9)
Communicate or threaten to communicate, the existence of a claim to a person
other than one who might be reasonably expected to be liable on the claim in
any manner other than through proper legal action, process, or proceedings
except under the following conditions:

(a)
A licensee or employee of a licensee may inform a credit reporting bureau of
the existence of a claim: PROVIDED, That if the licensee or employee of a
licensee reports a claim to a credit reporting bureau, the licensee shall upon
receipt of written notice from the debtor that any part of the claim is
disputed, forward a copy of such written notice to the credit reporting bureau;

(b)
A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim may
communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if the claim has
been reduced to a judgment;

(c)
A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim that has
not been reduced to judgment, may communicate the existence of a claim to a
debtor's employer if:

(i)
The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his last known address or place of employment concerning the claim
and the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has
failed to agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the
licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing to the licensee disputed any part of the claim:
PROVIDED, That the licensee or employee may only communicate the existence of a
claim which has not been reduced to judgment to the debtor's employer once
unless the debtor's employer has agreed to additional communications.

(d)
A licensee may for the purpose of locating the debtor or locating assets of the
debtor communicate the existence of a claim to any person who might reasonably
be expected to have knowledge of the whereabouts of a debtor or the location of
assets of the debtor if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to
judgment, when:

(i)
The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his last known address or last known place of employment concerning
the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or
has failed to agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the
licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(e)
A licensee may communicate the existence of a claim to its customers or clients
if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:

(i)
The licensee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his
last known address or last known place of employment concerning the claim and
the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to
agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(10)
Threaten the debtor with impairment of his credit rating if a claim is not
paid.

(11)
Communicate with the debtor after notification in writing from an attorney
representing such debtor that all further communications relative to a claim
should be addressed to the attorney: PROVIDED, That if a licensee requests in
writing information from an attorney regarding such claim and the attorney does
not respond within a reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly
with the debtor until he or it again receives notification in writing that an
attorney is representing the debtor.

(12)
Communicate with a debtor or anyone else in such a manner as to harass,
intimidate, threaten, or embarrass a debtor, including but not limited to
communication at an unreasonable hour, with unreasonable frequency, by threats
of force or violence, by threats of criminal prosecution, and by use of
offensive language. A communication shall be presumed to have been made for
the purposes of harassment if:

(a)
It is made with a debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or place, more than
three times in a single week;

(b)
It is made with a debtor at his or her place of employment more than one time
in a single week;

(c)
It is made with the debtor or spouse at his or her place of residence between
the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m.

(13)
Communicate with the debtor through use of forms or instruments that simulate
the form or appearance of judicial process, the form or appearance of
government documents, or the simulation of a form or appearance of a
telegraphic or emergency message.

(14)
Communicate with the debtor and represent or imply that the existing obligation
of the debtor may be or has been increased by the addition of attorney fees,
investigation fees, service fees, or any other fees or charges when in fact
such fees or charges may not legally be added to the existing obligation of
such debtor.

(15)
Threaten to take any action against the debtor which the licensee cannot
legally take at the time the threat is made.

(16)
Send any telegram or make any telephone calls to a debtor or concerning a debt
or for the purpose of demanding payment of a claim or seeking information about
a debtor, for which the charges are payable by the addressee or by the person
to whom the call is made.

(17)
In any manner convey the impression that the licensee is vouched for, bonded to
or by, or is an instrumentality of the state of Washington or any agency or
department thereof.

(18)
Collect or attempt to collect in addition to the principal amount of a claim
any sum other than allowable interest, collection costs or handling fees
expressly authorized by statute, and, in the case of suit, attorney's fees and
taxable court costs.

(19)
Procure from a debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any written note,
contract, stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under which a debtor may be
required to pay any sum other than principal, allowable interest, and, in the
case of suit, attorney's fees and taxable court costs.

(20)
Upon notification by a victim of identity theft that a police report has been
filed regarding the identity theft, and upon receipt of a copy of the report
indicating that the victim's checkbook or other series of preprinted written
instruments has been stolen, fail to accept one single writing from the victim
that disputes creditors' claims for the entire checkbook or series. Once a
single writing has been received, the collection agency must not recontact the
victim regarding the checks or other written instruments in the same series or
lot and must consider the single writing as a dispute to all creditors' claims
arising from use of the checkbook or other series of instruments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Section captions used in sections 1 through 8 of this act are not part of the
law.

---
END ---