BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.43.040 and 1995 c 356 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following will be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that
the applicant is qualified for registration as a professional engineer,
engineer-in-training, professional land surveyor, or land-surveyor-in-training,
respectively:

As
a professional engineer: A specific record of eight years or more of
experience in engineering work of a character satisfactory to the board and
indicating that the applicant is competent to practice engineering; and
successfully passing a written or oral examination, or both, in engineering as
prescribed by the board.

Graduation
in an approved engineering curriculum of four years or more from a school or
college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing shall be considered
equivalent to four years of such required experience. The satisfactory
completion of each year of such an approved engineering course without
graduation shall be considered as equivalent to a year of such required
experience. Graduation in a curriculum other than engineering from a school or
college approved by the board shall be considered as equivalent to two years of
such required experience: PROVIDED, That no applicant shall receive credit for
more than four years of experience because of undergraduate educational
qualifications. The board may, at its discretion, give credit as experience
not in excess of one year, for satisfactory postgraduate study in engineering.

Structural
engineering is recognized as a specialized branch of professional engineering.
To receive a certificate of registration in structural engineering, an
applicant must hold a current registration in this state in engineering and
have at least two years of structural engineering experience, of a character
satisfactory to the board, in addition to the eight years' experience required
for registration as a professional engineer. An applicant for registration as
a structural engineer must also pass an additional examination as prescribed by
the board. Applicants for a certificate of registration in structural
engineering who have had their application approved by the board prior to July
1, 2001, are not required to have an additional two years of structural
engineering experience if the applicant passes the additional structural
examination before January 30, 2002.

As
an engineer-in-training: An applicant for registration as a professional
engineer shall take the prescribed examination in two stages. The first stage
of the examination may be taken upon submission of his or her application for
registration as an engineer-in‑training and payment of the application
fee prescribed in RCW 18.43.050 at any time after the applicant has completed
four years of the required engineering experience, as defined in this section,
or has achieved senior standing in a school or college approved by the board.
The first stage of the examination shall test the applicant's knowledge of
appropriate fundamentals of engineering subjects, including mathematics and the
basic sciences.

At
any time after the completion of the required eight years of engineering
experience, as defined in this section, the applicant may take the second stage
of the examination upon submission of an application for registration and
payment of the application fee prescribed in RCW 18.43.050. This stage of the
examination shall test the applicant's ability, upon the basis of his or her
greater experience, to apply his or her knowledge and experience in the field
of his or her specific training and qualifications.

As
a professional land surveyor: A specific record of eight years or more of
experience in land surveying work of a character satisfactory to the board and
indicating that the applicant is competent to practice land surveying, and
successfully passing a written or oral examination, or both, in surveying as
prescribed by the board.

Graduation
from a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing,
including the completion of an approved course in surveying, shall be
considered equivalent to four years of the required experience. Postgraduate
college courses approved by the board shall be considered for up to one
additional year of the required experience.

As
a land-surveyor-in-training: An applicant for registration as a professional
land surveyor shall take the prescribed examination in two stages. The first
stage of the examination may be taken upon submission of his or her application
for registration as a land-surveyor-in-training and payment of the application
fee prescribed in RCW 18.43.050 at any time after the applicant has completed
four years of the required land surveying experience, as defined in this
section, or has achieved senior standing in a school or college approved by the
board. The first stage of the examination shall test the applicant's knowledge
of appropriate fundamentals of land surveying subjects, including mathematics
and the basic sciences.

At
any time after the completion of the required eight years of land surveying
experience, as defined in this section, the applicant may take the second stage
of the examination upon submission of an application for registration and
payment of the application fee prescribed in RCW 18.43.050. This stage of the
examination shall test the applicant's ability, upon the basis of greater
experience, to apply knowledge and experience in the field of land surveying.

The
first stage shall be successfully completed before the second stage may be
attempted. Applicants who have been approved by the board to take the
examination based on the requirement for six years of experience under this
section before July 1, 1996, are eligible to sit for the examination.

No
person shall be eligible for registration as a professional engineer,
engineer-in-training, professional land surveyor, or land-surveyor-in-training,
who is not of good character and reputation.

Teaching,
of a character satisfactory to the board shall be considered as experience not
in excess of two years for the appropriate profession.

The
mere execution, as a contractor, of work designed by a professional engineer,
or the supervision of the construction of such work as a foreman or
superintendent shall not be deemed to be practice of engineering.

Any person having the necessary qualifications prescribed in this
chapter to entitle him or her to registration shall be eligible for such
registration although the person may not be practicing his or her profession at
the time of making his or her application.

---
END ---