BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.44.080 and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of transportation and local authorities, with respect
to public highways under their jurisdiction, may prohibit the operation
thereon of motor trucks or other vehicles or may impose limits as to the weight
thereof, or any other restrictions as may be deemed necessary, whenever any
such public highway by reason of rain, snow, climatic, or other
conditions, will be seriously damaged or destroyed unless the operation of
vehicles thereon be prohibited or restricted or the permissible weights thereof
reduced((: PROVIDED, That)). Whenever a highway has been closed
generally to vehicles or specified classes of vehicles, the department and
local authorities shall ((by general rule or)) by special permit
authorize the operation thereon of school buses, private carrier buses used
as school buses, authorized emergency vehicles, and motor trucks
transporting perishable commodities or services or commodities necessary
for the health and welfare of local residents under such weight and speed
restrictions as the department and the local authorities deem necessary
to protect the highway from undue damage((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)).
The governing authorities of incorporated cities and towns shall not
prohibit the use of any city street designated by the transportation commission
as forming a part of the route of any primary state highway through any such
incorporated city or town by vehicles or any class of vehicles or impose any
restrictions or reductions in permissible weights unless ((such)) the
restriction, limitation, or prohibition, or reduction in permissible weights ((be))
is first approved in writing by the department of transportation.

(2)
The department shall give public notice of a road closure or imposed
restriction. Local authorities imposing any such restrictions or
limitations, or prohibiting any use or reducing the permissible weights shall
do so by proper ordinance or resolution ((and)). The department or
local authorities shall erect or cause to be erected and maintained signs
designating the provisions of the public notice, ordinance, or
resolution ((in)) at each end of the portion of any public
highway affected thereby, and no such public notice, ordinance,
or resolution ((shall be)) is effective unless and until such
signs are erected and maintained.

((The
department shall have the same authority as hereinabove granted to local
authorities to prohibit or restrict the operation of vehicles upon state
highways. The department shall give public notice of closure or restriction.
The department may issue special permits for the operation of school buses and
motor trucks transporting perishable commodities or commodities necessary for
the health and welfare of local residents under specified weight and speed
restrictions as may be necessary to protect any state highway from undue
damage.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Road restrictions imposed by the department or local authorities must be
categorized either as "emergency load restrictions" or "severe
emergency load restrictions." The emergency load limitation imposed by
local authorities must be based on the "Severe Emergency Load
Restrictions" table only. The condition existing at the time will
determine which of the two schedules will be imposed.

EMERGENCY LOAD RESTRICTIONS

CONVENTIONAL TIRES TIRES WITH .5 MARKING

Tire Size Gross Load Tire Size Gross Load

Each Tire Each Tire

7.00 1800
lbs. 8x22.5 2250 lbs.

7.50 2250
lbs. 9x22.5 2800 lbs.

8.25 2800
lbs. 10x22.5 3400 lbs.

9.00 3400
lbs. 11x22.5 4000 lbs.

10.00 4000
lbs. 11x24.5 4000 lbs.

11.00 4500
lbs. 12x22.5 4500 lbs.

12.00 12x24.5

&
over 4500 lbs. & over 4500 lbs.

SEVERE EMERGENCY LOAD RESTRICTIONS

CONVENTIONAL TIRES TIRES WITH .5 MARKING

Tire Size Gross Load Tire Size Gross Load

Each Tire Each Tire

7.00 1800
lbs. 8x22.5 1800 lbs.

7.50 1800
lbs. 9x22.5 1900 lbs.

8.25 1900
lbs. 10x22.5 2250 lbs.

9.00 2250
lbs. 11x22.5 2750 lbs.

10.00 2750
lbs. 11x24.5 2750 lbs.

11.00 12x22.5

&
over 3000 lbs. & over 3000 lbs.

(a)
No allowance will be made for axles other than the primary steering axle and
drive axle(s).

(b)
The load distribution on any one axle of the vehicle must be such that it will
not load the tires on that axle in excess of the prescribed load listed in the
table above. However, a truck, truck tractor, auto stage, municipal transit
vehicle, school bus, or private carrier bus used as a school bus having
conventional 10.00 x 20 tires or 11.00 x 22.5 tires, or larger, may carry a
maximum load of 10,000 pounds on the front axle over a public highway placed
under emergency load restrictions.

(2)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Perishable commodity" means a product of agriculture, aquaculture,
or manufacture that by its nature is subject to destruction, decay,
deterioration, or spoilage except under proper conditions. At least fifty
percent of the load must be perishables.

(b)
"Services or commodities necessary for the health and welfare of local
residents" means (i) a service provided to the public that is necessary to
maintain essential power, gas, communications, garbage, sewer, or water
services and (ii) commodities provided to the public that are necessary in
providing food, shelter, or fuel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of transportation, in conjunction with the county road
administration board, shall adopt rules for imposition of road restrictions
under RCW 46.44.080. The initial rules will be effective July 1, 2003, and
must be reviewed by the department of transportation and the county road administration
board at least every two years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2003.

---
END ---