BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to respond to the requirements of Initiative Measure No.
695 that require voter approval of increases in taxes, rates, and other
monetary charges by allowing ballot propositions for such purposes to be
submitted to voters at special elections held at any date if the election is
conducted using mail ballots. Mail ballot elections are less costly than
traditional elections, and more voters cast ballots when elections are
conducted using mail ballots than when conducted using traditional polling
place voting. To further reduce costs, local governments and state agencies
are encouraged to submit such ballot propositions at special elections held on
the same day. It is further the purpose of this act to encourage these special
elections to be held at dates other than the traditional special election,
primary, and general election dates to avoid extremely long ballots when voters
are considering other matters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 29.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of a county, city, town, or special purpose district may
cause one or more ballot propositions to be submitted for voters authorizing an
increase in a tax, fee, or other monetary charge at a special election
conducted by mail ballot. A single ballot proposition may authorize a single
or multiple increases. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 29.13.010 and
29.13.020, the special election may be held on any date.

(2)
A state agency may cause one or more ballot propositions to be submitted to
voters state-wide authorizing an increase in a fee or other monetary charge at
a special election conducted by mail ballot, if the state agency pays for the
cost of the election out of its current budget. A single ballot proposition
may authorize a single or multiple increases. Notwithstanding the provisions
of RCW 29.13.010 and 29.13.020, the special election may be held on any date.

(3) A resolution by a local government requesting such a special election
must be presented to the county auditor at least forty-five days before the
specified election date. The county auditor must call the special election to
be held on the date specified in the resolution. A notice by a state agency
requesting such a special election must be presented to the secretary of state
at least forty-five days before the specified election date. The secretary of
state must call the special election to be held on the date specified in the
notice.

---
END ---