BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.20.010 and 1985 c 297 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development, establishment, and
enforcement of standards for the maintenance and operation of boarding homes,
which, in the light of advancing knowledge, will promote safe and adequate care
of the individuals therein. It is further the intent of the legislature that
boarding homes be available to meet the needs of those for whom they care by
recognizing the capabilities of individuals to direct their self-medication or
to use supervised self-medication techniques when ordered and approved by a
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW or a ((podiatrist)) podiatric
physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.22 RCW.

The
legislature finds that many residents of community-based long-term care facilities
are vulnerable and their health and well-being are dependent on their
caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge of their caregivers are often
the key to good care. The legislature finds that the need for well-trained
caregivers is growing as the state's population ages and residents' needs
increase. The legislature intends that current training standards should be
enhanced.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Boarding home administrators or their designees must satisfactorily complete
department-approved basic training and continuing education.

(2)
Staff persons must satisfactorily complete department-approved staff
orientation, basic training, and continuing education.

(3)
The department must create an approval system for those seeking to conduct
department-approved training.

(4)
The department will complete rules for subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this
section by March 1, 2001 in collaboration with providers, consumers,
caregivers, advocates, family members, educators, and other interested parties.

(5)
The department must develop by January 1, 2003, training modules for
administrators and staff to enhance knowledge and ability to provide care for
people with dementia, mental illness, and developmental disabilities.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.128.005 and 1995 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that adult family homes are an important part of the state's
long-term care system. Adult family homes provide an alternative to
institutional care and promote a high degree of independent living for
residents. Persons with functional limitations have broadly varying service
needs. Adult family homes that can meet those needs are an essential component
of a long-term system. The legislature further finds that different
populations living in adult family homes, such as the developmentally disabled
and the elderly, often have significantly different needs and capacities from
one another.

It
is the legislature's intent that department rules and policies relating to the
licensing and operation of adult family homes recognize and accommodate the
different needs and capacities of the various populations served by the homes.
Furthermore, the development and operation of adult family homes that can
provide quality personal care and special care services should be encouraged.

The
legislature finds that many residents of community-based long-term care
facilities are vulnerable and their health and well-being are dependent on
their caregivers. The quality, skills, and knowledge of their caregivers are
often the key to good care. The legislature finds that the need for
well-trained caregivers is growing as the state's population ages and
residents' needs increase. The legislature intends that current training
standards should be enhanced.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.128.120 and 1996 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
adult family home provider and each resident manager shall have the following
minimum qualifications:

(1)
Twenty-one years of age or older;

(2)
Good moral and responsible character and reputation;

(3)
Literacy;

(4)
Management and administrative ability to carry out the requirements of this
chapter;

(5)
Satisfactory completion of department-approved ((initial)) basic
training and continuing education training as specified by the department in
rule, working in collaboration with providers, consumers, caregivers,
advocates, family members, educators, and other interested parties in the
rule-making process;

(6)
Satisfactory completion of department-approved, or equivalent, special care
training before a provider may provide special care services to a resident;

(7)
Not been convicted of any crime listed in RCW 43.43.830 and 43.43.842; and

(8)
Effective July 1, 1996, registered with the department of health.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.128.130 and 1995 c 260 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Adult family homes shall be maintained internally and externally in good repair
and condition. Such homes shall have safe and functioning systems for heating,
cooling, hot and cold water, electricity, plumbing, garbage disposal, sewage,
cooking, laundry, artificial and natural light, ventilation, and any other
feature of the home.

(2)
Adult family homes shall be maintained in a clean and sanitary manner,
including proper sewage disposal, food handling, and hygiene practices.

(3)
Adult family homes shall develop a fire drill plan for emergency evacuation of
residents, shall have smoke detectors in each bedroom where a resident is
located, shall have fire extinguishers on each floor of the home, and shall not
keep nonambulatory patients above the first floor of the home.

(4)
Adult family homes shall have clean, functioning, and safe household items and
furnishings.

(5)
Adult family homes shall provide a nutritious and balanced diet and shall
recognize residents' needs for special diets.

(6)
Adult family homes shall establish health care procedures for the care of
residents including medication administration and emergency medical care.

(a)
Adult family home residents shall be permitted to self- administer medications.

(b)
Adult family home providers may administer medications and deliver special care
only to the extent authorized by law.

(7)
Adult family home providers shall either: (a) Reside at the adult family home;
or (b) employ or otherwise contract with a qualified resident manager to reside
at the adult family home. The department may exempt, for good cause, a
provider from the requirements of this subsection by rule.

(8)
A provider will ensure that any volunteer, student, employee, or person
residing within the adult family home who will have unsupervised access to any
resident shall not have been convicted of a crime listed under RCW 43.43.830 or
43.43.842. Except that a person may be conditionally employed pending the
completion of a criminal conviction background inquiry.

(9)
A provider shall offer activities to residents under care as defined by the
department in rule.

(10)
An adult family home provider ((shall)) must ensure that staff
are competent and receive necessary training to perform assigned tasks. Staff
must satisfactorily complete department-approved staff orientation, basic
training, and continuing education as specified by the department by rule. The
department will work in collaboration with providers, consumers, caregivers,
advocates, family members, educators, and other interested parties in the
rule-making process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:

By
March 1, 2001, the department must, by rule, create an approval system for
those seeking to conduct department-approved training under RCW 70.128.120 (5)
and (6) and 70.128.130(10). The department will work in collaboration with
providers, consumers, caregivers, advocates, family members, educators, and
other interested parties in the rule-making process.

Sec.
7. RCW
74.39A.005 and 1993 c 508 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the aging of the population and advanced medical
technology have resulted in a growing number of persons who require
assistance. The primary resource for long-term care continues to be family and
friends. However, these traditional caregivers are increasingly employed
outside the home. There is a growing demand for improvement and expansion of
home and community-based long-term care services to support and complement the
services provided by these informal caregivers.

The
legislature further finds that the public interest would best be served by a
broad array of long-term care services that support persons who need such
services at home or in the community whenever practicable and that promote
individual autonomy, dignity, and choice.

The
legislature finds that as other long-term care options become more available,
the relative need for nursing home beds is likely to decline. The legislature
recognizes, however, that nursing home care will continue to be a critical part
of the state's long-term care options, and that such services should promote
individual dignity, autonomy, and a homelike environment.

The
legislature finds that many recipients of in-home services are vulnerable and
their health and well-being are dependent on their caregivers. The quality,
skills, and knowledge of their caregivers are often the key to good care. The
legislature finds that the need for well-trained caregivers is growing as the
state's population ages and clients' needs increase. The legislature intends
that current training standards should be enhanced.

Sec.
8. RCW
74.39A.050 and 1999 c 336 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department's system of quality improvement for long-term care services shall
use the following principles, consistent with applicable federal laws and
regulations:

(1)
The system shall be client-centered and promote privacy, independence, dignity,
choice, and a home or home-like environment for consumers consistent with
chapter 392, Laws of 1997.

(2)
The goal of the system is continuous quality improvement with the focus on
consumer satisfaction and outcomes for consumers. This includes that when
conducting licensing inspections, the department shall interview an appropriate
percentage of residents, family members, resident managers, and advocates in
addition to interviewing providers and staff.

(3)
Providers should be supported in their efforts to improve quality and address
identified problems initially through training, consultation, technical
assistance, and case management.

(4)
The emphasis should be on problem prevention both in monitoring and in
screening potential providers of service.

(5)
Monitoring should be outcome based and responsive to consumer complaints and a
clear set of health, quality of care, and safety standards that are easily
understandable and have been made available to providers.

(6)
Prompt and specific enforcement remedies shall also be implemented without
delay, pursuant to RCW 74.39A.080, RCW 70.128.160, chapter 18.51 RCW, or
chapter 74.42 RCW, for providers found to have delivered care or failed to
deliver care resulting in problems that are serious, recurring, or uncorrected,
or that create a hazard that is causing or likely to cause death or serious
harm to one or more residents. These enforcement remedies may also include,
when appropriate, reasonable conditions on a contract or license. In the
selection of remedies, the safety, health, and well-being of residents shall be
of paramount importance.

(7)
To the extent funding is available, all long-term care staff directly
responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of vulnerable persons
should be screened through background checks in a uniform and timely manner to
ensure that they do not have a criminal history that would disqualify them from
working with vulnerable persons. Whenever a state conviction record check is
required by state law, persons may be employed or engaged as volunteers or
independent contractors on a conditional basis according to law and rules
adopted by the department.

(8)
No provider or staff, or prospective provider or staff, with a stipulated
finding of fact, conclusion of law, an agreed order, or finding of fact,
conclusion of law, or final order issued by a disciplining authority, a court
of law, or entered into a state registry finding him or her guilty of abuse,
neglect, exploitation, or abandonment of a minor or a vulnerable adult as
defined in chapter 74.34 RCW shall be employed in the care of and have
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults.

(9)
The department shall establish, by rule, a state registry which contains
identifying information about personal care aides identified under this chapter
who have substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or
abandonment of a vulnerable adult as defined in RCW 74.34.020. The rule must
include disclosure, disposition of findings, notification, findings of fact,
appeal rights, and fair hearing requirements. The department shall disclose,
upon request, substantiated findings of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation,
or abandonment to any person so requesting this information.

(10)
The department shall by rule develop training requirements for individual
providers and home care agency providers. Individual providers and home
care agency providers must satisfactorily complete department-approved
orientation, basic training, and continuing education as defined by the
department by rule. The department will work in collaboration with providers,
consumers, caregivers, advocates, family members, educators, and other
interested parties in the rule-making process. The department shall deny
payment to an individual provider or a home care provider who does not complete
the training requirements within the time limit specified by the
department by rule.

(11)
The department shall create an approval system by rule by March 1, 2001, for
those seeking to conduct department-approved training. In the rule-making
process, the department will collaborate with providers, consumers, caregivers,
advocates, family members, educators, and other interested parties.

(12)
The department shall establish, by rule, training, background checks, and other
quality assurance requirements for personal aides who provide in-home services
funded by medicaid personal care as described in RCW 74.09.520, community
options program entry system waiver services as described in RCW 74.39A.030, or
chore services as described in RCW 74.39A.110 that are equivalent to
requirements for individual providers.

(((12)))
(13) Under existing funds the department shall establish internally a
quality improvement standards committee to monitor the development of standards
and to suggest modifications.

(((13))) (14) Within existing funds, the department
shall design, develop, and implement a long-term care training program that is
flexible, relevant, and qualifies towards the requirements for a nursing
assistant certificate as established under chapter 18.88A RCW. This subsection
does not require completion of the nursing assistant certificate training
program by providers or their staff. The long-term care teaching curriculum
must consist of a fundamental module, or modules, and a range of other
available relevant training modules that provide the caregiver with appropriate
options that assist in meeting the resident's care needs. Some of the training
modules may include, but are not limited to, specific training on the special
care needs of persons with developmental disabilities, dementia, mental illness,
and the care needs of the elderly. No less than one training module must be
dedicated to workplace violence prevention. The nursing care quality assurance
commission shall work together with the department to develop the curriculum
modules. The nursing care quality assurance commission shall direct the
nursing assistant training programs to accept some or all of the skills and
competencies from the curriculum modules towards meeting the requirements for a
nursing assistant certificate as defined in chapter 18.88A RCW. A process may
be developed to test persons completing modules from a caregiver's class to
verify that they have the transferable skills and competencies for entry into a
nursing assistant training program. The department may review whether
facilities can develop their own related long-term care training programs. The
department may develop a review process for determining what previous
experience and training may be used to waive some or all of the mandatory
training. The department of social and health services and the nursing care
quality assurance commission shall work together to develop an implementation
plan by December 12, 1998.

---
END ---