BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.43.832 and 1997 c 392 s 524 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that businesses and organizations providing services to
children, developmentally disabled persons, and vulnerable adults need adequate
information to determine which employees or licensees to hire or engage. The
legislature further finds that many developmentally disabled individuals and
vulnerable adults desire to hire their own employees directly and also need
adequate information to determine which employees or licensees to hire or
engage. Therefore, the Washington state patrol criminal identification system
shall disclose, upon the request of a business or organization as defined in
RCW 43.43.830, a developmentally disabled person, or a vulnerable adult as
defined in RCW 43.43.830 or his or her guardian, an applicant's record for
convictions of offenses against children or other persons, convictions for
crimes relating to financial exploitation, but only if the victim was a
vulnerable adult, adjudications of child abuse in a civil action, the issuance
of a protection order against the respondent under chapter 74.34 RCW, and
disciplinary board final decisions and any subsequent criminal charges
associated with the conduct that is the subject of the disciplinary board final
decision.

(2)
The legislature also finds that the state board of education may request of the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system information regarding a
certificate applicant's record for convictions under subsection (1) of this
section.

(3)
The legislature also finds that law enforcement agencies, the office of the
attorney general, prosecuting authorities, and the department of social and
health services may request this same information to aid in the investigation
and prosecution of child, developmentally disabled person, and vulnerable adult
abuse cases and to protect children and adults from further incidents of abuse.

(4)
The legislature further finds that the department of social and health services
must consider the information listed in subsection (1) of this section in the
following circumstances:

(a)
When considering persons for state positions directly responsible for the care,
supervision, or treatment of children, developmentally disabled persons, or
vulnerable adults;

(b)
When considering persons for state positions involving unsupervised access
to vulnerable adults to conduct comprehensive assessments, financial
eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities,
investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions otherwise
required by federal law to meet employment standards;

(c)
When licensing agencies or facilities with individuals in positions directly
responsible for the care, supervision, or treatment of children,
developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not limited
to agencies or facilities licensed under chapter 74.15 or 18.51 RCW;

(((c)))
(d) When contracting with individuals or businesses or organizations for
the care, supervision, case management, or treatment of children,
developmentally disabled persons, or vulnerable adults, including but not
limited to services contracted for under chapter 18.20, 18.48, 70.127, 70.128,
72.36, or 74.39A RCW or Title 71A RCW.

(5)
Whenever a state conviction record check is required by state law, persons may
be employed or engaged as volunteers or independent contractors on a
conditional basis pending completion of the state background investigation.
Whenever a national criminal record check through the federal bureau of
investigation is required by state law, a person may be employed or engaged as
a volunteer or independent contractor on a conditional basis pending completion
of the national check. The Washington personnel resources board shall adopt
rules to accomplish the purposes of this subsection as it applies to state
employees.

(6)(a)
For purposes of facilitating timely access to criminal background information
and to reasonably minimize the number of requests made under this section,
recognizing that certain health care providers change employment frequently, health
care facilities may, upon request from another health care facility, share
copies of completed criminal background inquiry information.

(b)
Completed criminal background inquiry information may be shared by a willing
health care facility only if the following conditions are satisfied: The
licensed health care facility sharing the criminal background inquiry
information is reasonably known to be the person's most recent employer, no
more than twelve months has elapsed from the date the person was last employed
at a licensed health care facility to the date of their current employment
application, and the criminal background information is no more than two years
old.

(c)
If criminal background inquiry information is shared, the health care facility
employing the subject of the inquiry must require the applicant to sign a
disclosure statement indicating that there has been no conviction or finding as
described in RCW 43.43.842 since the completion date of the most recent
criminal background inquiry.

(d)
Any health care facility that knows or has reason to believe that an applicant
has or may have a disqualifying conviction or finding as described in RCW
43.43.842, subsequent to the completion date of their most recent criminal
background inquiry, shall be prohibited from relying on the applicant's
previous employer's criminal background inquiry information. A new criminal
background inquiry shall be requested pursuant to RCW 43.43.830 through
43.43.842.

(e)
Health care facilities that share criminal background inquiry information shall
be immune from any claim of defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any
other claim in connection with any dissemination of this information in
accordance with this subsection.

(f)
Health care facilities shall transmit and receive the criminal background
inquiry information in a manner that reasonably protects the subject's rights
to privacy and confidentiality.

(g)
For the purposes of this subsection, "health care facility" means a
nursing home licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, a boarding home licensed under
chapter 18.20 RCW, or an adult family home licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW.

(7)
Background checks required under this section shall be completed within one
month of the initial request. If a federal bureau of investigation check is
required in addition to the state background check, an applicant who is not
disqualified based on the results of the state background check shall be
eligible for a one hundred twenty day provisional approval to hire, pending the
outcome of the federal bureau of investigation check. If the federal bureau of
investigation check disqualifies an applicant, the department shall notify the
requestor that the provisional approval to hire is withdrawn and the applicant
may be terminated.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.20A.710 and 1999 c 336 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall investigate the conviction records, pending charges or
disciplinary board final decisions of:

(a)
Persons being considered for state employment in positions directly responsible
for the supervision, care, or treatment of children, vulnerable adults,
or individuals with mental illness or developmental disabilities; ((and))

(b)
Persons being considered for state employment in positions involving
unsupervised access to vulnerable adults to conduct comprehensive assessments,
financial eligibility determinations, licensing and certification activities,
investigations, surveys, or case management; or for state positions otherwise
required by federal law to meet employment standards; and

(c)
Individual providers who are paid by the state for in-home services and hired
by individuals with physical disabilities, developmental disabilities, mental
illness, or mental impairment, including but not limited to services provided
under chapter 74.39A RCW.

(2)
The investigation may include an examination of state and national criminal
identification data. The secretary shall use the information solely for the
purpose of determining the character, suitability, and competence of these
applicants.

(3)
The secretary shall provide the results of the state background check on
individual providers to the individuals with physical disabilities, developmental
disabilities, mental illness, or mental impairment or to their legal guardians,
if any, for their determination of the character, suitability, and competence
of the applicants. If an individual elects to hire or retain an individual
provider after receiving notice from the department that the applicant has a
conviction for an offense that would disqualify the applicant from employment
with the department, then the secretary shall deny payment for any subsequent
services rendered by the disqualified individual provider.

(4)
Criminal justice agencies shall provide the secretary such information as they
may have and that the secretary may require for such purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---