BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Promoting the good health of children is a paramount interest of the state of
Washington. Children with poor health are less likely to grow into productive
adults. They are less able to function well in school. And, if they develop
health problems that are often preventable, they are very expensive to care for
and educate. The vast majority of children in Washington state are eligible
for some health insurance, but many are difficult to enroll in these insurance
programs because of many barriers. Uninsured children are less likely to have
a usual source of care and get the preventive care needed to prevent serious
illness. Also, many insured children do not receive the preventive services
they need. It is the intent of the legislature to make all children eligible
for preventive services and ensure they have appropriate preventive services.
It is the further intent of the legislature to identify children who are
without access to health care, develop systems to improve their access to
preventive services, and examine ways to ensure that these children have access
to acute and chronic care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
kids get care pilot project is established in the department of health. The
secretary of the department shall:

(1)
Appoint a director of the kids get care pilot program. The director shall
coordinate with the health care authority and the department of social and
health services to develop administrative procedures and coordinated funding
mechanisms to carry out the intent of this program. These agencies shall
cooperate with the director to develop a program that is clear, straightforward
and easily understandable to the families and providers involved;

(2)
Identify five counties in different congressional districts in which to
establish pilot projects;

(3)
Develop a simple, uniform eligibility system that builds as much as possible on
existing technology to enroll children in all public programs and identify
children who are not eligible for any other health coverage or insurance. The
eligibility system shall be available to all cooperating providers who care for
children, social service agencies, and outreach organizations interested in
enrolling children in health insurance;

(4)
Identify providers in the pilot counties who are interested in caring for
children and are willing to participate in this program. The goal shall be to
find a medical home for all of the children in these communities and develop a
system to ensure that children needing a medical home are referred to and
accepted by participating providers;

(5)
Develop funding for this pilot program from private sources and by maximizing
public sources already appropriated. The funding shall be used to support
staff developing and administering this program and to pay for the preventive
services provided to the children who are not otherwise covered by existing
private or public insurance;

(6)
Develop a schedule of preventive services to which all children should have
access. This schedule of preventive benefits shall be used to establish the
basic services that the program will subsidize as outlined in subsection (7) of
this section;

(7)
Establish a sliding scale so that the preventive services funded under this
program are partially subsidized for lower income families but remain
affordable;

(8)
Coordinate the pilot projects with local health departments to ensure that
population-based information and outreach is used to maximize the efficiency of
the outreach, enrollment, and delivery of preventive services;

(9)
Develop outreach programs in all pilot sites that emphasize the public health
messages of good health habits, appropriate screening, effective services, and
the availability of these preventive services;

(10)
Coordinate this outreach with local health departments, social service providers,
health care providers, schools, religious institutions, and other interested
parties in the communities; and

(11)
Develop a system to measure the impact of this program on the health of the
children in the pilot communities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
kids get care account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from private sources must be deposited in the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only to support the purposes of the kids get care
project established by section 2 of this act. Only the secretary of the
department of health or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
secretary of the department of health shall report to the governor and the
legislature on the effectiveness of the kids get care project by December 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the department of health for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes of this act.

---
END ---