BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A statement made by a vulnerable adult describing any act or attempted act of
sexual abuse on the vulnerable adult by another or describing any act of
physical abuse of the vulnerable adult that results in substantial bodily harm
as defined by RCW 9A.04.110, not otherwise admissible by statute or court rule,
is admissible in evidence in criminal proceedings if:

(a)
The court finds, in a hearing conducted outside the presence of a jury, that
the time, content, and circumstances of the statement provide sufficient
indicia of reliability; and

(b)
The vulnerable adult either:

(i)
Testifies at the proceedings; or

(ii)
Is unavailable as a witness and there is corroborative evidence of the act.

(2)
A statement may not be admitted under this section unless the proponent of the
statement makes known to the adverse party his or her intention to offer the
statement and the particulars of the statement sufficiently in advance of the
proceedings to provide the adverse party with a fair opportunity to prepare to
meet the statement.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "vulnerable adult" means a person
sixty years of age or older who:

(a)
Has functional, mental, or physical inability to care for himself or herself;

(b)
Is found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or

(c) Has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020.

---
END ---