BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
27.53.020 and 1986 c 266 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The
discovery, identification, excavation, and study of the state's archaeological
resources, the providing of information on archaeological sites for their
nomination to the state and national registers of historic places, the
maintaining of a complete inventory of archaeological sites and collections,
and the providing of information to state, federal, and private construction
agencies regarding the possible impact of construction activities on the
state's archaeological resources, are proper public functions; and the ((Washington
archaeological research center)) office of archaeology and historic
preservation, created ((under the authority of)) in chapter
((39.34)) 27.34 RCW ((as now existing or hereafter amended)),
is hereby designated as an appropriate agency to carry out these functions.
The director, in consultation with the ((Washington archaeological research
center)) office of archaeology and historic preservation, shall provide
guidelines for the selection of depositories designated by the state for
archaeological resources. The legislature directs that there shall be full
cooperation amongst the department, the ((Washington archaeological research
center)) office of archaeology and historic preservation, and other
agencies of the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
27.53.070 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 82 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the declared intention of the legislature that field investigations on
privately owned lands should be discouraged except in accordance with both the
provisions and spirit of this chapter and persons having knowledge of the
location of archaeological sites or resources are encouraged to communicate
such information to the ((Washington archaeological research center)) office
of archaeology and historic preservation. Such information shall not
constitute a public record which requires disclosure pursuant to the exception
authorized in RCW 42.17.310, as now or hereafter amended, to avoid site
depredation.

Sec.
3. RCW
27.53.080 and 1986 c 266 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Qualified or professional archaeologists, in performance of their
duties, are hereby authorized to enter upon public lands of the state of
Washington and its political subdivisions, at such times and in such manner as
not to interfere with the normal management thereof, for the purposes of doing archaeological
resource location and evaluation studies, including site sampling activities.
Scientific excavations are to be carried out only after appropriate agreement
has been made between a professional archaeologist or an institution of higher
education and the agency or political subdivision responsible for such lands.
Notice of such agreement shall be filed with the ((Washington archaeological
research center)) office of archaeology and historic preservation
and by them to the department. Amateur societies may engage in such activities
by submitting and having approved by the responsible agency or political
subdivision a written proposal detailing the scope and duration of the
activity. Before approval, a proposal from an amateur society shall be
submitted to the ((Washington archaeological research center)) office
of archaeology and historic preservation for review and recommendation.

---
END ---