BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
The lack of a reliable telephone number for receiving calls presents
significant barriers to obtaining employment, housing, medical care, and social
services;

(b)
Assisting current and former welfare recipients, other low-wage workers, and
homeless people to find employment, housing, medical care, and social services
is critical to the success of the state's welfare reform efforts; and

(c)
Community service voice mail has a proven record of improving recipients'
success in finding employment and housing, and in accessing medical care and
social services compared to clients without access to reliable telephone
numbers.

(2)
The legislature therefore intends to expand the availability of community
service voice mail programs by establishing community service voice mail as a
component of the Washington telephone assistance program.

Sec.
2. RCW
80.36.005 and 1993 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((As
used in this chapter)) The definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 80.36.410 through 80.36.475, unless the context ((indicates)) clearly
requires otherwise((,)).

(1)
"Community action agency" means local community action agencies or
local community service agencies designated by the department of community,
trade, and economic development under chapter 43.63A RCW.

(2)
"Community service voice mail" means a computerized telephone
answering service with the capabilities described in RCW 80.36.420(4).

(3)
"Department" means the department of social and health
services.

Sec.
3. RCW
80.36.410 and 1987 c 229 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that universal telephone service is an important policy
goal of the state. The legislature further finds that: (a) Recent
changes in the telecommunications industry, such as federal access charges,
raise concerns about the ability of low-income persons to continue to afford
access to local exchange telephone service; and (b) many low-income persons
do not have a permanent residence in which to receive local exchange telephone
service.

(2)
Therefore, the legislature finds that: (a) It is in the public interest
to take steps to mitigate the effects of these changes on low-income persons;
and (b) advances in telecommunications technologies, such as community service
voice mail, provide new and economically efficient ways to secure many of the
benefits of universal service to low-income persons who are not customers of
local exchange telephone service.

Sec.
4. RCW
80.36.420 and 1990 c 170 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington telephone assistance program shall be available to ((participants))
eligible clients of department programs ((set forth in RCW 80.36.470))
and community action agency services, except that clients of community
action agency services shall be eligible only for the community service voice
mail described in subsection (4) of this section. Assistance shall consist
of the following components:

(1)
A discount on service connection fees of fifty percent or more as set forth in
RCW 80.36.460.

(2)
A waiver of deposit requirements on local exchange service, as set forth in RCW
80.36.460.

(3)
A discounted flat rate service for local exchange service, which shall be
subject to the following conditions:

(a)
The commission shall establish a single telephone assistance rate for all local
exchange companies operating in the state of Washington. The telephone
assistance rate shall include any federal end user access charges and any other
charges necessary to obtain local exchange service.

(b)
The commission shall, in establishing the telephone assistance rate, consider
all charges for local exchange service, including federal end user access
charges, mileage charges, extended area service, and any other charges
necessary to obtain local exchange service.

(c)
The telephone assistance rate shall only be available to eligible customers
subscribing to the lowest available local exchange flat rate service, where the
lowest local exchange flat rate, including any federal end user access charges
and any other charges necessary to obtain local exchange service, is greater
than the telephone assistance rate. Low-income senior citizens sixty years of
age and older and other low-income persons identified by the department as
medically needy shall, where single-party service is available, be provided
with single-party service as the lowest available local exchange flat rate
service.

(d)
The cost of providing the service shall be paid, to the maximum extent
possible, by a waiver of all or part of the federal end user access charge and,
to the extent necessary, from the telephone assistance fund created by RCW
80.36.430.

(4)
A community service voice mailbox that provides recipients with: (a) An
individually assigned telephone number; (b) the ability to record a personal
greeting; and (c) a secure private security code to retrieve messages. The
community service voice mailbox may also include a toll-free line through which
recipients can access their community service voice mailboxes at no charge.

Sec.
5. RCW
80.36.430 and 1990 c 170 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington telephone assistance program shall be funded by a telephone
assistance excise tax on all switched access lines and by funds from any
federal government or other programs for this purpose. Switched access lines
are defined in RCW 82.14B.020. The telephone assistance excise tax shall be
applied equally to all residential and business access lines not to exceed
fourteen cents per month. The telephone assistance excise tax shall be
separately identified on each ratepayer's bill as the "Washington
telephone assistance program." All money collected from the telephone
assistance excise tax shall be transferred to a telephone assistance fund administered
by the department.

(2)
The department shall be the fund administrator for local exchange companies,
and the department of community, trade, and economic development shall be the
fund administrator for community action agencies. Local exchange companies
and community action agencies shall bill ((the)) their
fund administrator for their expenses incurred in offering the telephone
assistance program, including administrative and program expenses.

(3)
The department shall disburse the money to the local exchange companies and
to the department of community, trade, and economic development, except that
the total amount of funds that may be paid annually to the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall not exceed ten percent of the
total annual telephone assistance fund revenues collected. The department
is exempted from having to conclude a contract with local exchange companies in
order to effect this reimbursement. The department of community, trade, and
economic development shall disburse the money to the community action agencies.

(4)
The ((department)) fund administrators shall recover ((its))
their administrative costs from the fund. The ((department)) fund
administrator may specify by rule the range and extent of administrative
and program expenses that will be reimbursed to local exchange companies or
community action agencies.

Sec.
6. RCW
80.36.440 and 1990 c 170 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission ((and)), the department, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development may adopt any rules necessary to
implement RCW 80.36.410 through 80.36.470.

(2)
The rules relating to community service voice mail shall identify funding
priorities that extend the benefits of community service voice mail to the
greatest number of eligible clients. Within available resources, funding shall
be made available for: (a) Deployment of new community service voice mail
systems, including costs for start-up and installation, staff to train
participating agencies, and maintaining program data; (b) installation of
toll-free lines through which recipients of existing community service voice
mail can access their community service voice mailboxes at no charge; (c)
expansion of the capacity of existing community service voice mail; and (d)
payment for continuing and expanding telephone services of existing community
service voice mail, including maintenance expenses, operating expenses, and
administrative expenses. The rules may require community action agencies to
match up to fifty percent of the funds received from the telephone assistance
program or to demonstrate the acquisition of in-kind contributions from local
exchange companies or vendors of community service voice mail hardware or
software.

Sec.
7. RCW
80.36.450 and 1993 c 249 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington telephone assistance program shall be limited to one residential
access line per eligible household for services provided by local exchange
companies or to one community service voice mailbox per eligible person for
services provided by community action agencies.

Sec.
8. RCW
80.36.460 and 1990 c 170 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local exchange companies shall file tariffs with the commission which waive
deposits on local exchange service for eligible subscribers and which establish
a fifty percent discount on service connection fees for eligible subscribers.
Part or all of the remaining fifty percent of service connection fees may be
paid by funds from federal government or other programs for this purpose. The
commission or other appropriate agency shall make timely application for any
available federal funds. The remaining portion of the connection fee to be
paid by the subscriber shall be expressly payable by installment fees spread
over a period of months. A subscriber may, however, choose to pay the
connection fee in a lump sum. Costs associated with the waiver and discount
shall be accounted for separately and recovered from the telephone assistance
fund. Eligible subscribers shall be allowed one waiver of a deposit and one
discount on service connection fees per year.

(2)
Community action agencies may not charge recipients for community service voice
mail.

Sec.
9. RCW
80.36.470 and 1990 c 170 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Adult recipients of department-administered programs for the financially needy
which provide continuing financial or medical assistance, food stamps, or
supportive services to persons in their own homes are eligible for
participation in the telephone assistance program. The department shall notify
the participants of their eligibility.

(2)
Adult clients of community action agency services are eligible for
participation in the community service voice mail of the telephone assistance
program if they do not reside in a residence with local exchange telephone
service or do not have a reliable means of directly receiving telephone calls
or messages.

Sec.
10. RCW
80.36.475 and 1990 c 170 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall report to the ((energy and utilities)) committees of
the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over
telecommunications services by December 1 of each year on the status of the
Washington telephone assistance program. The report shall include the number
of participants by qualifying ((social service)) department or community
action agency programs receiving benefits from the telephone assistance
program and the type of benefits participants receive. The report shall also
include a description of the geographical distribution of participants, the
program's annual revenue and expenditures, and any recommendations for
legislative action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. RCW
80.36.005 is recodified as a new section in chapter 80.36 RCW to be codified
immediately before RCW 80.36.410.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 3 through 9 of this act expire June 30, 2003.

---
END ---