BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A compact,
in form as in this section fully set forth, shall be in effect when the states
of Idaho, Montana, and Oregon become parties thereto, and the consent of
congress has been granted as required by Article I, section 10 of the United
States Constitution.

THE
COLUMBIA RIVER NATURAL RESOURCES MANAGEMENT COMPACT

The
contracting states do hereby agree as follows:

ARTICLE
I.

The
purposes of this compact, entitled the Columbia River Natural Resources
Management Compact, are and shall be to promote the better regional management
and coordination of natural resources management issues and other issues
pertaining to the governance and use of the Columbia river.

ARTICLE
II.

This
agreement shall become operative immediately as to those states executing it
whenever the compacting states have executed it in the form that is in
accordance with the laws of the executing states and the congress has given its
consent.

ARTICLE
III.

Each
state joining herein shall appoint, as determined by state statutes, six
legislators, three from the state senate and three from the state house of
representatives, to a commission hereby constituted and designated as the
Columbia River Governance Commission. Of the members appointed, all may not
belong to the same political party. This commission shall be invested with the
powers and duties set forth herein.

The
term of each commissioner of the Columbia River Governance Commission shall be
four years. A commissioner shall hold office until a successor shall be
appointed and qualified, but such successor's term shall expire four years from
legal date of expiration of the term of the predecessor. Vacancies occurring
in the office of such commissioner from any reason or cause shall be filled for
the unexpired term, or a commissioner may be removed from office, as provided
by the statutes of the state concerned. Each commissioner may delegate in writing
from time to time, to a deputy, the power to be present and participate,
including voting as the representative or substitute, at any meeting of or
hearing by or other proceeding of the commission.

Voting
powers under this compact shall be limited to one vote for each state
regardless of the number of representatives.

ARTICLE
IV.

The
duty of the Columbia River Governance Commission shall be to assess programs of
state and federal agencies responsible for natural resource management issues
and governance issues of the Columbia river and to participate in decision
making by federal agencies on issues affecting the use of and activities on the
Columbia river. The commission shall have power to recommend the coordination
of the exercise of the police powers of the several states within their
respective jurisdictions to promote the efficient use and management of the
Columbia river and resources related to the Columbia river.

To
that end the commission shall draft and, after consultation with the advisory
committee hereinafter authorized, recommend to the governors and legislative
branches of the various signatory states hereto legislation dealing with the
governance and management of the Columbia river and the natural resources
related to the Columbia river over which the signatory states jointly or
separately now have or may hereafter acquire jurisdiction. The commission
shall, more than one month prior to any regular meeting of the legislative
branch in any state signatory hereto, present to the governor of such state its
recommendations relating to enactments by the legislative branch of that state
in furthering the intents and purposes of this compact.

The
commission shall consult with and advise the pertinent administrative agencies
in the signatory states of such regulations as it deems advisable with regard
to problems connected with the governance and use of the Columbia river and
that lie within the jurisdiction of such agencies.

The
commission shall have power to recommend to the federal government and to
states signatory hereto management strategies for the natural resources of the
Columbia river and any changes to federal or state statutes, regulations, or
rules necessary to the efficient and sound governance of the Columbia river and
its natural resources.

ARTICLE
V.

The
commission shall elect from its number a chairperson and a vice-chairperson and
shall appoint and at its pleasure remove or discharge such officers and
employees as may be required to carry out the provisions of this compact and
shall fix and determine their duties, qualifications, and compensation. Said
commission shall adopt rules and regulations for the conduct of its business.
It may establish and maintain one or more offices for the transaction of its
business and may meet at any time or place within the territorial limits of the
signatory states but must meet at least once a year.

ARTICLE
VI.

No
action shall be taken by the commission except by the affirmative vote of a
majority of the whole number of compacting states represented at any meeting.
No recommendation shall be made by the commission in regard to the management
of natural resources related to, or the governance and use of, the Columbia
river except by the vote of a majority of the compacting states that have an
interest in such issues.

ARTICLE
VII.

The
natural resource agencies of the signatory states shall act in collaboration as
the official research agency of the Columbia River Governance Commission.

An
advisory committee to be representative of such other interests of each state
as the commission deems advisable shall be established by the commission as
soon as practicable for the purpose of advising the commission upon such
recommendations as it may desire to make.

ARTICLE
VIII.

Nothing
in this compact shall be construed to limit the powers of any state or to
repeal or prevent the enactment of any legislation or the enforcement of any
requirement by any state imposing additional conditions and restrictions to
conserve its natural resources.

ARTICLE
IX.

Continued
absence of representation or of any representative on the commission from any
state party hereto shall be brought to the attention of the governor thereof.

ARTICLE
X.

The
states that sign this compact agree to make available annual funds for the
support of the commission on the following basis:

Sixty
percent of the annual budget shall be shared equally by those member states
having as a boundary the Columbia river; and forty percent of the annual budget
shall be shared equally by the other member states.

The
annual contribution of each member state shall be figured to the nearest one
hundred dollars.

This
article shall become effective upon its enactment by the states of Idaho,
Montana, Oregon, and Washington and upon ratification by congress by virtue of
the authority vested in it under Article I, section 10 of the United States
Constitution.

ARTICLE
XI.

This
compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each state until
renounced by it. Renunciation of this compact must be preceded by sending six
months' written notice of intention to withdraw from the compact to the other
parties hereto.

ARTICLE
XII.

The
state of Nevada or any state having rivers or streams tributary to the Columbia
river may become a contracting state by enactment of the Columbia River Natural
Resources Management Compact. Upon admission of any new state to the compact,
the purposes of the compact and the duties of the commission shall extend to
the development of joint programs for the use and governance of the Columbia
river and its natural resources in which the contracting states share mutual
concerns.

This
article shall become effective upon its enactment by the states of Idaho,
Montana, Oregon, and Washington and upon ratification by congress by virtue of
the authority vested in it under Article I, section 10 of the United States
Constitution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 75 RCW.

---
END ---