BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall adopt rules that take effect no later than July 1, 2000,
revising the signs, signals, and barricades standards governing flaggers used
in traffic control operations. The rules must be designed to improve options
available to ensure the safety of the traffic control operations.

(2)
The director may take the necessary steps to ensure that the rules required by
subsection (1) of this section take effect no later than July 1, 2000. In
developing the rules, the department must consult with the Washington state
department of transportation and other persons with an interest in improving
the safety of traffic control operations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
director of the department of labor and industries must report, by September
15, 2000, to the senate labor and workforce development committee and the house
commerce and labor committee on the rules adopted under section 1 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act shall be known and cited as the "Kim Vendl Worker Safety Act."

---
END ---