BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.07.290 and 1998 c 245 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington quality award council shall be organized as a private, nonprofit
corporation, in accordance with chapter 24.03 RCW and this section((, with
limited staff assistance by the secretary of state as provided by RCW 43.07.295)).

(2)
The council shall oversee the governor's Washington state quality ((achievement))
award program. The purpose of the program is to improve the overall
competitiveness of the state's economy by stimulating Washington state
industries, business, and organizations to bring about measurable success
through setting standards of organizational excellence, encouraging
organizational self-assessment, identifying successful organizations as role
models, and providing a valuable mechanism for promoting and strengthening a
commitment to continuous quality improvement in all sectors of the state's
economy. The ((program)) governor shall annually ((recognize))
present the award to organizations that improve the quality of their
products and services and are noteworthy examples of high-performing work
organizations, as determined by the council in consultation with the
governor or appointed representative.

(3)
The ((council shall consist of the governor and the secretary of state, or
their designees, as chair and vice-chair, respectively, the director of the
department of community, trade, and economic development, or his or her
designee, and twenty-seven members appointed by the)) governor shall
appoint a representative to serve on the board of directors of the council.
((Those twenty-seven council members must be selected from recognized
professionals who shall have backgrounds in or experience with effective
quality improvement techniques, employee involvement quality of work life
initiatives, development of innovative labor-management relations, and other
recognized leaders in state and local government and private business. The
membership of the board beyond the chair and vice-chair shall be appointed by
the governor for terms of three years.))

(4)
The council shall establish a board of examiners, a recognition committee, and
such other ((subcouncil groups)) committees or subgroups as it
deems appropriate to carry out its responsibilities. ((Subcouncil groups
established by the council may be composed of noncouncilmembers.))

(5)
((The council shall compile a list of resources available for organizations
interested in productivity improvement, quality techniques, effective methods
of work organization, and upgrading work force skills as a part of the quality
for Washington state foundation's ongoing educational programs. The council
shall make the list of resources available to the general public.

(6))) The
council may conduct such public information, research, education, and
assistance programs as it deems appropriate to further quality improvement in
organizations operating in the state of Washington.

(((7)))
(6) The council shall:

(a)
Approve and announce ((achievement)) award recipients;

(b)
Approve guidelines to examine applicant organizations;

(c)
Approve appointment of ((judges and)) board of examiners; and

(d)
Arrange appropriate annual awards and recognition for recipients((, in
conjunction with the quality for Washington state foundation;

(e)
Formulate recommendations for change in the nomination form or award
categories, in cooperation with the quality for Washington state foundation;
and

(f)
Review any related education, training, technology transfer, and research
initiatives proposed to it, and that it determines merit such a review.

(8)
By January 1st of each even-numbered year, the council may report to the
governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature on its activities in
the proceeding two years and on any recommendations in state policies or
programs that could encourage quality improvement and the development of
high-performance work organizations)).

(((9)))
(7) The council shall cease to exist on July 1, ((1999)) 2004,
unless otherwise extended by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
43.07.295 (Washington quality award council--Administrative
assistance) and 1997 c 329 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
43.07.290, as amended by this act, is recodified as a section in chapter 43.06
RCW.

---
END ---