BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.105.052 and 1999 c 80 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall:

(1)
Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates to the department,
including but not limited to:

(a)
The review of agency information technology portfolios and related requests;
and

(b)
Implementation of state-wide and interagency policies, standards, and
guidelines;

(2)
Make available information services to state agencies and local governments and
public benefit nonprofit corporations on a full cost-recovery basis. For
the purposes of this section "public benefit nonprofit corporation"
means a public benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.005 that
is receiving local, state, or federal funds either directly or through a public
agency other than an Indian tribe or political subdivision of another state.
These services may include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;

(b)
Mainframe computing services;

(c)
Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation, installation, and use;

(d)
Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering, and
establishing master contracts;

(e)
Facilities management services for information technology equipment, equipment
repair, and maintenance service;

(f)
Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to provide for
connection to local cable services to allow for access to these public and
educational channels in the state;

(g)
Office automation services;

(h)
System development services; and

(i)
Training.

These
services are for discretionary use by customers and customers may elect other
alternatives for service if those alternatives are more cost-effective or
provide better service. Agencies may be required to use the backbone network
portions of the telecommunications services during an initial start-up period
not to exceed three years;

(3)
Establish rates and fees for services provided by the department to assure that
the services component of the department is self-supporting. A billing rate
plan shall be developed for a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting
process. The rate plan shall be subject to review at least annually by the
customer advisory board. The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by each
cost center and will show the components of the rate structure as mutually
determined by the department and the customer advisory board. The same rate
structure will apply to all user agencies of each cost center. The rate plan
and any adjustments to rates shall be approved by the office of financial
management. The services component shall not subsidize the operations of the
strategic planning and policy component;

(4)
With the advice of the information services board and agencies, develop a state
strategic information technology plan and performance reports as required under
RCW 43.105.160;

(5)
Develop plans for the department's achievement of state-wide goals and
objectives set forth in the state strategic information technology plan
required under RCW 43.105.160. These plans shall address such services as
telecommunications, central and distributed computing, local area networks,
office automation, and end user computing. The department shall seek the
advice of the customer advisory board and the board in the development of these
plans;

(6)
Under direction of the information services board and in collaboration with the
department of personnel, and other agencies as may be appropriate, develop
training plans and coordinate training programs that are responsive to the
needs of agencies;

(7)
Identify opportunities for the effective use of information services and
coordinate appropriate responses to those opportunities;

(8)
Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans, information technology
portfolios, or overall information processing performance as requested by the
board, agencies, the director of financial management, or the legislature.
Agencies may be required to reimburse the department for agency-requested
reviews;

(9)
Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting requirements, in
conjunction with the office of financial management, for agencies to follow;

(10)
Assist the office of financial management with budgetary and policy review of
agency plans for information services;

(11)
Provide staff support from the strategic planning and policy component to the
board for:

(a)
Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;

(b)
Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by the board;

(c)
Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;

(d)
Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;

(12)
Be the lead agency in coordinating video telecommunications services for all
state agencies and develop, pursuant to board policies, standards and common
specifications for leased and purchased telecommunications equipment. The
department shall not evaluate the merits of school curriculum, higher education
course offerings, or other education and training programs proposed for transmission
and/or reception using video telecommunications resources. Nothing in this
section shall abrogate or abridge the legal responsibilities of licensees of
telecommunications facilities as licensed by the federal communication
commission on March 27, 1990; and

(13) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry out
the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

---
END ---