BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.48.150 and 1992 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 49.48.160 through 49.48.190.

(1)
"Commission" means compensation paid a sales representative by a
principal in an amount based on a percentage of the dollar amount of certain
orders for or sales of the principal's product.

(2)
"Principal" means a person, whether or not the person has a permanent
or fixed place of business in this state, who:

(a)
Manufactures, produces, imports, offers, or distributes a product or
service, including but not limited to memberships, for sale to customers ((who
purchase the product for resale));

(b)
Uses a sales representative to solicit orders for the product or service;
and

(c)
Compensates the sales representative in whole or in part by commission.

(3)
"Sales representative" means a person who solicits, on behalf of a
principal, orders for the purchase ((at wholesale)) of the principal's
product or service, but does not include a person who places orders for
his or her own account for resale((,)) or purchases for his or
her own account for resale((, or sells or takes orders for the direct
sale of products to the ultimate consumer)).

Sec.
2. RCW
49.48.160 and 1992 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A contract between a principal and a sales representative under which the sales
representative is to solicit ((wholesale)) orders within this state must
be in writing and must set forth the method by which the sales representative's
commission is to be computed and paid, including the conditions for receipt
of commissions after termination of the contract or employment. The
principal shall provide the sales representative with a copy of the contract.
A provision in the contract establishing venue for an action arising under the
contract in a state other than this state is void.

(2)
If a sales representative is not provided a written contract and is denied a
commission, the principal is liable to the sales representative for twice the amount
of the commission upon a finding by a court of competent jurisdiction that the
commission is owed to the sales representative by the principal. When no
written contract has been entered into, any agreement between a sales
representative and a principal is deemed to incorporate the provisions of RCW
49.48.150 through 49.48.190.

(3)
During the course of the contract or employment, a sales representative
shall be paid the earned commission and all other moneys earned or payable in
accordance with the agreed terms of the contract, but no later than thirty days
after receipt of payment by the principal for products or ((goods)) services
sold on behalf of the principal by the sales representative.

Upon termination of a contract or employment, whether or not
the agreement is in writing, all earned commissions due to the sales
representative shall be paid within thirty days after receipt of payment by the
principal for products or ((goods)) services sold on behalf of
the principal by the sales representative, including earned commissions not due
when the contract or employment is terminated.

---
END ---