BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that patients with certain chronic debilitating
medical conditions have a critical need to live in high temperature
environments in order to sustain their functioning and prevent a worsening of
health conditions that are likely life-threatening. Their ability to maintain
a comfortable body temperature can directly affect the course of their
illnesses. Temperature-sensitive patients include those on life-support
equipment; or who are paraplegic or quadriplegic; with scleroderma, compromised
immune systems; or suffering from other life-threatening illnesses, including
spinal cord injuries, rheumatoid arthritis and diabetes. With inadequate
heating, a patient's internal organs degenerate with diminished blood supply
ultimately leading to emergent and more costly health services such as
transplants and dialysis. The financial trauma of the onset or progression of
these serious illnesses, coupled with inordinate heating costs, may require
these patients to become dependent on the state for the costs of meeting more
serious and intractable conditions. With the hope of preventing the onset of
more debilitating conditions and avoiding higher health costs associated with
them, it is the intent of the legislature to encourage power, light, and gas
distribution businesses in this state to offer discounts on heating costs to
temperature-sensitive patients by providing credits against the taxes imposed
by this chapter for customer payment reductions in accordance with the
provisions of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A light and power business or a gas distribution business may take a credit
against the tax imposed by this chapter for customer payment reductions,
subject to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
A customer must submit an application for a payment reduction to the
department. The application must contain a signed statement from a licensed
physician or osteopathic physician who certifies that the patient is a
temperature-sensitive person with a qualifying illness or condition as provided
under subsection (3)(b) of this section. After reviewing the application, the
department shall transmit an approved application to the light and power and
gas distribution businesses currently servicing the customer. Upon receipt of
an approved application, a light and power business and gas distribution
business shall begin providing the customer with a payment reduction and begin
taking the credit authorized under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
For the purposes of this section and unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a)
"Payment reduction" means a financial diminution in the amount of
money a customer must remit to a light and power business or gas distribution
business for services which qualify a light and power business or gas
distribution business for a tax credit authorized under subsection (1) of this
section. A payment reduction shall not exceed fifty percent of the money owed
to a light and power business or gas distribution business for services.

(b)
"Customer" means an individual that requires light and power service
or gas service and that:

(i)
Depends on life-support equipment;

(ii)
Has paraplegia or quadriplegia;

(iii)
Has scleroderma;

(iv)
Has a life-threatening illness; or

(v)
Has a compromised immune system.

(4) Application for a payment reduction may only be made in the
form and manner prescribed by the department. The department may adopt any
rules necessary for the effective administration of this section.

---
END ---