BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.10 RCW to read as follows:

Public bodies may use the design-build procedure under RCW
39.10.050 to award contracts for the design, fabrication, and installation of
building engineering systems, regardless of cost.

---
END ---