BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.46.410 and 1998 c 322 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Costs will be unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and
related to the provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2)
Unallowable costs include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a)
Costs of items or services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of
such items or services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly
reimbursed by the department as the result of an authorized reduction in
patient contribution;

(b)
Costs of services and items provided to recipients which are covered by the
department's medical care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident
day payment rate established by the department under this chapter;

(c)
Costs associated with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval
(part 100, Title 42 C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with
applicable standards, criteria, or plans. If the department was not given
timely notice of a proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be
unallowable up to the date they are determined to be reimbursable under
applicable federal regulations;

(d)
Costs associated with a construction or acquisition project requiring
certificate of need approval, or exemption from the requirements for
certificate of need for the replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant
to chapter 70.38 RCW if such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e)
Interest costs other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January
1, 1985;

(f)
Salaries or other compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders,
partners, principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor
or its home office, including all board of directors' fees for any purpose,
except reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g)
Costs in excess of limits or in violation of principles set forth in this
chapter;

(h)
Costs resulting from transactions or the application of accounting methods
which circumvent the principles of the payment system set forth in this
chapter;

(i)
Costs applicable to services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related
organization in excess of the lower of the cost to the related organization or
the price of comparable services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j)
Bad debts of non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients are
allowable if the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the
recipient's required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can
establish that reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually
uncollectible when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment
established that there was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;

(k)
Charity and courtesy allowances;

(l)
Cash, assessments, or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable
organizations, professional organizations, trade associations, or political
parties, and costs incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m)
Vending machine expenses;

(n)
Expenses for barber or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o)
Funeral and burial expenses;

(p)
Costs of gift shop operations and inventory;

(q)
Personal items such as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines,
and clothing, except those used in patient activity programs;

(r)
Fund-raising expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity
program;

(s)
Penalties and fines;

(t)
Expenses related to telephones, televisions, radios, and similar appliances in
patients' private accommodations;

(u)
Federal, state, and other income taxes;

(v)
Costs of special care services except where authorized by the department;

(w)
Expenses of an employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on
an equal or fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or
retirement plans;

(x)
Expenses of profit-sharing plans;

(y)
Expenses related to the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes
which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary
and economic provision of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(z)
Personal expenses and allowances of owners or relatives;

(aa)
All expenses of maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional
organizations;

(bb)
Costs related to agreements not to compete;

(cc)
Amortization of goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset,
whether related to resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally
accepted accounting principles or not;

(dd)
Expenses related to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor
would expend for the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs
related to patient care;

(ee)
Legal and consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the
department where a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where
otherwise the determination of the department stands;

(ff)
Legal and consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a
lawsuit against the department;

(gg)
Lease acquisition costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other
intangible assets;

(hh)
All rental or lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and
after January 1, 1985;

(ii)
Postsurvey charges incurred by the facility as a result of subsequent
inspections under RCW 18.51.050 which occur beyond the first postsurvey visit
during the certification survey calendar year;

(jj)
Compensation paid for any purchased nursing care services, including registered
nurse, licensed practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through
service contract arrangement in excess of the amount of compensation paid for
such hours of nursing care service had they been paid at the average hourly
wage, including related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of
like classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most
recent cost report period;

(kk)
For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and
depreciable assets that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of
1984 and implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(ll)
Costs reported by the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs,
due to statutory exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the
period to be covered by the rate;

(mm)
Costs of outside activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a
vehicle for personal purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out
for office space;

(nn)
Travel expenses outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the
province of British Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central
office of a chain organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether
inside or outside these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related
to resident care;

(oo)
Moving expenses of employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort
to recruit within the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province
of British Columbia;

(pp)
Depreciation in excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car
or other vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or
central office staff;

(qq)
Costs for temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered
with the secretary of the department of health;

(rr)
Payroll taxes associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation
of owners, relatives, and administrative personnel;

(ss)
Costs and fees associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(tt)
All advertising or promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted
advertising;

(uu)
Outside consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data
set completion proficiency;

(vv)
Interest charges assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure
to make a timely refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for
loans obtained to make the refunds; and

(ww)
((All home office or central office costs, whether on or off the nursing
facility premises, and whether allocated or not to specific services, in excess
of the median of those adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such costs
for the most recent report period; and

(xx))) Tax
expenses that a nursing facility has never incurred.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.46.421 and 1999 c 353 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of part E of this chapter is to determine nursing facility medicaid
payment rates that, in the aggregate for all participating nursing facilities,
are in accordance with the biennial appropriations act.

(2)(a)
The department shall use the nursing facility medicaid payment rate
methodologies described in this chapter to determine initial component rate
allocations for each medicaid nursing facility.

(b)
The initial component rate allocations shall be subject to adjustment as
provided in this section in order to assure that the state-wide average payment
rate to nursing facilities is less than or equal to the state-wide average
payment rate specified in the biennial appropriations act.

(3)
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating a legal right or
entitlement to any payment that (a) has not been adjusted under this section or
(b) would cause the state-wide average payment rate to exceed the state-wide
average payment rate specified in the biennial appropriations act.

(4)(a)
The state-wide average payment rate for the capital portion of the rate for any
state fiscal year under the nursing facility medicaid payment system, weighted
by patient days, shall not exceed the annual state-wide weighted average
nursing facility payment rate for the capital portion of the rate identified
for that fiscal year in the biennial appropriations act.

(b)
If the department determines that the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate for the capital portion of the rate calculated in accordance with this
chapter is likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
for the capital portion of the rate identified in the biennial appropriations
act, then the department shall adjust all nursing facility property and
financing allowance payment rates proportional to the amount by which the
weighted average rate allocations would otherwise exceed the budgeted capital
portion of the rate amount. Any such adjustments shall only be made
prospectively, not retrospectively, and shall be applied proportionately to
each component rate allocation for each facility.

(c)
Any rate adjustments made under (b) of this subsection that are in excess of
the amount necessary to comply with (a) of this subsection shall be refunded to
each nursing facility.

(5)(a)
The state-wide average payment rate for the noncapital portion of the rate,
excluding the tax component, for any state fiscal year under the nursing
facility payment system, weighted by patient days, shall not exceed the annual
state-wide weighted average nursing facility payment rate for the noncapital
portion of the rate identified for that fiscal year in the biennial
appropriations act.

(b)
If the department determines that the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate for the noncapital portion of the rate calculated in accordance with this
chapter is likely to exceed the weighted average nursing facility payment rate
for the noncapital portion of the rate identified in the biennial
appropriations act, then the department shall adjust all nursing facility
direct care, therapy care, support services, operations, and variable return
payment rates proportional to the amount by which the weighted average rate
allocations would otherwise exceed the budgeted noncapital portion of the rate
amount. Any such adjustments shall only be made prospectively, not
retrospectively, and shall be applied proportionately to each direct care,
therapy care, support services, operations, and variable return rate allocation
for each facility.

(c) Any rate adjustments made under (b) of this subsection that
are in excess of the amount necessary to comply with (a) of this subsection
shall be refunded to each nursing facility.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.46.431 and 1999 c 353 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Effective July 1, 1999, nursing facility medicaid payment rate allocations
shall be facility-specific and shall have ((seven)) eight
components: Direct care, therapy care, support services, tax,
operations, property, financing allowance, and variable return. The department
shall establish and adjust each of these components, as provided in this
section and elsewhere in this chapter, for each medicaid nursing facility in
this state.

(2)
All component rate allocations, excluding the tax component, shall be
based upon a minimum facility occupancy of eighty-five percent of licensed
beds, regardless of how many beds are set up or in use.

(3)
Information and data sources used in determining medicaid payment rate
allocations, including formulas, procedures, cost report periods, resident
assessment instrument formats, resident assessment methodologies, and resident
classification and case mix weighting methodologies, may be substituted or
altered from time to time as determined by the department.

(4)(a)
Direct care component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost
report data covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996
will be used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, direct care component
rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, direct care component rate allocations.

(b)
Beginning July 1, 2000, and for all subsequent July 1st nonrebased direct
care component rate allocations, based on ((1996))the rebase
year cost report data, direct care component rate allocations shall
be adjusted ((annually)) for economic trends and conditions by ((a
factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations act)) the
change in the nursing home input price index without capital costs published by
the health care financing administration of the department of health and human
services (HCFA index). The period to be used to measure the HCFA index
increase or decrease shall be the calendar year immediately preceding the July
1st nonrebased rate period. A different economic trends and conditions
adjustment factor or factors may be defined in the biennial appropriations act
for facilities whose direct care component rate is set equal to their adjusted
June 30, 1998, rate, as provided in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(c)
Beginning July 1, 2001, and for all subsequent July 1st rebased direct
care component rate allocations based on ((1999)) the rebase year
cost report data shall be adjusted ((annually)) for economic trends and
conditions by ((a factor or factors defined in the biennial appropriations
act)) the change in the HCFA index for the calendar year that immediately
precedes the July 1st rebased rate period, multiplied by a factor of 2.0.
A different economic trends and conditions adjustment factor or factors may be
defined in the biennial appropriations act for facilities whose direct care
component rate is set equal to their adjusted June 30, 1998, rate, as provided
in RCW 74.46.506(5)(k).

(5)(a)
Therapy care component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted
cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from
1996 will be used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, therapy care
component rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 will be used
for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, therapy care component rate
allocations.

(b)
Beginning July 1, 2000, and for all subsequent July 1st nonrebased therapy
care component rate allocations shall be adjusted ((annually)) for
economic trends and conditions by a ((factor or factors defined in the
biennial appropriations act)) change in the nursing home price input
without capital costs published by the health care financing administration of
the department of health and human services (HCFA index). The period to be
used to measure the HCFA index increase or decrease shall be the calendar year
immediately preceding the July 1st nonrebased rate period.

(c)
Beginning July 1, 2001, and for all subsequent July 1st rebased support
services component rate allocations, the rebase period cost report data shall
be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by the change in the HCFA index
for the calendar year that immediately precedes the July 1st rebased rate
period, multiplied by a factor of 2.0.

(6)(a)
Support services component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted
cost report data covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from
1996 shall be used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, support services
component rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used
for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, support services component rate
allocations.

(b)
Beginning July 1, 2000, and for all subsequent July 1st nonrebased support
services component rate allocations shall be adjusted ((annually)) for
economic trends and conditions by a ((factor or factors defined in the
biennial appropriations act)) change in the nursing home price input
without capital costs published by the health care financing administration of
the department of health and human services (HCFA index). The period to be used
to measure the HCFA index increase or decrease shall be the calendar year
immediately preceding the July 1st nonrebased rate period.

(c)
Beginning July 1, 2001, and for all subsequent July 1st rebased support
services component rate allocations, the rebase period cost report data shall
be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by the change in the HCFA index
for the calendar year that immediately precedes the July 1st rebased rate
period, multiplied by a factor of 2.0.

(7)(a)
Operations component rate allocations shall be established using adjusted cost
report data covering at least six months. Adjusted cost report data from 1996
shall be used for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, operations component
rate allocations; adjusted cost report data from 1999 shall be used for July 1,
2001, through June 30, 2004, operations component rate allocations.

(b)
Beginning July 1, 2000, and for all subsequent July 1st nonrebased operations
component rate allocations shall be adjusted ((annually)) for economic
trends and conditions by a ((factor or factors defined in the biennial
appropriations act)) change in the nursing home price input without
capital costs published by the health care financing administration of the
department of health and human services (HCFA index). The period to be used to
measure the HCFA index increase or decrease shall be the calendar year
immediately preceding the July 1st nonrebased rate period.

(c)
Beginning July 1, 2001, and for all subsequent July 1st rebased operations component
rate allocations, the rebase period cost report data shall be adjusted for
economic trends and conditions by the change in the HCFA index for the calendar
year that immediately precedes the July 1st rebased rate period, multiplied by
a factor of 2.0.

(8)
((For July 1, 1998, through September 30, 1998, a facility's property and
return on investment component rates shall be the facility's June 30, 1998,
property and return on investment component rates, without increase.)) For
October 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999, a facility's property and ((return
on investment)) financing allowance component rates shall be rebased
utilizing 1997 adjusted cost report data covering at least six months of data.

(9)
Total payment rates under the nursing facility medicaid payment system shall
not exceed facility rates charged to the general public for comparable
services.

(10)
Medicaid contractors shall pay to all facility staff a minimum wage of the
greater of ((five dollars and fifteen cents per hour or)) the state
or federal minimum wage. To the extent that the percentage change in
the HCFA index, specified in this section, is less than the annual percentage
change in the state or federal minimum wage requirement, and notwithstanding
any peer group cost limitations, the department shall prospectively adjust each
contractor's rate component to fund the medicaid share of any such increase in
the minimum wage amount, including any related parity wage adjustments that a
contractor may make. However, any related parity wage adjustment that a
contractor may make as a result of an increase in the state or federal minimum
wage, the medicaid share shall be no greater than the percentage change between
the federal or state required minimum wage increase and only to the extent that
the percentage change in the minimum wage exceeds the percentage change in the
HCFA index as specified in this section.

(11)
The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions
for determining component rate allocations for facilities in circumstances not
directly addressed by this chapter, including but not limited to: The need to
prorate inflation for partial-period cost report data, newly constructed
facilities, existing facilities entering the medicaid program for the first
time or after a period of absence from the program, existing facilities with
expanded new bed capacity, existing medicaid facilities following a change of
ownership of the nursing facility business, facilities banking beds or
converting beds back into service, facilities having less than six months of
either resident assessment, cost report data, or both, under the current
contractor prior to rate setting, and other circumstances.

(12)
The department shall establish in rule procedures, principles, and conditions,
including necessary threshold costs, for adjusting rates to reflect capital
improvements or new requirements imposed by the department or the federal
government. Any such rate adjustments are subject to the provisions of RCW
74.46.421.

(13)
Prior to the July 1st rate period, the department shall recalculate any medians
that may be affected by removing the home office or central office cost
limitation under RCW 74.46.410 and taxes paid under section 7 of this act.

(14)
Following each July 1st rebased rate period, the department shall, by the
immediately following July 1st nonrebased rate period, recalculate any medians
affected by any appeals or errors or omissions made under this chapter and
shall make any necessary rate adjustments.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.46.511 and 1999 c 353 s 6 and 1999 c 181 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The therapy care component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of
medicaid one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified therapist as defined in
this chapter, including therapy supplies and therapy consultation, for one day
for one medicaid resident of a nursing facility. The therapy care component
rate allocation for October 1, 1998, through June 30, 2001, shall be based on
adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1996. The therapy component
rate allocation for July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2004, shall be based on
adjusted therapy costs and days from calendar year 1999. The therapy care
component rate shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions as
specified in RCW 74.46.431(5) (b) and (c), and shall be determined in
accordance with this section.

(2)
In rebasing, as provided in RCW 74.46.431(5)(a), the department shall take from
the cost reports of facilities the following reported information:

(a)
Direct one-on-one therapy charges for all residents by payer including charges
for supplies;

(b)
The total units or modules of therapy care for all residents by type of therapy
provided, for example, speech or physical. A unit or module of therapy care is
considered to be fifteen minutes of one-on-one therapy provided by a qualified
therapist or support personnel; and

(c)
Therapy consulting expenses for all residents.

(3)
The department shall determine for all residents the total cost per unit of
therapy for each type of therapy by dividing the total adjusted one-on-one
therapy expense for each type by the total units provided for that therapy
type.

(4)
The department shall divide medicaid nursing facilities in this state into two
peer groups:

(a)
Those facilities located within a metropolitan statistical area; and

(b)
Those not located in a metropolitan statistical area.

Metropolitan
statistical areas and nonmetropolitan statistical areas shall be as determined
by the United States office of management and budget or other applicable
federal office. The department shall array the facilities in each peer group
from highest to lowest based on their total cost per unit of therapy for each
therapy type. The department shall determine the median total cost per unit of
therapy for each therapy type and add ten percent of median total cost per unit
of therapy. The cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type at a nursing facility
shall be the lesser of its cost per unit of therapy for each therapy type or
the median total cost per unit plus ten percent for each therapy type for its
peer group.

(5)
The department shall calculate each nursing facility's therapy care component rate
allocation as follows:

(a)
To determine the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy type, the
allowable cost per unit of therapy for each type of therapy shall be multiplied
by the total therapy units for each type of therapy;

(b)
The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense shall be calculated taking
the allowable total therapy cost for each therapy type times the medicaid
percent of total therapy charges for each therapy type;

(c)
The medicaid allowable one-on-one therapy expense for each therapy type shall
be divided by total adjusted medicaid days to arrive at the medicaid one-on-one
therapy cost per patient day for each therapy type;

(d)
The medicaid one-on-one therapy cost per patient day for each therapy type
shall be multiplied by total adjusted patient days for all residents to
calculate the total allowable one-on-one therapy expense. The lesser of the
total allowable therapy consultant expense for the therapy type or a reasonable
percentage of allowable therapy consultant expense for each therapy type, as
established in rule by the department, shall be added to the total allowable
one-on-one therapy expense to determine the allowable therapy cost for each
therapy type;

(e)
The allowable therapy cost for each therapy type shall be added together, the
sum of which shall be the total allowable therapy expense for the nursing
facility;

(f)
The total allowable therapy expense will be divided by the greater of adjusted
total patient days from the cost report on which the therapy expenses were
reported, or patient days at eighty-five percent occupancy of licensed beds.
The outcome shall be the nursing facility's therapy care component rate
allocation.

(6)
The therapy care component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this
section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

(7) The therapy care component rate shall be suspended for medicaid
residents in qualified nursing facilities designated by the department who are
receiving therapy paid by the department outside the facility daily rate under
RCW 74.46.508(2).

Sec.
5. RCW
74.46.515 and 1999 c 353 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The support services component rate allocation corresponds to the provision of
food, food preparation, dietary, housekeeping, and laundry services for one
resident for one day.

(2)
Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing
facility's support services component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(6)(a).

(3)
Beginning July 1, 2000, to determine each facility's support services
component rate allocation, the department shall:

(a)
Array facilities' adjusted support services costs per adjusted resident day for
each facility from facilities' cost reports from the applicable report year,
for facilities located within a metropolitan statistical area, and for those
not located in any metropolitan statistical area and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;

(b)
Set each facility's support services component rate at the lower of the
facility's per resident day adjusted support services costs from the applicable
cost report period or the adjusted median per resident day support services
cost for that facility's peer group, either metropolitan statistical area or
nonmetropolitan statistical area, plus ten percent; and

(c)
Adjust each facility's support services component rate for economic trends and
conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(6) (b) and (c).

(4) The support services component rate allocations calculated in
accordance with this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to
comply with RCW 74.46.421.

Sec.
6. RCW
74.46.521 and 1999 c 353 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The operations component rate allocation corresponds to the general operation
of a nursing facility for one resident for one day, including but not limited to
management, administration, utilities, office supplies, accounting and
bookkeeping, minor building maintenance, minor equipment repairs and
replacements, and other supplies and services, exclusive of taxes paid under
section 7 of this act, direct care, therapy care, support services,
property, financing allowance, and variable return.

(2)
Beginning October 1, 1998, the department shall determine each medicaid nursing
facility's operations component rate allocation using cost report data
specified by RCW 74.46.431(7)(a).

(3)
Beginning July 1, 2000, to determine each facility's operations
component rate the department shall:

(a)
Array facilities' adjusted general operations costs per adjusted resident day
for each facility from facilities' cost reports from the applicable report
year, for facilities located within a metropolitan statistical area and for
those not located in a metropolitan statistical area and determine the median
adjusted cost for each peer group;

(b)
Set each facility's operations component rate at the lower of the facility's
per resident day adjusted operations costs from the applicable cost report
period or the adjusted median per resident day general operations cost for that
facility's peer group, metropolitan statistical area or nonmetropolitan
statistical area; and

(c)
Adjust each facility's operations component rate for economic trends and
conditions as provided in RCW 74.46.431(7) (b) and (c).

(4)
The operations component rate allocations calculated in accordance with this
section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to comply with RCW 74.46.421.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax component rate allocation corresponds to the real estate, personal
property, and business and occupation taxes assessed by the department of
revenue against a nursing facility.

(2)
Beginning July 1, 2000, and on each July 1st thereafter, the department shall
determine each medicaid nursing facility's tax component rate allocation, as
applicable, using cost report data from the immediately preceding calendar
year.

(3)
The tax component rate allocation shall be a per resident day amount that is
proportionate to the nursing facility's medicaid resident days to total actual
days during the immediately preceding cost report year.

(4) The tax component rate allocations calculated in accordance
with this section shall not be adjusted under RCW 74.46.421.

---
END ---