BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.03.130 and 1993 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
state office, commission, department or institution may agree to pay the travel
expenses of a prospective employee as an inducement for such applicant to
travel to a designated place to be interviewed by and for the convenience of
such agency: PROVIDED, That if such employment is to be in the classified
service, such offer may be made only on the express authorization of the state
department of personnel, or other corresponding personnel agency as provided by
chapter 41.06 RCW, to applicants reporting for a merit system examination or to
applicants from an eligible register reporting for a pre-employment interview.
Travel expenses authorized for prospective employees called for interviews
shall be payable at rates in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now
existing or hereafter amended. When an applicant is called to be interviewed
by or on behalf of more than one agency, the authorized travel expenses may be
paid directly by the authorizing personnel department or agency, subject to
reimbursement from the interviewing agencies on a pro rata basis.

In the case of both classified and exempt positions, such travel
expenses will be paid only for applicants being considered for the positions of
director, deputy director, assistant director, or supervisor of state
departments, boards or commissions; or equivalent or higher positions; or
engineers, or other personnel having both executive and professional status. In
the case of the state investment board, such travel expenses may also be paid
for applicants being considered for investment officer positions. In the
case of four-year institutions of higher education, such travel expenses will
be paid only for applicants being considered for academic positions above the
rank of instructor or professional or administrative employees in supervisory
positions. In the case of community and technical colleges, such travel
expenses may be paid for applicants being considered for full-time faculty
positions or administrative employees in supervisory positions.

---
END ---