BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that teacher experience and education information is
gathered and maintained on a district-by-district basis. This information is
important for many reasons, particularly for funding and compensation
determinations and certification and recertification. However, gathering and
maintaining this information in the district in which the teacher is currently
located results in duplication of records, additional administrative expenses,
and redundancy in audit efforts, and also results in errors from teachers
changing districts or limited staff resources. The legislature intends to
explore the feasibility of a central repository for teacher education and
experience information.

(2)
The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee shall convene a
work group to explore the feasibility of a central repository for teacher
education and experience information and to make recommendations for
establishing a central repository. The feasibility study shall analyze the
costs and benefits of a central repository including, but not limited to, the
following:

(a)
Whether increased accuracy is likely;

(b)
Whether school districts can save administrative and training costs;

(c)
Whether teachers will benefit;

(d)
Whether a central repository allows for innovative use of the internet and
other information technology;

(e)
Whether improved methods could be used to better ensure data reliability and
integrity; and

(f)
Whether audits can be done more efficiently.

(3)
The feasibility study shall also estimate the cost of a central repository and
estimate the savings a central repository would generate compared to the
current methods of gathering and maintaining this information.

(4)
The work group shall include the office of the superintendent of public
instruction, the office of the state auditor, the department of information
services, and a representative from each of the following: Teachers, a large
school district, a small school district, educational service districts, school
administrators, and others at the discretion of the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee.

(5)
Staffing for the work group shall be provided by the legislative accountability
and evaluation program committee with assistance from the state agencies on the
work group.

(6)
The feasibility study and recommendations shall be provided to the education
and fiscal committees of the legislature by December 15, 2000.

(7)
This section expires December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---