BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The department of social and health services shall create a pilot program to
provide atypical antipsychotic medications to the following underserved
populations who meet one or more of these qualifications:

(a)
Persons in crisis who are not medicaid eligible;

(b)
Working poor under two hundred percent of the federal poverty level and who are
not medicaid eligible and need continued access to antipsychotic medications;

(c)
Persons transitioning from jail and from department of corrections facilities
to medicaid eligibility; and

(d)
Persons in jail.

(2)
This pilot program shall consist of not less than less than two grants awarded
to regional support networks.

(3)
To be eligible for a grant under this program, the department shall establish a
competitive application process specifying the population to be served and the
reimbursement and distribution mechanism to be used. The department shall
evaluate the applications and award grants based on programs that optimize the
number of individuals served within available resources.

(4)
Funding for this program shall be used to provide these persons with atypical
antipsychotic medications and any associated laboratory testing related to the
use of these medications.

(5)
Funding for this grant program is to be separate from the regional support
network allocation formula. The department shall report to the legislature on
the results of this program by December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act is not provided by June 30, 2000,
in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---