BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.76 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Firms and organizations that do business with the state expect and deserve to
be paid in a prompt and timely manner; and

(b)
Unjustified delays in paying vendors, construction contractors, and providers
of service may discourage these firms and organizations, in particular small
and medium-sized firms and women and minority-owned business enterprises, from
doing business with the state, and may ultimately increase the costs to the
state government of: (i) Purchasing materials, equipment, and supplies; (ii)
undertaking construction and reconstruction projects; and (iii) obtaining a
wide variety of professional and other specialized services, including those
that are provided to persons in need.

(2)
It is the purpose of this chapter to set standards for the payment of bills
incurred by state agencies within specified periods of time and to require
interest payments in situations where contract payments do not conform to these
standards. It is also the intent of this chapter, consistent with accepted
business practices and with sound principles of fiscal management: (a) To
encourage state agencies in all branches of state government to make payments
at least as expeditiously as they currently do; (b) to reduce existing payment
processing times whenever feasible, while at the same time permitting the state
agencies to perform proper and reasonable financial oversight activities
designed to ensure that the state government receives the quality of goods and
services to which it is entitled; and (c) to ensure that public funds are spent
in a prudent and responsible manner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 39.76 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in the event that an
interest payment is made by a contractor in the course of transacting business
with any entity other than a state agency, the interest shall not be an
obligation of the state, and the state shall not reimburse the contractor for
the interest, nor shall any moneys expended for interest payments be counted
toward any matching requirement applicable to grants or payments of state funds
unless expressly permitted by state law.

(2)
If a contractor incurs an interest obligation or charge as a direct result of
the state agency's failure to make a payment in accordance with the provisions
of this chapter, then the state agency must reimburse the contractor for the
amount of the interest obligation or charge.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 39.76 RCW to read as follows:

No
contract entered into between a state agency and a contractor after July 1,
2000, shall contain any provision requiring the payment of interest in a manner
inconsistent with this chapter, and any provision contained in a contract which
waives the right to the payment of interest is hereby declared to be contrary
to public policy and wholly void.

Sec.
4. RCW
39.76.011 and 1992 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 39.76.020, every state agency, county, city, town,
school district, board, commission, or any other public body shall pay interest
at a rate of one percent per month, but at least one dollar per month, on
amounts due on written contracts for public works, personal services, goods and
services, equipment, and travel, whenever the public body fails to make timely
payment.

(2)
For purposes of this section, payment shall be timely if:

(a)
Except as provided otherwise in this subsection, a check or warrant is mailed
or is available on the date specified for the amount specified in the
applicable contract documents but not later than thirty days of receipt of a
properly completed invoice or receipt of goods or services, whichever is
later. If a contract is funded by grant or federal money, the public body
shall pay the prime contractor for satisfactory performance within thirty
calendar days of the date the public body receives a payment request that
complies with the contract or within thirty calendar days of the date the
public body actually receives the grant or federal money, whichever is later.

(b)
On written contracts for public works, when part or all of a payment is going
to be withheld for unsatisfactory performance or if the payment request made
does not comply with the requirements of the contract, the public body shall
notify the prime contractor in writing within eight working days after receipt
of the payment request stating specifically why part or all of the payment is
being withheld and what remedial actions must be taken by the prime contractor
to receive the withheld amount.

(c)
If the notification by the public body required by (b) of this subsection does
not comply with the notice contents required under (b) of this subsection, the
public body shall pay the interest under subsection (1) of this section from
the ninth working day after receipt of the initial payment request until the
contractor receives notice that does comply with the notice contents required
under (b) of this subsection.

(d)
If part or all of a payment is withheld under (b) of this subsection, the
public body shall pay the withheld amount within thirty calendar days after the
prime contractor satisfactorily completes the remedial actions identified in
the notice. If the withheld amount is not paid within the thirty calendar
days, the public body shall pay interest under subsection (1) of this section
from the thirty-first calendar day until the date paid.

(e)(i)
If the prime contractor on a public works contract, after making a request for
payment to the public body but before paying a subcontractor for the
subcontractor's performance covered by the payment request, discovers that part
or all of the payment otherwise due to the subcontractor is subject to
withholding from the subcontractor under the subcontract for unsatisfactory
performance, the prime contractor may withhold the amount as allowed under the
subcontract. If the prime contractor withholds an amount under this
subsection, the prime contractor shall:

(A)
Give the subcontractor notice of the remedial actions that must be taken as
soon as practicable after determining the cause for the withholding but before
the due date for the subcontractor payment;

(B)
Give the contracting officer of the public body a copy of the notice furnished
to the subcontractor under (e)(i)(A) of this subsection; and

(C)
Pay the subcontractor within eight working days after the subcontractor
satisfactorily completes the remedial action identified in the notice.

(ii)
If the prime contractor does not comply with the notice and payment
requirements of (e)(i) of this subsection, the contractor shall pay the
subcontractor interest on the withheld amount from the eighth working day at an
interest rate that is equal to the amount set forth in subsection (1) of this
section.

(3)
Except as provided in subsection (2)(e) of this section, a prime contractor
on a public works project shall pay a subcontractor on the date specified in
the applicable contract document or, if no date is specified, within thirty
days of receipt of a properly completed invoice or receipt of goods or services.
If the prime contractor does not comply with the time limits in this
subsection, the prime contractor shall pay the subcontractor interest on the
amount due from the day the amount was due at an interest rate that is equal to
the amount set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
A payment is considered to be made when mailed or personally delivered to the
party being paid.

(b) An invoice is considered to be received when it is date-stamped
or otherwise marked as delivered. If the invoice is not date-stamped or
otherwise marked as delivered, the date of the invoice is considered to be the
date when the invoice is received.

---
END ---