BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall establish and maintain a no sales call list. The no sales
call list shall contain the name and telephone number or numbers of residents
who do not want to receive telephone solicitation calls. Residents must
register at no charge with the commission to appear on the no sales call list.

(2)
The commission shall:

(a)
Update the no sales call list monthly;

(b)
Determine the method of making the current list available at no charge to
commercial telephone solicitors; and

(c)
Inform the resident that, once registered, it may take up to one hundred twenty
days to experience a reduction in commercial solicitation calls.

(3)
The commission has the authority to contract with a third party to maintain the
no sales call list.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who does not want to receive unsolicited telephone sales calls may
register and be placed on the Washington utilities and transportation
commission's no sales call list, created in section 1 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
19.158.110 and 1989 c 20 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within the first minute of the telephone call, a commercial telephone solicitor
or salesperson shall:

(a)
Identify himself or herself, the company on whose behalf the solicitation is
being made, the property, goods, or services being sold; and

(b)
Terminate the telephone call within ten seconds if the purchaser indicates he
or she does not wish to continue the conversation.

(2)
If at any time during the telephone contact, the purchaser states or indicates
that he or she does not wish to be called again by the commercial telephone
solicitor or wants to have his or her name and individual telephone number
removed from the telephone lists used by the commercial telephone solicitor:

(a)
The commercial telephone solicitor shall not make any additional commercial
telephone solicitation of the called party at that telephone number within a
period of at least one year; and

(b)
The commercial telephone solicitor shall not sell or give the called party's
name and telephone number to another commercial telephone solicitor: PROVIDED,
That the commercial telephone solicitor may return the list, including the
called party's name and telephone number, to the company or organization from
which it received the list.

(3)
No commercial telephone solicitor or salesperson may make or cause to be
made any unsolicited telephone call to a residential, mobile, or telephonic
paging device telephone number if the number for the telephone appears in the
current no sales call list published by the Washington utilities and
transportation commission under the authority of section 1 of this act.

(4)
The utilities and transportation commission shall by rule ensure that
telecommunications companies inform their residential customers of the
provisions of this section. The notification may be made by:

(a)
Annual inserts in the billing statements mailed to residential customers; or

(b)
Conspicuous publication of the notice in the consumer information pages of
local telephone directories.

(((4)))
(5) If a sale or an agreement to purchase is completed, the commercial
telephone solicitor must inform the purchaser of his or her cancellation rights
as enunciated in this chapter, state the registration number issued by the
department of licensing, and give the street address of the seller.

(((5)))
(6) If, at any time prior to sale or agreement to purchase, the
commercial telephone solicitor's registration number is requested by the
purchaser, it must be provided.

(((6)))
(7) All oral disclosures required by this section shall be made in a
clear and intelligible manner.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---