BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.52.185 and 1997 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
During the twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the year before a
general election for a state legislator's election to office and continuing
through November 30th immediately after the general election, the legislator
may not ((mail, either by regular mail or electronic mail,)) by
regular mail send to a constituent at public expense a letter, newsletter,
brochure, or other piece of literature, except as follows:

(a)
The legislator may mail two mailings of newsletters to constituents. All newsletters
within each mailing of newsletters must be identical as to their content but
not as to the constituent name or address. One such mailing may be mailed no
later than thirty days after the start of a regular legislative session, except
that a legislator appointed during a regular legislative session to fill a
vacant seat may have up to thirty days from the date of appointment to send out
the first mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no later than sixty days
after the end of a regular legislative session.

(b)
The legislator may mail an individual letter to (i) an individual constituent
who has contacted the legislator regarding the subject matter of the letter
during the legislator's current term of office; (ii) an individual constituent
who holds a governmental office with jurisdiction over the subject matter of
the letter; or (iii) an individual constituent who has received an award or
honor of extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to
be noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to: (A) An
international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the Pulitzer prize;
(B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an Eagle Scout award; and (D)
a Medal of Honor.

(2)
For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "legislator" means a
legislator who is a "candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17.020, for any
public office.

(3)
A violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities of a public
office for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW 42.52.180.

(4)
The house of representatives and senate shall specifically limit expenditures
per member for the total cost of mailings. Those costs include, but are not
limited to, production costs, printing costs, and postage costs. The limits
imposed under this subsection apply only to the total expenditures on mailings
per member and not to any categorical cost within the total.

(5)
For purposes of this section, persons residing outside the legislative district
represented by the legislator are not considered to be constituents, but
students, military personnel, or others temporarily employed outside of the
district who normally reside in the district are considered to be constituents.

(6) During the period beginning on the forty-fifth day past the
date of the adjournment of a regular legislative session in the year of a
general election for a state legislator's election to office and continuing
through November 30th immediately after the general election, the restrictions
in subsection (1) of this section shall apply to letters, newsletters,
brochures, or other pieces of literature sent by electronic mail at public
expense.

---
END ---