BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the state explosives act is outdated and references
federal statutes and regulations that have since been amended. The legislature
also finds that the overlap between the explosives act and the fireworks laws
can result in confusion when interpreting the laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The chief of the Washington state patrol or her designee shall assemble a task
force to review the existing state statutes and rules governing explosives.
The task force shall consist of, at the least, one state fire marshal, one
representative from the attorney general's office, one representative from the
department of labor and industries, one explosives expert, and one
representative of the state prosecuting attorneys. The chief or her designee
may appoint to the task force any other individuals whom the chief or her
designee deems to have expertise in the issues relating to the state explosives
act.

(2)
In conducting its review, the task force shall consider, among other things:

(a)
The overlap between the explosives act and the fireworks laws;

(b)
Whether there is a need to modernize the laws because of technological
advancements; and

(c)
Any inconsistencies between the state and federal laws.

(3) The task force shall make recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature during the 2001 regular session. The task force
shall terminate July 1, 2001.

---
END ---