BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
10.05.010 and 1998 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
a court of limited jurisdiction a person charged with a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor may petition the court to be considered for a deferred prosecution
program. The petition shall be filed with the court at least seven days before
the date set for trial but, upon a written motion and affidavit establishing
good cause for the delay and failure to comply with this section, the court may
waive this requirement subject to the defendant's reimbursement to the court of
the witness fees and expenses due for subpoenaed witnesses who have appeared on
the date set for trial.

A person charged with a traffic infraction, misdemeanor, or gross
misdemeanor under Title 46 RCW shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution
program unless the court makes specific findings pursuant to RCW 10.05.020.
Such person shall not be eligible for a deferred prosecution program more than
once and is not eligible if he or she has more than two prior convictions
for an offense or offenses to which RCW 46.61.513 applies, or for any
equivalent out-of-state offense or offenses, where the prior convictions are
the result of arrests that occurred within seven years of the arrest for the
current offense. Separate offenses committed more than seven days apart
may not be consolidated in a single program.

---
END ---