BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of corrections, the Washington association of sheriffs and police
chiefs, and the Washington state patrol shall jointly develop a protocol for
law enforcement agencies to follow in creating internet access for the purpose
of disclosing information to the public under RCW 4.24.550 regarding sex
offenders and kidnapping offenders classified as risk level II or III. In
developing such a protocol, the agencies shall review similar procedures
currently being utilized in other jurisdictions. Not later than December 15,
2000, the agencies shall provide to the appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and senate the protocol that has been developed, along with
recommendations for legislation, if any, that may be necessary for its implementation.

---
END ---