BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, in addition to members eligible to
retire under RCW 41.40.180, any member of the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 who meets the following criteria may retire after providing
written notification to the member's employer and submitting the required
application to the director on a form provided by the department:

(a)
The member was employed by an employer in an eligible position on November 1,
1999;

(b)
The member's employer is a county, city, town, or transit district or the state
departments of transportation or ecology; and

(c)
The member has: (i) Attained the age of fifty-five years and completed five
service credit years of service; (ii) completed twenty-five service credit
years of service; or (iii) attained the age of fifty years and completed twenty
service credit years of service.

(2)
A member must submit the required notification and application no later than
August 31, 2000, setting forth that the member shall be retired no later than
December 31, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act is added to chapter 41.40 RCW, but because of its
temporary nature, shall not be codified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, in addition to members eligible to
retire under RCW 41.40.630, any member of the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 who meets the following criteria may retire after providing
written notification to the member's employer and submitting the required
application to the director on a form provided by the department:

(a)
The member was employed by an employer in an eligible position on November 1,
1999;

(b)
The member's employer is a county, city, town, or transit district or the state
departments of transportation or ecology; and

(c)
The member has: (i) Attained the age of sixty years and completed five service
credit years of service; or (ii) attained the age of fifty years and completed
fifteen service credit years of service. A member who retires under (c)(ii) of
this subsection shall have his or her retirement allowance reduced by three
percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age
at retirement and the attainment of age sixty.

(2)
A member must submit the required notification and application no later than
August 31, 2000, setting forth that the member shall be retired no later than
December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. Section
3 of this act is added to chapter 41.40 RCW, but because of its temporary
nature, shall not be codified.

---
END ---