BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.50.050 and 1999 c 198 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section governs records relating to the commission of juvenile offenses,
including records relating to diversions.

(2)
The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile offender
shall be open to public inspection, unless sealed pursuant to subsection (12)
of this section.

(3)
All records other than the official juvenile court file are confidential and
may be released only as provided in this section, RCW 13.50.010, 13.40.215, and
4.24.550.

(4)
Except as otherwise provided in this section and RCW 13.50.010, records
retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be released to
other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when an
investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by
the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the
responsibility for supervising the juvenile.

(5)
Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, information not in an official juvenile
court file concerning a juvenile or a juvenile's family may be released to the
public only when that information could not reasonably be expected to identify
the juvenile or the juvenile's family.

(6)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the release, to the
juvenile or his or her attorney, of law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys'
records pertaining to investigation, diversion, and prosecution of juvenile
offenses shall be governed by the rules of discovery and other rules of law
applicable in adult criminal investigations and prosecutions.

(7)
Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, law enforcement and prosecuting
attorneys may cooperate with schools in releasing information to a school
pertaining to the investigation, diversion, and prosecution of a juvenile
attending the school. Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, incident
reports may be released unless releasing the records would jeopardize the
investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses. If release of incident
reports would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution or endanger
witnesses, law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may release information to
the maximum extent possible to assist schools in protecting other students,
staff, and school property.

(8)
The juvenile court and the prosecutor may set up and maintain a central
record-keeping system which may receive information on all alleged juvenile
offenders against whom a complaint has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070
whether or not their cases are currently pending before the court. The central
record-keeping system may be computerized. If a complaint has been referred to
a diversion unit, the diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile
court or the prosecuting attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion.
An offense shall not be reported as criminal history in any central
record-keeping system without notification by the diversion unit of the date on
which the offender agreed to diversion.

(9)
Upon request of the victim of a crime or the victim's immediate family, the
identity of an alleged or proven juvenile offender alleged or found to have
committed a crime against the victim and the identity of the alleged or proven
juvenile offender's parent, guardian, or custodian and the circumstance of the
alleged or proven crime shall be released to the victim of the crime or the
victim's immediate family.

(10)
Subject to the rules of discovery applicable in adult criminal prosecutions,
the juvenile offense records of an adult criminal defendant or witness in an
adult criminal proceeding shall be released upon request to prosecution and
defense counsel after a charge has actually been filed. The juvenile offense
records of any adult convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of
the adult corrections system shall be released upon request to the adult
corrections system.

(11)
In any case in which an information has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or
a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and referred for diversion
pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person the subject of the information or
complaint may file a motion with the court to have the court vacate its order
and findings, if any, and, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order
the sealing of the official juvenile court file, the social file, and records
of the court and of any other agency in the case.

(12)
The court shall grant the motion to seal records made pursuant to subsection
(11) of this section if it finds that:

(a)
For class B offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release
from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry
of disposition, the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction. For class C offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date
of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any,
or entry of disposition, the person has spent five consecutive years in the
community without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction. For misdemeanor adjudications and diversions, since the last
date of release from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if
any, or entry of disposition, the person has spent two consecutive years in the
community without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction and the person is at least eighteen years old. For gross
misdemeanor adjudications, since the last date of release from confinement,
including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition, the
person has spent three consecutive years in the community without committing
any offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction and the person is
at least eighteen years old;

(b)
No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a
juvenile offense or a criminal offense;

(c)
No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with
that person;

(d)
The person has not been convicted of a class A or sex offense; and

(e)
Full restitution has been paid.

(13)
The person making a motion pursuant to subsection (11) of this section shall
give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecution and to any person or
agency whose files are sought to be sealed.

(14)
If the court grants the motion to seal made pursuant to subsection (11) of this
section, it shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order sealed the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and other records relating to
the case as are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the case
shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the records may
reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records of which are
sealed. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning confidential or
sealed records that records are confidential, and no information can be given
about the existence or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.

(15)
Inspection of the files and records included in the order to seal may
thereafter be permitted only by order of the court upon motion made by the
person who is the subject of the information or complaint, except as otherwise
provided in RCW 13.50.010(8) and subsection (23) of this section.

(16)
Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent to sealing has the
effect of nullifying the sealing order. Any charging of an adult felony
subsequent to the sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order for
the purposes of chapter 9.94A RCW.

(17)
A person eighteen years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only
one referral for diversion may request that the court order the records in that
case destroyed. The request shall be granted, subject to subsection (23) of
this section, if the court finds that two years have elapsed since completion
of the diversion agreement.

(18)
If the court grants the motion to destroy records made pursuant to subsection
(17) of this section, it shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section,
order the official juvenile court file, the social file, and any other records
named in the order to be destroyed.

(19)
The person making the motion pursuant to subsection (17) of this section shall
give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecuting attorney and to any
agency whose records are sought to be destroyed.

(20)
Any juvenile to whom the provisions of this section may apply shall be given
written notice of his or her rights under this section at the time of his or
her disposition hearing or during the diversion process.

(21)
Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a crime victim or a member
of the victim's family from divulging the identity of the alleged or proven
juvenile offender or his or her family when necessary in a civil proceeding.

(22)
Any juvenile justice or care agency may, subject to the limitations in
subsection (23) of this section and (a) and (b) of this subsection, develop
procedures for the routine destruction of records relating to juvenile offenses
and diversions.

(a)
Records, including diversion records, may be routinely destroyed only
when the person the subject of the information or complaint: (i) Has
attained twenty-three years of age or older((,)); or (ii)
is eighteen years of age or older and his or her criminal history consists
entirely of one diversion agreement and two years have passed since completion
of the agreement.

(b)
The court may not routinely destroy the official juvenile court file or
recordings or transcripts of any proceedings.

(23)
No identifying information held by the Washington state patrol in accordance
with chapter 43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or sealing under this
section. For the purposes of this subsection, identifying information includes
photographs, fingerprints, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints and any other data
that identifies a person by physical characteristics, name, birthdate or
address, but does not include information regarding criminal activity, arrest,
charging, diversion, conviction or other information about a person's treatment
by the criminal justice system or about the person's behavior.

(24) Information identifying child victims under age eighteen who
are victims of sexual assaults by juvenile offenders is confidential and not
subject to release to the press or public without the permission of the child
victim or the child's legal guardian. Identifying information includes the
child victim's name, addresses, location, photographs, and in cases in which
the child victim is a relative of the alleged perpetrator, identification of
the relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Information
identifying a child victim of sexual assault may be released to law
enforcement, prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental
agencies that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault.

---
END ---