BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.24.010 and 1998 c 237 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A
mother or father, or both, who has regularly contributed to the financial
and emotional support of his or her minor child, ((and the mother or
father, or both, of a child on whom either, or both, are dependent for support))
may maintain or join as a party an action ((as plaintiff)) for the
injury or death of ((the)) a minor child, or for the death of
an adult child.

This
section creates only one cause of action, but if the parents of the child are
not married, are separated, or not married to each other damages may be awarded
to each plaintiff separately, as the trier of fact finds just and equitable.

If
one parent brings an action under this section and the other parent is not
named as a plaintiff, notice of the institution of the suit, together with a
copy of the complaint, shall be served upon the other parent: PROVIDED, That
notice shall be required only if parentage has been duly established.

Such
notice shall be in compliance with the statutory requirements for a summons.
Such notice shall state that the other parent must join as a party to the suit
within twenty days or the right to recover damages under this section shall be
barred. Failure of the other parent to timely appear shall bar such parent's
action to recover any part of an award made to the party instituting the suit.

In such an action, in addition to damages for medical, hospital,
medication expenses, and loss of services and support, damages may be recovered
for the loss of love and companionship of the child and for injury to or
destruction of the parent-child relationship in such amount as, under all the
circumstances of the case, may be just.

---
END ---