BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds that natural disasters
and emergencies affect the health, safety, and well-being of Washington
residents. The legislature established a program to prepare for and address
disasters and emergencies in chapter 38.52 RCW and other statutes. Recent
emergencies and disasters involving landslides affecting a large number of
people were not typical; rather than happening suddenly and affecting
improvements to real property, the landslide disasters occurred and are
occurring over time and are destroying not only the improvements but are moving
the land as well. The legislature intends to enhance responses to disasters
and emergencies, including unusual disasters, through this act by: (1)
Improving coordination of disaster and emergency assistance; (2) providing
counseling and ombudsman services for homeowners and others who are victims;
(3) protecting victims' credit ratings; (4) providing tax credits for lenders
who forgive loans in landslide disasters; and (5) creating an emergency management
and assistance fund.

Sec.
2. RCW
38.52.030 and 1997 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

IMPROVING
COORDINATION OF DISASTER ASSISTANCE. (1) The director may employ such
personnel and may make such expenditures within the appropriation therefor, or
from other funds made available for purposes of emergency management, as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2)(a)
The director, subject to the direction and control of the governor, shall be
responsible to the governor for carrying out the program for emergency
management of this state. The director shall coordinate the activities of all
organizations for emergency management within the state, and shall maintain
liaison with and cooperate with emergency management agencies and organizations
of other states and of the federal government, and shall have such additional
authority, duties, and responsibilities authorized by this chapter, as may be
prescribed by the governor.

(b)(i)
To improve coordination and communication when an emergency or disaster is not
a flood, earthquake, or windstorm, but is unusual or occurring over a long
period of time, such as a large landslide, or whenever the director deems it
appropriate, the director may form a task force which includes a designated
member from the emergency management division who shall chair the task force,
the department of community, trade, and economic development, any other state
agency at the request of the director, any local organization or organizations
under RCW 38.52.070, and the local government or governments where the
emergency or disaster occurred or is occurring. The director may request that
the federal emergency management agency, the small business administration, or
any other federal agency participate in the task force.

(ii)
The task force shall focus on enhancing the coordination of emergency response,
hazard mitigation efforts, environmental issues, and disaster relief and
assistance between the state, local agencies, the private sector, and disaster
victims, particularly where the initial emergency response has successfully
stabilized the situation and addressed immediate public health and safety
issues, but the impacts of the emergency or disaster, or the emergency or disaster
itself, are ongoing over a long period of time. The state agencies shall
collaborate with one another to most effectively address the emergency or
disaster. Communicating with and providing assistance to local agencies, local
governments, and disaster victims over time shall be a priority of the task
force, particularly facilitating communication and streamlining problem
identification and resolution.

(3)
The director shall develop and maintain a comprehensive, all-hazard emergency
plan for the state which shall include an analysis of the natural,
technological, or human caused hazards which could affect the state of
Washington, and shall include the procedures to be used during emergencies for
coordinating local resources, as necessary, and the resources of all state
agencies, departments, commissions, and boards. The comprehensive emergency
management plan shall direct the department in times of state emergency to
administer and manage the state's emergency operations center. This will
include representation from all appropriate state agencies and be available as
a single point of contact for the authorizing of state resources or actions,
including emergency permits. The comprehensive emergency management plan must
specify the use of the incident command system for
multiagency/multijurisdiction operations. The comprehensive, all-hazard
emergency plan authorized under this subsection may not include preparation for
emergency evacuation or relocation of residents in anticipation of nuclear
attack. This plan shall be known as the comprehensive emergency management
plan.

(4)
In accordance with the comprehensive emergency management plans and the
programs for the emergency management of this state, the director shall procure
supplies and equipment, institute training programs and public information
programs, and shall take all other preparatory steps, including the partial or
full mobilization of emergency management organizations in advance of actual
disaster, to insure the furnishing of adequately trained and equipped forces of
emergency management personnel in time of need.

(5)
The director shall make such studies and surveys of the industries, resources,
and facilities in this state as may be necessary to ascertain the capabilities
of the state for emergency management, and shall plan for the most efficient
emergency use thereof.

(6)
The emergency management council shall advise the director on all aspects of
the communications and warning systems and facilities operated or controlled
under the provisions of this chapter.

(7)
The director, through the state enhanced 911 coordinator, shall coordinate and
facilitate implementation and operation of a state-wide enhanced 911 emergency
communications network.

(8)
The director shall appoint a state coordinator of search and rescue operations
to coordinate those state resources, services and facilities (other than those
for which the state director of aeronautics is directly responsible) requested
by political subdivisions in support of search and rescue operations, and on
request to maintain liaison with and coordinate the resources, services, and
facilities of political subdivisions when more than one political subdivision
is engaged in joint search and rescue operations.

(9)
The director, subject to the direction and control of the governor, shall
prepare and administer a state program for emergency assistance to individuals
within the state who are victims of a natural, technological, or human caused
disaster, as defined by RCW 38.52.010(6). Such program may be integrated into
and coordinated with disaster assistance plans and programs of the federal
government which provide to the state, or through the state to any political
subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way
of gift, grant, or loan for purposes of assistance to individuals affected by a
disaster. Further, such program may include, but shall not be limited to,
grants, loans, or gifts of services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds
of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, to individuals who, as a
result of a disaster, are in need of assistance and who meet standards of
eligibility for disaster assistance established by the department of social and
health services: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall be construed in
any manner inconsistent with the provisions of Article VIII, section 5 or
section 7 of the Washington state Constitution.

(10)
The director shall appoint a state coordinator for radioactive and hazardous
waste emergency response programs. The coordinator shall consult with the
state radiation control officer in matters relating to radioactive materials.
The duties of the state coordinator for radioactive and hazardous waste
emergency response programs shall include:

(a)
Assessing the current needs and capabilities of state and local radioactive and
hazardous waste emergency response teams on an ongoing basis;

(b)
Coordinating training programs for state and local officials for the purpose of
updating skills relating to emergency mitigation, preparedness, response, and
recovery;

(c)
Utilizing appropriate training programs such as those offered by the federal
emergency management agency, the department of transportation and the
environmental protection agency; and

(d)
Undertaking other duties in this area that are deemed appropriate by the
director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

COUNSELING
AND OMBUDSMAN SERVICES FOR VICTIMS. (1) The legislature finds that, in
addition to existing emergency and disaster programs, homeowners who are
victims of emergencies or disasters may need assistance in dealing with their
lenders and insurers when their homes are temporarily or permanently uninhabitable
as a result of the emergency or disaster. This is especially true if the
disaster is unusual or occurs over a long period of time. The legislature also
finds that the earlier these services can be provided, the more effective they
are.

(2)
The department of community, trade, and economic development, with the
assistance of other agencies, may provide ombudsman and counseling services to
homeowners who are victims of emergencies or disasters in dealing with their
lenders, insurers, or other organizations. The housing finance commission, the
office of the insurance commissioner, the department of financial institutions,
and other state agencies shall assist the department of community, trade, and
economic development when requested, and may initiate services on their own if
the department of community, trade, and economic development does not provide
ombudsman and counseling services. The legislature intends that these
homeowner related ombudsman and counseling services be coordinated, preferably
by the department of community, trade, and economic development. The
department may request other public agencies and private organizations to
assist in its counseling and ombudsman services.

(3)
The ombudsman and counseling services may, to the extent resources are
available, assist victims of an emergency or disaster with their housing needs
and other issues caused by the emergency or disaster.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 19.182 RCW to read as follows:

PROTECTING
VICTIMS' CREDIT RATINGS. Whenever a lender is notified that the single-family
residence securing the loan is in a federally declared disaster area or is in
an area that is proclaimed an emergency by the governor, and the loan was not
delinquent at the time the disaster or emergency began and the emergency or
disaster is the primary reason for any delinquency, the lender shall notify the
credit reporting agency that the loan is delinquent due to a declared disaster
or proclaimed emergency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

TAX
CREDIT FOR FORGIVING LOANS IN LANDSLIDE DISASTERS. (1) In computing the tax
imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed for each financial institution
for each loan in which part or all of the principal balance owed is forgiven to
assist the victim of a landslide in an area that has been proclaimed an
emergency by the governor. The loan must be secured by a home that is in the
boundaries of the declared emergency area and the home is or will be a total
loss or is or will be permanently uninhabitable.

(2)(a)
The credit is equal to one-quarter of the amount forgiven, up to a maximum
credit per loan of fifty thousand dollars.

(b)
If less than the total principal balance is forgiven, the financial institution
may claim the credit only if the partial forgiveness is part of a plan to
assist multiple victims of the emergency and involves multiple financial
institutions in a pooling or other arrangement.

(c)
The department may request verification from the military department or other
state agency that the loan is secured by a home in the proclaimed emergency
area, that (b) of this subsection applies, or may request other reasonable
verification.

(3)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Financial institution" means any person to which a loan is owed.

(b)
"Loan" means an obligation secured by a deed of trust or mortgage on
a single-family residence that is located in a state declared emergency area
resulting from a landslide.

(4)
This section applies to all loans or parts of loans forgiven after the
effective date of this section.

(5)
Participation of a financial institution in this program contributes toward
meeting the credit needs of the communities it serves as set forth under
chapter 30.60 RCW for state banks, chapter 32.40 RCW for state savings banks,
and the federal community reinvestment act of 1977 for federal savings banks,
federal savings and loan associations, and national banks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT AND ASSISTANCE FUND. (1) The emergency management and assistance
fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. The account shall
consist of amounts deposited into the account as provided in sections 7 and 8
of this act, other funds appropriated or deposited to the account, and income
derived from the investment of moneys in the account. Only the director or the
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account
is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures.

(2)
The purpose of this account is to provide supplemental moneys:

(a)
To focus on disaster planning and preparedness, hazard mitigation, and response
to and recovery from emergencies and disasters in order to reduce the impact of
disasters on the state;

(b)
To help to protect lives, property, and the environment from the risk and
impact of natural hazards;

(c)
To promote the development of a standardized, trained, and adequately staffed
and equipped state-wide emergency management and mitigation system for use by
all state and local emergency management agencies; and

(d)
To provide funds to help local governments and citizens cope with disasters.

(3)
The account shall be used for risk-based all hazard planning, mitigation,
training, public education and awareness programs, and disaster response,
relief, and recovery. These moneys are intended to supplement and not supplant
existing state and local fiscal resources dedicated to emergency management.
Use of the account is intended to revitalize and improve upon the existing
emergency management infrastructure throughout the state to effectively
mitigate against the effects and cost of any disaster and to provide more
flexibility and resources to address unusual disasters or emergencies. The
account shall be used:

(a)
To provide that all residents of the state are educated before, during, and
after a disaster to protect themselves, their families, and their homes,
businesses, and other private or public property;

(b)
To encourage that structures, whether public or private, be designed,
constructed, retrofitted, or relocated away from flood prone areas, in
accordance with the most current safety, land use, and building codes; and

(c)
To strengthen state and local government and private sector emergency plans,
training, mitigation, and resources for response and recovery from disaster,
and to provide additional funds to help local governments and citizens cope
with disasters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW to read as follows:

EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT AND ASSISTANCE FUND. An annual surcharge of five dollars is imposed
on every homeowner's, mobile homeowner's, tenant home renter's, and condominium
unit owner's insurance policy, and an annual surcharge of ten dollars is
imposed on every commercial fire, commercial multiple peril, and business
owner's property insurance policy issued or renewed on or after January 1,
2001. The surcharge shall be imposed on the insured and paid by the insured to
the insurer. The insurer issuing or renewing the policy shall collect the
surcharge and remit it to the department of revenue, which shall collect,
administer, audit, and enforce the surcharge. The surcharge shall not be
considered premiums to the insurer. All proceeds of the surcharge shall be
deposited in the emergency management and assistance fund created in section 6
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT AND ASSISTANCE FUND. (1) A one-time surcharge of twenty-five
dollars is imposed on every loan secured by a one to four unit single-family
residence located in this state that is secured by a mortgage or deed of trust
made on or after January 1, 2001. The surcharge shall be imposed on the
borrower and paid by the borrower to the lender at the time the loan is
closed. The lender shall collect the surcharge and remit it to the department
of revenue, which shall collect, administer, audit, and enforce the surcharge.
The surcharge shall not be considered a fee or other income to the lender. All
proceeds of the surcharge shall be deposited in the emergency management and
assistance fund created in section 6 of this act.

(2)
This section does not apply to an individual who made fewer than ten loans the
previous calendar year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT AND ASSISTANCE FUND. (1) Of the annual amount available for
disbursement from the emergency management and assistance fund established in
section 6 of this act, the director shall provide that:

(a)
Thirty percent shall be made available to implement and administer state and
local emergency management programs, including training and public awareness,
of which twenty-five percent, the state share, shall be used by the department
and seventy-five percent, the local share, shall be allocated to local directors;

(b)
Twenty-five percent shall be allocated to provide for state relief assistance
for nonfederally declared disasters, the state share of federally declared
disasters, or up to three-fourths of the local match required to receive
federal disaster funds;

(c)
Twenty-five percent shall be made available for grants and loans to state or
regional agencies or authorities, local governments, and local private
nonprofit organizations to implement programs or projects that will further
state and local emergency management objectives of which:

(i)
Fifty percent shall be dedicated to mitigation projects, and shall be provided
in consultation with the department of community, trade, and economic
development. These projects shall include mitigation to reduce the risk from
the impact of disaster. Projects shall include, but need not be limited to,
projects that will promote public education or awareness of disaster
mitigation, improving land use planning, particularly identifying critical
areas such as steep slopes and landslide areas, developing or revising building
codes that incorporate the latest available information on risk reduction from
natural hazards;

(ii)
At least ten percent shall be provided to the department of community, trade,
and economic development to provide technical assistance and education to local
governments regarding identifying critical areas such as steep slopes and
landslide areas and developing or revising building codes that incorporate the
latest available information on risk reduction from natural hazards;

(iii)
At least five percent to the department of natural resources to help identify
landslide zones; and

(iv)
The remaining amount for nonmitigation programs and projects that include, but
are not limited to, improving preparedness planning, enhancement, and
coordination of relief efforts of state-wide private sector organizations and
improving the training and operational capabilities of agencies assigned lead
or support responsibilities in emergency management; and

(d)(i)
Twenty percent shall be used to provide assistance to low-income persons in a
disaster or emergency area in the form of loans and grants. This assistance
can only be used for expenses not covered by any other public disaster
assistance or private insurance. No grant or loan may exceed twelve thousand
five hundred dollars. The director may use some or all of the funds available
under this subsection for other emergency or disaster assistance programs or
efforts if the director finds that it is in the public's best interest to do
so.

(ii)
For purposes of this subsection, "low-income person" means a person
or family whose adjusted gross income is less than eighty percent of the median
family income, adjusted for household size for the county where the disaster
occurred.

(2)
The department shall, by rule, establish criteria and procedures for the
equitable allocation of funds as provided in subsection (1)(a), (b), and (d) of
this section, and shall establish criteria and procedures for competitive
allocation of funds provided in subsection (1)(c) of this section. Not more
than five percent of any award made under this section may be used for
administrative expenses. The distribution formula provided in this section may
be adjusted proportionally when necessary to meet any matching requirements
imposed as a condition of receiving federal disaster relief assistance or
planning funds.

(3)
Whenever the amounts available under subsection (1)(b) of this section are
insufficient to meet the estimated amounts needed to respond to and recover
from any nonfederally declared disaster or to provide the state share in any
federally declared disaster, the governor, in consultation with the director,
shall seek additional funds adequate to meet the needs of such disaster, plus
an amount equal to an additional fifteen percent of such funds to be utilized
exclusively for mitigation. Within thirty days of the close of each fiscal
year, any unexpended balance of funds allocated in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (1)(b) of this section for nonfederally declared
disasters or the state share of federally declared disasters, shall be made
available for supplemental mitigation grants in accordance with subsection
(1)(c) of this section.

(4)
The department shall collaborate with other state and local agencies in
developing rules and administering the funds allocated under this section.

Sec.
10. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1999 c 384 s 8 and 1999 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

INTEREST
EARNINGS. (1) Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested,
and reinvested by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same
manner and to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the emergency management and assistance
fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account,
the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile accountability incentive
account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center
account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust
fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
REPORT TO LEGISLATURE. The departments of community, trade, and economic
development and natural resources shall report to the legislature by December 1,
2001, on its activities under section 9(1)(c) of this act and shall make
recommendations regarding strategies to improve the identification of landslide
zones.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. The
secretary of state shall submit sections 6 through 10 of this act to the people
for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election
to be held in this state, as required by Initiative Measure No. 695.

---
END ---