BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.12.022 and 1994 c 124 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby levied and there shall be collected from every person in this
state a use tax for the privilege of using natural gas or manufactured gas
within this state as a consumer.

(2)
The tax shall be levied and collected in an amount equal to the value of the
article used by the taxpayer multiplied by the rate in effect for the public
utility tax on gas distribution businesses under RCW 82.16.020. The
"value of the article used" does not include any amounts that are
paid for the hire or use of a gas distribution business as defined in RCW
82.16.010(7) in transporting the gas subject to tax under this subsection if
those amounts are subject to tax under that chapter.

(3)
The tax levied in this section shall not apply to the use of natural or manufactured
gas delivered to the consumer by other means than: (a) Through a
pipeline; or (b) by truck to a farm for growing agricultural crops, poultry,
or livestock.

(4)
The tax levied in this section shall not apply to the use of natural or
manufactured gas if the person who sold the gas to the consumer has paid a tax
under RCW 82.16.020 with respect to the gas for which exemption is sought under
this subsection.

(5)
There shall be a credit against the tax levied under this section in an amount
equal to any tax paid by:

(a)
The person who sold the gas to the consumer when that tax is a gross receipts
tax similar to that imposed pursuant to RCW 82.16.020 by another state with
respect to the gas for which a credit is sought under this subsection; or

(b)
The person consuming the gas upon which a use tax similar to the tax imposed by
this section was paid to another state with respect to the gas for which a
credit is sought under this subsection.

(6)
The use tax hereby imposed shall be paid by the consumer to the department.

(7)
There is imposed a reporting requirement on the person who delivered the gas to
the consumer to make a quarterly report to the department. Such report shall
contain the volume of gas delivered, name of the consumer to whom delivered,
and such other information as the department shall require by rule.

(8)
The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the administration
and enforcement of sections 1 through 6, chapter 384, Laws of 1989.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.16.010 and 1996 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, unless otherwise required by the context:

(1)
"Railroad business" means the business of operating any railroad, by
whatever power operated, for public use in the conveyance of persons or
property for hire. It shall not, however, include any business herein defined
as an urban transportation business.

(2)
"Express business" means the business of carrying property for public
hire on the line of any common carrier operated in this state, when such common
carrier is not owned or leased by the person engaging in such business.

(3)
"Railroad car business" means the business of operating stock cars,
furniture cars, refrigerator cars, fruit cars, poultry cars, tank cars,
sleeping cars, parlor cars, buffet cars, tourist cars, or any other kinds of
cars used for transportation of property or persons upon the line of any railroad
operated in this state when such railroad is not owned or leased by the person
engaging in such business.

(4)
"Water distribution business" means the business of operating a plant
or system for the distribution of water for hire or sale.

(5)
"Light and power business" means the business of operating a plant or
system for the generation, production or distribution of electrical energy for
hire or sale and/or for the wheeling of electricity for others.

(6)
"Telegraph business" means the business of affording telegraphic
communication for hire.

(7)
"Gas distribution business" means the business of operating a plant
or system for the production or distribution for hire or sale of gas through
a pipeline to consumers or by truck to farms for growing agricultural crops,
poultry, or livestock, whether manufactured or natural.

(8)
"Motor transportation business" means the business (except urban
transportation business) of operating any motor propelled vehicle by which
persons or property of others are conveyed for hire, and includes, but is not
limited to, the operation of any motor propelled vehicle as an auto
transportation company (except urban transportation business), common carrier
or contract carrier as defined by RCW 81.68.010 and 81.80.010: PROVIDED, That
"motor transportation business" shall not mean or include the
transportation of logs or other forest products exclusively upon private roads
or private highways.

(9)
"Urban transportation business" means the business of operating any
vehicle for public use in the conveyance of persons or property for hire,
insofar as (a) operating entirely within the corporate limits of any city or
town, or within five miles of the corporate limits thereof, or (b) operating
entirely within and between cities and towns whose corporate limits are not
more than five miles apart or within five miles of the corporate limits of
either thereof. Included herein, but without limiting the scope hereof, is the
business of operating passenger vehicles of every type and also the business of
operating cartage, pickup, or delivery services, including in such services the
collection and distribution of property arriving from or destined to a point
within or without the state, whether or not such collection or distribution be
made by the person performing a local or interstate line-haul of such property.

(10)
"Public service business" means any of the businesses defined in
subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), and (9) or any business
subject to control by the state, or having the powers of eminent domain and the
duties incident thereto, or any business hereafter declared by the legislature
to be of a public service nature, except telephone business as defined in RCW
82.04.065 and low-level radioactive waste site operating companies as redefined
in RCW 81.04.010. It includes, among others, without limiting the scope
hereof: Airplane transportation, boom, dock, ferry, pipe line, toll bridge,
toll logging road, water transportation and wharf businesses.

(11)
"Tugboat business" means the business of operating tugboats,
towboats, wharf boats or similar vessels in the towing or pushing of vessels,
barges or rafts for hire.

(12)
"Gross income" means the value proceeding or accruing from the
performance of the particular public service or transportation business
involved, including operations incidental thereto, but without any deduction on
account of the cost of the commodity furnished or sold, the cost of materials
used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or any other
expense whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on account of
losses.

(13) The meaning attributed, in chapter 82.04 RCW, to the term
"tax year," "person," "value proceeding or
accruing," "business," "engaging in business," "in
this state," "within this state," "cash discount" and
"successor" shall apply equally in the provisions of this chapter.

---
END ---