BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.55.120 and 1999 c 398 s 7 and 1999 c 327 s 5 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department that are impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW
46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140 may be redeemed only under the
following circumstances:

(a)
Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by
the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and
verified by the operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department, or one who has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department from the registered owner who produces
proof of ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is
in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person
eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements
of (e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and storage
fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a government
agency. If the department's records show that the operator has been convicted
of a violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded because
the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be released only
pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded
or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency may issue a written order to
release pursuant to a provision of an applicable state agency rule or local
ordinance authorizing release on the basis of: Economic or personal
hardship to the spouse of the operator, taking into consideration public safety
factors, including the operator's criminal history and driving record; or
economic or personal hardship to the owner of the vehicle if the owner was not
the operator of the vehicle when it was impounded and if the owner has not
received a prior release under this provision for hardship to the owner.

If
a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the
department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held at the written direction of the agency
ordering the vehicle impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days
if the operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded
because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle
may not be released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including paying
all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold
was ordered by a government agency.

(b)
If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license impound, a person
who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the period of impound shall
within five days of the impound at the request of the tow truck operator pay a
security deposit to the tow truck operator of not more than one-half of the
applicable impound storage rate for each day of the proposed suspended license
impound. The tow truck operator shall credit this amount against the final
bill for removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit. If the
person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security deposit or
provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator, the tow truck
operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as an abandoned vehicle
within the normal time limits set out in RCW 46.55.130(1). The security
deposit required by this section may be paid and must be accepted at any time
up to twenty-four hours before the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle
as abandoned. The registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at
the auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the highest
bidder who is not the registered owner.

(c)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business may immediately
redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and
storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license
impound.

(d)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer or lender with a
perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a
vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license impound. A motor
vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may
not knowingly and intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to
repossess and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However, this provision does not
preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected security interest in the
vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then selling, leasing, or otherwise
disposing of it in accordance with chapter 62A.9 RCW, including providing
redemption rights to the debtor under RCW 62A.9-506. If the debtor is the
registered owner of the vehicle, the debtor's right to redeem the vehicle under
chapter 62A.9 RCW is conditioned upon the debtor obtaining and providing proof
from the impounding authority or court having jurisdiction that any fines,
penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered owner, as a result of the
suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof of the payment must be
tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the debtor tenders all
other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle dealers or lenders
are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from the
impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a suspended
license impound.

(e)
The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department shall be released upon the presentation to any person having custody
of the vehicle of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs
of towing, storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing,
removing, impounding, or storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for
the amount of any security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In
addition, if a vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345 and was
being operated by the registered owner when it was impounded under local
ordinance or agency rule, it must not be released to any person until the
registered owner establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded
or the court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures owed
by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators are not
liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from the impounding
agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a suspended license
impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall include, without limitation,
cash, major bank credit cards, or personal checks drawn on in-state banks if
accompanied by two pieces of valid identification, one of which may be required
by the operator to have a photograph. If the towing firm can determine through
the customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented check
would not be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may
refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops payment on a personal check
or credit card, or does not make restitution within ten days from the date a
check becomes insufficient due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has
provided a service pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the
towing firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section shall
be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus
costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

(2)(a)
The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem
an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a
hearing, which notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting
a hearing, the name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy
of the towing and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall
maintain a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.

(b)
Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a
right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in
which the vehicle was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or
the amount of towing and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction
to determine the issues involving all impoundments including those authorized
by the state or its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine
the issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for
that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of
the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section
and more than five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the
filing of the hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a
filing fee in the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district
court. If the hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day
period, the right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for
any towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to
hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a)
The court, within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the
registered tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the
owner, the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency
authorizing the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b)
At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any
relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged
were not proper. The court may consider a written report made under oath by
the officer who authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal
appearance at the hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the
impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees charged were in
compliance with the posted rates, and who is responsible for payment of the
fees. The court may not adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the
posted or contracted rates.

(d)
If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
as permitted under this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed
against the person or persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did
not have a signed and valid impoundment authorization from a private property
owner or an authorized agent.

(e)
If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or
storage fees, and any security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate,
and the person or agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator
against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment,
towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in
favor of the registered and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of
personal property registered or titled with the department, for the amount of
the filing fee required by law for the impound hearing petition as well as
reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during the time the same
was impounded, for not less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or
agency authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345 is
determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer
directing the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable
for damages if the officer relied in good faith and without gross negligence on
the records of the department in ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle
had a suspended or revoked driver's license. If any judgment entered is not
paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of its entry, the court shall
award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant in any action
to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may be made by registered
or certified mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of the party
mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read essentially
as follows:

TO:
. . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you
in the . . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature ..................

Typed name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within fifteen
days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required by RCW
46.55.110(3) shall be sold at public auction in accordance with all the
provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW 46.55.130. A vehicle or
item of personal property registered or titled with the department may be
redeemed at any time before the start of the auction upon payment of the
applicable towing and storage fees.

---
END ---