BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.605 RCW to read as follows:

Every school district shall notify the parent or guardian of a
student who school staff or administrators have any knowledge, or any
reasonable basis for thinking that the student is being threatened, bullied, or
exposed to other potential risks of danger, harm, or criminal acts imposed on
the student by other students in the school.

---
END ---