BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.605.010 and 1997 c 411 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board of directors of each school district by rule or regulation shall set
forth proper procedure to ensure that each school within their district is
carrying out district policy providing that no child may be removed from any
school grounds or building thereon during school hours except by a person so
authorized by a parent or legal guardian having legal custody thereof, except
that a student may leave secondary school grounds only in accordance with the
school district's open campus policy under RCW 28A.600.035. Such rules shall
be applicable to school employees or their designees who may not remove, cause
to be removed, or allow to be removed, any student from school grounds without
authorization from the student's parent or legal guardian unless the employee
is: The student's parent, legal guardian, or immediate family member, a school
employee providing school bus transportation services in accordance with
chapter 28A.160 RCW, a school employee supervising an extracurricular activity
in which the student is participating and the employee is providing
transportation to or from the activity; or, the student is in need of emergent
medical care, and the employee is unable to reach the parent for transportation
of the student. School security personnel may remove a student from school
grounds without parental authorization for disciplinary reasons.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit removal of a student from
school grounds by:

(a)
Any person acting in his or her official capacity in response to a 911
emergency call; or

(b)
A parent who wishes to remove his or her child from the school grounds because
of a crisis situation occurring at or near the school grounds unless:

(i)
The situation involves a clear and present danger to the students, school
staff, school administrators, parents, or law enforcement or other emergency
personnel that is immediate and imminent; or

(ii) The presence of the parent would substantially disrupt the
necessary operations of the school, or law enforcement or other emergency
personnel.

---
END ---