BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.060 and 1991 c 154 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
landlord will at all times during the tenancy keep the premises fit for human
habitation, and shall in particular:

(1)
Maintain the premises to substantially comply with any applicable code,
statute, ordinance, or regulation governing their maintenance or operation,
which the legislative body enacting the applicable code, statute, ordinance or
regulation could enforce as to the premises rented if such condition
substantially endangers or impairs the health or safety of the tenant;

(2)
Maintain the roofs, floors, walls, chimneys, fireplaces, foundations, and all
other structural components in reasonably good repair so as to be usable and
capable of resisting any and all normal forces and loads to which they may be
subjected;

(3)
Keep any shared or common areas reasonably clean, sanitary, and safe from
defects increasing the hazards of fire or accident;

(4)
Provide a reasonable program for the control of infestation by insects, rodents,
and other pests at the initiation of the tenancy and, except in the case of a
single family residence, control infestation during tenancy except where such
infestation is caused by the tenant;

(5)
Except where the condition is attributable to normal wear and tear, make
repairs and arrangements necessary to put and keep the premises in as good
condition as it by law or rental agreement should have been, at the
commencement of the tenancy;

(6)
Provide reasonably adequate locks and furnish keys to the tenant;

(7)
Maintain all electrical, plumbing, heating, and other facilities and appliances
supplied by him in reasonably good working order;

(8)
Maintain the dwelling unit in reasonably weathertight condition;

(9)
Except in the case of a single family residence, provide and maintain
appropriate receptacles in common areas for the removal of ashes, rubbish, and
garbage, incidental to the occupancy and arrange for the reasonable and regular
removal of such waste;

(10)
Except where the building is not equipped for the purpose, provide facilities
adequate to supply heat and water and hot water as reasonably required by the
tenant;

(11)
Provide a written notice to the tenant that the dwelling unit is equipped with
a smoke detection device as required in RCW 48.48.140. The notice shall inform
the tenant of the tenant's responsibility to maintain the smoke detection
device in proper operating condition and of penalties for failure to comply
with the provisions of RCW 48.48.140(3). The notice must be signed by the
landlord or the landlord's authorized agent and tenant with copies provided to
both parties.

(12)(a)
Designate to the tenant the name and address of the property owner, or the
property owner's agent, or the person who is the landlord by a statement on
the rental agreement or by a notice conspicuously posted on the premises. The
tenant shall be notified immediately of any changes by certified mail or by an
updated posting. If the person designated in this section does not reside in
the state where the premises are located, there shall also be designated a
person who resides in the county who is authorized to act as an agent for the
purposes of service of notices and process, and if no designation is made of a
person to act as agent, then the person to whom rental payments are to be made
shall be considered such agent. As used in this subsection,
"address" means the physical location where the property owner, or
the property owner's agent, or the landlord resides. "Address" does
not include a post office box.

(b)
Any person who violates this subsection is liable to the tenant for an amount
not to exceed five hundred dollars. The prevailing party may also recover
court costs, but not attorneys' fees.

(c)
A tenant may terminate a rental agreement for a violation of this subsection
and is discharged from payment of rent for the period remaining on the rental
agreement, and is entitled to a pro rata refund of any prepaid rent, and shall
receive a full and specific statement of the basis for retaining any of the
deposit together with any refund due in accordance with RCW 59.18.280.

No duty shall devolve upon the landlord to repair a defective
condition under this section, nor shall any defense or remedy be available to
the tenant under this chapter, where the defective condition complained of was
caused by the conduct of such tenant, his family, invitee, or other person
acting under his control, or where a tenant unreasonably fails to allow the
landlord access to the property for purposes of repair. When the duty imposed
by subsection (1) of this section is incompatible with and greater than the
duty imposed by any other provisions of this section, the landlord's duty shall
be determined pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

---
END ---