BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Beginning January 1, 2001, every lender who collects funds under a residential
real estate loan agreement for deposit in a mortgage escrow account shall pay
interest to the borrower at a rate not less than the discount rate. Interest
shall be computed on the average monthly balance in the escrow account and
shall be paid by crediting the escrow account the amount due at least
quarterly.

(2)
The discount rate shall be adjusted semiannually. These adjustments shall be
calculated on May 15th and November 15th each year. Adjustments calculated on
May 15th shall take effect on the following July 1st, and adjustments
calculated on November 15th shall take effect on the following January 1st.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Discount rate" means the auction average rate on three-month United
States treasury bills, as established by the most recent auction of such
treasury bills, as reported by the federal reserve, less one hundred basis
points for reasonable expenses incurred by the lender or servicer. The
discount rate shall be determined with reference to the most recent auction
date before May 15th and November 15th each year, beginning November 15, 2000.

(2)
"Residential real estate loan" means a loan secured by a first
mortgage, deed of trust, real estate contract, or other first lien on the
borrower's interest in a one-to-four family dwelling located in this state,
including an individual cooperative unit, or a loan for the construction of the
dwelling.

(3)
"Lender" means any individual, corporation, association, partnership,
or trust doing business under the laws of this state or the United States as
mortgage servicers, banks, bank holding companies, mutual savings banks, trust
companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, consumer finance
companies, investment companies, insurance companies, mortgage companies,
mortgage servicing companies, pension funds, or real estate investment trusts,
and affiliates, subsidiaries, and service corporations thereof.

(4)
"Mortgage escrow account" means an account created in conjunction
with a residential real estate loan that is intended for the placement of
funds, on an incremental basis, for the purpose of paying property taxes,
hazard insurance, or other obligations of the residential real estate loan
customer in relation to the residential real estate loan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
chapter applies to all mortgage escrow accounts existing on January 1, 2001,
and all accounts created on or after January 1, 2001, except for mortgage
escrow accounts where payment of interest on these accounts specifically
violates federal law or regulation. For instance, if federal law or regulation
does not specifically prohibit the payment of interest on mortgage escrow
accounts by federally chartered or organized lenders, then this chapter applies
to the federally chartered or organized lenders regarding mortgage escrow
accounts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---