BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.52.053 and 1997 c 260 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 through 84.52.056, and 84.52.043 shall not
prevent the levy of taxes by school districts, when authorized so to do by the
voters of such school district in the manner and for the purposes and number of
years allowable under Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this
state. Elections for such taxes shall be held in the year in which the levy is
made or, in the case of propositions authorizing two-year through ((four-year))
ten-year levies for maintenance and operation support of a school
district, authorizing two-year levies for transportation vehicle funds
established in RCW 28A.160.130, or authorizing two-year through six-year levies
to support the construction, modernization, or remodeling of school facilities,
in the year in which the first annual levy is made: PROVIDED, That once
additional tax levies have been authorized for maintenance and operation
support of a school district for a two-year through ((four-year)) ten-year
period, no further additional tax levies for maintenance and operation support
of the district for that period may be authorized.

A
special election may be called and the time therefor fixed by the board of school
directors, by giving notice thereof by publication in the manner provided by
law for giving notices of general elections, at which special election the
proposition authorizing such excess levy shall be submitted in such form as to
enable the voters favoring the proposition to vote "yes" and those
opposed thereto to vote "no".

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect December 1, 2000, if the proposed constitutional amendment to
Article VII, section 2, of the state Constitution, allowing voters to approve
excess levies for up to ten years for the support of common schools, is validly
submitted to and is approved by the voters at the next general election. If
the proposed amendment is not approved and ratified, this act is void in its
entirety.

---
END ---