BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.33.020 and 1993 c 81 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Alleged father" means a person whose parent-child relationship has not
been terminated, who is not a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW, and who
alleges himself or whom a party alleges to be the father of the child. It
includes a person whose marriage to the mother was terminated more than three
hundred days before the birth of the child or who was separated from the mother
more than three hundred days before the birth of the child.

(2)
"Child" means a person under eighteen years of age.

(3)
"Adoptee" means a person who is to be adopted or who has been
adopted.

(4)
"Adoptive parent" means the person or persons who seek to adopt or
have adopted an adoptee.

(5)
"Court" means the superior court.

(6)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(7)
"Agency" means any public or private association, corporation, or
individual licensed or certified by the department as a child placing agency
under chapter 74.15 RCW or as an adoption agency.

(8)
"Parent" means the natural or adoptive mother or father of a child,
including a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW. It does not include any
person whose parent-child relationship has been terminated by a court of
competent jurisdiction.

(9)
"Legal guardian" means the department, an agency, or a person, other
than a parent or stepparent, appointed by the court to promote the child's
general welfare, with the authority and duty to make decisions affecting the
child's development.

(10)
"Guardian ad litem" means a person, not related to a party to the
action, appointed by the court to represent the best interests of a party who
is under a legal disability.

(11)
"Relinquish or relinquishment" means the voluntary surrender of
custody of a child to the department, an agency, or prospective adoptive
parents.

(12)
"Individual approved by the court" or "qualified salaried court
employee" means a person who has a master's degree in social work or a
related field and one year of experience in social work, or a bachelor's degree
and two years of experience in social work, and includes a person not having
such qualifications only if the court makes specific findings of fact that are
entered of record establishing that the person has reasonably equivalent
experience.

(13)
"Birth parent" means the biological mother or biological or alleged
father of a child, including a presumed father under chapter 26.26 RCW, whether
or not any such person's parent-child relationship has been terminated by a
court of competent jurisdiction. "Birth parent" does not include a
biological mother or biological or alleged father, including a presumed father
under chapter 26.26 RCW, if the parent-child relationship was terminated
because of an act for which the person was found guilty under chapter 9A.42 or
9A.44 RCW.

(14)
"Nonidentifying information" includes, but is not limited to, the
following information about the birth parents, adoptive parents, and adoptee:

(a)
Age in years at the time of adoption;

(b)
Heritage, including nationality, ethnic background, and race;

(c)
Education, including number of years of school completed at the time of
adoption, but not name or location of school;

(d)
General physical appearance, including height, weight, color of hair, eyes, and
skin, or other information of a similar nature;

(e)
Religion;

(f)
Occupation, but not specific titles or places of employment;

(g)
Talents, hobbies, and special interests;

(h)
Circumstances leading to the adoption;

(i)
Medical and genetic history of birth parents;

(j)
First names;

(k)
Other children of birth parents by age, sex, and medical history;

(l)
Extended family of birth parents by age, sex, and medical history;

(m)
The fact of the death, and age and cause, if known;

(n)
Photographs;

(o)
Name of agency or individual that facilitated the adoption.

(15)
"Indian child" means a child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 26.33 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall comply with all federal requirements relating
to the adoption of Indian children. The department shall not require licensed
adoption agencies to meet any requirements or standards beyond those required
by the federal Indian child welfare act, unless specifically authorized by law.

---
END ---