BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

The
transportation fund is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund may
be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only
for transportation-related capital purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall deposit into the transportation fund all revenue received from
taxes imposed under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the sale or use of:

(1)
Vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers used, or of the type designed primarily to
be used, upon the public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure
of the owner, or for the conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or
property, including fixed loads and facilities for human habitation; but not
including (a) dock and warehouse tractors and their cars or trailers, lumber
carriers of the type known as spiders, and all other automotive equipment not
designed primarily for use upon public streets or highways, (b) motor vehicles
or their trailers used entirely upon private property, or (c) mobile homes as
defined in RCW 46.04.302;

(2)
Travel trailers as defined in RCW 46.04.623; and

(3)
Campers as defined in RCW 46.04.085.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---