BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW to read as follows:

Computers
and software acquired by the supreme court must be used for at least thirty-six
months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 2.06 RCW to read as follows:

Computers
and software acquired by the court of appeals must be used for at least
thirty-six months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW to read as follows:

Computers
and software acquired by the administrator for the courts must be used for at
least thirty-six months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

Computers
and software acquired by institutions of higher education must be used for at
least thirty-six months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW to read as follows:

Computers
and software acquired by each state elected official, and the office of those
officials, must be used for at least thirty-six months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

Computers
and software acquired by each department, agency, office, division, bureau,
board, commission, or other administrative agency of the state must be used for
at least thirty-six months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

Computers and software acquired by the legislature, and each
legislative agency, must be used for at least thirty-six months.

---
END ---