BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of:

(1)
Items that become components of a state highway as defined in RCW 46.04.560;
and

(2)
Labor and services rendered for constructing, repairing, or improving a state
highway as defined in RCW 46.04.560.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use
of items that become components of a state highway as defined in RCW 46.04.560.

---
END ---