BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 2.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
supreme court may not hire any new staff or expand the amount of floor space it
uses prior to January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 2.06 RCW to read as follows:

The
court of appeals may not hire any new staff or expand the amount of floor space
it uses prior to January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW to read as follows:

The
administrator for the courts may not hire any new staff or expand the amount of
floor space it uses prior to January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.01 RCW to read as follows:

Each
state elected official, and the office of those officials, may not hire any new
staff or expand the amount of floor space it uses prior to January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

A
department, agency, office, division, bureau, board, commission, or other
administrative agency of the state, other than the state patrol, department of
corrections, juvenile rehabilitation administration of the department of social
and health services, and institutions of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016, may not hire any new staff or expand the amount of floor space it
uses prior to January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

The house of representatives, senate, and each legislative agency
may not hire any new staff or expand the amount of floor space it uses prior to
January 1, 2004.

---
END ---