BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the citizens of this state are usually unaware of the
presence of criminals, and criminal activity, within their communities and
neighborhoods. As a consequence, law-abiding citizens are frequently unable to
take effective measures to protect themselves. Criminals have no right to keep
their identities hidden from the public, making law-abiding citizens
uninformed, unaware, unprotected, and vulnerable to further harm. Far too
often, criminals engage in repeat offenses within the very community in which
they committed previous offenses and within the very community in which they
currently reside. Because of the lack of accessibility to information
regarding criminals, and criminal activity, citizens of the state needlessly
suffer the many harmful effects of crime, including injury to their person and
property, loss of life, financial loss, increased anxiety, and loss of a sense
of well-being.

Simple
protective measures by responsible individuals will frequently thwart criminal
activity. However, a lack of pertinent knowledge effectively hinders citizens
from taking lawful, wise, crime-preventative actions. The law-abiding public
must have the basic information necessary to protect their lives, their property,
and the ability to engage in the pursuit of happiness. The internet is one of
the most rapid and effective means of communicating information available
today. A large percentage of the population in now online, and it appears
likely that the internet will be increasingly utilized as a means of receiving
important information. The legislature therefore concludes that it is in the
best interest of the public health, safety, and welfare that information
regarding violent criminals and criminal activity should be posted on the
internet and thereby made available to the public at large.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Regarding a defendant who has been convicted of a violent offense as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030 in any trial court of this state, the department shall post the
information required by this section on the internet within thirty days of
conviction, regardless of whether an appeal may occur. Regarding a defendant
who has been convicted of a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 in any
trial court of another state or in any trial court of the federal government,
the department shall post the information required by this section on the
internet, regardless of whether an appeal may occur, within thirty days after
the information has been received by the department from the other state or the
federal government. The department shall post the following information:

(a)
The name of the defendant, and any aliases used by the defendant;

(b)
The address of the defendant at the time the defendant was arrested, and the
current address of the defendant;

(c)
The court before which the defendant was tried, and the name of the presiding
judge;

(d)
The offense for which the defendant was convicted, and the sentence imposed on
the defendant by the trial court;

(e)
The defendant's age, height, weight, and other descriptive data, such as a
tattoo or other distinguishing marks;

(f)
A copy of the defendant's mug shots, and a photograph of the defendant taken at
the time of sentencing if not incarcerated, or upon release if incarcerated;

(g)
Whether the defendant was incarcerated and for how long, the anticipated
release date, the actual release date, and whether the defendant served his or
her complete sentence or was released early for any reason and what that reason
was; and

(h)
A list of all previous felonies for which the defendant has been convicted and
the disposition of each conviction.

(2) For the purposes of this section, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, "convicted" means that the defendant has been
found guilty of a violent offense in any trial court of this state, in any
trial court of another state, or in any trial court of the federal government,
and is the event that triggers the department's mandate to post the
legislatively directed data onto the internet, regardless of whether an appeal
may occur.

---
END ---