BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state may sue the
firearms industry for damages, abatement, or injunctive relief resulting or
arising from the lawful design, manufacture, marketing, sale, or use of
firearms, firearm-related components, or ammunition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
This act does not prohibit the state or any political subdivision of the state
from bringing an action against the firearms industry for breach of contract or
warranty in connection with firearms, firearm-related components, or ammunition
when purchased by the state or any political subdivision of the state.

(2)
This act does not prohibit civil actions by individuals for injuries resulting
from a firearm, firearm-related component, or ammunition malfunction due to
defects in design or manufacture of the firearm, firearm-related component, or
ammunition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
For purposes of this act, the potential of a firearm, firearm-related
component, or ammunition to cause serious injury, death, or damages to persons
or property as a result of the normal function of the firearm, firearm-related
component, or ammunition does not constitute a defect in design or manufacture
or other defective condition.

(2)
A firearm, firearm-related component, or ammunition shall not be deemed
defective on the basis of the potential of the firearm, firearm-related
component, or ammunition to cause serious injury, death, or damage to persons
or property regardless of whether or not the firearm is discharged lawfully or
unlawfully.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
An employee, official, or agent of the state, or any political subdivision of
the state, who in his or her official capacity and within the scope of his or
her duties files an action in violation of this act is guilty of a class C
felony.

(2)
A civil suit may be brought by any person or corporation to enjoin a wrongful
filing under this act and if the person or corporation prevails, the person or
corporation shall be awarded costs, including reasonable attorney fees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
authority to regulate the manufacture, sale, purchase, possession, ownership,
carrying, transport, transfer, licensing, registration, operation, or use of
gun shows, firearms, firearm components, firearm ammunition, firearm dealers,
dealers in firearm components, or sellers of firearm ammunition is reserved
exclusively to the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. For
purposes of this act, "firearms industry" means those persons,
corporations, or organizations engaged in the business of manufacture,
marketing, storage, distribution, transport, display, advertising, sale,
training, or service of firearms, firearm-related components, or ammunition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 9.41 RCW.

---
END ---