BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person who,
while at a gun show or event, offers to sell or sells a handgun to another must
be licensed as a dealer under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923 and post the license in
accordance with 27 C.F.R. Sec. 178.91 and Sec. 178.100(a).

(2)
A person who organizes, promotes, or otherwise sponsors a gun show or event
shall:

(a)
Take all reasonable steps to ensure that any person who, while at the gun show
or event, offers to sell or sells a handgun to another complies with the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section; and

(b)
Provide the services of a person licensed as a dealer under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923
to conduct the transactions described in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
A person other than a dealer may display a handgun for sale while at a gun show
or event, provided that any sale of the handgun is conducted through a person
licensed as a dealer under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923.

(4)
A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.41.010 and 1997 c 338 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or
projectiles may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder.

(2)
"Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in
length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.

(3)
"Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and
intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or
remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic
cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each
single pull of the trigger.

(4)
"Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less
than sixteen inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of
modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than
twenty-six inches.

(5)
"Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or
redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and
designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the
explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a
number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

(6)
"Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels
less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any
means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less
than twenty-six inches.

(7)
"Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical
rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that
the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum,
belt, or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying
ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and
fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.

(8)
"Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not
designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition
with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any
matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and
also any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for
which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not
readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(9)
"Loaded" means:

(a)
There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;

(b)
Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the firearm;

(c)
There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a
revolver;

(d)
There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or

(e)
There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the
firearm is a muzzle loader.

(10)
"Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms
at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms
license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), or who is required to be licensed under
section 1 of this act. A person who does not have, and is not required to
have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is not a dealer
if that person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or purchases of firearms
for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a hobby, or sells all or
part of his or her personal collection of firearms, in a private transaction
not through a gun show or event.

(11)
"Crime of violence" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree,
burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second
degree;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6,
1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a)
of this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony
classified as a crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(12)
"Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony
attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter
amended:

(a)
Any crime of violence;

(b)
Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50
RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of
imprisonment of at least ten years;

(c)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(d)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(e)
Indecent liberties;

(f)
Leading organized crime;

(g)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(h)
Rape in the third degree;

(i)
Drive-by shooting;

(j)
Sexual exploitation;

(k)
Vehicular assault;

(l)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(m)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(n)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125; or

(o)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is
comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
serious offense.

(13)
"Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington
peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned
Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement
officer" also includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as defined
in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her employer to
carry a concealed pistol.

(14)
"Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this state or any
federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense under the laws
of this state.

(15)
"Sell" refers to the actual approval of the delivery of a firearm in
consideration of payment or promise of payment of a certain price in money.

(16)
"Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of a closed
action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the muzzle, or
in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of any legal device
permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.

(17)
"Family or household member" means "family" or
"household member" as used in RCW 10.99.020.

(18)(a)
"Gun show or event" means any function sponsored by any person or
national, state, or local organization that is devoted to the collection, competitive
use, or other sporting use of firearms in the community.

(b)
"Gun show or event" includes, but is not limited to, any gun trade
show, gun collectors' show, flea market, auction, or similar event, a purpose
for which is the displaying, offering for sale, or selling of firearms.

(c) "Gun show or event" includes, but is not limited
to, any area near the gun show or event that the sponsor knows or should
reasonably know will be used for parking for the gun show or event.

---
END ---