BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The public employees' benefits board shall purchase up to ten life insurance
policies with a face value of five hundred thousand dollars each, or one group
policy covering up to ten persons with coverage of five hundred thousand
dollars per person, on behalf of the state to provide benefits to the spouse
and minor children of a state patrol officer, police officer, sheriff, or fire
fighter, or a volunteer law enforcement officer or fire fighter, killed in the
line of duty. The board shall purchase the policies from an insurer authorized
to sell life insurance policies in this state; if no such insurer will provide
the life insurance policies under this section, the board shall purchase the
policies through a surplus lines broker under chapter 48.15 RCW.

(2)
The board shall establish an advisory committee comprised of a representative
of the Washington state patrol, a representative of city police officers, a
representative of county sheriffs, and a representative of fire fighters. The
advisory committee shall assist the board in designing the specifics of the
life insurance policies to ensure a proper insurable interest, in defining the
criteria under which the policies will apply, and providing other advice on the
administration of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of forty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the health care authority for the public employees' benefits board to purchase
life insurance policies under section 1 of this act.

---
END ---