BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.28 RCW to read as follows:

No person, association, or organization may assume or use the
designation "sheriff" or any other title, designation, words,
letters, abbreviation, sign, or card intending to indicate that the person,
association, or organization is a county sheriff or deputy sheriff or is
associated with a county sheriff unless the person, association, or
organization is in fact a county sheriff or deputy sheriff or associated with a
county sheriff or unless authorized by the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs.

---
END ---