BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.56.080 and 1986 c 257 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every person who, with intent to sell or exchange and to deprive or defraud the
lawful owner thereof, willfully takes, leads, or transports away,
conceals, withholds, slaughters, or otherwise appropriates any horse, mule,
cow, heifer, bull, steer, swine, ((or)) goat, sheep, donkey,
bison, llama, alpaca, or ratite bird is guilty of theft of livestock in the
first degree.

(2)
A person who commits what would otherwise be theft of livestock in the first
degree but without intent to sell or exchange, and for the person's own use
only, is guilty of theft of livestock in the second degree.

(3)
Theft of livestock in the first degree is a class B felony.

(4) Theft of livestock in the second degree is a class C felony.

---
END ---