BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.44.093 and 1994 c 271 s 306 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person is guilty of sexual
misconduct with a minor in the first degree when the person has, or knowingly
causes another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse
with another person who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen
years old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least
sixty months older than the victim, is in a significant relationship to the
victim, other than a relationship between a school employee and a student,
and abuses a supervisory position within that relationship in order to engage
in or cause another person under the age of eighteen to engage in sexual
intercourse with the victim.

(b)
In the case of a significant relationship involving a school employee and a
student, the employee is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the first
degree when the employee has, or knowingly causes another person under the age
of eighteen to have, sexual intercourse with the student if the student is at
least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and not married to the
employee.

(2)
Sexual misconduct with a minor in the first degree is a class C felony.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "school employee" means an employee
of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020 or a grade kindergarten through
twelve employee of a private school under chapter 28A.195 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.44.096 and 1994 c 271 s 307 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, a person is guilty of sexual
misconduct with a minor in the second degree when the person has, or knowingly
causes another person under the age of eighteen to have, sexual contact with
another person who is at least sixteen years old but less than eighteen years
old and not married to the perpetrator, if the perpetrator is at least sixty
months older than the victim, is in a significant relationship to the victim, other
than a relationship between a school employee and a student, and abuses a
supervisory position within that relationship in order to engage in or cause
another person under the age of eighteen to engage in sexual contact with the
victim.

(b)
In the case of a significant relationship involving a school employee and a
student, the employee is guilty of sexual misconduct with a minor in the second
degree when the employee has, or knowingly causes another person under the age
of eighteen to have, sexual contact with the student if the student is at least
sixteen years old but less than eighteen years old and not married to the
employee.

(2)
Sexual misconduct with a minor in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "school
employee" means an employee of a common school defined in RCW 28A.150.020
or a grade kindergarten through twelve employee of a private school under
chapter 28A.195 RCW.

---
END ---