BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.18.016 and 1999 c 397 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division under RCW
36.18.025 or 27.24.070.

(2)
For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of dissolution or
paternity, within the same case as the original action, a fee of twenty dollars
must be paid.

(3)(a)
The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil action shall pay, at the
time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars; if the demand is for a jury of
twelve, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury
of six and pays the required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury
of twelve, an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.

(b)
Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of fifty dollars for a
jury of six, or one hundred dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as
costs under RCW 10.46.190.

(4)
For preparing, transcribing, or certifying an instrument on file or of record
in the clerk's office, with or without seal, for the first page or portion of
the first page, a fee of two dollars, and for each additional page or portion
of a page, a fee of one dollar must be charged. For authenticating or
exemplifying an instrument, a fee of one dollar for each additional seal
affixed must be charged.

(5)
For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of two dollars must
be charged.

(6)
For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment and for a writ
of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.

(7)
For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in other than civil
actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars must be charged.

(8)
For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a certified copy of
letters of administration, letters testamentary, or letters of guardianship,
there must be a fee of two dollars.

(9)
For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may collect an
execution fee as authorized by the federal government.

(10)
For clerk's special services such as processing ex parte orders by mail,
performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports, and conducting
exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee not to exceed twenty
dollars per hour or portion of an hour.

(11)
For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be a fee of ten
dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for each video tape.

(12)
For the filing of oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28 RCW, a fee of twenty
dollars must be charged.

(13)
For filing a disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4), a fee of two
dollars must be charged.

(14)
For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW 65.12.780, a fee of
five dollars must be charged.

(15)
For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020 and chapter 9.94A
RCW, a fee of one hundred ten dollars must be charged.

(16)
A facilitator surcharge of ten dollars must be charged as authorized under RCW
26.12.240.

(17)
For filing a water rights statement under RCW 90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five
dollars must be charged.

(18)
For filing a warrant for overpayment of state retirement systems benefits under
chapter 41.50 RCW, a fee of five dollars shall be charged pursuant to RCW
41.50.136.

(19)
A service fee of three dollars for the first page and one dollar for each
additional page must be charged for receiving faxed documents, pursuant to
Washington state rules of court, general rule 17.

(20)
For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of fifty cents per page
must be charged.

(21)
For copies and reports produced at the local level as permitted by RCW 2.68.020
and supreme court policy, a variable fee must be charged.

(22)
Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090 must be charged.

(23)
Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority of local
ordinance or policy must be charged.

(24)
For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a fee may be assessed
against the party filing a statement of arbitrability not to exceed one hundred
twenty dollars as established by authority of local ordinance and approved by a
vote of the people if it is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction
that such a vote is required by chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure No.
695). This charge shall be used solely to offset the cost of the mandatory
arbitration program.

(25) For filing a request for trial de novo of an
arbitration award, a fee not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars as established
by authority of local ordinance must be charged.

---
END ---