BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that the warm water game fish enhancement program is
increasing opportunities to fish for and catch warm water game fish.

The
legislature also recognizes that there are warm water ponds, lakes, and streams
in the state that provide outstanding fishing opportunities for people of all
ages.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to designate certain waterbodies as warm
water game fish habitat in order to preserve and protect them for current and
future generations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall designate specific ponds, lakes, rivers, and streams in the
state as warm water game fish habitat. Once a waterbody has received such a
designation, it shall be managed to increase the opportunities to fish for and
catch warm water game fish.

At
a minimum, the following waterbodies shall be designated as warm water game
fish habitat:

Adams
county: Cow Lake, Hutchinson Lake, Shiner Lake, and Sprague Lake;

Benton
county: Columbia Park Pond;

Chelan
county: Antilon Lake and Roses Lake;

Clark
county: Lacamas Lake, Merwin Reservoir, and Vancouver Lake;

Cowlitz
county: Horseshoe Lake, Kress Lake, and Silver Lake;

Grant
county: Alkali Lake, Banks Lake, Billy Clapp Reservoir, Evergreen Reservoir,
Frenchman Lake, Lower Goose Lake, Moses Lake, Potholes Reservoir, Redrock Lake,
Stan Coffin Lake, and Winchester Lake (Reservoir);

Franklin
county: Clark Pond and Scooteny Reservoir;

King
county: Green Lake;

Kittitas
county: Fio Rito Lakes and McCabe Pond;

Lewis
county: Mayfield Reservoir, South Lewis County Park Pond, and Swofford Pond;

Okanogan
county: Palmer Lake, Washburn Island Pond, and Whitestone Lake;

Pierce
county: American Lake and Harts Lake;

San
Juan county: Hummel Lake;

Skagit
county: Big Lake and Campbell Lake;

Snohomish
county: Gissberg Ponds;

Spokane
county: Liberty Lake and Newman Lake;

Thurston
county: Chambers Lake, Little Chambers Lake, and Longs Pond;

Whatcom
county: Fazon Lake, Terrell Lake, and Whatcom Lake; and

Yakima
county: I‑82 ponds 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7, Rotary Lake, Sarge Hubbard
Pond, and Wenas Lake.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall provide an annual report to the legislature by December 31st
of each year, beginning December 31, 2000, of the waterbodies designated as
warm water game fish habitat under section 2 of this act. The report shall
include the status of warm water game fish by waterbody and a list of habitat
enhancement projects completed during the calendar year that benefit warm water
game fish.

Sec.
4. RCW 75.46.170
and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The (([salmon recovery funding])) salmon recovery funding board
shall develop procedures and criteria for allocation of funds for salmon
habitat projects and salmon recovery activities on a state-wide basis to
address the highest priorities for salmon habitat protection and restoration.
To the extent practicable the board shall adopt an annual allocation of
funding. The allocation should address both protection and restoration of habitat,
and should recognize the varying needs in each area of the state on an
equitable basis. The board has the discretion to partially fund, or to fund in
phases, salmon habitat projects. The board may annually establish a maximum
amount of funding available for any individual project, subject to available
funding. No projects required solely as a mitigation or a condition of
permitting are eligible for funding.

(2)(a)
In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and activities the
board shall give preference to projects that:

(i)
Are based upon the limiting factors analysis identified under RCW 75.46.070;

(ii)
Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery based upon the stock status
information contained in the department of fish and wildlife salmonid stock
inventory (SASSI), the salmon and steelhead habitat inventory and assessment
project (SSHIAP), and any comparable science-based assessment when available;

(iii)
Will benefit listed species and other fish species; and

(iv)
Will preserve high quality salmonid habitat.

(b)
In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and activities the
board shall also give consideration to projects that:

(i)
Are the most cost-effective;

(ii)
Have the greatest matched or in-kind funding; and

(iii)
Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of project
implementation.

(3)
In evaluating, ranking, and awarding funds for projects and activities, the
board shall give lesser preference to projects located in designated warm water
game fish habitat.

(4)
The board may reject, but not add, projects from a habitat project list
submitted by a lead entity for funding.

(((4)))
(5) For fiscal year 2000, the board may authorize the interagency review
team to evaluate, rank, and make funding decisions for categories of projects
or activities or from funding sources provided for categories of projects or
activities. In delegating such authority the board shall consider the review
team's staff resources, procedures, and technical capacity to meet the purposes
and objectives of this chapter. The board shall maintain general oversight of
the team's exercise of such authority.

(((5)))
(6) The board shall seek the guidance of the technical review team to
ensure that scientific principles and information are incorporated into the
allocation standards and into proposed projects and activities. If the
technical review team determines that a habitat project list complies with the
critical pathways methodology under RCW 75.46.070, it shall provide substantial
weight to the list's project priorities when making determinations among
applications for funding of projects within the area covered by the list.

(((6)))
(7) The board shall establish criteria for determining when block grants
may be made to a lead entity or other recognized regional recovery entity
consistent with one or more habitat project lists developed for that region.
Where a lead entity has been established pursuant to RCW 75.46.060, the board
may provide grants to the lead entity to assist in carrying out lead entity
functions under this chapter, subject to available funding. The board shall
determine an equitable minimum amount of funds for each region, and shall
distribute the remainder of funds on a competitive basis.

(((7))) (8) The board may waive or modify portions of
the allocation procedures and standards adopted under this section in the award
of grants or loans to conform to legislative appropriations directing an
alternative award procedure or when the funds to be awarded are from federal or
other sources requiring other allocation procedures or standards as a condition
of the board's receipt of the funds. The board shall develop an integrated
process to manage the allocation of funding from federal and state sources to
minimize delays in the award of funding while recognizing the differences in
state and legislative appropriation timing.

---
END ---