BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that preconviction and postconviction probation or
supervision of persons charged with or convicted of misdemeanors is necessary
to improve the safety of the community in general. Also, the legislature finds
that the decision concerning whether a criminal offender is released into the
community pending trial or placed on postconviction supervision, as well as
revocation of community placement, rests with the judiciary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

If
a county, city, or other local government entity engages in the provision of
preconviction or postconviction probation or supervision services for persons
charged with or convicted of misdemeanors, the county, city, or other local
government entity, and their staff and volunteers who assist in probation or
supervision, are not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or
omission in providing probation or supervision services unless the act or
omission constitutes gross negligence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 9.95 RCW to read as follows:

The Washington state law and justice advisory council, appointed
under RCW 72.09.300(7), shall by October 1, 2000, develop standards for
preconviction and postconviction probation and supervision services by
counties, cities, and other local government entities of persons charged with
or convicted of misdemeanors.

---
END ---