BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.55.120 and 1999 c 398 s 7 and 1999 c 327 s 5 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department that are impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW
46.55.080, 46.55.085, 46.55.113, or 9A.88.140 may be redeemed only under the
following circumstances:

(a)
Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by
the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and
verified by the operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department, or one who has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department from the registered owner who produces
proof of ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is
in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person
eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements
of (e) of this subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and storage
fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a government
agency. If the department's records show that the operator has been convicted
of a violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle impounded
because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may be
released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the
vehicle impounded or from the court having jurisdiction. An agency ((may
issue a written order to release pursuant to a provision of an applicable state
agency rule or local ordinance authorizing release)) is authorized to
release the impounded vehicle prior to the expiration of any period of
impoundment on the basis of economic or personal hardship to the spouse of
the operator or to the registered owner of the vehicle if the registered
owner was not the operator, taking into consideration public safety
factors, including the operator's criminal history and driving record.

If
a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the
department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held at the written direction of the agency
ordering the vehicle impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days
if the operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded
because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle
may not be released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (e) of this subsection, including paying
all towing, removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold
was ordered by a government agency.

(b)
If the vehicle is directed to be held for a suspended license impound, a person
who desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the period of impound shall
within five days of the impound at the request of the tow truck operator pay a
security deposit to the tow truck operator of not more than one-half of the
applicable impound storage rate for each day of the proposed suspended license
impound. The tow truck operator shall credit this amount against the final
bill for removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit. If the
person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security deposit or
provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator, the tow truck
operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as an abandoned vehicle
within the normal time limits set out in RCW 46.55.130(1). The security
deposit required by this section may be paid and must be accepted at any time
up to twenty-four hours before the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle
as abandoned. The registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at
the auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the highest
bidder who is not the registered owner.

(c)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business may immediately
redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and
storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license
impound.

(d)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer or lender with a
perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a
vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a suspended license impound. A
motor vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security interest in the
vehicle may not knowingly and intentionally engage in collusion with a
registered owner to repossess and then return or resell a vehicle to the
registered owner in an attempt to avoid a suspended license impound. However,
this provision does not preclude a vehicle dealer or a lender with a perfected
security interest in the vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of it in accordance with chapter 62A.9
RCW, including providing redemption rights to the debtor under RCW 62A.9-506.
If the debtor is the registered owner of the vehicle, the debtor's right to
redeem the vehicle under chapter 62A.9 RCW is conditioned upon the debtor
obtaining and providing proof from the impounding authority or court having
jurisdiction that any fines, penalties, and forfeitures owed by the registered
owner, as a result of the suspended license impound, have been paid, and proof
of the payment must be tendered to the vehicle dealer or lender at the time the
debtor tenders all other obligations required to redeem the vehicle. Vehicle
dealers or lenders are not liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an
order from the impounding agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a
suspended license impound.

(e)
The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department shall be released upon the presentation to any person having custody
of the vehicle of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs
of towing, storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing,
removing, impounding, or storing any such vehicle, with credit being given for
the amount of any security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection. In
addition, if a vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345 and was
being operated by the registered owner when it was impounded under local
ordinance or agency rule, it must not be released to any person until the
registered owner establishes with the agency that ordered the vehicle impounded
or the court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or forfeitures owed
by him or her have been satisfied. Registered tow truck operators are not
liable for damages if they rely in good faith on an order from the impounding
agency or a court in releasing a vehicle held under a suspended license
impound. Commercially reasonable tender shall include, without limitation,
cash, major bank credit cards, or personal checks drawn on in-state banks if
accompanied by two pieces of valid identification, one of which may be required
by the operator to have a photograph. If the towing firm can determine through
the customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented check
would not be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may
refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops payment on a personal check or
credit card, or does not make restitution within ten days from the date a check
becomes insufficient due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has provided a
service pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the towing
firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section shall be
liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus
costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

(2)(a)
The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem
an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a
hearing, which notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting
a hearing, the name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy
of the towing and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall
maintain a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.

(b)
Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a
right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in
which the vehicle was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or
the amount of towing and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction
to determine the issues involving all impoundments including those authorized
by the state or its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine
the issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for
that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of
the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section
and more than five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the
filing of the hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a
filing fee in the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district
court. If the hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day
period, the right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for
any towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to
hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a)
The court, within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the
registered tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the
owner, the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency
authorizing the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b)
At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any
relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged
were not proper. The court may consider a written report made under oath by
the officer who authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal
appearance at the hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the
impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees charged were in
compliance with the posted rates, and who is responsible for payment of the
fees. The court may not adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the
posted or contracted rates.

(d)
If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
as permitted under this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed
against the person or persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did
not have a signed and valid impoundment authorization from a private property
owner or an authorized agent.

(e)
If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or
storage fees, and any security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate,
and the person or agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator
against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment,
towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in
favor of the registered and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of
personal property registered or titled with the department, for the amount of
the filing fee required by law for the impound hearing petition as well as
reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during the time the same
was impounded, for not less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or
agency authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345 is
determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer
directing the impoundment and the government employing the officer are not
liable for damages if the officer relied in good faith and without gross
negligence on the records of the department in ascertaining that the operator
of the vehicle had a suspended or revoked driver's license. If any judgment
entered is not paid within fifteen days of notice in writing of its entry, the
court shall award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant in
any action to enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may be made by
registered or certified mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of
the party mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read
essentially as follows:

TO:
. . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you
in the . . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you
under RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the
date of this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature ..................

Typed name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4)
Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property registered or
titled with the department that is not redeemed within fifteen days of mailing
of the notice of custody and sale as required by RCW 46.55.110(3) shall be sold
at public auction in accordance with all the provisions and subject to all the
conditions of RCW 46.55.130. A vehicle or item of personal property registered
or titled with the department may be redeemed at any time before the start of
the auction upon payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.55.240 and 1994 c 176 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A city, town, or county that adopts an ordinance or resolution concerning
unauthorized, abandoned, or impounded vehicles shall include the applicable
provisions of this chapter.

(a)
A city, town, or county may, by ordinance, authorize other impound situations
that may arise locally upon the public right-of-way or other publicly owned or
controlled property.

(b)
A city, town, or county ordinance shall contain language that establishes a
written form of authorization to impound, which may include a law enforcement
notice of infraction or citation, clearly denoting the agency's authorization
to impound.

(c)
A city, town, or county may, by ordinance, provide for release of an impounded
vehicle by means of a promissory note in lieu of immediate payment, if at the
time of redemption the legal or registered owner requests a hearing on the
validity of the impoundment. If the municipal ordinance directs the release of
an impounded vehicle before the payment of the impoundment charges, the
municipality is responsible for the payment of those charges to the registered
tow truck operator within thirty days of the hearing date.

(d)
The hearing specified in RCW 46.55.120(2) and in this section may be conducted
by an administrative hearings officer instead of in the district court. A
decision made by an administrative hearing officer may be appealed to the
district court for final judgment.

(e)
A city, town, or county ordinance shall contain language that the city, town,
or county is authorized to release an impounded vehicle prior to the expiration
of any period of impoundment on the basis of economic or personal hardship to
the spouse of the operator or to the registered owner of the vehicle if the
registered owner was not the operator, taking into consideration public safety
factors, including the operator's criminal history and driving record.

(2)
A city, town, or county may adopt an ordinance establishing procedures for the
abatement and removal as public nuisances of junk vehicles or parts thereof
from private property. Costs of removal may be assessed against the registered
owner of the vehicle if the identity of the owner can be determined, unless the
owner in the transfer of ownership of the vehicle has complied with RCW
46.12.101, or the costs may be assessed against the owner of the property on
which the vehicle is stored. A city, town, or county may also provide for the
payment to the tow truck operator or wrecker as a part of a neighborhood
revitalization program.

(3)
Ordinances pertaining to public nuisances shall contain:

(a)
A provision requiring notice to the last registered owner of record and the
property owner of record that a hearing may be requested and that if no hearing
is requested, the vehicle will be removed;

(b)
A provision requiring that if a request for a hearing is received, a notice
giving the time, location, and date of the hearing on the question of abatement
and removal of the vehicle or part thereof as a public nuisance shall be
mailed, by certified mail, with a five-day return receipt requested, to the
owner of the land as shown on the last equalized assessment roll and to the
last registered and legal owner of record unless the vehicle is in such
condition that identification numbers are not available to determine ownership;

(c)
A provision that the ordinance shall not apply to (i) a vehicle or part thereof
that is completely enclosed within a building in a lawful manner where it is
not visible from the street or other public or private property or (ii) a
vehicle or part thereof that is stored or parked in a lawful manner on private
property in connection with the business of a licensed dismantler or licensed
vehicle dealer and is fenced according to RCW 46.80.130;

(d)
A provision that the owner of the land on which the vehicle is located may
appear in person at the hearing or present a written statement in time for
consideration at the hearing, and deny responsibility for the presence of the
vehicle on the land, with his reasons for the denial. If it is determined at
the hearing that the vehicle was placed on the land without the consent of the
landowner and that he has not subsequently acquiesced in its presence, then the
local agency shall not assess costs of administration or removal of the vehicle
against the property upon which the vehicle is located or otherwise attempt to
collect the cost from the owner;

(e)
A provision that after notice has been given of the intent of the city, town,
or county to dispose of the vehicle and after a hearing, if requested, has been
held, the vehicle or part thereof shall be removed at the request of a law
enforcement officer with notice to the Washington state patrol and the
department of licensing that the vehicle has been wrecked. The city, town, or
county may operate such a disposal site when its governing body determines that
commercial channels of disposition are not available or are inadequate, and it
may make final disposition of such vehicles or parts, or may transfer such
vehicle or parts to another governmental body provided such disposal shall be
only as scrap.

(4) A registered disposer under contract to a city or county for
the impounding of vehicles shall comply with any administrative regulations
adopted by the city or county on the handling and disposing of vehicles.

---
END ---