BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.132.010 and 1982 c 113 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that the bottled and canned beverage industry has grown
significantly since 1972, when a policy on the return and reuse of beverage
containers was first considered in several states. Use of energy and materials
for the manufacture of individual containers made of metal and glass is higher
than for reused containers made of the same materials. Therefore, energy and
material use solely attributable to the growth of the industry has increased.
Several states have instituted successful long-term programs for the return and
reuse of beverage containers. For many reasons, including global warming,
energy and materials conservation, finite landfill space, and the continuing
need for litter control, the legislature believes that individual beverage
containers should be returned and reused whenever possible.

(2)
The legislature finds that beverage containers designed to be opened through
the use of detachable metal rings or tabs are hazardous to the health and
welfare of the citizens of this state and detrimental to certain wildlife. The
detachable parts are susceptible to ingestion by human beings and wildlife.
The legislature intends to eliminate the danger posed by these unnecessary
containers by prohibiting their retail sale in this state.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.132.020 and 1983 c 257 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Beverage" means beer or other malt beverage or mineral water, fruit
juice or juice drinks, soda water, or other drink in liquid form and
intended for human consumption. The term does not include milk-based,
soy-based, or similar products requiring heat and pressure in the canning
process.

(2)
"Beverage container" means a separate and sealed can or bottle
containing a beverage.

(3)
"Dealer" means every person in the state of Washington who engages
in the sale of beverages in beverage containers to a consumer, or means a
redemption center certified under section 7 of this act.

(4)
"Department" means the department of ecology created under chapter
43.21A RCW.

(5)
"Distributor" means every person who engages in the sale of beverages
in beverage containers to a dealer in the state of Washington including any
manufacturer who engages in such sales.

(6)
"Manufacturer" means every person bottling, canning, or otherwise
filling beverage containers for sale to distributors or dealers.

(7)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision or
instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.132 RCW to read as follows:

Every
beverage container sold or offered for sale in the state shall have a refund
value of not less than fifteen cents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 70.132 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in this section, a dealer shall accept from any person any
empty beverage containers of the kind, size, and brand sold by the dealer, and
shall pay to that person the refund value of the beverage container as
established by section 3 of this act.

(2)
Except as provided in this section, a distributor shall accept from a dealer
any empty beverage containers of the kind, size, and brand sold by the
distributor, and shall pay the dealer the refund value of the beverage
container as established by section 3 of this act.

(3)
A dealer may refuse to accept from any person, and a distributor may refuse to
accept from any dealer, any empty beverage container that does not state on it
a refund value as established by section 3 of this act.

(4)
A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of any beverage
container visibly containing or contaminated by a substance other than water,
residue of the original contents, or ordinary dust.

(5)
A dealer may refuse to accept and to pay the refund value of more than one
hundred forty-four individual beverage containers returned by any one person
during one day.

(6)
In order to refuse containers under subsection (4) or (5) of this section, the
dealer must post in each area where containers are received a clearly visible
and legible sign containing the following information:

"NOTICE:

Washington law allows a dealer to refuse to accept:

1.Beverage containers visibly containing or
contaminated by a substance other than water, residue of the original contents,
or ordinary dust; or

2.More than one hundred forty-four individual
beverage containers from any one person during one day."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 70.132 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
January 1, 2001, every beverage container sold or offered for sale in this
state by a dealer shall clearly indicate by embossing or by a stamp, or by a
label or other method securely affixed to the beverage container, the refund
value of the container.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 70.132 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To promote the use of reusable beverage containers of uniform design and to
facilitate the return of containers to manufacturers for reuse as a beverage
container, the department of licensing may certify beverage containers that
satisfy the requirements of this section.

(2)
A beverage container may be certified if:

(a)
It is reusable as a beverage container by more than one manufacturer in the
ordinary course of business; and

(b)
More than one manufacturer will in the ordinary course of business accept the
beverage container for reuse as a beverage container and pay the refund value
of the container.

(3)
The department may by rule establish appropriate liquid capacities and shapes
for beverage containers to be certified or decertified in accordance with the
purposes in subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
A beverage container shall not be certified under this section if by reason of
its shape or design, or by reason of words or symbols permanently inscribed
thereon, whether by engraving, embossing, painting, or other permanent method,
it is reusable as a beverage container in the ordinary course of business only
by a manufacturer of a beverage sold under a specific brand name.

(5)
Unless an application for certification under this section is denied by the
liquor control board within sixty days after the filing of the application, the
beverage container shall be deemed certified.

(6)
The department may review at any time certification of a beverage container.
If after such review, with written notice and hearing afforded to the person
who filed the application for certification under this section, the department
determines the container is no longer qualified for certification, it shall
withdraw certification.

(7)
Withdrawal of certification shall be effective not less than thirty days after
written notice to the person who filed the application for certification under
this section and to the manufacturers under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 70.132 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To facilitate the return of empty beverage containers and to serve dealers of
beverages, any person may establish a redemption center, subject to the
approval of the department of licensing, at which any person may return empty
beverage containers and receive payment of the refund value of such beverage
containers.

(2)
Application for approval of a redemption center shall be filed with the
department of licensing. The application shall state the name and address of
the person responsible for the establishment and operation of the redemption
center, the kind and brand names of the beverage containers that will be
accepted at the redemption center, and the names and addresses of the dealers
to be served by the redemption center. The application shall include such
additional information as the department may require.

(3)
The department of licensing shall approve a redemption center if it finds the
center will provide a convenient service for the return of empty beverage
containers. The order of the department approving a redemption center shall
identify the dealers to be served by the redemption center and the kind and
brand names of empty beverage containers that the redemption center must
accept. The order may contain any other provisions that ensure the redemption
center will provide a convenient service to the public as the department may
determine.

(4) The department of licensing may review approval of a redemption
center at any time. After written notice to the person responsible for the
establishment and operation of the redemption center and to the dealers served
by the redemption center, the department may, after hearing, withdraw approval
of a redemption center if the department finds there has not been compliance
with its order approving the redemption center, or if the redemption center no
longer provides a convenient service to the public.

---
END ---