BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that large woody debris was frequently removed from
streams decades ago because of concerns that it may cause flooding downstream.
The legislature finds that the placement of large woody debris into streams
serves an important purpose in salmon recovery because it can create riffle
pools for salmon to rest and feed, and can provide protection for salmon from
predators. Large woody debris in streams can also benefit other fish and
wildlife, and can enhance water quality. The legislature has encouraged
volunteers and project sponsors to place large woody debris into streams as
part of the state's salmon recovery strategy. The legislature also finds that
landowners are sometimes required to place large woody debris into streams as a
condition of a hydraulic permit approval, or because of rules adopted by the
forest practices board. Because landowners, project sponsors, and volunteers
who place large woody debris into streams serve an important state purpose, it
is the legislature's intent to provide immunity from liability that may occur
as a result of this activity.

(2) Any landowner, or any project sponsor or volunteer working on a
project from a habitat project list, who is involved in the design or placement
of large woody debris into a stream to enhance salmon or other fish recovery
shall not be held liable for any injury or damages resulting from ordinary
negligence associated with these actions, if the placement of the large woody
debris is in accordance with the terms of a hydraulic permit and is consistent
with generally accepted design guidelines. The immunity provided in this
section applies, but is not limited to, personal injury, property damage,
flooding, erosion, damage to public improvements, and other injuries or damages
of any kind or character resulting from the placement of the large woody
debris. For purposes of this section, the immunity from injuries or damages
caused by the placement of large woody debris into a stream does not extend to
the agency which issued the hydraulic permit.

---
END ---