BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
77.16.360 and 1997 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 77.12.240 and 77.12.265 or other
provisions of law, it is unlawful to take, hunt, or attract black bear with the
aid of bait.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear with the aid of bait by employees or agents of county, state, or federal
agencies while acting in their official capacities for the purpose of
protecting livestock, domestic animals, private property, or the public safety.

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the establishment and
operation of feeding stations for black bear in order to prevent damage to
commercial timberland.

(c)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of bait to attract black
bear for scientific purposes.

(d)
As used in this subsection, "bait" means a substance placed, exposed,
deposited, distributed, scattered, or otherwise used for the purpose of
attracting black bears to an area where one or more persons hunt or intend to
hunt them.

(2)
Notwithstanding RCW 77.12.240 or any other provisions of law, it is unlawful to
hunt or pursue black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or
dogs.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs by employees or
agents of county, state, or federal agencies while acting in their official
capacities for the purpose of protecting livestock, domestic animals, private
property, or the public safety. A dog or dogs may be used by the owner or
tenant of real property consistent with a permit issued and conditioned by the
director under RCW 77.12.265.

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of a dog or dogs for the
pursuit of black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx for scientific purposes.

(c)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of cougar
with the aid of a dog or dogs when a county legislative authority authorizes
the commission to establish a hunting season as allowed under section 2 of this
act.

(3)
A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties, the director
shall revoke the hunting license of a person who violates subsection (1) or (2)
of this section and a hunting license shall not be issued for a period of five
years following the revocation. Following a subsequent violation of subsection
(1) or (2) of this section by the same person, a hunting license shall not be
issued to the person at any time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of any county may by appropriate legislation
authorize the commission to establish a hunting season for cougar that allows
the killing of cougar with the aid of a dog or dogs within the borders of the
authorizing county.

(2)
If authorized by the legislative authority of a county under subsection (1) of
this section, the commission may establish a hunting season for cougar that
allows the killing of cougar with the aid of a dog or dogs. Hunting seasons
established by the commission as authorized by a county legislative authority
shall be organized by game management units. Seasons can be established for
one game management unit or multiple game management units. However, the
commission shall only establish a season for game management units that fall
wholly within the boundaries of the authorizing county.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---