BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.01.050 and 1997 c 401 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All actions against any county may be commenced in the superior court of such
county, or in the superior court of either of the two nearest ((counties))
judicial districts. All actions by any county shall be commenced in the
superior court of the county in which the defendant resides, or in either of
the two ((counties)) judicial districts nearest to the county
bringing the action.

(2) The determination of the nearest ((counties)) judicial
districts is measured by the travel time between county seats using major
surface routes, as determined by the office of the administrator for the
courts.

---
END ---