BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An outdoor amphitheater may not be sited on public land within an urban growth
area unless that urban growth area has been established under RCW 36.70A.110
for at least ten years.

(2)
A county making a siting decision subject to subsection (1) of this section
shall weigh input by locally affected residents more than any other factor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---