BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
27.12.190 and 1982 c 123 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
management and control of a library shall be vested in a board of either five
or seven trustees, as ((hereinafter)) provided in this
section ((provided. In cities and towns)), who are elected to those
positions and serve until their successors have been elected and qualified and
assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170.

A
board of trustees for a city or town library shall consist of five trustees
((shall be appointed by the mayor with the consent of the legislative body.
In counties, rural county library districts, and island library districts, five
trustees shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. In)) who
are elected to six-year staggered terms of office by the voters of the city or
town. A board of trustees for a county library, rural county library district,
island library district, or rural partial-county library district shall consist
of five trustees who are elected to six-year staggered terms of office by the
voters of the county or library district. A board of trustees for a
regional library ((district a board)) shall consist of either
five or seven trustees ((shall be appointed by the joint action of the
legislative bodies concerned. In intercounty rural library districts)) who
are elected to six-year staggered terms of office by the voters of the
governmental units that establish and maintain the regional library. A
board of trustees for an intercounty rural library district shall consist of
either five or seven trustees ((shall be appointed by the joint action of the
boards of county commissioners of each of the counties included in a)) who
are elected to six-year terms of office by the voters of the library
district. ((The first appointments for boards comprised of but five
trustees shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, and five years
respectively, and thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to serve for
five years. The first appointments for boards comprised of seven trustees
shall be for terms of one, two, three, four, five, six, and seven years respectively,
and thereafter a trustee shall be appointed annually to serve for seven years.
No person shall be appointed to any board of trustees for more than two
consecutive terms. Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms as soon as
possible in the manner in which members of the board are regularly chosen.))

A
library trustee shall not receive a salary or other compensation for services
as trustee, but necessary expenses actually incurred shall be paid from the
library funds.

((A
library trustee in the case of a city or town may be removed only by vote of
the legislative body. A trustee of a county library, a rural county library
district library, or an island library district library may be removed for just
cause by the county commissioners after a public hearing upon a written
complaint stating the ground for removal, which complaint, with a notice of the
time and place of hearing, shall have been served upon the trustee at least
fifteen days before the hearing. A trustee of an intercounty rural library
district may be removed by the joint action of the board of county
commissioners of the counties involved in the same manner as provided herein
for the removal of a trustee of a county library.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except for the initial trustees, library trustees shall be elected to six-year
staggered terms of office at general elections held in odd-numbered years.
Trustees shall serve until their successors are elected and qualified and
assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies shall occur and be
filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

(2)
Initial library trustees shall be elected at the same election at which the
proposition is submitted to the voters authorizing the formation of the library
district or at the first general election held after the library has been
created in the case of a county, city, or town library or a regional library.
The election of initial library district trustees is null and void if the
ballot proposition authorizing the formation of the library district is not
approved. A primary shall not be held to nominate candidates as part of the
process for initially electing library trustees. Each candidate shall run for
one of five or seven separate library trustee positions. A special filing
period shall be opened as provided in RCW 29.15.170 and 29.15.180. The person
receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be elected to
that position. The initial library trustees shall assume office immediately
when they are elected and qualified, but their terms of office shall be
calculated from the first day of January after their election.

(3)
Staggering of the terms of office for the initial library trustees on a
five-member board of trustees shall be accomplished as follows: (a) The two
persons who are elected receiving the two greatest numbers of votes shall be
elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered
year or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered
year; (b) the two persons who are elected receiving the next two greatest
numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election
is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of office if the election
is held in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other person who is elected shall
be elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an
odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an
even-numbered year.

(4)
Staggering of the terms of office for the initial library trustees on a
seven-member board of trustees shall be accomplished as follows: (a) The three
persons who are elected receiving the three greatest numbers of votes shall be
elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered
year or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered
year; (b) the two persons who are elected receiving the next two greatest numbers
of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held
in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of office if the election is held
in an even-numbered year; and (c) the other two persons who are elected shall
be elected to two-year terms of office if the election is held in an
odd-numbered year or one-year terms of office if the election is held in an
even-numbered year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
board of trustees of a library district may divide the library district into
trustee districts equal to the number of members on the board of trustees.
Each trustee district shall have approximately the same population and shall
follow the boundaries of precincts. Trustee districts shall be redrawn as
provided in chapter 29.70 RCW.

Library
trustee districts shall be used as follows: (1) Only a registered voter who
resides in a trustee district may be a candidate for, or serve as, a trustee of
the trustee district; and (2) only voters of a trustee district may vote at a
primary to nominate candidates for a trustee of the trustee district. Voters
of the entire library district may vote at a general election to elect a person
as a trustee of the trustee district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 27.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
first election of library trustees for libraries that are in existence as of
July 1, 2000, shall take place at the 2001 general election. Where needed, the
2001 primary shall be used to nominate candidates. The existing board of
library trustees of any library district may divide the library district into
trustee districts for use in the first and subsequent election of trustees.
Any library created after July 1, 2000, shall have its initial trustees elected
as provided in this act.

Sec.
5. RCW
27.12.010 and 1994 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As used
in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

(1)
"Governmental unit" means any county, city, town, rural county
library district, intercounty rural library district, rural partial-county
library district, or island library district;

(2)
"Legislative body" means the body authorized to determine the amount
of taxes to be levied in a governmental unit; in rural county library
districts, in intercounty rural library districts, and in island library
districts, the legislative body shall be the board of library trustees of the
district;

(3)
"Library" means a free public library supported in whole or in part
with money derived from taxation;

(4)
"Library district" means a rural county library district,
intercounty rural library district, rural partial-county library district, or
island library district;

(5)
"Regional library" means a free public library maintained by two or
more counties or other governmental units as provided in RCW 27.12.080;

(((5)))
(6) "Rural county library district" means a ((library
serving)) municipal corporation organized to provide library services to
all the unincorporated area of a county ((not included within the
area of incorporated cities and towns: PROVIDED, That)), but any
city or town with a population of one hundred thousand or less at the time of
annexation may ((be included therein)) annex into a rural county
library district as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;

(((6)))
(7) "Intercounty rural library district" means a municipal
corporation organized to provide library service for all unincorporated
areas ((outside of incorporated cities and towns)) within two or more
counties((: PROVIDED, That)), but any city or town with a
population of one hundred thousand or less at the time of annexation may ((be
included therein)) annex into an intercounty rural library district
as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;

(((7)))
(8) "Island library district" means a municipal corporation
organized to provide library service for all unincorporated areas ((outside
of incorporated cities and towns)) on a single island only, and not all of
the unincorporated area of the county, in counties composed entirely of
islands and having a population of less than twenty-five thousand at the time
the island library district was created((: PROVIDED, That)), but
any city or town with a population of one hundred thousand or less at the time
of annexation may ((be included therein)) annex into an island
library district as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390; and

(((8)))
(9) "Rural partial-county library district" means a municipal
corporation organized to provide library service for a portion of the
unincorporated area of a county((.)), but any city or town
located in the same county as a rural partial-county library district may annex
to the district if the city or town has a population of one hundred thousand or
less at the time of annexation.

Sec.
6. RCW
27.12.040 and 1990 c 259 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
procedure for the establishment of a rural county library district shall be as
follows:

(1)
Petitions signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters of the unincorporated
area of a county who voted in the last general election, ((outside of
the area of incorporated cities and towns,)) asking that the question,
"Shall a rural county library district be established?" be submitted
to a vote of the ((people)) registered voters residing in the
unincorporated area of the county, shall be filed with the county
legislative authority.

(2)
The county legislative authority, after having determined that the petitions
were signed by the requisite number of registered voters, shall place the
proposition for the establishment of a rural county library district on the
ballot for the vote of the ((people)) registered voters of the unincorporated
area of the county, ((outside incorporated cities and towns,)) at
the next succeeding general or special election.

(3)
If a majority of those voting on the proposition vote in favor of the
establishment of the rural county library district, the county legislative
authority shall forthwith declare it established.

The initial trustees shall be elected as provided in section 2
of this act.

Sec.
7. RCW
27.12.050 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((After
the board of county commissioners has declared a rural county library district
established, it shall appoint a board of library trustees and provide)) Funds
for the establishment and maintenance of library service for the district shall
be provided by making a tax levy on the property in the district of not
more than fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value per year
sufficient for the library service ((as shown to be required by the budget
submitted to the board of county commissioners by the board of library trustees)),
and by making a tax levy in such further amount as shall be authorized pursuant
to RCW 27.12.222 or 84.52.052 or 84.52.056. ((Such)) The board of
trustees shall determine the levy or levies and certify the levy or levies to the
county legislative authority. Levies shall be a part of the general tax
roll and shall be collected as a part of the general taxes against the property
in the district.

Sec.
8. RCW
27.12.130 and 1959 c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((Immediately
following the establishment of an intercounty rural library district the boards
of county commissioners of the counties affected shall jointly appoint a board
of five or seven trustees for the district in accordance with RCW 27.12.190.))
The initial board of trustees for an intercounty library district shall be
elected as provided in section 2 of this act. The board of trustees shall
appoint a librarian for the district.

Sec.
9. RCW
27.12.420 and 1982 c 123 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((Immediately
following the establishment of an island library district, the board of county
commissioners shall appoint a board of library trustees for the district in
accordance with RCW 27.12.190.)) The initial board of trustees for an
island library district shall be elected as provided in section 2 of this act.
The board of trustees shall appoint a librarian for the district.

Funds
for the establishment and maintenance of the library service of the district
shall be provided by ((the board of county commissioners by)) means of
an annual tax levy on the property in the district of not more than fifty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value per year. The tax levy shall be based
on a budget to be compiled by the board of trustees of the island library
district who shall determine the tax rate necessary and certify their
determination to the ((board of county commissioners)) county
legislative authority.

Excess
levies authorized pursuant to RCW 27.12.222, 84.52.052, or 84.52.056 shall be
at a rate determined by the board of trustees of the island library district
and certified to the ((board of county commissioners)) county
legislative authority.

Sec.
10. RCW
27.12.470 and 1999 c 153 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

A
rural partial-county library district may be created in a portion of the
unincorporated area of a county as provided in this section if a rural county
library district, intercounty rural library district, or island library
district has not been created in the county.

The
procedure to create a rural partial-county library district is initiated by the
filing of petitions with the county auditor proposing the creation of the
district that have been signed by at least ten percent of the registered voters
residing in the area proposed to be included in the rural partial-county
library district. The county auditor shall review the petitions and certify
the sufficiency or insufficiency of the signatures to the county legislative
authority.

If
the petitions are certified as having sufficient valid signatures, the county
legislative authority shall hold a public hearing on the proposed rural
partial-county library district, may adjust the boundaries of the proposed
district, and may cause a ballot proposition to be submitted to the voters of
the proposed rural partial-county library district authorizing its creation if
the county legislative authority finds that the creation of the rural partial-county
library district is in the public interest. A subsequent public hearing shall
be held if additional territory is added to the proposed rural partial-county
library district by action of the county legislative authority.

The
rural partial-county library district shall be created if the ballot
proposition authorizing the creation of the district is approved by a simple
majority vote of the voters voting on the proposition. ((Immediately after
creation of the rural partial-county library district the county legislative
authority shall appoint a board of library trustees for the district as
provided under RCW 27.12.190.)) The initial trustees shall be elected
as provided in section 2 of this act.

Except
as provided in this section, a rural partial-county library district is subject
to all the provisions of law applicable to a rural county library district and
shall have all the powers, duties, and authorities of a rural county library
district, including, but not limited to, the authority to impose property
taxes, incur debt, and annex a city or town with a population of less than one
hundred thousand at the time of the annexation that is located in the same
county as the rural partial-county library district.

Adjacent
unincorporated territory in the county may be annexed to a rural partial-county
library district in the same manner as territory is annexed to a water-sewer
district, except that an annexation is not subject to potential review by a
boundary review board.

If,
at the time of creation, a rural partial-county library district has an
assessed valuation of less than fifty million dollars, it may provide library
services only by contracting for the services through an interlocal agreement
with an adjacent library district, or an adjacent city or town that maintains
its own library. If the assessed valuation of the rural partial-county library
district subsequently reaches fifty million dollars as a result of annexation
or appreciation, the fifty million dollar limitation shall not apply.

If
a ballot proposition is approved creating a rural county library district in
the county, every rural partial-county library district in that county shall be
dissolved and its assets and liabilities transferred to the rural county
library district. Where a rural partial-county library district has annexed a
city or town, the voters of the city or town shall be allowed to vote on the
proposed creation of a rural county library district and, if created, the rural
county library district shall include each city and town that was annexed to
the rural partial-county library district.

Nothing in this section authorizes the consolidation of a rural
partial-county library district with any rural county library district; island
library district; city, county, or regional library; intercounty library
district; or other rural partial-county library district, unless, in addition
to any other requirements imposed by statute, the boards of all library
districts involved approve the consolidation.

---
END ---