BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to improve student safety by providing parents
and guardians with information concerning pesticides that pose risks to
children. The metabolism, physiology, and diet of children puts them at higher
risk than adults to pesticide exposure. Children spend much of their time in
schools and day care centers, and parents and guardians have a right to be
informed about potential health threats to their children.

Sec.
2. RCW
17.21.410 and 1994 c 283 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A certified applicator making a landscape application to:

(a)
Residential property shall at the time of the application place a marker at the
usual point of entry to the property. If the application is made to an
isolated spot that is not a substantial portion of the property, the applicator
shall only be required to place a marker at the application site. If the
application is in a fenced or otherwise isolated backyard, no marker is
required.

(b)
Commercial properties such as apartments or shopping centers shall at the time
of application place a marker in a conspicuous location at or near each site
being treated.

(c)
A golf course shall at the time of the application place a marker at the first
tee and tenth tee or post the information in a conspicuous location such as on
a central message board.

(d)
A school((,)) or nursery school, ((or licensed day care)) other
than a school as defined in section 3 of this act, shall at the time of the
application place a marker at each primary point of entry to the school
grounds.

(e)
A park, cemetery, rest stop, or similar property as may be defined in rule
shall at the time of the application place a marker at each primary point of
entry.

(2)
An individual making such a landscape application to a school grounds,
nursery school, or licensed day care, and not otherwise covered by subsection
(1) of this section or section 3 of this act, shall be required to
comply with the posting requirements in subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(3)
The marker shall be a minimum of four inches by five inches. It shall have the
words: "THIS LANDSCAPE HAS BEEN TREATED BY" as the headline and
"FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL" as the footer. Larger size
requirements for markers may be established in rule for specific applications.
The company name and service mark with the applicator's telephone number where
information can be obtained shall be included between the headline and the
footer on the marker. The letters and service marks shall be printed in colors
contrasting to the background.

(4)
The property owner or tenant shall remove the marker according to the schedule
established in rule. A commercial applicator is not liable for the removal of
markers by unauthorized persons or removal outside the designated removal time.

(5)
A certified applicator who complies with this section cannot be held liable for
personal property damage or bodily injury resulting from markers that are
placed as required.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 17.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If a school intends to make a school facility application in the form of a
spray or granular application of a pesticide during the school year, the school
shall annually notify students, parents or guardians of students, and employees
about the school's pest control policies and methods and identify where they
may gain access to a list of the pesticides that may be used by the school and
material safety data sheets for those pesticides. If the school maintains a
registry of the students, parents or guardians of students, and employees who
wish to receive such a notice, providing such an annual notification to the
persons on the registry satisfies the requirements of this subsection.

(2)
A school shall provide posted and written notice to students, parents or
guardians of students, and employees at least forty-eight hours before a school
facility application.

(3)
At least forty-eight hours before a pesticide is applied to a school facility,
the school shall post notification signs at the treatment site, in a central
area at the school, and at points of entry. For pesticides meeting the EPA's
criteria of toxicity category I or toxicity category II, the signs shall remain
in place for at least five calendar days following pesticide application to a
school facility. For other pesticides, the signs shall remain in place
following pesticide application to a school facility for at least forty-eight
hours or until the next regularly scheduled school day, whichever is longer.
Notification signs shall be at least eight and one‑half by eleven
inches. Each sign shall have the words: "THIS AREA WILL BE OR HAS BEEN
TREATED" as the headline and "FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL"
as the footer. The letters shall be printed in colors contrasting to the
background.

(4)
An individual making a school facility application shall display the name and
telephone number of the applicator on any application apparatus, and shall
carry a material safety data sheet for each pesticide being applied.

(5)
All notices and notification signs required under this section shall include
the signal word from the pesticide label alongside the words
"Pesticide/Herbicide Application"; for example, "WARNING:
PESTICIDE/HERBICIDE APPLICATION." Notices shall include:

(a)
The name of the pesticide;

(b)
The proposed date and time of application;

(c)
The area and rate of application; and

(d)
The name and phone number of a contact person.

The
active ingredient for any pesticide named in (a) of this subsection shall be
included in the information the contact person shall be prepared to provide
upon being contacted.

(6)
A school facility application does not include:

(a)
The application of antimicrobial pesticides as defined by 7 U.S.C. Sec.
136(mm);

(b)
The placement of rodent or insect bait stations that are not accessible to
children; or

(c)
A pesticide application conducted for emergency purposes, such as, but not
limited to, an application to control venomous spiders or stinging insects.

(7)
If the school facility application is made during an extended break when
children are not present, and when the treatment ends no less than ninety-six
hours before the end of the break, the school shall send written notice before
to the beginning of the break. Any school application to a landscape, athletic
field, or outdoor structure during the break is subject to posted notice
requirements of this subsection.

(8)
Neither the school nor the applicator is liable for the removal of signs by
unauthorized persons or removal outside the designated removal time. A school
or an applicator who complies with this section may not be held liable for
personal property damage or bodily injury resulting from signs that are placed
as required.

(9)
As used in this section:

(a)
"School" means a licensed day care, preschool, kindergarten, or
elementary or secondary school. "School" does not include a private
school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW or any postsecondary educational
facility attended by secondary school students.

(b)
"School facility" means any facility used for school purposes that is
visited or used by children attending the school and includes the buildings or
structures, playgrounds, landscape areas, athletic fields, school vehicles, or
any other area of school property visited or used by children attending the
school.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Schools
as defined in section 3 of this act shall provide notice of pesticide
applications to students, parents or guardians of students, and employees
pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

Day care centers shall provide notice of pesticide applications to
children, parents or guardians of children, and employees pursuant to chapter
17.21 RCW.

---
END ---