BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.29.006 and 1998 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive and
judicial branches of state government, including state agencies, departments,
offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and educational, correctional, and
other types of institutions.

(2)
"Client services" means services provided directly to agency clients
including, but not limited to, medical and dental services, employment and
training programs, residential care, and subsidized housing.

(3)
"Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified parties and culminating in
a selection based on criteria which may include such factors as the
consultant's fees or costs, ability, capacity, experience, reputation,
responsiveness to time limitations, responsiveness to solicitation
requirements, quality of previous performance, and compliance with statutes and
rules relating to contracts or services.

(4)
"Consultant" means an independent individual or firm contracting with
an agency to perform a service or render an opinion or recommendation according
to the consultant's methods and without being subject to the control of the
agency except as to the result of the work. The agency monitors progress under
the contract and authorizes payment.

(5)
"Emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the
control of the agency that either:

(a)
Present a real, immediate threat to the proper performance of essential
functions; or

(b)
May result in material loss or damage to property, bodily injury, or loss of
life if immediate action is not taken.

(6)
"Evidence of competition" means documentation demonstrating that the
agency has solicited responses from multiple firms in selecting a consultant.

(7)
"Personal service" means professional or technical expertise provided
by a consultant to accomplish a specific study, project, task, or other work
statement. This term does not include purchased services as defined under
subsection (9) of this section. This term does not include client
services.

(8)
"Personal service contract" means an agreement, or any amendment
thereto, with a consultant for the rendering of personal services to the state
which is consistent with RCW 41.06.380.

(9)
"Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing and necessary functions. This term includes,
but is not limited to, services acquired under RCW 43.19.190 or 43.105.041 for
equipment maintenance and repair; operation of a physical plant; security;
computer hardware and software maintenance; data entry; key punch services; and
computer time-sharing, contract programming, and analysis.

(10)
"Sole source" means a consultant providing professional or technical
expertise of such a unique nature that the consultant is clearly and
justifiably the only practicable source to provide the service. The
justification shall be based on either the uniqueness of the service or sole
availability at the location required.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.29.040 and 1998 c 101 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to:

(1)
Contracts specifying a fee of less than five thousand dollars if the total of
the contracts from that agency with the contractor within a fiscal year does
not exceed five thousand dollars;

(2)
Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service where the tariff is
established by the utilities and transportation commission or other public
entity;

(3)
Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any governmental entity, whether
federal, state, or local and any department, division, or subdivision thereof;

(4)
Contracts awarded for services to be performed for a standard fee, when the
standard fee is established by the contracting agency or any other governmental
entity and a like contract is available to all qualified applicants;

(5)
Contracts for services that are necessary to the conduct of collaborative
research if prior approval is granted by the funding source;

(6)
((Contracts for client services;

(7)))
Contracts for architectural and engineering services as defined in RCW
39.80.020, which shall be entered into under chapter 39.80 RCW;

(((8)))
(7) Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for the purposes of
litigation; and

(((9)))
(8) Contracts for bank supervision authorized under RCW 30.38.040.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All personal service and client service contracts entered into by an agency
shall require the contractor to report the salaries, annual bonuses, travel
allowances, commissions, or other forms of remuneration paid for personal services
to the following employees:

(a)
The contractor's officers, as defined in chapter 24.03 RCW;

(b)
The contractor's executive director;

(c)
The employee who executed the contract; and

(d)
The appropriate program director, or the employee responsible for insuring
compliance with the contract's terms.

(2)
The contractor shall make a disclosure report to the agency executing the
contract no later than one year after the effective date of the contract, but
prior to termination of the contract.

(3) The office of financial management shall establish a uniform
reporting format for use by contractors fulfilling the reporting requirement
under this section.

---
END ---