BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.50.050 and 1999 c 198 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section governs records relating to the commission of juvenile offenses,
including records relating to diversions.

(2)
The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile offender
shall be open to public inspection, unless sealed pursuant to subsection (12)
of this section.

(3)
All records other than the official juvenile court file are confidential and
may be released only as provided in this section, RCW 13.50.010, 13.40.215, and
4.24.550.

(4)
Except as otherwise provided in this section and RCW 13.50.010, records
retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be released to
other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when an
investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by
the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the
responsibility for supervising the juvenile.

(5)
Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, information not in an official juvenile
court file concerning a juvenile or a juvenile's family may be released to the
public only when that information could not reasonably be expected to identify
the juvenile or the juvenile's family.

(6)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the release, to the juvenile
or his or her attorney, of law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys' records
pertaining to investigation, diversion, and prosecution of juvenile offenses
shall be governed by the rules of discovery and other rules of law applicable
in adult criminal investigations and prosecutions.

(7)
Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, law enforcement and prosecuting
attorneys may cooperate with schools in releasing information to a school
pertaining to the investigation, diversion, and prosecution of a juvenile
attending the school. Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, incident
reports may be released unless releasing the records would jeopardize the
investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses. If release of incident
reports would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution or endanger
witnesses, law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may release information to
the maximum extent possible to assist schools in protecting other students,
staff, and school property.

(8)
The juvenile court and the prosecutor may set up and maintain a central
record-keeping system which may receive information on all alleged juvenile
offenders against whom a complaint has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070
whether or not their cases are currently pending before the court. The central
record-keeping system may be computerized. If a complaint has been referred to
a diversion unit, the diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile
court or the prosecuting attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion. An
offense shall not be reported as criminal history in any central record-keeping
system without notification by the diversion unit of the date on which the
offender agreed to diversion.

(9)
Upon request of the victim of a crime or the victim's immediate family, the
identity of an alleged or proven juvenile offender alleged or found to have
committed a crime against the victim and the identity of the alleged or proven
juvenile offender's parent, guardian, or custodian and the circumstance of the
alleged or proven crime shall be released to the victim of the crime or the
victim's immediate family.

(10)
Subject to the rules of discovery applicable in adult criminal prosecutions,
the juvenile offense records of an adult criminal defendant or witness in an adult
criminal proceeding shall be released upon request to prosecution and defense
counsel after a charge has actually been filed. The juvenile offense records
of any adult convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of the adult
corrections system shall be released upon request to the adult corrections
system.

(11)
In any case in which an information has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or
a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and referred for diversion
pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person the subject of the information or
complaint may file a motion with the court to have the court vacate its order
and findings, if any, and, subject to subsection (((23))) (24) of
this section, order the sealing of the official juvenile court file, the social
file, and records of the court and of any other agency in the case.

(12)
The court shall grant the motion to seal records made pursuant to subsection
(11) of this section if it finds that:

(a)
For class B offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release
from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry
of disposition, the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction.
For class C offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release
from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry
of disposition, the person has spent five consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction;

(b)
No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a
juvenile offense or a criminal offense;

(c)
No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with
that person;

(d)
The person has not been convicted of a class A or sex offense; and

(e)
Full restitution has been paid.

(13)
The person making a motion pursuant to subsection (11) of this section shall
give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecution and to any person or
agency whose files are sought to be sealed.

(14)
If the court grants the motion to seal made pursuant to subsection (11) of this
section, it shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order sealed the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and other records relating to
the case as are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the case
shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the records may
reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records of which are
sealed. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning confidential or
sealed records that records are confidential, and no information can be given
about the existence or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.

(15)
Inspection of the files and records included in the order to seal may
thereafter be permitted only by order of the court upon motion made by the
person who is the subject of the information or complaint, except as otherwise
provided in RCW 13.50.010(8) and subsection (((23))) (24) of this
section.

(16)
Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent to sealing has the
effect of nullifying the sealing order. Any charging of an adult felony
subsequent to the sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order for
the purposes of chapter 9.94A RCW.

(17)
In any case in which a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and
referred for diversion pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person who is the subject
of the complaint may file a motion with the court to have the court vacate its
order and findings, if any, and subject to subsection (24) of this section, order
the destruction of the official juvenile court file, the social file, and
records of the court and of any other agency in the case. The court may grant
the motion to destroy records made pursuant to this subsection if it finds:

(a)
The person making the motion is at least twenty-three years of age;

(b)
The person has not subsequently been convicted of a felony;

(c)
No proceeding is pending against that person seeking the conviction of a
criminal offense; and

(d)
The person has never been found guilty of a serious offense.

(18)
A person eighteen years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only
one referral for diversion may request that the court order the records in that
case destroyed. The request shall be granted, subject to subsection (((23)))
(24) of this section, if the court finds that two years have elapsed
since completion of the diversion agreement.

(((18)))
(19) If the court grants the motion to destroy records made pursuant to
subsection (((17))) (18) of this section, it shall, subject to
subsection (((23))) (24) of this section, order the official
juvenile court file, the social file, and any other records named in the order
to be destroyed.

(((19)))
(20) The person making the motion pursuant to subsection (17) or (18)
of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecuting
attorney and to any agency whose records are sought to be destroyed.

(((20)))
(21) Any juvenile to whom the provisions of this section may apply shall
be given written notice of his or her rights under this section at the time of
his or her disposition hearing or during the diversion process.

(((21)))
(22) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a crime victim
or a member of the victim's family from divulging the identity of the alleged
or proven juvenile offender or his or her family when necessary in a civil
proceeding.

(((22)))
(23) Any juvenile justice or care agency may, subject to the limitations
in subsection (((23))) (24) of this section and (a) and (b) of
this subsection, develop procedures for the routine destruction of records
relating to juvenile offenses and diversions.

(a)
Records may be routinely destroyed only when the person the subject of the
information or complaint has attained twenty-three years of age or older, or is
eighteen years of age or older and his or her criminal history consists
entirely of one diversion agreement and two years have passed since completion
of the agreement.

(b)
The court may not routinely destroy the official juvenile court file or
recordings or transcripts of any proceedings.

(((23)))
(24) No identifying information held by the Washington state patrol in
accordance with chapter 43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or sealing under
this section. For the purposes of this subsection, identifying information
includes photographs, fingerprints, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints and any
other data that identifies a person by physical characteristics, name,
birthdate or address, but does not include information regarding criminal
activity, arrest, charging, diversion, conviction or other information about a
person's treatment by the criminal justice system or about the person's behavior.

(((24)))
(25) Information identifying child victims under age eighteen who are
victims of sexual assaults by juvenile offenders is confidential and not
subject to release to the press or public without the permission of the child
victim or the child's legal guardian. Identifying information includes the
child victim's name, addresses, location, photographs, and in cases in which
the child victim is a relative of the alleged perpetrator, identification of
the relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Information
identifying a child victim of sexual assault may be released to law
enforcement, prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental
agencies that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault.

Sec.
2. RCW
40.14.020 and 1995 c 326 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All
public records shall be and remain the property of the state of Washington.
They shall be delivered by outgoing officials and employees to their successors
and shall be preserved, stored, transferred, destroyed, or disposed of,
and otherwise managed, only in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
In order to insure the proper management and safeguarding of public records,
the division of archives and records management is established in the office of
the secretary of state. The state archivist, who shall administer the division
and have reasonable access to all public records, wherever kept, for purposes
of information, surveying, or cataloguing, shall undertake the following
functions, duties, and responsibilities:

(1)
To manage the archives of the state of Washington;

(2)
To centralize the archives of the state of Washington, to make them available
for reference and scholarship, and to insure their proper preservation;

(3)
To inspect, inventory, catalog, and arrange retention and transfer schedules on
all record files of all state departments and other agencies of state
government;

(4)
To insure the maintenance and security of all state public records and to
establish safeguards against unauthorized removal or destruction;

(5)
To establish and operate such state record centers as may from time to time be
authorized by appropriation, for the purpose of preserving, servicing,
screening, and protecting all state public records which must be
preserved temporarily or permanently, but which need not be retained in office
space and equipment;

(6)
To adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW:

(a)
Setting standards for the durability and permanence of public records
maintained by state and local agencies;

(b)
Governing procedures for the creation, maintenance, transmission, cataloging,
indexing, storage, or reproduction of photographic, optical, electronic, or
other images of public documents or records in a manner consistent with current
standards, policies, and procedures of the department of information services
for the acquisition of information technology;

(c)
Governing the accuracy and durability of, and facilitating access to,
photographic, optical, electronic, or other images used as public records; or

(d)
To carry out any other provision of this chapter;

(7)
To gather and disseminate to interested agencies information on all phases of records
management and current practices, methods, procedures, techniques, and devices
for efficient and economical management and preservation of records;

(8)
To operate a central microfilming bureau which will microfilm, at cost, records
approved for filming by the head of the office of origin and the archivist; to
approve microfilming projects undertaken by state departments and all other
agencies of state government; and to maintain proper standards for this work.
For the purpose of storage of records relating to juvenile offenses, the
archivist's rules may provide for use of alternative methods of electronic
imaging by the bureau and affected agencies;

(9)
To maintain necessary facilities for the review of records approved for
destruction and for their economical disposition by sale or burning; directly
to supervise such destruction of public records as shall be authorized by the
terms of this chapter; (([and])) and

(10)
To assist and train state and local agencies in the proper methods of creating,
maintaining, cataloging, indexing, transmitting, storing, and reproducing
photographic, optical, electronic, or other images used as public records.

Sec.
3. RCW
40.14.070 and 1999 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
County, municipal, and other local government agencies may request authority to
destroy noncurrent public records having no further administrative or legal
value by submitting to the division of archives and records management lists of
such records on forms prepared by the division. The archivist, a
representative appointed by the state auditor, and a representative appointed
by the attorney general shall constitute a committee, known as the local
records committee, which shall review such lists and which may veto the
destruction of any or all items contained therein.

(b)
A local government agency, as an alternative to submitting lists, may elect to
establish a records control program based on recurring disposition schedules
recommended by the agency to the local records committee. The schedules are to
be submitted on forms provided by the division of archives and records
management to the local records committee, which may either veto, approve, or
amend the schedule. Approval of such schedule or amended schedule shall be by
unanimous vote of the local records committee. Upon such approval, the
schedule shall constitute authority for the local government agency to destroy
the records listed thereon, after the required retention period, on a recurring
basis until the schedule is either amended or revised by the committee.

(2)(a)
Except as otherwise provided by law, no public records shall be destroyed until
approved for destruction by the local records committee. Official public
records shall not be destroyed unless:

(i)
The records are six or more years old;

(ii)
The department of origin of the records has made a satisfactory showing to the
state records committee that the retention of the records for a minimum of six
years is both unnecessary and uneconomical, particularly where lesser federal
retention periods for records generated by the state under federal programs
have been established; or

(iii)
The originals of official public records less than six years old have been
copied or reproduced by any photographic, photostatic, microfilm, miniature
photographic, or other process approved by the state archivist which accurately
reproduces or forms a durable medium for so reproducing the original. For
the purpose of storage of records relating to juvenile offenses, the
archivist's rules may provide for use of alternative methods of electronic
imaging.

An
automatic reduction of retention periods from seven to six years for official
public records on record retention schedules existing on June 10, 1982, shall
not be made, but the same shall be reviewed individually by the local records
committee for approval or disapproval of the change to a retention period of
six years.

The
state archivist may furnish appropriate information, suggestions, and guidelines
to local government agencies for their assistance in the preparation of lists
and schedules or any other matter relating to the retention, preservation, or
destruction of records under this chapter. The local records committee may
adopt appropriate regulations establishing procedures to be followed in such
matters.

Records
of county, municipal, or other local government agencies, designated by the
archivist as of primarily historical interest, may be transferred to a
recognized depository agency.

(b)
Records of investigative reports prepared by any state, county, municipal, or
other law enforcement agency pertaining to sex offenders contained in chapter
9A.44 RCW or sexually violent offenses as defined in RCW 71.09.020 that are not
required in the current operation of the law enforcement agency or for pending
judicial proceedings shall, following the expiration of the applicable schedule
of the law enforcement agency's retention of the records, be transferred to the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs for permanent electronic
retention and retrieval. Upon electronic retention of any document, the
association shall be permitted to destroy the paper copy of the document.

(c) Any record transferred to the Washington association of sheriffs
and police chiefs pursuant to (b) of this subsection shall be deemed to no
longer constitute a public record pursuant to RCW 42.17.020 and shall be exempt
from public disclosure. Such records shall be disseminated only to criminal
justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030 for the purpose of determining if
a sex offender met the criteria of a sexually violent predator as defined in
chapter 71.09 RCW.

---
END ---