BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the DNA identification system is becoming increasingly
useful in the accurate investigation and prosecution of criminal offenses. The
legislature further finds that the use of DNA identification deters recidivist
acts, significantly aids in the exculpation of innocent persons, and allows for
the accurate identification of prisoners for institutional purposes. Thus the
legislature has determined that it is in the public interest to expand the DNA
identification system to include all convicted felons.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.43.754 and 1999 c 329 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every adult or juvenile ((individual)) convicted of a felony ((or
adjudicated guilty of an equivalent juvenile offense defined as a sex offense
under RCW 9.94A.030(33)(a) or a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030))
shall have a blood sample drawn for purposes of DNA identification analysis.

(a)
For such persons ((convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty
of an equivalent juvenile offense)) who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a county jail or detention facility, the county shall be
responsible for obtaining the blood sample((s)) either as part of
the intake process into ((the county jail or detention)) such
facility ((for those persons convicted on or after July 25, 1999,)) or
((within a reasonable time after July 25, 1999,)) for those persons
incarcerated prior to ((July 25, 1999,)) the effective date of this
act who have not yet had a blood sample drawn, within a reasonable time
after the effective date of this act, beginning with those persons who will
be released the soonest.

(b)
For such persons ((convicted of such offenses or adjudicated guilty
of an equivalent juvenile offense,)) who are serving or who are to serve a
term of confinement in a department of corrections facility or a ((division
of)) juvenile rehabilitation administration facility, the facility
holding the person shall be responsible for obtaining blood samples either as
part of the intake process into such facility ((for those persons convicted
on or after July 25, 1999, or within a reasonable time after July 25, 1999))
or, for those persons incarcerated prior to ((July 25, 1999,)) the
effective date of this act who have not yet had a blood sample drawn, within
a reasonable time after the effective date of this act, beginning with
those persons who will be released the soonest.

(c)
For such persons who are not sentenced to a term of confinement, or who do not
serve any portion of their term of confinement after sentencing, the blood
sample shall be drawn prior to release by the court.

(2)
Any blood sample taken pursuant to RCW 43.43.752 through 43.43.758 shall be
used solely for the purpose of providing DNA or other blood grouping tests for
identification analysis and prosecution of ((a sex offense or a violent))
felony offenses.

((This
section applies to all adults who are convicted after July 1, 1990; and to all
adults who were convicted on or prior to July 1, 1990, and who are still
incarcerated on or after July 25, 1999. This section applies to all juveniles
who are adjudicated guilty after July 1, 1994; and to all juveniles who were
adjudicated guilty on or prior to July 1, 1994, and who are still incarcerated
on or after July 25, 1999.))

(3)
This section applies to all adults and juveniles who are:

(a)
Convicted of any felony on or after the effective date of this act;

(b)
Convicted of any felony before the effective date of this act, if such persons
are still incarcerated on the effective date of this act;

(c)
Convicted after July 1, 1990, of any sex offense or violent offense, as those
terms are defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(d)
Convicted on or before July 1, 1990, of any sex offense or violent offense, as
those terms are defined in RCW 9.94A.030, if such persons were still
incarcerated on July 25, 1999.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "convicted"
means adjudicated guilty under Title 10 or 13 RCW and includes a verdict of
guilty, a finding of guilty, and an acceptance of a plea of guilty.

---
END ---