BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.63.080 and 1981 c 19 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Procedures for the conduct of all hearings provided for in this chapter may be
established by rule of the supreme court.

(2)
Any person subject to proceedings under this chapter may be represented by
counsel or, if the subject person is not fluent in the English language, the
person may be represented by an immediate family member.

(3) The attorney representing the state, county, city, or town may
appear in any proceedings under this chapter but need not appear,
notwithstanding any statute or rule of court to the contrary.

---
END ---