BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.14 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of RCW 90.14.140 through 90.14.180, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, "voluntarily fails" means the nonuse of all or a
portion of the water by the owner of the water right, where the nonuse occurs
as a result of factors within the control of the water user. A failure to use
all or a portion of the full water right is involuntary when the nonuse of such
right is in response to factors beyond the control of the water user, such as
cyclical weather patterns or the presence of water from a source not within the
control of the water user as long as the diversion and delivery facilities are
maintained in good operating condition consistent with the full amount of the
water right.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act is remedial in nature and applies retroactively to
October 12, 1977.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---