BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
There is created the task force on water storage. The purpose of the task
force is to examine the role of increased water storage in providing water
supplies to meet the needs of fish, population growth, and economic
development, and to enhance the protection of people's lives and their property
and the protection of aquatic habitat through flood control facilities. For
this purpose, increased storage may be in the form of surface storage including
off-stream storage, underground storage, or the enlargement or enhancement of
existing structures. The task force shall also examine means of providing
funding for increased water storage.

(2)
The task force shall be composed of the following:

(a)
A representative of the department of agriculture, appointed by the director of
the department;

(b)
A representative of the department of community, trade, and economic
development, appointed by the director of the department;

(c)
A representative of the department of ecology, appointed by the director of the
department;

(d)
A representative of the department of fish and wildlife, appointed by the
director of the department;

(e)
A representative of the department of health, appointed by the secretary of the
department;

(f)
A representative of the governor's salmon recovery office, appointed by the
governor;

(g)
A representative of conservation districts, appointed by the Washington
association of conservation districts;

(h)
Two representatives of irrigation districts, one representing a district within
a federal reclamation project and one representing a district that is outside
of such a project, appointed by a state association of irrigation districts
authorized by RCW 87.76.020;

(i)
Two representatives of cities, one representing a city located west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains and one representing a city located east of the
crest of the Cascade mountains, appointed by the association of Washington
cities. Of these two representatives, one shall represent a city with a
relatively large population and one shall represent a city with a relatively
small population;

(j)
Two representatives of counties, one representing a county located west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains and one representing a county located east of
the crest of the Cascade mountains, appointed by the Washington state
association of counties. Of these two representatives, one shall represent a
county with a relatively large population and one shall represent a county with
a relatively small population;

(k)
Two representatives of tribes, one representing a reservation located west of
the crest of the Cascade mountains and one representing a reservation located
east of the crest of the Cascade mountains, appointed by the association of
Washington tribes. Of these two representatives, one shall represent a
reservation with a relatively large land area and one shall represent a
reservation with a relatively small land area;

(l)
A representative of a municipal water purveyor that provides residential water
to a relatively large population, but that is not a division or other part of
city government, appointed by the secretary of health from a list or lists of
nominees submitted by state-wide associations of such purveyors;

(m)
Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of the major
caucuses in the house of representatives, appointed by the co-speakers of the
house of representatives; and

(n)
Four members of the senate, two from each of the major caucuses in the senate,
appointed by the president of the senate.

(3)
The department of ecology shall provide staff support for the task force and
the director of the department of ecology shall convene the first meeting of
the task force not less than thirty days after the effective date of this
section.

(4)
No member of the task force shall receive compensation, per diem, or
reimbursement of expenses from the task force or the department of ecology for
his or her activities as a member of the task force. However, each may receive
such compensation, per diem, and/or reimbursement as is authorized by the
entity he or she is employed by, is appointed from, or represents on the task
force.

(5)
Following its examination, the task force shall report its recommendations to
the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund
to the department of ecology for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---