BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The office of financial management shall adopt uniform guidelines for the
effective and efficient management of personal service contracts and client
service contracts by all state agencies. The guidelines must, at a minimum,
include:

(a)
Accounting methods, systems, measures, and principles to be used by agencies
and contractors;

(b)
Precontract procedures for selecting potential contractors based on their
qualifications and ability to perform;

(c)
Incorporation of performance measures and measurable benchmarks in contracts,
and the use of performance audits;

(d)
Uniform contract terms to ensure contract performance and compliance with state
and federal standards;

(e)
Proper payment and reimbursement methods to ensure that the state receives full
value for taxpayer moneys, including cost settlements and cost allowance;

(f)
Post-contract procedures, including methods for recovering improperly spent or
overspent moneys for disallowance and adjustment;

(g)
Adequate contract remedies and sanctions to ensure compliance;

(h)
Monitoring, fund tracking, risk assessment, and auditing procedures and
requirements;

(i)
Financial reporting, record retention, and record access procedures and requirements;

(j)
Procedures and criteria for terminating contracts for cause or otherwise; and

(k)
Any other subject related to effective and efficient contract management.

(2)
The office of financial management shall submit the guidelines required by subsection
(1) of this section to the governor and the appropriate standing committees of
the legislature no later than December 1, 2000.

(3)
The office of financial management shall publish a guide book for use by state
agencies containing the guidelines required by subsection (1) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A state agency entering into or renewing personal service contracts or client
service contracts shall follow the guidelines required by section 1 of this
act.

(2)
A state agency that has entered into or renewed personal service contracts or
client service contracts during a calendar year shall, on or before January 1
of the following calendar year, provide the office of financial management with
a report detailing the procedures the agency employed in entering into,
renewing, and managing the contracts.

(3)
The provisions of this section apply to state agencies entering into or
renewing contracts after January 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The office of financial management shall provide a training course for agency
personnel responsible for executing and managing personal service contracts and
client service contracts. The course must contain training on effective and
efficient contract management under the guidelines established under section 1
of this act. State agencies shall require agency employees responsible for
executing or managing personal service contracts and client service contracts
to complete the training course to the satisfaction of the office of financial
management. Beginning January 1, 2002, no agency employee may execute or
manage personal service contracts or client service contracts unless the
employee has completed the training course. Any request for exception to this
requirement shall be submitted to the office of financial management in writing
and shall be approved by the office of financial management prior to the
employee executing or managing the contract.

(2)(a)
The office of financial management shall conduct risk-based audits of the
contracting practices of personal service contracts and client service
contracts from multiple state agencies entered into or renewed by state
agencies to ensure compliance with the guidelines established in section 1 of
this act. The office shall conduct the audits according to the following
schedule:

(i)
In fiscal 2001, a minimum of eighteen risk-based audits, involving at least six
in each of at least three agencies, shall be conducted on the contracting
practices of personal service contracts and client service contracts; and

(ii)
In fiscal 2002 and each fiscal year thereafter, a statistically appropriate
number of risk-based audits shall be conducted annually on the contracting
practices of personal service contracts and client service contracts of
multiple state agencies.

(b)
The office of financial management shall forward the results of the audits
conducted under this section to the governor, the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature, and the joint legislative audit and review
committee.

(c)
This section does not preclude the office of financial management from
conducting additional risk-based audits of the contracting practices of
agencies to ensure compliance with the guidelines established in section 1 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

The
state auditor and the attorney general shall annually by November 30th of each
year provide a collaborative report of contract audit and investigative
findings, enforcement actions, and the status of agency resolution to the
governor and the policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

Sec.
5. RCW
39.29.040 and 1998 c 101 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to:

(1)
Contracts specifying a fee of less than five thousand dollars if the total of
the contracts from that agency with the contractor within a fiscal year does
not exceed five thousand dollars;

(2)
Contracts awarded to companies that furnish a service where the tariff is
established by the utilities and transportation commission or other public
entity;

(3)
Intergovernmental agreements awarded to any governmental entity, whether
federal, state, or local and any department, division, or subdivision thereof;

(4)
Contracts awarded for services to be performed for a standard fee, when the
standard fee is established by the contracting agency or any other governmental
entity and a like contract is available to all qualified applicants;

(5)
Contracts for services that are necessary to the conduct of collaborative
research if prior approval is granted by the funding source;

(6)
Contracts for client services except as otherwise indicated in this chapter;

(7)
Contracts for architectural and engineering services as defined in RCW
39.80.020, which shall be entered into under chapter 39.80 RCW;

(8)
Contracts for the employment of expert witnesses for the purposes of
litigation; and

(9)
Contracts for bank supervision authorized under RCW 30.38.040.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect January 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
duties and powers of the office of financial management relating to oversight
of personal service and client service contracts in sections 1 through 3 of
this act shall be terminated on June 30, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective June 30, 2007:

(1)
Section 1 of this act;

(2)
Section 2 of this act; and

(3) Section 3 of this act.

---
END ---