BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The following persons are entitled to free or reduced fare coupons for travel
on paratransit or municipal transit vehicles:

(a)
Veterans, as defined in RCW 41.04.005, who are over seventy years of age and
their dependents;

(b)
Retired military personnel from any branch of the armed forces of the United
States and their dependents; and

(c)
Disabled persons meeting the criteria of RCW 46.16.381.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall issue the coupons to
qualified persons. Municipal transit agencies may issue the coupons upon proof
of a person's entitled status.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.06B RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A municipal transit agency or paratransit service must provide services to
rural areas within its boundaries when there is no transportation option other
than private automobiles for rural residents.

(2) Existing transit systems may cross county boundaries in order
to provide service to persons using military health care providers or military
hospital facilities without requiring such persons to transfer from one transit
vehicle to another.

---
END ---