BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that pesticide tracking is crucial for the protection of
public health, water quality, and species listed as threatened or endangered in
Washington. The legislature further finds that the creation of a central
depository for information on pesticide spraying allows people to obtain
information with a single contact regarding what pesticide was used, where it
was used, and under what conditions it was used. This information will be
valuable in conducting detailed studies of human exposure to pesticides,
environmental monitoring, and in developing recovery strategies for salmon and
other fish species in the state. It is the intent of the legislature to
develop a user-friendly data system on pesticide use with the assistance of
stakeholder groups that is cost-effective and provides reliable information.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department shall establish and implement a pesticide use reporting system in
accordance with the requirements of this act by January 1, 2002. The system
shall allow pesticide use data to be accessed on a watershed basis for each
watershed resource inventory area established in chapter 173-500 WAC as it
existed on January 1, 2000. Any data and reports generated from the data
shall be accessible on an internet site maintained by the department, and shall
also be readily accessible from the department. Pesticide use information
maintained under RCW 17.21.100(1) shall be included as part of the reporting
system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The department shall conduct a review of any issues that must be resolved in
order to establish a valid, user-friendly, cost-effective pesticide use
reporting system in Washington. The department shall appoint an advisory work
group representing affected interest groups, including the general public, to
assist in conducting the review. The work group shall include a balanced
representation from all areas of the state. The review shall be completed and
copies transmitted to the appropriate legislative committees by January 1,
2001. The review shall consider and include recommendations on at least the
following:

(a)
Specific data to be gathered in addition to information that is required under
RCW 17.21.100(1);

(b)
Reporting frequency and data formats, including major categories of pesticide
use;

(c)
Integration with other existing state, local, or federal data bases;

(d)
The most appropriate hydrologic or geographic unit for compiling data based on
cost and usability of the data;

(e)
The correlation between the point of purchase of a pesticide product and the
ultimate location of the use of that pesticide;

(f)
Practical methods for obtaining homeowner pesticide use data;

(g)
The development of a mechanism to ensure the accuracy of the data base; and

(h)
Specific funding sources to support the operation of the state-wide pesticide
use reporting system.

(2)
The department shall provide necessary administrative support to the work
group. All meetings of the work group shall be open to the general public, and
shall include an opportunity to receive testimony from members of the general
public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Beginning on July 1, 2003, the department shall publish an annual report
summarizing pesticide use in Washington on a watershed basis. The report shall
include an analysis of trends in use, and an assessment of the accuracy of the
reporting data.

(2)
The department shall adopt rules relating to the release of pesticide use
information. The rules shall ensure that the identity of the owner or lessee
of a specific property where a pesticide has been applied remains confidential,
except where the release of the information is otherwise authorized by law.

(3)
The department shall adopt rules regarding the transmittal of information
required under RCW 17.21.100(1), and any additional information required, for
inclusion into the pesticide use data base. The department shall adopt rules
imposing civil penalties for failure to transmit information as required by
this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
independent science panel shall review available scientific literature on the
impact of pesticides, as defined in RCW 17.21.020, on salmon. The independent
science panel shall develop recommendations for how in-stream monitoring
practices can be developed for pesticides, as well as how pesticides can be
addressed in salmon recovery plans. These recommendations shall be forwarded
to the salmon recovery office and the appropriate legislative committees by
July 1, 2001. In reviewing the impact of pesticides upon salmon, the
independent science panel shall consider, among other factors, how pesticides
can affect swimming ability, schooling behavior, and migration patterns of
salmon.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 17.21 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---