BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.41.040 and 1997 c 338 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful
possession of a firearm in the first degree, if the person owns, has in his or
her possession, or has in his or her control any firearm after having
previously been convicted in this state or elsewhere of any serious offense as
defined in this chapter.

(b)
A person, whether an adult or juvenile, is guilty of the crime of unlawful
possession of a firearm in the second degree, if the person does not qualify
under (a) of this subsection for the crime of unlawful possession of a firearm
in the first degree and the person owns, has in his or her possession, or has
in his or her control any firearm:

(i)
After having previously been convicted in this state or elsewhere of any felony
not specifically listed as prohibiting firearm possession under (a) of this
subsection, or any of the following crimes when committed by one family or
household member against another, committed on or after July 1, 1993: Assault
in the fourth degree, coercion, stalking, reckless endangerment, criminal
trespass in the first degree, or violation of the provisions of a protection
order or no-contact order restraining the person or excluding the person from a
residence (RCW 26.50.060, 26.50.070, 26.50.130, or 10.99.040);

(ii)
After having previously been involuntarily committed for mental health
treatment under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent
statutes of another jurisdiction, unless his or her right to possess a firearm
has been restored as provided in RCW 9.41.047;

(iii)
If the person is under eighteen years of age, except as provided in RCW
9.41.042; and/or

(iv)
If the person is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal,
or sentencing for a serious offense as defined in RCW 9.41.010.

(2)(a)
Unlawful possession of a firearm in the first degree is a class B felony,
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b)
Unlawful possession of a firearm in the second degree is a class C felony,
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)
Notwithstanding RCW 9.41.047 or any other provisions of law, as used in this
chapter, a person has been "convicted", whether in an adult court or
adjudicated in a juvenile court, at such time as a plea of guilty has been
accepted, or a verdict of guilty has been filed, notwithstanding the pendency
of any future proceedings including but not limited to sentencing or
disposition, post-trial or post-factfinding motions, and appeals. Conviction
includes a dismissal entered after a period of probation, suspension or deferral
of sentence, and also includes equivalent dispositions by courts in
jurisdictions other than Washington state. A person shall not be precluded
from possession of a firearm if the conviction has been the subject of a
pardon, annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure
based on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted or the
conviction or disposition has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other
equivalent procedure based on a finding of innocence. Where no record of the
court's disposition of the charges can be found, there shall be a rebuttable
presumption that the person was not convicted of the charge.

(4)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a person convicted of an
offense prohibiting the possession of a firearm under this section other than
murder, manslaughter, robbery, rape, indecent liberties, arson, assault,
kidnapping, extortion, burglary, or violations with respect to controlled
substances under RCW 69.50.401(a) and 69.50.410, who received a probationary
sentence under RCW 9.95.200, and who received a dismissal of the charge under
RCW 9.95.240, shall not be precluded from possession of a firearm as a result
of the conviction.

(5)
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, if a person is prohibited
from possession of a firearm under subsection (1) of this section and has not
previously been convicted of a sex offense prohibiting firearm ownership under
subsection (1) of this section and/or any felony defined under any law as a
class A felony or with a maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both,
the individual may petition a court of record to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored:

(a)
Under RCW 9.41.047; and/or

(b)(i)
Except as otherwise provided in (b)(iii) of this subsection, if the
conviction was for a felony offense, after five or more consecutive years in
the community without being convicted or currently charged with any felony,
gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony
convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.360; or

(ii)
Except as otherwise provided in (b)(iii) of this subsection, if the
conviction was for a nonfelony offense, after three or more consecutive years
in the community without being convicted or currently charged with any felony,
gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if the individual has no prior felony
convictions that prohibit the possession of a firearm counted as part of the
offender score under RCW 9.94A.360 and the individual has completed all
conditions of the sentence; or

(iii)
If the conviction was for an offense committed by an individual under the age
of eighteen who was armed with a firearm during the commission of the offense,
after ten or more consecutive years in the community without being convicted or
currently charged with any felony, gross misdemeanor, or misdemeanor crimes, if
the individual has no prior felony convictions that prohibit the possession of
a firearm counted as part of the offender score under RCW 9.94A.360 and has
completed all conditions of the sentence.

(((5)))
(6) In addition to any other penalty provided for by law, if a person
under the age of eighteen years is found by a court to have possessed a firearm
in a vehicle in violation of subsection (1) of this section or to have
committed an offense while armed with a firearm during which offense a motor
vehicle served an integral function, the court shall notify the department of
licensing within twenty-four hours and the person's privilege to drive shall be
revoked under RCW 46.20.265.

(((6)))
(7) Nothing in chapter 129, Laws of 1995 shall ever be construed or
interpreted as preventing an offender from being charged and subsequently convicted
for the separate felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen
firearm, or both, in addition to being charged and subsequently convicted under
this section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second
degree. Notwithstanding any other law, if the offender is convicted under this
section for unlawful possession of a firearm in the first or second degree and
for the felony crimes of theft of a firearm or possession of a stolen firearm,
or both, then the offender shall serve consecutive sentences for each of the
felony crimes of conviction listed in this subsection.

(((7)))
(8) Each firearm unlawfully possessed under this section shall be a
separate offense.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.41.010 and 1997 c 338 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Firearm" means a weapon or device from which a projectile or projectiles
may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder.

(2)
"Pistol" means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in
length, or is designed to be held and fired by the use of a single hand.

(3)
"Rifle" means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and
intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned, made or
remade, and intended to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed metallic
cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each
single pull of the trigger.

(4)
"Short-barreled rifle" means a rifle having one or more barrels less
than sixteen inches in length and any weapon made from a rifle by any means of
modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less than
twenty-six inches.

(5)
"Shotgun" means a weapon with one or more barrels, designed or
redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and
designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to use the energy of the
explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a
number of ball shot or a single projectile for each single pull of the trigger.

(6)
"Short-barreled shotgun" means a shotgun having one or more barrels
less than eighteen inches in length and any weapon made from a shotgun by any
means of modification if such modified weapon has an overall length of less
than twenty-six inches.

(7)
"Machine gun" means any firearm known as a machine gun, mechanical
rifle, submachine gun, or any other mechanism or instrument not requiring that
the trigger be pressed for each shot and having a reservoir clip, disc, drum,
belt, or other separable mechanical device for storing, carrying, or supplying
ammunition which can be loaded into the firearm, mechanism, or instrument, and
fired therefrom at the rate of five or more shots per second.

(8)
"Antique firearm" means a firearm or replica of a firearm not
designed or redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire ignition
with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including any
matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system and
also any firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for
which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not
readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade.

(9)
"Loaded" means:

(a)
There is a cartridge in the chamber of the firearm;

(b)
Cartridges are in a clip that is locked in place in the firearm;

(c)
There is a cartridge in the cylinder of the firearm, if the firearm is a
revolver;

(d)
There is a cartridge in the tube or magazine that is inserted in the action; or

(e)
There is a ball in the barrel and the firearm is capped or primed if the
firearm is a muzzle loader.

(10)
"Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling firearms
at wholesale or retail who has, or is required to have, a federal firearms
license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a). A person who does not have, and is not
required to have, a federal firearms license under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 923(a), is
not a dealer if that person makes only occasional sales, exchanges, or
purchases of firearms for the enhancement of a personal collection or for a
hobby, or sells all or part of his or her personal collection of firearms.

(11)
(("Crime of violence" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree,
burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second
degree;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6,
1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in (a)
of this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony
classified as a crime of violence under (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(12)))
"Serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a felony
attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter
amended:

(a)
Any crime of violence, which means any of the following felonies, as now
existing or hereafter amended:

(i)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree,
burglary in the second degree, residential burglary, and robbery in the second
degree;

(ii)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6,
1996, which is comparable to a felony classified as a crime of violence in
(a)(i) of this subsection; and

(iii)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense comparable to a felony
classified as a crime of violence under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection;

(b)
Any felony violation of the uniform controlled substances act, chapter 69.50
RCW, that is classified as a class B felony or that has a maximum term of
imprisonment of at least ten years;

(c)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(d)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(e)
Indecent liberties;

(f)
Leading organized crime;

(g)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(h)
Rape in the third degree;

(i)
Drive-by shooting;

(j)
Sexual exploitation;

(k)
Vehicular assault;

(l)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(m)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under RCW 9.94A.030;

(n)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125; or

(o)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to June 6, 1996, that is
comparable to a serious offense, or any federal or out-of-state conviction for
an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony classified as a
serious offense.

(((13)))
(12) "Law enforcement officer" includes a general authority Washington
peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020, or a specially commissioned
Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020. "Law enforcement
officer" also includes a limited authority Washington peace officer as
defined in RCW 10.93.020 if such officer is duly authorized by his or her
employer to carry a concealed pistol.

(((14)))
(13) "Felony" means any felony offense under the laws of this
state or any federal or out-of-state offense comparable to a felony offense
under the laws of this state.

(((15)))
(14) "Sell" refers to the actual approval of the delivery of a
firearm in consideration of payment or promise of payment of a certain price in
money.

(((16)))
(15) "Barrel length" means the distance from the bolt face of
a closed action down the length of the axis of the bore to the crown of the
muzzle, or in the case of a barrel with attachments to the end of any legal
device permanently attached to the end of the muzzle.

(((17)))
(16) "Family or household member" means "family" or
"household member" as used in RCW 10.99.020.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.41.047 and 1996 c 295 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At the time a person is convicted or found not guilty by reason of insanity
of an offense making the person ineligible to possess a firearm, or at the time
a person is committed by court order under RCW 71.05.320, 71.34.090, or chapter
10.77 RCW for mental health treatment, the convicting or committing court shall
notify the person, orally and in writing, that the person must immediately
surrender any concealed pistol license and that the person may not possess a
firearm unless his or her right to do so is restored by a court of record. For
purposes of this section a convicting court includes a court in which a person
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity.

The
convicting or committing court also shall forward a copy of the person's
driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, to the department of
licensing, along with the date of conviction or commitment.

(2)
Upon receipt of the information provided for by subsection (1) of this section,
the department of licensing shall determine if the convicted or committed
person has a concealed pistol license. If the person does have a concealed
pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify the
license-issuing authority which, upon receipt of such notification, shall
immediately revoke the license.

(3)(a)
A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm, by reason of having been
involuntarily committed for mental health treatment under RCW 71.05.320,
71.34.090, chapter 10.77 RCW, or equivalent statutes of another jurisdiction
may, upon discharge, petition a court of record to have his or her right to
possess a firearm restored. At the time of commitment, the court shall
specifically state to the person that he or she is barred from possession of
firearms.

(b)
The secretary of social and health services shall develop appropriate rules to
create an approval process under this subsection. The rules must provide for
the restoration of the right to possess a firearm upon a showing in a court of
competent jurisdiction that the person is no longer required to participate in
an inpatient or outpatient treatment program, is no longer required to take
medication to treat any condition related to the commitment, and does not
present a substantial danger to himself or herself, others, or the public.
Unlawful possession of a firearm under this subsection shall be punished as a
class C felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c)
A person petitioning the court under this subsection (3) shall bear the burden
of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the circumstances resulting
in the commitment no longer exist and are not reasonably likely to recur and
by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence that he or she does not present a
substantial danger to the safety of others.

(4)
No person who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity may petition a
court for restoration of the right to possess a firearm unless the person meets
the requirements for the restoration of the right to possess a firearm that
would have applied under RCW 9.41.040(4) if the person had been found guilty of
the crime.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements, the
conflicting part of this act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the
extent of the conflict, and such finding or determination does not affect the
operation of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet
federal requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---