BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature has committed substantial state resources to maintaining and
improving the health of the residents of the state of Washington. The surgeon
general of the United States has concluded that the use of tobacco is harmful
to our health and the environmental protection agency has found that
second-hand tobacco smoke causes cancer and respiratory disease. Recently the
attorney general of the state of Washington has been involved in extensive
litigation against tobacco companies.

In
Washington, nearly eight hundred fifty thousand adults smoke cigarettes, and
another seventy-five thousand use smokeless tobacco. Each year eight thousand
Washington residents die prematurely from smoking-related diseases, including
heart disease, stroke, cancer, emphysema, asthma, and bronchitis. Every person
who dies from tobacco products loses an average of eleven and one-half years of
life. The medical costs related to tobacco use more than doubled between 1987
and 1993. The direct medical costs related to smoking in Washington are
estimated at seven hundred six million dollars annually. Between 1980 and
1993, Washington's medicaid expenses attributable to smoking totaled more than
one billion one hundred million dollars.

The
legislature finds that direct or indirect investment of public pension and
retirement funds in business firms that manufacture tobacco is inconsistent
with its goals of maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents
while making health care affordable. Accordingly, the legislature intends to
prohibit the investment of public pension and retirement funds in business
firms that manufacture tobacco.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
On or after January 1, 2001, the state investment board shall not make
additional or new investments of public pension and retirement funds in the
stocks, bonds, securities, or other evidence of indebtedness or ownership of
business firms manufacturing tobacco products.

(b)
Beginning January 1, 2001, the state investment board shall liquidate all
investments of public pension and retirement funds in stocks, bonds,
securities, or other evidence of indebtedness or ownership of business firms
manufacturing tobacco products.

(2)
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(a)
"Business firm" means any corporation operating as a for-profit
entity and organized under the laws of a state of the United States and
includes its subsidiaries or affiliates if involved in the manufacture of
tobacco products.

(b)
"Manufacture tobacco" means maintaining facilities, including plant
and equipment, for growing tobacco and manufacturing tobacco products.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.33A.110 and 1994 c 154 s 310 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state investment board may make appropriate rules and regulations for the
performance of its duties. Subject to the prohibitions in section 2 of this
act, the board shall establish investment policies and procedures designed
exclusively to maximize return at a prudent level of risk. However, in the
case of the department of labor and industries' accident, medical aid, and
reserve funds, the board shall establish investment policies and procedures
designed to attempt to limit fluctuations in industrial insurance premiums and,
subject to this purpose, to maximize return at a prudent level of risk. The
board shall adopt rules to ensure that its members perform their functions in
compliance with chapter 42.52 RCW. Rules adopted by the board shall be adopted
pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.33A.130 and 1999 c 228 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state treasurer may cause any securities in which the state investment board
deals to be registered in the name of a nominee without mention of any
fiduciary relationship, except that adequate records shall be maintained to
identify the actual owner of the security so registered. The securities so
registered shall be held in the physical custody of the state treasurer, the
federal reserve system, the designee of the state treasurer, or, at the
election of the designee and upon approval of the state treasurer, the
Depository Trust Company of New York City or its designees.

With
respect to the securities, the nominee shall act only upon the order of the
state investment board. All rights to the dividends, interest, and sale
proceeds from the securities and all voting rights of the securities are vested
in the actual owners of the securities, and not in the nominee. The voting
rights of the securities shall be publicly exercised by the board in compliance
with section 2 of this act.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.33A.140 and 1998 c 14 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the prohibitions in section 2 of this act, the state investment board
shall invest and manage the assets entrusted to it with reasonable care, skill,
prudence, and diligence under circumstances then prevailing which a prudent
person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in
the conduct of an activity of like character and purpose.

The
board shall:

(1)
Consider investments not in isolation, but in the context of the investment of
the particular fund as a whole and as part of an overall investment strategy,
which should incorporate risk and return objectives reasonably suited for that
fund; and

(2)
Diversify the investments of the particular fund unless, because of special
circumstances, the board reasonably determines that the purposes of that fund
are better served without diversifying. However, no corporate fixed-income
issue or common stock holding may exceed three percent of the cost or six percent
of the market value of the assets of that fund.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.84.150 and 1998 c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except under section 2 of this act and where otherwise
specifically provided by law, the state investment board shall have full power
to invest, reinvest, manage, contract, or sell or exchange investments
acquired. Investments shall be made in accordance with RCW 43.33A.140 and
investment policy duly established and published by the state investment board.

---
END ---