BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

"PROVISIONS
APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC EMPLOYEES'

RETIREMENT SYSTEM PLANS 2 AND
3"

Sec.
101. RCW
41.40.005 and 1992 c 72 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
41.40.010 through 41.40.112 shall apply to members of plan 1 ((and)),
plan 2, and plan 3.

Sec.
102. RCW
41.40.010 and 1998 c 341 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the public employees' retirement system
provided for in this chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3)
"State treasurer" means the treasurer of the state of Washington.

(4)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means every branch, department,
agency, commission, board, and office of the state, any political subdivision
or association of political subdivisions of the state admitted into the
retirement system, and legal entities authorized by RCW 35.63.070 and 36.70.060
or chapter 39.34 RCW; and the term shall also include any labor guild,
association, or organization the membership of a local lodge or division of
which is comprised of at least forty percent employees of an employer (other
than such labor guild, association, or organization) within this chapter. The
term may also include any city of the first class that has its own retirement
system.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means every branch,
department, agency, commission, board, and office of the state, and any
political subdivision and municipal corporation of the state admitted into the
retirement system, including public agencies created pursuant to RCW 35.63.070,
36.70.060, and 39.34.030; except that after August 31, 2000, school districts
and educational service districts will no longer be employers for the public
employees' retirement system plan 2.

(5)
"Member" means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system, as provided for in RCW 41.40.023. RCW 41.26.045 does not
prohibit a person otherwise eligible for membership in the retirement system
from establishing such membership effective when he or she first entered an
eligible position.

(6)
"Original member" of this retirement system means:

(a)
Any person who became a member of the system prior to April 1, 1949;

(b)
Any person who becomes a member through the admission of an employer into the
retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, and prior to April 1, 1951;

(c)
Any person who first becomes a member by securing employment with an employer
prior to April 1, 1951, provided the member has rendered at least one or more
years of service to any employer prior to October 1, 1947;

(d)
Any person who first becomes a member through the admission of an employer into
the retirement system on or after April 1, 1951, provided, such person has been
in the regular employ of the employer for at least six months of the
twelve-month period preceding the said admission date;

(e)
Any member who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as
provided by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's
retirement becomes entitled to be credited with ten years or more of membership
service except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement
allowance for the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW
41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member;

(f)
Any member who has been a contributor under the system for two or more years
and who has restored all contributions that may have been withdrawn as provided
by RCW 41.40.150 and who on the effective date of the individual's retirement
has rendered five or more years of service for the state or any political
subdivision prior to the time of the admission of the employer into the system;
except that the provisions relating to the minimum amount of retirement
allowance for the member upon retirement at age seventy as found in RCW
41.40.190(4) shall not apply to the member.

(7)
"New member" means a person who becomes a member on or after April 1,
1949, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(8)(a)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members, means salaries or wages
earned during a payroll period for personal services and where the compensation
is not all paid in money, maintenance compensation shall be included upon the
basis of the schedules established by the member's employer.

(i)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 1 members also includes the
following actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(A)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered compensation earnable and the individual shall
receive the equivalent service credit;

(B)
If a leave of absence is taken by an individual for the purpose of serving in
the state legislature, the salary which would have been received for the
position from which the leave of absence was taken, shall be considered as
compensation earnable if the employee's contribution is paid by the employee
and the employer's contribution is paid by the employer or employee;

(C)
Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(D)
Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring
in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(E)
Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing
program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(F)
Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the
purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for
time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to
report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not
arise.

(ii)
"Compensation earnable" does not include:

(A)
Remuneration for unused sick leave authorized under RCW 41.04.340, 28A.400.210,
or 28A.310.490;

(B)
Remuneration for unused annual leave in excess of thirty days as authorized by
RCW 43.01.044 and 43.01.041.

(b)
"Compensation earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
salaries or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal
services, including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries
deferred under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and
457 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude nonmoney
maintenance compensation and lump sum or other payments for deferred annual
sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated annual leave, or
any form of severance pay.

"Compensation
earnable" for plan 2 and plan 3 members also includes the following
actual or imputed payments, which are not paid for personal services:

(i)
Retroactive payments to an individual by an employer on reinstatement of the
employee in a position, or payments by an employer to an individual in lieu of
reinstatement in a position which are awarded or granted as the equivalent of
the salary or wage which the individual would have earned during a payroll
period shall be considered compensation earnable to the extent provided above,
and the individual shall receive the equivalent service credit;

(ii)
In any year in which a member serves in the legislature, the member shall have
the option of having such member's compensation earnable be the greater of:

(A)
The compensation earnable the member would have received had such member not
served in the legislature; or

(B)
Such member's actual compensation earnable received for nonlegislative public
employment and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to
the retirement system required because compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(A)
of this subsection is greater than compensation earnable under (b)(ii)(B) of
this subsection shall be paid by the member for both member and employer
contributions;

(iii)
Assault pay only as authorized by RCW 27.04.100, 72.01.045, and 72.09.240;

(iv)
Compensation that a member would have received but for a disability occurring
in the line of duty only as authorized by RCW 41.40.038;

(v)
Compensation that a member receives due to participation in the leave sharing
program only as authorized by RCW 41.04.650 through 41.04.670; and

(vi)
Compensation that a member receives for being in standby status. For the
purposes of this section, a member is in standby status when not being paid for
time actually worked and the employer requires the member to be prepared to
report immediately for work, if the need arises, although the need may not
arise.

(9)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, except as provided in RCW 41.40.088,
means periods of employment in an eligible position or positions for one or
more employers rendered to any employer for which compensation is paid, and
includes time spent in office as an elected or appointed official of an
employer. Compensation earnable earned in full time work for seventy hours or
more in any given calendar month shall constitute one service credit month
except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation earnable earned for less
than seventy hours in any calendar month shall constitute one-quarter service
credit month of service except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Only service
credit months and one-quarter service credit months shall be counted in the
computation of any retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this
chapter. Any fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the
computation of such retirement allowance or benefits. Time spent in standby
status, whether compensated or not, is not service.

(i)
Service by a state employee officially assigned by the state on a temporary
basis to assist another public agency, shall be considered as service as a
state employee: PROVIDED, That service to any other public agency shall not be
considered service as a state employee if such service has been used to
establish benefits in any other public retirement system.

(ii)
An individual shall receive no more than a total of twelve service credit
months of service during any calendar year. If an individual is employed in an
eligible position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more
than one service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service
for seventy or more hours is rendered.

(iii)
A school district employee may count up to forty-five days of sick leave as
creditable service solely for the purpose of determining eligibility to retire
under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 1
"forty-five days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service
credit months. Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as
allowed under this subsection as follows:

(A)
Less than twenty-two days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(C)
More than twenty-two days but less than forty-five days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of
employment by a member in an eligible position or positions for one or more
employers for which compensation earnable is paid. Compensation earnable
earned for ninety or more hours in any calendar month shall constitute one
service credit month except as provided in RCW 41.40.088. Compensation
earnable earned for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours in any
calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit month of service.
Compensation earnable earned for less than seventy hours in any calendar month
shall constitute one-quarter service credit month of service. Time spent in
standby status, whether compensated or not, is not service.

Any
fraction of a year of service shall be taken into account in the computation of
such retirement allowance or benefits.

(i)
Service in any state elective position shall be deemed to be full time service,
except that persons serving in state elective positions who are members of the
Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement system, or
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system at the time of
election or appointment to such position may elect to continue membership in
the Washington school employees' retirement system, teachers' retirement
system, or law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system.

(ii)
A member shall receive a total of not more than twelve service credit months of
service for such calendar year. If an individual is employed in an eligible
position by one or more employers the individual shall receive no more than one
service credit month during any calendar month in which multiple service for
ninety or more hours is rendered.

(iii)
Up to forty-five days of sick leave may be creditable as service solely for the
purpose of determining eligibility to retire under RCW 41.40.180 as authorized
by RCW 28A.400.300. For purposes of plan 2 and plan 3 "forty-five
days" as used in RCW 28A.400.300 is equal to two service credit months.
Use of less than forty-five days of sick leave is creditable as allowed under
this subsection as follows:

(A)
Less than eleven days equals one-quarter service credit month;

(B)
Eleven or more days but less than twenty-two days equals one-half service
credit month;

(C)
Twenty-two days equals one service credit month;

(D)
More than twenty-two days but less than thirty-three days equals one and
one-quarter service credit month;

(E)
Thirty-three or more days but less than forty-five days equals one and one-half
service credit month.

(10)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(11)
"Service credit month" means a month or an accumulation of months of
service credit which is equal to one.

(12)
"Prior service" means all service of an original member rendered to
any employer prior to October 1, 1947.

(13)
"Membership service" means:

(a)
All service rendered, as a member, after October 1, 1947;

(b)
All service after October 1, 1947, to any employer prior to the time of its admission
into the retirement system for which member and employer contributions, plus
interest as required by RCW 41.50.125, have been paid under RCW 41.40.056 or
41.40.057;

(c)
Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service rendered
after April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a member, in the case of any member,
upon payment in full by such member of the total amount of the employer's
contribution to the retirement fund which would have been required under the
law in effect when such probationary service was rendered if the member had
been a member during such period, except that the amount of the employer's
contribution shall be calculated by the director based on the first month's
compensation earnable as a member;

(d)
Service not to exceed six consecutive months of probationary service, rendered
after October 1, 1947, and before April 1, 1949, and prior to becoming a
member, in the case of any member, upon payment in full by such member of five
percent of such member's salary during said period of probationary service,
except that the amount of the employer's contribution shall be calculated by
the director based on the first month's compensation earnable as a member.

(14)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, pension or other benefit provided by this chapter.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person
in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(15)
"Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(16)
"Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all contributions
standing to the credit of a member in the member's individual account,
including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), together with the regular
interest thereon.

(17)(a)
"Average final compensation" for plan 1 members, means the annual
average of the greatest compensation earnable by a member during any
consecutive two year period of service credit months for which service credit
is allowed; or if the member has less than two years of service credit months
then the annual average compensation earnable during the total years of service
for which service credit is allowed.

(b)
"Average final compensation" for plan 2 and plan 3 members,
means the member's average compensation earnable of the highest consecutive
sixty months of service credit months prior to such member's retirement,
termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized leaves of absence may
not be used in the calculation of average final compensation except under RCW
41.40.710(2).

(18)
"Final compensation" means the annual rate of compensation earnable
by a member at the time of termination of employment.

(19)
"Annuity" means payments for life derived from accumulated
contributions of a member. All annuities shall be paid in monthly
installments.

(20)
"Pension" means payments for life derived from contributions made by
the employer. All pensions shall be paid in monthly installments.

(21)
"Retirement allowance" means the sum of the annuity and the pension.

(22)
"Employee" or "employed" means a person who is providing
services for compensation to an employer, unless the person is free from the
employer's direction and control over the performance of work. The department
shall adopt rules and interpret this subsection consistent with common law.

(23)
"Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed
upon the basis of such mortality and other tables as may be adopted by the
director.

(24)
"Retirement" means withdrawal from active service with a retirement
allowance as provided by this chapter.

(25)
"Eligible position" means:

(a)
Any position that, as defined by the employer, normally requires five or more
months of service a year for which regular compensation for at least seventy
hours is earned by the occupant thereof. For purposes of this chapter an
employer shall not define "position" in such a manner that an
employee's monthly work for that employer is divided into more than one
position;

(b)
Any position occupied by an elected official or person appointed directly by
the governor, or appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court under RCW
2.04.240(2) or 2.06.150(2), for which compensation is paid.

(26)
"Ineligible position" means any position which does not conform with
the requirements set forth in subsection (25) of this section.

(27)
"Leave of absence" means the period of time a member is authorized by
the employer to be absent from service without being separated from membership.

(28)
"Totally incapacitated for duty" means total inability to perform the
duties of a member's employment or office or any other work for which the
member is qualified by training or experience.

(29)
"Retiree" means any person who has begun accruing a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer while a member.

(30)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(31)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to state-wide office or elected or appointed as a member
of the legislature.

(32)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(33)
"Plan 1" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 1
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became
members of the system prior to October 1, 1977.

(34)
"Plan 2" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 2
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became
members of the system on and after October 1, 1977.

(35)
"Plan 3" means the public employees' retirement system, plan 3
providing the benefits and funding provisions covering persons who first became
members of the system on and after September 1, 2001, and choose to enter plan
3, or who transfer under section 202 of this act.

(36)
"Index" means, for any calendar year, that year's annual average
consumer price index, Seattle, Washington area, for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United
States department of labor.

(((36)))
(37) "Index A" means the index for the year prior to the
determination of a postretirement adjustment.

(((37)))
(38) "Index B" means the index for the year prior to index A.

(((38)))
(39) "Index year" means the earliest calendar year in which
the index is more than sixty percent of index A.

(((39)))
(40) "Adjustment ratio" means the value of index A divided by
index B.

(((40)))
(41) "Annual increase" means, initially, fifty-nine cents per
month per year of service which amount shall be increased each July 1st by
three percent, rounded to the nearest cent.

(((41)))
(42) "Separation from service" occurs when a person has
terminated all employment with an employer.

(43)
"Member account" or "member's account" for purposes of plan
3 means the sum of the contributions and earnings on behalf of the member in
the defined contribution portion of plan 3.

Sec.
103. RCW
41.40.042 and 1991 c 35 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

The deductions from the compensation of members, provided for in
RCW 41.40.330 or ((41.40.650,)) 41.34.040, shall be made
notwithstanding that the minimum compensation provided for by law for any
member shall be reduced thereby. Every member shall be deemed to consent and
agree to the deductions made and provided for in this chapter and receipt in
full for his or her salary or compensation, and payment less the deductions
shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and
demands whatsoever for the services rendered by the person during the period
covered by the payment, except as to benefits provided for under this chapter.

Sec.
104. RCW
41.40.054 and 1997 c 103 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.40.200,
41.40.220, 41.40.230, 41.40.235, 41.40.250, ((or)) 41.40.670, or
section 310 of this act if the disability is the result of criminal conduct
by the member committed after April 21, 1997.

Sec.
105. RCW
41.40.057 and 1995 c 286 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to the establishment of membership service with employers
admitted to the retirement system after July 23, 1995.

(2)
For current employees, membership service may be established for periods of
employment with an employer prior to the employer's admission into the
retirement system by making the payments required by this section.

The
employer must select one of the options in this subsection and apply it
uniformly, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The required
payment shall include the total member and employer contributions that would
have been required from the date of each current member's hire.

(a)
Option A: The employer makes all the required payments within fifteen years
from the date of the employer's admission.

(b)
Option B: The employer makes a portion of the required payments and the member
pays the balance. The employer shall not be required to make its payments
until the member has made his or her payments. Each member shall have the
option to purchase the membership service.

(c)
Option C: The member makes all of the required payments. Each member shall
have the option to purchase the membership service.

All
payments under options B and C of this subsection must be completed within five
years from the date of the employer's admission, or prior to the retirement of
the member, whichever occurs sooner. A member may not receive membership service
credit under option B or C of this subsection until all required payments have
been made.

(3)
An employer shall not be required to purchase membership service under option A
or B for periods of employment for which the employer made contributions to a
qualified retirement plan as defined by 26 U.S.C. Sec. 401(a), if the
contributions plus interest accrued cannot be transferred to the retirement
system. If the employer does not purchase the membership credit under this
subsection, the member may purchase the membership service under subsection
(2)(c) of this section.

(4)
A former employee who is an active member of the system and is not covered by
subsection (2) of this section may establish membership service by making the
required payments under subsection (2)(c) of this section prior to the
retirement of the member.

(5) All payments made by the member under this section shall be
placed in the member's individual account in the members' savings fund or
the member's account for those members entering plan 3.

Sec.
106. RCW
41.40.062 and 1998 c 341 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The members and appointive and elective officials of any political subdivision
or association of political subdivisions of the state may become members of the
retirement system by the approval of the local legislative authority.

(2)
On and after September 1, 1965, every school district of the state of
Washington shall be an employer under this chapter. Every member of each
school district who is eligible for membership under RCW 41.40.023 shall be a
member of the retirement system and participate on the same basis as a person
who first becomes a member through the admission of any employer into the
retirement system on and after April 1, 1949, except that after August 31,
2000, school districts will no longer be employers for the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 or plan 3.

Sec.
107. RCW
41.40.088 and 1998 c 341 s 603 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A plan 1 member who is employed by a school district or districts, an
educational service district, the state school for the deaf, the state school
for the blind, institutions of higher education, or community colleges:

(a)
Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the period from
September through August of the following year if he or she is employed in an
eligible position, earns compensation earnable for six hundred thirty hours or
more during that period, and is employed during nine months of that period,
except that a member may not receive credit for any period prior to the
member's employment in an eligible position;

(b)
If a member in an eligible position does not meet the requirements of (a) of
this subsection, the member is entitled to a service credit month for each
month of the period he or she earns earnable compensation for seventy or more
hours; and the member is entitled to a one-quarter service credit month for
those calendar months during which he or she earned compensation for less than
seventy hours.

(2)
Except for any period prior to the member's employment in an eligible position,
a plan 2 or plan 3 member who is employed by a school district or
districts, an educational service district, the state school for the blind, the
state school for the deaf, institutions of higher education, or community
colleges:

(a)
Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the period from
September through August of the following year if he or she is employed in an
eligible position, earns compensation earnable for eight hundred ten hours or
more during that period, and is employed during nine months of that period;

(b)
If a member in an eligible position for each month of the period from September
through August of the following year does not meet the hours requirements of
(a) of this subsection, the member is entitled to one-half service credit month
for each month of the period if he or she earns earnable compensation for at
least six hundred thirty hours but less than eight hundred ten hours during
that period, and is employed nine months of that period.

(c)
In all other instances, a member in an eligible position is entitled to service
credit months as follows:

(i)
One service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned for
ninety or more hours;

(ii)
One-half service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned
for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(iii)
One-quarter service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned
for less than seventy hours.

(d)
After August 31, 2000, school districts and educational service districts will
no longer be employers for the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or
plan 3.

(3)
The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

Sec.
108. RCW
41.40.092 and 1983 c 81 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Active members of the Washington state patrol retirement system who have
previously established service credit in the public employees' retirement
system, plan 1 or plan 2 while employed by the state patrol as a cadet
as defined in RCW 43.43.120(6)(b) may have such service credit transferred to
the state patrol retirement system subject to the terms and conditions
specified in chapter 43.43 RCW, including reestablishment of such service for
the sole purpose of transfer. Service reestablishment shall be subject to the
interest requirements of RCW 41.40.150(2).

(2)
Service credit established for employment other than that specified in
subsection (1) of this section is not eligible for transfer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109. RCW
41.40.094 is decodified.

"PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM PLAN 2"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. RCW
41.40.650 (Employer and member contributions) and 1989 c 273 s
24, 1986 c 268 s 6, 1984 c 184 s 12, & 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 6 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. (1)
Every plan 2 member employed by an employer in an eligible position has the
option to make an irrevocable transfer to plan 3.

(2)
All service credit in plan 2 shall be transferred to the defined benefit
portion of plan 3.

(3)
Any plan 2 member who wishes to transfer to plan 3 may transfer according to
the schedule provided in section 304(2) of this act.

(4)
The accumulated contributions in plan 2, less fifty percent of any
contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be transferred to the
member's account in the defined contribution portion established in chapter
41.34 RCW, pursuant to procedures developed by the department and subject to
RCW 41.34.090. Contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.50.165(2) that are not
transferred to the member's account shall be transferred to the fund created in
RCW 41.50.075(2), except that interest earned on all such contributions shall
be transferred to the member's account.

(5)
The legislature reserves the right to discontinue the right to transfer under
this section.

(6)
Anyone previously retired from plan 2 is prohibited from transferring to plan
3.

"PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM PLAN 3"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. (1)
Sections 301 through 317 of this act apply only to plan 3 members.

(2)
Plan 3 consists of two separate elements: (a) A defined benefit portion
covered under this subchapter; and (b) a defined contribution portion covered
under chapter 41.34 RCW.

(3)
Unless otherwise specified, all references to "plan 3" in this
subchapter refer to the defined benefit portion of plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. All
employees who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on
or after September 1, 2001, shall have the irrevocable option of membership in
plan 2 or plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. (1) A
member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement allowance equal to
one percent of such member's average final compensation for each service credit
year.

(2)
The retirement allowance payable under section 309 of this act to a member who
separates after having completed at least twenty service credit years shall be
increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one percent, compounded for each
month from the date of separation to the date that the retirement allowance
commences.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. (1)
As used in this subsection, unless a different meaning is plainly required by
the context:

(a)
"Transfer period" means the time during which a member of one of the
groups of public employees' retirement system plan 2 members identified in
subsection (2) of this section may choose to irrevocably transfer from plan 2
to plan 3.

(b)
"Transfer amount" means the accumulated contributions present in a
member's savings fund on September 1, 2001, plus contributions made thereafter
until the actual date of transfer which is the basis for calculation of the
plan 2 to plan 3 transfer payment.

(c)
"Transfer payment date" means the date that the transfer payment will
be made into a member's individual account as specified for that member's
transfer period.

(d)
"Additional transfer payment date" means March 1, 2003, the date of
the additional transfer payment made according to subsection (3) of this
section.

(2)
Members that did not have the option of choosing plan 2 or plan 3 upon entry
into the retirement system, may irrevocably transfer to plan 3 according to the
following schedule:

(a)
For those members employed by state agencies and institutions of higher
education the transfer period means the period between September 1, 2001, and
March 1, 2002, and the transfer payment date is the end of the month of the
member's actual date of transfer.

(b)
For those members employed by other organizations the transfer period means the
period between March 1, 2002, and March 1, 2003, and the transfer payment date
is the end of the month of the member's actual date of transfer.

(c)
For those members employed by more than one employer within the retirement
system, and whose transfer period is different between one employer and
another, the member's transfer period will be the last period that is available
from any of that member's employers within the retirement system.

(3)
Members of plan 2 who are members of the retirement system prior to September
1, 2001, and choose to irrevocably transfer to plan 3 during the transfer
period shall have an additional payment made equivalent to their transfer
amount that is:

(a)
Increased by one hundred ten percent;

(b)
Increased by an annual rate of seven and one-half percent for the months
between September 1, 2001, and the actual month the member transferred to plan
3; and

(c)
Deposited into the member's individual account on the additional transfer
payment date.

(4)
If a member who requests to transfer during their transfer period dies before
the additional transfer payment date, the additional transfer payment provided
in this section shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons,
trust, or organization the member nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department.

(5)
The legislature reserves the right to modify or discontinue the right to an
additional payment under this section for any plan 2 members who have not
previously transferred to plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. Any
member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement allowance under the
provisions of section 309, 310, or 312 of this act is eligible to commence
receiving a retirement allowance after having filed written application with
the department.

(1)
Retirement allowances paid to members shall accrue from the first day of the
calendar month immediately following such member's separation from employment.

(2)
Retirement allowances payable to eligible members no longer in service, but
qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to RCW 41.40.068 shall accrue from
the first day of the calendar month immediately following such qualification.

(3)
Disability allowances paid to disabled members shall accrue from the first day
of the calendar month immediately following such member's separation from
employment for disability.

(4)
Retirement allowances paid as death benefits shall accrue from the first day of
the calendar month immediately following the member's death.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306. (1) A
member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer
shall continue to receive service credit.

(2)
A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized
leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and
whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation
paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be
on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's
leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that
provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the
period of leave. The earnable compensation reported for a member who
establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the
salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining
agreement.

(3)
Except as specified in subsection (4) of this section, a member shall be
eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's
entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of
absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if:

(a)
The member makes the contribution on behalf of the employer, plus interest, as
determined by the department; and

(b)
The member makes the employee contribution, plus interest, as determined by the
department, to the defined contribution portion.

The
contributions required shall be based on the average of the member's earnable
compensation at both the time the authorized leave of absence was granted and
the time the member resumed employment.

(4)
A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the armed forces of the
United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to
five years of military service if within ninety days of the member's honorable
discharge from the United States armed forces, the member applies for
reemployment with the employer who employed the member immediately prior to the
member entering the United States armed forces. This subsection shall be
administered in a manner consistent with the requirements of the federal
uniformed services employment and reemployment rights act.

The
department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the
employer for its contribution required under section 313 of this act for the
period of military service, plus interest as determined by the department.
Service credit under this subsection may be obtained only if the member makes
the employee contribution to the defined contribution portion as determined by
the department.

The
contributions required shall be based on the compensation the member would have
earned if not on leave, or if that cannot be estimated with reasonable
certainty, the compensation reported for the member in the year prior to when
the member went on military leave.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307. (1)
Contributions on behalf of the employer paid by the employee to purchase plan 3
service credit shall be allocated to the defined benefit portion of plan 3 and
shall not be refundable when paid to the fund described in RCW 41.50.075(4).
Contributions on behalf of the employee shall be allocated to the member
account. If the member fails to meet the statutory time limitations to
purchase plan 3 service credit, it may be purchased under the provisions of RCW
41.50.165(2). One-half of the purchase payments under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus
interest, shall be allocated to the member's account.

(2)
No purchased plan 3 membership service may be credited until all payments
required of the member are made, with interest. Upon receipt of all payments
owed by the member, the department shall bill the employer for any
contributions, plus interest, required to purchase membership service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. (1)
The director may pay a member eligible to receive a retirement allowance or the
member's beneficiary a lump sum payment in lieu of a monthly benefit if the
initial monthly benefit would be less than one hundred dollars. The one
hundred dollar limit shall be increased annually as determined by the
director. The lump sum payment shall be the actuarial equivalent of the
monthly benefit.

(2)
Persons covered under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section may upon
returning to member status reinstate all previous service by depositing the
lump sum payment received, with interest as computed by the director, within
two years of returning to service or prior to retiring again, whichever comes
first. In computing the amount due, the director shall exclude the accumulated
value of the normal payments the member would have received while in
beneficiary status if the lump sum payment had not occurred.

(3)
Any member who receives a settlement under this section is deemed to be retired
from this system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309. (1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by the transfer payment date specified in
section 304 of this act, under the public employees' retirement system plan 2
and who transferred to plan 3 under section 202 of this act;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of section 303 of this act.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of section
303 of this act, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection
shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment
of age sixty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 310. (1) A
member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued
employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be eligible to
receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member shall receive
a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in section 303 of this
act and shall have this allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference
in the number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age
sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any
further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by
the retiree as provided in section 315 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 311. (1)
Any member who elects to transfer to plan 3 and has eligible unrestored
withdrawn contributions in plan 2, may restore such contributions under the
provisions of RCW 41.40.740 with interest as determined by the department. The
restored plan 2 service credit will be automatically transferred to plan 3.
Restoration payments will be transferred to the member account in plan 3. If
the member fails to meet the time limitations of RCW 41.40.740, they may
restore such contributions under the provisions of RCW 41.50.165(2). The
restored plan 2 service credit will be automatically transferred to plan 3.
One-half of the restoration payments under RCW 41.50.165(2) plus interest shall
be allocated to the member's account.

(2)
Any member who elects to transfer to plan 3 may purchase plan 2 service credit
under RCW 41.40.740. Purchased plan 2 service credit will be automatically
transferred to plan 3. Contributions on behalf of the employer paid by the
employee shall be allocated to the defined benefit portion of plan 3 and shall
not be refundable when paid to the fund described in RCW 41.50.075(3).
Contributions on behalf of the employee shall be allocated to the member
account. If the member fails to meet the time limitations of RCW 41.40.740, they
may subsequently restore such contributions under the provisions of RCW
41.50.165(2). Purchased plan 2 service credit will be automatically
transferred to plan 3. One-half of the payments under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus
interest, shall be allocated to the member's account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 312. If a
member dies prior to retirement, the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children shall receive a retirement allowance computed as provided in section
303 of this act actuarially reduced to reflect a joint and one hundred percent
survivor option and if the member was not eligible for normal retirement at the
date of death a further reduction as described in section 309 of this act.

If
the surviving spouse who is receiving the retirement allowance dies leaving a
child or children under the age of majority, then such child or children shall
continue to receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being
received by the surviving spouse, share and share alike, until such child or
children reach the age of majority.

If
there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an allowance at the time of
the member's death, such member's child or children under the age of majority
shall receive an allowance, share and share alike. The allowance shall be
calculated with the assumption that the age of the spouse and member were equal
at the time of the member's death.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 313. The
required contribution rates to the retirement system for employers shall be
established by the director from time to time as may be necessary upon the
advice of the state actuary. The state actuary shall use the aggregate
actuarial cost method to calculate contribution rates. The employer
contribution rate calculated under this section shall be used only for the
purpose of determining the amount of employer contributions to be deposited in
the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund from the total employer contributions
collected under RCW 41.40.048.

Any
increase in the contribution rate required as the result of a failure of an
employer to make any contribution required by this section shall be borne in
full by the employer not making the contribution.

The
director shall notify all employers of any pending adjustment in the required
contribution rate and such increase shall be announced at least thirty days
prior to the effective date of the change.

The
employer's contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within
fifteen days following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll
period ends.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 314.
Beginning July 1, 1979, and every year thereafter, the department shall
determine the following information for each retired member or beneficiary whose
retirement allowance has been in effect for at least one year:

(1)
The original dollar amount of the retirement allowance;

(2)
The index for the calendar year prior to the effective date of the retirement
allowance, to be known as "index A";

(3)
The index for the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known
as "index B"; and

(4)
The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.

The
value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original
retirement allowance and shall be applied beginning with the July payment. In
no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:

(a)
Produce a retirement allowance which is lower than the original retirement
allowance;

(b)
Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(c)
Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

For
the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar year,
that year's average consumer price index‑-Seattle, Washington area for
urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 315. (1)
Upon retirement for service as prescribed in section 309 of this act or
retirement for disability under section 310 of this act, a member shall elect
to have the retirement allowance paid pursuant to one of the following options,
calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a)
Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement
allowance payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the
amount of such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement,
then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such designated
person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death, then to the
surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b)
The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement
option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule
designates shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person
nominated by the member by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department at the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department
shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor
option and a joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(2)(a)
A member, if married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to
the option selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection. If a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse
do not give written consent to an option under this section, the department
shall pay a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be
actuarially equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b)
If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.50.790 has been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a
member's retirement:

(i)
The department shall honor the designation as if made by the member under
subsection (1) of this section; and

(ii)
The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a)
Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a
reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of
this subsection, if they meet the following conditions:

(i)
The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the
retiree; and

(ii)
The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated
beneficiary's death.

(b)
The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the
date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be
increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c)
The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:

(i)
One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection
converted to a percent;

(ii)
Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option
factor;

(iii)
The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of
July 1, 1998.

(d)
The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of
the month following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July
1, 1998, whichever comes last.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 316. (1)
Except as provided in RCW 41.40.037, no retiree under the provisions of plan 3
shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he
or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010,
41.32.010, or 41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in RCW 41.26.030, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership
in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject to this
section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective official of a city
or town.

(2)
If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her
benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that
caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's
benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the
department.

(3)
The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 317. The
benefits provided pursuant to chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act)
are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to
September 1, 2001. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these
benefits at any time prior to September 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 318.
Sections 301 through 317 of this act are each added to chapter 41.40 RCW and
codified with the subchapter heading "PLAN 3."

"DEFINED
CONTRIBUTION"

Sec.
401. RCW
41.34.020 and 1998 c 341 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated:

(1)
"Actuary" means the state actuary or the office of the state actuary.

(2)
"Board" means the employee retirement benefits board authorized in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(3)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(4)(a)
"Compensation" for teachers for purposes of this chapter is the same
as "earnable compensation" for plan 3 in chapter 41.32 RCW except
that the compensation may be reported when paid, rather than when earned.

(b)
"Compensation" for classified employees for purposes of this chapter
is the same as "compensation earnable" for plan 3 in RCW 41.35.010,
except that the compensation may be reported when paid, rather than when
earned.

(c)
"Compensation" for public employees for purposes of this chapter is
the same as "compensation earnable" for plan 3 in RCW 41.40.010,
except that the compensation may be reported when paid, rather than when
earned.

(d)
"Compensation" for law enforcement officers and fire fighters for
purposes of this chapter is the same as "basic salary" for plan 3 in
RCW 41.26.030.

(5)(a)
"Employer" for teachers for purposes of this chapter means the same
as "employer" for plan 3 in chapter 41.32 RCW.

(b)
"Employer" for classified employees for purposes of this chapter
means the same as "employer" for plan 3 in RCW 41.35.010.

(c)
"Employer" for public employees for purposes of this chapter means
the same as "employer" for plan 3 in RCW 41.40.010.

(d)
"Employer" for law enforcement officers and fire fighters for
purposes of this chapter is the same as "employer" for plan 3 in RCW
41.26.030.

(6)
"Member" means any employee included in the membership of a
retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.32 RCW of plan 3 ((or)),
chapter 41.35 RCW of plan 3, chapter 41.40 RCW of plan 3, or chapter 41.26
RCW of plan 3.

(7)
"Member account" or "member's account" means the sum of the
contributions and earnings on behalf of the member.

(8)
"Retiree" means any member in receipt of an allowance or other
benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service rendered to an employer
by such member.

(9)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(29).

(10)
"Classified employee" means a member of the school employees'
retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(11)
"Public employee" means a member of the public employees' retirement
system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.40.010.

(12)
"Law enforcement officer or fire fighter" means a member of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 3 as defined in
RCW 41.26.030.

Sec.
402. RCW
41.34.030 and 1998 c 341 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter applies only to members of plan 3 retirement systems created under
chapters 41.32 ((and)), 41.35, 41.40, and 41.26 RCW.

(2)
Plan 3 consists of two separate elements:

(a)
A defined benefit portion covered under:

(i)
Sections 101 through 117, chapter 239, Laws of 1995; or

(ii)
Sections 1 through 25 and 201 through 213, chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or

(iii)
Sections 101 through 317, chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (sections 101
through 317 of this act); or sections 801 through 1017, chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (sections 801 through 1017 of this act); and

(b)
A defined contribution portion covered under this chapter. Unless specified
otherwise, all references to "plan 3" in this chapter refer to the
defined contribution portion of plan 3.

Sec.
403. RCW
41.34.060 and 1999 c 265 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the member's account
shall be invested by the state investment board. In order to reduce
transaction costs and address liquidity issues, based upon recommendations of
the state investment board, the department may require members to provide up to
ninety days' notice prior to moving funds from the state investment board
portfolio to self-directed investment options provided under subsection (3) of
this section.

(a)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.32 RCW of
plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(2).

(b)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.35 RCW of
plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(4).

(c)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.40 RCW of
plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(3).

(d)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.26 RCW of
plan 3, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system combined plan 2 and 3 fund
under RCW 41.50.075(1).

(2)
The state investment board shall declare monthly unit values for the portfolios
or funds, or portions thereof, utilized under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this
section. The declared values shall be an approximation of portfolio or fund
values, based on internal procedures of the state investment board. Such
declared unit values and internal procedures shall be in the sole discretion of
the state investment board. The state investment board may delegate any of the
powers and duties under this subsection, including discretion, pursuant to RCW
43.33A.030. Member accounts shall be credited by the department with a rate of
return based on changes to such unit values.

(3)
Members may elect to self-direct their investments as set forth in RCW
41.34.130 and 43.33A.190.

Sec.
404. RCW
41.34.080 and 1998 c 341 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a
pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, any optional benefit, any other
right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter,
and the various funds created by chapter 239, Laws of 1995((, and));
chapter 341, Laws of 1998; and chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this
act) and all moneys and investments and income thereof, is hereby exempt
from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax, and shall not be subject
to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or
insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever, and shall be unassignable.

(2)
This section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement
allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on
any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised
of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions
and that has been approved for deduction in accordance with rules that may be
adopted by the state health care authority and/or the department. This section
shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from
authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees
to any retirement association or organization the membership of which is
composed of retired public employees, if a total of three hundred or more of
such retired employees have authorized such deduction for payment to the same
retirement association or organization.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department from complying
with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter
26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter
74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060,
(d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court
order directing the department to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution
order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670
and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by
federal law.

Sec.
405. RCW
41.34.100 and 1998 c 341 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 239, Laws of 1995 are not provided to
employees as a matter of contractual right prior to July 1, 1996. The
legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time
prior to July 1, 1996.

(2)
The benefits provided pursuant to chapter 341, Laws of 1998 are not provided to
employees as a matter of contractual right prior to September 1, 2000. The
legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these benefits at any time
prior to September 1, 2000.

(3)
The benefits provided pursuant to chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this
act) are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to
September 1, 2001. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these
benefits at any time prior to September 1, 2001.

"GAIN
SHARING"

Sec.
406. RCW
41.31A.010 and 1998 c 341 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
requires otherwise.

(1)
"Actuary" means the state actuary or the office of the state actuary.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3)
"Teacher" means any employee included in the membership of the
teachers' retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.32 RCW.

(4)
"Member account" or "member's account" means the sum of any
contributions as provided for in chapter 41.34 RCW and the earnings on behalf
of the member.

(5)
"Classified employee" means the same as in RCW 41.35.010.

(6)
"Public employee" means the same as "member" as defined in
RCW 41.40.010(5).

(7) "Law enforcement officer or fire fighter" means
the same as "member" as defined in RCW 41.26.030(8).

Sec.
407. RCW
41.31A.020 and 1998 c 341 s 312 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
On January 1, ((2002)) 2004, and on January 1st of even-numbered
years thereafter, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the extraordinary investment gain amount.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
Any member of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 ((or)), the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3, the public employees'
retirement system plan 3, or the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 3 who earned service credit during the twelve-month
period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the distribution
and had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member account on
August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution; or

(b)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875 ((or)),
41.35.680, section 309 or 1008 of this act; or

(c)
Any person who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who:

(i)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service months after
attaining age fifty-four; or

(d)
Any teacher who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed
five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who transferred to
plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or

(e)
Any classified employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who
has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510; or

(f)
Any public employee who is a retiree pursuant to RCW 41.40.010(29) and who
has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2001, and who
transferred to plan 3 under section 202 of this act; or

(g)
Any law enforcement officer or fire fighter who is a retiree pursuant to RCW
41.26.030(24), and who has completed five service credit years by September 1,
2001, and transferred to plan 3 under section 901 of this act; or

(h)
Any person who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their member
account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and
who:

(i)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(ii)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service months after
attaining age fifty-four; or

(((g)))
(i) Any teacher who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in
their member account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the
distribution and who has completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996,
under plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817; or

(((h)))
(j) Any classified employee who had a balance of at least one thousand
dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit years by
September 1, 2000, and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.35.510; or

(k)
Any public employee who had a balance of at least one thousand dollars in their
member account on August 31st of the year immediately preceding the
distribution and who has completed five service credit years by September 1,
2001, and who transferred to plan 3 under section 202 of this act; or

(l)
Any law enforcement officer or fire fighter who had a balance of at least one
thousand dollars in their member account on August 31st of the year immediately
preceding the distribution and who has completed five service credit years by
September 1, 2001, and who transferred to plan 3 under section 901 of this act.

(3)
The extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as follows:

(a)
One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in trust for pension
benefits in the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund ((and)),
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund,
the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund, and the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system combined plan 2 and
3 fund at the close of the previous state fiscal year not including the
amount attributable to member accounts;

(b)
Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of investment returns on
those assets over the previous four state fiscal years exceeds ten percent;

(c)
Multiplied by the proportion of:

(i)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of all
persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section; to

(ii)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of:

(A)
All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section;

(B)
Any person who earned service credit in the teachers' retirement system plan 2
((or)), the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 2,
the public employees' retirement system plan 2, or the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 during the
twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the
distribution;

(C)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.765 ((or)),
41.35.420, 41.40.630, or 41.26.430; and

(D)
Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers' retirement
system plan 2 ((or)), the Washington school employees' retirement
system plan 2, the public employees' retirement system plan 2, or the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2;

(d)
Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit provided in
subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their service credit total on
August 31st of the previous year.

(4)
The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the
future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. A
new section is added to chapter 41.31A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
On March 1, 2003, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the 2000 retroactive extraordinary investment
gain amount and the 2002 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefits provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
Any public employee or law enforcement officer or fire fighter who earned
service credit during the twelve-month period from September 1st to August 1st
immediately preceding the distribution and who transferred to plan 3 under
section 202 or 901 of this act; or

(b)
Any public employee or law enforcement officer or fire fighter in receipt of a
benefit pursuant to section 309 of this act and who has completed five service
credit years by September 1, 2001, and who transferred to plan 3 under section
202 or 901 of this act; or

(c)
Any public employee or law enforcement officer or fire fighter who is a retiree
pursuant to RCW 41.34.020(8) and who has completed five service credit years by
September 1, 2001, and who transferred to plan 3 under section 202 or 901 of
this act; or

(d)
Any public employee or law enforcement officer or fire fighter who has a
balance of at least one thousand dollars in his or her member account and who
has completed five service credit years by September 1, 2001, and who
transferred to plan 3 under section 202 or 901 of this act.

(3)
The 2000 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated
as follows:

(a)
An amount equal to the average benefit per year of service paid in 2000 to
members of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 under section 309, chapter
341, Laws of 1998;

(b)
Distributed to persons eligible for the benefit in subsection (1) of this
section on the basis of their service credit total on July 1, 2001.

(4)
The 2002 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated
as follows:

(a)
An amount equal to the average benefit per year of service paid in 2002 to
members of the teachers' retirement system plan 3 under section 309, chapter
341, Laws of 1998;

(b)
Distributed to persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of
this section on the basis of their service credit total on July 1, 2001.

(5)
The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the
future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

"ACTUARIAL
FUNDING"

Sec.
501. RCW
41.45.010 and 1998 c 341 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to provide a dependable and systematic process
for funding the benefits provided to members and retirees of the public
employees' retirement system, chapter 41.40 RCW; the teachers' retirement
system, chapter 41.32 RCW; the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, chapter 41.26 RCW; the school employees' retirement system,
chapter 41.35 RCW; and the Washington state patrol retirement system, chapter
43.43 RCW.

The
funding process established by this chapter is intended to achieve the
following goals:

(1)
To continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school
employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plans 2 and 3 as provided by
law;

(2)
To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees' retirement system
plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 not later than June 30,
2024;

(3)
To establish predictable long-term employer contribution rates which will
remain a relatively constant proportion of the future state budgets; and

(4)
To fund, to the extent feasible, benefit increases for plan 1 members and all
benefits for plan 2 and 3 members over the working lives of those members so
that the cost of those benefits are paid by the taxpayers who receive the
benefit of those members' service.

Sec.
502. RCW
41.45.020 and 1998 c 341 s 402 and 1998 c 283 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Council" means the pension funding council created in RCW 41.45.100.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3)
"Law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1,"
((and)) "law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 2," and "law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding
provisions under chapter 41.26 RCW.

(4)
"Public employees' retirement system plan 1," ((and))
"public employees' retirement system plan 2," and
"public employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits
and funding provisions under chapter 41.40 RCW.

(5)
"Teachers' retirement system plan 1," "teachers' retirement
system plan 2," and "teachers' retirement system plan 3" mean
the benefits and funding provisions under chapter 41.32 RCW.

(6)
"School employees' retirement system plan 2" and "school
employees' retirement system plan 3" mean the benefits and funding
provisions under chapter 41.35 RCW.

(7)
"Washington state patrol retirement system" means the retirement
benefits provided under chapter 43.43 RCW.

(8)
"Unfunded liability" means the unfunded actuarial accrued liability
of a retirement system.

(9)
"Actuary" or "state actuary" means the state actuary
employed under chapter 44.44 RCW.

(10)
"State retirement systems" means the retirement systems listed in RCW
41.50.030.

(11)
"Work group" means the pension funding work group created in RCW
41.45.120.

(12)
"Classified employee" means a member of the Washington school
employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.35.010.

(13)
"Teacher" means a member of the teachers' retirement system as
defined in RCW 41.32.010(15).

Sec.
503. RCW
41.45.050 and 1998 c 341 s 403 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Employers of members of the public employees' retirement system, the teachers'
retirement system, the school employees' retirement system, and the Washington
state patrol retirement system shall make contributions to those systems based
on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.

(2)
The state shall make contributions to the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system based on the rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and
41.45.070. The state treasurer shall transfer the required contributions each
month on the basis of salary data provided by the department.

(3)
The department shall bill employers, and the state shall make contributions to
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, using the
combined rates established in RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 regardless of the
level of pension funding provided in the biennial budget. Any member of an
affected retirement system may, by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding,
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

(4)
The contributions received for the public employees' retirement system shall be
allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 employer
contribution ((required by RCW 41.40.650)) shall first be deposited in
the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
fund. All remaining public employees' retirement system employer contributions
shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund.

(5)
The contributions received for the teachers' retirement system shall be
allocated between the plan 1 fund and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2
and plan 3 fund. All remaining teachers' retirement system employer
contributions shall be deposited in the plan 1 fund.

(6)
The contributions received for the school employees' retirement system shall be
allocated between the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund as
follows: The contributions necessary to fully fund the combined plan 2 and
plan 3 employer contribution shall first be deposited in the combined plan 2
and plan 3 fund. All remaining school employees' retirement system employer
contributions shall be deposited in the public employees' retirement system
plan 1 fund.

(7)
The contributions received under RCW 41.26.450 for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system shall be allocated between the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 and the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 fund as follows: The contributions necessary to fully
fund the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 employer contributions shall be first deposited in the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system combined
plan 2 and plan 3 fund. All remaining law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system employer contributions shall be deposited in
the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund.

Sec.
504. RCW
41.45.060 and 1998 c 341 s 404, 1998 c 340 s 11, and 1998 c 283 s 6 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results based on the
assumptions adopted under RCW 41.45.030.

(2)
Not later than September 30, 1998, and every two years thereafter, consistent
with the assumptions adopted under RCW 41.45.030, the council shall adopt and
may make changes to:

(a)
A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system;

(b)
Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system
((plan 1)), the teachers' retirement system ((plan 1)), and the
Washington state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and

(c)
A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system
for funding the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

(3)
The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the
level percentages of pay that are needed:

(a)
To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees' retirement system
plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, and the unfunded liability of the
Washington state patrol retirement system not later than June 30, 2024, except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section; ((and))

(b)
To also continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3, the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school
employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plans 2 and 3 in accordance
with RCW ((41.40.650, 41.26.450,)) 41.45.061, section 507 of this
act, and this section; and

(c)
For the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plans 2 and 3 the
rate charged to employers shall be one and one-half times the rate charged to
the state.

(4)
The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan
2 and 3 employer contribution rate.

(5)
An amount equal to the amount of extraordinary investment gains as defined in
RCW 41.31.020 shall be used to shorten the amortization period for the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(6)
The council shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial
management and department of retirement systems of the state and employer
contribution rates adopted.

(7)
The director of the department of retirement systems shall collect those rates
adopted by the council.

Sec.
505. RCW
41.45.070 and 1998 c 341 s 406 and 1998 c 340 s 10 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the basic employer contribution rate established in RCW
41.45.060, the department shall also charge employers of public employees'
retirement system, teachers' retirement system, school employees' retirement
system, or Washington state patrol retirement system members an additional
supplemental rate to pay for the cost of additional benefits, if any, granted
to members of those systems. Except as provided in subsections (6) and
(7) of this section, the supplemental contribution rates required by this
section shall be calculated by the state actuary and shall be charged
regardless of language to the contrary contained in the statute which
authorizes additional benefits.

(2)
In addition to the basic state contribution rate established in RCW 41.45.060
for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system the
department shall also establish a supplemental rate to pay for the cost of
additional benefits, if any, granted to members of the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system. Except as provided in
subsection (6) of this section, this supplemental rate shall be calculated by
the state actuary and the state treasurer shall transfer the additional
required contributions regardless of language to the contrary contained in the
statute which authorizes the additional benefits.

(3)
The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases
provided to active members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1,
the teachers' retirement system plan 1, the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system plan 1, and Washington state patrol retirement
system, shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed
to fund the cost of the benefit not later than June 30, 2024.

(4)
The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund benefit increases
provided to active and retired members of the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 and plan 3, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 and
plan 3, the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3, or the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3,
shall be calculated as the level percentage of all members' pay needed to fund
the cost of the benefit, as calculated under RCW 41.40.650 or 41.26.450,
respectively.

(5)
The supplemental rate charged under this section to fund postretirement
adjustments which are provided on a nonautomatic basis to current retirees
shall be calculated as the percentage of pay needed to fund the adjustments as
they are paid to the retirees. The supplemental rate charged under this
section to fund automatic postretirement adjustments for active or retired
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 shall be calculated as the level percentage of pay needed
to fund the cost of the automatic adjustments not later than June 30, 2024.

(6)
A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional
benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 340, Laws of 1998.

(7)
A supplemental rate shall not be charged to pay for the cost of additional
benefits granted to members pursuant to chapter 41.31A RCW; section 309,
chapter 341, Laws of 1998; or section 701, chapter 341, Laws of 1998.

Sec.
506. RCW
41.45.061 and 1998 c 341 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The required contribution rate for members of the plan 2 teachers' retirement
system shall be fixed at the rates in effect on July 1, 1996, subject to the
following:

(a)
Beginning September 1, 1997, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
employee contribution rate shall not exceed the employer plan 2 and 3 rates
adopted under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 for the teachers' retirement system;

(b)
In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall be increased by
fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by any plan 2 benefit
increase passed after July 1, 1996;

(c)
In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall not be increased
as a result of any distributions pursuant to section 309, chapter 341, Laws of
1998 and RCW 41.31A.020.

(2)
The required contribution rate for members of the school employees' retirement
system plan 2 shall be fixed at the rates in effect on September 1, 2000, for
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2, subject to the
following:

(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the member contribution rate
shall not exceed the school employees' retirement system employer plan 2 and 3
contribution rate adopted under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070;

(b)
The member contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system plan 2
shall be increased by fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by
any plan 2 benefit increase passed after September 1, 2000.

(3)
The required contribution rate for members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 shall be set at the same rate as the employer combined
plan 2 and plan 3 rate.

(4)
The required contribution rate for members of the law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 shall be set at the sum of the employer
and state rates for the combined plan 2 and plan 3.

(5)
The employee contribution rates for plan 2 under subsections (3) and
(4) of this section shall not ((be increased)) include any
increase as a result of any distributions pursuant to RCW 41.31A.020 and
41.31A.030.

(((4)))
(6) The required plan 2 and 3 contribution rates for employers shall be
adopted in the manner described in RCW 41.45.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 507. A
new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any increase in the contribution rate required as the result of a failure of
the state or of an employer to make any contribution required by this section
shall be borne in full by the state or by that employer not making the
contribution.

(2)
The director shall notify all employers of any pending adjustment in the
required contribution rate and such pending adjustment in the required
contribution rate and any increase shall be announced at least thirty days
prior to the effective date of the change.

(3)
Members' contributions required by this section shall be deducted from the
members' compensation each payroll period. The members' contribution and the
employers' contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within
fifteen days following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll
period ends. The state's contribution required by this section shall be
transferred to the appropriate fund from the total contributions transferred by
the state treasurer under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.

"NECESSARY
FOR IMPLEMENTATION"

Sec.
601. RCW
41.50.075 and 1998 c 341 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Two funds are hereby created and established in the state treasury to be known
as the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement fund, and the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system combined plan 2 and plan 3 retirement fund which
shall consist of all moneys paid into them in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash,
securities, or other assets. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid
to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, and the plan 2 fund shall consist
of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(2)
All of the assets of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be
credited according to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be
maintained in the state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan
1 fund and the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The
plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided
to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the
combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the
benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system plan 2 and 3.

(3)
There is hereby established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. The plan 1
fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, and the combined
plan 2 and plan 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the
benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plans
2 and 3.

(4)
There is hereby established in the state treasury the school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund
shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of
the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.

Sec.
602. RCW
41.50.088 and 1998 c 341 s 507 and 1998 c 116 s 10 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall adopt rules as necessary and exercise all the powers and
perform all duties prescribed by law with respect to:

(a)
The board shall recommend to the state investment board types of options for
member self-directed investment in the teachers' retirement system plan 3 ((and)),
the school employees' retirement system plan 3, the public employees'
retirement system plan 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 3 as deemed by the board to be reflective of the
members' preferences;

(b)
The selection of optional benefit payment schedules available to members and
survivors of members upon the death, disability, retirement, or termination of
the member. The optional benefit payments ((may)) shall include
but not be limited to: Fixed and participating annuities, joint and survivor
annuities, and payments that bridge to social security or defined benefit plan
payments;

(c)
Approval of actuarially equivalent annuities that may be purchased from the
combined plan 2 and plan 3 funds under RCW 41.50.075 (2) or (3); and

(d)
Determination of the basis for administrative charges to the self-directed
investment fund to offset self-directed account expenses;

(2)
The board shall recommend to the state investment board types of options for
participant self-directed investment in the state deferred compensation plan,
as deemed by the board to be reflective of the participants' preferences.

Sec.
603. RCW
41.50.500 and 1998 c 341 s 512 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 41.50.500 through 41.50.650, 41.50.670 through 41.50.720, and
26.09.138.

(1)
"Benefits" means periodic retirement payments or a withdrawal of
accumulated contributions.

(2)
"Disposable benefits" means that part of the benefits of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those benefits of any amount
required by law to be withheld. The term "required by law to be
withheld" does not include any deduction elective to the member.

(3)
"Dissolution order" means any judgment, decree, or order of spousal
maintenance, property division, or court-approved property settlement incident
to a decree of divorce, dissolution, invalidity, or legal separation issued by
the superior court of the state of Washington or a judgment, decree, or other
order of spousal support issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in another
state or country, that has been registered or otherwise made enforceable in
this state.

(4)
"Mandatory benefits assignment order" means an order issued to the
department of retirement systems pursuant to RCW 41.50.570 to withhold and
deliver benefits payable to an obligor under chapter 2.10, 2.12, 41.26, 41.32,
41.40, 41.35, or 43.43 RCW.

(5)
"Obligee" means an ex spouse or spouse to whom a duty of spousal
maintenance or property division obligation is owed.

(6)
"Obligor" means the spouse or ex spouse owing a duty of spousal
maintenance or a property division obligation.

(7)
"Periodic retirement payments" means periodic payments of retirement
allowances, including but not limited to service retirement allowances,
disability retirement allowances, and survivors' allowances. The term does not
include a withdrawal of accumulated contributions.

(8)
"Property division obligation" means any outstanding court-ordered
property division or court-approved property settlement obligation incident to
a decree of divorce, dissolution, or legal separation.

(9)
"Standard allowance" means a benefit payment option selected under
RCW 2.10.146(1)(a), 41.26.460(1)(a), section 1015(1)(a) of this act,
41.32.785(1)(a), 41.40.188(1)(a), 41.40.660(1), section 315(1)(a) of this
act, or 41.35.220 that ceases upon the death of the retiree. Standard
allowance also means the benefit allowance provided under RCW 2.10.110,
2.10.130, 43.43.260, 41.26.100, 41.26.130(1)(a), or chapter 2.12 RCW. Standard
allowance also means the maximum retirement allowance available under RCW
41.32.530(1) following member withdrawal of accumulated contributions, if any.

(10)
"Withdrawal of accumulated contributions" means a lump sum payment to
a retirement system member of all or a part of the member's accumulated
contributions, including accrued interest, at the request of the member
including any lump sum amount paid upon the death of the member.

Sec.
604. RCW
41.05.011 and 1998 c 341 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2)
"State purchased health care" or "health care" means
medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority,
the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the
department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4)
"Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a
health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health
maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5)
"Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to
choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee
contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to office
after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a) Employees of
a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state if the
legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the authority to
provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the authority, as
provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee organizations representing
state civil service employees, at the option of each such employee
organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of employee
organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for the
purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such employee
organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority agrees to
provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract with the
authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7)
"Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under
RCW 41.05.055.

(8)
"Retired or disabled school employee" means:

(a)
Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational
service district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32
or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation
receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to
receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or
41.40 RCW.

(9)
"Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan,
a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow
the employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125
or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10)
"Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12)
"Plan year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13)
"Separated employees" means persons who separate from employment with
an employer as defined in:

(a)
RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b)
RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000; or

(c)
RCW 41.40.010 on or after September 1, 2001;

and who
are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the
teachers' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40) ((or)),
the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in RCW
41.35.010, or the public employees' retirement system plan 3 as defined in
RCW 41.40.010.

"FUND
INVESTMENTS AND INTEREST EARNINGS"

Sec.
701. RCW
43.33A.190 and 1998 c 341 s 707 are each amended to read as follows:

Pursuant
to RCW 41.34.130, the state investment board shall invest all self-directed
investment moneys under teachers' retirement system plan 3 ((and)),
the school employees' retirement system plan 3, the public employees'
retirement system plan 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 3 with full power to establish investment policy,
develop investment options, and manage self-directed investment funds.

Sec.
702. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher
education construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the
industrial insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account,
the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement
principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real
estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid
account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice
assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the
natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account,
the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the
volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and pension)) and reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system combined plan 2 and plan 3
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

"LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS' AND FIRE FIGHTERS'

RETIREMENT
SYSTEM PLANS 1, 2, AND 3"

Sec.
801. RCW
41.26.005 and 1992 c 72 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
41.26.010 through 41.26.062 shall apply to members of plan 1 ((and)),
plan 2, and plan 3.

Sec.
802. RCW
41.26.030 and 1996 c 178 s 11 and 1996 c 38 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(1)
"Retirement system" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system" provided herein.

(2)(a)
"Employer" for plan 1 members, means the legislative authority of any
city, town, county, or district or the elected officials of any municipal
corporation that employs any law enforcement officer and/or fire fighter, any
authorized association of such municipalities, and, except for the purposes of
RCW 41.26.150, any labor guild, association, or organization, which represents
the fire fighters or law enforcement officers of at least seven cities of over
20,000 population and the membership of each local lodge or division of which
is composed of at least sixty percent law enforcement officers or fire fighters
as defined in this chapter.

(b)
"Employer" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means the following
entities to the extent that the entity employs any law enforcement officer
and/or fire fighter:

(i)
The legislative authority of any city, town, county, or district;

(ii)
The elected officials of any municipal corporation;

(iii)
The governing body of any other general authority law enforcement agency; or

(iv)
A four-year institution of higher education having a fully operational fire
department as of January 1, 1996.

(3)
"Law enforcement officer" beginning January 1, 1994, means any person
who is commissioned and employed by an employer on a full time, fully
compensated basis to enforce the criminal laws of the state of Washington
generally, with the following qualifications:

(a)
No person who is serving in a position that is basically clerical or
secretarial in nature, and who is not commissioned shall be considered a law
enforcement officer;

(b)
Only those deputy sheriffs, including those serving under a different title
pursuant to county charter, who have successfully completed a civil service
examination for deputy sheriff or the equivalent position, where a different
title is used, and those persons serving in unclassified positions authorized
by RCW 41.14.070 except a private secretary will be considered law enforcement
officers;

(c)
Only such full time commissioned law enforcement personnel as have been
appointed to offices, positions, or ranks in the police department which have
been specifically created or otherwise expressly provided for and designated by
city charter provision or by ordinance enacted by the legislative body of the
city shall be considered city police officers;

(d)
The term "law enforcement officer" also includes the executive
secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is an employer
under RCW 41.26.030(2)) if that individual has five years previous membership
in the retirement system established in chapter 41.20 RCW. The provisions of
this subsection (3)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 and plan 3 members; and

(e)
The term "law enforcement officer" also includes a person employed on
or after January 1, 1993, as a public safety officer or director of public
safety, so long as the job duties substantially involve only either police or
fire duties, or both, and no other duties in a city or town with a population
of less than ten thousand. The provisions of this subsection (3)(e) shall not
apply to any public safety officer or director of public safety who is
receiving a retirement allowance under this chapter as of May 12, 1993.

(4)
"Fire fighter" means:

(a)
Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis as a member
of a fire department of an employer and who is serving in a position which
requires passing a civil service examination for fire fighter, and who is
actively employed as such;

(b)
Anyone who is actively employed as a full time fire fighter where the fire
department does not have a civil service examination;

(c)
Supervisory fire fighter personnel;

(d)
Any full time executive secretary of an association of fire protection
districts authorized under RCW 52.12.031. The provisions of this subsection
(4)(d) shall not apply to plan 2 and plan 3 members;

(e)
The executive secretary of a labor guild, association or organization (which is
an employer under RCW 41.26.030(2) as now or hereafter amended), if such
individual has five years previous membership in a retirement system
established in chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW. The provisions of this subsection
(4)(e) shall not apply to plan 2 and plan 3 members;

(f)
Any person who is serving on a full time, fully compensated basis for an
employer, as a fire dispatcher, in a department in which, on March 1, 1970, a
dispatcher was required to have passed a civil service examination for fire
fighter; and

(g)
Any person who on March 1, 1970, was employed on a full time, fully compensated
basis by an employer, and who on May 21, 1971, was making retirement
contributions under the provisions of chapter 41.16 or 41.18 RCW.

(5)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems created in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

(6)
"Surviving spouse" means the surviving widow or widower of a member.
"Surviving spouse" shall not include the divorced spouse of a member
except as provided in RCW 41.26.162.

(7)(a)
"Child" or "children" means an unmarried person who is
under the age of eighteen or mentally or physically handicapped as determined
by the department, except a handicapped person in the full time care of a state
institution, who is:

(i)
A natural born child;

(ii)
A stepchild where that relationship was in existence prior to the date benefits
are payable under this chapter;

(iii)
A posthumous child;

(iv)
A child legally adopted or made a legal ward of a member prior to the date benefits
are payable under this chapter; or

(v)
An illegitimate child legitimized prior to the date any benefits are payable
under this chapter.

(b)
A person shall also be deemed to be a child up to and including the age of
twenty years and eleven months while attending any high school, college, or
vocational or other educational institution accredited, licensed, or approved
by the state, in which it is located, including the summer vacation months and
all other normal and regular vacation periods at the particular educational
institution after which the child returns to school.

(8)
"Member" means any fire fighter, law enforcement officer, or other
person as would apply under subsections (3) or (4) of this section whose
membership is transferred to the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system on or after March 1, 1970, and every law
enforcement officer and fire fighter who is employed in that capacity on or
after such date.

(9)
"Retirement fund" means the "Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system fund" as provided for
herein.

(10)
"Employee" means any law enforcement officer or fire fighter as
defined in subsections (3) and (4) of this section.

(11)(a)
"Beneficiary" for plan 1 members, means any person in receipt of a
retirement allowance, disability allowance, death benefit, or any other benefit
described herein.

(b)
"Beneficiary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means any person
in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter
resulting from service rendered to an employer by another person.

(12)(a)
"Final average salary" for plan 1 members, means (i) for a member
holding the same position or rank for a minimum of twelve months preceding the
date of retirement, the basic salary attached to such same position or rank at
time of retirement; (ii) for any other member, including a civil service member
who has not served a minimum of twelve months in the same position or rank
preceding the date of retirement, the average of the greatest basic salaries
payable to such member during any consecutive twenty-four month period within
such member's last ten years of service for which service credit is allowed,
computed by dividing the total basic salaries payable to such member during the
selected twenty-four month period by twenty-four; (iii) in the case of
disability of any member, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of disability retirement; (iv) in the case of a member who hereafter vests
pursuant to RCW 41.26.090, the basic salary payable to such member at the time
of vesting.

(b)
"Final average salary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means
the monthly average of the member's basic salary for the highest consecutive
sixty service credit months of service prior to such member's retirement,
termination, or death. Periods constituting authorized unpaid leaves of
absence may not be used in the calculation of final average salary.

(13)(a)
"Basic salary" for plan 1 members, means the basic monthly rate of
salary or wages, including longevity pay but not including overtime earnings or
special salary or wages, upon which pension or retirement benefits will be
computed and upon which employer contributions and salary deductions will be
based.

(b)
"Basic salary" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means salaries
or wages earned by a member during a payroll period for personal services,
including overtime payments, and shall include wages and salaries deferred
under provisions established pursuant to sections 403(b), 414(h), and 457 of
the United States Internal Revenue Code, but shall exclude lump sum payments
for deferred annual sick leave, unused accumulated vacation, unused accumulated
annual leave, or any form of severance pay. In any year in which a member
serves in the legislature the member shall have the option of having such
member's basic salary be the greater of:

(i)
The basic salary the member would have received had such member not served in
the legislature; or

(ii)
Such member's actual basic salary received for nonlegislative public employment
and legislative service combined. Any additional contributions to the
retirement system required because basic salary under (b)(i) of this subsection
is greater than basic salary under (b)(ii) of this subsection shall be paid by
the member for both member and employer contributions.

(14)(a)
"Service" for plan 1 members, means all periods of employment for an
employer as a fire fighter or law enforcement officer, for which compensation
is paid, together with periods of suspension not exceeding thirty days in
duration. For the purposes of this chapter service shall also include service
in the armed forces of the United States as provided in RCW 41.26.190. Credit
shall be allowed for all service credit months of service rendered by a member
from and after the member's initial commencement of employment as a fire
fighter or law enforcement officer, during which the member worked for seventy
or more hours, or was on disability leave or disability retirement. Only
service credit months of service shall be counted in the computation of any
retirement allowance or other benefit provided for in this chapter.

(i)
For members retiring after May 21, 1971 who were employed under the coverage of
a prior pension act before March 1, 1970, "service" shall also
include (A) such military service not exceeding five years as was creditable to
the member as of March 1, 1970, under the member's particular prior pension
act, and (B) such other periods of service as were then creditable to a particular
member under the provisions of RCW 41.18.165, 41.20.160 or 41.20.170. However,
in no event shall credit be allowed for any service rendered prior to March 1,
1970, where the member at the time of rendition of such service was employed in
a position covered by a prior pension act, unless such service, at the time
credit is claimed therefor, is also creditable under the provisions of such
prior act.

(ii)
A member who is employed by two employers at the same time shall only be
credited with service to one such employer for any month during which the
member rendered such dual service.

(b)
"Service" for plan 2 and plan 3 members, means periods of
employment by a member for one or more employers for which basic salary is
earned for ninety or more hours per calendar month which shall constitute a
service credit month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more
employers for which basic salary is earned for at least seventy hours but less
than ninety hours per calendar month shall constitute one-half service credit
month. Periods of employment by a member for one or more employers for which
basic salary is earned for less than seventy hours shall constitute a
one-quarter service credit month.

Members
of the retirement system who are elected or appointed to a state elective
position may elect to continue to be members of this retirement system.

Service
credit years of service shall be determined by dividing the total number of
service credit months of service by twelve. Any fraction of a service credit
year of service as so determined shall be taken into account in the computation
of such retirement allowance or benefits.

If
a member receives basic salary from two or more employers during any calendar
month, the individual shall receive one service credit month's service credit
during any calendar month in which multiple service for ninety or more hours is
rendered; or one-half service credit month's service credit during any calendar
month in which multiple service for at least seventy hours but less than ninety
hours is rendered; or one-quarter service credit month during any calendar
month in which multiple service for less than seventy hours is rendered.

(15)
"Accumulated contributions" means the employee's contributions made
by a member, including any amount paid under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus accrued
interest credited thereon.

(16)
"Actuarial reserve" means a method of financing a pension or
retirement plan wherein reserves are accumulated as the liabilities for benefit
payments are incurred in order that sufficient funds will be available on the
date of retirement of each member to pay the member's future benefits during
the period of retirement.

(17)
"Actuarial valuation" means a mathematical determination of the
financial condition of a retirement plan. It includes the computation of the
present monetary value of benefits payable to present members, and the present
monetary value of future employer and employee contributions, giving effect to
mortality among active and retired members and also to the rates of disability,
retirement, withdrawal from service, salary and interest earned on investments.

(18)
"Disability board" for plan 1 members means either the county
disability board or the city disability board established in RCW 41.26.110.

(19)
"Disability leave" means the period of six months or any portion
thereof during which a member is on leave at an allowance equal to the member's
full salary prior to the commencement of disability retirement. The definition
contained in this subsection shall apply only to plan 1 members.

(20)
"Disability retirement" for plan 1 members, means the period
following termination of a member's disability leave, during which the member
is in receipt of a disability retirement allowance.

(21)
"Position" means the employment held at any particular time, which
may or may not be the same as civil service rank.

(22)
"Medical services" for plan 1 members, shall include the following as
minimum services to be provided. Reasonable charges for these services shall
be paid in accordance with RCW 41.26.150.

(a)
Hospital expenses: These are the charges made by a hospital, in its own
behalf, for

(i)
Board and room not to exceed semiprivate room rate unless private room is
required by the attending physician due to the condition of the patient.

(ii)
Necessary hospital services, other than board and room, furnished by the
hospital.

(b)
Other medical expenses: The following charges are considered "other
medical expenses", provided that they have not been considered as
"hospital expenses".

(i)
The fees of the following:

(A)
A physician or surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.71 RCW;

(B)
An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under the provisions of chapter
18.57 RCW;

(C)
A chiropractor licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.25 RCW.

(ii)
The charges of a registered graduate nurse other than a nurse who ordinarily
resides in the member's home, or is a member of the family of either the member
or the member's spouse.

(iii)
The charges for the following medical services and supplies:

(A)
Drugs and medicines upon a physician's prescription;

(B)
Diagnostic x-ray and laboratory examinations;

(C)
X-ray, radium, and radioactive isotopes therapy;

(D)
Anesthesia and oxygen;

(E)
Rental of iron lung and other durable medical and surgical equipment;

(F)
Artificial limbs and eyes, and casts, splints, and trusses;

(G)
Professional ambulance service when used to transport the member to or from a
hospital when injured by an accident or stricken by a disease;

(H)
Dental charges incurred by a member who sustains an accidental injury to his or
her teeth and who commences treatment by a legally licensed dentist within
ninety days after the accident;

(I)
Nursing home confinement or hospital extended care facility;

(J)
Physical therapy by a registered physical therapist;

(K)
Blood transfusions, including the cost of blood and blood plasma not replaced
by voluntary donors;

(L)
An optometrist licensed under the provisions of chapter 18.53 RCW.

(23)
"Regular interest" means such rate as the director may determine.

(24)
"Retiree" for persons who establish membership in the retirement
system on or after October 1, 1977, means any member in receipt of a retirement
allowance or other benefit provided by this chapter resulting from service
rendered to an employer by such member.

(25)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(26)
"State actuary" or "actuary" means the person appointed
pursuant to RCW 44.44.010(2).

(27)
"State elective position" means any position held by any person
elected or appointed to state-wide office or elected or appointed as a member
of the legislature.

(28)
"Plan 1" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, plan 1 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system prior to October 1,
1977.

(29)
"Plan 2" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, plan 2 providing the benefits and funding provisions
covering persons who first became members of the system on and after October 1,
1977.

(30)
"Plan 3" means the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system, plan 3 providing benefits and funding provisions covering
persons who first became members of the system on and after March 1, 2002, and
choose to enter plan 3, or who transfer under section 901 of this act.

(31)
"Service credit year" means an accumulation of months of service
credit which is equal to one when divided by twelve.

(((31)))
(32) "Service credit month" means a full service credit month
or an accumulation of partial service credit months that are equal to one.

(((32)))
(33) "General authority law enforcement agency" means any
agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency,
department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the
detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the
traffic or criminal laws in general, but not including the Washington state
patrol. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a
limited authority law enforcement agency having as one of its functions the
apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or violating the
traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas, including but not
limited to, the state departments of natural resources, fish and wildlife, and
social and health services, the state gambling commission, the state lottery
commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the state utilities and
transportation commission, the state liquor control board, and the state
department of corrections.

"LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS' AND FIRE FIGHTERS'

RETIREMENT
SYSTEM PLAN 2"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 901. A
new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every plan 2 member employed by an employer in an eligible position has the
option to make an irrevocable transfer to plan 3.

(2)
All service credit in plan 2 shall be transferred to the defined benefit
portion of plan 3.

(3)
Any plan 2 member who wishes to transfer to plan 3 may transfer during any
month during the period from March 1, 2002, to March 1, 2003, provided that the
member earns service credit for that month.

(4)
The accumulated contributions in plan 2, less fifty percent of any
contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be transferred to the
member's account in the defined contribution portion established in chapter
41.34 RCW, pursuant to procedures developed by the department and subject to
RCW 41.34.090. Contributions made pursuant to RCW 41.50.165(2) that are not
transferred to the member's account shall be transferred to the fund created in
RCW 41.50.075(2), except that interest earned on all such contributions shall
be transferred to the member's account.

(5)
The legislature reserves the right to discontinue the right to transfer under
this section.

(6)
Anyone previously retired from plan 2 is prohibited from transferring to plan
3.

Sec.
902. RCW
41.26.450 and 1996 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)
The required contribution rates to the plan II system for members, employers,
and the state of Washington shall be established by the director from time to
time as may be necessary upon the advice of the state actuary. The state
actuary shall use the aggregate actuarial cost method to calculate contribution
rates.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the member, the employer
and the state shall each contribute the following shares of the cost of the
retirement system:

Member 50%

Employer 30%

State 20%

(3))) Port
districts established under Title 53 RCW and institutions of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall contribute both the employer and state
shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are
law enforcement officers. Institutions of higher education shall contribute
both the employer and the state shares of the cost of the retirement system for
any of their employees who are fire fighters.

(((4)
Effective January 1, 1987, however, no member or employer contributions are
required for any calendar month in which the member is not granted service
credit.

(5)
Any adjustments in contribution rates required from time to time for future
costs shall likewise be shared proportionally by the members, employers, and
the state.

(6)
Any increase in the contribution rate required as the result of a failure of
the state or of an employer to make any contribution required by this section
shall be borne in full by the state or by that employer not making the
contribution.

(7)
The director shall notify all employers of any pending adjustment in the
required contribution rate and such increase shall be announced at least thirty
days prior to the effective date of the change.

(8)
Members' contributions required by this section shall be deducted from the
members basic salary each payroll period. The members contribution and the
employers contribution shall be remitted directly to the department within
fifteen days following the end of the calendar month during which the payroll period
ends. The state's contribution required by this section shall be transferred
to the plan II fund from the total contributions transferred by the state
treasurer under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070.))

"LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS' AND FIRE FIGHTERS'

RETIREMENT
SYSTEM PLAN 3"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1001. (1)
Sections 1001 through 1017 apply only to plan 3 members.

(2)
Plan 3 consists of two separate elements: (a) A defined benefit portion
covered under this subchapter; and (b) a defined contribution portion covered
under chapter 41.34 RCW.

(3)
Unless otherwise specified, all references to "plan 3" in this
subchapter refer to the defined benefit portion of plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1002. All
employees who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on
or after March 1, 2002, shall have the irrevocable option of membership in plan
2 or plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1003. (1) A
member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement allowance equal to
one percent of such member's average final compensation for each service credit
year.

(2)
The retirement allowance payable under section 1008 of this act to a member who
separates after having completed at least twenty service credit years shall be
increased by twenty-five one-hundredths of one percent, compounded for each
month from the date of separation to the date that the retirement allowance
commences.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1004. (1)
As used in this section, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the
context:

(a)
"Transfer period" means March 1, 2002, to March 1, 2003, the time
during which plan 2 members identified in subsection (2) of this section may
choose to irrevocably transfer from plan 2 to plan 3.

(b)
"Transfer amount" means the accumulated contributions present in a
member's savings fund on March 1, 2002, plus contributions made thereafter
until the actual date of transfer which is the basis for calculation of the
plan 2 to plan 3 transfer payment.

(c)
"Transfer payment date" means the date that the transfer payment will
be made into a member's individual account on the date specified for that
member's transfer period.

(d)
"Additional transfer payment date" means March 1, 2003, the date of
the additional transfer payment made according to subsection (3) of this
section.

(2)
Members that did not have the option of choosing plan 2 or plan 3 upon entry
into the retirement system, may irrevocably transfer to plan 3 during the
transfer period.

(3)
Members of plan 2 who are members of the retirement system prior to March 1,
2002, and choose to irrevocably transfer to plan 3 during the transfer period
shall have an additional payment made equivalent to their transfer amount that
is:

(a)
Increased by seventy-seven percent;

(b)
Increased by an annual rate of seven and one-half percent for the months
between March 1, 2002, and the actual month the member transferred to plan 3;
and

(c)
Deposited into the member's individual account on the additional transfer
payment date.

(4)
If a member who requests to transfer during their transfer period dies before
the additional transfer payment date, the additional transfer payment provided
in this section shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons,
trust, or organization the member nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the department.

(5)
The legislature reserves the right to modify or discontinue the right to an
additional payment under this section for any plan 2 members who have not
previously transferred to plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1005. Any
member or beneficiary eligible to receive a retirement allowance under the
provisions of sections 1008, 1009, or 1012 of this act shall be eligible to
commence receiving a retirement allowance after having filed written
application with the department.

(1)
Retirement allowances paid to members under the provisions of section 1008 of
this act shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately
following such member's separation from service.

(2)
Retirement allowances paid to vested members no longer in service, but
qualifying for such an allowance pursuant to section 1008 of this act, shall
accrue from the first day of the calendar month immediately following such
qualification.

(3)
Disability allowances paid to disabled members under the provisions of section
1009 of this act shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month
immediately following such member's separation from service for disability.

(4)
Retirement allowances paid as death benefits under the provisions of section
1012 of this act shall accrue from the first day of the calendar month
immediately following the member's death.

(5)
A person is separated from service on the date a person has terminated all
employment with an employer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1006. (1) A
member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer
shall continue to receive service credit as provided for under the provisions
of sections 1001 through 1017 of this act.

(2)
A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized
leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and
whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation
paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be
on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's
leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that
provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the
period of leave. The basic salary reported for a member who establishes
service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to
the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

(3)
Except as specified in subsection (6) of this section, a member shall be
eligible to receive a maximum of two years service credit during a member's
entire working career for those periods when a member is on an unpaid leave of
absence authorized by an employer. Such credit may be obtained only if the
member makes the employer, member, and state contributions plus interest as
determined by the department for the period of the authorized leave of absence
within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement whichever
comes sooner.

(4)
If a member fails to meet the time limitations of subsection (3) of this
section, the member may receive a maximum of two years of service credit during
a member's working career for those periods when a member is on unpaid leave of
absence authorized by an employer. This may be done by paying the amount
required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

(5)
For the purpose of subsection (3) of this section the contribution shall not
include the contribution for the unfunded supplemental present value as
required by section 1013 of this act. The contributions required shall be
based on the average of the member's basic salary at both the time the
authorized leave of absence was granted and the time the member resumed
employment.

(6)
A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the armed forces of the
United States shall be entitled to retirement system service credit for up to
five years of military service. This subsection shall be administered in a
manner consistent with the requirements of the federal uniformed services
employment and reemployment rights act.

(a)
The member qualifies for service credit under this subsection if:

(i)
Within ninety days of the member's honorable discharge from the United States
armed forces, the member applies for reemployment with the employer who
employed the member immediately prior to the member entering the United States
armed forces; and

(ii)
The member makes the employee contributions required under section 1013 of this
act within five years of resumption of service or prior to retirement,
whichever comes sooner; or

(iii)
Prior to retirement and not within ninety days of the member's honorable
discharge or five years of resumption of service the member pays the amount
required under RCW 41.50.165(2).

(b)
Upon receipt of member contributions under (a)(ii) of this subsection, the
department shall establish the member's service credit and shall bill the
employer and the state for their respective contributions required under
section 1013 of this act for the period of military service, plus interest as
determined by the department.

(c)
The contributions required under (a)(ii) of this subsection shall be based on
the compensation the member would have earned if not on leave, or if that
cannot be estimated with reasonable certainty, the compensation reported for
the member in the year prior to when the member went on military leave.

(7)
A member receiving benefits under Title 51 RCW who is not receiving benefits
under this chapter shall be deemed to be on unpaid, authorized leave of
absence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1007. (1)
Contributions on behalf of the employer paid by the employee to purchase plan 3
service credit shall be allocated to the defined benefit portion of plan 3 and
shall not be refundable when paid to the fund described in RCW 41.50.075(4).
Contributions on behalf of the employee shall be allocated to the member
account. If the member fails to meet the statutory time limitations to
purchase plan 3 service credit, it may be purchased under the provisions of RCW
41.50.165(2). One-half of the purchase payments under RCW 41.50.165(2), plus
interest, shall be allocated to the member's account.

(2)
No purchased plan 3 membership service may be credited until all payments
required of the member are made, with interest. Upon receipt of all payments
owed by the member, the department shall bill the employer for any
contributions, plus interest, required to purchase membership service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1008. (1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
section 1003 of this act.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of section
1003 of this act, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection
shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment
of age fifty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and
to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
section 1003 of this act, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age fifty-five.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1009. (1) A
member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for continued
employment by an employer as determined by the director shall be eligible to
receive an allowance under the provisions of sections 1001 through 1017 of this
act. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as
provided for in section 1009 of this act and shall have such allowance
actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-five.

(2)
Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall
be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as required by the
department. If such medical examinations reveal that such a member has
recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is no longer
entitled to benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be
canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service
rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if unable to
perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's request, in such other
like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which
the member is then able to perform. In no event shall a member previously
drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary
or rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position
held by the member at the date of the retirement for disability. If the
department determines that the member is able to return to service, the member
is entitled to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing shall
comply with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure
Act.

(3)
Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty
on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits under RCW 41.04.500 through
41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW 41.04.535 shall receive or continue to
receive service credit subject to the following:

(a)
No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(b)
No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or
is separated without leave of absence.

(c)
Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for
the period of the service credited.

(d)
Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the
department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(e)
State contributions shall be as provided in section 1013 of this act.

(f)
Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would
have received had the disability not occurred.

(g)
The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted for a
period not to exceed six consecutive months.

(h)
Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section
or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit
as a matter of contractual right.

(4)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to
his or her legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is
no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

(5)
Should the disability retirement allowance of any disability beneficiary be
canceled for any cause other than reentrance into service or retirement for
service, he or she shall be paid the excess, if any, of the accumulated
contributions at the time of retirement over all payments made on his or her
behalf under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1010.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, members shall be eligible for
industrial insurance as provided by Title 51 RCW, and shall be included in the
payroll of the employer for such purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1011. (1)
Any member who elects to transfer to plan 3 and has eligible unrestored
withdrawn contributions in plan 2, may restore such contributions under the
provisions of RCW 41.26.425 with interest as determined by the department. The
restored plan 2 service credit shall be automatically transferred to plan 3.
Restoration payments shall be transferred to the member account in plan 3. If
the member fails to meet the time limitations of RCW 41.26.425, they may
restore such contributions under the provisions of RCW 41.50.165(2). The
restored plan 2 service credit shall be automatically transferred to plan 3.
One-half of the restoration payments under RCW 41.50.165(2) plus interest shall
be allocated to the member's account.

(2)
Any member who elects to transfer to plan 3 may purchase plan 2 service credit
under RCW 41.26.425. Purchased plan 2 service credit shall be automatically
transferred to plan 3. Contributions on behalf of the employer paid by the
employee shall be allocated to the defined benefit portion of plan 3 and shall
not be refundable when paid to the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund described in
RCW 41.50.075(1). Contributions on behalf of the employee shall be allocated
to the member account. If the member fails to meet the time limitations of RCW
41.26.425, they may subsequently restore such contributions under the
provisions of RCW 41.50.165(2). Purchased plan 2 service credit shall be
automatically transferred to plan 3. One-half of the payments under RCW
41.50.165(2), plus interest, shall be allocated to the member's account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1012. (1)
Except as provided in RCW 11.07.010, if a member or a vested member who has not
completed at least ten years of service dies, the amount of the accumulated
contributions standing to such member's credit in the retirement system at the
time of such member's death, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee
upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed
under RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department. If there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the member's death,
such member's accumulated contributions standing to such member's credit in the
retirement system, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under
RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact
such spouse had been nominated by written designation, or if there be no such
surviving spouse, then to such member's legal representatives.

(2)
If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at
least ten years of service dies, the surviving spouse or eligible child or
children shall elect to receive either:

(a)
A retirement allowance computed as provided for in section 1008 of this act,
actuarially reduced by the amount of any lump sum benefit identified as owing
to an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670 and actuarially adjusted to reflect a joint and
one hundred percent survivor option under section 1015 of this act and if the
member was not eligible for normal retirement at the date of death a further
reduction as described in section 1008(2) of this act; if a surviving spouse who
is receiving a retirement allowance dies leaving a child or children of the
member under the age of majority, then such child or children shall continue to
receive an allowance in an amount equal to that which was being received by the
surviving spouse, share and share alike, until such child or children reach the
age of majority; if there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive an
allowance at the time of the member's death, such member's child or children
under the age of majority shall receive an allowance share and share alike
calculated as herein provided making the assumption that the ages of the spouse
and member were equal at the time of the member's death; or

(b)(i)
The member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to
an obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court
order filed under RCW 41.50.670; or

(ii)
If the member dies on or after July 25, 1993, one hundred fifty percent of the
member's accumulated contributions, less any amount identified as owing to an
obligee upon withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order
filed under RCW 41.50.670. Any accumulated contributions attributable to
restorations made under RCW 41.50.165(2) shall be refunded at one hundred percent.

(3)
If a member who is eligible for retirement or a member who has completed at
least ten years of service dies after October 1, 1977, and is not survived by a
spouse or an eligible child, then the accumulated contributions standing to the
member's credit, less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon
withdrawal of accumulated contributions pursuant to a court order filed under
RCW 41.50.670, shall be paid:

(a)
To an estate, a person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall
have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department; or

(b)
If there is no such designated person or persons still living at the time of
the member's death, then to the member's legal representatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1013. Port
districts established under Title 53 RCW and institutions of higher education
as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 shall contribute both the employer and state
shares of the cost of the retirement system for any of their employees who are
law enforcement officers. Institutions of higher education shall contribute
both the employer and the state shares of the cost of the retirement system for
any of their employees who are fire fighters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1014.
Beginning July 1, 1979, and every year thereafter, the department shall
determine the following information for each retired member or beneficiary
whose retirement allowance has been in effect for at least one year:

(1)
The original dollar amount of the retirement allowance;

(2)
The index for the calendar year prior to the effective date of the retirement
allowance, to be known as "index A";

(3)
The index for the calendar year prior to the date of determination, to be known
as "index B"; and

(4)
The ratio obtained when index B is divided by index A.

The
value of the ratio obtained shall be the annual adjustment to the original
retirement allowance and shall be applied beginning with the July payment. In
no event, however, shall the annual adjustment:

(a)
Produce a retirement allowance which is lower than the original retirement
allowance;

(b)
Exceed three percent in the initial annual adjustment; or

(c)
Differ from the previous year's annual adjustment by more than three percent.

For
the purposes of this section, "index" means, for any calendar year,
that year's average consumer price index‑-Seattle, Washington area for
urban wage earners and clerical workers, all items, compiled by the bureau of
labor statistics, United States department of labor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1015. (1)
Upon retirement for service as prescribed in section 1008 of this act or
disability retirement under section 1009 of this act, a member shall elect to
have the retirement allowance paid pursuant to the following options,
calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a)
Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement
allowance payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the
amount of such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement,
then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death,
then to the surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or
persons still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the
retiree's legal representative.

(b)
The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement
option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule
designates shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a designated
person. Such person shall be nominated by the member by written designation
duly executed and filed with the department at the time of retirement. The
options adopted by the department shall include, but are not limited to, a
joint and one hundred percent survivor option and a joint and fifty percent
survivor option.

(2)(a)
A member, if married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to
the option selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection. If a member is married and both the member and member's spouse do
not give written consent to an option under this section, the department will
pay the member a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit and record the
member's spouse as the beneficiary. Such benefit shall be calculated to be
actuarially equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b)
If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.50.790 has been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a
member's retirement:

(i)
The department shall honor the designation as if made by the member under
subsection (1) of this section; and

(ii)
The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a)
Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a
reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of
this subsection, if they meet the following conditions:

(i)
The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the
retiree; and

(ii)
The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated
beneficiary's death.

(b)
The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the
date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be
increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c)
The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:

(i)
One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection
converted to a percent;

(ii)
Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option
factor;

(iii)
The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of
July 1, 1998.

(d)
The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of
the month following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July
1, 1998, whichever comes last.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1016. (1)
No retiree under the provisions of plan 3 shall be eligible to receive such
retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible
position as defined in RCW 41.40.010 or 41.32.010, or as a law enforcement
officer or fire fighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030. If a retiree's benefits
have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated
when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to
be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially
recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

(2)
The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1017. (1)
On or after June 10, 1982, the director may pay a beneficiary, subject to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section, a lump sum payment in lieu of a
monthly benefit if the initial monthly benefit computed in accordance with
section 1003 of this act would be less than fifty dollars. The lump sum
payment shall be the greater of the actuarial equivalent of such monthly
benefits or an amount equal to the individual's accumulated contributions plus
accrued interest.

(2)
A beneficiary, subject to the provisions of subsection (5) of this section, who
is receiving a regular monthly benefit of less than fifty dollars may request,
in writing, to convert from a monthly benefit to a lump sum payment. If the
director approves the conversion, the calculation of the actuarial equivalent
of the total estimated regular benefit will be computed based on the
beneficiary's age at the time the benefit initially accrued. The lump sum
payment will be reduced to reflect any payments received on or after the
initial benefit accrual date.

(3)
Persons covered under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section may upon
returning to member status reinstate all previous service by depositing the
lump sum payment received, with interest as computed by the director, within
two years of returning to service or prior to re-retiring, whichever comes
first. In computing the amount due, the director shall exclude the accumulated
value of the normal payments the member would have received while in
beneficiary status if the lump sum payment had not occurred.

(4)
If a member fails to meet the time limitations set forth under subsection (3)
of this section, the member may reinstate all previous service under RCW
41.50.165(2) prior to retirement. The sum deposited shall exclude the
accumulated value of the normal payments the member would have received while
in beneficiary status if the lump sum payment had not occurred.

(5)
Only persons entitled to or receiving a service retirement allowance under
section 1003 of this act or an earned disability allowance under section 1009
of this act qualify for participation under this section.

(6)
It is the intent of the legislature that any member who receives a settlement
under this section shall be deemed to be retired from this system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1018. The
benefits provided pursuant to chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act)
are not provided to employees as a matter of contractual right prior to
September 1, 2001. The legislature retains the right to alter or abolish these
benefits at any time prior to September 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1019.
Sections 1001 through 1017 of this act are each added to chapter 41.26 RCW.

"EARLY
RETIREMENT REDUCTION FACTORS"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1101. (1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1102. (1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.32.760.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect
the difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the
attainment of age sixty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1103. (1) NORMAL
RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1104. (1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.26.420.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age fifty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty
service credit years and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and
to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per year to reflect the
difference in the number of years between age at retirement and the attainment
of age fifty-five.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1105. (1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1106. (1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.35.510;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance actuarially reduced to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

(3)
ALTERNATE EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least thirty
service credit years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at retirement
and the attainment of age sixty-five.

"MISCELLANEOUS"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1201. (1)
Except for sections 407 and 1101 through 1106 of this act, this act takes
effect September 1, 2001.

(2)
Section 407 of this act takes effect January 1, 2004.

(3)
Sections 1101 through 1107 of this act take effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1202.
Subchapter headings in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---