BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
person is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of anhydrous ammonia if the
person possesses anhydrous ammonia with the intent to use such anhydrous
ammonia in the manufacture of a controlled substance as defined in chapter
69.50 RCW. Violation of this section is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
person is guilty of the crime of unlawful storage of anhydrous ammonia if the
person possesses anhydrous ammonia in a container that is not approved by the
United States department of transportation to hold anhydrous ammonia.
Violation of this section is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Any
damages arising out of the unlawful possession of, storage of, or tampering
with anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment shall be the sole
responsibility of the unlawful possessor, storer, or tamperer. In no case
shall liability for damages arising out of the unlawful possession of, storage
of, or tampering with anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment extend
to the owner, installer, maintainer, designer, manufacturer, or seller of the
anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment, unless such damages arise out
of the owner's, installer's, maintainer's, designer's, manufacturer's, or
seller's acts or omissions that constitute negligent misconduct to abide by the
laws regarding anhydrous ammonia possession and storage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---