BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.33 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary of state may not approve the use of a voting device
or system where a voter casts his or her ballot by transmitting the ballot to
election officials over the Internet.

---
END ---