BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
national board for professional teaching standards has been certifying
outstanding teachers since 1987. During the 1999 certification process, twelve
teachers from Washington earned this prestigious certification. Because the
process for earning national board certification is the most rigorous advanced
certification process in the teaching profession, the legislature finds that
teachers achieving such certification should be rewarded for their
accomplishments. The legislature intends that those who obtain national board
certification receive a stipend for the duration of the certificate, which is
currently ten years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Subject to legislative funding, the superintendent of public instruction shall
offer an annual stipend in the amount of three thousand five hundred dollars
for each teacher who has attained certification by the national board for
professional teaching standards. A teacher is eligible to receive a stipend
annually for the duration of the certificate. The stipend is provided in
recognition of each participant's outstanding performance. The stipend shall
be provided subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
For any teacher who received certification from the national board prior to
September 1, 2000, the stipend shall begin on September 1, 2000, and shall be
awarded annually for the number of years remaining on the national board
certificate. However, if a teacher received a fifteen percent bonus as
provided in section 514(13), chapter 309, Laws of 1999, the teacher is not
eligible for a stipend until the next fiscal year.

(2)
Any teacher who enrolls in the program before September 1, 2000, and achieves
certification during the 2000-01 school year and any teacher who achieves
certification from the national board in subsequent years is eligible for the
stipend. If a teacher received a fifteen percent bonus as provided in section
514(13), chapter 309, Laws of 1999, the teacher is not eligible for a stipend
until the next fiscal year.

(3)
By December 31, 2003, and periodically thereafter, the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with the state board of
education and with the assistance of an advisory committee, shall review the
national board certification standards to determine whether additional
requirements to the national standards are needed to align the national
requirements with Washington state standards for teachers and students under
education reform.

(4)
By November 15, 2003, the Washington institute for public policy shall report
to the appropriate house of representatives and senate committees on the
results and accomplishments of the program. The report may include
recommendations for program continuation, modifications, or elimination.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2004.

---
END ---