BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that higher academic standards will not be achieved by
all students at the same rate. Some students start school fully ready to learn
and with good instruction and hard work are likely to meet the rigorous demands
of the fourth grade Washington assessment of student learning, while other
students will have a great deal of difficulty meeting high standards without
additional time and assistance beyond what is otherwise provided during the
regular school day for the regular one hundred eighty-day school year.

The
legislature intends to encourage school districts to offer summer school
opportunities for struggling students in the primary grades in order to provide
cost-effective strategies for helping all students achieve high standards on
the fourth grade assessment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall allocate funds to school
districts for summer school extended learning programs for struggling students
who have completed first, second, or third grade. The purpose of the programs
are to assist struggling students to meet the standard on the fourth grade
Washington assessment of student learning in reading, writing, and mathematics.

(2)
School districts shall determine the manner in which students may be selected
for participation in programs funded under this section. However, districts
shall include teacher referrals as a part of the process for identifying and
selecting students who will be eligible to participate. This section may not
be construed to require any student to attend summer school. Districts shall
encourage eligible struggling students and their parents to enroll the student
in the program.

(3)
The summer school programs funded under this section shall offer students at
least twenty days of instruction. School districts may determine the length of
time students may spend per day receiving instruction in the program. However,
for purposes of this act, a day for participating staff shall consist of at
least four hours instructing students and may include one hour of planning
time. The programs funded under this section shall be offered only during the
summer; however, a school using a year-round calendar may offer this program
during vacation and intercession periods to students who are enrolled in first,
second, or third grade. School districts may not expend funds provided under
this chapter for after-school or Saturday school programs.

(4)
Funds appropriated to implement the program in this section may be used for:

(a)
Participating instructional staff compensation;

(b)
Transportation of participating students; and

(c)
The cost of other activities and services essential to operating a full-day
program, such as food service and utilities.

(5)
Funds appropriated to implement the program in this section shall not be used
to supplant funding used to operate extended learning programs for struggling
students that a school district operated before May 1, 2000.

(6)
Instruction for programs under this section shall be provided primarily by
excellent certificated classroom teachers; however, excellent classified
instructional staff may provide up to one-fourth of the instruction conducted
under this program. Staff providing instruction for the summer school program
shall be determined by a local school district or school site selection process
that shall include, but need not be limited to adequate notice of positions, a
written application process, and an objective selection process. Instruction
shall be provided by staff who are trained in instructional strategies that
have been proven to be effective in helping the types of students being served
by the program to improve their reading, writing, or math achievement. The
manner of selecting the staff who may participate in the program is not subject
to collective bargaining.

(7)
The amount of funds allocated to school districts shall be determined by the
percentage of students scoring in level one on the reading or mathematics
component, or scoring at a level that does not meet the standard on the writing
component, of the 1999 Washington assessment of student learning multiplied by
the full-time equivalent student enrollment in grades kindergarten through
three.

(8)
The summer school extended learning programs funded under this section are not
part of basic education. Salaries paid to participating staff are not part of
basic education program salaries under RCW 28A.400.200.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---