BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.125.030 and 1999 c 45 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter and unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Core services" means treatment services for victims of sexual
assault including information and referral, crisis intervention, medical
advocacy, legal advocacy, support, ((and)) system coordination, and
prevention for potential victims of sexual assault.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Law enforcement agencies" means police and sheriff's departments of
this state.

(4)
"Personal representative" means a friend, relative, attorney, or
employee or volunteer from a community sexual assault program or specialized
treatment service provider.

(5)
"Rape crisis center" means a community-based social service agency
which provides services to victims of sexual assault.

(6)
"Community sexual assault program" means a community-based social
service agency that is qualified to provide and provides core services to
victims of sexual assault.

(7)
"Sexual assault" means one or more of the following:

(a)
Rape or rape of a child;

(b)
Assault with intent to commit rape or rape of a child;

(c)
Incest or indecent liberties;

(d)
Child molestation;

(e)
Sexual misconduct with a minor;

(f)
Custodial sexual misconduct;

(g)
Crimes with a sexual motivation; or

(h)
An attempt to commit any of the aforementioned offenses.

(8)
"Specialized services" means treatment services for victims of sexual
assault including support groups, therapy, and specialized sexual
assault medical examination((, and prevention education to potential victims
of sexual assault)).

(9) "Victim" means any person who suffers physical and/or
mental anguish as a proximate result of a sexual assault.

---
END ---