BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that a large and growing body of research supports the
premise that all students learn more, perform better, and exhibit more
responsible and respectful behavior in schools where they are known personally
and as individuals by the adults in the school.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definition in this section applies throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

"Personalized
school" means a school with each of the following characteristics:

(1)
The school enrolls no more than two hundred seventy-five students if it is an
elementary school, or no more than four hundred forty students if it is a
middle, junior high, or high school with three or four grade levels;

(2)
Every teacher at the school works with every student assigned to his or her
classroom for a minimum of two consecutive years;

(3)
The school develops and implements a plan for high levels of parental
involvement in which parents are directly engaged in supporting their child's
learning and in which parents play a significant role in school governance;

(4)
The school develops a governance plan which involves an administrator,
teachers, parents and other community members, and, if it is a secondary
school, the students; and

(5)
The school develops a philosophy and mission which focuses on the
personalization of learning and academic and personal success for each
student. The school embodies its philosophy and mission in its daily operations
and activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
personalized schools research and development program is established to study
the extent to which personalized schools can result in increased academic and
personal achievement for students in public schools. The program is intended
to determine the capacity of personalized schools to promote higher academic
achievement, as measured by performance on the Washington assessment of student
learning, and personal achievement, as measured by retention and graduation
rates, student behavior, student, parent, and teacher satisfaction, and other
relevant data. The legislature intends for this pilot program to operate five
full school years, to include evaluation of personalized schools, and to
publish and disseminate the results of the project's research and findings for
the benefit of the entire state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a process for school
districts to apply for grant funding to participate in the personalized schools
research and development program. School districts may apply on behalf of
existing schools that intend to meet the program requirements or on behalf of
proposed new schools to be created in order to meet the program requirements.
In order to be eligible to participate in the program, a school must have its
own leadership, staff, and governance, but may share a common school building
with another school in the district. The school-within-a-school model program
and the academic house model program may not be employed by schools
participating in the program established by this chapter.

(2)
The superintendent shall appoint a selection committee to review applications
and, to the extent funding is provided for this program, select up to fifty
schools to participate from among qualified applicants. The selection
committee shall include one member of the superintendent's office, two teachers
from schools in a district not applying for a grant under the program, one
administrator from a school district which has not applied for a grant under
the program, one representative from an institution of higher education, and
two additional members.

(3)
The selection committee shall attempt to select approximately equal numbers of
schools enrolling elementary school students, middle or junior high school
students, and high school students. The selection committee shall make every
possible effort to award grants to at least nine schools in each of the three
categories of school: Elementary, middle or junior high, and high school. The
selection committee shall also endeavor to balance grants among schools serving
urban, suburban, and rural communities and to achieve geographic balance in
grant awards to include all regions of the state.

(4)
The selection committee shall determine the grant award recipients by December
10, 2000, and inform all applicants of its decisions by December 18, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1) Applications
for grants under this chapter must be submitted to the superintendent by
November 1, 2000.

(2)
Each application on behalf of an existing school must include:

(a)
A description of how the school currently satisfies all of the conditions set
forth in the definition of a personalized school, as provided in section 2 of
this act, or a description of how the school plans to satisfy those conditions
by September 1, 2001;

(b)
A statement of the applicant school's understanding of the value of personalization
in education;

(c)
A letter from the applying school district affirming the commitment of the
board of directors of the district and the district superintendent to maintain
the applicant school as a personalized school, as defined in section 2 of this
act, for the entire five-year duration of this research and development
program, if the school is selected to receive a grant to participate in the
program; and

(d)
A letter from the applicant school's principal articulating his or her commitment
to the personalized schools research and development program.

(3)
Each application on behalf of a proposed school to be created for purposes of
the personalized schools program must include:

(a)
A description of how the proposed school will satisfy all the conditions set
forth in the definition of a personalized school, as defined in section 2 of
this act;

(b)
A statement of the understanding of the applicant for the proposed school
regarding the value of personalization in education;

(c)
A letter from the applying school district affirming the commitment of the
board of directors of the district and the district superintendent to maintain
the proposed school as a personalized school, as defined in section 2 of this
act, for the entire five-year duration of this research and development
program, if the application for a proposed school is selected to receive a
grant to participate in the program; and

(d)
A letter from the individual who would become the proposed school's principal
articulating his or her commitment to the personalized schools research and
development program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The superintendent shall award start-up grants for selected schools by January
15, 2001. Subject to available funding, each personalized school shall receive
a thirty-five thousand dollar start-up grant.

(a)
Up to fifteen thousand dollars of the start-up grant may be used for
facilities.

(b)
The remainder of the start-up grant must be expended for needs directly related
to teaching and learning, with a focus on professional development. This may
not include purchase of material or curricula, unless such materials or
curricula are necessary for the conduct of professional development activities.

(2)
Subject to available funding, by July 1, 2001, the superintendent shall award
each personalized school a grant of twenty-five thousand dollars for the first
year of operation of the personalized school. Subject to available funding, by
July 1, 2002, the superintendent shall award each personalized school a grant
of fifteen thousand dollars for the second year of operation of the
personalized school. Subject to available funding, by July 1, 2003, the
superintendent shall award each personalized school a grant of eight thousand
dollars for the third year of operation of the personalized school.

(3)
Schools selected to participate in the personalized schools program shall begin
planning activities in January 2001 and shall begin their first year of
operation within the personalized school program in September 2001.
Participating schools shall continue to operate as personalized schools at
least through the end of the 2005-06 school year. All funds awarded for
personalized schools under this chapter must be under the control of the
personalized school and may be spent according to the school's discretion,
subject to the requirements of all other applicable laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall develop an assessment system for
personalized schools. The assessment system must include the Washington
assessment of student learning, information concerning student behavior, data
relating to the perceptions that students, parents, and educators have about
personalized schools, and other information that may be relevant to determining
the effectiveness of personalized schools. Up to thirty thousand dollars of
the appropriation provided for this program in the 2001 fiscal year may be used
for development of the assessment system created pursuant to this section.

(2)
The superintendent shall designate a program staff member within the agency to
manage the assessment development activities and to provide technical
assistance to personalized schools. Subject to available funding, the
designated staff member shall also organize an annual institute for
representatives of each personalized school to gain additional professional
development and provide opportunities to learn from the experiences of other
personalized schools.

(3)
The superintendent may require personalized schools to collect and report
information the superintendent deems necessary for an adequate evaluation of
the personalized schools pilot program. The superintendent shall compile and
analyze information on the results and effectiveness of the personalized school
pilot program and report its findings to the legislature and to the public
annually.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
superintendent may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act expire December 31, 2006.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. The
sum of one million eight hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of
public instruction for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---