BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 53.54 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that aircraft noise at large airports negatively affects the
education of children at schools located near the airports. It interferes with
speech, distracts students and teachers, makes it more difficult to
concentrate, and generally interferes with the education process. The
legislature finds that the optional noise abatement provisions in this chapter,
first enacted in 1974, have not resulted in adequate aircraft noise abatement
for many schools located near large airports owned by port districts. The
legislature intends to mandate that port districts operating a large airport,
whether currently existing or created in the future, provide resources for
noise abatement to schools impacted by large airports. The revenues provided
under this act are intended to supplement other resources available to the port
district, including federal funds and operating revenue that can be used for
noise abatement.

Sec.
2. RCW
53.54.010 and 1974 ex.s. c 121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A port district operating an airport ((serving more than twenty scheduled
jet aircraft flights per day)) may undertake any of the programs or
combinations of such programs, as authorized by this chapter, for the purpose
of alleviating and abating the impact of jet aircraft noise on areas
surrounding such airport. A port district may assist public schools in
paying for, in addition to direct expenses, reasonable indirect costs resulting
from noise abatements necessitated by aircraft noise from an airport operated
by the district, including bringing the buildings up to code to obtain a
building permit.

(2)
A port district with a population of one million or more operating an airport
serving more than twenty scheduled jet aircraft flights per day must undertake
a program or programs for alleviating and abating the impact of jet aircraft
noise on areas surrounding the airport, particularly area schools.

Sec.
3. RCW
53.54.030 and 1993 c 150 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter, except with respect to schools, in
developing a remedial program, the port commission may utilize one or more of
the following programs:

(1)
Acquisition of property or property rights within the impacted area, which
shall be deemed necessary to accomplish a port purpose. The port district may
purchase such property or property rights by time payment notwithstanding the
time limitations provided for in RCW 53.08.010. The port district may mortgage
or otherwise pledge any such properties acquired to secure such transactions.
The port district may assume any outstanding mortgages.

(2)
Transaction assistance programs, including assistance with real estate fees and
mortgage assistance, and other neighborhood remedial programs as compensation
for impacts due to aircraft noise and noise associated conditions. Any such
programs shall be in connection with properties located within an impacted area
and shall be provided upon terms and conditions as the port district shall
determine appropriate.

(3)
Programs of soundproofing structures located within an impacted area. Such
programs may be executed without regard to the ownership, provided the owner
waives damages and conveys an easement for the operation of aircraft, and for
noise and noise associated conditions therewith, to the port district.

(4)
Mortgage insurance of private owners of lands or improvements within such noise
impacted area where such private owners are unable to obtain mortgage insurance
solely because of noise impact. In this regard, the port district may
establish reasonable regulations and may impose reasonable conditions and
charges upon the granting of such mortgage insurance: PROVIDED, That such fees
and charges shall at no time exceed fees established for federal mortgage
insurance programs for like service.

(5)
An individual property may be provided benefits by the port district under each
of the programs described in subsections (1) through (4) of this section.
However, an individual property may not be provided benefits under any one of
these programs more than once, unless the property is subjected to increased
aircraft noise or differing aircraft noise impacts that would have afforded
different levels of mitigation, even if the property owner had waived all
damages and conveyed a full and unrestricted easement.

(6)
Management of all lands, easements, or development rights acquired, including
but not limited to the following:

(a)
Rental of any or all lands or structures acquired;

(b)
Redevelopment of any such lands for any economic use consistent with airport
operations, local zoning and the state environmental policy;

(c)
Sale of such properties for cash or for time payment and subjection of such
property to mortgage or other security transaction: PROVIDED, That any such
sale shall reserve to the port district by covenant an unconditional right of
easement for the operation of all aircraft and for all noise or noise
conditions associated therewith.

(7)
A property shall be considered within the impacted area if any part thereof is
within the impacted area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 53.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A port district operating an airport may undertake a program or programs to pay
for the direct costs of noise abatement in schools in an impact area.

(2)
For remedial programs for public schools as authorized or required under RCW
53.54.010, a port district operating an airport may expend money to assist
school districts in constructing, improving, or repairing school facilities
when the construction, improvement, or repair is in any way related to or
necessitated by noise abatement. However, a port district with a population of
one million or more operating an airport serving more than twenty scheduled jet
aircraft flights per day must expend money to assist school districts in
constructing, improving, or repairing public school facilities when the
construction, improvement, or repair is in any way related to or necessitated
by noise abatement. For public schools, the noise abatement program must be
completed to a standard similar to the noise and air quality standards that
exist in similar schools outside the impacted area. If federal funds or
certain airport revenue under federal law, based on an attorney general
opinion, cannot be used for some of the assistance for schools authorized or
required under this section or RCW 53.54.010, the port must use other revenues
or moneys, including property taxes, that are not specifically restricted and
the use of which does not impair contracts or obligations in existence on the
effective date of this act.

(3)
A school shall be considered within the impacted area if any part of the school
is within the impacted area.

Sec.
5. RCW
53.54.040 and 1974 ex.s. c 121 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
port district may establish a fund to be utilized in effectuating the intent of
this chapter. The port district may finance such fund by: The proceeds of any
grants or loans made by federal agencies; rentals, charges and other revenues
as may be generated by programs authorized by this chapter, airport revenues;
and revenue bonds based upon such revenues. The port district may also finance
such fund, as necessary, in whole or in part, with the proceeds of general
obligation bond issues of not more than one-eighth of one percent of the value
of taxable property in the port district: PROVIDED, That any such bond issue
shall be in addition to bonds authorized by RCW 53.36.030: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That any such general obligation bond issue may be subject to referendum by
petition as provided by county charter, the same as if it were a county
ordinance. For public schools, the port district may use revenues from
property taxes under RCW 53.36.020.

Sec.
6. RCW
53.36.020 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A district may raise revenue by levy of an annual tax not to exceed forty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value against the assessed valuation of
the taxable property in such port district for general port purposes, including
the establishment of a capital improvement fund for future capital
improvements, except that any levy for the payment of the principal and
interest of the general bonded indebtedness of the port district shall be in
excess of any levy made by the port district under the forty-five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value limitation. The levy shall be made and
taxes collected in the manner provided for the levy and collection of taxes in
school districts of the first class.

(2)
A port district with a population of one million or more operating an airport
serving more than twenty scheduled jet aircraft flights per day must use at
least ten percent of the taxes collected annually under this section for unmet
noise abatement needs for public schools under chapter 53.54 RCW, or as much of
the amount under this subsection that does not directly impair contracts or
obligations existing on the effective date of this act. This subsection does
not limit the amount a port district may spend for noise abatement programs,
and is not intended to define noise abatement needs.

Sec.
7. RCW
14.08.020 and 1961 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
acquisition of any lands for the purpose of establishing airports or other air
navigation facilities; the acquisition of airport protection privileges; the
acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement,
maintenance, equipment and operation of airports and other air navigation
facilities, the mitigation of noise impacts arising from the operation of
the airport facilities and aircraft using the airport facilities, and the
exercise of any other powers herein granted to municipalities, are hereby
declared to be public, governmental, county and municipal functions, exercised
for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity, and such lands and other
property, easements and privileges acquired and used by such municipalities in
the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are hereby
declared to be acquired and used for public, governmental, county and municipal
purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

Sec.
8. RCW
14.08.100 and 1959 c 231 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing bodies having power to appropriate moneys within the
municipalities in this state for the purpose of acquiring, establishing,
constructing, enlarging, improving, maintaining, equipping or operating
airports and other air navigation facilities under the provisions of this
chapter, including the mitigation of noise impacts arising from the airport
and its operations, are hereby authorized to appropriate and cause to be
raised by taxation or otherwise in such municipalities, moneys sufficient to
carry out therein the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
The revenues obtained from the ownership, control and operation of any such
airport or other air navigation facility shall be used, first, to finance the
maintenance and operating expenses thereof, and, second, to make payments of
interest on and current principal requirements of any outstanding bonds or
certificates issued for the acquisition or improvement thereof, and to make
payment of interest on any mortgage heretofore made. Revenues in excess of the
foregoing requirements may be applied to finance the extension or improvement
of the airport or other air navigation facilities, and to construct, maintain,
lease, and otherwise finance buildings and facilities for industrial or
commercial use: PROVIDED, That such portion of the airport property to be
devoted to said industrial or commercial use be first found by the governing
body to be not required for airport purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
When a port district with a population of at least one million and serving more
than twenty scheduled jet aircraft flights per day and a school district cannot
agree on a method to mitigate noise from airplane operations as required under
section 4(2) of this act, the dispute shall be resolved as follows:

(a)
The port district shall pay for all direct noise abatement costs, and half of
all indirect noise abatement costs;

(b)
The school district shall pay at least twenty-five percent of indirect noise
abatement costs; and

(c)
The state may provide up to twenty-five percent of indirect expenses. If the
state has not appropriated any funds or sufficient funds for purposes of noise
abatement in public schools, the school district shall pay the difference up to
half the indirect costs.

(2)(a)
If the port district with a population of at least one million and serving more
than twenty scheduled jet aircraft flights per day and a school district cannot
agree on the costs of the noise abatement or what is a direct expense and what
is an indirect expense, the port and the school district shall refer the matter
or matters to arbitration. The arbitration process shall be administered by
the Thurston county superior court. The arbitration process shall begin upon
the application of either a port or school district to the Thurston county
superior court, with notice to the other party. The arbitrators shall be
chosen as follows:

(i)
One chosen by the port district;

(ii)
One chosen by the school district; and

(iii)
One chosen by the two arbitrators appointed under (a)(i) and (ii) of this
subsection. If the two arbitrators cannot agree on a third, the court shall
appoint the third arbitrator.

(b)
RCW 7.04.070, 7.04.080, 7.04.090, 7.04.100, 7.04.110, 7.04.120, 7.04.140, and 7.04.170
shall apply to arbitration under this subsection (2).

(c)
The court shall set a reasonable time, not to exceed ninety days unless the
court makes a finding that more time is necessary, for the arbitrators to reach
a decision. If the arbitrators cannot reach a decision within the time
established by the court, the court shall decide the matter or matters in
dispute.

(d)
The arbitration costs under this subsection (2) shall be paid for as follows:
The port district shall pay three-fourths and the school district one-fourth.

(e)
The decision of the arbitrators, or the court if the arbitrators cannot reach a
decision, is final once it is confirmed by the court and there is no right of
appeal of a decision under this subsection (2).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---