BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.05.060 and 1991 c 3 s 308 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
local board of health shall have supervision over all matters pertaining to the
preservation of the life and health of the people within its jurisdiction and
shall:

(1)
Enforce through the local health officer or the administrative officer
appointed under RCW 70.05.040, if any, the public health statutes of the state
and rules promulgated by the state board of health and the secretary of health;

(2)
Supervise the maintenance of all health and sanitary measures for the
protection of the public health within its jurisdiction;

(3)
Enact such local rules and regulations as are necessary in order to preserve,
promote and improve the public health and provide for the enforcement thereof:
PROVIDED, That each local rule or regulation regarding communal meals where the
food consumed is prepared or purchased by the participants and consumed
primarily by the participants, and food banks and donations to food banks, may
not take effect until ratified by the legislative authority of each county,
city, and town represented on the local board of health;

(4)
Provide for the control and prevention of any dangerous, contagious or
infectious disease within the jurisdiction of the local health department;

(5)
Provide for the prevention, control and abatement of nuisances detrimental to
the public health;

(6)
Provide public education on healthful and sanitary: (a) Preparation of food
for communal meals, and (b) operation of food banks;

(7)
Make such reports to the state board of health through the local health officer
or the administrative officer as the state board of health may require; and

(((7))) (8) Establish fee schedules for issuing or
renewing licenses or permits or for such other services as are authorized by
the law and the rules of the state board of health: PROVIDED, That such fees
for services shall not exceed the actual cost of providing any such services.

---
END ---