BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.12.005 and 1998 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
The term "department" means the department of labor and industries.

(2)
The term "director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's designated representative.

(3)
The term "employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and employs one
or more employees and for the purposes of RCW 49.12.270 through 49.12.295 and
49.12.450 also includes the state, any state institution, any state agency,
political subdivisions of the state, and any municipal corporation or
quasi-municipal corporation.

(4)
The term "employee" means an employee who is employed in the business
of the employee's employer whether by way of manual labor or otherwise.

(5)
The term "conditions of labor" shall mean and include the conditions
of rest and meal periods for employees including provisions for personal
privacy, practices, methods and means by or through which labor or services are
performed by employees and includes bona fide physical qualifications in
employment, but shall not include conditions of labor otherwise governed by
statutes and rules and regulations relating to industrial safety and health
administered by the department.

(6)
For the purpose of chapter 16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess. a minor is defined to
be a person of either sex under the age of eighteen years.

(7)
"Staffing agency" means an employer who employs workers for the
purpose of rendering services to third persons who supervise and direct their
work.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each staffing agency shall include a written notification with each payment of
wages to its employees specifying the rate paid, or payable, to the staffing
agency by, or on behalf of, the recipient of the employee's services for the
work performed by the employee, or for any services rendered by the staffing
agency with respect to the employee.

(2) Any temporary service contractor that violates subsection (1)
of this section is subject to a civil penalty in the amount of two hundred
fifty dollars per employee per violation for the initial citation, and five
hundred dollars per employee per violation for each subsequent citation. The
civil penalties provided for in this section are in addition to any other
penalty provided by law. In enforcing this section, the director may not
penalize a temporary service contractor for a first violation that the director
determines was due to an inadvertent mistake or clerical error.

---
END ---