BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.17.020 and 1997 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
The term "agriculture" means farming and includes, but is not limited
to:

(a)
The cultivation and tillage of the soil;

(b)
Dairying;

(c)
The production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural or
horticultural commodity;

(d)
The raising of livestock, bees, fur-bearing animals, or poultry; and

(e)
Any practices performed by a farmer or on a farm, incident to or in connection
with such farming operations, including but not limited to preparation for
market and delivery to:

(i)
Storage;

(ii)
Market; or

(iii)
Carriers for transportation to market.

The
term "agriculture" does not mean a farmer's processing for sale or
handling for sale a commodity or product grown or produced by a person other
than the farmer or the farmer's employees.

(2)
The term "director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or his designated representative.

(3)
The term "department" means the department of labor and industries.

(4)
The term "employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and employs one
or more employees or who contracts with one or more persons, the essence of
which is the personal labor of such person or persons and includes the state,
counties, cities, and all municipal corporations, public corporations, political
subdivisions of the state, and charitable organizations: PROVIDED, That any
person, partnership, or business entity not having employees, and who is
covered by the industrial insurance act shall be considered both an employer
and an employee.

(5)
The term "employee" means an employee of an employer who is employed
in the business of his employer whether by way of manual labor or otherwise and
every person in this state who is engaged in the employment of or who is
working under an independent contract the essence of which is his personal
labor for an employer under this chapter whether by way of manual labor or
otherwise.

(6)
The term "person" means one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, corporations, business trusts, legal representatives, or any
organized group of persons.

(7)
The term "safety and health standard" means a standard which requires
the adoption or use of one or more practices, means, methods, operations, or
processes reasonably necessary or appropriate to provide safe or healthful
employment and places of employment.

(8)
The term "workplace" means any plant, yard, premises, room, or other
place where an employee or employees are employed for the performance of labor
or service over which the employer has the right of access or control, and
includes, but is not limited to, all workplaces covered by industrial insurance
under Title 51 RCW, as now or hereafter amended. The term
"workplace" does not include an employee's residence.

(9) The term "working day" means a calendar day, except
Saturdays, Sundays, and all legal holidays as set forth in RCW 1.16.050, as now
or hereafter amended, and for the purposes of the computation of time within
which an act is to be done under the provisions of this chapter, shall be
computed by excluding the first working day and including the last working day.

---
END ---