BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.220 and 1994 c 271 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an offender has completed the requirements of the sentence, the secretary
of the department or the secretary's designee shall notify the sentencing
court, which shall discharge the offender and provide the offender with a
certificate of discharge.

(2)
An offender who is not convicted of a violent offense or a sex offense and is
sentenced to a term involving community supervision may be considered for a
discharge of sentence by the sentencing court prior to the completion of
community supervision, provided that the offender has completed at least
one-half of the term of community supervision and has met all other sentence
requirements.

(3)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the discharge
shall have the effect of restoring all civil rights lost by operation of law
upon conviction, and the certificate of discharge shall so state. Nothing in
this section prohibits the use of an offender's prior record for purposes of
determining sentences for later offenses as provided in this chapter. Nothing
in this section affects or prevents use of the offender's prior conviction in a
later criminal prosecution either as an element of an offense or for
impeachment purposes. A certificate of discharge is not based on a finding of
rehabilitation.

(4)
Unless otherwise ordered by the sentencing court, a certificate of discharge
shall not terminate the offender's obligation to comply with an order issued
pursuant to chapter 9A.46 or 10.14 RCW that excludes or prohibits the offender
from having contact or coming within a set distance of any specified person or
location that was contained in the judgment and sentence. An offender who
violates such an order after a certificate of discharge has been issued shall
be subject to prosecution according to the chapter under which the order was
originally issued.

(5)
Upon release from custody, the offender may apply to the department for
counseling and help in adjusting to the community. This voluntary help may be
provided for up to one year following the release from custody.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW
9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW
9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with
forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a
narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule
I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW
9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of
minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW
9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1
(RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW
9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property
for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A
Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW
9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct
1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Foreign
Protection Order Violation (RCW

26.52.070
(3) and (4))

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW ((88.12.032)) 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
((88.12.155(3))) 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled
Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile
Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun
or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2
(RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation
(RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness
(RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or
threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a
Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for
Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW
69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a
Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.390 and 1999 c 330 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside the standard
range should be imposed in accordance with RCW 9.94A.120(2), the sentence is
subject to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.210(4).

The
following are illustrative factors which the court may consider in the exercise
of its discretion to impose an exceptional sentence. The following are
illustrative only and are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional
sentences.

(1)
Mitigating Circumstances

(a)
To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing participant,
aggressor, or provoker of the incident.

(b)
Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good faith effort to compensate,
the victim of the criminal conduct for any damage or injury sustained.

(c)
The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion
insufficient to constitute a complete defense but which significantly affected
his or her conduct.

(d)
The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was induced by others
to participate in the crime.

(e)
The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct
or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, was
significantly impaired (voluntary use of drugs or alcohol is excluded).

(f)
The offense was principally accomplished by another person and the defendant
manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of
the victim.

(g)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of the purpose of this
chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(h)
The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of
physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a
response to that abuse.

(2)
Aggravating Circumstances

(a)
The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty to the victim.

(b)
The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the current offense
was particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to extreme youth,
advanced age, disability, or ill health.

(c)
The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant knew that the
victim of the current offense was pregnant.

(d)
The current offense was a major economic offense or series of offenses, so
identified by a consideration of any of the following factors:

(i)
The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;

(ii)
The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss substantially
greater than typical for the offense;

(iii)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time; or

(iv)
The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or fiduciary
responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current offense.

(e)
The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to trafficking in controlled
substances, which was more onerous than the typical offense of its statutory
definition: The presence of ANY of the following may identify a current
offense as a major VUCSA:

(i)
The current offense involved at least three separate transactions in which
controlled substances were sold, transferred, or possessed with intent to do
so;

(ii)
The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or transfer of
controlled substances in quantities substantially larger than for personal use;

(iii)
The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled substances for use
by other parties;

(iv)
The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender to have occupied a
high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;

(v)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time or involved a broad geographic area of
disbursement; or

(vi)
The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate the commission of
the current offense, including positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary
responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

(f)
The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.127.

(g)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of the same victim
under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple incidents over a
prolonged period of time.

(h)
The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and
one or more of the following was present:

(i)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or
sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged
period of time;

(ii)
The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's
minor children under the age of eighteen years; ((or))

(iii)
The offender's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim; or

(iv)
In committing the offense, the offender violated the provisions of a no-contact
order issued under chapter 9A.46 or 10.99 RCW, a protection order issued under
chapter 10.14 or 26.50 RCW, a foreign protection order as defined in chapter
26.52 RCW, or a restraining order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or
26.44 RCW that restrained or enjoined the offender from contacting or going
within a set distance of a victim or location or excluded the offender from a
specified location.

(i)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of
this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(j)
The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored foreign criminal
history results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light
of the purpose of this chapter as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(k)
The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of rape.

(l)
The defendant knew that the victim of the current offense was a youth who was
not residing with a legal custodian and the defendant established or promoted
the relationship for the primary purpose of victimization.

Sec.
4. RCW
9A.46.040 and 1985 c 288 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Because of the likelihood of repeated harassment directed at those who have
been victims of harassment in the past, when any defendant charged with a crime
involving harassment is released from custody before trial on bail or personal
recognizance, the court authorizing the release may require that the defendant:

(a)
Stay ((away from the)) a specified distance of no more than one
thousand feet away from a home, school, business, or place of employment of
the victim or victims of the alleged offense or from any other location,
as shall be specifically named by the court in the order; and

(b)
Refrain from coming within a specified distance of not less than one hundred
or more than five hundred feet from a specified victim or from contacting,
intimidating, threatening, or otherwise interfering with the victim or victims
of the alleged offense and such other persons, including but not limited to
members of the family or household of the victim, as shall be specifically
named by the court in the order.

(2)(a)
An intentional violation of a court order issued under this section is a
misdemeanor. The written order releasing the defendant shall contain the
court's directives and shall bear the legend: Violation of this order is a
criminal offense under chapter 9A.46 RCW.

(b)
A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim by the clerk of
the court.

Sec.
5. RCW
10.14.080 and 1995 c 246 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon filing a petition for a civil antiharassment protection order under this
chapter, the petitioner may obtain an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection
order. An ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order may be granted
with or without notice upon the filing of an affidavit which, to the
satisfaction of the court, shows reasonable proof of unlawful harassment of the
petitioner by the respondent and that great or irreparable harm will result to
the petitioner if the temporary antiharassment protection order is not granted.

(2)
An ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order shall be effective for a
fixed period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if the court has
permitted service by publication under RCW 10.14.085. The ex parte order may
be reissued. A full hearing, as provided in this chapter, shall be set for not
later than fourteen days from the issuance of the temporary order or not later
than twenty-four days if service by publication is permitted. Except as
provided in RCW 10.14.070 and 10.14.085, the respondent shall be personally
served with a copy of the ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and
notice of the date set for the hearing.

(3)
At the hearing, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that
unlawful harassment exists, a civil antiharassment protection order shall issue
prohibiting such unlawful harassment.

(4)
An order issued under this chapter shall be effective for not more than one
year unless the court finds that the respondent is likely to resume unlawful
harassment of the petitioner when the order expires. If so, the court may
enter an order for a fixed time exceeding one year or may enter a permanent
antiharassment protection order. The court shall not enter an order that is
effective for more than one year if the order restrains the respondent from
contacting the respondent's minor children. This limitation is not applicable
to civil antiharassment protection orders issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or
26.26 RCW. If the petitioner seeks relief for a period longer than one year on
behalf of the respondent's minor children, the court shall advise the
petitioner that the petitioner may apply for renewal of the order as provided
in this chapter or if appropriate may seek relief pursuant to chapter 26.09 or
26.10 RCW.

(5)
At any time within the three months before the expiration of the order, the
petitioner may apply for a renewal of the order by filing a petition for
renewal. The petition for renewal shall state the reasons why the petitioner
seeks to renew the protection order. Upon receipt of the petition for renewal,
the court shall order a hearing which shall be not later than fourteen days
from the date of the order. Except as provided in RCW 10.14.085, personal
service shall be made upon the respondent not less than five days before the
hearing. If timely service cannot be made the court shall set a new hearing
date and shall either require additional attempts at obtaining personal service
or permit service by publication as provided by RCW 10.14.085. If the court
permits service by publication, the court shall set the new hearing date not
later than twenty-four days from the date of the order. If the order expires
because timely service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte order
of protection as provided in this section. The court shall grant the petition
for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence
that the respondent will not resume harassment of the petitioner when the order
expires. The court may renew the protection order for another fixed time
period or may enter a permanent order as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.

(6)
The court, in granting an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection order or
a civil antiharassment protection order, shall have broad discretion to grant
such relief as the court deems proper, including an order:

(a)
Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to contact the petitioner;

(b)
Restraining the respondent from making any attempts to keep the petitioner
under surveillance;

(c)
((Requiring the respondent to stay a stated distance from the petitioner's
residence and workplace; and

(d))) Restraining
the respondent from coming within a specified distance of no more than one
thousand feet from the petitioner's residence, workplace, or other specified
location;

(d)
Restraining the respondent from coming within a specified distance of not less
than one hundred or more than five hundred feet from the petitioner; and

(e)
Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(7)
A petitioner may not obtain an ex parte temporary antiharassment protection
order against a respondent if the petitioner has previously obtained two such
ex parte orders against the same respondent but has failed to obtain the
issuance of a civil antiharassment protection order unless good cause for such
failure can be shown.

(8)
The court order shall specify the date an order issued pursuant to subsections
(4) and (5) of this section expires if any. The court order shall also state
whether the court issued the protection order following personal service or
service by publication and whether the court has approved service by
publication of an order issued under this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
10.31.100 and 1999 c 184 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

A
police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed or
is committing a felony shall have the authority to arrest the person without a
warrant. A police officer may arrest a person without a warrant for committing
a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor only when the offense is committed in the
presence of the officer, except as provided in subsections (1) through (10) of
this section.

(1)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor, involving physical harm or
threats of harm to any person or property or the unlawful taking of property or
involving the use or possession of cannabis, or involving the acquisition,
possession, or consumption of alcohol by a person under the age of twenty-one
years under RCW 66.44.270, or involving criminal trespass under RCW 9A.52.070
or 9A.52.080, shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(2)
A police officer shall arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that:

(a)
An order has been issued of which the person has knowledge under ((RCW
10.99.040(2), 10.99.050, 26.09.050, 26.09.060, 26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.44.063,))
chapter 10.99, 26.09, 26.10, 26.26 ((RCW, or chapter)), 26.44,
or 26.50 RCW, or a foreign protection order as defined in chapter 26.52
RCW, restraining the person and the person has violated the terms of the
order restraining the person from acts or threats of violence or restraining
the person from going onto the grounds of or entering a residence, workplace,
school, or day care, or prohibiting the person from coming within a
specified distance of a location or another person, or, in the case of an
order issued under RCW 26.44.063, imposing any other restrictions or conditions
upon the person; or

(b)
A foreign protection order, as defined in RCW 26.52.010, has been issued of
which the person under restraint has knowledge and the person under restraint
has violated a provision of the foreign protection order prohibiting the person
under restraint from contacting or communicating with another person, or of a
provision excluding the person under restraint from a residence, workplace,
school, or day care, or a violation of any provision for which the foreign
protection order specifically indicates that a violation will be a crime; or

(c)
The person is sixteen years or older and within the preceding four hours has
assaulted a family or household member as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and the
officer believes: (i) A felonious assault has occurred; (ii) an assault has
occurred which has resulted in bodily injury to the victim, whether the injury
is observable by the responding officer or not; or (iii) that any physical
action has occurred which was intended to cause another person reasonably to
fear imminent serious bodily injury or death. Bodily injury means physical
pain, illness, or an impairment of physical condition. When the officer has
probable cause to believe that family or household members have assaulted each
other, the officer is not required to arrest both persons. The officer shall
arrest the person whom the officer believes to be the primary physical
aggressor. In making this determination, the officer shall make every
reasonable effort to consider: (i) The intent to protect victims of domestic
violence under RCW 10.99.010; (ii) the comparative extent of injuries inflicted
or serious threats creating fear of physical injury; and (iii) the history of
domestic violence between the persons involved.

(3)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a violation of any of the following traffic laws shall have
the authority to arrest the person:

(a)
RCW 46.52.010, relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other
property;

(b)
RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(c)
RCW 46.61.500 or 46.61.530, relating to reckless driving or racing of vehicles;

(d)
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(e)
RCW 46.20.342, relating to driving a motor vehicle while operator's license is
suspended or revoked;

(f)
RCW 46.61.5249, relating to operating a motor vehicle in a negligent manner.

(4)
A law enforcement officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle
accident may arrest the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the accident if
the officer has probable cause to believe that the driver has committed in
connection with the accident a violation of any traffic law or regulation.

(5)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing a violation of RCW ((88.12.025)) 79A.60.040
shall have the authority to arrest the person.

(6)
An officer may act upon the request of a law enforcement officer in whose
presence a traffic infraction was committed, to stop, detain, arrest, or issue
a notice of traffic infraction to the driver who is believed to have committed
the infraction. The request by the witnessing officer shall give an officer
the authority to take appropriate action under the laws of the state of
Washington.

(7)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has committed
or is committing any act of indecent exposure, as defined in RCW 9A.88.010, may
arrest the person.

(8)
A police officer may arrest and take into custody, pending release on bail,
personal recognizance, or court order, a person without a warrant when the
officer has probable cause to believe that an order has been issued of which
the person has knowledge under chapter 10.14 RCW and the person has violated
the terms of that order.

(9)
Any police officer having probable cause to believe that a person has, within
twenty-four hours of the alleged violation, committed a violation of RCW
9A.50.020 may arrest such person.

(10)
A police officer having probable cause to believe that a person illegally
possesses or illegally has possessed a firearm or other dangerous weapon on
private or public elementary or secondary school premises shall have the
authority to arrest the person.

For
purposes of this subsection, the term "firearm" has the meaning
defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the term "dangerous weapon" has the
meaning defined in RCW 9.41.250 and 9.41.280(1) (c) through (e).

(11)
Except as specifically provided in subsections (2), (3), (4), and (6) of this
section, nothing in this section extends or otherwise affects the powers of
arrest prescribed in Title 46 RCW.

(12)
No police officer may be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest
pursuant to RCW 10.31.100 (2) or (8) if the police officer acts in good faith
and without malice.

Sec.
7. RCW
10.99.020 and 1997 c 338 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Family or household members" means spouses, former spouses, persons
who have a child in common regardless of whether they have been married or have
lived together at any time, adult persons related by blood or marriage, adult
persons who are presently residing together or who have resided together in the
past, persons sixteen years of age or older who are presently residing together
or who have resided together in the past and who have or have had a dating
relationship, persons sixteen years of age or older with whom a person sixteen
years of age or older has or has had a dating relationship, and persons who
have a biological or legal parent-child relationship, including stepparents and
stepchildren and grandparents and grandchildren.

(2)
"Dating relationship" has the same meaning as in RCW 26.50.010.

(3)
"Domestic violence" includes but is not limited to any of the
following crimes when committed by one family or household member against
another:

(a)
Assault in the first degree (RCW 9A.36.011);

(b)
Assault in the second degree (RCW 9A.36.021);

(c)
Assault in the third degree (RCW 9A.36.031);

(d)
Assault in the fourth degree (RCW 9A.36.041);

(e)
Drive-by shooting (RCW 9A.36.045);

(f)
Reckless endangerment (RCW 9A.36.050);

(g)
Coercion (RCW 9A.36.070);

(h)
Burglary in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.020);

(i)
Burglary in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.030);

(j)
Criminal trespass in the first degree (RCW 9A.52.070);

(k)
Criminal trespass in the second degree (RCW 9A.52.080);

(l)
Malicious mischief in the first degree (RCW 9A.48.070);

(m)
Malicious mischief in the second degree (RCW 9A.48.080);

(n)
Malicious mischief in the third degree (RCW 9A.48.090);

(o)
Kidnapping in the first degree (RCW 9A.40.020);

(p)
Kidnapping in the second degree (RCW 9A.40.030);

(q)
Unlawful imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040);

(r)
Violation of the provisions of a restraining order restraining the person or
restraining or enjoining the person from going onto the grounds of or
entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care or coming within a
specified distance of a location or a specified person (RCW 26.09.300,
26.10.220, ((or)) 26.26.138, 26.44.063, or 26.44.150);

(s)
Violation of the provisions of a protection order or no-contact order
restraining the person or restraining the person from going onto the grounds of
or entering a residence, workplace, school, or day care (RCW 26.50.060,
26.50.070, 26.50.130, 10.99.040, ((or)) 10.99.050, or 26.52.070);

(t)
Rape in the first degree (RCW 9A.44.040);

(u)
Rape in the second degree (RCW 9A.44.050);

(v)
Residential burglary (RCW 9A.52.025);

(w)
Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110); and

(x)
Interference with the reporting of domestic violence (RCW 9A.36.150).

(4)
"Victim" means a family or household member who has been subjected to
domestic violence.

Sec.
8. RCW
10.99.040 and 1997 c 338 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Because of the serious nature of domestic violence, the court in domestic
violence actions:

(a)
Shall not dismiss any charge or delay disposition because of concurrent
dissolution or other civil proceedings;

(b)
Shall not require proof that either party is seeking a dissolution of marriage
prior to instigation of criminal proceedings;

(c)
Shall waive any requirement that the victim's location be disclosed to any
person, other than the attorney of a criminal defendant, upon a showing that
there is a possibility of further violence: PROVIDED, That the court may order
a criminal defense attorney not to disclose to his or her client the victim's
location; and

(d)
Shall identify by any reasonable means on docket sheets those criminal actions
arising from acts of domestic violence.

(2)(a)
Because of the likelihood of repeated violence directed at those who have been
victims of domestic violence in the past, when any person charged with or
arrested for a crime involving domestic violence is released from custody
before arraignment or trial on bail or personal recognizance, the court
authorizing the release may prohibit that person from having any contact with
the victim. The jurisdiction authorizing the release shall determine whether
that person should be prohibited from having any contact with the victim. If
there is no outstanding restraining or protective order prohibiting that person
from having contact with the victim, the court authorizing release may issue,
by telephone, a no-contact order prohibiting the person charged or arrested
from having contact with the victim or from being present within a specified
distance of no more than one thousand feet from a specified location, or from
being present within a specified distance of not less than one hundred or more
than five hundred feet of the victim.

(b)
In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(c)
The no-contact order shall also be issued in writing as soon as possible.

(3)
At the time of arraignment the court shall determine whether a no-contact order
shall be issued or extended. The no-contact order shall terminate if the
defendant is acquitted or the charges are dismissed. If a no-contact order
is issued or extended, the court may also include in the conditions of release
a requirement that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring. If
electronic monitoring is ordered, the court shall specify who shall provide the
monitoring services, and the terms under which the monitoring shall be
performed. Upon conviction, the court may require as a condition of the
sentence that the defendant reimburse the providing agency for the costs of the
electronic monitoring.

(4)(a)
Willful violation of a court order issued under subsection (2) or (3) of this
section is a gross misdemeanor except as provided in (b) and (c) of this
subsection (4). Upon conviction and in addition to other penalties provided by
law, the court may require that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring.
The court shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services
and the terms under which the monitoring must be performed. The court also may
include a requirement that the defendant pay the costs of the monitoring. The
court shall consider the ability of the convicted person to pay for electronic
monitoring.

(b)
Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this section and that
does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under RCW 9A.36.011 or
9A.36.021 is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW, and any
conduct in violation of a protective order issued under this section that is
reckless and creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to
another person is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c)
A willful violation of a court order issued under this section is a class C
felony if the offender has at least two previous convictions for violating the
provisions of a no-contact order issued under this chapter, a domestic violence
protection order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or any
federal or out-of-state order that is comparable to a no-contact order or
protection order issued under Washington law. The previous convictions may
involve the same victim or other victims specifically protected by the
no-contact orders or protection orders the offender violated.

(d)
The written order releasing the person charged or arrested shall contain the
court's directives and shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order is
a criminal offense under chapter 10.99 RCW and will subject a violator to
arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or reckless endangerment that is a
violation of this order is a felony. You can be arrested even if any person
protected by the order invites or allows you to violate the order's
prohibitions. You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from
violating the order's provisions. Only the court can change the order."

(e)
A certified copy of the order shall be provided to the victim.

(5)
If a no-contact order has been issued prior to charging, that order shall
expire at arraignment or within seventy-two hours if charges are not filed.
Such orders need not be entered into the computer-based criminal intelligence
information system in this state which is used by law enforcement agencies to
list outstanding warrants.

(((5)))
(6) Whenever ((an)) a no-contact order ((prohibiting
contact)) is issued, modified, or terminated under subsection (2) or (3) of
this section, the clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or
before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency
specified in the order. Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law
enforcement agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order for one year or
until the expiration date specified on the order into any computer-based criminal
intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the ((law enforcement))
computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes
notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The
order is fully enforceable in any jurisdiction in the state. Upon receipt
of notice that an order has been terminated under subsection (3) of this
section, the law enforcement agency shall remove the order from the
computer-based criminal intelligence information system.

Sec.
9. RCW
10.99.045 and 1998 c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A defendant arrested for an offense involving domestic violence as defined by
RCW 10.99.020 shall be required to appear in person before a magistrate within
one judicial day after the arrest.

(2)
A defendant who is charged by citation, complaint, or information with an
offense involving domestic violence as defined by RCW 10.99.020 and not
arrested shall appear in court for arraignment in person as soon as
practicable, but in no event later than fourteen days after the next day on
which court is in session following the issuance of the citation or the filing
of the complaint or information.

(3)
At the time of the appearances provided in subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, the court shall determine the necessity of imposing a no-contact order
or other conditions of pretrial release according to the procedures established
by court rule for a preliminary appearance or an arraignment. The court may
include in the order any conditions authorized under RCW 9.41.800 and
10.99.040.

(4)
Appearances required pursuant to this section are mandatory and cannot be
waived.

(5)
The no-contact order shall be issued and entered with the appropriate law
enforcement agency pursuant to the procedures outlined in RCW 10.99.040 (2) and
(4).

Sec.
10. RCW
10.99.050 and 1997 c 338 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When a defendant is found guilty of a crime and a condition of the sentence
restricts the defendant's ability to have contact with the victim, such
condition shall be recorded and a written certified copy of that order shall be
provided to the victim.

(2)(a)
Willful violation of a court order issued under this section is a gross
misdemeanor. Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this
section and that does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under
RCW 9A.36.011 or 9A.36.021 is a class C felony, and any conduct in violation of
a protective order issued under this section that is reckless and creates a
substantial risk of death or serious physical injury to another person is a
class C felony. A willful violation of a court order issued under this section
is also a class C felony if the offender has at least two previous convictions
for violating the provisions of a no-contact order issued under this chapter,
or a domestic violence protection order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10,
26.26, or 26.50 RCW, or any federal or out-of-state order that is comparable to
a no-contact order or protection order that is issued under Washington law. The
previous convictions may involve the same victim or other victims specifically
protected by the no-contact orders or protection orders the offender violated.

(b)
The written order shall contain the court's directives and shall bear the
legend: Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 10.99 RCW
and will subject a violator to arrest; any assault, drive-by shooting, or
reckless endangerment that is a violation of this order is a felony.

(3)
Whenever an order prohibiting contact is issued pursuant to this section, the
clerk of the court shall forward a copy of the order on or before the next
judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order.
Upon receipt of the copy of the order the law enforcement agency shall ((forthwith))
enter the order for one year or until the expiration date specified on the
order into any computer-based criminal intelligence information system
available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding
warrants. Entry into the ((law enforcement)) computer-based criminal
intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement
agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any
jurisdiction in the state.

(4)
If an order prohibiting contact issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
11. RCW
26.09.050 and 1995 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In entering a decree of dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or
declaration of invalidity, the court shall determine the marital status of the
parties, make provision for a parenting plan for any minor child of the
marriage, make provision for the support of any child of the marriage entitled
to support, consider or approve provision for the maintenance of either spouse,
make provision for the disposition of property and liabilities of the parties,
make provision for the allocation of the children as federal tax exemptions,
make provision for any necessary continuing restraining orders including the
provisions contained in RCW 9.41.800, make provision for the issuance within
this action of the restraint provisions of a domestic violence protection order
under chapter 26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter
10.14 RCW, and make provision for the change of name of any party.

(2)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party ((or)),
from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of
the other party or the day care or school of any child, or coming within a
specified distance of a specified location or a specified party shall
prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.09
RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(3)
The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a criminal offense
legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section, in addition to the law enforcement
information sheet or proof of service of the order, be forwarded by the clerk
of the court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law
enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law
enforcement agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any
computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state
used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is
fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(4)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
12. RCW
26.09.060 and 1995 c 246 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In a proceeding for:

(a)
Dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or a declaration of invalidity; or

(b)
Disposition of property or liabilities, maintenance, or support following
dissolution of the marriage by a court which lacked personal jurisdiction over
the absent spouse; either party may move for temporary maintenance or for
temporary support of children entitled to support. The motion shall be
accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and
the amounts requested.

(2)
As a part of a motion for temporary maintenance or support or by independent
motion accompanied by affidavit, either party may request the court to issue a
temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, providing relief proper
in the circumstances, and restraining or enjoining any person from:

(a)
Transferring, removing, encumbering, concealing, or in any way disposing of any
property except in the usual course of business or for the necessities of life,
and, if so restrained or enjoined, requiring him or her to notify the moving
party of any proposed extraordinary expenditures made after the order is
issued;

(b)
Molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

(c)
Going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the
other party or the day care or school of any child upon a showing of the
necessity therefor;

(d)
Coming within a specified distance of no more than one thousand feet from a
specified location;

(e)
Coming within a specified distance of not less than one hundred or more than
five hundred feet from a specified party; and

(f)
Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3)
Either party may request a domestic violence protection order under chapter
26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a
temporary basis. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW
26.50.060 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children
which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the
relief provided in RCW 10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection
shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon
court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all
temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4)
In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(5)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to
the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other
evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until
the time for responding has elapsed.

(6)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction and
an order for temporary maintenance or support in such amounts and on such terms
as are just and proper in the circumstances. The court may in its discretion
waive the filing of the bond or the posting of security.

(7)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining the person from
molesting or disturbing another party ((or)), from going onto the
grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of the other party or the
day care or school of any child, or coming within a specified distance of a
location or a specified party shall prominently bear on the front page of
the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS
IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.09 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO
ARREST.

(8)
The court shall order that any temporary restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any computer-based
criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the ((law
enforcement)) computer-based criminal intelligence information
system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of
the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(9)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

(10)
A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary injunction:

(a)
Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be
adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b)
May be revoked or modified;

(c)
Terminates when the final decree is entered, except as provided under
subsection (((10))) (11) of this section, or when the petition
for dissolution, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity is dismissed;

(d)
May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing decree.

(((10)))
(11) Delinquent support payments accrued under an order for temporary
support remain collectible and are not extinguished when a final decree is
entered unless the decree contains specific language to the contrary. A
support debt under a temporary order owed to the state for public assistance
expenditures shall not be extinguished by the final decree if:

(a)
The obligor was given notice of the state's interest under chapter 74.20A RCW;
or

(b)
The temporary order directs the obligor to make support payments to the office
of support enforcement or the Washington state support registry.

Sec.
13. RCW
26.10.040 and 1995 c 93 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In entering an order under this chapter, the court shall consider, approve, or
make provision for:

(((1)))
(a) Child custody, visitation, and the support of any child entitled to
support;

(((2)))
(b) The allocation of the children as a federal tax exemption;

(((3)))
(c) Any necessary continuing restraining orders, including the
provisions contained in RCW 9.41.800;

(((4)))
(d) A domestic violence protection order under chapter 26.50 RCW or an
antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW. The court may grant
any of the relief provided in RCW 26.50.060 except relief pertaining to
residential provisions for the children which provisions shall be provided for
under this chapter, and any of the relief provided in RCW 10.14.080;

(((5)))
(e) Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or
enjoining the person from molesting or disturbing another party ((or)),
from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of
the other party or the day care or school of any child, or coming within a
specified distance of a location or a specified party. The restraining order
shall prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF
THIS ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER
26.10 RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST((;)).

(((6)))
(2) The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section, in addition to the law enforcement
information sheet or proof of service of the order, be forwarded by the clerk
of the court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law
enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law
enforcement agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any
computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state
used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is
fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(3)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
14. RCW
26.10.115 and 1995 c 246 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for temporary
support of children entitled to support. The motion shall be accompanied by an
affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and the amount
requested.

(2)
In a proceeding under this chapter either party may file a motion for a
temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, providing relief proper
in the circumstances, and restraining or enjoining any person from:

(a)
Molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party or of any child;

(b)
Entering the family home or the home of the other party upon a showing of the
necessity therefor;

(c)
Coming within a specified distance of no more than one thousand feet from a
specified location;

(d)
Coming within a specified distance of not less than one hundred or more than
five hundred feet from a specified party; and

(e)
Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3)
Either party may request a domestic violence protection order under chapter
26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a
temporary basis. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW
26.50.060 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children
which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the
relief provided in RCW 10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection
shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon
court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all
temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4)
In issuing the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(5)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to
the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other
evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until
the time for responding has elapsed.

(6)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction and
an order for temporary support in such amounts and on such terms as are just
and proper in the circumstances.

(7)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party ((or)),
from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of
the other party or the day care or school of any child, or coming within a
specified distance of a specified location or a specified party shall
prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.10
RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(8)
The court shall order that any temporary restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any computer-based
criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. Entry into the ((law
enforcement)) computer-based criminal intelligence information
system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of
the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(9)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

(10)
A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary injunction:

(a)
Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be
adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b)
May be revoked or modified;

(c)
Terminates when the final order is entered or when the motion is dismissed;

(d)
May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing order.

(((10)))
(11) A support debt owed to the state for public assistance expenditures
which has been charged against a party pursuant to RCW 74.20A.040 and/or
74.20A.055 shall not be merged in, or otherwise extinguished by, the final
decree or order, unless the office of support enforcement has been given notice
of the final proceeding and an opportunity to present its claim for the support
debt to the court and has failed to file an affidavit as provided in this
subsection. Notice of the proceeding shall be served upon the office of
support enforcement personally, or by certified mail, and shall be given no
fewer than thirty days prior to the date of the final proceeding. An original
copy of the notice shall be filed with the court either before service or
within a reasonable time thereafter. The office of support enforcement may
present its claim, and thereby preserve the support debt, by filing an
affidavit setting forth the amount of the debt with the court, and by mailing a
copy of the affidavit to the parties or their attorney prior to the date of the
final proceeding.

Sec.
15. RCW
26.26.130 and 1997 c 58 s 947 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The judgment and order of the court determining the existence or nonexistence
of the parent and child relationship shall be determinative for all purposes.

(2)
If the judgment and order of the court is at variance with the child's birth
certificate, the court shall order that an amended birth certificate be issued.

(3)
The judgment and order shall contain other appropriate provisions directed to
the appropriate parties to the proceeding, concerning the duty of current and
future support, the extent of any liability for past support furnished to the
child if that issue is before the court, the furnishing of bond or other
security for the payment of the judgment, or any other matter in the best
interest of the child. The judgment and order may direct the father to pay the
reasonable expenses of the mother's pregnancy and confinement. The judgment
and order may include a continuing restraining order or injunction. In issuing
the order, the court shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(4)
The judgment and order shall contain the social security numbers of all parties
to the order.

(5)
Support judgment and orders shall be for periodic payments which may vary in
amount. The court may limit the father's liability for the past support to the
child to the proportion of the expenses already incurred as the court deems
just. The court shall not limit or affect in any manner the right of
nonparties including the state of Washington to seek reimbursement for support
and other services previously furnished to the child.

(6)
After considering all relevant factors, the court shall order either or both
parents to pay an amount determined pursuant to the schedule and standards
contained in chapter 26.19 RCW.

(7)
On the same basis as provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the court shall make
residential provisions with regard to minor children of the parties, except
that a parenting plan shall not be required unless requested by a party.

(8)
In any dispute between the natural parents of a child and a person or persons
who have (a) commenced adoption proceedings or who have been granted an order
of adoption, and (b) pursuant to a court order, or placement by the department
of social and health services or by a licensed agency, have had actual custody
of the child for a period of one year or more before court action is commenced
by the natural parent or parents, the court shall consider the best welfare and
interests of the child, including the child's need for situation stability, in
determining the matter of custody, and the parent or person who is more fit
shall have the superior right to custody.

(9)
In entering an order under this chapter, the court may issue any necessary
continuing restraining orders, including the restraint provisions of domestic
violence protection orders under chapter 26.50 RCW or antiharassment protection
orders under chapter 10.14 RCW.

(10)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party ((or)),
from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of
the other party or the day care or school of any child, or coming within a
specified distance of a specified location or a specified party shall
prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.26
RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(11)
The court shall order that any restraining order bearing a criminal offense
legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall forthwith enter the order into any computer-based criminal
intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement
agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is fully enforceable in any
county in the state.

(12)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

Sec.
16. RCW
26.26.137 and 1995 c 246 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the court has made a finding as to the paternity of a child, or if a party's
acknowledgment of paternity has been filed with the court, or a party alleges
he is the father of the child, any party may move for temporary support for the
child prior to the date of entry of the final order. The motion shall be
accompanied by an affidavit setting forth the factual basis for the motion and
the amounts requested.

(2)
Any party may request the court to issue a temporary restraining order or
preliminary injunction, providing relief proper in the circumstances, and
restraining or enjoining any party from:

(a)
Molesting or disturbing the peace of another party;

(b)
Going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of another
party or the day care or school of any child; ((or))

(c)
Coming within a specified distance of no more than one thousand feet from a
specified location;

(d)
Coming within a specified distance of not less than one hundred or more than
five hundred feet of a specified party; or

(e)
Removing a child from the jurisdiction of the court.

(3)
Either party may request a domestic violence protection order under chapter
26.50 RCW or an antiharassment protection order under chapter 10.14 RCW on a
temporary basis. The court may grant any of the relief provided in RCW
26.50.060 except relief pertaining to residential provisions for the children
which provisions shall be provided for under this chapter, and any of the
relief provided in RCW 10.14.080. Ex parte orders issued under this subsection
shall be effective for a fixed period not to exceed fourteen days, or upon
court order, not to exceed twenty-four days if necessary to ensure that all
temporary motions in the case can be heard at the same time.

(4)
Restraining orders issued under this section restraining or enjoining
the person from molesting or disturbing another party ((or)),
from going onto the grounds of or entering the home, workplace, or school of
the other party or the day care or school of any child, or coming within a
specified distance of a specified location or a specified party shall
prominently bear on the front page of the order the legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.26
RCW AND WILL SUBJECT A VIOLATOR TO ARREST.

(5)
The court shall order that any temporary restraining order bearing a criminal
offense legend, any domestic violence protection order, or any antiharassment
protection order granted under this section be forwarded by the clerk of the
court on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement
agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement
agency shall ((forthwith)) enter the order into any computer-based
criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law
enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order is fully
enforceable in any county in the state.

(6)
If a restraining order issued pursuant to this section is modified or
terminated, the clerk of the court shall notify the law enforcement agency
specified in the order on or before the next judicial day. Upon receipt of
notice that an order has been terminated, the law enforcement agency shall
remove the order from any computer-based criminal intelligence system.

(7)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to
the other party only if it finds on the basis of the moving affidavit or other
evidence that irreparable injury could result if an order is not issued until
the time for responding has elapsed.

(((7)))
(8) The court may issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary
injunction and an order for temporary support in such amounts and on such terms
as are just and proper in the circumstances. In issuing the order, the court
shall consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(((8)))
(9) A temporary order, temporary restraining order, or preliminary
injunction:

(a)
Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be
adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding;

(b)
May be revoked or modified;

(c)
Terminates when the final order is entered or when the petition is dismissed;
and

(d)
May be entered in a proceeding for the modification of an existing order.

(((9)))
(10) A support debt owed to the state for public assistance expenditures
which has been charged against a party pursuant to RCW 74.20A.040 and/or
74.20A.055 shall not be merged in, or otherwise extinguished by, the final
decree or order, unless the office of support enforcement has been given notice
of the final proceeding and an opportunity to present its claim for the support
debt to the court and has failed to file an affidavit as provided in this
subsection. Notice of the proceeding shall be served upon the office of
support enforcement personally, or by certified mail, and shall be given no
fewer than thirty days prior to the date of the final proceeding. An original
copy of the notice shall be filed with the court either before service or
within a reasonable time thereafter. The office of support enforcement may
present its claim, and thereby preserve the support debt, by filing an
affidavit setting forth the amount of the debt with the court, and by mailing a
copy of the affidavit to the parties or their attorney prior to the date of the
final proceeding.

Sec.
17. RCW
26.44.063 and 1993 c 412 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature to minimize trauma to a child involved in
an allegation of sexual or physical abuse. The legislature declares that
removing the child from the home often has the effect of further traumatizing
the child. It is, therefore, the legislature's intent that the alleged
offender, rather than the child, shall be removed from the home and that this
should be done at the earliest possible point of intervention in accordance
with RCW 10.31.100, 13.34.130, this section, and RCW 26.44.130.

(2)
In any judicial proceeding in which it is alleged that a child has been
subjected to sexual or physical abuse, if the court finds reasonable grounds to
believe that an incident of sexual or physical abuse has occurred, the court
may, on its own motion, or the motion of the guardian ad litem or other
parties, issue a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction
restraining or enjoining the person accused of committing the abuse from:

(a)
Molesting or disturbing the peace of the alleged victim;

(b)
Entering the family home of the alleged victim except as specifically
authorized by the court; ((or))

(c)
Having any contact with the alleged victim, except as specifically authorized
by the court;

(d)
Coming within a specified distance of no more than one thousand feet from a
specified location; or

(e)
Coming within a specified distance of not less than one hundred or more than
five hundred feet of the victim.

(3)
In issuing a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction, the court
may impose any additional restrictions that the court in its discretion
determines are necessary to protect the child from further abuse or emotional
trauma pending final resolution of the abuse allegations.

(4)
The court shall issue a temporary restraining order prohibiting a person from
entering the family home if the court finds that the order would eliminate the
need for an out-of-home placement to protect the child's right to nurturance,
health, and safety and is sufficient to protect the child from further sexual
or physical abuse or coercion.

(5)
The court may issue a temporary restraining order without requiring notice to
the party to be restrained or other parties only if it finds on the basis of
the moving affidavit or other evidence that irreparable injury could result if
an order is not issued until the time for responding has elapsed.

(6)
A temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction:

(a)
Does not prejudice the rights of a party or any child which are to be
adjudicated at subsequent hearings in the proceeding; and

(b)
May be revoked or modified.

(7)
The person having physical custody of the child shall have an affirmative duty
to assist in the enforcement of the restraining order including but not limited
to a duty to notify the court as soon as practicable of any violation of the
order, a duty to request the assistance of law enforcement officers to enforce
the order, and a duty to notify the department of social and health services of
any violation of the order as soon as practicable if the department is a party
to the action. Failure by the custodial party to discharge these affirmative
duties shall be subject to contempt proceedings.

(8) Willful violation of a court order entered under this section
is a misdemeanor. A written order shall contain the court's directive and
shall bear the legend: "Violation of this order with actual notice of its
terms is a criminal offense under chapter 26.44 RCW, is also subject to
contempt proceedings, and will subject a violator to arrest."

Sec.
18. RCW
26.44.067 and 1993 c 412 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person having had actual notice of the existence of a restraining order
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to RCW 26.44.063 who
refuses to comply with the provisions of such order shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.

(2)
The notice requirements of subsection (1) of this section may be satisfied by
the peace officer giving oral or written evidence to the person subject to the
order by reading from or handing to that person a copy certified by a notary
public or the clerk of the court to be an accurate copy of the original court
order which is on file. The copy may be supplied by the court or any party.

(3)
The remedies provided in this section shall not apply unless restraining orders
subject to this section ((shall)) bear this legend: VIOLATION OF THIS
ORDER WITH ACTUAL NOTICE OF ITS TERMS IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE UNDER CHAPTER 26.44
RCW AND IS ALSO SUBJECT TO CONTEMPT PROCEEDINGS.

(4) It is a defense to prosecution under subsection (1) of this
section that the court order was issued contrary to law or court rule. No
right of action shall accrue against any peace officer acting upon a properly
certified copy of a court order lawful on its face if such officer employs
otherwise lawful means to effect the arrest.

Sec.
19. RCW
26.50.035 and 1995 c 246 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((By July 1, 1994,)) The administrator for the courts shall
develop and prepare instructions and informational brochures required under RCW
26.50.030(4), standard petition and order for protection forms, and a court
staff handbook on domestic violence and the protection order process. The
standard petition and order for protection forms must be used after September
1, 1994, for all petitions filed and orders issued under this chapter. The
instructions, brochures, forms, and handbook shall be prepared in consultation
with interested persons, including a representative of the state domestic
violence coalition, judges, and law enforcement personnel.

(a)
The instructions shall be designed to assist petitioners in completing the
petition, and shall include a sample of standard petition and order for
protection forms.

(b)
The informational brochure shall describe the use of and the process for
obtaining, modifying, and terminating a domestic violence
protection order as provided under this chapter, ((a)) an
antiharassment no-contact order as provided ((by RCW 10.99.040)) under
chapter 9A.46 RCW, a domestic violence no-contact order as provided under
chapter 10.99 RCW, a restraining order as provided ((by RCW 26.09.060))
under chapter 26.09, 26.10, 26.26, and 26.44 RCW, ((and)) an antiharassment
protection order as provided by chapter 10.14 RCW, and a foreign protection
order as defined in chapter 26.52 RCW.

(c)
The order for protection form shall include, in a conspicuous location, notice
of criminal penalties resulting from violation of the order, and the following
statement: "You can be arrested even if the person or persons who
obtained the order invite or allow you to violate the order's prohibitions.
The respondent has the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating the
order's provisions. Only the court can change the order upon written
application."

(d)
The court staff handbook shall allow for the addition of a community resource
list by the court clerk.

(2)
All court clerks shall obtain a community resource list from a domestic
violence program, defined in RCW 70.123.020, serving the county in which the
court is located. The community resource list shall include the names and
telephone numbers of domestic violence programs serving the community in which
the court is located, including law enforcement agencies, domestic violence
agencies, sexual assault agencies, legal assistance programs, interpreters,
multicultural programs, and batterers' treatment programs. The court shall
make the community resource list available as part of or in addition to the
informational brochures described in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The administrator for the courts shall distribute a master copy of the petition
and order forms, instructions, and informational brochures to all court clerks
and shall distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms to all
superior, district, and municipal courts.

(4)
For purposes of this section, "court clerks" means court
administrators in courts of limited jurisdiction and elected court clerks.

(5)
The administrator for the courts shall determine the significant
non-English-speaking or limited English-speaking populations in the state. The
administrator shall then arrange for translation of the instructions and
informational brochures required by this section, which shall contain a sample
of the standard petition and order for protection forms, into the languages spoken
by those significant non-English-speaking populations and shall distribute a
master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures to all
court clerks by January 1, 1997.

(6)
The administrator for the courts shall update the instructions, brochures,
standard petition and order for protection forms, and court staff handbook when
changes in the law make an update necessary.

Sec.
20. RCW
26.50.060 and 1999 c 147 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon notice and after hearing, the court may provide relief as follows:

(a)
Restrain the respondent from committing acts of domestic violence;

(b)
Exclude the respondent from coming within a specified distance of no more
than one thousand feet from the dwelling ((which)) that the
parties share, from the residence, workplace, or school of the petitioner, ((or))
from the day care or school of ((a)) any child, or from any
other location;

(c)
On the same basis as is provided in chapter 26.09 RCW, the court shall make
residential provision with regard to minor children of the parties. However,
parenting plans as specified in chapter 26.09 RCW shall not be required under
this chapter;

(d)
Order the respondent to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator treatment
program approved under RCW 26.50.150;

(e)
Order other relief as it deems necessary for the protection of the petitioner
and other family or household members sought to be protected, including orders
or directives to a peace officer, as allowed under this chapter;

(f)
Require the respondent to pay the administrative court costs and service fees,
as established by the county or municipality incurring the expense and to
reimburse the petitioner for costs incurred in bringing the action, including ((a))
reasonable ((attorney's)) attorneys' fees;

(g)
Restrain the respondent from having any contact with the victim of domestic
violence or the victim's children or members of the victim's household;

(h)
Restrain the respondent from coming within a specified distance of not less
than one hundred or more than five hundred feet of the victim or the victim's
children or members of the victim's household;

(((h)))
(i) Require the respondent to submit to electronic monitoring. The
order shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services and
the terms under which the monitoring must be performed. The order also may
include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The
court shall consider the ability of the respondent to pay for electronic
monitoring;

(((i)))
(j) Consider the provisions of RCW 9.41.800;

(((j)))
(k) Order possession and use of essential personal effects. The court
shall list the essential personal effects with sufficient specificity to make
it clear which property is included; and

(((k)))
(l) Order use of a vehicle.

(2)
If a ((restraining)) protection order restrains the respondent
from contacting the respondent's minor children the restraint shall be for a
fixed period not to exceed one year. This limitation is not applicable to
orders for protection issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, or 26.26 RCW. With
regard to other relief, if the petitioner has petitioned for relief on his or
her own behalf or on behalf of the petitioner's family or household members or
minor children, and the court finds that the respondent is likely to resume
acts of domestic violence against the petitioner or the petitioner's family or
household members or minor children when the order expires, the court may
either grant relief for a fixed period or enter a permanent order of
protection.

If
the petitioner has petitioned for relief on behalf of the respondent's minor
children, the court shall advise the petitioner that if the petitioner wants to
continue protection for a period beyond one year the petitioner may either
petition for renewal pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or may seek
relief pursuant to the provisions of chapter 26.09 or 26.26 RCW.

(3)
If the court grants an order for a fixed time period, the petitioner may apply
for renewal of the order by filing a petition for renewal at any time within
the three months before the order expires. The petition for renewal shall
state the reasons why the petitioner seeks to renew the protection order. Upon
receipt of the petition for renewal the court shall order a hearing which shall
be not later than fourteen days from the date of the order. Except as provided
in RCW 26.50.085, personal service shall be made on the respondent not less
than five days before the hearing. If timely service cannot be made the court
shall set a new hearing date and shall either require additional attempts at
obtaining personal service or permit service by publication as provided in RCW
26.50.085 or by mail as provided in RCW 26.50.123. If the court permits
service by publication or mail, the court shall set the new hearing date not
later than twenty-four days from the date of the order. If the order expires
because timely service cannot be made the court shall grant an ex parte order
of protection as provided in RCW 26.50.070. The court shall grant the petition
for renewal unless the respondent proves by a preponderance of the evidence
that the respondent will not resume acts of domestic violence against the
petitioner or the petitioner's children or family or household members when the
order expires. The court may renew the protection order for another fixed time
period or may enter a permanent order as provided in this section. The court
may award court costs, service fees, and reasonable attorneys' fees as provided
in subsection (1)(f) of this section.

(4)
In providing relief under this chapter, the court may realign the designation
of the parties as "petitioner" and "respondent" where the
court finds that the original petitioner is the abuser and the original
respondent is the victim of domestic violence and may issue an ex parte temporary
order for protection in accordance with RCW 26.50.070 on behalf of the victim
until the victim is able to prepare a petition for an order for protection in
accordance with RCW 26.50.030.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no order for protection
shall grant relief to any party except upon notice to the respondent and
hearing pursuant to a petition or counter-petition filed and served by the
party seeking relief in accordance with RCW 26.50.050.

(6)
The court order shall specify the date the order expires if any. The court
order shall also state whether the court issued the protection order following
personal service, service by publication, or service by mail and whether the
court has approved service by publication or mail of an order issued under this
section.

(7)
If the court declines to issue an order for protection or declines to renew an
order for protection, the court shall state in writing on the order the
particular reasons for the court's denial.

Sec.
21. RCW
26.50.070 and 1996 c 248 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where an application under this section alleges that irreparable injury could
result from domestic violence if an order is not issued immediately without
prior notice to the respondent, the court may grant an ex parte temporary order
for protection, pending a full hearing, and grant relief as the court deems
proper, including an order:

(a)
Restraining any party from committing acts of domestic violence;

(b)
Restraining any party from ((going onto)) being present within a
specified distance of no more than one thousand feet from the grounds ((of
or entering)) or the dwelling that the parties share, from the
residence, workplace, ((or)) school of the other, or from any other
location, or from the day care or school of a child until further order of
the court;

(c)
Restraining any party from interfering with the other's custody of the minor
children or from removing the children from the jurisdiction of the court;

(d)
Restraining any party from having any contact with the victim of domestic
violence or the victim's children or members of the victim's household;

(e)
Restraining any party from coming within a specified distance of not less than
one hundred or more than five hundred feet of a specified party; and

(((e)))
(f) Considering the provisions of RCW 9.41.800.

(2)
Irreparable injury under this section includes but is not limited to situations
in which the respondent has recently threatened petitioner with bodily injury
or has engaged in acts of domestic violence against the petitioner.

(3)
The court shall hold an ex parte hearing in person or by telephone on the day
the petition is filed or on the following judicial day.

(4)
An ex parte temporary order for protection shall be effective for a fixed
period not to exceed fourteen days or twenty-four days if the court has
permitted service by publication under RCW 26.50.085 or by mail under RCW
26.50.123. The ex parte order may be reissued. A full hearing, as provided in
this chapter, shall be set for not later than fourteen days from the issuance
of the temporary order or not later than twenty-four days if service by
publication or by mail is permitted. Except as provided in RCW 26.50.050,
26.50.085, and 26.50.123, the respondent shall be personally served with a copy
of the ex parte order along with a copy of the petition and notice of the date
set for the hearing.

(5)
Any order issued under this section shall contain the date and time of issuance
and the expiration date and shall be entered into a state-wide judicial
information system by the clerk of the court within one judicial day after
issuance.

(6)
If the court declines to issue an ex parte temporary order for protection the
court shall state the particular reasons for the court's denial. The court's
denial of a motion for an ex parte order of protection shall be filed with the
court.

Sec.
22. RCW
26.50.110 and 1996 c 248 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever an order for protection is granted under this chapter and the
respondent or person to be restrained knows of the order, a violation of the
restraint provisions or of a provision excluding the person from a residence,
workplace, school, ((or)) day care, or other location is a gross
misdemeanor except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section.
Upon conviction, and in addition to any other penalties provided by law, the
court may require that the respondent submit to electronic monitoring. The
court shall specify who shall provide the electronic monitoring services, and
the terms under which the monitoring shall be performed. The order also may
include a requirement that the respondent pay the costs of the monitoring. The
court shall consider the ability of the convicted person to pay for electronic
monitoring.

(2)
A peace officer shall arrest without a warrant and take into custody a person
whom the peace officer has probable cause to believe has violated an order
issued under this chapter that restrains the person or excludes the person from
a residence, workplace, school, or day care, or prohibits the person from
coming within a specified distance of a location or another person, if the
person restrained knows of the order. Presence of the order in the law
enforcement computer-based criminal intelligence information system is not the
only means of establishing knowledge of the order.

(3)
A violation of an order for protection shall also constitute contempt of court,
and is subject to the penalties prescribed by law.

(4)
Any assault that is a violation of an order issued under this chapter and that
does not amount to assault in the first or second degree under RCW 9A.36.011 or
9A.36.021 is a class C felony, and any conduct in violation of a protective
order issued under this chapter that is reckless and creates a substantial risk
of death or serious physical injury to another person is a class C felony.

(5)
A violation of a court order issued under this chapter is a class C felony if
the offender has at least two previous convictions for violating the provisions
of a no-contact order issued under chapter 10.99 RCW, a domestic violence ((protection))
restraining order issued under chapter 26.09, 26.10, ((or)) 26.26,
or 26.44 RCW ((or)), a domestic violence protection order issued
under this chapter, a foreign protection order as defined in chapter
26.52 RCW, or any federal or out-of-state order that is comparable to a
no-contact or protection order issued under Washington law. The previous
convictions may involve the same victim or other victims specifically protected
by the no-contact orders or protection orders the offender violated.

(6)
Upon the filing of an affidavit by the petitioner or any peace officer alleging
that the respondent has violated an order for protection granted under this
chapter, the court may issue an order to the respondent, requiring the
respondent to appear and show cause within fourteen days why the respondent
should not be found in contempt of court and punished accordingly. The hearing
may be held in the court of any county or municipality in which the petitioner
or respondent temporarily or permanently resides at the time of the alleged
violation.

Sec.
23. RCW
26.50.160 and 1995 c 246 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

To
prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different courts and to
give courts needed information for issuance of orders, the judicial information
system shall be available in each district, municipal, and superior court by
July 1, 1997, and shall include a data base containing the following
information:

(1)
The names of the parties and the cause number for every order of protection
issued under this title, every criminal no-contact order issued under chapters
9A.46 and 10.99 RCW, every antiharassment order issued under chapter 10.14
RCW, every dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every third-party
custody action under chapter 26.10 RCW, ((and)) every parentage action
under chapter 26.10 RCW, every restraining order under chapters 26.26 and
26.44 RCW, and every foreign protection order filed under chapter 26.52 RCW;

(2)
A criminal history of the parties; and

(3)
Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in issuing orders under
this chapter as determined by the judicial information system committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. RCW
10.14.130 (Exclusion of certain actions) and 1987 c 280 s 13 are
each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---