BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The superintendent of public instruction, to the extent funds are appropriated
for this purpose, shall design and implement a state-wide K-12 student
accountability and information system. The system shall provide data and other
information to accurately calculate for schools and school districts: (a)
Drop-out and graduation rates; (b) student mobility; (c) student attendance;
(d) academic achievement over time; and (e) other indicators and information
that measure, or contribute to, student achievement and performance. To the
maximum extent possible, the superintendent of public instruction shall design
the system so that it can be integrated with other student, fiscal, and
personnel information systems and so that paperwork is reduced and more staff
time in schools and districts is directed to local work. The superintendent of
public instruction shall ensure that all feasible safeguards are in place to
prevent the unauthorized release of confidential student information and that
state-level access to student-level data be limited to data that is required
for accountability or fiscal purposes. No individual student data regarding
discipline and behavior shall be accessible at the state level. In developing
the system, the superintendent of public instruction shall implement a student
identification system that does not use social security numbers. It is the
intent of the legislature to have the system implemented in all school
districts no later than the beginning of the 2001-02 school year.

(2)
In designing, developing, and implementing the information system in subsection
(1) of this section, the superintendent of public instruction shall consult the
academic achievement and accountability commission, school district personnel,
privacy experts, system designers in other states, and other appropriate
individuals. The system shall be designed so that it is easily implemented in
schools and school district offices.

(3)
By September 1, 2000, the superintendent shall present to the house of
representatives and senate education and fiscal committees, the governor, and
the academic achievement and accountability commission: (a) A prototype of the
system; (b) an implementation timeline; (c) projected future costs; (d) confidentiality
safeguards; and (e) training needs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of eight hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---