BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that families that provide foster care are an invaluable
resource and should be afforded the right, consistent with federal law, to
voice grievances about treatment furnished or not furnished to the foster
child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The departmental and judicial review rights and procedures in RCW
74.08.080 apply to any applicant for or recipient of any program, service,
assistance, or benefits funded in whole or in part by any funds received by the
department or any authorized agency, entity, contractor, or subcontractor
pursuant to Titles IV-B and E of the social security act who is aggrieved by a
decision of the department or authorized agency, entity, contractor, or
subcontractor. The adjudicative proceeding is governed by the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and RCW 74.08.080. For purposes of this
section, affected recipients and applicants include children, foster children,
parents, and foster parents.

---
END ---