BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.0209 and 1987 c 4 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bona
fide charitable or nonprofit organization," as used in this chapter,
means: (1) Any organization duly existing under the provisions of chapter((s))
24.12, 24.20, ((or)) 24.28, or 31.12 RCW, any agricultural fair
authorized under the provisions of chapters 15.76 or 36.37 RCW, or any
nonprofit corporation duly existing under the provisions of chapter 24.03 RCW
for charitable, benevolent, eleemosynary, educational, civic, patriotic,
political, social, fraternal, athletic or agricultural purposes only, or any
nonprofit organization, whether incorporated or otherwise, when found by the
commission to be organized and operating for one or more of the aforesaid
purposes only, all of which in the opinion of the commission have been
organized and are operated primarily for purposes other than the operation of
gambling activities authorized under this chapter; or (2) any corporation which
has been incorporated under Title 36 U.S.C. and whose principal purposes are to
furnish volunteer aid to members of the armed forces of the United States and
also to carry on a system of national and international relief and to apply the
same in mitigating the sufferings caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods,
and other national calamities and to devise and carry on measures for
preventing the same. Such an organization must have been organized and
continuously operating for at least twelve calendar months immediately
preceding making application for any license to operate a gambling activity, or
the operation of any gambling activity authorized by this chapter for which no
license is required. It must have not less than fifteen bona fide active
members each with the right to an equal vote in the election of the officers,
or board members, if any, who determine the policies of the organization in
order to receive a gambling license. An organization must demonstrate to the
commission that it has made significant progress toward the accomplishment of
the purposes of the organization during the twelve consecutive month period preceding
the date of application for a license or license renewal. The fact that
contributions to an organization do not qualify for charitable contribution
deduction purposes or that the organization is not otherwise exempt from
payment of federal income taxes pursuant to the internal revenue code of 1954,
as amended, shall constitute prima facie evidence that the organization is not
a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization for the purposes of this
section.

Any person, association or organization which pays its employees,
including members, compensation other than is reasonable therefor under the
local prevailing wage scale shall be deemed paying compensation based in part
or whole upon receipts relating to gambling activities authorized under this
chapter and shall not be a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization for
the purposes of this chapter.

---
END ---