BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
53.40.030 and 1983 c 167 s 137 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The port commission shall determine the form, conditions, and denominations of
all such bonds, the maturity date or dates which the bonds so sold shall bear,
and the interest rate or rates thereon. It shall not be necessary that all
bonds of the same authorized issue bear the same interest rate or rates.
Principal and interest of the bonds shall be payable at such place or places as
may be fixed and determined by the port commission. The bonds may contain
provisions for registration thereof as to principal only or as to both
principal and interest as provided in RCW 39.46.030. The bonds shall have
interest payable at such time or times as may be determined by the port commission
and in such amounts as it may prescribe. The port commission may provide for
retirement of bonds issued under this chapter at any time or times prior to
their maturity, and in such manner and upon the payment of such premiums as may
be fixed and determined by resolution of the port commission. The port
commission may delegate authority to the chief executive officer of the port to
approve the interest rate or rates, maturity date or dates, redemption rights,
interest payment dates, and principal maturities under such terms and
conditions approved by resolution of the port commission.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds may
be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

---
END ---