BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.44.030 and 1995 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is unlawful for any person to operate upon the public highways of this state
any vehicle having an overall length, with or without load, in excess of forty
feet. This restriction does not apply to (1) a municipal transit vehicle, (2)
auto stage, private carrier bus ((or)), school bus, or motor
home with an overall length not to exceed forty-six feet, or (3) an
articulated auto stage with an overall length not to exceed sixty-one feet.

It
is unlawful for any person to operate upon the public highways of this state
any combination consisting of a tractor and semitrailer that has a semitrailer
length in excess of fifty-three feet or a combination consisting of a tractor
and two trailers in which the combined length of the trailers exceeds sixty-one
feet, with or without load.

It
is unlawful for any person to operate on the highways of this state any
combination consisting of a truck and trailer, or log truck and stinger-steered
pole trailer, with an overall length, with or without load, in excess of
seventy-five feet. However, a combination of vehicles transporting automobiles
or boats may have a front overhang of three feet and a rear overhang of four
feet beyond this allowed length. "Stinger-steered," as used in this
section, means the coupling device is located behind the tread of the tires of
the last axle of the towing vehicle.

These
length limitations do not apply to vehicles transporting poles, pipe,
machinery, or other objects of a structural nature that cannot be dismembered
and operated by a public utility when required for emergency repair of public
service facilities or properties, but in respect to night transportation every
such vehicle and load thereon shall be equipped with a sufficient number of
clearance lamps on both sides and marker lamps upon the extreme ends of any
projecting load to clearly mark the dimensions of the load.

The length limitations described in this section are exclusive of
safety and energy conservation devices, such as mud flaps and splash and spray
suppressant devices, refrigeration units or air compressors, and other devices
that the department determines to be necessary for safe and efficient operation
of commercial vehicles. No device excluded under this paragraph from the
limitations of this section may have, by its design or use, the capability to
carry cargo.

---
END ---