BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.18.100 and 1997 c 428 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No insurance policy form other than surety bond forms, forms exempt under RCW
48.18.103, or application form where written application is required and is to
be attached to the policy, or printed life or disability rider or endorsement
form shall be issued, delivered, or used unless it has been filed with and
approved by the commissioner. This section shall not apply to policies, riders
or endorsements of unique character designed for and used with relation to
insurance upon a particular subject, or for a commercial property casualty
policyholder as defined in this section.

(2)
Every such filing containing a certification, in a form approved by the
commissioner, by either the chief executive officer of the insurer or by an
actuary who is a member of the American academy of actuaries, attesting that
the filing complies with Title 48 RCW and Title 284 of the Washington
Administrative Code, may be used by such insurer immediately after filing with
the commissioner. The commissioner may order an insurer to cease using a
certified form upon the grounds set forth in RCW 48.18.110. This subsection
shall not apply to certain types of policy forms designated by the commissioner
by rule.

(3)
Except as provided in RCW 48.18.103, every filing that does not contain a
certification pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be made not less
than thirty days in advance of any such issuance, delivery, or use. At the
expiration of such thirty days the form so filed shall be deemed approved
unless prior thereto it has been affirmatively approved or disapproved by order
of the commissioner. The commissioner may extend by not more than an
additional fifteen days the period within which he or she may so affirmatively
approve or disapprove any such form, by giving notice of such extension before
expiration of the initial thirty-day period. At the expiration of any such
period as so extended, and in the absence of such prior affirmative approval or
disapproval, any such form shall be deemed approved. The commissioner may
withdraw any such approval at any time for cause. By approval of any such form
for immediate use, the commissioner may waive any unexpired portion of such
initial thirty-day waiting period.

(4)
The commissioner's order disapproving any such form or withdrawing a previous
approval shall state the grounds therefor.

(5)
No such form shall knowingly be so issued or delivered as to which the
commissioner's approval does not then exist.

(6)
The commissioner may, by order or rule, exempt the form of any policy
sold to a commercial property casualty policyholder from the filing
requirements of this section ((for so long as he or she deems proper, any
insurance document or form or type thereof as specified in such order, to which
in his or her opinion this section may not practicably be applied, or the
filing and approval of which are, in his or her opinion, not desirable or
necessary for the protection of the public)).

(7)
Every member or subscriber to a rating organization shall adhere to the form
filings made on its behalf by the organization. Deviations from such
organization are permitted only when filed with the commissioner in accordance
with this chapter.

(8)
For the purposes of this section, a "commercial property casualty
policyholder" is defined as an insured who uses the services of an
insurance agent or broker to purchase insurance, has a risk manager, and
certifies that it meets any two of the following four criteria:

(a)
Pays an annual aggregate insurance premium of one hundred fifty thousand
dollars;

(b)
Generates annual net revenues or sales in excess of one hundred million
dollars;

(c)
Employs two hundred or more people; and

(d)
Possesses a net worth in excess of fifty million dollars.

(9)
For the purposes of this section, a "risk manager" is an employed,
retained, or contracted person who is a licensed insurance agent or broker in
Washington state or has a professional insurance designation allowing the
person to serve in this capacity.

(10) Policies issued to a commercial property casualty
policyholder shall contain a disclaimer in language similar to the following:
"This policy is exempt from the form filing and approval requirements of
the Washington state insurance code (specifically RCW 48.18.100)."

---
END ---