BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Through July 1, 2001, the gambling commission may not process or approve any
applications, new or existing, for participation in the enhanced card room
pilot program or process or issue any licenses in any successor licensing
program for minicasinos.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---