BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state department of transportation and the local authorities are authorized to
reserve all or any portion of any highway under their respective jurisdictions,
including any designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of
public transportation vehicles, electric-powered vehicles, or private
motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of passengers when
such limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the highway or will
aid in the conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing such
exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be
effective at all times or at specified times of day or on specified days. Violation
of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority under
this section is a traffic infraction.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.52.025 and 1974 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Highway authorities of the state, counties, and incorporated cities
and towns, in addition to the specific powers granted in this chapter, shall
also have, and may exercise, relative to limited access facilities, any and all
additional authority, now or hereafter vested in them relative to highways or
streets within their respective jurisdictions, and may regulate, restrict, or
prohibit the use of such limited access facilities by various classes of
vehicles or traffic. Such highway authorities may reserve any limited access
facility or portions thereof, including designated lanes or ramps for the
exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles, privately
owned buses, electric-powered vehicles, or private motor vehicles
carrying not less than a specified number of passengers when such limitation
will increase the efficient utilization of the highway facility or will aid in
the conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing such exclusive
or preferential use of a highway facility may be declared to be effective at
all time or at specified times of day or on specified days.

---
END ---