BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.14.065 and 1987 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person or entity, or successor to such person or entity, having a statement of
claim on file ((with)) in the water rights claims registry ((on
April 20, 1987,)) may submit to the department of ecology for filing((,))
an amendment to such a statement of claim if the submitted amendment is based
on:

(1)
An error in estimation of the quantity of the applicant's water claim
prescribed in RCW 90.14.051 if the applicant provides reasons for the failure
to claim such right in the original claim;

(2)
A change in circumstances not foreseeable at the time the original claim was
filed, if such change in circumstances relates only to the manner of
transportation or diversion of the water and not to the use or quantity of such
water; or

(3)
The amendment is ministerial in nature.

The
department shall accept any such submission and file the same in the registry
unless the department by written determination concludes that the requirements
of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section have not been satisfied. Any
person aggrieved by a determination of the department may obtain a review
thereof by filing a petition for review with the pollution control hearings
board within thirty days of the date of the determination by the department.
The provisions of RCW 90.14.081 shall apply to any amendment filed under this
section.

This
section applies to statements of claim filed with the department during any
filing period authorized by this chapter and filed by the department in the
water rights claims registry.