BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.50.060 and 1984 c 258 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A city or town electing to establish a municipal court pursuant to this chapter
may terminate such court by adoption of an appropriate ordinance. However no
municipal court may be terminated unless the municipality has complied with RCW
3.50.805, 35.22.425, 35.23.595, ((35.24.455)) 35.23.555,
35.27.515, 35.30.100, and 35A.11.200.

(2) A city or town newly establishing a municipal court
pursuant to this chapter shall do so by adoption of an appropriate ordinance on
or before December 1 of any year, to take effect January 1 of the following
year. Within thirty days of establishing a new court, the city or town
shall provide written notice of the new court's existence to the supreme court.

---
END ---