BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of this act to have voters reaffirm the financing mechanism passed
by the legislature and approved by the governor on October 17, 1995, that
authorized the financing for the construction of a stadium located in King
county and occupied by a professional major league baseball team.

(1)
If the referendum is adopted and ratified by the voters, the financing
mechanism adopted in chapter 1, Laws of 1995 3rd sp. sess. is reaffirmed.

(2)
If the referendum is rejected by the voters, the governor shall immediately
take the following actions:

(a)
Locate and negotiate with a private entity for the sale of the stadium
authorized under chapter 1, Laws of 1995 3rd sp. sess., in an amount sufficient
to retire the state and local government portion of the outstanding debt on the
stadium; or

(b)
Renegotiate the lease and require the professional major league baseball team
that entered into the agreement required in RCW 82.14.360 to make lease
payments in an amount sufficient to retire the state and local portion of the
outstanding debt on the stadium authorized under chapter 1, Laws of 1995 3rd
sp. sess.; or

(c)
Enter into binding arbitration with the professional major league baseball team
that signed the agreement required in RCW 82.14.360 for the sale of the stadium
in an amount sufficient to retire the state and local portion of the
outstanding debt on the stadium authorized under chapter 1, Laws of 1995 3rd
sp. sess.; or

(d)
Appoint a governor's stadium finance restructure task force with the task of
developing alternative financing mechanisms to state and local bond financing
of the stadium. The financing mechanisms adopted by the task force must
provide adequate revenues to retire the state and local portion of the
outstanding debt on the stadium authorized under chapter 1, Laws of 1995 3rd
sp. sess.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption
and ratification, or rejection, at the next regular general election to be held
in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state
Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

(2)
The attorney general shall prepare an explanatory statement and transmit that
statement regarding the referendum to the secretary of state no later than the
last Monday in September before the general election.

(3) The secretary of state shall prepare and distribute a voters'
pamphlet addressing this referendum measure following the procedures and
requirements of chapter 29.81 RCW, except that the secretary of state may
establish different deadlines for the appointment of committees to draft arguments
for and against the referendum, for submitting arguments for and against the
referendum, and for submitting rebuttal statements for and against the
referendum. The voters' pamphlet description of the referendum shall include
information to inform the public that approval of the referendum is a
reaffirmation of the financing mechanism used to finance the construction of
the stadium authorized under chapter 1, Laws of 1995 3rd sp. sess. Rejection
of the referendum will require the governor to negotiate for either the sale of
or restructuring of the outstanding debt on the professional baseball stadium
located in King county and known as "Safeco Field" under the terms of
section 1 of this act.

---
END ---