BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
tremendous increases in the costs of election campaigns, when coupled with
recently enacted limits on campaign contributions, creates a situation favoring
the election of wealthy candidates able to spend substantial amounts of their
own resources for the purpose of winning elections and those candidates who
receive their contributions from sources that have been able to proliferate to
avoid, as a practical matter, the contribution limits. In order to decrease
the advantage of a candidate's wealth or nimble contribution sources in
election contests, the legislature enacts this law directing the adoption of voluntary
campaign spending limits for state election contests and disclosure of those
candidates who agree to abide by the voluntary limits and those who do not.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The public disclosure commission shall adopt recommended spending limits for
candidates for the following offices: Governor, lieutenant governor, secretary
of state, treasurer, auditor, attorney general, commissioner of public lands,
insurance commissioner, superintendent of public instruction, member of the
state senate, and member of the state house of representatives. In adopting
the recommended spending limits, the commission shall consider the average
expenditure amounts for the candidates who received the highest and next
highest number of votes in the 2000 general elections for each office for which
the commission is required to recommend a spending limit. Unless the
commission finds that these amounts would be inappropriate or unrealistic or
that adjustments in the amounts to reflect geographic differences in
legislative districts are warranted, the commission shall base its recommended
spending limits on the average expenditure amounts.

(2)
Beginning in 2003, the commission shall biennially adjust the recommended
spending limits adopted under subsection (1) of this section based on changes
in economic conditions as reflected in the inflationary index used by the
commission under RCW 42.17.370.

(3)
Each candidate for an office subject to a recommended spending limit may
execute, and file with the commission, a promise that the candidate will stay
within the limit. A candidate's promise that is executed and filed in
conformance with this section and with the rules adopted by the commission to
implement this section is binding on the candidate. A candidate who violates
his or her promise to stay within the voluntary spending limit is in violation
of this chapter. The commission shall remove the name of such a candidate from
the list prepared under subsection (5) of this section.

(4)
The commission shall prescribe the form that will be used for executing a
promise under this section. The promise must be filed not later than the tenth
day after the close of the filing period for the office.

(5)
For each election involving an office for which voluntary expenditure limits
have been established under this section, the commission shall compile a list
of those candidates who filed promises in a timely manner. The commission
shall promptly make the list available to the media and the public. The
announcement of its availability must be made by the executive director of the
commission or an employee designated by the chair of the commission to make
such an announcement. During an election campaign, the commission shall
periodically publish a list identifying each candidate who has executed a
binding promise under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 29.81 RCW to read as follows:

The
secretary of state shall add to each voters' pamphlet a list of the campaign
spending limits recommended by the public disclosure commission for each of the
state offices for which the statements of candidates appear in the pamphlet and
a brief explanation of the effect of a promise filed with the commission under
section 2 of this act.

In
preparing the voters' pamphlet for publication, the secretary of state shall
secure from the public disclosure commission its most current list of
candidates who have promised to limit spending, as that list is specified in
section 2 of this act. Using this list, the secretary shall add a prominent
notice in the candidates' pamphlet to accompany the statement or photograph of
each person on the list. The notice will state: "Has promised to abide
by the voluntary spending limit for this campaign." With the statement in
the pamphlet of each other candidate for state office, the secretary shall add
a prominent notice stating: "Has NOT promised to abide by
the voluntary spending limit for this campaign." The notice will
accompany the statement or photograph of each such other candidate.

For
the purposes of this section, "state office" means the offices listed
in section 2(1) of this act for which the public disclosure commission has
adopted recommended spending limits.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---