BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that marriage is an institution that predates our existence
as a state and is of primary importance to the continued welfare of the people.

Marriage
establishes a relationship of companionship and affection between a man and a
woman and between parents and their children that is in the best interest of
each spouse and the best interest of the children resulting from the marriage
relationship.

Spouses
and children have a right to expect that the marital relationship will be
protected from wrongful interference by third parties as long as the marriage
continues, especially when the relationship is weak or struggling.

It
is the policy of the state of Washington to encourage, nurture, and protect the
institution of marriage and the spouses and children therein, and to provide
legal redress against persons who wrongfully interfere with the marital
relationship.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
party to a marriage has a legal cause of action against a third party who
wrongfully interferes with the marital relationship, thus causing a loss of
consortium to the injured spouse.

An
act of adultery is conclusive proof of wrongful interference and cause of loss
of consortium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Marriage" means any duly recognized marriage under chapter 26.04 RCW
that has included voluntary cohabitation within the three months before the
time an action is filed under this chapter, and for which no decree of legal
separation has been entered.

(2)
"Wrongful interference" means wrongfully and intentionally or
negligently intervening in, intruding upon, or interrupting the marital
relationship.

(3)
"Loss of consortium" includes, but is not limited to, loss of love,
affection, companionship, care, services, and society.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. An
action brought under this chapter must be filed within two years after the
filing party has knowledge of wrongful interference by a third party.

A
party injured by wrongful interference with the marital relationship is entitled
to all general and specific damages, including mental pain and suffering,
attorney fees, and other costs of litigation.

A
party bringing an action under this chapter is entitled to injunctive relief
against any third party wrongfully interfering with the marital relationship.

No
bond may be required for such an injunction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
provisions of this chapter are to be liberally construed to effectuate the
policies and purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
the event of conflict between this chapter and any other provision of law, the
provisions of this chapter shall govern.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
morals, and safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 26 RCW.

---
END ---