BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that good teachers are the foundation of the state's
education system. These educators are central to assuring excellence and rigor
in the educational experience of every student. The legislature also finds
that the state has many experienced and exemplary teachers who could help
enrich the teaching experiences of other teachers in their buildings, including
beginning teachers. The legislature further finds that the state lacks a
career advancement structure that provides administrative level compensation
packages for outstanding teachers who continue classroom teaching while they
act as instructional leaders for their buildings. The legislature intends to
create a pilot program designed to keep master teachers working directly with
students in the classroom while they are providing instructional leadership and
mentoring for other teachers in their buildings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
master teacher pilot program is established. The purposes of the program are
to:

(1)
Provide exemplary teachers with career advancement opportunities to serve as
master teachers while they remain in their own classrooms half time working
directly with students;

(2)
Provide an opportunity for experienced and exemplary teachers to help and
mentor new teachers and other teachers in the building;

(3)
Help beginning teachers work toward mastery of state-defined knowledge and
skill standards for effective teaching;

(4)
Advance school or district student learning objectives;

(5)
Create master teacher selection processes that will permit master teachers to
be effective instructional resources for other educators in their buildings;
and

(6)
Help the state design a career advancement program for educators that
effectively uses and compensates the instructional skills and knowledge of
master teachers, good teachers, beginning teachers, and other educators.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The master teacher pilot program shall be administered by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction. The office shall design and administer
the program with the assistance of an advisory committee that shall include,
but need not be limited to teachers, administrators, school directors, parents,
and representatives of higher education and business and labor organizations.

(2)
The program shall include, but need not be limited to the following components:

(a)
Master teachers shall be assigned to teach in their own classrooms half time
and act as instructional leaders and mentors for other teachers in the building
half time;

(b)
Master teachers should have compensation levels approximately comparable to
those of principals;

(c)
Master teachers should be selected through processes that have the support of
parents, teachers, principals, building staff, school directors, and members of
the community;

(d)
One master teacher may be selected for approximately every two hundred fifty
students;

(e)
With very limited exceptions, master teachers are not expected to assume
building level administrative duties; and

(f)
Master teachers will be expected to work beyond the districts' contracted days
for certificated personnel.

(3)
The selection criteria for master teachers shall include, but need not be
limited to:

(a)
The ability to demonstrate exemplary skills and knowledge about effective instructional
and classroom management practices, the implementation and interpretation of
student assessment strategies, and planning and instruction aligned with the
essential academic learning requirements;

(b)
Training and experience as a coach and mentor;

(c)
Outstanding communication skills; and

(d)
A commitment to the purposes of the program.

(4)
At least annually, the office shall provide or fund training specifically
designed to train and support master teachers.

(5)
Participation in the pilot program shall have the demonstrated support of, at a
minimum, the school's board of directors, superintendent, principal, and
teachers.

(6)
Participating master teachers, beginning teachers, cooperating teachers, school
administrators, and others involved in the pilot program shall annually
evaluate the effectiveness of the program and share with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction information on the role of master teachers
in the school, any results from the program, and any recommendations for
program improvements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
duties of master teachers should include, but need not be limited to:

(1)
Observing and providing feedback to other teachers in the building;

(2)
Conducting demonstration classes;

(3)
Working with teachers to develop specific knowledge and skills that improve
student learning;

(4)
Working with teachers to measure and analyze improvements in student learning;

(5)
Assisting other mentors, beginning teachers, and cooperating teachers;

(6)
Working with other teachers in the building on school and district student
learning objectives;

(7)
Working with teachers to formulate clear plans with specific benchmarks and
improvement indicators over time for the improvement of knowledge and skills.
The knowledge and skills should be based on state-wide standards for effective
teaching practices; and

(8)
Instructing students half time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
By May 31, 2000, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide to interested school districts a preliminary program design including a
process for the selection of pilot schools for the 2000-01 school year. The
program design shall incorporate, at a minimum, the provisions of sections 2
and 3 of this act, and any additional requirements contained in this section or
any act containing an appropriation for the program.

(2)
By August 1, 2000, to the extent that funding is provided through appropriation
for this purpose, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, with
the assistance of the advisory committee created in section 3 of this act, and
subject to the following conditions, shall select pilot schools for the 2000-01
school year.

(a)
The process used to select pilot schools shall be reviewed in advance by the
advisory committee.

(b)
Each participating school may select a maximum of two master teachers.

(c)
The pilot schools, to the extent feasible, shall include at least one elementary
school, one middle or junior high school, and one high school, and shall be
geographically and demographically varied.

(d)
Master teachers shall be appointed for approximately an eleven-month to
one-year period.

(e)
Master teachers shall receive the full-time salary to which they would normally
be entitled as certificated teachers plus an additional stipend of ten thousand
dollars.

(3)
By September 30, 2000, pilot schools shall select their master teachers and
commence the program.

(4)
By December 1, 2000, the office shall provide to the governor and appropriate
fiscal and policy committees of the house of representatives and the senate a
preliminary report on the program. The report shall include an estimate of the
number of schools that wish to participate during the 2001-03 biennium, the
approximate cost of funding participation of interested schools, and any
recommendations for program improvements. The report may include estimates of
the cost of phasing-in additional participation in the program. The report, or
a subsequent report, shall include one or more possible designs for
articulated, educator career advancement programs that create opportunities for
and recognize the skills and contributions of paraprofessional, beginning
teachers, good teachers, and master teachers.

(5)
By December 1, 2006, the office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall provide to the governor and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees
of the house of representatives and the senate a final report on the master
teacher pilot program. The report shall include an analysis of the
effectiveness of the program for improving both student learning and the
teaching experiences of teachers in pilot schools. The report shall also
include the findings and recommendations of the office and of the advisory
committee for continuation, modification, or elimination of the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 28A.405 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act expire June 30, 2007.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
sum of two hundred fifty dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---