BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
88.02.040 and 1989 c 393 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall provide for the issuance of vessel registrations and may
appoint agents for collecting fees and issuing registration numbers and
decals. Fees for vessel registrations collected by the director shall be
deposited in the general fund: PROVIDED, That any amount above one million one
hundred thousand dollars per fiscal year shall be allocated to counties by the
state treasurer for boating safety/education and law enforcement programs.
Eligibility for such allocation shall be contingent upon approval of the local
boating safety program by the state parks and recreation commission. Fund
allocation shall be based on the numbers of registered vessels by county of
moorage. Each benefiting county shall be responsible for equitable
distribution of such allocation to other jurisdictions with approved boating
safety programs within said county. Any fees not allocated to counties due to
the absence of an approved boating safety program, shall be allocated to the
commission for awards to local governments to offset law enforcement and
boating safety impacts of boaters recreating in jurisdictions other than where
registered.

(2) The department shall include a written statement on all
original and renewal vessel registrations providing notice of the requirements
of RCW 79A.60.160(4) and of the penalty for violation.

---
END ---