BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW to read as follows:

An
employer who discloses information about a former or current employee's or job
applicant's substance abuse test results to a prospective or current employer
of that employee is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune from
civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.73 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to an employer who discloses
information about a former or current employee's or job applicant's substance
abuse test results to a prospective or current employer of that employee. The
disclosing employer is presumed to be acting in good faith and is immune from
civil liability for such disclosure or its consequences.

---
END ---