BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state patrol shall compile and publish a list of automobiles and
trucks that, as manufactured, do not meet the final standards adopted by the
National Highway Traffic Safety Administration for daytime running lights and
headlights. The list must show model year, model name, description, and such
other details as will enable the public to identify vehicles that do not meet
the final standards. The list must include vehicles that do not violate
standards in force at the time of manufacture. The term "final
standards" means the standards that will be required after any phasing-in
time has elapsed. The list must be made available to the public by October 1,
2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

The director shall include on automobile and truck registration
applications these questions: "Have you added headlights or modified the
factory-installed headlights on this vehicle? Have you changed or disabled the
factory-installed muffler on this vehicle?" Responses must be recorded on
the vehicle's registration in a form acceptable to the state patrol for law
enforcement purposes.

---
END ---