BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the state of Washington is nationally recognized in the
areas of financial management, capital management, human resources, and
managing for results and information technology; that the executive branch of
state government has undertaken regulatory reform efforts, performance-based
budgeting efforts, and programs to improve quality, efficiency, and
effectiveness; and that the roles performed by the legislative auditor and the
state auditor are valued.

It
is the intent of the legislature that public confidence in government at all levels
is essential and must be promoted by all possible means, that the state's
stewardship over public funds is a fundamental responsibility, and that this
chapter is designed to help strengthen state management of public resources and
the systems that provide citizens the information they need to assess
accountability and to make informed decisions.

The
purposes of this chapter are to:

(1)
Establish a permanent means of bringing citizens, public employees,
policymakers, executives, businesses, labor organizations, and management
experts together for the continuous enhancement of state government and agency
performance and accountability and to make our Washington state government and
its agencies the most effective and efficient in the nation;

(2)
Assess the quality and integration of state agency strategic and quality plans,
performance measurement, and performance assessment in planning, budgeting, and
managing the state's resources;

(3)
Evaluate whether state government and its agencies make strategic and
consistent efforts to engage citizens in dialogue, planning, and determining
accountability for programs and services;

(4)
Determine whether citizens have the information they need to assess
accountability and adequate opportunities to participate in their government;

(5)
Assess the success of state agencies implementing and using new technologies to
improve services, facilitate citizen access, and measure and enhance the
satisfaction of state agency customers;

(6)
Evaluate the effectiveness of state agencies publicizing performance results
and successes;

(7)
Use independent and comprehensive reviews to affirm the effectiveness and
efficiency of state government agency management and use of public resources;
and

(8)
Establish benchmarks of the best practices of government at all levels in
organizing, managing, and conducting the annual, independent reviews of the
effectiveness and efficiency of state government agency management and use of
public resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
citizens' alliance for government accountability is established as a panel
composed of six members as follows: (1) The governor or the governor's
designee; (2) the state auditor or the state auditor's designee; and (3) four
citizen members, one of which is appointed by the leader of each of the two
major party caucuses of the house of representatives and the senate. The
members of the alliance shall select a chair from one of the four citizen
members. The alliance shall appoint task forces as needed that reflect the
state's economic, social, ethnic, and political diversity, including private
sector, for-profit, corporate chief executive officers, private sector,
nonprofit organization chief executives, state employees, representatives of a
labor organization, management experts, managers or administrators from county
or city government, and the general citizenry.

Volunteers
shall be sought to participate. The alliance may create subcommittees and
advisory panels to assist in its deliberations and may contract for specialized
expertise.

The
alliance may solicit charitable gifts, grants, and donations that are placed
into the citizens' alliance for government accountability account and used to
offset general fund moneys appropriated for such purposes.

All
members of the alliance shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the
performance of duties of the alliance in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
alliance shall make reports and recommendations to increase and improve state
government efficiency, effectiveness, organization, operations, and
accountability and to achieve costs savings. By December 31, 2000, the
alliance shall present the legislature and governor with a strategic work plan
to accomplish its purposes and shall make annual reports to the legislature and
governor thereafter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
citizens' alliance for government accountability account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may only be
expended to finance the activities of the alliance and all expenditures must be
authorized by the director of the office of financial management or the
director's designee. Moneys in the account are not subject to appropriation
and are not subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
alliance shall convene summit conferences as needed throughout the state and
shall actively solicit participation by state employees, management experts,
and the general citizenry.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
citizens' alliance for government accountability and its powers and duties
shall terminate on June 30, 2007, as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective June 30, 2008:

(1)
Section 1 of this act;

(2)
Section 2 of this act;

(3)
Section 3 of this act;

(4)
Section 4 of this act;

(5)
Section 5 of this act; and

(6)
Section 10 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 5 and 10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the state general fund
to the citizens' alliance for government accountability account for the
purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---