BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature makes the following findings:

(1)
Current federal laws prohibit the sale of human organs and tissues for research
or transplantation;

(2)
State law on the sale of human organs and tissues for research or
transplantation is in need of clarification;

(3)
Federal law prohibits any fetal tissue donations without the informed consent
of the patient, the researcher, and the donee in cases involving federally
funded research;

(4)
Allegations regarding the transfer of fetal tissue for valuable consideration
requires an investigation to determine if current laws banning the sale of
organs are being broken; and

(5)
The uniform anatomical gift act, chapter 68.50 RCW, should be clarified to
address issues raised by fetal tissue use and research.

Sec.
2. RCW
68.50.530 and 1996 c 178 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout
RCW 68.50.520 through 68.50.630, section 3 of this act, and 68.50.901
through 68.50.904.

(1)
"Anatomical gift" means a donation of all or part of a human body to
take effect upon or after death.

(2)
"Decedent" means a deceased individual.

(3)
"Document of gift" means a card, a statement attached to or imprinted
on a motor vehicle operator's license, a will, or other writing used to make an
anatomical gift.

(4)
"Donor" means an individual who makes an anatomical gift of all or
part of the individual's body. "Donor" also means a patient who
makes an anatomical gift of fetal tissue.

(5)
"Enucleator" means an individual who is qualified to remove or
process eyes or parts of eyes.

(6)
"Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, or as a
hospital under the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the
United States government, a state, or a subdivision of a state.

(7)
"Part" means an organ, tissue, eye, bone, artery, blood, fluid, or
other portion of a human body.

(8)
"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, joint venture, association, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(9)
"Physician" or "surgeon" means an individual licensed or
otherwise authorized to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine
and surgery under chapters 18.71 and 18.57 RCW.

(10)
"Procurement organization" means a person licensed, accredited, or
approved under the laws of any state for procurement, distribution, or storage
of human bodies or parts.

(11)
"State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States,
the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(12)
"Technician" means an individual who is qualified to remove or
process a part.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

If
the anatomical gift is a byproduct of a routine medical procedure, and does not
involve the death of the donor, informed consent as set out in RCW 7.70.060 is
required. If the patient is a minor, the provisions of RCW 7.70.065 apply.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
house of representatives requests that the office of the attorney general
conduct an investigation to determine if illegal trafficking of fetal remains
is occurring in Washington state. The results of the investigation shall be
reported to the health committee of the house of representatives by January 1,
2001.

---
END ---