BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.175 and 1988 c 153 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the offender violates any condition of postrelease supervision, a hearing may
be conducted in the same manner as provided in RCW 9.94A.200. Jurisdiction
shall be with the court of the county in which the offender was sentenced.
However, the court may order a change of venue to the offender's county of
residence or where the violation occurred, for the purpose of holding a
violation hearing.

After
the hearing, the court may order the offender to be confined for up to sixty
days per violation in the county jail. Reimbursement to a city or county for
the care of offenders who are detained solely for violating a condition of
postrelease supervision shall be ((under)) made pursuant to RCW 70.48.440.
A county shall be reimbursed for indigent defense costs for offenders who are
detained solely for violating a condition of postrelease supervision in
accordance with regulations to be promulgated by the office of financial
management. An offender may be held in jail at state expense pending the
hearing, and any time served while awaiting the hearing shall be credited
against confinement imposed for a violation. The court shall retain
jurisdiction for the purpose of holding the violation hearing and imposing a
sanction.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.190 and 1995 c 108 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A sentence that includes a term or terms of confinement totaling more than one
year shall be served in a facility or institution operated, or utilized under
contract, by the state. Except as provided for in subsections (3) and
(5) of this section, a sentence of not more than one year of confinement
shall be served in a facility operated, licensed, or utilized under contract,
by the county, or if home detention or work crew has been ordered by the court,
in the residence of either the defendant or a member of the defendant's
immediate family.

(2)
If a county uses a state partial confinement facility for the partial confinement
of a person sentenced to confinement for not more than one year, the county
shall reimburse the state for the use of the facility as provided for in this
subsection. The office of financial management shall set the rate of
reimbursement based upon the average per diem cost per offender in the
facility. ((The office of financial management shall determine to what
extent, if any, reimbursement shall be reduced or eliminated because of funds
provided by the legislature to the department of corrections for the purpose of
covering the cost of county use of state partial confinement facilities.))
The office of financial management shall reestablish reimbursement rates each
even-numbered year.

(3)
A person who is sentenced for a felony to a term of not more than one year, and
who is committed or returned to incarceration in a state facility on another
felony conviction, either under the indeterminate sentencing laws, chapter 9.95
RCW, or under this chapter shall serve all terms of confinement, including a
sentence of not more than one year, in a facility or institution operated, or
utilized under contract, by the state, consistent with the provisions of RCW
9.94A.400.

(4)
For sentences imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(6) which have a sentence range
of over one year, notwithstanding any other provision of this section all such
sentences regardless of length shall be served in a facility or institution
operated, or utilized under contract, by the state.

(5)
Where an offender is serving a total consecutive period of confinement greater
than one year whether from one or more than one sentence, that period of
confinement shall be served in a facility or institution operated, or utilized
under contract, by the state. In calculating whether the total period of
confinement exceeds one year, all terms of confinement, including terms of
confinement for offenses classified as misdemeanors or gross misdemeanors
whether or not the offender is also sentenced to a period of confinement for an
offense classified as a felony, shall be included.

(6)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the length of any
sentence, the period of confinement any inmate serves, or any statutes or rules
pertaining to earned early release.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.207 and 1999 c 196 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary may issue warrants for the arrest of any offender who violates a
condition of community placement or community custody. The arrest warrants
shall authorize any law enforcement or peace officer or community corrections
officer of this state or any other state where such offender may be located, to
arrest the offender and place him or her in total confinement pending
disposition of the alleged violation. The department shall compensate the
local jurisdiction at the office of financial management's adjudicated rate, in
accordance with RCW 70.48.440.

(2)
A community corrections officer, if he or she has reasonable cause to believe
an offender in community placement or community custody has violated a
condition of community placement or community custody, may suspend the person's
community placement or community custody status and arrest or cause the arrest
and detention in total confinement of the offender, pending the determination
of the secretary as to whether the violation has occurred. The community
corrections officer shall report to the secretary all facts and circumstances
and the reasons for the action of suspending community placement or community
custody status. A violation of a condition of community placement or community
custody shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for purposes of RCW
9.94A.195. The authority granted to community corrections officers under this
section shall be in addition to that set forth in RCW 9.94A.195.

(((2)))
(3) Inmates, as defined in RCW 72.09.015, who ((have been transferred
to)) are in community custody and who are detained in a local
correctional facility are the financial responsibility of the department of
corrections((, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section)).
The community custody inmate shall be removed from the local correctional
facility, except as provided in subsection (((3))) (4) of this
section, not later than eight days, excluding weekends and holidays, following
admittance to the local correctional facility and notification that the inmate
is available for movement to a state correctional institution.

(((3)))
(4) The department may negotiate with local correctional authorities for
an ((additional period of detention; however, sex offenders sanctioned for
community custody violations under RCW 9.94A.205(2) to a term of confinement
shall remain in the local correctional facility for the complete term of the
sanction. For confinement sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a), the
local correctional facility shall be financially responsible. For confinement
sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.205(2)(b), the department of corrections
shall be financially responsible for that portion of the sanction served during
the time in which the sex offender is on community custody in lieu of earned
release, and the local correctional facility shall be financially responsible
for that portion of the sanction served by the sex offender after the time in
which the sex offender is on community custody in lieu of earned release. The
department, in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs and those counties in which the sheriff does not operate a
correctional facility, shall establish a methodology for determining the
department's local correctional facilities bed utilization rate, for each
county in calendar year 1998, for offenders being held for violations of
conditions of community custody, community placement, or community supervision.
For confinement sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.205(2) (c) or (d), the local
correctional facility shall continue to be financially responsible to the
extent of the calendar year 1998 bed utilization rate. If the department's use
of bed space in local correctional facilities of any county for confinement
sanctions imposed on offenders sentenced to a term of community custody under
RCW 9.94A.205(2) (c) or (d) exceeds the 1998 bed utilization rate for the
county, the department shall compensate the county for the excess use at the
per diem rate equal to the lowest rate charged by the county under its contract
with a municipal government during the year in which the use occurs)) inmate
described in subsection (3) of this section to remain in a local correctional
facility for the length of the confinement sanction that is imposed. In such
event, the department shall compensate the local correctional authority for the
cost of confinement in accordance with RCW 70.48.440.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.48.440 and 1984 c 235 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of financial management, in consultation with the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall establish a uniform
equitable rate for reimbursing cities and counties for the care of sentenced
felons who are the financial responsibility of the department of corrections
and are detained or incarcerated in a city or county jail.

((Until
June 30, 1985, the rate for the care of sentenced felons who are the financial
responsibility of the department of corrections shall be ten dollars per day.
Cost of extraordinary emergency medical care incurred by prisoners who are the
financial responsibility of the department of corrections under this chapter
shall be reimbursed. The department of corrections shall be advised as far in
advance as practicable by competent medical authority of the nature and course
of treatment required to ensure the most efficient use of state resources to
address the medical needs of the offender. In the event emergency medical care
is needed, the department of corrections shall be advised as soon as
practicable after the offender is treated.

Prior
to June 30, 1985, the office of financial management shall meet with the
corrections standards board to establish criteria to determine equitable rates
regarding variable costs for sentenced felons who are the financial
responsibility of the department of corrections after June 30, 1985.))

The
rate shall reflect the weighted state-wide average cost, including medical
services, of housing an offender in city and county jails or the average annual
cost per inmate incurred by the department of corrections as reported in the
most recently published copy of legislative budget notes, whichever is less.

The
office of financial management shall re-establish these rates each
even-numbered year ((beginning in 1986)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 70.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature shall, by making specific appropriations, agree to assume
responsibility for certain additional jail costs which are currently borne by
local governments. Categories of costs that are to be assumed include those
jail costs incurred as a result of: (a) Serving out-of-state warrants; (b)
serving out-of-county warrants; (c) holding prisoners who are arrested by any
officer of the Washington state patrol, department of fish and wildlife, any
public college or university police force, or the state parks department; and
(d) offenders who are denied bail due to specific legislative enactments which
made that offender ineligible for bail.

(2) All appropriations made for this purpose: (a) Are made in
support of programs and services that are the ongoing responsibility of the
recipient political subdivision; (b) are a transfer of local government costs
under RCW 43.135.060; and (c) do not constitute a state obligation for any time
period other than that for which the appropriation is made. All appropriations
made for this purpose shall also indicate the amount appropriated, the
categories of costs being assumed, and how the appropriation will be modified
if the costs being assumed exceed the amount being appropriated.

---
END ---