BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW to read as follows:

The
administrator for the courts shall study and make recommendations to the
legislature on ways to improve the availability and transferability of
information between courts and law enforcement. Specifically, the
administrator for the courts shall study and make recommendations on:

(1)
The feasibility and desirability of establishing an interface between district
and superior court data bases and law enforcement data bases so that
information may be electronically transmitted and available between data bases;

(2)
Short-term technological solutions to the problems of transmitting information
from the courts to law enforcement data bases, including greater utilization of
existing technology and technology that is readily available;

(3) The development and use of electronic signatures by judges on
warrants and other court orders.

---
END ---