BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.19 RCW to read as follows:

Any insurer that provides a premium discount when a policyholder
insures more than one vehicle with the insurer shall include an insured
motorcycle as a vehicle for purposes of the multivehicle discount. For
purposes of this section, "motorcycle" means the same as defined in
RCW 46.04.330.

---
END ---