BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the right of free speech, especially political speech,
as guaranteed under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and
Article I, section 5 of the Washington state Constitution and that this right
extends fully to judges and judicial candidates of our state.

The
legislature further recognizes that judges and judicial candidates may choose
to exercise these rights in order to better inform the public as to their
judicial philosophy and to educate the people on a wide range of issues
important to those who have a civic duty to elect them.

The legislature hereby declares its belief that judges and judicial
candidates have a right to freely express and incorporate their beliefs and
opinions in any statement made regarding any campaign or potential campaign for
judicial office or any issue pertaining thereto without legal or professional
retribution, negative consequence, or penalty to the standing, evaluation, or
privilege of the judge or the judicial candidate.

---
END ---