BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that the Washington assessments of student learning for
elementary, middle, and high school years are an important tool for students,
parents, teachers, schools, and the state. These assessments are so important
that the legislature encourages all students in the state to participate in the
assessments, which are required of public school students and voluntary for
students attending private schools and students receiving home-based
education. The assessments let students and their parents know the student's
progress in learning the skills and knowledge the state deems necessary to
become a responsible citizen and successfully live, learn, and work in the
twenty-first century.

(2)
Students receiving home-based education under chapter 28A.200 RCW may
voluntarily take the Washington assessments of student learning through the
local school district at district expense as part of the district's ancillary
services. The school district shall not regulate these students simply because
they take the assessments.

(3)(a)
Individual students attending private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW may
take the Washington assessments of student learning through the local school
district at district expense as part of the district's ancillary services.

(b)
If a significant number of students who attend the same private school under
chapter 28A.195 RCW wish to take the Washington assessments of student
learning, the assessment contractor may provide the assessments at the private
school and may agree to have the private school administer the assessments.
The superintendent shall pay the assessment contractor the cost of the test
itself, including processing the test to determine the results, for each
student taking the assessments under this subsection (3)(b). The
superintendent shall not pay for any costs the private school may incur in
administering the assessments at the private school, such as staff or school
administrative costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---