BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 2.56 RCW to read as follows:

The
administrator for the courts shall conduct a study of the municipal courts,
district courts, and superior courts of this state with respect to the number
of nonelected judicial officers and commissioners serving in the courts of the
state. The administrator for the courts shall report the results of the study
to the legislature by January 1, 2001. The study shall answer the following
questions:

(1)
How many judges of each municipal, district, and superior court of the state
are serving under appointment, rather than by election;

(2)
For each judge of the municipal, district, and superior courts who is serving
under appointment, rather than by election, how long has the judge served without
being elected and what are the actual hours per week worked by the judge; and

(3) How many commissioners are serving in the municipal, district,
and superior courts, and what are the actual hours per week worked by each
commissioner.

---
END ---