BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the citizens of Washington state expect government
employees to obey the law and to have the requisite character necessary to
perform public service in an ethical manner. The legislature further finds
that taxpayers should not be forced to continue to subsidize the retirement programs
of public employees who are convicted of felony criminal acts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.26 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever
a member has been convicted of a felony related to the member's duties in his
or her eligible position, service credit shall not be granted to the member
from the time the felony was first committed forward. Any contributions made
by the member after the felony was committed shall be returned to the member.
This section applies to felonies committed after the effective date of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever
a member has been convicted of a felony related to the member's duties in his
or her eligible position, service credit shall not be granted to the member
from the time the felony was first committed forward. Any contributions made
by the member after the felony was committed shall be returned to the member.
This section applies to felonies committed after the effective date of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever
a member has been convicted of a felony related to the member's duties in his
or her eligible position, service credit shall not be granted to the member
from the time the felony was first committed forward. Any contributions made
by the member after the felony was committed shall be returned to the member.
This section applies to felonies committed after the effective date of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever
a member has been convicted of a felony related to the member's duties in his
or her eligible position, service credit shall not be granted to the member
from the time the felony was first committed forward. Any contributions made
by the member after the felony was committed shall be returned to the member.
This section applies to felonies committed after the effective date of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW to read as follows:

Whenever a judge or justice has been removed from office for a
violation of a rule of judicial conduct pursuant to Article IV, section 31 of
the state Constitution and chapter 2.64 RCW, service credit shall not be
granted to the member from the period of time from the first violation to
removal from office. The member's contributions for such periods shall be
returned to the member. This section applies to any member of plan 1 or 2 who
has not retired as of the effective date of this act.

---
END ---