BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.14A.020 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

State
efforts shall address the needs of children and their families, including
emotionally disturbed and mentally ill children, potentially dependent
children, and families-in-conflict by:

(1)
Serving children and families as a unit in the least restrictive setting
available and in close proximity to the family home, consistent with the best
interests and special needs of the child;

(2)
Ensuring that appropriate social and health services are provided to the family
unit both prior to and during the removal of a child from the home and after
family reunification;

(3)
Ensuring that the safety and best interests of the child are the paramount
considerations when making placement and service delivery decisions;

(4)
Recognizing the interdependent and changing nature of families and communities,
building upon their inherent strengths, maintaining their dignity and respect,
and tailoring programs to their specific circumstances;

(5)
Developing and implementing comprehensive, preventive, and early intervention
social and health services which have demonstrated the ability to delay or reduce
the need for out-of-home placements and ameliorate problems before they become
chronic or severe;

(6)
Authorizing and facilitating blended funding for children who require
services and residential treatment from multiple services systems; including
education, child welfare services, mental health, alcohol and drug, and
juvenile rehabilitation;

(7)
Being sensitive to the family and community culture, norms, values, and
expectations, ensuring that all services are provided in a culturally
appropriate and relevant manner, and ensuring participation of racial and
ethnic minorities at all levels of planning, delivery, and evaluation efforts;

(((7)))
(8)(a) Developing coordinated social and health services which:

(i)
Identify problems experienced by children and their families early and provide
services which are adequate in availability, appropriate to the situation, and
effective;

(ii)
Seek to bring about meaningful change before family situations become
irreversibly destructive and before disturbed psychological behavioral patterns
and health problems become severe or permanent;

(iii)
Serve children and families in their own homes thus preventing unnecessary
out-of-home placement or institutionalization;

(iv)
Focus resources on social and health problems as they begin to manifest
themselves rather than waiting for chronic and severe patterns of illness,
criminality, and dependency to develop which require long-term treatment,
maintenance, or custody;

(v)
Reduce duplication of and gaps in service delivery;

(vi)
Improve planning, budgeting, and communication among all units of the
department and among all agencies that serve children and families; and

(vii)
Utilize outcome standards for measuring the effectiveness of social and health
services for children and families.

(b)
In developing services under this subsection, local communities must be
involved in planning and developing community networks that are tailored to
their unique needs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.14A RCW to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of the department of
social and health services shall transfer appropriated funds to support blended
funding projects for youth. To be eligible for blended funding a child must be
eligible for services designed to address a behavioral, mental, emotional, or
substance abuse issue from the department of social and health services or a
local school district and require services from more than one categorical
service delivery system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---