BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that many children miss between weeks and months of school
when they are placed in foster care and when they change foster families. The
legislature also finds that these educational disruptions can have a profoundly
negative impact on student learning and educational persistence, with almost
seventy percent of children in foster care becoming high school dropouts. The
legislature further finds that a study of the educational circumstances of
children in foster care is needed to determine the barriers to academic
achievement these children face. The legislature intends to commission a study
to examine the educational experiences and achievement levels of children in
the state's foster care system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The office of the superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with the
department of social and health services, shall conduct a study that examines
the educational experiences and achievement levels of students who have spent
at least ninety days in the state's foster care system. The study may include
either all or a statistically valid subset of students in the system. The
study shall include, but need not be limited to an examination of:

(a)
The number of students who change schools due to transportation logistics,
safety concerns, and other issues;

(b)
The case management time needed to keep a student in his or her original school
and the time needed to enroll a student into a new school, including the time
required to meet the record and data needs of the new school;

(c)
The estimated transportation costs, not covered by a school district, for
keeping a student in the student's original school;

(d)
The number and percentage of students who, during the period of examination,
are expelled or suspended, or who drop out of school;

(e)
The number and percentage of high school age students who graduate from high
school;

(f)
The achievement levels of students on required nationally normed tests and on
the Washington assessment of student learning, to the extent such information
is available;

(g)
The number of students receiving special education services, by area of special
education eligibility;

(h)
The average length of time between foster home placement and school enrollment;
and

(i)
Access to school records by a new school from the student's prior school or
schools, and by foster parents and caseworkers assisting the child.

(2)
The study should include a student specific comparison of discipline issues and
special education services experiences prior to and during placement in foster
care.

(3)
The office may convene an advisory committee to assist it in its design and
implementation of the study. The committee may include, but need not be
limited to educators, caseworkers, representatives of organizations providing
services to foster children, and other interested persons.

(4)
The office may contract with one or more outside entities to assist in the
design and implementation of the study.

(5)
By December 1, 2000, the office shall provide a preliminary report on its
progress to the governor and appropriate committees of the house of
representatives and the senate. By July 1, 2001, the office shall provide a
final report on the results of the study to the governor and appropriate
legislative committees. The report may include recommendations for improving
the educational experience, graduation rates, and achievement levels of
students in foster care.

(5)
This section expires September 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the study in section
2 of this act.

---
END ---