BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that access to a higher education will give children who are
in foster care hope for the future. The legislature further finds that such
assistance will help these children become successful, productive, contributing
citizens and avoid cycles of abuse, poverty, violence, and delinquency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.80 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The foster care scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is
to help students who were in foster care attend an institution of higher
education in the state of Washington.

(2)
To the extent funds are appropriated, the higher education coordinating board
shall award grants to eligible students to help cover the costs of receiving a
higher education at an institution of higher education in Washington state.
The grant shall be in an amount not to exceed the costs of obtaining a higher
education, excluding tuition. The higher education coordinating board shall
establish procedures, by rule, to disburse the awards as direct grants to
students.

(3)
To qualify for the grant, a student shall:

(a)
Be between the ages of sixteen and twenty-three;

(b)
Have been in foster care in the state of Washington for a minimum of six months
since his or her fourteenth birthday;

(c)
Be eligible for financial aid under the state student financial aid program;

(d)
Enter an institution of higher education or vocational program in Washington
state within three years of high school graduation or having successfully
received his or her GED;

(e)
Be making satisfactory progress towards completion of a degree or certificate
program; and

(f)
Not be pursuing a degree in theology.

(4)
If a student is eligible under subsection (3) of this section, the student may
receive a maximum of eight semesters or twelve quarters of grants for higher
education in the state of Washington.

(5)
An eligible student may transfer among institutions of higher education in
Washington and continue to receive the grant.

(6)
Grants under this section shall not affect eligibility for the state student
financial aid program.

(7)
The higher education coordinating board shall work with the department of
social and health services and the superintendent of public instruction to
provide information about this program to children in foster care in the state
of Washington and to students sixteen years and over who would be eligible for
the program.

(8)
As used in this section, "institutions of higher education" includes:

(a)
Public institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;

(b)
Private, nonprofit educational institutions, the main campus of which is
permanently situated in the state, providing programs of education beyond the
high school level, leading to a degree or certificate, and accredited by the
northwest association of schools and colleges as of the effective date of this
section;

(c)
Other institutions that are approved by the higher education coordinating board
as meeting equivalent standards as those institutions accredited under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to the
higher education coordinating board for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---