BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that persons with developmental disabilities must be given access
to quality residential programs that allow independent living in the
communities of Washington state. The inability of private community services
providers to pay competitive wages is threatening safety and quality of
services. The benchmark reimbursement rate for community residential services
providers is not adequate to attract and retain qualified staff and the gap
between the wage level of state employees in the state-operated living
alternatives program and private contracted community residential programs is
widening. To achieve community service system stabilization, employees of
contracted community residential programs should be compensated at a level near
parity with the rate paid employees of state-operated living alternatives
programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
secretary shall adopt rules to provide that certified community residential
programs for persons with developmental disabilities shall be paid a benchmark
rate for wages and benefits that amounts to no less than eighty percent of the
average hourly wages and benefits paid to employees of the state-operated
living alternatives program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---