BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that the current process for providing hunting
opportunities through auctions and raffles does not provide recreational
hunters an equal opportunity to participate in hunts for big game animals. The
legislature finds that any additional revenues brought in through these
auctions and raffles are minimal at best, and that the process allows
additional for-profit auctions and raffles to take place by private parties and
landowners and causes additional expense to the state with no reciprocal
revenue generated on behalf of the state. Therefore, the legislature declares
that the current process for conducting auctions and raffles for big game hunts
should be eliminated and replaced with general seasons open to all citizens on
an annual basis.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.46.010 and 1996 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
public policy of the state of Washington on gambling is to keep the criminal
element out of gambling and to promote the social welfare of the people by
limiting the nature and scope of gambling activities and by strict regulation
and control.

It
is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature, recognizing the close
relationship between professional gambling and organized crime, to restrain all
persons from seeking profit from professional gambling activities in this
state; to restrain all persons from patronizing such professional gambling
activities; to safeguard the public against the evils induced by common
gamblers and common gambling houses engaged in professional gambling; and at
the same time, both to preserve the freedom of the press and to avoid
restricting participation by individuals in activities and social pastimes,
which activities and social pastimes are more for amusement rather than for
profit, do not maliciously affect the public, and do not breach the peace.

The
legislature further declares that the raising of funds for the promotion of
bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations is in the public interest as is
participation in such activities and social pastimes as are hereinafter in this
chapter authorized.

The
legislature further declares that the conducting of bingo, raffles, and
amusement games and the operation of punch boards, pull-tabs, card games and
other social pastimes, when conducted pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, are hereby
authorized, as are only such lotteries for which no valuable consideration has
been paid or agreed to be paid as hereinafter in this chapter provided.

The
legislature further declares that fishing derbies shall not constitute any form
of gambling and shall not be considered as a lottery, a raffle, or an amusement
game and shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter or any rules
and regulations adopted hereunder.

((The
legislature further declares that raffles authorized by the fish and wildlife
commission involving hunting big game animals or wild turkeys shall not be
subject to the provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations adopted
hereunder, with the exception of this section and RCW 9.46.400.))

All
factors incident to the activities authorized in this chapter shall be closely
controlled, and the provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to
achieve such end.

Sec.
3. RCW
77.12.170 and 1998 c 191 s 38 and 1998 c 87 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
There is established in the state treasury the state wildlife fund which
consists of moneys received from:

(a)
Rentals or concessions of the department;

(b)
The sale of real or personal property held for department purposes;

(c)
The sale of licenses, permits, tags, stamps, and punchcards required by this
title, except annual resident adult saltwater and all shellfish licenses, which
shall be deposited into the state general fund;

(d)
Fees for informational materials published by the department;

(e)
Fees for personalized vehicle license plates as provided in chapter 46.16 RCW;

(f)
Articles or wildlife sold by the director under this title;

(g)
Compensation for wildlife losses or contributions, gifts, or grants received
under RCW 77.12.320 or 77.32.380;

(h)
Excise tax on anadromous game fish collected under chapter 82.27 RCW; and

(i)
The sale of personal property seized by the department for wildlife
violations((; and

(j)
The department's share of revenues from auctions and raffles authorized by the
commission)).

(2)
State and county officers receiving any moneys listed in subsection (1) of this
section shall deposit them in the state treasury to be credited to the state
wildlife fund.

Sec.
4. RCW
77.32.050 and 1999 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All
recreational licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by Titles 75 and 77
RCW ((and raffle tickets authorized under chapter 77.12 RCW)) shall be
issued under the authority of the commission. The commission shall adopt rules
for the issuance of recreational licenses, permits, tags, and stamps, ((and
raffle tickets,)) and for the collection, payment, and handling of license
fees, terms and conditions to govern dealers, and dealers' fees. A transaction
fee on recreational licenses may be set by the commission and collected from
licensees. The department may authorize all or part of such fee to be paid
directly to a contractor providing automated licensing system services. Fees retained
by dealers shall be uniform throughout the state. The department shall
authorize dealers to collect and retain dealer fees of at least two dollars for
purchase of a standard hunting or fishing recreational license document, except
that the commission may set a lower dealer fee for issuance of tags or when a
licensee buys a license that involves a stamp or display card format rather
than a standard department licensing document form.

Sec.
5. RCW
77.32.090 and 1998 c 191 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may adopt rules pertaining to the form, period of validity, use,
possession, and display of licenses, permits, tags, and stamps required by this
chapter ((and raffle tickets authorized under chapter 77.12 RCW)).

Sec.
6. RCW
77.32.250 and 1998 c 191 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Licenses,
permits, tags, and stamps required by this chapter ((and raffle tickets
authorized under chapter 77.12 RCW)) shall not be transferred.

Upon
request of a fish and wildlife officer or ex officio fish and wildlife officer,
persons licensed, operating under a permit, or possessing wildlife under the
authority of this chapter shall produce required licenses, permits, tags, or
stamps((, or raffle tickets)) for inspection and write their signatures
for comparison and in addition display their wildlife. Failure to comply with
the request is prima facie evidence that the person has no license or is not
the person named.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
9.46.400 (Wildlife raffle) and 1996 c 101 s 3;

(2) RCW
77.08.070 ("Raffle" defined) and 1996 c 101 s 4;

(3) RCW
77.12.770 (Hunting big game--Auction or raffle--Procedure) and
1996 c 101 s 5;

(4) RCW
77.12.780 (Private lands--Raffle authorization to hunt big game)
and 1996 c 101 s 6; and

(5) 1998 c
245 s 160.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 through 7 of this act take effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---