BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Public entities and schools shall display the National League of Families'
POW/MIA flag along with the flag of the United States and the flag of the state
upon or near the principal building of the public entity on the following
days: (a) Armed Forces Day on the third Saturday in May; (b) Memorial Day on
the last Monday in May; (c) Flag Day on June 14; (d) Independence Day on July
4; (e) National POW/MIA Recognition Day; and (f) Veterans Day on November 11.

(2)
The department of general administration shall provide a National League of
Families' POW/MIA flag to public entities and schools for display under
subsection (1) of this section.

(3) As used in this section, "public entity" means every
state agency, including each institution of higher education, and every county,
city, and town.

---
END ---