BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.07.152 and 1993 c 383 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This section establishes a special procedure which an elector may
use to register to vote during the period beginning after the closing of
registration for voting at the polls under RCW 29.07.160 and ending on the
fifteenth day before a primary, special election, or general election. During
this period, ((the unregistered)) a qualified elector who is
not registered to vote in his or her county of residence may register to
vote in person in the office of the county auditor or at a voter registration
location specifically designated for this purpose by the county auditor of the
county in which the applicant resides((, and)). Persons who register
during this period are not eligible to vote at the polls but may apply for
an absentee ballot for that primary or election. The auditor ((or voter
registrar)) shall register that individual in the manner provided in this
chapter((. The application for an absentee ballot executed by the newly registered
voter for the primary or election that follows the execution of the
registration shall be promptly transmitted to the auditor with the completed
voter registration form)) and promptly execute that individual's request
for an absentee ballot.

---
END ---