BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this chapter is to provide legal recognition to the professions of
industrial hygiene and occupational safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"The practice of industrial hygiene" means the anticipation,
prevention, recognition, evaluation, elimination, and control of environmental,
biological, chemical, physical, and ergonomic factors and stresses arising in
or from the workplace that may cause sickness, impaired health and well-being,
or significant discomfort among workers or the general public.

(2)
"American board of industrial hygiene" means a national nonprofit
corporation established to improve the practice and educational standards of
the profession of industrial hygiene and that certifies individuals who meet
its education, experience, examination, and maintenance requirements for
practicing industrial hygiene.

(3)
"Industrial hygienist-in-training" or "IHIT" means a person
who has received the designation of industrial hygienist-in-training and holds
a valid, unexpired certificate from the American board of industrial hygiene.

(4)
"Certified industrial hygienist" is a person who holds a valid,
unexpired certificate from the American board of industrial hygiene.

(5)
"The practice of occupational safety" means the preservation of human
material resources through the systematic application of education, chemistry,
physics, biological, ergonomic, psychological, physiological, and management
principles for anticipating, identifying, and evaluating hazardous systems,
conditions, and practices in the workplace and developing, implementing, and
administering programs to alleviate those hazards.

(6)
"Board of certified safety professionals" means a national nonprofit
corporation established to improve the practice and educational standards of
the profession of occupational safety and certify individuals who meet its
education, experience, examination, and maintenance requirements for practicing
occupational safety.

(7)
"Certified safety professional" means a person who holds a valid,
unexpired certificate as a certified safety professional from the board of
certified safety professionals.

(8)
"Associate safety professional" means a person who holds a valid,
unexpired certificate as an associate safety professional from the board of
certified safety professionals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
No person may assume or use the following professional titles unless the person
possesses the proper valid, unexpired certificate from the American board of
industrial hygiene:

(a)
Certified industrial hygienist or the abbreviation CIH; and

(b)
Industrial hygienist-in-training or the abbreviation IHIT.

(2)
No person may assume or use the following professional titles unless the
person possesses a valid, unexpired certificate from the board of certified
safety professionals:

(a)
Certified safety professional or the abbreviation CSP; and

(b)
Associate safety professional or the abbreviation ASP.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Nothing in this chapter prohibits or restricts:

(1)
The practice of industrial hygiene by a person employed as an apprentice under
the supervision of a certified industrial hygienist;

(2)
The practice of occupational safety by a person employed as an apprentice under
the supervision of a certified safety professional;

(3)
A student studying industrial hygiene engaging in supervised activities related
to the practice of industrial hygiene;

(4)
A student studying occupational safety engaging in supervised activities
related to the practice of occupational safety;

(5)
Any person legally regulated in this state under any other licensing statute or
rule from engaging in the activities permitted under his or her license,
provided he or she does not represent himself or herself to the public as a
certified industrial hygienist, industrial hygienist-in-training, certified
safety professional, or associate safety professional; or

(6)
Individuals practicing within the scope of practice of industrial hygiene or
the scope of practice of occupational safety, so long as the individual does
not use the title, initials, or represent himself or herself to the public as a
certified industrial hygienist, industrial hygienist-in-training, certified
safety professional, or associate safety professional.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
person who violates section 3 of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and is
punishable under RCW 9.92.030.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---