BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Washington Constitution establishes "the paramount duty of the state to
make ample provision for the education of all children." Providing
quality education for all children in Washington requires well-qualified and
experienced teachers and other school employees. However, salaries for
educators have not kept up with the increased cost-of-living in the state. The
failure to keep up with inflation threatens Washington's ability to compete
with other states to attract first-rate teachers to Washington classrooms and
to keep well-qualified educators from leaving for other professions. The state
must provide a fair and reasonable cost-of-living increase to help ensure that
the state attracts and keeps the best teachers and school employees for the
children of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
School district employees shall be provided an annual salary cost-of-living
increase in accordance with this section.

(a)
The cost-of-living increase shall be calculated by applying the rate of the
yearly increase in the cost-of-living index to any state-funded salary base
used in state funding formulas for teachers and other school district
employees. Beginning with the 2001-02 school year, and for each subsequent
school year, each school district shall be provided a cost-of-living allocation
sufficient to grant this cost-of-living increase for the salaries, including
mandatory salary-related benefits, of all employees of the district.

(b)
A school district shall distribute its cost-of-living allocation for salaries
and salary-related benefits in accordance with the district's salary schedules,
collective bargaining agreements, and compensation policies. No later than the
end of the school year, each school district shall certify to the
superintendent of public instruction that it has spent funds provided for
cost-of-living increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.

(c)
Any funded cost-of-living increase shall be included in the salary base used to
determine cost-of-living increases for all school employees in subsequent
years. For teachers and other certificated instructional staff, the rate of
the annual cost-of-living increase funded for certificated instructional staff
shall be applied to the base salary used with the state-wide salary allocation
schedule established under RCW 28A.150.410 and to any other salary models used
to recognize school district personnel costs.

(d)
Beginning with the 2001-02 school year, the state shall fully fund the
cost-of-living increase in this section as part of its obligation to meet the
basic education requirements under Article IX of the Washington state
Constitution.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means, for
any school year, the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price
index, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor
statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If
the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for
areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people,
covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including
all items shall be used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Academic employees of community and technical college districts shall be
provided an annual salary cost-of-living increase in accordance with this
section. For purposes of this section, "academic employee" has the
same meaning as defined in RCW 28B.52.020.

(a)
Beginning with the 2001-02 fiscal year, and for each subsequent fiscal year,
each college district shall receive a cost-of-living allocation sufficient to
increase academic employee salaries, including mandatory salary-related
benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the cost-of-living index.

(b)
A college district shall distribute its cost-of-living allocation for salaries
and salary-related benefits in accordance with the district's salary schedules,
collective bargaining agreements, and other compensation policies. No later
than the end of the fiscal year, each college district shall certify to the
college board that it has spent funds provided for cost-of-living increases on
salaries and salary-related benefits.

(c)
The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living increase in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for academic employees
in subsequent years.

(d)
Beginning with the 2001-02 fiscal year, the state shall fully fund the
cost-of-living increase set forth in this section.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means, for
any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price
index, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor
statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If
the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for
areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people,
covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including
all items shall be used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Classified employees of technical colleges shall be provided an annual salary
cost-of-living increase in accordance with this section. For purposes of this
section, "technical college" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
28B.50.030. This section applies to only those classified employees under the
jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW.

(a)
Beginning with the 2001-02 fiscal year, and for each subsequent fiscal year,
each technical college board of trustees shall receive a cost-of-living
allocation sufficient to increase classified employee salaries, including
mandatory salary-related benefits, by the rate of the yearly increase in the
cost-of-living index.

(b)
A technical college board of trustees shall distribute its cost-of-living
allocation for salaries and salary-related benefits in accordance with the
technical college's salary schedules, collective bargaining agreements, and
other compensation policies. No later than the end of the fiscal year, each
technical college shall certify to the college board that it has spent funds
provided for cost-of-living increases on salaries and salary-related benefits.

(c)
The college board shall include any funded cost-of-living increase in the
salary base used to determine cost-of-living increases for technical college
classified employees in subsequent years.

(d)
Beginning with the 2001-02 fiscal year, the state shall fully fund the cost-of-living
increase set forth in this section.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living index" means, for
any fiscal year, the previous calendar year's annual average consumer price
index, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor
statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If
the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for
areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people,
covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state, and including
all items shall be used for the cost-of-living index in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---