BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The department of ecology shall conduct a preconstruction analysis of the Roza
irrigation district off-stream storage project at Washout canyon, regarding its
suitability as a site for the construction of a retainment dam and water
storage reservoir and the project's potential to create a warm water fishery,
provide recreational opportunities, and enhance agriculture, anadromous fish,
and instream flows.

(2)
The analysis shall include, but is not limited to, an analysis of water rights
related to the operation of the dam, the geology and hydrology of the site and
appropriate dam design and dynamics, and its impact on water-related issues.
The department shall conduct its analysis through contracts with the Roza
irrigation district. The department shall consult with the Yakama Indian
Nation, Yakima county, the state's department of fish and wildlife, and the
upper Columbia area office of the United States bureau of reclamation regarding
the scope of issues to be addressed in this preconstruction analysis.

(3)
The preconstruction analysis in this section shall be completed by June 30,
2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund
to the department of ecology for the purposes of section 1 of this act. The
amount provided by this section is contingent upon the provision of an equal
match in cash, in-kind services, or combination of cash and in-kind services
from the Roza irrigation district and if such a match is not provided by the
district, the amount provided by this section shall lapse.

---
END ---