BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.135.045 and 1994 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The emergency reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund
all general fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit
for that fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter
based on projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit.

(2)
The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only
with approval of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter.

(3)
The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of ((biennial))
annual general fund‑-state revenues as projected by the official
state revenue forecast. Amounts in excess of five percent shall be
transferred as follows:

(a)
One-half of any balance in excess of five percent shall be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the state treasurer to the education construction fund
hereby created in the treasury. (((4)(a))) Funds may be appropriated
from the education construction fund exclusively for common school construction
or higher education construction. (((b))) Funds may be appropriated for
any other purpose only if approved by a two-thirds vote of each house of the
legislature and if approved by a vote of the people at the next general election.

(b)
One-half of any balance in excess of five percent shall be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the state treasurer to the property tax reduction fund
created in the treasury. The amount transferred into the property tax
reduction fund must be used to reduce the state's portion of the property tax
levy for the following year. The amount transferred into the property tax
reduction fund for any four-quarter period ending September 30th may not exceed
the amount of tax that would otherwise be levied by the state for the support
of the common schools for collection the following calendar year, as forecast
by the economic and revenue forecast council. This unused taxing capacity may
not be used to supplant the need to use other revenue sources.

(4)
An appropriation approved by the people under this subsection shall result in
an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only for the fiscal period for
which the appropriation is made and shall not affect any subsequent fiscal
period.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular
ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter
named shall be as follows:

(1)
Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the
state shall not exceed ((three dollars and sixty cents)) two dollars
and forty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value adjusted to the
state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state
department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the common
schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed ((one dollar and eighty
cents)) two dollars and seventy cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value; (c) the levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars
and ((twenty-five)) fifty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town shall not exceed three
dollars and ((thirty-seven)) sixty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to
increase its levy from ((one dollar and eighty)) two dollars and
seventy cents to a rate not to exceed ((two dollars and forty-seven))
three dollars and sixty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the
county and any road district within the county do not exceed ((four dollars
and five)) five dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a
result of the increased county levy.

(2)
The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts,
other than the state, shall not exceed ((five dollars and ninety)) seven
dollars and ten cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term
"junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than
the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public
utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection shall not apply
to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or
public utility district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation
futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical
care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to
finance affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW
84.52.105; and (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that
are protected under RCW 84.52.120.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy for
collection in the following year for the support of common schools of the state
a tax of ((three dollars and sixty)) two dollars and forty cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all
taxable property within the state adjusted to the state equalized value in
accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue. An
amount equal to an additional one dollar and twenty cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within
the state adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue, shall be dedicated
from other revenue paid into the general fund of the state treasury for support
of common schools of the state.

As
used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes the
payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction
projects for the common schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The limitation provided in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to chapter
. . ., Laws of 2000 (this act).

(2)
In the first year following the effective date of this act, the county taxing
district levy shall not be less than the prior year's levy plus ninety cents.

(3) This section expires December 31, 2001.

---
END ---