BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 38.52 RCW to read as follows:

Any
business with ten or fewer employees located in Seattle that incurred physical
damage to its facilities and/or loss of sales and service income between
November 30, 1999, through December 5, 1999, arising from demonstrations
associated with the world trade organization meeting in Seattle may submit its
application of itemized costs of repairing the damage to these facilities and
replacing the sales and service loss during this time period to the director of
the emergency management program. The director, in his or her judgment, shall:

(1)
Describe the form and content of the application;

(2)
Determine the appropriate and reasonable cost of damages and sales and service
loss to the business making the application, not including any insured damages
or losses;

(3)
Certify the amount of damage and sales and service loss attributable to these
demonstrations; and

(4)
Give priority to certifying damages and losses to businesses with three or
fewer employees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The
amounts certified by the director of the emergency management program under
section 1 of this act may be claimed as credits against taxes payable under
chapters 82.04, 82.08, and 82.12 RCW, including amounts collected by a seller
under RCW 82.08.050. A credit claimed under this section may not exceed the
amount of tax that would otherwise be due. A refund shall not be given in
place of a credit. A credit must be claimed by the due date of the last
tax return for the calendar year in which the expenditure is made. Any unused
credit may be carried over to subsequent calendar years.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---