BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All public institutions of higher education shall adopt rules regarding
disruptive off-campus conduct of students, including sanctions.

(2)
Sanctions may include, but are not limited to, counseling, probation,
suspension, or expulsion.

(3)
As used in this section, "disruptive off-campus conduct" means all
conduct resulting in a citation or conviction for the violation of laws or
ordinances that:

(a)
Interferes with the institution of higher education's relationship with the
surrounding community;

(b)
Harms the reputation of the institution of higher education; or

(c)
Violates the institution of higher education's policies.

(4)
Each public institution of higher education shall report the substance of
rules, including sanctions, to appropriate committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---