BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 10.95 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Until July 1, 2002, the sentence of death for anyone sentenced under RCW
10.95.030(2) shall be stayed.

(2)
A death penalty task force is hereby created for the purpose of conducting a
review of the existing statutes and court rules to determine the following:

(a)
The adequacy of the counsel and resources provided defendants in capital
offense cases;

(b)
The uniformity of decision making by prosecuting attorneys in terms of charging
defendants with aggravated first degree murder and the criteria in such
decisions;

(c)
The impact of race, ethnicity, gender, and economic status on the likelihood of
a defendant being charged with aggravated first degree murder; and

(d)
Whether there are revisions to existing statutes and court rules which, if
implemented, would decrease the likelihood of an inappropriate imposition of
the death penalty.

(3)
The task force shall consist of eleven members. The membership shall be
appointed as follows:

(a)
Two members appointed by the chief justice of the state supreme court;

(b)
Two members appointed by the president of the senate;

(c)
Two members appointed by the co-speakers of the house;

(d)
Two members appointed by the governor;

(e)
Three members appointed by the president of the Washington state bar
association. Not more than one member shall be a current or former prosecuting
attorney. Not more than one member shall be an attorney whose practice is
primarily criminal defense and who has experience in death penalty cases.

(4)
The task force may conduct meetings, select officers, and prescribe rules of procedure.
The task force shall cooperate, act, and function with legislative committees
and executive agencies as necessary to complete its business.

(5)
Members of the task force shall serve without additional compensation, but must
be reimbursed for their travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
44.04.120, incurred while attending meetings of the task force, engaged on
other task force business authorized by the task force, or going to and coming
from task force meetings.

(6)
The task force shall make a report, together with any recommendations, to the
legislature, governor, and supreme court not later than January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the office of the administrator for the courts for the purposes of providing
staffing and support to the death penalty task force.

(2)
The sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the office of the administrator for the courts for the purposes
of providing staffing and support to the death penalty task force.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act expires July 1, 2002.

---
END ---