BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.190.005 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that a primary goal of public involvement in the lives of
children has been to strengthen the family unit.

However,
the legislature recognizes that traditional two-parent families with one parent
routinely at home are now in the minority. In addition, extended family and
natural community supports have eroded drastically. The legislature recognizes
that public policy assumptions must be altered to account for this new social
reality. Public effort must be redirected to expand, support, strengthen, and
help reconstruct family and community ((networks)) associations
to assist in meeting the needs of children.

The
legislature finds that a broad variety of services for children and families
has been independently designed over the years and that the coordination and
cost-effectiveness of these services will be enhanced through the adoption of
((an)) a common approach ((that allows communities to
prioritize and coordinate services to meet their local needs)) to their
delivery. The legislature further finds that the most successful programs
for reaching and working with at-risk families and children treat individuals'
problems in the context of the family, offer a broad spectrum of services, are
flexible in the use of program resources, and use staff who are trained in
crossing traditional program categories in order to broker services necessary
to fully meet a family's needs.

The
legislature further finds that eligibility criteria, expenditure restrictions,
and reporting requirements of state and federal categorical programs often
create barriers toward the effective use of resources for addressing the
multiple problems of at-risk families and children.

The
purposes of this chapter are (1) to modify public policy and programs to
empower communities to support and respond to the needs of individual families
and children and (2) to improve the responsiveness of services for children and
families at risk by facilitating greater coordination and flexibility in the
use of funds by state and local service agencies.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.190.040 and 1993 c 336 s 901 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that helping children to arrive at school ready to learn
is an important part of improving student learning.

(2)
To the extent funds are appropriated, the ((family policy council)) superintendent
of public instruction shall award grants to community-based consortiums
that submit comprehensive plans that include strategies to improve readiness to
learn.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.190.070 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

The
community public health and safety networks shall:

(1)
Review state and local public health data and analysis relating to risk
factors, protective factors, and at-risk children and youth;

(2)
Prioritize the risk factors and protective factors to reduce the likelihood of
their children and youth being at risk. The priorities shall be based upon
public health data and assessment and policy development standards provided by
the department of health under RCW 43.70.555; and

(3)
Develop long-term comprehensive plans to reduce the rate of at-risk children
and youth; set definitive, measurable goals, based upon the department of
health standards; and project their desired outcomes((;

(4)
Distribute funds to local programs that reflect the locally established
priorities and as provided in RCW 70.190.140;

(5)
Comply with outcome-based standards;

(6)
Cooperate with the department of health and local boards of health to provide
data and determine outcomes; and

(7)
Coordinate its efforts with anti-drug use efforts and organizations and
maintain a high priority for combatting drug use by at-risk youth)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 70.190 RCW to read as follows:

A
county that contains one or more public health and safety networks on the
effective date of this section may retain the network and use it to develop
additional long-term comprehensive plans as provided in RCW 70.190.070.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
70.190.040 is recodified as a new section in chapter 28A.300 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
70.190.050 (Community networks--Outcome evaluation) and 1998 c 245
s 122 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 207;

(2) RCW
70.190.060 (Community networks--Legislative
intent--Membership--Open meetings) and 1998 c 314 s 12, 1996 c 132 s 3, &
1994 sp.s. c 7 s 303;

(3) RCW
70.190.065 (Member's authorization of expenditures--Limitation)
and 1996 c 132 s 5;

(4) RCW
70.190.075 (Lead fiscal agent) and 1996 c 132 s 4;

(5) RCW
70.190.080 (Community networks--Programs and plans) and 1996 c 132
s 6 & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 305;

(6) RCW
70.190.085 (Community networks--Sexual abstinence and activity
campaign) and 1994 c 299 s 5;

(7) RCW
70.190.090 (Community networks--Planning grants and
contracts--Distribution of funds--Reports) and 1999 c 309 s 918, 1996 c 132 s
7, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 306;

(8) RCW
70.190.100 (Duties of council) and 1998 c 245 s 123 & 1994
sp.s. c 7 s 307;

(9) RCW
70.190.110 (Program review) and 1998 c 245 s 124 & 1994 sp.s.
c 7 s 308;

(10) RCW
70.190.120 (Interagency agreement) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 309;

(11) RCW
70.190.130 (Comprehensive plan--Approval process--Network
expenditures--Penalty for noncompliance with chapter) and 1998 c 314 s 13, 1996
c 132 s 8, & 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 310;

(12) RCW
70.190.150 (Federal restrictions on funds transfers, waivers) and
1994 sp.s. c 7 s 312;

(13) RCW
70.190.160 (Community networks--Implementation in federal and
state plans) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 314;

(14) RCW
70.190.170 (Transfer of funds and programs to state agency) and
1994 sp.s. c 7 s 320;

(15) RCW
70.190.180 (Community network--Grants for use of school
facilities) and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 604; and

(16) RCW
70.190.190 (Network members immune from civil liability--Network
assets not subject to attachment or execution) and 1996 c 132 s 9.

---
END ---