BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A legislative entity authorized to provide public transportation services under
chapter 35.58, 36.57, or 36.57A RCW, may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the boundaries of the transportation entity.

(2)(a)
The rate of tax shall not exceed an amount as calculated under (b) of this
subsection, shall be stated as a percent, and is imposed on the selling price
in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use
tax. The proceeds of this tax shall be used only for public transportation systems
and services.

(b)
The tax rate under (a) of this subsection shall be set at the rate of the
transportation entity's sales and use tax as it exists on January 1, 2000,
multiplied by twenty-five percent. The result of this calculation is the
maximum rate that may be imposed under this section by that transportation
entity.

(3)
The tax imposed under this section shall be deducted from the amount of tax
otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department under chapter
82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department shall perform the collection of such taxes
on behalf of the transportation entity at no cost to the entity.

(4)
The authority for the tax under this section is effective until June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act shall terminate if a decision by a court of record, from which no appeal
has or can be taken, finds that sections 1 and 3, chapter 1, Laws of 2000, are
invalid.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---