BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.13.070 and 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Nominating
primaries for general elections to be held in November shall be held at the
regular polling places in each precinct on the ((third)) second
Tuesday of the preceding ((September or on the seventh Tuesday immediately
preceding such general election, whichever occurs first)) June.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.13.010 and 1994 c 142 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All state, county, city, town, and district general elections for the election
of federal, state, legislative, judicial, county, city, town, district, and
precinct officers, and for the submission to the voters of the state, county,
city, town, or district of any measure for their adoption and approval or
rejection, shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of
November, in the year in which they may be called. A state-wide general
election shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November
of each year: PROVIDED, That the state-wide general election held in
odd-numbered years shall be limited to (a) city, town, and district general
elections as provided for in RCW 29.13.020, or as otherwise provided by law;
(b) the election of federal officers for the remainder of any unexpired terms
in the membership of either branch of the congress of the United States; (c)
the election of state and county officers for the remainder of any unexpired
terms of offices created by or whose duties are described in Article II,
section 15, Article III, sections 16, 17, 19, 20, 21, 22, and 23, and Article
IV, sections 3 and 5 of the state Constitution and RCW 2.06.080; (d) the election
of county officers in any county governed by a charter containing provisions
calling for general county elections at this time; and (e) the approval or
rejection of state measures, including proposed constitutional amendments,
matters pertaining to any proposed constitutional convention, initiative
measures and referendum measures proposed by the electorate, referendum bills,
and any other matter provided by the legislature for submission to the
electorate.

(2)
A county legislative authority may, if it deems an emergency to exist, call a
special county election by presenting a resolution to the county auditor at
least ((forty-five)) fifty days prior to the proposed election
date. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a special election
called by the county legislative authority shall be held on one of the
following dates as decided by such governing body:

(a)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;

(b)
The second Tuesday in March;

(c)
The fourth Tuesday in April;

(d)
((The third Tuesday in May;

(e))) The
day of the primary as specified by RCW 29.13.070;

(e)
The first Tuesday after the second Wednesday in September; or

(f)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3)
In addition to the dates set forth in subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this
section, a special election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be
called at any time to meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or
other act of God. Such county special election shall be noticed and conducted
in the manner provided by law.

(4)
In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference primary is
conducted in February, March, or April((, or May)) under chapter
29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called by the county
legislative authority under subsection (2) of this section during the month of
that primary is the date of the presidential primary.

(5)
This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes,
whether general or special in nature, having different dates for such city,
town, and district elections, the purpose of this section being to establish
mandatory dates for holding elections except for those elections held pursuant
to a home-rule charter adopted under Article XI, section 4 of the state
Constitution. This section shall not be construed as fixing the time for
holding primary elections, or elections for the recall of any elective public
officer.

Sec.
3. RCW
29.13.020 and 1994 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All city, town, and district general elections shall be held throughout the
state of Washington on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November
in the odd-numbered years.

This
section shall not apply to:

(a)
Elections for the recall of any elective public officer;

(b)
Public utility districts or district elections at which the ownership of
property within those districts is a prerequisite to voting, all of which
elections shall be held at the times prescribed in the laws specifically
applicable thereto;

(c)
Consolidation proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.315 RCW ((28A.315.280))
and nonhigh capital fund aid proposals as provided for in chapter 28A.540 RCW.

(2)
The county auditor, as ex officio supervisor of elections, upon request in the
form of a resolution of the governing body of a city, town, or district,
presented to the auditor at least ((forty-five)) fifty days prior
to the proposed election date, may, if the county auditor deems an emergency to
exist, call a special election in such city, town, or district, and for the
purpose of such special election he or she may combine, unite, or divide
precincts. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, such a
special election shall be held on one of the following dates as decided by the
governing body:

(a)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in February;

(b)
The second Tuesday in March;

(c)
The fourth Tuesday in April;

(d)
((The third Tuesday in May;

(e))) The
day of the primary election as specified by RCW 29.13.070;

(e)
The first Tuesday after the second Wednesday in September; or

(f)
The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.

(3)
In a presidential election year, if a presidential preference primary is
conducted in February, March, or April((, or May)) under chapter
29.19 RCW, the date on which a special election may be called under subsection
(2) of this section during the month of that primary is the date of the
presidential primary.

(4)
In addition to subsection (2)(a) through (f) of this section, a special
election to validate an excess levy or bond issue may be called at any time to
meet the needs resulting from fire, flood, earthquake, or other act of God,
except that no special election may be held between the first day for
candidates to file for public office and the last day to certify the returns of
the general election other than as provided in subsection (2)(((e))) (d)
and (f) of this section. Such special election shall be conducted and notice
thereof given in the manner provided by law.

(5)
This section shall supersede the provisions of any and all other statutes,
whether general or special in nature, having different dates for such city,
town, and district elections, the purpose of this section being to establish
mandatory dates for holding elections.

Sec.
4. RCW
29.15.020 and 1990 c 59 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of candidacy for the
following offices shall be filed during regular business hours with the filing
officer no earlier than ((the fourth Monday in July)) sixty-four days
before the date of the primary established by RCW 29.13.070 and no later
than the following Friday in the year in which the office is scheduled to be
voted upon:

(1)
Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or both full terms
and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state general election; and

(2)
Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that has not been
filled by election and for which an election to fill the vacancy is required in
conjunction with the next state general election.

This
section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a different filing
period for these offices.

Sec.
5. RCW
29.15.150 and 1973 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
it shall be necessary to hold a special election in an odd-numbered year to
fill an unexpired term of any office which is scheduled to be voted upon for a
full term in an even-numbered year, no ((September)) primary election
shall be held in the odd-numbered year if, after the last day allowed for
candidates to withdraw, either of the following circumstances exist:

(1)
No more than one candidate of each qualified political party has filed a
declaration of candidacy for the same partisan office to be filled; or

(2)
No more than two candidates have filed a declaration of candidacy for a single
nonpartisan office to be filled.

In
either event, the officer with whom the declarations of candidacy were filed
shall immediately notify all candidates concerned and the names of the
candidates that would have been printed upon the ((September)) primary
ballot, but for the provisions of this section, shall be printed as nominees
for the positions sought upon the November general election ballot.

Sec.
6. RCW
29.15.170 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 10 are each amended to read as
follows:

Filings
for a nonpartisan office shall be reopened for a period of three normal
business days, such three day period to be fixed by the election officer with
whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by
notifying press, radio, and television in the county and by such other means as
may now or hereafter be provided by law whenever before the ((fourth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to a primary:

(1)
A void in candidacy occurs;

(2)
A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office leaving an unexpired term to be
filled by an election for which filings have not been held; or

(3)
A nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election
pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution, dies
or is disqualified.

Candidacies
validly filed within said three-day period shall appear on the ballot as if
made during the earlier filing period.

Sec.
7. RCW
29.15.180 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 11 are each amended to read as
follows:

Filings
for a nonpartisan office (other than judge of the supreme court or
superintendent of public instruction) shall be reopened for a period of three
normal business days, such three day period to be fixed by the election officer
with whom such declarations of candidacy are filed and notice thereof given by
notifying press, radio, and television in the county and by such other means as
may now or hereafter be provided by law, when:

(1)
A void in candidacy for such nonpartisan office occurs on or after the ((fourth))
seventh Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the ((fourth)) seventh
Tuesday before an election; or

(2)
A nominee for judge of the superior court eligible after a contested primary
for a certificate of election by Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the
state Constitution, dies or is disqualified within the ten day period when a
petition for write-in candidacy may be received; or

(3)
A vacancy occurs in any nonpartisan office on or after the ((fourth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to a primary but prior to the ((fourth)) seventh
Tuesday before an election leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an
election for which filings have not been held.

The
candidate receiving a plurality of the votes cast for that office in the
general election shall be deemed elected.

Sec.
8. RCW
29.15.190 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 120 s 12 are each amended to read as
follows:

A
scheduled election shall be lapsed, the office deemed stricken from the ballot,
no purported write-in votes counted, and no candidate certified as elected,
when:

(1)
In an election for judge of the supreme court or superintendent of public
instruction, a void in candidacy occurs on or after the ((fourth)) seventh
Tuesday prior to a primary, public filings and the primary being an
indispensable phase of the election process for such offices;

(2)
Except as otherwise specified in RCW 29.15.180, as now or hereafter amended, a
nominee for judge of the superior court entitled to a certificate of election
pursuant to Article 4, section 29, Amendment 41 of the state Constitution dies
or is disqualified on or after the ((fourth)) seventh Tuesday
prior to a primary;

(3)
In other elections for nonpartisan office a void in candidacy occurs or a
vacancy occurs involving an unexpired term to be filled on or after the ((fourth))
seventh Tuesday prior to an election.

Sec.
9. RCW
29.15.230 and 1981 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Filings
for a partisan elective office shall be opened for a period of three normal
business days whenever, on or after the first day of the regular filing period
and before the ((fourth)) seventh Tuesday prior to a primary, a
vacancy occurs in that office, leaving an unexpired term to be filled by an
election for which filings have not been held.

Any
such special three-day filing period shall be fixed by the election officer
with whom declarations of candidacy for that office are filed. The election
officer shall give notice of the special three-day filing period by notifying
the press, radio, and television in the county or counties involved, and by
such other means as may be required by law.

Candidacies
validly filed within the special three-day filing period shall appear on the
primary ballot as if filed during the regular filing period.

Sec.
10. RCW
29.19.030 and 1989 c 4 s 3 (Initiative Measure No. 99) are each amended to read
as follows:

The
name of any candidate for a major political party nomination for president of
the United States shall be printed on the presidential preference primary ballot
of a major political party only:

(1)
By direction of the secretary of state, who in the secretary's sole discretion
has determined that the candidate's candidacy is generally advocated or is
recognized in national news media; or

(2)
If members of the political party of the candidate have presented a petition
for nomination of the candidate that has attached to the petition a sheet or
sheets containing the signatures of at least one thousand registered voters who
declare themselves in the petition as being affiliated with the same political
party as the presidential candidate. The petition shall be filed with the
secretary of state not later than the ((thirty-ninth)) fiftieth
day before the presidential preference primary. The signature sheets shall
also contain the residence address and name or number of the precinct of each
registered voter whose signature appears thereon and shall be certified in the
manner prescribed in RCW 29.79.200 and 29.79.210.

The
secretary of state shall place the name of the candidate on the ballot unless
the candidate, at least ((thirty-five)) forty-five days before
the presidential preference primary, executes and files with the secretary of
state an affidavit stating without qualification that he or she is not now and
will not become a candidate for the office of president of the United States at
the forthcoming presidential election. The secretary of state shall certify
the names of all candidates who will appear on the presidential preference
primary ballot to the respective county auditors on or before the fourth
Tuesday in April of each presidential election year.

Sec.
11. RCW
29.24.020 and 1989 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
nomination of a candidate for partisan public office by other than a major
political party shall only be made either: (1) In a convention held not
earlier than the ((last Saturday in June and not later than the first
Saturday in July or during any of the seven days immediately preceding)) forty-fourth
day nor later than the sixteenth day before the first day for filing
declarations of candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29.68.080; or (2) as
provided by RCW ((29.51.170)) 29.62.180. A minor political party
may hold more than one convention but in no case shall any such party nominate
more than one candidate for any one partisan public office or position. For
the purpose of nominating candidates for the offices of president and
vice-president, United States senator, or a state-wide office, a minor party or
independent candidate holding multiple conventions may add together the number
of signatures of different individuals from each convention obtained in support
of the candidate or candidates in order to obtain the number required by RCW
29.24.030. For all other offices for which nominations are made, signatures of
the requisite number of registered voters must be obtained at a single
convention.

Sec.
12. RCW
29.30.075 and 1987 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
where a recount or litigation under RCW 29.04.030 is pending, the county
auditor shall have sufficient absentee ballots ready to mail to absentee voters
of that county, other than overseas voters or service voters, at least
twenty days before any primary, general election, or special election. At
least thirty days before a primary, general election, or special election, the
county auditor shall mail absentee ballots to all overseas and service voters
who have submitted valid requests for absentee ballots. A request for an
absentee ballot made by an overseas voter or service voter after that day must
be processed immediately.

Sec.
13. RCW
29.62.020 and 1999 c 259 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At least every third day after a special election, primary, or general election
and before certification of the election results, except Sundays and legal
holidays, the county auditor shall convene the county canvassing board or their
designees to process absentee ballots and canvass the votes cast at that
special election, primary, or general election, if the county auditor is in
possession of more than twenty-five ballots that have yet to be canvassed. The
county auditor may use his or her discretion in determining when to convene the
canvassing board or their designees during the final four days before the
certification of election results in order to protect the secrecy of any
ballot.

Each
absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by the county
auditor two days or more before the convening of the canvassing board or their
designees and that either was received by the county auditor before the closing
of the polls on the day of the special election, primary, or general election
for which it was issued, or that bears a date of mailing on or before the
special election, primary, or general election for which it was issued, must be
processed at that time. The tabulation of votes that results from that day's
canvass must be made available to the general public immediately upon
completion of the canvass.

(2)
On the ((tenth)) fifteenth day after a special election ((or a)),
primary ((and on the fifteenth day after a)), or general
election, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and certify the
results. Each absentee ballot that was returned before the closing of the
polls on the date of the primary or election for which it was issued, and each
absentee ballot with a date of mailing on or before the date of the primary or
election for which it was issued and received on or before the date on which
the primary or election is certified, shall be included in the canvass report.

(3)
At the request of any caucus of the state legislature, the county auditor shall
transmit copies of all unofficial returns of state and legislative primaries or
elections prepared by or for the county canvassing board to either the
secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of the house.

Sec.
14. RCW
42.12.040 and 1981 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If a vacancy occurs in any partisan elective office in the
executive or legislative branches of state government or in any partisan county
elective office before the ((fourth)) seventh Tuesday prior to
the primary for the next general election following the occurrence of the
vacancy, a successor shall be elected to that office at that general election.
Except during the last year of the term of office, if such a vacancy occurs on
or after the ((fourth)) seventh Tuesday prior to the primary for
that general election, the election of the successor shall occur at the next
succeeding general election. The elected successor shall hold office for the
remainder of the unexpired term. This section shall not apply to any vacancy occurring
in a charter county which has charter provisions inconsistent with this
section.

Sec.
15. RCW
42.17.710 and 1993 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

During
the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a regular legislative
session convenes and continuing ((thirty days past)) through the
date of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date a
special legislative session convenes and continuing through the date that
session adjourns, no state official or a person employed by or acting on behalf
of a state official or state legislator may solicit or accept contributions to
a public office fund, to a candidate or authorized committee, or to retire a
campaign debt.

Sec.
16. RCW
42.52.185 and 1997 c 320 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
During the twelve-month period beginning on December 1st of the year before a
general election for a state legislator's election to office and continuing
through November 30th immediately after the general election, the legislator
may not mail, either by regular mail or electronic mail, to a constituent at
public expense a letter, newsletter, brochure, or other piece of literature,
except as follows:

(a)
The legislator may mail two mailings of newsletters to constituents. All
newsletters within each mailing of newsletters must be identical as to their
content but not as to the constituent name or address. One such mailing may be
mailed no later than thirty days after the start of a regular legislative
session, except that a legislator appointed during a regular legislative
session to fill a vacant seat may have up to thirty days from the date of
appointment to send out the first mailing. The other mailing may be mailed no
((later than sixty days after the end of a regular legislative session))
earlier than one day after the date of the primary established by RCW
29.13.070 and no later than fifteen days after the date of the primary.

(b)
The legislator may mail an individual letter to (i) an individual constituent
who has contacted the legislator regarding the subject matter of the letter
during the legislator's current term of office; (ii) an individual constituent
who holds a governmental office with jurisdiction over the subject matter of
the letter; or (iii) an individual constituent who has received an award or
honor of extraordinary distinction of a type that is sufficiently infrequent to
be noteworthy to a reasonable person, including, but not limited to: (A) An
international or national award such as the Nobel prize or the Pulitzer prize;
(B) a state award such as Washington scholar; (C) an Eagle Scout award; and (D)
a Medal of Honor.

(2)
For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "legislator" means a
legislator who is a "candidate," as defined by RCW 42.17.020, for any
public office.

(3)
A violation of this section constitutes use of the facilities of a public
office for the purpose of assisting a campaign under RCW 42.52.180.

(4)
The house of representatives and senate shall specifically limit expenditures
per member for the total cost of mailings. Those costs include, but are not
limited to, production costs, printing costs, and postage costs. The limits
imposed under this subsection apply only to the total expenditures on mailings
per member and not to any categorical cost within the total.

(5)
For purposes of this section, persons residing outside the legislative district
represented by the legislator are not considered to be constituents, but
students, military personnel, or others temporarily employed outside of the
district who normally reside in the district are considered to be constituents.

Sec.
17. RCW 27.12.355
and 1987 c 138 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As provided in this section, a rural county library district, island library
district, or intercounty rural library district may withdraw areas from its
boundaries, or reannex areas into the library district that previously had been
withdrawn from the library district under this section.

(2)
The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a
resolution by the board of trustees requesting the withdrawal and finding that,
in the opinion of the board, inclusion of this area within the library district
will result in a reduction of the district's tax levy rate under the provisions
of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or town council
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located within the city or town, or
adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the county
within which the area is located approving the withdrawal, if the area is
located outside of a city or town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end
of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for
property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the
adoption of the second resolution.

The
authority of an area to be withdrawn from a library district as provided under
this section is in addition, and not subject, to the provisions of RCW
27.12.380.

The
withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a library district shall not
exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the costs
of redeeming any indebtedness of the library district existing at the time of
the withdrawal.

(3)
An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a library district under
this section may be reannexed into the library district upon: (a) Adoption of
a resolution by the board of trustees proposing the reannexation; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the
reannexation, if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a
resolution by the county legislative authority of the county within which the
area is located approving the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a
city or town. The reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the adoption of the second
resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax
purposes, the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of
the second resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be
taken by the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling
for a referendum is filed with the city or town council, or county legislative
authority, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the second
resolution, which petition has been signed by registered voters of the area
proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total number of
the registered voters residing in that area.

If
a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been
so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot
proposition to authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of
the area at the next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that
occurs ((forty-five)) fifty or more days after the petitions have
been validated. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec.
18. RCW
27.12.370 and 1982 c 123 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The
county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution call a special
election to be held in such city or town at the next date provided in RCW
29.13.010 but not less than ((forty-five)) fifty days from the
date of the declaration of such finding, and shall cause notice of such
election to be given as provided for in RCW 29.27.080.

The
election on the annexation of the city or town into the library district shall
be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in which the city or town
is located in accordance with the general election laws of the state and the
results thereof shall be canvassed by the canvassing board of the county or
counties. No person shall be entitled to vote at such election unless he or
she is registered to vote in said city or town for at least thirty days
preceding the date of the election. The ballot proposition shall be in
substantially the following form:

"Shall the city or town of
. . . . . . be annexed to and be a part of
. . . . . . library district?

YES ........................................... G

NO............................................. G"

If
a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote in favor
thereof, the city or town shall thereupon be annexed and shall be a part of
such library district.

Sec.
19. RCW
35.06.070 and 1994 c 81 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

A
ballot proposition authorizing an advancement in classification of a town to a
second class city shall be submitted to the voters of the town if either: (1)
Petitions proposing the advancement are submitted to the town clerk that have
been signed by voters of the town equal in number to at least ten percent of
the voters of the town voting at the last municipal general election; or (2)
the town council adopts a resolution proposing the advancement. The clerk
shall immediately forward the petitions to the county auditor who shall review
the signatures and certify the sufficiency of the petitions.

A
ballot proposition authorizing an advancement shall be submitted to the town
voters at the next municipal general election occurring ((forty-five)) fifty
or more days after the petitions are submitted if the county auditor certifies
the petitions as having sufficient valid signatures. The town shall be
advanced to a second class city if the ballot proposition is approved by a
simple majority vote, effective when the corporation is actually reorganized
and the new officers are elected and qualified. The county auditor shall
notify the secretary of state if the advancement of a town to a second class
city is approved.

Sec.
20. RCW
35.13.1821 and 1998 c 286 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
annexation ordinance provided for in RCW 35.13.182 is subject to referendum for
forty-five days after its passage. Upon the filing of a timely and sufficient
referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by qualified electors in
number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general
state election in the area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be
submitted to the voters of the area in a general election if one is to be held
within ninety days or at a special election called for that purpose not less
than ((forty-five)) fifty days nor more than ninety days after
the filing of the referendum petition. Notice of the election shall be given
as provided in RCW 35.13.080 and the election shall be conducted as provided in
the general election law. The annexation shall be deemed approved by the
voters unless a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in opposition
thereto.

After
the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the date of passage of
the annexation ordinance, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has
been filed, the area annexed shall become a part of the city or town upon the
date fixed in the ordinance of annexation.

Sec.
21. RCW
35.61.360 and 1987 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As provided in this section, a metropolitan park district may withdraw areas
from its boundaries, or reannex areas into the metropolitan park district that
previously had been withdrawn from the metropolitan park district under this
section.

(2)
The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a
resolution by the park district commissioners requesting the withdrawal and
finding that, in the opinion of the commissioners, inclusion of this area
within the metropolitan park district will result in a reduction of the
district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the withdrawal,
if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by
the county legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or town. A
withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of
December in the year in which the resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of
establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be
established immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.

The
withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a metropolitan park district shall
not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the
costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the metropolitan park district existing
at the time of the withdrawal.

(3)
An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a metropolitan park
district under this section may be reannexed into the metropolitan park
district upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the park district commissioners
proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or
town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located within the city
or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the
county within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the area
is located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective at
the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on
the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be
reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the
adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of
the total number of the registered voters residing in that area.

If
a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been
so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot
proposition to authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of
the area at the next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that
occurs ((forty-five)) fifty or more days after the petitions have
been validated. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec.
22. RCW
35A.14.299 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each amended to read as
follows:

Such
annexation ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall be subject to
referendum for forty-five days after the passage thereof. Upon the filing of a
timely and sufficient referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by
qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes
cast in the last general state election in the area to be annexed, the question
of annexation shall be submitted to the voters of such area in a general
election if one is to be held within ninety days or at a special election
called for that purpose not less than ((forty-five)) fifty days
nor more than ninety days after the filing of the referendum petition. Notice
of such election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 and the election
shall be conducted as provided in RCW ((35A.14.060)) 35A.29.151.
The annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the
votes cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.

After
the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the date of passage of
the annexation ordinance, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has
been filed, the area annexed shall become a part of the code city upon the date
fixed in the ordinance of annexation. From and after such date, if the
ordinance so provided, property in the annexed area shall be subject to the
proposed zoning regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property within
the area annexed shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate and on the same
basis as the property of such annexing code city is assessed and taxed to pay
for any then outstanding indebtedness of such city contracted prior to, or
existing at, the date of annexation.

Sec.
23. RCW
36.93.030 and 1991 c 363 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created and established in each county with a population of two
hundred ten thousand or more a board to be known and designated as a
"boundary review board".

(2)
A boundary review board may be created and established in any other county in
the following manner:

(a)
The county legislative authority may, by majority vote, adopt a resolution
establishing a boundary review board; or

(b)
A petition seeking establishment of a boundary review board signed by qualified
electors residing in the county equal in number to at least five percent of the
votes cast in the county at the last county general election may be filed with
the county auditor.

Upon
the filing of such a petition, the county auditor shall examine the same and
certify to the sufficiency of the signatures thereon. No person may withdraw
his or her name from a petition after it has been filed with the auditor.
Within thirty days after the filing of such petition, the county auditor shall
transmit the same to the county legislative authority, together with his or her
certificate of sufficiency.

After
receipt of a valid petition for the establishment of a boundary review board,
the county legislative authority shall submit the question of whether a
boundary review board should be established to the electorate at the next
county primary or county general election which occurs more than ((forty-five))
fifty days from the date of receipt of the petition. Notice of the
election shall be given as provided in RCW 29.27.080 and shall include a clear
statement of the proposal to be submitted.

If
a majority of the persons voting on the proposition shall vote in favor of the
establishment of the boundary review board, such board shall thereupon be
deemed established.

Sec.
24. RCW
52.02.080 and 1989 c 63 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The election on the formation of the district and to elect the
initial fire commissioners shall be conducted by the election officials of the
county or counties in which the proposed district is located in accordance with
the general election laws of the state. This election shall be held at the
next general election date, as specified under RCW 29.13.020, that occurs ((forty-five))
fifty or more days after the date of the action by the boundary review
board, or county legislative authority or authorities, approving the proposal.

Sec.
25. RCW
52.04.056 and 1989 c 63 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As provided in this section, a fire protection district may withdraw areas from
its boundaries, or reannex areas into the fire protection district that
previously had been withdrawn from the fire protection district under this
section.

(2)
The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a
resolution by the board of fire commissioners requesting the withdrawal and
finding that, in the opinion of the board, inclusion of this area within the
fire protection district will result in a reduction of the district's tax levy
rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b) adoption of a resolution by
the city or town council approving the withdrawal, if the area is located
within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative
authority or authorities of the county or counties within which the area is
located approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or
town. A withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on the
thirty-first day of December in the year in which the resolutions are adopted,
but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the
boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the second
resolution.

The
authority of an area to be withdrawn from a fire protection district as
provided under this section is in addition, and not subject, to the provisions of
RCW 52.04.101.

The
withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a fire protection district shall
not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the
costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the fire protection district existing at
the time of the withdrawal.

(3)
An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a fire protection
district under this section may be reannexed into the fire protection district
upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the board of fire commissioners
proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or
town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located within the city
or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority or
authorities of the county or counties within which the area is located
approving the reannexation, if the area is located outside of a city or town.
The reannexation shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first
day of December in the year in which the adoption of the second resolution
occurs, but for purposes of establishing boundaries for property tax purposes,
the boundaries shall be established immediately upon the adoption of the second
resolution. Referendum action on the proposed reannexation may be taken by
the voters of the area proposed to be reannexed if a petition calling for a
referendum is filed with the city or town council, or county legislative
authority or authorities, within a thirty-day period after the adoption of the
second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered voters of the
area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of the total
number of the registered voters residing in that area.

If
a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been
so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot
proposition to authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of
the area at the next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that
occurs ((forty-five)) fifty or more days after the petitions have
been validated. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

Sec.
26. RCW
52.04.071 and 1984 c 230 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

The
county legislative authority or authorities shall by resolution call a special
election to be held in the city or town and in the fire protection district at
the next date provided in RCW 29.13.010 but not less than ((forty-five))
fifty days from the date of the declaration of the finding, and shall
cause notice of the election to be given as provided for in RCW 29.27.080.

The
election on the annexation of the city or town into the fire protection district
shall be conducted by the auditor of the county or counties in which the city
or town and the fire protection district are located in accordance with the
general election laws of the state. The results thereof shall be canvassed by
the canvassing board of the county or counties. No person is entitled to vote
at the election unless he or she is a qualified elector in the city or town or
unless he or she is a qualified elector within the boundaries of the fire
protection district. The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the
following form:

"Shall the city or town of
. . . . . . be annexed to and be a part of
. . . . . . fire protection district?

YES ........................................... G

NO............................................. G"

If
a majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the city or town and a
majority of the persons voting on the proposition in the fire protection
district vote in favor thereof, the city or town shall be annexed and shall be
a part of the fire protection district.

Sec.
27. RCW
53.04.110 and 1998 c 240 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
port district now existing or which may hereafter be organized under the laws
of the state of Washington is hereby authorized to change its corporate name
under the following conditions and in the following manner:

(1)
On presentation, at least ((forty-five)) fifty days before any
general port election to be held in the port district, of a petition to the
commissioners of any port district now existing or which may hereafter be
established under the laws of the state of Washington, signed by at least ten
percent of the total number of voters of the port district who voted at the
last general port election and asking that the corporate name of the port
district be changed, it shall be the duty of the commissioners to submit to the
voters of the port district the proposition as to whether the corporate name of
the port shall be changed. The proposition shall be submitted at the next
general port election.

(2)
The petition shall contain the present corporate name of the port district and
the corporate name which is proposed to be given to the port district.

(3)
On submitting the proposition to the voters of the port district it shall be
the duty of the port commissioners to cause to be printed on the official
ballot used at the election the following proposition:

"Shall the corporate
name, 'Port of . . . . . .' be changed to 'Port of
. . . . . . . . .'........................................ YES

"Shall the corporate name, 'Port of
. . . . . .' be changed to 'Port of
. . . . . . . . .'........................................ NO"

(4)
At the time when the returns of the general election shall be canvassed by the
commissioners of the port district, it shall be the duty of the commissioners
to canvass the vote upon the proposition so submitted, recording in their
record the result of the canvass.

(5) Should a majority of the registered voters of the port district
voting at the general port election vote in favor of the proposition it shall
be the duty of the port commissioners to certify the fact to the auditor of the
county in which the port district shall be situated and to the secretary of
state of the state of Washington, under the seal of the port district. On and
after the filing of the certificate with the county auditor as aforesaid and
with the secretary of state of the state of Washington, the corporate name of
the port district shall be changed, and thenceforth the port district shall be
known and designated in accordance therewith.

Sec.
28. RCW
54.08.010 and 1985 c 469 s 55 are each amended to read as follows:

At
any general election held in an even-numbered year, the county legislative
authority of any county in this state may, or, on petition of ten percent of
the qualified electors of the county based on the total vote cast in the last
general county election held in an even-numbered year, shall, by resolution,
submit to the voters of the county the proposition of creating a public utility
district which shall be coextensive with the limits of the county as now or
hereafter established. A form of petition for the creation of a public utility
district shall be submitted to the county auditor within ten months prior to
the election at which the proposition is to be submitted to the voters.
Petitions shall be filed with the county auditor not less than four months
before the election and the county auditor shall within thirty days examine the
signatures thereof and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency thereof. If
the petition be found to be insufficient, it shall be returned to the persons
filing the same, who may amend or add names thereto for ten days, when the same
shall be returned to the county auditor, who shall have an additional fifteen
days to examine the same and attach his certificate thereto. No person having
signed the petition shall be allowed to withdraw his name therefrom after the
filing of the same with the county auditor: PROVIDED, That each signature
shall be dated and that no signature dated prior to the date on which the form
of petition was submitted to the county auditor shall be valid. Whenever the
petition shall be certified to as sufficient, the county auditor shall
forthwith transmit the same, together with his certificate of sufficiency
attached thereto, to the county legislative authority which shall submit the
proposition to the voters of the county at the next general election in an
even-numbered year occurring ((forty-five)) fifty days after
submission of the proposition to the legislative authority. The notice of the
election shall state the boundaries of the proposed public utility district and
the object of such election, and shall in other respects conform to the
requirements of the general laws of the state of Washington, governing the time
and manner of holding elections. In submitting the question to the voters for
their approval or rejection, the proposition shall be expressed on the ballot
substantially in the following terms:

Public Utility District No. .......................... YES G

Public
Utility District No. ............................ NO G

Any
petition for the formation of a public utility district may describe a less
area than the entire county in which the petition is filed, the boundaries of
which shall follow the then existing precinct boundaries and not divide any
voting precinct; and in the event that such a petition is filed the county
legislative authority shall fix a date for a hearing on such petition, and
shall publish the petition, without the signatures thereto appended, for two
weeks prior to the date of the hearing, together with a notice stating the time
of the meeting when the petition will be heard. The publication, and all other
publications required by chapter 1, Laws of 1931, shall be in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the district is situated. The
hearing on the petition may be adjourned from time to time, not exceeding four
weeks in all. If upon the final hearing the county legislative authority shall
find that any lands have been unjustly or improperly included within the
proposed public utility district and will not be benefited by inclusion
therein, it shall change and fix the boundary lines in such manner as it shall
deem reasonable and just and conducive to the public welfare and convenience,
and make and enter an order establishing and defining the boundary lines of the
proposed public utility district: PROVIDED, That no lands shall be included
within the boundaries so fixed lying outside the boundaries described in the
petition, except upon the written request of the owners of those lands.
Thereafter the same procedure shall be followed as prescribed in this chapter
for the formation of a public utility district including an entire county,
except that the petition and election shall be confined solely to the lesser
public utility district.

No public utility district created after September 1, 1979, shall
include any other public utility district within its boundaries: PROVIDED,
That this paragraph shall not alter, amend, or modify provisions of chapter 54.32
RCW.

Sec.
29. RCW
54.08.070 and 1979 ex.s. c 240 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
district which does not own or operate electric facilities for the generation,
transmission or distribution of electric power on March 25, 1969, or any
district which hereafter does not construct or acquire such electric facilities
within ten years of its creation, shall not construct or acquire any such
electric facilities without the approval of such proposal by the voters of such
district: PROVIDED, That a district shall have the power to construct or
acquire electric facilities within ten years following its creation by action
of its commission without voter approval of such action.

At
any general election held in an even-numbered year, the proposal to construct
or acquire electric facilities may be submitted to the voters of the district
by resolution of the public utility district commission or shall be submitted
to the voters of the district by the county legislative authority on petition
of ten percent of the qualified electors of such district, based on the total
vote cast in the last general county election held in an even-numbered year. A
form of petition for the construction or acquisition of electric facilities by
the public utility district shall be submitted to the county auditor within ten
months prior to the election at which such proposition is to be submitted to
the voters. Petitions shall be filed with the county auditor not less than
four months before such election and the county auditor shall within thirty
days examine the signatures thereof and certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency
thereof. If such petition is found to be insufficient, it shall be returned to
the persons filing the same, who may amend and add names thereto for ten days,
when the same shall be returned to the county auditor, who shall have an
additional fifteen days to examine the same and attach his certificate
thereto. No person having signed such petition shall be allowed to withdraw
his name therefrom after the filing of the same with the county auditor:
PROVIDED, That each signature shall be dated and that no signature dated prior
to the date on which the form of petition was submitted to the county auditor
shall be valid. Whenever such petition shall be certified to as sufficient,
the county auditor shall forthwith transmit the same, together with his
certificate of sufficiency attached thereto, to the county legislative
authority which shall submit such proposition to the voters of said district at
the next general election in an even-numbered year occurring ((forty-five))
fifty days after submission of the proposition to said legislative
authority. The notice of the election shall state the object of such election,
and shall in other respects conform to the requirements of the general laws of
Washington, governing the time and manner of holding elections.

The
proposal submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection, shall be
expressed on the ballot substantially in the following terms:

Shall
Public Utility District No. . . . . of
. . . . . . County construct or acquire electric
facilities for the generation, transmission or distribution of electric power?

Yes G

No G

Within
ten days after such election, the election board of the county shall canvass
the returns, and if at such election a majority of the voters voting on such
proposition shall vote in favor of such construction or acquisition of electric
facilities, the district shall be authorized to construct or acquire electric
facilities.

Sec.
30. RCW
57.04.050 and 1999 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
entry of the findings of the final hearing on the petition if one or more
county legislative authorities find that the proposed district will be
conducive to the public health, welfare, and convenience and will benefit the
land therein, they shall present a resolution to the county auditor calling for
a special election to be held at a date specified under RCW 29.13.020, that
occurs ((forty-five)) fifty or more days after the resolution is
presented, at which a ballot proposition authorizing the district to be created
shall be submitted to voters for their approval or rejection. The
commissioners shall cause to be published a notice of the election for four
successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the proposed
district, which notice shall state the hours during which the polls will be
open, the boundaries of the district as finally adopted and the object of the
election, and the notice shall also be posted ten days in ten public places in
the proposed district. The district shall be created if the ballot proposition
authorizing the district to be created is approved by a majority of the voters
voting on the proposition.

A
separate ballot proposition authorizing the district, if created, to impose a
single-year excess levy for the preliminary expenses of the district shall be
submitted to voters for their approval or rejection at the same special
election, if the petition to create the district also proposed that a ballot
proposition authorizing an excess levy be submitted to voters for their
approval or rejection. The excess levy shall be proposed in the amount
specified in the petition to create the district, not to exceed one dollar and
twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, and may only be
submitted to voters for their approval or rejection if the special election is
held in February, March, or April((, or May)). The proposition
to be effective must be approved in the manner set forth in Article VII,
section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

Sec.
31. RCW
70.44.235 and 1987 c 138 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As provided in this section, a public hospital district may withdraw areas from
its boundaries, or reannex areas into the public hospital district that
previously had been withdrawn from the public hospital district under this
section.

(2)
The withdrawal of an area shall be authorized upon: (a) Adoption of a
resolution by the hospital district commissioners requesting the withdrawal and
finding that, in the opinion of the commissioners, inclusion of this area
within the public hospital district will result in a reduction of the
district's tax levy rate under the provisions of RCW 84.52.010; and (b)
adoption of a resolution by the city or town council approving the withdrawal,
if the area is located within the city or town, or adoption of a resolution by
the county legislative authority of the county within which the area is located
approving the withdrawal, if the area is located outside of a city or town. A
withdrawal shall be effective at the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December
in the year in which the resolutions are adopted, but for purposes of
establishing boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be
established immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution.

The
withdrawal of an area from the boundaries of a public hospital district shall
not exempt any property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying the
costs of redeeming any indebtedness of the public hospital district existing at
the time of the withdrawal.

(3)
An area that has been withdrawn from the boundaries of a public hospital
district under this section may be reannexed into the public hospital district
upon: (a) Adoption of a resolution by the hospital district commissioners
proposing the reannexation; and (b) adoption of a resolution by the city or
town council approving the reannexation, if the area is located within the city
or town, or adoption of a resolution by the county legislative authority of the
county within which the area is located approving the reannexation, if the area
is located outside of a city or town. The reannexation shall be effective at
the end of the day on the thirty-first day of December in the year in which the
adoption of the second resolution occurs, but for purposes of establishing
boundaries for property tax purposes, the boundaries shall be established
immediately upon the adoption of the second resolution. Referendum action on
the proposed reannexation may be taken by the voters of the area proposed to be
reannexed if a petition calling for a referendum is filed with the city or town
council, or county legislative authority, within a thirty-day period after the
adoption of the second resolution, which petition has been signed by registered
voters of the area proposed to be reannexed equal in number to ten percent of
the total number of the registered voters residing in that area.

If
a valid petition signed by the requisite number of registered voters has been
so filed, the effect of the resolutions shall be held in abeyance and a ballot
proposition to authorize the reannexation shall be submitted to the voters of
the area at the next special election date specified in RCW 29.13.020 that
occurs ((forty-five)) fifty or more days after the petitions have
been validated. Approval of the ballot proposition authorizing the
reannexation by a simple majority vote shall authorize the reannexation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 32. RCW
29.01.160 (September primary) and 1965 c 9 s 29.01.160 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 33. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---