BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.61.030 and 1987 c 432 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
lake management district may be initiated upon either the adoption of a
resolution of intention by a county legislative authority or the filing of a
petition signed by ((ten landowners or the owners of at least fifteen
percent of the acreage)) a simple majority of over fifty percent of the
landowners contained within the proposed lake management district((,
whichever is greater)). A petition or resolution of intention shall set
forth: (1) The nature of the lake improvement or maintenance activities
proposed to be financed; (2) the amount of money proposed to be raised by
special assessments or rates and charges; (3) if special assessments are to be
imposed, whether the special assessments will be imposed annually for the
duration of the lake management district, or the full special assessments will
be imposed at one time, with the possibility of installments being made to
finance the issuance of lake management district bonds, or both methods; (4) if
rates and charges are to be imposed, the annual amount of revenue proposed to
be collected and whether revenue bonds payable from the rates and charges are
proposed to be issued; (5) the number of years proposed for the duration of the
lake management district; and (6) the proposed boundaries of the lake
management district.

The
county legislative authority may require the posting of a bond of up to five thousand
dollars before the county considers the proposed creation of a lake management
district initiated by petition. The bond may only be used by the county to
finance its costs in studying, holding hearings, making notices, preparing
special assessment rolls or rolls showing the rates and charges on each parcel,
and conducting elections related to the lake management district if the
proposed lake management district is not created.

A
resolution of intention shall also designate the number of the proposed lake
management district, and fix a date, time, and place for a public hearing on
the formation of the proposed lake management district. The date for the
public hearing shall be at least thirty days and no more than ninety days after
the adoption of the resolution of intention unless an emergency exists.

Petitions
shall be filed with the county legislative authority. The county legislative
authority shall determine the sufficiency of the signatures, which shall be
conclusive upon all persons. No person may withdraw his or her name from a
petition after it is filed. If the county legislative authority determines a
petition to be sufficient and the proposed lake management district appears to
be in the public interest and the financing of the lake improvement or
maintenance activities is feasible, it shall adopt a resolution of intention,
setting forth all of the details required to be included when a resolution of
intention is initiated by the county legislative authority.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.61.090 and 1987 c 432 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
balloting shall be subject to the following conditions, which shall be included
in the instructions mailed with each ballot, as provided in RCW 36.61.080: (1)
All ballots must be signed by the owner or reputed owner of property according
to the assessor's tax rolls; (2) each ballot must be returned to the county
legislative authority not later than five o'clock p.m. of a specified day,
which shall be at least twenty but not more than thirty days after the ballots
are mailed; (3) each property owner shall mark his or her ballot for or against
the creation of the proposed lake management district((, with the ballot
weighted so that the property owner has one vote for each dollar of estimated
special assessment or rate and charge proposed to be imposed on his or her
property)); and (4) the valid ballots shall be tabulated and a simple
majority of over fifty percent of the votes cast shall determine whether
the proposed lake management district shall be approved or rejected.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.61.100 and 1987 c 432 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the proposal receives a simple majority of over fifty percent of the
vote in favor of creating the lake management district, the county legislative
authority shall adopt an ordinance creating the lake management district and
may proceed with establishing the special assessments or rates and charges,
collecting the special assessments or rates and charges, and performing the
lake improvement or maintenance activities. If a proposed lake management
district includes more than one lake and its adjacent areas, the lake
management district may only be established if the proposal receives a simple
majority of over fifty percent of the vote in favor of creating it by
the voters on each lake and its adjacent areas. The county legislative
authority shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation in a
lake management district indicating that such an ordinance has been adopted
within ten days of the adoption of the ordinance.

The
ballots shall be available for public inspection after they are counted.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.61.115 and 1987 c 432 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

A special assessment, or rate and charge, on any lot, tract, parcel
of land, or other property shall not be increased beyond one hundred ten
percent of the estimated special assessment, or rate and charge, proposed to be
imposed as provided in the resolution adopted in RCW 36.61.070, unless the
creation of a lake management district is approved under another mailed ballot
election that reflects the ((weighted)) voting arising from such
increases.

---
END ---