BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this chapter is to provide legal recognition to the profession of
industrial hygiene, as well as provide assurance to the public that individuals
representing themselves as being involved in the profession of industrial
hygiene have met minimum qualifications, thereby protecting the public from
harm.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Industrial hygiene" means that science and art devoted to the
anticipation, recognition, evaluation, and control of those environmental
factors and stresses arising in or from the workplace that may cause sickness,
impaired health and well-being, or significant discomfort among workers, and
may also impact the general community.

(2)
"Industrial hygienist" means a person who meets the educational
requirements and who demonstrates competence in practicing industrial hygiene
as determined under this chapter.

(3)
"Industrial hygienist-in-training" or "IHIT" means a person
who has received the designation of industrial hygienist-in-training from the
American board of industrial hygiene, a national nonprofit corporation
established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession
of industrial hygiene and that certifies individuals who meet its education,
experience, examination, and maintenance requirements for practicing industrial
hygiene.

(4)
"Certified industrial hygienist" or "CIH" is a person who
has received the designation of certified industrial hygienist from the
American board of industrial hygiene, a national nonprofit corporation
established to improve the practice and educational standards of the profession
of industrial hygiene and that certifies individuals who meet its education,
experience, examination, and maintenance requirements for practicing industrial
hygiene.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
No person may represent himself or herself as an industrial hygienist without
first:

(a)
Completing a baccalaureate or graduate degree from an accredited college or
university using a curriculum in industrial hygiene, biology, chemistry,
engineering, physics, or a closely related physical or biological science; and

(b)
Demonstrating through experience and training, the ability:

(i)
To anticipate and recognize workplace environmental factors and stresses such
as chemical, physical, biological, or ergonomic, and to understand their
effects on people, and their well-being;

(ii)
To evaluate, through observation, sampling, and testing, the magnitude of these
factors and stresses; and

(iii)
To prescribe methods to prevent, eliminate, control, or reduce such factors and
stresses, and their effects; or

(c)
Being certified by a national nonprofit corporation established to improve the
practice and educational standards of the profession of industrial hygiene and
that certifies individuals who meet its education, experience, examination, and
maintenance requirements.

(2)
A person represents himself or herself as an industrial hygienist when the
person adopts or uses any title or description of services that incorporates
one or more of the following terms: Industrial hygienist, industrial
hygienist-in-training, IHIT, certified industrial hygienist, or CIH.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
person meeting the requirements of section 3 of this act or a nonprofit
corporation established to improve the practice and educational standards of
the profession of industrial hygiene through certifying individuals who meet
its education, experience, examination, and maintenance requirements may bring
a private cause of action in the appropriate court to recover actual damages or
one thousand dollars, whichever is greater, against any person who violates
section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Nothing in this chapter prohibits or restricts:

(1)
The practice of industrial hygiene by a person employed as an apprentice under
the supervision of an industrial hygienist;

(2)
A student studying industrial hygiene engaging in supervised activities related
to industrial hygiene;

(3)
Any person legally regulated in this state under any other licensing act or
regulation from engaging in the activities permitted under his or her license,
provided he or she does not represent himself or herself to the public as an
industrial hygienist; or

(4)
Individuals practicing within the scope of the meaning of industrial hygiene,
so long as the individual does not use the title, initials, or represent
themselves to the public as an industrial hygienist.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---