BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.34.230 and 1995 c 318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, for the purpose of acquiring
conservation futures ((as well as)) and other rights and
interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and for
the development, maintenance, and operation of the real property, a county
may levy an amount not to exceed six and one-quarter cents per thousand dollars
of assessed valuation against the assessed valuation of all taxable property
within the county. The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax
levy authorized in this section.

(2) A county imposing the levy authorized in this section may
use no more than twenty-five percent of these funds for development, maintenance,
and operation of the real property acquired with funds received from the levy
authorized in this section.

---
END ---