BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.101.020 and 1990 c 288 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this chapter, "placebound" means unable to
relocate to complete a college program because of family or employment
commitments, health concerns, monetary inability, or other similar factors.

(2) To be eligible for an educational opportunity grant, applicants
must be placebound residents of the state of Washington who are needy students
as defined in RCW 28B.10.802(3) and who have completed the associate of arts
degree or its equivalent. A placebound resident is one who may be influenced
by the receipt of an enhanced student financial aid award to attend an
institution that has existing unused capacity rather than attend a branch
campus established pursuant to chapter 28B.45 RCW. An eligible placebound
applicant is further defined as a person ((whose residence is located in an
area served by a branch campus)) who, because of family or employment
commitments, health concerns, monetary need, or other similar factors, would be
unable to complete an upper-division course of study but for receipt of an
educational opportunity grant.

---
END ---