BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that apprenticeship as a job training tool is one of the most
effective in the state. The state is experiencing a shortage of skilled
workers, especially in this period of economic growth. The most severe
shortage is for workers with a postsecondary vocational credential.

Though
apprenticeship as a training model is effective, it represents a very small
portion of training that is currently taking place within the work force. It
is the intent of the legislature to encourage and foster the greater use of the
apprenticeship training model in new and emerging industries.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.04.030 and 1979 ex.s. c 37 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the confirmation of the state apprenticeship council by a majority vote, the
director of labor and industries shall appoint and deputize an assistant
director to be known as the supervisor of apprenticeship. Under the
supervision of the director of labor and industries and with the advice and guidance
of the apprenticeship council, the supervisor shall: (1) Encourage and promote
the making of apprenticeship agreements conforming to the standards established
by or in accordance with this chapter, and in harmony with the policies of the
United States department of labor; (2) encourage and promote apprenticeship
opportunities in new and emerging occupations that have not traditionally used
the apprenticeship training model to include outreach to employers and the
community and technical college system; (3) act as secretary of the
apprenticeship council and of state joint apprenticeship committees; (((3)))
(4) when so authorized by the apprenticeship council, register such
apprenticeship agreements as are in the best interests of the apprentice and
conform to the standards established by or in accordance with this chapter; (((4)))
(5) keep a record of apprenticeship agreements and upon performance
thereof issue certificates of completion of apprenticeship; (((5))) (6)
terminate or cancel any apprenticeship agreements in accordance with the
provisions of such agreements; and who (((6))) (7) may act to
bring about the settlement of differences arising out of the apprenticeship
agreement where such differences cannot be adjusted locally or in accordance
with the established trade procedure.

Related
and supplemental instruction for apprentices, coordination of instruction with
job experiences, and the selection and training of teachers and coordinators
for such instruction shall be the responsibility of the ((commission for
vocational education and its local recognized agency for vocational education))
state board for community and technical colleges. The director of labor
and industries is authorized to appoint such other personnel as may be
necessary to aid the apprenticeship council and the supervisor of
apprenticeship in the execution of their functions under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
(1)(a) A joint legislative task force on new and emerging apprenticeships is
established. The task force shall consist of up to fifteen members, as
follows:

(i)
Two members, one from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate;

(ii)
Two members, one from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(iii)
Up to ten members representing business and labor, primarily from those
occupations that have not traditionally used the apprenticeship model such as
occupations in high tech industries. Members shall be appointed jointly by the
president of the senate and the co-speakers of the house of representatives;
and

(iv)
One member who is an active participant in an apprenticeship program. The
member shall be appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the
co-speakers of the house of representatives.

(b)
In addition, the work force training and education coordinating board, the
department of labor and industries, the state board for community and technical
colleges, and the higher education coordinating board shall cooperate with the
joint legislative task force on new and emerging apprenticeships and maintain a
liaison representative, who shall be a nonvoting member.

(c)
The joint legislative task force on new and emerging apprenticeships shall
choose its chair from among its membership.

(2)
The joint legislative task force on new and emerging apprenticeships shall
study the following issues:

(a)
Barriers to the use of new and emerging apprenticeships;

(b) Incentives for developing training using the
apprenticeship model;

(c)
The need for resources to manage the administrative process and promotion of
the program;

(d)
The distribution of program costs; and

(e)
Identification of funding alternatives for providing training through the
apprenticeship model.

(3)
The joint legislative task force on new and emerging apprenticeships, where
feasible, may consult with individuals from the public and private sector or
ask such persons to establish an advisory committee.

(4)
The joint legislative task force on new and emerging apprenticeships shall use
legislative facilities and staff from senate committee services and the office
of program research, but may hire additional staff with specific technical
expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out the mandates of this
study. Each nonlegislative member of the task force shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. All expenses
of the task force, including travel, shall be paid jointly by the senate and
the house of representatives.

(5)
The joint legislative task force on new and emerging apprenticeships shall
report its findings and recommendations to the legislature by December 1, 2000.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2001.

---
END ---