BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
73.04.110 and 1987 c 98 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
((person who is a)) veteran, as defined in RCW 41.04.005 ((who)),
is entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the department of
licensing if the veteran both submits to the department ((of licensing))
satisfactory proof of a service-connected disability rating from the veterans
administration or the military service from which the veteran was discharged
and the veteran:

(1)
Has lost the use of both hands or one foot;

(2)
Was captured and incarcerated for more than twenty-nine days by an enemy of the
United States during a period of war with the United States;

(3)
Has become blind in both eyes as the result of military service; or

(4)
Is rated by the veterans administration or the military service from which the
veteran was discharged and is receiving service-connected compensation at ((the
one hundred)) at least a fifty percent rate that is expected to
exist for more than one year((;

is
entitled to regular or special license plates issued by the department of
licensing)). The special license plates shall bear
distinguishing marks, letters, or numerals indicating that the motor vehicle is
owned by a disabled veteran or former prisoner of war. This license shall be
issued annually for one personal use vehicle without payment of any license
fees or excise tax thereon. Whenever any person who has been issued license
plates under the provisions of this section applies to the department for
transfer of the plates to a subsequently acquired motor vehicle, a transfer fee
of five dollars shall be charged in addition to all other appropriate fees.
The department may periodically verify the ((one hundred)) fifty
percent rate as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Any
person who has been issued free motor vehicle license plates under this section
prior to July 1, 1983, shall continue to be eligible for the annual free
license plates.

For
the purposes of this section, "blind" means the definition of
"blind" used by the state of Washington in determining eligibility
for financial assistance to the blind under Title 74 RCW.

Any unauthorized use of a special plate is a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---