BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The transportation improvement board, in cooperation with the freight mobility
strategic investment board, shall convene a panel of transportation
beneficiaries to conduct a comprehensive analysis of state-wide transportation
needs and priorities, existing and potential transportation funding mechanisms,
and the policies and practices of governmental entities, private businesses,
and labor that affect the delivery of transportation programs and projects. To
the extent that it deems it practicable, the board shall use the processes,
procedures, materials, and working groups or committees established by the blue
ribbon commission on transportation.

(2)
The transportation improvement board, together with the freight mobility
strategic investment board, shall provide quarterly progress reports to the
governor, the transportation committees of the legislature, and the house of
representatives and senate fiscal committees and shall report its final
findings and recommendations by December 1, 2000.

Sec.
2. 1998
c 348 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 3,822,000

Transportation
Fund‑-State Appropriation........ $ 250,000

Central
Puget Sound Public Transportation

Account--State
Appropriation............... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,172,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
In order to meet the growing demand for services the legislative transportation
committee shall seek accountability and efficiencies within transportation
agency programs through in-depth program evaluations. These program
evaluations shall consider:

(a)
Whether or not strategic planning and performance-based budgeting is a
preferable planning and budgeting tool to the current incremental budgeting
process for agency administrative programs and capital program budgeting;

(b)
How the programs are performing currently and how service would be affected at
different funding levels using performance measures; and

(c)
What decision-making tools aid with the budgeting and oversight of these
programs, such as tools developed during the maintenance accountability program
(MAP) conducted by the legislative transportation committee during the 1995-97
biennium.

(2)
In consultation with other legislative committees, the legislative
transportation committee shall study ways to enhance budget development tools
and presentation documents that will better illustrate agencies' full
appropriation authority and the intended outcomes of the appropriation.

(3)
The legislative transportation committee shall conduct an evaluation of
services provided by the county road administration board, the transportation
improvement board and the TransAid division within the department of
transportation. The evaluation shall assess whether consolidation of any of
these activities will result in efficiencies and improved service delivery.
The evaluation shall also assess the funding structure of these organizations
to determine whether there are any benefits gained from a more simplified
structure. The evaluation shall also assess other funding authorities to see
if there is potential for further expansion of these revenues. The committee
shall report its findings and recommendations to the 1998 legislature and, if
needed, prepare legislation to implement those recommendations. $150,000 of
the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is provided for this
evaluation.

(4)
((The legislative transportation committee, in cooperation with the house
appropriations committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the office
of financial management, shall study and report to the legislature its findings
regarding the process and procedures for calculation, determination, and
collection of the amounts of motor vehicle excise tax (MVET) collected on the
sale or lease of motor vehicles in this state. The report shall include
findings as to the base amount for calculation of MVET, the amortization
schedule for calculation of MVET, and adequacy and efficiency of current
systems to provide accurate and timely information to those responsible for
determining and collecting the MVET due, including recommendations for
determining the MVET due for current and future multiple MVET tax structures.
The report must also include a status report as to the progress and feasibility
of using third party information providers or using private vendors to collect the
MVET. $200,000 of the transportation fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for this evaluation including the use of a consultant. This $200,000
amount is null and void if an appropriation for this activity is enacted in any
other appropriations bill by June 30, 1997.

(5)))
During the 1998 interim, the legislative transportation committee shall conduct
a study relating to interagency reimbursements, cost allocations, debt service
authorizations, and other budget accountability issues.

(((7)))
(5) The legislative transportation committee shall study the economic
and transportation impact of a draw-down of the Columbia/Snake river. At a
minimum, the study should address the following issues: (a) Impacts on
alternate transportation modes: State and local road deterioration,
congestion, safety, rail, and truck capacity; (b) impacts to producers,
growers, and shippers, such as access to markets and transportation costs; (c)
impacts to river, such as transportation, jobs, and businesses; and (d) impacts
on the state's export sales.

(((8)))
(6) $1,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the following purpose: By June 1, 1998, the legislature
and the governor shall convene a panel of transportation beneficiaries to
conduct a comprehensive analysis of state-wide transportation needs and
priorities; existing and potential transportation funding mechanisms, and the
policies and practices of governmental entities, private businesses, and labor
that affect the delivery of transportation programs and projects. By May 1,
1998, the speaker of the house of representatives and the majority leader of
the senate shall appoint two members from each caucus of the house of
representatives and senate and the governor shall appoint individuals
representing, at a minimum, the following entities: The governor; state
agencies whose policies, practices, and procedures have a direct impact on the
delivery of transportation programs, projects, and services; cities; counties;
regional transportation planning organizations; ports; passenger rail; light
density freight rail; transit agencies; the trucking industry; the steamship
industry; major employers; the retail industry; agricultural business; labor;
contractors; and the general public.

The
panel shall provide quarterly progress reports to the governor, the legislative
transportation committee, and the house of representatives and senate fiscal
committees and shall report its final findings and recommendations by December
1, 2000.

(((9)))
(7) Up to $100,000 of the central Puget Sound public transportation
account--state appropriation and up to $50,000 of the transportation
fund--state appropriation are provided solely for a contracted performance and
management audit of selected public transportation systems to ascertain the
relative effectiveness and efficiency of those systems and, where appropriate,
provide recommendations that would improve efficiency and effectiveness. The
audit shall also determine the accuracy of the information contained in the
annual public transportation systems report published by the department of
transportation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Effective December 31, 2000, 1999 sp.s. c 1 s 207 (uncodified) is repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---