BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the medical risks to the health of women as a result of
obtaining an abortion makes it necessary to clarify that only qualified health
care personnel may perform abortions or assist in performing abortions.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.02.110 and 1992 c 1 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state may not deny or interfere with a woman's right to choose to have an
abortion prior to viability of the fetus, or to protect her life or health.

A
physician may terminate ((and a health care provider may assist a physician
in terminating)) a pregnancy as permitted by this section. A health
care provider may assist a physician who is terminating a pregnancy but only a
physician may terminate a pregnancy.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.02.170 and 1992 c 1 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Viability" means the point in the pregnancy when, in the judgment of
the physician on the particular facts of the case before such physician, there
is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus's sustained survival outside the uterus
without the application of extraordinary medical measures.

(2)
"Abortion" means any medical treatment intended to induce the
termination of a pregnancy except for the purpose of producing a live birth.

(3)
"Pregnancy" means the reproductive process beginning with the implantation
of an embryo.

(4)
"Physician" means a physician licensed to practice under chapter
18.57 or 18.71 RCW in the state of Washington.

(5)
"Health care provider" means a physician ((or a)) and any
other person ((acting under the general direction of a physician)) licensed
by this state under Title 18 RCW to provide health care services.

(6)
"State" means the state of Washington and counties, cities, towns,
municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal corporations in the state of
Washington.

(7)
"Private medical facility" means any medical facility that is not
owned or operated by the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---