BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 81.80 RCW to read as follows:

If a common carrier or contract carrier transports human tissue or
human fetal tissue, the carrier shall ensure that the package is clearly
labeled as to its contents. The labeling must include, at a minimum, the words
"package contains human tissue" or "package contains human fetal
tissue," as appropriate. The required words must be printed in red ink
and in letters that are at least one inch. The commission shall adopt rules
implementing this section.

---
END ---