BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

When
a newborn infant has been identified as being affected by the nonprescription
use of a controlled substance by a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or
18.57 RCW primarily responsible for the care of a newborn infant, an advanced
registered nurse who practices midwifery licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, or a
midwife licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW, the department must be notified by
the physician, nurse, or midwife. Information given to the department shall
include the name and address of the parent or parents of an infant who has been
affected by the nonprescription use of a controlled substance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department, upon receipt of a report under section 1 of this act, shall
investigate and, if the department has reasonable cause to believe that the
infant has been affected by the nonprescription use of a controlled substance,
the infant is in need of treatment for conditions related to the infant being
affected by the nonprescription use of a controlled substance, and the parents
of the child cannot adequately care for the child's conditions, the department
shall take custody of the child for the purpose of obtaining treatment for the
child. Where medically indicated, the department may place the infant in an
appropriate birth facility or pediatric care program, and access services for
the treatment of the child's condition. The child's withdrawal from the
effects of the prenatal nonprescription use of a controlled substance shall be
under the supervision of appropriate medical professionals. The department
shall retain custody of the child until the court assumes custody, until the
department upon a documented and substantiated record determines that the
child's parents can adequately care for the infant's condition, or until the
department decides not to file a dependency petition under subsection (2) of
this section.

(2)
After an investigation in response to a receipt of a report under section 1 of
this act, the department shall, in appropriate cases, file a dependency
petition under this chapter. In the event the department does not file a
petition, it shall refer the mother to available chemical dependency treatment
programs.

(3)
The department and the mother may enter an agreement in which the mother agrees
to chemical dependency treatment on an inpatient or outpatient basis.

(4)
If the department and mother enter an agreement under subsection (3) of this
section, the department shall, if a dependency petition has been filed, request
the court to defer the entry of an order of dependency for as long as the
mother remains in treatment, subject to the department's monitoring for
compliance. As a condition of deferral of the order of dependency, the
parents, if both are available and known, shall stipulate to facts sufficient
to constitute a dependency and the court shall order treatment and prohibit
nonprescription use of controlled substances. In the event that an available
parent unreasonably refuses to stipulate to facts constituting a dependency,
the court may proceed with the hearing on the petition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the department receives a report under section 1 of this act of a mother who
has given birth to a second infant who has been affected by the nonprescription
use of a controlled substance, the department:

(a)
May request the court to proceed immediately with the entry of a dependency for
the first infant who was affected by the nonprescription use of a controlled
substance; and

(b)
Shall investigate and, unless there are compelling reasons to the contrary,
file a dependency petition on the second infant who has been affected by the
nonprescription use of a controlled substance. If the department does not file
a petition, it shall refer the woman to available chemical dependency treatment
programs.

(2)
The department and the mother may enter an agreement in which the mother agrees
to enter chemical dependency inpatient treatment.

(3)
If the department and the mother enter an agreement under subsection (2) of
this section, the department shall request the court to defer the entry of an
order of dependency on the second infant for as long as the mother remains in
treatment, subject to the department's monitoring for compliance. As a
condition of deferral of the order of dependency, the parents, if both are
available and known, shall stipulate to facts sufficient to constitute a
dependency and the court shall order treatment and prohibit nonprescription use
of controlled substances. In the event that an available parent unreasonably
refuses to stipulate to facts constituting a dependency, the court may proceed
with the hearing on the petition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may request the court to dismiss the petition deferred under section
2 or 3 of this act at any time, but a petition may not be vacated or dismissed
unless the mother demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that she has
not used controlled substances in a nonprescription manner for at least twelve
consecutive months and can safely provide for the child's welfare without
continuing supervision by the department or court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

If
the department receives a report under section 1 of this act of a mother who
has given birth to a third or subsequent infant who has been affected by the
nonprescription use of a controlled substance the department shall:

(1)
Request the court to proceed immediately with the entry of a finding of
dependency on all children who were affected by the nonprescription use of a
controlled substance born before the third or subsequent birth unless an order
of dependency has been vacated or dismissed; and

(2)
File a dependency petition on any infant subject to this section as well as any
other child born before the third or subsequent birth of an infant who was
affected by the nonprescription use of a controlled substance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

Following
a filing of a petition under section 5 of this act:

(1)
The court shall order evaluation by a designated chemical dependency
specialist, as defined in RCW 70.96A.020, who shall undertake the processes
described in RCW 70.96A.140.

(2)
If the court has ordered removal of a child or children, the out-of-home
placement order shall remain in effect until the petition is dismissed or the
mother has successfully completed inpatient treatment and any aftercare program
for controlled substances ordered by the court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

There
is a rebuttable presumption in any petition filed under section 6 of this act
that termination of parental rights is in the best interest of the child and it
is unreasonable to provide services to reunify the children with the mother.
The court shall give great weight to the fact that the mother has given birth
to a third or subsequent infant born affected by the nonprescription use of a
controlled substance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may make available, or cause to be made available, pharmaceutical
birth control services, information, and counseling to any person who enters
chemical dependency treatment under this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this act, "department" means the department of social
and health services.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---