BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that family and medical leave is designed to help working
people fulfill both their work and family responsibilities. The legislature also
finds that, when an individual who takes family and medical leave subsequently
becomes eligible to receive unemployment compensation, the maximum benefits
payable to the individual are decreased and the weekly benefit amount payable
to the individual may be decreased. The legislature intends to eliminate these
unintended consequences of taking family and medical leave.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.04.020 and 1994 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Base year" with respect to each individual, shall mean either the
first four of the last five completed calendar quarters or the last four
completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of the
individual's benefit year.

(2)
For the purposes of establishing a benefit year, the department shall initially
use the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters as the base
year. If a benefit year is not established using the first four of the last
five calendar quarters as the base year, the department shall use the last four
completed calendar quarters as the base year. At the request of an
individual who took family and medical leave in one or more calendar quarters
in the base year, the department shall use the following four calendar quarters
as the base year: The calendar quarters in the base year in which the
individual did not take family and medical leave; and the calendar quarters
immediately preceding the base year in which the individual did not take family
and medical leave. The department shall not use any calendar quarters in which
the individual took family and medical leave.

(3)
Computations using the last four completed calendar quarters shall be based on
available wage items processed as of the close of business on the day preceding
the date of application. The department shall promptly contact employers to
request assistance in obtaining wage information for the last completed
calendar quarter if it has not been reported at the time of initial
application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 50.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Family
and medical leave" means leave taken under either the federal family and
medical leave act of 1993 (Act of Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) or the
state family leave law, chapter 49.78 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act takes effect July 2, 2000, for new claims filed after July 1, 2000.

---
END ---