BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that outpatient prescription drugs are an essential
component of patient care and as a health benefits payer under the state's
medical assistance program, the legislature directs the department of social
and health services' medical assistance administration to add a prior
authorization component to its drug utilization review program to ensure that
beneficiaries have access to medically necessary medicines in a clinically
appropriate manner.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.09.010 and 1990 c 296 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Board" means the drug utilization review board established under
section 3 of this act.

(2)
"Children's health program" means the health care services program
provided to children under eighteen years of age and in households with incomes
at or below the federal poverty level as annually defined by the federal
department of health and human services as adjusted for family size, and who
are not otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty
program for the medically needy.

(((2)))
(3) "Committee" means the ((children's health services))
pharmacy and therapeutics committee created in section ((3)) 6
of this act.

(((3)))
(4) "Compendia" means the "American Hospital Formulary
Services Drug Information," "U.S. Pharmacopeia‑-Drug
Information," peer-reviewed medical literature, and clinical information
submitted to the state medicaid agency by the pharmaceutical research company
that developed the product and is registered with the federal food and drug
administration as the product distributor.

(5)
"County" means the board of county commissioners, county council,
county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A combination of
two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions may enter into joint
agreements to fulfill the requirements of RCW 74.09.415 through 74.09.435.

(((4)))
(6) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.

(((5)))
(7) "Department of health" means the Washington state
department of health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.

(((6)))
(8) "Drug utilization review" means both retrospective and
prospective drug utilization review. Such programs are designed to ensure that
drug utilization is: (a) Medically appropriate; (b) medically necessary; and
(c) not likely to have adverse medical results.

(9)
"Drug utilization review criteria" means standards approved by the
board for use in determining whether use of a drug is likely to be medically
appropriate, medically necessary, and will not result in adverse medical
outcomes.

(10)
"Internal management" means the administration of medical assistance,
medical care services, the children's health program, and the limited casualty
program.

(((7)))
(11) "Limited casualty program" means the medical care program
provided to medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal
social security act, and to medically indigent persons who are without income
or resources sufficient to secure necessary medical services.

(((8)))
(12) "Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care
program provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of
the federal social security act.

(((9)))
(13) "Medical care services" means the limited scope of care
financed by state funds and provided to general assistance recipients, and
recipients of alcohol and drug addiction services provided under chapter 74.50
RCW.

(((10)))
(14) "Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW
18.51.010.

(((11)))
(15) "Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined
annually by the United States department of health and human services, or
successor agency.

(((12)))
(16) "Prior authorization" means a process requiring the
prescriber or the dispenser to verify with the state medicaid agency or its
contractor that the proposed medical use of a particular medicine for a patient
meets predetermined criteria for coverage by the program.

(17)
"Prospective drug utilization review" means that part of the drug
utilization review program that occurs before a drug is dispensed and that uses
the drug utilization review criteria to screen for potential drug therapy
problems related to therapeutic duplication, drug-disease contraindications,
drug-drug interactions, incorrect drug dosage or duration of drug treatment,
drug-allergy interactions, and clinical abuse or misuse.

(18)
"Retrospective drug utilization review" means that part of the drug
utilization review program that is an historical review of drug utilization
data using drug utilization review criteria to examine pharmacy claims data and
other information to identify overutilization, underutilization, appropriate
use of branded and generic products, therapeutic duplication, drug-disease
contraindications, drug-drug interactions, incorrect drug dosage or duration of
drug treatment, and clinical abuse or misuse.

(19)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The drug utilization review board is hereby established within the department
of social and health services' medical assistance administration for the
implementation of a retrospective and prospective drug utilization review
program.

(2)
The board shall consist of eleven members as appointed by the secretary as
follows:

(a)
Four physicians licensed in this state and actively engaged in the practice of
medicine chosen from a list of nominees provided by the Washington state
medical association;

(b)
Five pharmacists licensed in this state and actively engaged in the practice of
pharmacy chosen from a list of nominees provided by the Washington state
pharmacists association;

(c)
One person who is a resident of this state chosen to represent medical
assistance beneficiaries in this state; and

(d)
One person representing the pharmaceutical industry, chosen from a list of
nominees provided by the pharmaceutical research and manufacturers of America.

(3)
Board members shall serve staggered three-year terms. One physician, one
pharmacist, and the beneficiary representative shall each be initially
appointed for two-year terms, and one physician, two pharmacists, and the
pharmaceutical industry representative shall each be initially appointed for
one-year terms. Members may be reappointed for a period not to exceed three
three-year terms. Vacancies on the board shall be filled for the balance of
the unexpired term from nominee lists for the appropriate board category as
under subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
Board members shall select a chairperson and a vice-chairperson on an annual
basis from the board membership.

(5)
The board shall meet at least quarterly and may meet at other times at the
discretion of the chairperson. Notice of any meeting of the board shall be
published in the Washington state register thirty days before such meeting.
Board meetings shall in all respects comply with the provisions of the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and shall be subject to the provisions
of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as applicable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
board shall have the power and duty to:

(1)
Advise and make recommendations regarding rules adopted by the department
implementing the provisions of state and federal law related to drug
utilization review;

(2)
Oversee the implementation of a retrospective and prospective drug utilization
review program for the medical assistance program, including responsibility for
recommending criteria for selection of contractors and reviewing contracts
between the medical assistance program and any other entity that will process
and review drug claims and profiles for the drug utilization review program in
accordance with this section;

(3)
Develop and apply the drug utilization review criteria for the retrospective
and prospective drug utilization review programs, provided that the drug
utilization review criteria shall be consistent with the indications supported
and/or rejected by the compendia and the food and drug administration's approved
labeling for the drug. The board also shall consider outside information
provided by interested parties, including prescribers who treat significant
numbers of patients under the medical assistance program;

(4)
Establish a process to reassess on a periodic basis the drug utilization review
criteria and, as necessary, modify the prospective and retrospective drug
utilization review programs; and

(5)
Provide a period for public comment during each board meeting. Notice of
proposed changes to the drug utilization review criteria and modification of
the prospective and retrospective drug utilization review programs shall be
furnished thirty days prior to the consideration or recommendation of any
proposed changes to the drug utilization review programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The board, in cooperation with the department, shall create and implement a
prospective and retrospective drug utilization review program for outpatient
prescription drugs under the medical assistance program, using drug utilization
review criteria to ensure that drug utilization is medically appropriate,
medically necessary, and not likely to result in adverse medical outcomes.

(2)
The department may contract with an entity to process and review drug claims
and profiles for the drug utilization review program, provided that the
department shall use a competitive bidding process as required by the office of
state procurement.

(3)
The prospective drug utilization review program shall be based on drug
utilization review criteria established by the board and shall provide that,
before a prescription is filled or delivered, a review shall be conducted by a
pharmacist at the point of sale to screen for potential drug therapy problems.
In conducting the prospective drug utilization review, a pharmacist may not
alter the prescribed outpatient drug therapy without a new prescription order
by the prescribing physician and approval by the patient. The prospective drug
utilization review shall screen for:

(a)
Therapeutic duplication;

(b)
Drug-disease contraindications;

(c)
Drug-drug interactions;

(d)
Incorrect drug dosage or duration of drug treatment;

(e)
Drug-allergy interactions; and

(f)
Clinical abuse or misuse.

(4)
The retrospective drug utilization review program shall be based on drug
utilization review criteria established by the board using the department's
mechanized drug claims processing and information retrieval system to analyze
medical assistance claims to:

(a)
Identify patterns of fraud, abuse, gross overuse or underuse, and inappropriate
or medically unnecessary care;

(b)
Assess data on drug use using criteria developed from the compendia for the
purpose of evaluating:

(i)
Therapeutic appropriateness;

(ii)
Overutilization or underutilization;

(iii)
Appropriate use of branded and generic products;

(iv)
Therapeutic duplication;

(v)
Drug-disease contraindications;

(vi)
Drug-drug interactions;

(vii)
Incorrect drug dosage or duration of drug treatment; and

(viii)
Clinical abuse or misuse; and

(c)
Propose remedial strategies to improve the quality of care and to promote
effective use of medical assistance program funds or beneficiary expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall have the
authority to implement a prior authorization program for outpatient
prescription drugs under the medical assistance program only as provided in sections
3 through 8 of this act.

(2)
The pharmacy and therapeutics committee is hereby established within the
department of social and health services' medical assistance administration for
the purposes of implementing prior authorization for outpatient prescription
drugs under the medical assistance program.

(3)
The committee shall consist of eleven members as appointed by the secretary:

(a)
Five physicians licensed in this state and actively engaged in the practice of
medicine chosen from a list of nominees provided by the Washington state
medical association;

(b)
Four pharmacists licensed in this state and actively engaged in the practice of
pharmacy chosen from a list of nominees provided by the Washington state
pharmacists association;

(c)
One person who shall represent medical assistance beneficiaries in this state;
and

(d)
One person representing the pharmaceutical industry who is a resident of this
state, chosen from a list of nominees provided by the pharmaceutical research
and manufacturers of America.

(4)
Committee members shall serve staggered three-year terms. Two physicians, one
pharmacist, and the medical assistance beneficiary representative shall each be
initially appointed for two-year terms, and one physician, one pharmacist, and
the pharmaceutical industry representative shall each be initially appointed
for one-year terms. Members may be reappointed for a period not to exceed
three three-year terms. Vacancies on the committee shall be filled for the
balance of the unexpired term from nominee lists for the appropriate committee
category as under subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
Committee members shall select a chairperson and a vice-chairperson on an
annual basis from the committee membership.

(6)
The committee shall meet at least quarterly and may meet at other times at the
discretion of the chairperson. Notice of any meeting of the committee shall be
published in the Washington state register thirty days before such meeting.
Committee meetings shall in all respects comply with the provisions of the open
public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW, and shall be subject to the provisions
of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as applicable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
committee shall have the power and duty to:

(1)
Advise and make recommendations regarding rules to be adopted by the department
regarding outpatient prescription drug prior authorization;

(2)
Oversee the implementation of a drug prior authorization program for the
medical assistance program;

(3)
Establish the drug prior authorization review process in compliance with
section 8 of this act;

(4)
Make formal recommendations to the department regarding any outpatient
prescription drug covered by the medical assistance program that is to be
priorly authorized;

(5)
Review on an annual basis whether drugs placed on prior authorization should
remain on prior authorization; and

(6)
Modify the prior authorization review process, as necessary, to achieve the
objectives of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. (1)
Any drug prior authorization program shall meet the following conditions:

(a)
The program shall provide telephone, fax, or other electronically transmitted
approval or denial within twenty-four hours after receipt of the prior
authorization request;

(b)
In an emergency situation, including a situation in which a response to a prior
authorization request is unavailable, a seventy-two hour supply of the
prescribed drug shall be dispensed and paid for by the medical assistance
program, or, at the discretion of the committee, a supply greater than
seventy-two hours that will assure a minimum effective duration of therapy for
an acute intervention;

(c)
Authorization shall be granted if the drug is prescribed for a medically
accepted indication supported by the compendia unless there is a
therapeutically equivalent generic drug that is available without prior
authorization; and

(d)
The program shall consult with prescribers to develop a streamlined process for
the prescriber to furnish any documentation required to support a prior
authorization request. To the extent possible, such process shall flow
directly from the patient care interaction and not a separate set of tasks required
of the prescriber by the state.

(2)
No drug may be recommended for prior authorization by the committee and placed
on prior authorization by the department unless the following conditions are
met:

(a)
The committee analyzes the retrospective drug utilization review data using the
drug utilization review criteria to identify a drug whose use is likely not to
be medically appropriate or medically necessary, or likely to result in adverse
medical outcomes;

(b)
The committee considers the potential impact on patient care and the potential
fiscal impact that may result from placement of such a drug on prior
authorization;

(c)
Any consideration of the cost of the drug by the committee shall reflect the
total cost of treating the conditions for which the drug is prescribed,
including nonpharmaceutical costs that may be affected by the drug's
availability of use in treating program beneficiaries;

(d)
The committee provides thirty days' public notice prior to any meeting
developing recommendations concerning whether such a drug should be placed on
prior authorization. Any interested party may request an opportunity to make
an oral presentation to the committee related to the prior authorization of the
drug. The committee shall also consider any information provided by any
interested party, including but not limited to physicians, pharmacists,
beneficiaries, and manufacturers or distributors of the drug;

(e)
The committee makes a formal written recommendation to the department that such
a drug be placed on prior authorization which shall be supported by an analysis
of prospective and retrospective drug utilization review data demonstrating:
(i) The expected impact of such a decision on the clinical care likely to be
received by beneficiaries for whom the drug is medically necessary; (ii) the
expected impact on physicians whose patients require the drug; and (iii) the
expected fiscal impact on the medical assistance program;

(f)
The department accepts or rejects the recommendation of the committee and in a
written decision determines whether such drug should be placed on prior
authorization. The department may consider any additional and clarifying
information provided by any interested party rendering its decision; and

(g)
The department's decision shall be published for public comment for a period of
no less than thirty days. The effective date of the decision shall not be
prior to the close of the comment period and effective notice of the decision's
finality is available to prescribers.

(3)
The committee shall develop a grievance mechanism for interested parties to
hear appeals of the department's decision to place a drug on prior
authorization. After participating in the grievance mechanism developed by the
committee, any interested party aggrieved by the placement of a drug on prior
authorization shall be entitled to an administrative hearing before the
department under the provisions of the administrative procedure act.

(4)
The committee shall review the prior authorization status of a drug every
twelve months.

(5)
The committee shall provide thirty days' public notice prior to any meeting
determining whether changes should be made to the drug prior authorization
review process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 3 through 8 of this act are each added to chapter 74.09 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---