BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state capitol committee may recommend to the legislature names for new or
existing buildings on the state capitol grounds based upon a recommendation
from the director of the department of general administration and with the
advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee subject to the following
limitations:

(a)
The state capitol committee may only recommend a new name for an existing
building after a substantial renovation or a change in the predominant tenant
agency headquartered in the building.

(b)
The state capitol committee may recommend that a new or existing building be
named after:

(i)
An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii)
The purpose of the building;

(iii)
The single or predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building; or

(iv)
A natural place in Washington.

(c)
The names on the facades of the state capitol group shall not be removed.

(2)
The state capitol committee may recommend to the legislature names for new or
existing public rooms or spaces on the state capitol grounds or within
buildings on the state capitol grounds based upon a recommendation from the
director of the department of general administration and with the advice of the
capitol campus design advisory committee subject to the following limitations:

(a)
The state capitol committee may only recommend a new name for an existing room
or space after a substantial renovation;

(b)
The state capitol committee may recommend that a new or existing public room or
space be named after:

(i)
An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii)
The purpose of the room or space; or

(iii)
A natural place in Washington.

(3) The legislature may, by concurrent resolution, rename a new or
existing building, public room, or space based on the recommendation of the
state capitol committee.

(4) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds"
means buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state
capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol campus,
the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey campus, Sylvester
Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and Capitol Lake.

---
END ---