BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.18.289 and 1988 c 249 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever a notice of cancellation or nonrenewal or an offer to
renew is furnished to an insured in accord with any provision of this chapter,
a copy of such notice or offer shall be provided ((at the same time)) within
five working days to the agent on the account or to the broker of record
for the insured. When possible, the copy to the agent or broker may be
provided electronically.

---
END ---