BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70B.090 and 1995 c 347 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a local
government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall issue its notice of final
decision on a project permit application within one hundred twenty days after
the local government notifies the applicant that the application is complete,
as provided in RCW 36.70B.070. In determining the number of days that have elapsed
after the local government has notified the applicant that the application is
complete, the following periods shall be excluded:

(a)(i)
Any period during which the applicant has been requested by the local
government to correct plans, perform required studies, or provide additional
required information. The period shall be calculated from the date the local
government notifies the applicant of the need for additional information until
the earlier of the date the local government determines whether the additional
information satisfies the request for information or fourteen days after the
date the information has been provided to the local government.

(ii)
If the local government determines that the information submitted by the
applicant under (a)(i) of this subsection is insufficient, it shall notify the
applicant of the deficiencies and the procedures under (a)(i) of this
subsection shall apply as if a new request for studies had been made;

(b)
Any period during which an environmental impact statement is being prepared
following a determination of significance pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW, if
the local government by ordinance or resolution has established time periods
for completion of environmental impact statements, or if the local government and
the applicant in writing agree to a time period for completion of an
environmental impact statement;

(c)
Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an open record
appeal hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are allowed. The local
government by ordinance or resolution shall establish a time period to consider
and decide such appeals. The time period shall not exceed: (i) Ninety days
for an open record appeal hearing; and (ii) sixty days for a closed record
appeal. The parties to an appeal may agree to extend these time periods; ((and))

(d)
Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the local
government; and

(e)
Any time period required for a state or federal agency to review a project
permit application under review by the local government if: (i) Such review by
the state or federal agency is mandated by state or federal statute; and (ii)
approval by the state or federal agency is necessary for a local government to
issue a final decision.

(2)
The time limits established by subsection (1) of this section do not apply if a
project permit application:

(a)
Requires an amendment to the comprehensive plan or a development regulation;

(b)
Requires approval of a new fully contained community as provided in RCW
36.70A.350, a master planned resort as provided in RCW 36.70A.360, or the
siting of an essential public facility as provided in RCW 36.70A.200; or

(c)
Is substantially revised by the applicant, in which case the time period shall
start from the date at which the revised project application is determined to
be complete under RCW 36.70B.070.

(3)
If the local government is unable to issue its final decision within the time
limits provided for in this section, it shall provide written notice of this
fact to the project applicant. The notice shall include a statement of reasons
why the time limits have not been met and an estimated date for issuance of the
notice of final decision.

(4)(a)
Except when an extension applies under subsection (1)(b), (c), (d), or (e) of
this section, if the local government or its designee does not take final
action on a project permit application within one hundred twenty days after the
application is deemed complete, the applicant may file a petition for a
peremptory writ of mandamus in the superior court of the county where the
application was submitted to compel the local government or its designee to
issue the approval. The local government shall retain jurisdiction to make a
decision on the project permit application until a petition for a peremptory
writ of mandamus is filed. Upon filing a petition for a peremptory writ of
mandamus jurisdiction for all decisions regarding the application, including
settlement, shall be with the superior court. A person who files a petition
for a peremptory writ of mandamus under this section shall provide written
notice of the filing to all persons who would be entitled to notice under RCW
36.70B.110 and to any person who participated orally or in writing in any
evidentiary hearing on the application held prior to the filing of the
petition. The notice shall be mailed or hand delivered on the same day the
petition is filed. The superior court shall issue a peremptory writ of
mandamus unless the local government shows that the approval would violate a
substantive provision of the applicable comprehensive plan or land use
regulations.

(b)
If the local government does not take final action on a project permit
application within one hundred twenty days after the date the application is
deemed complete, the applicant may elect to proceed with the application
according to the applicable provisions of the comprehensive plan and land use
regulations and/or to file a petition for a peremptory writ of mandamus under
this section.

(c)
A local government may not compel an applicant to waive the period set in
subsection (1) of this section or to waive the provisions of this subsection as
a condition for taking any action on a project permit application except when
such applications are filed concurrently and considered jointly with a plan
amendment.

(5)
This section shall apply to project permit applications filed on or after April
1, 1996.

Sec.
2. 1998
c 286 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RCW
((36.70B.090 and)) 64.40.050 shall expire June 30, 2000. The provisions
of RCW ((36.70B.090 and)) 64.40.050 shall apply to project permit
applications determined to be complete pursuant to RCW 36.70B.070 on or before
June 30, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of section 1 of this act, referencing this
act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus
appropriations act, section 1 of this act is null and void.

---
END ---