BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.44.010 and 1998 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All county and municipal peace officers are hereby charged with the duty of
investigating and prosecuting all violations of this title, and the penal laws
of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation,
possession, distribution and sale of liquor, and all fines imposed for
violations of this title and the penal laws of this state relating to the
manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, distribution and sale of
liquor shall belong to the county, city or town wherein the court imposing the
fine is located, and shall be placed in the general fund for payment of the
salaries of those engaged in the enforcement of the provisions of this title
and the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor: PROVIDED, That
all fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district
court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in
chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended.

(2)
In addition to any and all other powers granted, the board shall have the power
to enforce the penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor.

(3)
In addition to the other duties under this section, the board shall enforce
chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.

(4)
The board may appoint and employ, assign to duty and fix the compensation of,
officers to be designated as liquor enforcement officers. Such liquor
enforcement officers shall have the power, under the supervision of the board,
to enforce the penal provisions of this title and the penal laws of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor. They shall have the power and authority to
serve and execute all warrants and process of law issued by the courts in
enforcing the penal provisions of this title or of any penal law of this state
relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, possession,
distribution and sale of liquor, and the provisions of chapters 82.24 and 82.26
RCW. They shall have the power to arrest without a warrant any person or
persons found in the act of violating any of the penal provisions of this title
or of any penal law of this state relating to the manufacture, importation,
transportation, possession, distribution and sale of liquor, and the provisions
of chapters 82.24 and 82.26 RCW.

(5)(a)
All liquor enforcement officers initially employed on or after the effective
date of this act shall, as a condition of continued employment, engage in basic
law enforcement officer training provided by the criminal justice training
commission. An officer employed on or after the effective date of this act
shall not engage in any enforcement duties until the officer has been certified
as having successfully completed the training.

(b) Liquor enforcement officers employed prior to the effective
date of this act shall attend and successfully complete an equivalency basic
law enforcement training program developed by the criminal justice training
commission under section 3 of this act. Law enforcement training for liquor
enforcement officers employed prior to the effective date of this act shall be
phased in over time. The liquor control board shall adopt a policy specifying
the number of officers who shall attend basic law enforcement training per
year, and the procedure for selecting the order and timing of officers sent to
the training.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.101.010 and 1981 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

When
used in this chapter:

(1)
((The term)) "Commission" means the Washington state
criminal justice training commission.

(2)
((The term)) "Boards" means the education and training
standards boards, the establishment of which are authorized by this chapter.

(3)
((The term)) "Criminal justice personnel" means any person
who serves in a county, city, state, or port commission agency engaged in crime
prevention, crime reduction, or enforcement of the criminal law.

(4)
((The term)) "Law enforcement personnel" means any
public employee or volunteer having as a primary function the enforcement of
criminal laws in general or any employee or volunteer of, or any individual
commissioned by, any municipal, county, state, or combination thereof, agency
having as its primary function the enforcement of criminal laws in general as
distinguished from an agency possessing peace officer powers, the primary
function of which is the implementation of specialized subject matter areas.
For the purposes of this subsection "primary function" means that
function to which the greater allocation of resources is made.

(5)
((The term)) "Correctional personnel" means any
employee or volunteer who by state, county, municipal, or combination thereof,
statute has the responsibility for the confinement, care, management, training,
treatment, education, supervision, or counseling of those individuals whose
civil rights have been limited in some way by legal sanction.

(6)
"Liquor enforcement officer" means an officer employed or appointed
by the liquor control board under RCW 66.44.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall provide basic law enforcement training to all liquor
enforcement officers initially employed on or after the effective date of this
act. The commission shall certify that the liquor enforcement officer has
successfully completed the training before the liquor enforcement officer
engages in any enforcement activities.

(2) The commission shall provide an equivalency basic law
enforcement training program for liquor enforcement officers employed prior to
the effective date of this act. The commission shall develop an equivalency
training program of no more than one hundred sixty hours taking into
consideration the types of experiences of and training received by experienced liquor
enforcement officers. The commission shall certify that the liquor enforcement
officer has successfully completed the equivalency training.

---
END ---