BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
86.26.100 and 1991 c 322 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

State participation in the cost of any flood control maintenance
project shall be provided for by a written memorandum agreement between the
director of ecology and the legislative authority of the county submitting the
request, which agreement, among other things, shall state the estimated cost
and the percentage thereof to be borne by the state. In no instance, except on
emergency projects, shall the state's share exceed ((one-half)) seventy-five
percent of the total cost of the project, to include project
planning and design. Grants for cost sharing feasibility studies for new flood
control projects shall not exceed fifty percent of the matching funds that are
required by the federal government, and shall not exceed twenty-five percent of
the total costs of the feasibility study. However, grants to prepare a
comprehensive flood control management plan required under RCW 86.26.050 shall
not exceed seventy-five percent of the full planning costs, but not to exceed
amounts for either purpose specified in rule and regulation by the department
of ecology.

---
END ---