BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.18.070 and 1983 c 194 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the ((advisory)) rehabilitation council
for the blind. ((The advisory council shall consist of at least six and no
more than ten members.)) The rehabilitation council shall consist of
the minimum number of voting members to meet the requirements of the
rehabilitation council required under the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 as
now or hereafter amended. A majority of the voting members shall be
blind. ((Advisory)) Rehabilitation council members shall be
residents of the state of Washington, ((and no member shall be an employee
of the department)) and shall represent the categories of membership
specified in the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 as now or hereafter
amended. The director of the department of services for the blind shall be an
ex officio, nonvoting member.

(2)
The governor shall appoint members of the ((advisory)) rehabilitation
council for terms of three years, except that the initial appointments shall be
as follows: (a) Three members for terms of three years; (b) two members for
terms of two years; and (c) other members for terms of one year. Vacancies in
the membership of the ((advisory)) rehabilitation council shall
be filled by the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3)
The governor may remove members of the ((advisory)) rehabilitation
council for cause.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.18.080 and 1983 c 194 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((advisory)) rehabilitation council for the blind shall meet
officially with the director of the department quarterly to perform the duties
enumerated in RCW 74.18.090. Additional meetings of the ((advisory)) rehabilitation
council may be convened at the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the
members. The ((advisory)) rehabilitation council shall elect a
chairperson from among its members for a term of one year or until a successor
has been elected.

(2)
((Advisory)) Rehabilitation council members shall receive
reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their official
duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.18.090 and 1983 c 194 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((advisory)) rehabilitation council for the blind may:

(1)
Provide counsel to the director in developing, reviewing, ((and)) making
recommendations, and agreeing on the department's state plan for
vocational rehabilitation, budget requests, permanent rules concerning services
to blind citizens, and other major policies which impact the quality or
quantity of services for the blind;

(2)
Undertake annual reviews with the director of the needs of blind citizens, the
effectiveness of the services and priorities of the department to meet those
needs, and the measures that could be taken to improve the department's
services;

(3)
Annually make recommendations to the governor and the legislature on issues
related to the department of services for the blind, other state agencies, or
state laws which have a significant effect on the opportunities, services, or
rights of blind citizens; ((and))

(4)
Advise and make recommendations to the governor on the criteria and
qualifications pertinent to the selection of the director;

(5)
Perform additional functions as required by the federal rehabilitation act of
1973 as now or hereafter amended.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.18.100 and 1983 c 194 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of the director to consult in a timely manner
with the ((advisory)) rehabilitation council for the blind on the
matters enumerated in RCW 74.18.090. The director shall provide appropriate
departmental resources for the use of the ((advisory)) rehabilitation
council in conducting its official business.

---
END ---