BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
The purpose of this chapter is to provide enhanced educational opportunities
for students in this state to gain the knowledge and skills necessary for
postsecondary education, a technical education, or the world of work; and

(b)
A student should not be compelled to remain in a school found by the state to
be failing for two out of four years.

(2)
The legislature intends that educational choice transfers be made available in
order to give parents and guardians the opportunity for their children to
achieve a basic education by attending a public school that is performing
satisfactorily.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Eligible student" means:

(a)
A student in grades one through five who attends a public school in which for
two out of four years fewer than seventy-five percent of the fourth grade
students met the state standards in reading and mathematics required in RCW
28A.655.060;

(b)
A student in grades six through eight who attends or will attend a school in
which for two out of four years fewer than seventy-five percent of the eighth
grade students met the state standards in reading and mathematics required in
RCW 28A.655.060;

(c)
A student in grades nine through twelve who attends or will attend a school in
which for two out of four years fewer than seventy-five percent of the eleventh
grade students met the state standards in reading and mathematics required in
RCW 28A.655.060;

(d)
A student in grades one through twelve who attends or will attend a school
which has reported in two out of the past four years more than five known
incidents involving the possession of weapons in accordance with RCW
28A.320.130; or

(e)
A student in grades one through twelve who is the victim of a crime perpetrated
by a dangerous weapon included under RCW 9.41.280(1).

(2)
"Transfer program" means the educational opportunity transfer
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
By January 1, 2001, each school district shall develop a process to identify
all students eligible to participate in the transfer program.

(2)
By June 1, 2001, and each June 1st thereafter, all schools with students
eligible to participate in the transfer program shall notify parents of
enrolled students of the opportunity for participation in the program.

(3)
School districts shall make available a list of schools which are not failing
in their district.

(4)
Transfers shall be granted to schools that are not failing.

(5)
All notices of intent to transfer must be received by the student's school
district by July 1st of the first year in which the student intends to
transfer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The school district shall provide transportation for eligible students
transferring to another public school and shall receive state funding for the
operating costs of transporting those students.

(2)
School districts may coordinate efforts for the transfer of students between
districts.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall adjust the annual transportation
payments to school districts to reflect the transportation of participating
students.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
chapter may be known and cited as the educational opportunity transfer program
for the new millennium act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

---
END ---