BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 4.84 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs shall be awarded to the prevailing party
or substantially prevailing party on appeal before the superior court, court of
appeals, or supreme court of a decision by a growth management hearings board.
The court shall award and determine the amount of reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs under this section if:

(a)
The prevailing party on appeal was the prevailing or substantially prevailing
party before a growth management hearings board; and

(b)
The prevailing party on appeal was the prevailing party or substantially prevailing
party in all prior judicial proceedings, or is the prevailing party or
substantially prevailing party in the superior court.

(2) Awarding of attorneys' fees and costs under this section does
not preclude any other remedies or relief otherwise available under law.

---
END ---