BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.065 and 1997 c 304 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Competitive telephone service" means the providing by any person of
telecommunications equipment or apparatus, or service related to that equipment
or apparatus such as repair or maintenance service, if the equipment or
apparatus is of a type which can be provided by persons that are not subject to
regulation as telephone companies under Title 80 RCW and for which a separate
charge is made. Competitive telephone service includes service offered by
aggregators as defined at 47 U.S.C. Sec. 226(a)(2).

(2)
"Network telephone service" means the providing by any person of
access to a local telephone network, local telephone network switching service,
or toll service, ((or coin telephone services,)) or the providing
of telephonic, video, data, or similar communication or transmission for hire,
via a local telephone network, toll line or channel, cable, microwave, or
similar communication or transmission system. "Network telephone
service" includes interstate service, including toll service, originating
from or received on telecommunications equipment or apparatus in this state if
the charge for the service is billed to a person in this state. "Network
telephone service" includes the provision of transmission to and from the
site of an internet provider via a local telephone network, toll line or
channel, cable, microwave, or similar communication or transmission system.
"Network telephone service" does not include the providing of
competitive telephone service, the providing of cable television service, the providing
of broadcast services by radio or television stations, nor the provision of
internet service as defined in RCW 82.04.297, including the reception of
dial-in connection, provided at the site of the internet service provider.

(3)
"Telephone service" means competitive telephone service or network
telephone service, or both, as defined in subsections (1) and (2) of this
section.

(4) "Telephone business" means the business of providing
network telephone service, as defined in subsection (2) of this section. It
includes cooperative or farmer line telephone companies or associations
operating an exchange.

---
END ---