BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.112.060 and 1992 c 101 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

An
authority shall have the following powers:

(1)
To establish offices, departments, boards, and commissions that are necessary
to carry out the purposes of the authority, and to prescribe the functions,
powers, and duties thereof.

(2)
To appoint or provide for the appointment of, and to remove or to provide for
the removal of, all officers and employees of the authority.

(3)
To fix the salaries, wages, and other compensation of all officers and
employees of the authority.

(4)
To employ such engineering, legal, financial, or other specialized personnel as
may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of the authority.

(5)
To determine risks, hazards, and liabilities in order to obtain insurance
consistent with these determinations. This insurance may include any types of
insurance covering, and for the benefit of, one or more parties with whom the
authority contracts for any purpose, and insurance for the benefit of its board
members, authority officers, and employees to insure against liability for acts
or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their
official duties. All insurance obtained for construction of authority projects
with a total project cost exceeding one hundred million dollars may be acquired
by bid or by negotiation through December 31, 2006. In order to allow the
authority flexibility to secure appropriate insurance by negotiation, the
authority is exempt from RCW 48.30.270.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.30.270 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No officer or employee of this state, or of any public agency, public authority
or public corporation except a public corporation or public authority created
pursuant to agreement or compact with another state, and no person acting or
purporting to act on behalf of such officer or employee, or public agency or
public authority or public corporation, shall, with respect to any public
building or construction contract which is about to be, or which has been
competitively bid, require the bidder to make application to, or to furnish
financial data to, or to obtain or procure, any of the surety bonds or
contracts of insurance specified in connection with such contract, or specified
by any law, general, special or local, from a particular insurer or agent or
broker.

(2)
No such officer or employee or any person, acting or purporting to act on
behalf of such officer or employee shall negotiate, make application for,
obtain or procure any of such surety bonds or contracts of insurance, except
contracts of insurance for builder's risk or owner's protective liability,
which can be obtained or procured by the bidder, contractor or subcontractor.

(3)
This section shall not be construed to prevent the exercise by such officer or
employee on behalf of the state or such public agency, public authority, or
public corporation of its right to approve the form, sufficiency or manner or
execution of the surety bonds or contracts of insurance furnished by the
insurer selected by the bidder to underwrite such bonds, or contracts of
insurance.

(4)
Any provisions in any invitation for bids, or in any of the contract documents,
in conflict with this section are declared to be contrary to the public policy
of this state.

(5)
A violation of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided by RCW
48.01.080.

(6)
This section shall not apply to:

(a)
The public nonprofit corporation authorized under RCW 67.40.020; or

(b) A regional transit authority authorized under RCW 81.112.030.

---
END ---