BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the number of traffic crashes resulting in serious or
fatal injuries on Washington roadways is unacceptably high. The vast majority
of these crashes result from dangerous driving behavior, often occurring when
traffic infractions and traffic crimes are committed. It is the intent of the
legislature to increase fines in order to deter the behavior leading to traffic
infractions and crimes, thus reducing the injuries and deaths that result from
traffic crashes. It is further intended that the increased portion of fines
identified in this act will be used solely to fund programs to reduce traffic
crashes and reduce the severity of injuries from those crashes and for other
traffic safety purposes as outlined in this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.59 RCW to read as follows:

The
traffic safety improvement account is created in the state treasury. The
purpose of this account is to improve traffic safety by funding programs
through the Washington traffic safety commission, particularly those directed
by this chapter. The bicycle and pedestrian safety account and the impaired
driving safety account are abolished as separate accounts and are merged into
the traffic safety improvement account. All receipts from additional penalties
collected under RCW 46.63.110(7) or section 5 of this act, and fifty percent of
the penalties collected under RCW 46.61.527(3) must be deposited into this
account. Funded projects should include, but not be limited to support for
community traffic safety task forces, state match required by the Washington
traffic safety commission to qualify for federal highway safety grants, the
drug recognition expert program, traffic safety public information and
education efforts, support for local communities implementing traffic safety
laws passed by the legislature, bicycle and pedestrian safety efforts, and
other programs consistent with this chapter. Only the director of the traffic
safety commission or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures until July 1,
2001, after which date moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Any expenditures before July 1, 2001, are subject to review by
the transportation committees of the legislature.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.59.150 and 1999 c 372 s 9 and 1999 c 351 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(((1)))
The Washington state traffic safety commission shall establish a program for
improving bicycle and pedestrian safety, and shall cooperate with the
stakeholders and independent representatives to form an advisory committee to
develop programs and create public private partnerships which promote bicycle
and pedestrian safety. The traffic safety commission shall periodically report
and make recommendations to the ((legislative)) transportation committees
of the legislature on the progress of the bicycle and pedestrian safety
committee.

(((2)
The bicycle and pedestrian safety account is created in the state treasury to
support bicycle and pedestrian education or safety programs.))

Sec.
4. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a
monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each
offense unless authorized by this chapter or title.

(2)
The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for
designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions
under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and
penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the
supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3)
There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as
defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a
monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body
may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by
local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by
the local legislative body.

(4)
Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature
and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW
relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the
limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this chapter.

(5)
Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court
may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty
may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for
payment the court shall notify the department of the failure to pay the
penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privilege until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in
subsection (3) of this section has been paid.

(6)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per
infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived.
Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in
the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW
70.168.040.

(7)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction other than of RCW 46.61.440 or 46.61.527 will be
assessed an additional penalty of ten dollars. The court may not reduce,
waive, or suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to
be indigent. Revenue from the additional penalty must be forwarded to the
state treasurer for deposit in the traffic safety improvement account under section
2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 46.64 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to any other penalties imposed for conviction of a violation of this
title that is a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony, the court must
impose an additional penalty of fifty dollars. The court may not reduce,
waive, or suspend the additional penalty unless the court finds the offender to
be indigent. Revenue from the additional penalty must be forwarded to the
state treasurer for deposit in the traffic safety improvement account under
section 2 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---