BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.34.020 and 1999 c 176 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Abandonment" means action or inaction by a person or entity with a
duty of care for a vulnerable adult that leaves the vulnerable person without
the means or ability to obtain necessary food, clothing, shelter, or health
care.

(2)
"Abuse" means the willful action or inaction that inflicts injury,
unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment on a vulnerable adult.
In instances of abuse of a vulnerable adult who is unable to express or
demonstrate physical harm, pain, or mental anguish, the abuse is presumed to
cause physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. Abuse includes sexual abuse,
mental abuse, physical abuse, and exploitation of a vulnerable adult, which
have the following meanings:

(a)
"Sexual abuse" means any form of nonconsensual sexual contact,
including but not limited to unwanted or inappropriate touching, rape, sodomy,
sexual coercion, sexually explicit photographing, and sexual harassment.
Sexual abuse includes any sexual contact between a staff person, who is not
also a resident or client, of a facility or a staff person of a program
authorized under chapter 71A.12 RCW, and a vulnerable adult living in that
facility or receiving service from a program authorized under chapter 71A.12
RCW, whether or not it is consensual.

(b)
"Physical abuse" means the willful action of inflicting bodily injury
or physical mistreatment. Physical abuse includes, but is not limited to, striking
with or without an object, slapping, pinching, choking, kicking, shoving,
prodding, or the use of chemical restraints or physical restraints unless the
restraints are consistent with licensing requirements, and includes restraints
that are otherwise being used inappropriately.

(c)
"Mental abuse" means any willful action or inaction of mental or
verbal abuse. Mental abuse includes, but is not limited to, coercion,
harassment, inappropriately isolating a vulnerable adult from family, friends,
or regular activity, and verbal assault that includes ridiculing, intimidating,
yelling, or swearing.

(d)
"Exploitation" means an act of forcing, compelling, or exerting undue
influence over a vulnerable adult causing the vulnerable adult to act in a way
that is inconsistent with relevant past behavior, or causing the vulnerable
adult to perform services for the benefit of another.

(3)
"Consent" means express written consent granted after the vulnerable
adult or his or her legal representative has been fully informed of the nature
of the services to be offered and that the receipt of services is voluntary.

(4)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(5)
"Facility" means a residence licensed or required to be licensed
under chapter 18.20 RCW, boarding homes; chapter 18.51 RCW, nursing homes;
chapter 70.128 RCW, adult family homes; chapter 72.36 RCW, soldiers' homes; or
chapter 71A.20 RCW, residential habilitation centers; state hospitals
operated and maintained under chapter 72.23 RCW; or any other facility
licensed by the department.

(6)
"Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of the
property, income, resources, or trust funds of the vulnerable adult by any
person for any person's profit or advantage.

(7)
"Individual provider" means a person under contract with the
department to provide services in the home under chapter 74.09 or 74.39A RCW.

(8)
"Mandated reporter" is an employee of the department; law enforcement
officer; social worker; professional school personnel; individual provider; an
employee of a facility; an operator of a facility; an employee of a social
service, welfare, mental health, adult day health, adult day care, home health,
home care, or hospice agency; county coroner or medical examiner; Christian Science
practitioner; or health care provider subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

(9)
"Neglect" means (a) a pattern of conduct or inaction by a person or
entity with a duty of care to provide the goods and services that maintain
physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult, or that avoids or prevents
physical or mental harm or pain to a vulnerable adult; or (b) an act or
omission that demonstrates a serious disregard of consequences of such a
magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to the vulnerable adult's
health, welfare, or safety.

(10)
"Permissive reporter" means any person, employee of a financial
institution, attorney, or volunteer in a facility or program providing services
for vulnerable adults.

(11)
"Protective services" means any services provided by the department
to a vulnerable adult with the consent of the vulnerable adult, or the legal
representative of the vulnerable adult, who has been abandoned, abused,
financially exploited, neglected, or in a state of self-neglect. These services
may include, but are not limited to case management, social casework, home
care, placement, arranging for medical evaluations, psychological evaluations,
day care, or referral for legal assistance.

(12)
"Self-neglect" means the failure of a vulnerable adult, not living in
a facility, to provide for himself or herself the goods and services necessary
for the vulnerable adult's physical or mental health, and the absence of which
impairs or threatens the vulnerable adult's well-being. This definition may
include a vulnerable adult who is receiving services through home health,
hospice, or a home care agency, or an individual provider when the neglect is
not a result of inaction by that agency or individual provider.

(13)
"Vulnerable adult" includes a person:

(a)
Sixty years of age or older who has the functional, mental, or physical
inability to care for himself or herself; or

(b)
Found incapacitated under chapter 11.88 RCW; or

(c)
Who has a developmental disability as defined under RCW 71A.10.020; or

(d)
Admitted to any facility; or

(e)
Receiving services from home health, hospice, or home care agencies licensed or
required to be licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW; or

(f)
Receiving services from an individual provider.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.34.067 and 1999 c 176 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where appropriate, an investigation by the department may include a private
interview with the vulnerable adult regarding the alleged abandonment, abuse,
financial exploitation, neglect, or self-neglect.

(2)
In conducting the investigation, the department shall interview the
complainant, unless anonymous, and shall use its best efforts to interview the
vulnerable adult or adults harmed, and, consistent with the protection of the
vulnerable adult shall interview facility staff, any available independent
sources of relevant information, including if appropriate the family members of
the vulnerable adult.

(3)
The department may conduct ongoing case planning and consultation with: (a)
Those persons or agencies required to report under this chapter or submit a
report under this chapter; (b) consultants designated by the department; and
(c) designated representatives of Washington Indian tribes if client
information exchanged is pertinent to cases under investigation or the
provision of protective services. Information considered privileged by statute
and not directly related to reports required by this chapter must not be
divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.

(4)
The department shall prepare and keep on file a report of each investigation
conducted by the department for a period of time in accordance with policies
established by the department.

(5)
If the department determines that the vulnerable adult has suffered from abuse,
neglect, self-neglect, abandonment, or financial exploitation, and lacks the
ability or capacity to consent, and needs the protection of a guardian, the
department may bring a guardianship action under chapter 11.88 RCW as an
interested person.

(6)
When the investigation is completed and the department determines that an
incident of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, neglect, or
self-neglect has occurred, the department shall inform the vulnerable adult of
their right to refuse protective services, and ensure that, if necessary,
appropriate protective services are provided to the vulnerable adult, with the
consent of the vulnerable adult. The vulnerable adult has the right to
withdraw or refuse protective services.

(7)
Where appropriate, the department ((may)) shall photograph
a vulnerable adult or their environment for the purpose of providing
documentary evidence of the physical condition of the vulnerable adult or his
or her environment. When photographing the vulnerable adult, the department
shall obtain permission from the vulnerable adult or his or her legal
representative unless immediate photographing is necessary to preserve
evidence. However, if the legal representative is alleged to have abused,
neglected, abandoned, or exploited the vulnerable adult, consent from the legal
representative is not necessary. No such consent is necessary when
photographing the physical environment.

(8)
When the investigation is complete and the department determines that the
incident of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect has
occurred, the department shall inform the facility in which the incident
occurred, consistent with confidentiality requirements concerning the
vulnerable adult, witnesses, and complainants.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.34.080 and 1999 c 176 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

If
access is denied to an employee of the department seeking to investigate an
allegation of abandonment, abuse, financial exploitation, or neglect of a
vulnerable adult by an individual, the department ((may)) shall
seek an injunction to prevent interference with the investigation. The court
shall issue the injunction if the department shows that:

(1)
There is reasonable cause to believe that the person is a vulnerable adult and
is or has been abandoned, abused, financially exploited, or neglected; and

(2)
The employee of the department seeking to investigate the report has been
denied access.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.34.150 and 1986 c 187 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services((, in its discretion, may)) shall
seek relief under RCW 74.34.110 through 74.34.140 on behalf of and with the
consent of any vulnerable adult when there is reasonable cause to believe
that there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the vulnerable adult.
((Neither the department of social and health services nor the state of
Washington shall be liable for failure to seek relief on behalf of any persons
under this section.))

Sec.
5. RCW
74.34.210 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 18 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

A
petition for an order for protection or an action for damages under this
chapter may be brought by the plaintiff, or where necessary, by his or her
family members and/or guardian or legal fiduciary, or as otherwise provided
under this chapter. The death of the plaintiff shall not deprive the court of
jurisdiction over a petition or claim brought under this chapter. Upon
petition, after the death of the vulnerable person, the right to initiate or
maintain the action shall be transferred to the executor or administrator of
the deceased, for the benefit of the surviving spouse, child or children, or
other heirs without regard to limitations set forth in chapter 4.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. RCW
74.34.170 (Services of department discretionary--Funding) and
1986 c 187 s 10 are each repealed.

---
END ---