BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The joint task force on ferries is created, to be composed of:

(a)
Eight members of the legislature selected as follows:

(i)
Four members of the senate, two from each of the major caucuses, to be
appointed by the president of the senate;

(ii)
Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of the major
caucuses, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(iii)
The members appointed from each major caucus of the senate and the house of
representatives must include one member from a legislative district that
encompasses a terminus of a Washington state ferry route and one from a
legislative district that does not include a terminus of a Washington state
ferry route;

(b)
At least one person designated by the cochairs representing each of the
following:

(i)
Ferry advisory committees;

(ii)
Persons who do not use ferries;

(iii)
Labor organizations representing ferry workers;

(iv)
Washington State Ferries;

(v)
Transit operators;

(vi)
The office of financial management; and

(vii)
Other groups as deemed appropriate by the cochairs of the task force.

(2)
The transportation committees shall provide staff support as mutually agreed by
the cochairs of the joint select committee. The speaker of the house of representatives
and the president of the senate shall designate the cochairs.

(3)
The legislative transportation committee shall pay the expenses of the
legislative committee members.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
joint task force on ferries shall report to the full legislature at the
beginning of the 2001 legislative session. The report must include, but not be
limited to, analysis and recommendations on the following:

(1)
Establishment of a long-term goal for a target for recovery of operating costs
from fare revenue that recognizes that the operation of the ferries is the
proprietary provision of a service for a fee;

(2)
Options for further cuts in ferry service or full or partial restoration of
ferry service cuts;

(3)
Feasibility of full or partial privatization of the ferry system,
public-private partnerships, or state and local partnerships; and

(4)
Establishing the short-term and long-term capital needs of the Washington state
ferry system, recognizing that the ferry system is part of the state's highway
system and that it is appropriate that the public pay for the capital needs of
the ferry system as an extension of the land-based highway system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---