BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes the importance of sound water management. In an effort
to promote new and innovative methods of water storage, the legislature
authorizes the department of ecology to issue reservoir permits that enable an
entity to artificially store and recover ground water in any underground
geological formation, which qualifies as a reservoir under RCW 90.03.370.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.44.035 and 1987 c 109 s 107 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(2)
"Director" means the director of ecology;

(3)
"Ground waters" means all waters that exist beneath the land surface
or beneath the bed of any stream, lake or reservoir, or other body of surface
water within the boundaries of this state, whatever may be the geological
formation or structure in which such water stands or flows, percolates or
otherwise moves. There is a recognized distinction between natural ground
water and artificially stored ground water;

(4)
"Natural ground water" means water that exists in underground storage
owing wholly to natural processes; ((and))

(5)
"Artificially stored ground water" means water that is made available
in underground storage artificially, either intentionally, or incidentally to
irrigation and that otherwise would have been dissipated by natural ((waste))
processes; and

(6)
"Underground artificial storage and recovery project" means any
project in which it is intended to artificially store water in the ground
through injection or surface spreading and infiltration. However, (a) this
subsection does not apply to operational and seepage losses that occur during
the irrigation of land, or to water that is artificially stored due to the
construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district project, or
to projects involving water reclaimed in accordance with chapter 90.46 RCW; and
(b) RCW 90.44.130 applies to those instances of claimed artificial recharge
occurring due to the construction, operation, or maintenance of an irrigation
district project or operational and seepage losses that occur during the
irrigation of land, as well as other forms of claimed artificial recharge
already existing at the time a ground water subarea is established.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.03.370 and 1987 c 109 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All applications for reservoir permits shall be subject to the provisions of
RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. But the party or parties proposing to apply
to a beneficial use the water stored in any such reservoir shall also file an
application for a permit, to be known as the secondary permit, which shall be
in compliance with the provisions of RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.320. Such
secondary application shall refer to such reservoir as its source of water
supply and shall show documentary evidence that an agreement has been entered
into with the owners of the reservoir for a permanent and sufficient interest
in said reservoir to impound enough water for the purposes set forth in said
application. When the beneficial use has been completed and perfected under
the secondary permit, the department shall take the proof of the water users
under such permit and the final certificate of appropriation shall refer to
both the ditch and works described in the secondary permit and the reservoir
described in the primary permit.

(2)(a)
For the purposes of this section, "reservoir" includes, in addition
to any surface reservoir, any naturally occurring underground geological
formation where water is collected and stored for use as part of an underground
artificial storage and recovery project. To qualify for issuance of a
reservoir permit an underground geological formation must meet standards for
review and mitigation of adverse impacts identified, for the following issues:

(i)
Aquifer vulnerability and hydraulic continuity;

(ii)
Potential impairment of existing water rights;

(iii)
Geotechnical impacts;

(iv)
Chemical compatibility of surface waters and ground water;

(v)
Recharge and recovery treatment requirements;

(vi)
System operation;

(vii)
Water rights and ownership of water stored for recovery; and

(viii)
Environmental impacts.

(b)
Standards for review and standards for mitigation of adverse impacts shall be
established by the department by rule. Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
90.03.250 through 90.03.320, analysis of each underground artificial storage
and recovery project and each underground geological formation for which an
applicant seeks the status of a reservoir shall be through applicant-initiated
studies reviewed by the department.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "underground artificial storage and
recovery project" means any project in which it is intended to
artificially store water in the ground through injection or surface spreading
and infiltration. However, (a) this subsection does not apply to operational
and seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of land, or to water that
is artificially stored due to the construction, operation, or maintenance of an
irrigation district project, or to projects involving water reclaimed in
accordance with chapter 90.46 RCW; and (b) RCW 90.44.130 applies to those
instances of claimed artificial recharge occurring due to the construction,
operation, or maintenance of an irrigation district project or operational and
seepage losses that occur during the irrigation of land, as well as other forms
of claimed artificial recharge already existing at the time a ground water
subarea is established.

(4) The department shall report to the legislature by December
31, 2001, on the standards for review and standards for mitigation developed
under subsection (3) of this section and on the status of any applications that
have been filed with the department for underground artificial storage and
recovery projects by that date.

---
END ---