BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
62A.7-202 and 1965 ex.s. c 157 s 7-202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A warehouse receipt need not be in any particular form.

(2)
Unless a warehouse receipt embodies within its written ((or)),
printed, or electronic terms each of the following, the warehouseman is
liable for damages caused by the omission to a person injured thereby:

(a)
the location of the warehouse where the goods are stored;

(b)
the date of issue of the receipt;

(c)
the consecutive number of the receipt;

(d)
a statement whether the goods received will be delivered to the bearer, to a
specified person, or to a specified person or his order;

(e)
the rate of storage and handling charges, except that where goods are stored
under a field warehousing arrangement a statement of that fact is sufficient on
a non-negotiable receipt;

(f)
a description of the goods or of the packages containing them;

(g)
the signature of the warehouseman, which may be made by his authorized agent;

(h)
if the receipt is issued for goods of which the warehouseman is owner, either
solely or jointly or in common with others, the fact of such ownership; and

(i)
a statement of the amount of advances made and of liabilities incurred for
which the warehouseman claims a lien or security interest (RCW 62A.7-209). If
the precise amount of such advances made or of such liabilities incurred is, at
the time of the issue of the receipt, unknown to the warehouseman or to his
agent who issues it, a statement of the fact that advances have been made or
liabilities incurred and the purpose thereof is sufficient.

(3) A warehouseman may insert in his receipt any other terms which
are not contrary to the provisions of this Title and do not impair his
obligation of delivery (RCW 62A.7-403) or his duty of care (RCW 62A.7-204).
Any contrary provisions shall be ineffective.

---
END ---