BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.15.558 and 1997 c 211 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges may waive all or a portion
of the tuition and services and activities fees for state employees as defined
under subsection (2) of this section, immediate family members of these
state employees, and members of the Washington national guard. The
enrollment of these persons is pursuant to the following conditions:

(a)
Such persons shall register for and be enrolled in courses on a space available
basis and no new course sections shall be created as a result of the
registration;

(b)
Enrollment information on persons registered pursuant to this section shall be
maintained separately from other enrollment information and shall not be
included in official enrollment reports, nor shall such persons be considered
in any enrollment statistics that would affect budgetary determinations; and

(c)
Persons registering on a space available basis shall be charged a registration
fee of not less than five dollars.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "state employees" means persons
employed half‑time or more in one or more of the following employee
classifications:

(a)
Permanent employees in classified service under chapter 41.06 RCW;

(b)
Permanent employees governed by chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the exercise of
the option under RCW 41.56.201;

(c)
Permanent classified employees and exempt paraprofessional employees of
technical colleges; and

(d)
Faculty, counselors, librarians, and exempt professional and administrative
employees at institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

(3)
In awarding waivers, an institution of higher education may award waivers to
eligible persons employed by the institution before considering waivers for
eligible persons who are not employed by the institution.

(4)
If an institution of higher education exercises the authority granted under
this section, it shall include all eligible state employees and members of the
Washington national guard in the pool of persons eligible to participate in the
program.

(5) In establishing eligibility to receive waivers, institutions of
higher education may not discriminate between full‑time employees and
employees who are employed half‑time or more.

---
END ---