BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that housing is a fundamental need of Washington residents
and manufactured homes are the housing choice for a significant number of state
residents, often being their largest asset. The legislature also finds that
problems with the sale of a manufactured home may cause extreme hardship on
purchasers of a manufactured home, sometimes resulting in loss of the home and
financial ruin. These problems may be the result of, among other things, a lack
of information or knowledge on the part of the purchaser, mistakes by the
seller, and, occasionally, fraud or improper business practices on the part of
the seller. These issues are complicated by the fact that manufactured homes
are titled as vehicles unless they are converted to real property under chapter
65.20 RCW. The legislature intends to explore alternatives to better protect
purchasers of manufactured homes, particularly ways to improve the closing of
manufactured home sales.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The joint task force on manufactured home sales shall consist of the following
members or their designees:

(a)
The following four members of the house of representatives appointed by the
co-speakers: (i) Two members of the committee on financial institutions and
insurance, one from each major caucus; and (ii) two members of the committee on
economic development, housing and trade, one from each caucus;

(b)
The following four members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate: (i) Two members of the committee on commerce, trade, housing and
financial institutions, one from each major caucus; and (ii) two other
senators, one from each major caucus;

(c)
The following members appointed by the governor: (i) Three citizens
representing purchasers of manufactured homes; (ii) one member each from the
following industries: Manufactured home manufacturers, manufactured home
dealers, manufactured home installers, lenders, and escrow agents or title
companies; and (iii) a representative of local governments; and

(d)
The co-chairs of the joint task force shall request that a representative of
the attorney general, the department of licensing, the department of community,
trade, and economic development, and the department of financial institutions
serve on the joint task force as nonvoting members, and may appoint other
experts and advisors as nonvoting members.

(2)
The nonlegislative members of the joint task force on manufactured home sales
shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members of the joint
task force shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
44.04.120. The staff of senate committee services and the office of program
research of the house of representatives shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the joint task force.

(3)
The joint task force on manufactured home sales shall be co-chaired by one
senator, chosen by the task force, and one state representative, chosen by the
task force, from opposite parties. A quorum for any meeting or hearing shall
be six members. Any final findings, conclusions, or recommendations of the
joint task force must be agreed to by at least eight members, however, minority
findings, conclusions, or recommendations may be included that are submitted by
any member or group of members. The open public meetings act shall apply to
all meetings and hearings of the joint task force. Rules of procedure shall be
established at the first meeting of the joint task force.

(4)
The joint task force on manufactured home sales shall review the sales
practices, transfer of ownership, land-home packages offered by dealers,
installation, and other practices related to the purchase, closing, and
installation of a manufactured home, and shall make recommendations for
legislation and policy regarding methods to provide better protection for
purchasers of manufactured homes. The joint task force shall consider, among
other things, the following: (a) What types of complaints are being made by
purchasers of manufactured homes? (b) Should the closing of a manufactured
home sale be more formal, such as requiring that all manufactured home sales be
closed in escrow? (c) Should a notice be designed and provided to purchasers
of manufactured homes that provides consumer protection information, including
such things as: (i) A summary of the rights of the consumer regarding
warranties and installation; (ii) examples of improper sales activities such as
secret side agreements, delivering a different home than the one purchased and
pressuring the purchaser to accept the delivered home, and providing the seller
with a power of attorney? (d) Should funds not be disbursed to the dealer
until the terms of the sale have been satisfied, including delivery of the
manufactured home? and (e) What other methods should be considered to better
protect purchasers of manufactured homes?

(5)
The co-chairs of the joint task force on manufactured home sales shall convene
the first meeting and develop a work plan and meeting schedule. The joint task
force shall present a final report, including recommendations and a legislative
bill draft, if general consensus is reached on a bill draft, to the legislative
committees represented on the joint task force by December 15, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act expires December 31, 2000.

---
END ---