BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature recognizes that a well-trained and educated work force is a key
factor in the economic development of the state of Washington. The presence of
a high quality, yet affordable system of public colleges and universities is
critical in developing such a work force. It is the intent of the legislature
to examine key elements and identify and address any barriers in delivering an
excellent and affordable public education to its citizens.

(2)
A legislative task force on community and technical college out-of-state
tuition and residency requirements is established. The task force shall
consist of:

(a)
A maximum of four members of the house of representatives committee on higher
education, equally divided from the two largest caucuses and chosen by the
co-speakers of the house of representatives; and

(b)
Two members of the house of representatives committee on appropriations,
equally divided from each of the two largest caucuses and chosen by the
co-speakers of the house of representatives.

In
addition, the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher
education coordinating board, and the council of presidents shall each
cooperate with the task force and each maintain a liaison representative, each
of whom shall be nonvoting members.

(3)
The task force shall conduct an interim study focusing on out-of-state tuition
and residency requirements at the public community and technical colleges. The
study shall include, but not be limited to:

(a)
The impact of the state's rules in setting in-state and out-of-state tuition at
the community and technical colleges on the four-year baccalaureate
universities and research universities; and

(b)
How the state's residency requirements should be applied to enrollment in
distance learning courses.

(4)
The task force, where feasible, may consult with individuals from the public
and private sector or ask such persons to establish an advisory committee.

(5)
The task force shall use legislative facilities and staff from the office of
program research.

(6)
The task force shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature
by December 1, 2000.

(7)
This section expires July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---