BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.522 and 1996 c 199 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of vehicular assault if he operates or drives any vehicle:

(a)
In a reckless manner, and this conduct is the proximate cause of serious bodily
injury to another; or

(b)
While under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined by RCW
46.61.502, and this conduct is the proximate cause of serious bodily injury to
another; or

(c)
While using a personal wireless service as defined in RCW 80.36.375, and this
conduct is the proximate cause of serious bodily injury to another. However,
this subsection (1)(c) does not apply to authorized emergency vehicles,
motorcyclists wearing a helmet with built-in headsets or earphones as approved
by the Washington state patrol, or motorists using hands-free, wireless
communications systems, as approved by the equipment section of the Washington
state patrol.

(2)
"Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a
substantial risk of death, serious permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss
or impairment of the function of any part or organ of the body.

(3)
Vehicular assault is a class B felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act may be known and cited as the Rhoades Act.

---
END ---