BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

The
governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges may waive all or a portion
of the tuition for undergraduate or graduate students who are employed or
contracted by the institutions to provide services to fellow students who are
disabled under the federal Americans with disabilities act of 1990. The type
of services provided may include, but is not limited to, sign language
interpreting, tutoring, reading, and note taking.

The
waiver in this section is not subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.910 and 1999 c 344 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for revenue waived under programs listed in subsections (3) and (4) of
this section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the omnibus state
appropriations act, the total amount of operating fees revenue waived,
exempted, or reduced by a state university, a regional university, The
Evergreen State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue in this
subsection. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial management, before
granting any waivers. This limitation applies to all tuition waiver programs
established before or after July 1, 1992.

(a)
University of Washington 21 percent

(b)
Washington State University 20 percent

(c)
Eastern Washington University 11 percent

(d)
Central Washington University 8 percent

(e)
Western Washington University 10 percent

(f)
The Evergreen State College 6 percent

(g)
Community colleges as a whole 35 percent

(2)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions,
or reductions in operating fees contained in the following:

(a)
RCW 28B.10.265;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.014;

(c)
RCW 28B.15.100;

(d)
RCW 28B.15.225;

(e)
RCW 28B.15.380;

(f)
RCW 28B.15.520;

(g)
RCW 28B.15.526;

(h)
RCW 28B.15.527;

(i)
RCW 28B.15.543;

(j)
RCW 28B.15.545;

(k)
RCW 28B.15.555;

(l)
RCW 28B.15.556;

(m)
RCW 28B.15.615;

(n)
RCW 28B.15.620;

(o)
RCW 28B.15.628;

(p)
RCW 28B.15.730;

(q)
RCW 28B.15.740;

(r)
RCW 28B.15.750;

(s)
RCW 28B.15.756;

(t)
RCW 28B.50.259;

(u)
RCW 28B.70.050;

(v)
RCW 28B.80.580; and

(w)
During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate commission for
higher education undergraduate exchange program for students attending Eastern
Washington University.

(3)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers,
exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees contained in the
following:

(a)
RCW 28B.15.522;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.540; ((and))

(c)
RCW 28B.15.558; and

(d)
Section 1 of this act.

(4)
The total amount of operating fees revenue waived, exempted, or reduced by
institutions of higher education participating in the western interstate
commission for higher education western undergraduate exchange program under
RCW 28B.15.544 shall not exceed the percentage of total gross authorized
operating fees revenue in this subsection.

(a)
Washington State University 1 percent

(b)
Eastern Washington University 3 percent

(c) Central Washington University 3 percent

---
END ---