BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.21B.190 and 1995 c 382 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
thirty days after the final decision and order of the hearings board upon such
an appeal has been ((communicated)) posted in the United States mail
to the interested parties, such interested party aggrieved by the decision and
order of the hearings board may appeal to the superior court.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.21B.230 and 1997 c 125 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person having received notice of a denial of a petition, a
notice of determination, notice of or an order made by the department may
appeal to the hearings board, within thirty days from the date the notice of
such denial, order, or determination is posted in the United States mail,
properly addressed, postage prepaid, to the appealing party. The notice of
such denial, order, or determination shall include a declaration by the
responsible official at the department certifying that the notice of such
denial, order, or determination was posted in the United States mail on the
date certified. The appeal shall be perfected by serving a copy of the
notice of appeal upon the department or air pollution authority established
pursuant to chapter 70.94 RCW, as the case may be, within the time specified
herein and by filing the original thereof with proof of service with the clerk
of the hearings board.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.21B.300 and 1993 c 387 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70.94.431, 70.105.080,
70.107.050, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, and 90.56.330 shall be
imposed by a notice in writing, ((either by certified mail with return
receipt requested)) which shall include a declaration by the responsible
official at the department certifying that the notice was posted in the United
States mail on the date certified, or by personal service, to the person
incurring the penalty from the department, the administrator of the office of
marine safety, or the local air authority, describing the violation with
reasonable particularity. Within fifteen days after the notice is received,
the person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the department, the
administrator, or the authority for the remission or mitigation of the
penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the department, the administrator,
or authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever terms the
department, the administrator, or the authority in its discretion deems
proper. The department or the authority may ascertain the facts regarding all
such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem
proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of
extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or factors not
considered in setting the original penalty.

(2)
Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the pollution control
hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the appeal is filed with the
hearings board and served on the department, the administrator, or authority
thirty days after ((receipt by the person penalized)) posting in the
United States mail of the notice imposing the penalty or thirty days after
((receipt)) posting in the United States mail of the notice of
disposition of the application for relief from penalty.

(3)
A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:

(a)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;

(b)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice of disposition on application for
relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or

(c)
Thirty days after receipt of the notice of decision of the hearings board if
the penalty is appealed.

(4)
If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department or the administrator
within thirty days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon
request of the department or the administrator, shall bring an action in the
name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county, or of
any county in which the violator does business, to recover the penalty. If the
amount of the penalty is not paid to the authority within thirty days after it
becomes due and payable, the authority may bring an action to recover the
penalty in the superior court of the county of the authority's main office or
of any county in which the violator does business. In these actions, the
procedures and rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil
action.

(5)
All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to
the general fund except those penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155,
which shall be credited to the reclamation account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7),
RCW 70.94.431, the disposition of which shall be governed by that provision,
RCW 70.105.080, which shall be credited to the hazardous waste control and
elimination account, created by RCW 70.105.180, and RCW 90.56.330, which shall
be credited to the coastal protection fund created by RCW 90.48.390.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.21B.310 and 1992 c 73 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any order issued by the department, the administrator of the office of marine
safety, or authority pursuant to RCW 70.94.211, 70.94.332, 70.105.095,
43.27A.190, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, or 90.48.120(2) or any provision enacted
after July 26, 1987, or any permit, certificate, or license issued by the
department may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board if the
appeal is filed with the board and served on the department or authority within
thirty days after ((receipt)) posting of the order in the
United States mail. Except as provided under chapter 70.105D RCW, this is
the exclusive means of appeal of such an order.

(2)
The department, the administrator, or the authority in its discretion may stay
the effectiveness of an order during the pendency of such an appeal.

(3)
At any time during the pendency of an appeal of such an order to the board, the
appellant may apply pursuant to RCW 43.21B.320 to the hearings board for a stay
of the order or for the removal thereof.

(4)
Any appeal must contain the following in accordance with the rules of the
hearings board:

(a)
The appellant's name and address;

(b)
The date and docket number of the order, permit, or license appealed;

(c)
A description of the substance of the order, permit, or license that is the
subject of the appeal;

(d)
A clear, separate, and concise statement of every error alleged to have been
committed;

(e)
A clear and concise statement of facts upon which the requester relies to
sustain his or her statements of error; and

(f)
A statement setting forth the relief sought.

(5)
Upon failure to comply with any final order of the department or the
administrator, the attorney general, on request of the department or the
administrator, may bring an action in the superior court of the county where
the violation occurred or the potential violation is about to occur to obtain
such relief as necessary, including injunctive relief, to insure compliance
with the order. The air authorities may bring similar actions to enforce their
orders.

(6) An appealable decision or order shall be identified as such and
shall contain a conspicuous notice to the recipient that it may be appealed
only by filing an appeal with the hearings board and serving it on the
department within thirty days of receipt.

---
END ---