BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature makes the following findings:

(1)
Access to advanced telecommunications facilities and services is essential to
the economic and educational well-being of all persons and entities in both
rural and urban areas.

(2)
Many persons and entities, particularly in rural areas, do not have adequate
access to advanced telecommunications facilities and services.

(3)
Public utility districts and rural port districts are well-positioned to
construct and operate advanced telecommunications facilities in a
cost-effective manner, particularly in rural areas, because of existing
rights-of-way, infrastructure ownership, experience delivering utility
services, and economies of scale achieved by fully utilizing utility
telecommunications systems.

(4)
Provision of wholesale telecommunications services by public utility districts
and rural port districts will stimulate competition among telecommunications
providers, to the benefit of all telecommunications consumers and users.

(5)
Economic development and educational opportunities, particularly in rural
areas, will be increased by public utility districts and rural port districts providing
cost-effective wholesale telecommunications services, thus reducing the
economic and educational disparity between rural and urban areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section and section 3
of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.

(b)
"Telecommunications" has the same meaning as that contained in RCW
80.04.010.

(c)
"Telecommunications facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts, poles,
wires, cables, crossarms, receivers, transmitters, instruments, machines,
appliances, instrumentalities and all devices, real estate, easements,
apparatus, property, and routes used, operated, owned, or controlled by any
entity to facilitate the provision of telecommunications services.

(d)
"Wholesale telecommunications services" means the provision of
telecommunications services or facilities for resale by an entity authorized to
provide telecommunications services to the general public.

(2)
A public utility district in existence on the effective date of this act may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, alter, improve, repair, operate, and maintain any
telecommunications facilities for its internal telecommunications needs and for
the provision of wholesale telecommunications services within the district's
limits, or by contract to other public utility districts.

(3)
A public utility district providing wholesale telecommunications services shall
ensure that rates, terms, and conditions for such services are not unduly or
unreasonably discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms, and conditions are
discriminatory or preferential when a public utility district offering rates,
terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale telecommunications services
does not offer substantially similar rates, terms, and conditions to all other
entities seeking substantially similar services.

(4)
A public utility district shall account for any and all revenues and
expenditures related to its wholesale telecommunications facilities and
services separately from revenues and expenditures related to its electrical or
water operations. Any revenues received from the provisions of wholesale
telecommunications services must be dedicated to reimbursing the district for
costs incurred to build and maintain the wholesale advanced telecommunications
facilities until such time as any bonds or other financing instruments used to
finance the wholesale advanced telecommunications facilities are discharged or
retired, after which such revenues must continue to support the on-going
maintenance of wholesale advanced telecommunications facilities.

(5)
Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize public utility districts to
sell or otherwise provide telecommunications services to end users.

(6)
A public utility district shall not exercise powers of eminent domain granted
under this title to acquire telecommunications facilities owned by any other
person or entity or contractual rights held by any other person or entity to
telecommunications facilities.

(7)
Except as otherwise specifically provided, a public utility district may
exercise any of the powers granted to it under this title and other applicable
law in carrying out the powers authorized under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person or entity that has requested wholesale telecommunications services
from a public utility district providing wholesale telecommunications services
under this chapter may petition the commission under the procedures set forth
in RCW 80.04.110 (1) through (3) if it believes the district's rates, terms,
and conditions are unduly or unreasonably discriminatory or preferential. The
person or entity shall provide the public utility district notice of its intent
to petition the commission and an opportunity to review within thirty days the
rates, terms, and conditions as applied to it prior to submitting its
petition. In determining whether a district is providing discriminatory or
preferential rates, terms, and conditions, the commission may consider such
matters as service quality, cost of service, technical feasibility of
connection points on the district's facilities, time of response to service
requests, system capacity, and other matters reasonably related to the
provision of wholesale telecommunications services. If the commission, after
notice and hearing, determines that a public utility district's rates, terms,
and conditions are unduly or unreasonably discriminatory or preferential, it
shall issue a final order finding noncompliance with this section and setting
forth the specific areas of apparent noncompliance. An order imposed under
this section shall be enforceable in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2)
The commission may order a public utility district to pay a share of the costs
incurred by the commission in connection with adjudicating or enforcing the
provisions of this section.

(3)
The commission procedures exercised under this section shall be in accordance
with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and a public utility
district may obtain judicial review of the commission's actions under chapter
34.05 RCW. The commission and prevailing party may also seek injunctive relief
to compel compliance with an order.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the commission's authority
and jurisdiction with respect to actions, proceedings, or orders permitted or
contemplated for a state commission under the federal telecommunications act of
1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section and section 5
of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.

(b)
"Rural port district" means a port district formed under chapter
53.04 RCW and located in a county with an average population density of fewer
than one hundred persons per square mile.

(c)
"Telecommunications" has the same meaning as that contained in RCW
80.04.010.

(d)
"Telecommunications facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts, poles,
wires, cables, crossarms, receivers, transmitters, instruments, machines, appliances,
instrumentalities and all devices, real estate, easements, apparatus, property,
and routes used, operated, owned, or controlled by any entity to facilitate the
provision of telecommunications services.

(e)
"Wholesale telecommunications services" means the provision of
telecommunications services or facilities for resale by an entity authorized to
provide telecommunications services to the general public.

(2)
A rural port district in existence on the effective date of this act may
construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance, lease, license, handle,
provide, add to, alter, improve, repair, operate, and maintain any
telecommunications facilities for its own use and for the provision of
wholesale telecommunications services within the district's limits.

(3)
A rural port district providing wholesale telecommunications services under
this section shall ensure that rates, terms, and conditions for such services
are not unduly or unreasonably discriminatory or preferential. Rates, terms,
and conditions are discriminatory or preferential when a rural port district
offering such rates, terms, and conditions to an entity for wholesale
telecommunications services does not offer substantially similar rates, terms,
and conditions to all other entities seeking substantially similar services.

(4)
A rural port district shall account for any and all revenues and expenditures
related to its wholesale advanced telecommunications facilities and services
separately from revenues and expenditures related to its internal
telecommunications operations. Any revenues received from the provisions of
wholesale advanced telecommunications services must be dedicated to reimbursing
the district for costs incurred to build and maintain the wholesale advanced
telecommunications facilities until such time as any bonds or other financing
instruments used to finance the wholesale advanced telecommunications
facilities are discharged or retired, after which such revenues must continue
to support the on-going maintenance of wholesale advanced telecommunications
facilities.

(5)
Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize rural port districts to
sell or otherwise provide telecommunications services to end users.

(6)
A rural port district shall not exercise powers of eminent domain granted under
this title to acquire telecommunications facilities owned by any other person
or entity or contractual rights held by any other person or entity to
telecommunications facilities.

(7)
Except as otherwise provided, a rural port district may exercise any of the
powers granted to it under this title and other applicable law in carrying out
the powers authorized under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 53.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person or entity that has requested wholesale telecommunications services
from a rural port district may petition the commission under the procedures set
forth in RCW 80.04.110 (1) through (3) if it believes the district's rates,
terms, and conditions are unduly or unreasonably discriminatory or
preferential. The person or entity shall provide the rural port district
notice of its intent to petition the commission and an opportunity to review
within thirty days the rates, terms, and conditions as applied to it prior to
submitting its petition. In determining whether a district is providing
discriminatory or preferential rates, terms, and conditions, the commission may
consider such matters as service quality, technical feasibility of connection
points on the district's telecommunications facilities, time of response to
service requests, system capacity, and other matters reasonably related to the
provision of wholesale telecommunications services. If the commission, after
notice and hearing, determines that a rural port district's rates, terms, and
conditions are unduly or unreasonably discriminatory or preferential, it shall
issue a final order finding noncompliance with this section and setting forth
the specific areas of apparent noncompliance. An order imposed under this
section shall be enforceable in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2)
The commission may order a rural port district to pay a share of the costs
incurred by the commission in adjudicating or enforcing this section.

(3)
The commission procedures exercised under this section shall be in accordance
with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and a district may
obtain judicial review of the commission's actions under chapter 34.05 RCW.
The commission and prevailing party may also seek injunctive relief to compel
compliance with an order.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the commission's authority
and jurisdiction with respect to actions, proceedings, or orders permitted or
contemplated for a state commission under the federal telecommunications act of
1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 80.01 RCW to read as follows:

The commission is authorized to perform the duties required by
sections 3 and 5 of this act.

---
END ---