BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Benefit date" means the date that the recipient receives the
business subsidy. If the business subsidy involves the purchase, lease, or
donation of physical equipment, then the benefit date begins when the recipient
puts the equipment into service. If the business subsidy is for improvements
to property, then the benefit date refers to the earliest date of either:

(a)
When the improvements are finished for the entire project; or

(b)
When a business occupies the property. If a business occupies the property and
the subsidy grantor expects that other businesses will also occupy the same
property, the grantor may assign a separate benefit date for each business when
it first occupies the property.

(2)
"Business subsidy" or "subsidy" means a state or local
government agency grant, contribution of personal property, real property,
infrastructure, the principal amount of a loan at rates below those
commercially available to the recipient, any reduction or deferral of any tax
or any fee, and guarantee of any payment under any loan, lease, or other
obligation, or any preferential use of government facilities given to a
business.

The
following forms of financial assistance are not business subsidies:

(a)
A grant of less than twenty-five thousand dollars; and

(b)
Tax reductions resulting from conformity with federal tax law.

(3)
"Grantor" means any state or local government agency with the
authority to grant a business subsidy.

(4)
"Local government agency" includes a statutory or home rule charter
city, housing and redevelopment authority, town, county, port authority,
economic development authority, community development agency, nonprofit entity
created by a local government agency, or any other entity created by or
authorized by a local government with authority to provide business subsidies.

(5)
"Recipient" means any for-profit or nonprofit business entity that
receives a business subsidy. Only nonprofit entities with at least one hundred
full-time equivalent positions and a ratio of highest to lowest paid employees
that exceeds ten to one, determined on the basis of full-time equivalent positions,
are included in this definition.

(6)
"State government agency" means any state agency that has the
authority to award business subsidies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
recipient must provide information to grantors. The information must be filed
on forms developed by the department of community, trade, and economic
development in cooperation with representatives of local government. Copies of
the completed forms must be sent to the department of community, trade, and economic
development and the local government agency that provided the business
subsidy. The report must include:

(a)
The type, public purpose, and amount of all subsidies, and type of district if
the subsidy is tax increment financing.

(b)
The hourly wage of each job created with separate bands of wages;

(c)
Whether the jobs are full time or part time;

(d)
The recipient's standard industrial code;

(e)
The sum of the hourly wages and cost of health insurance provided by the
employer with separate bands of wages;

(f)
The location of the recipient prior to receiving the business subsidy;

(g)
The name and address of the parent corporation of the recipient, if any;

(h)
A list of all financial assistance by all grantors for the project including
name of grantor, amount of assistance, how long assistance was received, and
what the assistance was used for; and

(i)
Other information the department of community, trade, and economic development
may request.

(2)
A report under subsection (1) of this section must be filed by March 1st of
each year for the previous calendar year.

(3)
If the recipient does not submit its report, the local government agency must
mail the recipient a warning within one week of the required filing date. If,
after fourteen days of the postmarked date of the warning, the recipient fails
to provide a report, the recipient must pay to the grantor a penalty of five
hundred dollars for each subsequent day until the report is filed. The maximum
penalty may not exceed fifty thousand dollars. If the recipient does not
submit its report by June 1st, it shall be ineligible for subsidies until the
report has been satisfactorily completed and submitted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Local government agencies and state government agencies, regardless of whether
or not they have awarded any business subsidies, must file a report by April
1st of each year with the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The local government agency must include a list of recipients
that did not complete the report required under section 2 of this act,
recipients that have not met their job and wage goals within two years, and the
steps being taken to bring them into compliance or to recoup the subsidy.

(2)
If the department of community, trade, and economic development has not
received the report under subsection (1) of this section by April 1st from an
entity required to report, the department of community, trade, and economic
development shall issue a warning to the government agency. If the department
of community, trade, and economic development has still not received the report
by June 1st of that same year from an entity required to report, then that
government agency may not award any business subsidies until the report has
been filed.

(3)
The department of community, trade, and economic development must provide
information on reporting requirements to state and local government agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development must publish a
compilation and summary of the results of the reports for the previous calendar
year by July 1st of each year. The reports of the government agencies to the
department of community, trade, and economic development and the compilation
and summary report of the department of community, trade, and economic
development must be made available to the public.

(2)
The department of community, trade, and economic development must coordinate
the production of reports so that useful comparisons across time periods and
across grantors can be made. The department of community, trade, and economic
development may add other information to the report as the department of
community, trade, and economic development deems necessary to evaluate business
subsidies. Among the information in the summary and compilation report, the
department of community, trade, and economic development must include:

(a)
Total amount of subsidies awarded in each development region of the state;

(b)
Distribution of business subsidy amounts by size of the business subsidy;

(c)
Distribution of business subsidy amounts by time category, such as monthly or
quarterly;

(d)
Distribution of subsidies by type and by public purpose;

(e)
Number of part-time and full-time jobs within separate bands of wages; and

(f)
Benefits paid within separate bands of wages.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. An
appropriation rider in an appropriation to the department of community, trade, and
economic development that specifies that the appropriation be granted to a
particular business or class of businesses must contain a statement of the
expected benefits associated with the grant. At a minimum, the statement must
include goals for the number of jobs created, wages paid, and the tax revenue
increases due to the grant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act applies to all business subsidies entered into or state appropriations
authorized after September 30, 2000.

---
END ---