BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.233 and 1997 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial vehicles with
a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds, effective with vehicle
registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2001, all vehicle license
plates must be issued on a standard background, as designated by the
department. Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity, the
department shall periodically provide for the replacement of license plates,
except for commercial vehicles with a gross weight in excess of twenty-six
thousand pounds. Frequency of replacement shall be established in accordance
with empirical studies documenting the longevity of the reflective materials
used to make license plates.

---
END ---