BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW to read as follows:

The department of licensing shall maintain reports of positive drug
test results of motor carrier operators as part of the operator's employment
record when the reports are made to the department by a motor carrier required
to have an in-house drug and alcohol testing program that meets the federal
requirements of 49 C.F.R. Part 382 or by a motor carrier that is a member of a
consortium, as defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 382.107, that provides testing that
meets the federal requirements. The operator's employment driving record shall
indicate his or her disqualification to drive a commercial motor vehicle
following a positive drug test. The disqualification to drive a commercial
motor vehicle shall remain in effect until the disqualified driver meets all
the applicable requirements of 49 C.F.R.

---
END ---