BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.58.150 and 1961 ex.s. c 5 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A
fetal death means any product of conception that shows no evidence of life
after complete expulsion or extraction from ((its)) his or her
mother by or as the result of any means, including the application of any
abortion procedure or technique. The words "evidence of life"
include breathing, beating of the heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or
definite movement of voluntary muscles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

The
body, including the body parts, body organs, body tissue, and body fluids, of a
fetus whose death is the result of the application of any abortion procedure or
technique may not be sold, donated, or otherwise transferred, with or without
valuable consideration, for any use, but shall be disposed of as human remains
by burial or cremation in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and
chapter 70.58 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
68.50.610 and 1993 c 228 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person may not knowingly, for valuable consideration, purchase or sell a part
for transplantation or therapy, if removal of the part is intended to occur
after the death of the decedent.

(2)
Valuable consideration does not include reasonable payment for the removal,
processing, disposal, preservation, quality control, storage, transportation,
or implantation of a part.

(3)
The donation of any part of the body, including the body parts, body organs,
body tissue, and body fluids, of a fetus whose death is the result of the
application of any abortion procedure or technique is prohibited under any
circumstance, with or without valuable consideration, for purposes of making an
anatomical gift.

(4)
A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony and upon conviction is
subject to a fine not exceeding fifty thousand dollars or imprisonment not
exceeding five years, or both.

Sec.
4. RCW
68.04.020 and 1977 c 47 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

"Human
remains" or "remains" means the body of ((a)) any
deceased person, and includes the body in any stage of decomposition except
cremated remains. "Human remains" or "remains" includes
the body of a dead fetus.

Sec.
5. RCW
68.50.110 and 1987 c 331 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
for pathological waste as defined in RCW 70.95K.010, in cases of
dissection provided for in RCW 68.50.070 and 68.50.100, and where ((a
dead body)) human remains shall rightfully be carried through or
removed from the state for the purpose of lawful burial or cremation
elsewhere, ((every dead body of a human being lying)) all human
remains within this state, ((and)) including the remains of
any dissected body, after dissection, shall be decently buried, or cremated
within a reasonable time after death.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

For
purposes of RCW 70.58.150, 68.50.610, and sections 2 and 7 of this act,
"application of any abortion technique or procedure" means the
exercise or use of any force, instrument, or drug, or other means, device, or
substance, intended to cause the termination of a pregnancy resulting in the
death of a fetus.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Section 2 of this act is not intended, and may not be construed, to prevent a coroner,
medical examiner, physician of the mother of the fetus, or prosecuting attorney
from using that part of the body of a fetus whose death is the result of the
application of any abortion procedure or technique that is necessary for the
sole and exclusive purpose of diagnosing or determining: (a) A disease or
condition or cause of death of the mother of the fetus if the abortion was
performed because of such disease or condition of the mother of the fetus, or
(b) cause of death of the fetus, if in either case no other reasonable means of
making the diagnosis or determination is available without such use, and after
the diagnosis or determination all that part of the body of the fetus used to
make the diagnosis or determination that remains is disposed of as required in
section 2 of this act.

(2)
Section 2 of this act and RCW 68.50.610(3) are not intended, and may not be
construed, to apply to the donation for medical research or use of any part of
the body of a fetus whose death is the result of a miscarriage, stillbirth,
ectopic pregnancy, sickness, disease, accident, or crime caused to the fetus or
the mother by a third party without the knowledge and consent of the mother.
However, the donation may only be made if a parent or guardian knows of and approves
the donation for such medical research or use.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---