BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a city or town:

(a)
May not ask for and obtain the social security number of any person;

(b)
May not keep the social security number of any person. Any person's social
security number that the city or town has in its possession on the effective
date of this section must be destroyed; and

(c)
May not sell, give, or otherwise transfer the social security number of any
person.

(2)(a)
A city or town may ask for and obtain the social security number of any person
if it is required to do so by federal law.

(b)
If this section is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a
prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act remains operative regardless of the conflict.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a state agency as defined
in RCW 43.17.320:

(a)
May not ask for and obtain the social security number of any person;

(b)
May not keep the social security number of any person. Any person's social
security number that the state agency has in its possession on the effective
date of this section must be destroyed; and

(c)
May not sell, give, or otherwise transfer the social security number of any
person.

(2)(a)
A state agency may ask for and obtain the social security number of any person
if it is required to do so by federal law.

(b) If this section is found to be in conflict with federal
requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds
to the state, the conflicting part of this act remains operative regardless of
the conflict.

---
END ---