BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that the jobs for the environment program has
successfully provided family-wage jobs to dislocated natural resource workers
while completing important conservation projects. It is important that this
program be updated for continued operation in the twenty-first century. This
is especially true because the jobs for the environment program has been
operated solely through omnibus appropriations bills since its inception, and
requires policy guidance.

(2)
Therefore, the watershed restoration and jobs program is created, with the dual
purpose of employing dislocated natural resource workers and completing crucial
watershed restoration and conservation projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Affected natural resource worker" means those workers eligible to
receive wages and benefits through the watershed restoration and jobs program,
including:

(a)
Workers previously employed under the jobs for the environment program;

(b)
Workers in a qualified natural resource training program, such as a state-approved
apprenticeship program;

(c)
Dislocated forest products workers and dislocated salmon fishing workers as
defined in RCW 50.70.010; and

(d)
Other workers from fisheries and timber-dependent communities who have at least
a two-year work history in such a community.

(2)
"Conservation" means activities that support the sustainability of
critical watershed functions, including activities such as field assessment of
conditions prior to initiating restoration work, and field and mapping
functions related to stream typing.

(3)
For the purposes of determining eligibility as a direct applicant to the
watershed restoration and jobs program, "private for-profit" means a
small business, as defined under RCW 19.85.020. Any for-profit business is
eligible to receive funds as a subcontractor to a locally funded project,
regardless of the business size.

(4)
"Task force" means the watershed restoration and jobs program task
force created under section 4 of this act.

(5)
"Watershed restoration" means altering current conditions in
measurable ways to provide water quality and habitat adequate to contribute to
the sustainability of healthy, diverse populations of fish and wildlife within
a watershed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. An
amount not to exceed fifteen percent of the funds available for the watershed
restoration and jobs program may be expended on agency administrative costs and
technical assistance provided by the department of fish and wildlife and
department of ecology as provided under section 6 of this act. Except for
essential administrative, supervisory, and technical assistance purposes, funds
may not be used for hiring permanent state employees.

Funds
may not be used for:

(1)
Administrative rule making;

(2)
Community outreach;

(3)
Acquisition of real property;

(4)
Mitigation work required under state or federal permits;

(5)
Incentives or bonuses to salaried employees; or

(6)
Marketing studies or research.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
watershed restoration and jobs program task force is created within the
department of natural resources. The purpose of the task force is to provide a
coordinated and comprehensive approach to the implementation of this chapter.
The task force consists of the following representatives or their designees:

(1)
The commissioner of public lands;

(2)
The director of the department of fish and wildlife;

(3)
The director of the department of ecology;

(4)
The director of the work force training and education coordinating board;

(5)
The governor's rural community assistance team coordinator;

(6)
A tribal representative;

(7)
A federal agency representative from among participating federal agencies; and

(8)
At least nine but no more than eleven public members, selected at large,
representing community and nongovernmental interests.

The
public members shall include at least one representative from:

(a)
State-wide rural community economic development organizations;

(b)
Conservation districts;

(c)
Small business interests;

(d)
Fishing and shellfish industry;

(e)
Organized labor;

(f)
The timber industry;

(g)
The construction industry;

(h)
State-wide environmental organizations; and

(i)
Community-based private nonprofit organizations with a focus on watershed
restoration or conservation.

The
representatives of the tribal, federal, and public members shall serve
three-year terms, except for one-third who shall serve an initial term of one
year, and one-third who shall serve an initial term of two years. The task
force may seek the advice of other agencies and organizations as needed. The
commissioner of public lands shall appoint the chair and public members. The
governor shall appoint the governmental members of the task force. A task
force quorum for meetings consists of at least one-half of the government and
at least one-half plus one of the community, tribal, and public members. All
members shall serve without additional pay, except that public representatives
may have travel costs reimbursed. Participation in the work of the committee
by agency members is considered performance of their employment. The
department of natural resources shall provide staff and administrative support
to the task force and shall solicit the participation of agency personnel to
assist the task force as needed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
task force shall evaluate and recommend proposals for funding watershed
restoration and conservation projects that employ affected natural resource
workers. The task force shall give priority consideration to projects from the
habitat project lists created pursuant to RCW 75.46.060 that create temporary
jobs providing family wages and benefits to affected natural resource workers.
The task force may fund other watershed restoration and conservation projects
on a secondary basis. Jobs that avoid redislocating natural resource workers
from the watershed restoration and jobs program must be given added
consideration over those that do not. Priority must be given to the workers
listed in section 2(1) (a) through (c) of this act.

In
making funding recommendations, the task force shall consider whether projected
improvements in water or habitat quality and quantity are quantifiable. The
task force shall also consider whether the project is sponsored or cosponsored
by tribes or private for-profits to provide funds, equipment time, materials,
or technical expertise, including training, to match state or federal funds.
The watershed restoration and jobs program shall strongly promote training that
is offered through a state-approved natural resource apprenticeship program,
whenever practicable, in the area.

The
task force shall submit to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature a biennial report summarizing the benefits created by the projects
funded under this chapter and shall make recommendations for improving the
watershed restoration and jobs program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The department of natural resources shall implement and administer the
watershed restoration and jobs program.

(2)
The department of fish and wildlife shall provide technical assistance and
expertise in addressing fish and wildlife issues.

(3)
The department of ecology shall provide technical assistance and expertise in
addressing water quality issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
employment security department shall refer eligible affected natural resource
workers to employers hiring under the watershed restoration and jobs program.
Recipients of funds must consider the list of workers developed by the
employment security department before conducting interviews or making hiring
decisions for workers entering the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. On or
before January 1, 2002, the department of natural resources shall prepare a
report to the legislature evaluating the implementation of this chapter. The
following indicators of success must be reported:

(1)
The number of affected natural resource workers employed by each project;

(2)
The number of previously affected natural resource workers employed and trained
through the watershed restoration and jobs program who have found long-term
employment;

(3)
Active use by sponsors of one or more training curriculum for watershed
restoration workers that promote effective and consistent skills needed by
restoration workers;

(4)
Whether project design guidelines have been prepared and applied that are based
on generally accepted standards and techniques;

(5)
The number of funded projects underway in a timely manner;

(6)
The number of projects started versus successfully completed and effectively
documented; and the completion of a credible program review allowing the
program to learn from individual project strengths and weaknesses;

(7)
Whether the program's local match requirements are achieving the expected
results of promoting strong local support;

(8)
The effectiveness and quantity of on-the-ground accomplishments, for example,
miles of stream bed or riparian area restored, miles of forest roads impacting
water quality that are decommissioned, and the effectiveness of stream bank
projects to reduce sedimentation; and

(9)
Whether local watershed health indicators have been established and are being
adequately monitored and reported on to determine area-wide progress in meeting
watershed health goals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act are each added to chapter 43.21J RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.21J.005 (Legislative findings) and 1993 c 516 s 1;

(2) RCW
43.21J.010 (Intent--Purpose--Definitions) and 1995 c 226 s 26
& 1993 c 516 s 2;

(3) RCW
43.21J.020 (Environmental and forest restoration account) and 1993
c 516 s 3;

(4) RCW
43.21J.030 (Environmental enhancement and job creation task force)
and 1998 c 245 s 60, 1994 c 264 s 17, & 1993 c 516 s 5;

(5) RCW
43.21J.040 (Environmental enhancement and restoration project
proposals--Evaluation--Award of funds) and 1993 c 516 s 4;

(6) RCW
43.21J.050 (Training or employment) and 1993 c 516 s 8;

(7) RCW
43.21J.060 (Unemployment compensation benefits--Training) and 1993
c 516 s 9;

(8) RCW
43.21J.070 (Unemployment compensation benefits--Special base year
and benefit year) and 1993 c 516 s 10;

(9) RCW
43.21J.800 (Joint legislative audit and review committee report)
and 1996 c 288 s 36 & 1993 c 516 s 11;

(10) RCW
43.21J.900 (Short title--1993 c 516) and 1993 c 516 s 15;

(11) RCW
43.21J.901 (Section captions and part headings--1993 c 516) and
1993 c 516 s 16;

(12) RCW
43.21J.902 (Severability--1993 c 516) and 1993 c 516 s 17;

(13) RCW
43.21J.903 (Conflict with federal requirements--1993 c 516) and
1993 c 516 s 19; and

(14) RCW
43.21J.904 (Effective date--1993 c 516) and 1993 c 516 s 20.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act take effect July 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. The
sum of three million three hundred thirty thousand dollars, or as much thereof
as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001,
from the salmon recovery account to the department of natural resources for the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---