BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.020 and 1997 c 58 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

By
October 2002, the department shall develop and implement an electronic benefit
transfer system to be used for the delivery of public assistance benefits,
including without limitation, food assistance.

The
department shall comply with P.L. 104-193, and shall cooperate with relevant
federal agencies in the design and implementation of the electronic benefit
transfer system.

Payment by electronic benefits transfer is not required where an
individual determines, and the decision is approved by the eligibility worker
at the department, that payment by electronic benefits transfer would impose a
hardship due to a physical or mental disability or a geographic, language, or
literacy barrier, or would impose a financial hardship.

---
END ---