BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that facilitating the environmental permit process will
increase citizen satisfaction and compliance with state and local permit
requirements. Lack of coordination in the processing of permit applications
causes costly delays and frustration to the applicant. The public deserves a
clear, predictable system for land-use decisions. The legislature also finds
that permit issuance can be expedited by requiring state agencies and local
jurisdictions to coordinate their permit processes.

Sec.
2. RCW
58.17.095 and 1986 c 233 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A county, city, or town may adopt an ordinance providing for the administrative
review of a preliminary plat without a public hearing ((by adopting an
ordinance providing for such administrative review)). The ordinance may
specify a threshold number of lots in a subdivision above which a public
hearing must be held, and may specify other factors which necessitate the
holding of a public hearing. ((The administrative review process shall
include))

(2)
If the county, city, or town has not adopted consolidated permitting procedures
and time frames as provided in chapter 36.70B RCW, it shall conduct
administrative review of preliminary plats consistent with the following
minimum conditions:

(((1)))
(a) The notice requirements of RCW 58.17.090 shall be followed, except
that the publication shall be made within ten days of the filing of the
application. Additionally, at least ten days after the filing of the
application notice both shall be: (((a))) (i) Posted on or
around the land proposed to be subdivided in at least five conspicuous places
designed to attract public awareness of the proposal; and (((b))) (ii)
mailed to the owner of each lot or parcel of property located within at least three
hundred feet of the site. The applicant shall provide the county, city, or
town with a list of such property owners and their addresses. The notice shall
include notification that no public hearing will be held on the application,
except as provided by this section. The notice shall set out the procedures
and time limitations for persons to require a public hearing and make comments.

(((2)))
(b) Any person shall have a period of twenty days from the date of the
notice to comment upon the proposed preliminary plat. All comments received
shall be provided to the applicant. The applicant has seven days from receipt
of the comments to respond thereto.

(((3)))
(c) A public hearing on the proposed subdivision shall be held if any
person files a request for a hearing with the county, city, or town within
twenty-one days of the publishing of such notice. If such a hearing is
requested, notice requirements for the public hearing shall be in conformance
with RCW 58.17.090, and the ninety-day period for approval or disapproval of
the proposed subdivision provided for in RCW 58.17.140 shall commence with the
date of the filing of the request for a public hearing. Any hearing ordered
under this subsection shall be conducted by the planning commission or hearings
officer as required by county or city ordinance.

(((4)))
(d) On its own initiative within twenty-one days of the filing of the
request for approval of the subdivision, the governing body, or a designated
employee or official, of the county, city, or town, shall be authorized to
cause a public hearing to be held on the proposed subdivision within ninety
days of the filing of the request for the subdivision.

(((5)))
(e) If the public hearing is waived as provided in this section, the
planning commission or planning agency shall complete the review of the
proposed preliminary plat and transmit its recommendation to the legislative
body as provided in RCW 58.17.100.

(3)
If the county, city, or town has adopted consolidated permitting procedures and
time frames as provided in chapter 36.70B RCW, it may conduct administrative
review of preliminary plats consistent with its procedures and time frames. At
a minimum, local permitting procedures and time frames related to
administrative review of preliminary plats shall provide for:

(a)
Notice of application by publication, posting, and mailing. All forms of
notice shall include a prominent statement that no public hearing will be held
on the application, except as provided by this section. All forms of notice
shall clearly state procedures and time frames for persons to make comments on
the proposal and request a public hearing.

(b)
Written comments on the application by any person. Comments received shall be
provided to the applicant, and the applicant shall have seven days from receipt
of the comments to respond thereto.

(c)
A public hearing on the application if any person files a request for a hearing
within the time frame specified. If a hearing is requested, notice
requirements for the public hearing and the time frame for approval or
disapproval of the application shall be consistent with other local permitting
procedures. Any hearing conducted under this subsection shall be conducted by
the planning commission or hearing officer as required by local ordinance.

(d)
A public hearing on the application if the legislative or executive branch of
the county, city, or town so requests within the time frame specified.

(e)
Expedited agency review and transmittal of its recommendation on the
application to the legislative body of the county, city, or town, if there is
no request for public hearing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that a pilot project to allow a county to administer
hydraulic permits will increase government efficiency, citizen satisfaction,
and compliance with state and local environmental requirements. The
legislature further finds that a pilot project will not compromise thorough and
competent environmental review.

(2)
The department may develop a pilot project to allow a county to administer
hydraulic permits. The department has discretion to determine which county may
participate in the pilot project. No county is obligated to participate in the
pilot project program. The pilot project shall be established by written
agreement between the department and the participating county. The department
shall retain full oversight authority and shall not delegate rule-making
authority during the pilot project. This section shall not apply to activities
and areas covered by chapter 76.09 RCW.

(3)
The agreement shall specify the types of hydraulic permits the participating
county may administer. However, the county may not administer hydraulic
permits associated with forest practices. The agreement shall incorporate, at
a minimum, the regulatory standards of this chapter and Title 220 WAC,
provisions for a local appeals process equivalent to that provided by this
chapter and Title 220 WAC, and provisions for effective monitoring and
enforcement of the hydraulic permits issued by the participating county. In
addition, the agreement shall incorporate the following guidelines:

(a)
There shall be no decrease in protection of fish habitat;

(b)
There shall be no full-time equivalent or funding shift from the department to
the participating county; and

(c)
The department shall retain authority to develop programmatic permits and
habitat conservation plans.

(4)
The participating county may charge permit applicants to cover any additional
cost of processing hydraulic permit applications, including inspection and
monitoring, consistent with the county's fee ordinance. The department shall
not seek any contribution from fees collected by the participating county for
services performed under the agreement.

(a)
The department and the participating county shall assemble a citizen advisory
panel including, at a minimum, representatives of the building industry,
environmental groups, and permit applicants.

(b)
The department, with the advice and assistance of the citizen advisory panel,
shall analyze the development and implementation of the pilot project and
assess whether it merits continued and expanded application to additional
jurisdictions. This analysis shall consider whether the pilot project results in
enhanced environmental protection, cost-effectiveness to both the state and the
participating county, and efficient service delivery to applicants. The
department and the advisory panel shall report the results of the pilot project
to the legislature by December 31, 2002. This section expires June 30, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of this section to provide an interagency forum for the discussion
of significant issues related to the permitting processes and use
authorizations for projects that are proposed on state-owned aquatic lands
where there are multiple permits, programs, and legal authorities involved.

(2)
It is a goal of this section to encourage all agencies and local governments
involved in issuing permits or granting use authorizations for a single project
on state-owned aquatic lands to communicate with each other on a timely basis
and early in the project review process in order to maximize coordination,
facilitate problem resolution, promote the effectiveness of permit decisions,
and enhance citizen understanding and involvement in the permit process. It is
also a goal of this section that all permitting or authorizing federal and
state agencies, local governments, and tribal governments be involved in
coordinating their respective roles related to permits or use authorizations
from the outset of any review process.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "aquatic lands" means as it is
defined in RCW 79.90.010.

(4)
The applicant may submit a joint aquatic resource permit application to the
department if a project proposed for the use of state-owned aquatic lands
requires:

(a)
A hydraulic project approval under chapter 75.20 RCW;

(b)
A wastewater discharge permit under chapter 90.48 RCW, or a federal clean water
act section 401 certification; and

(c)
A substantial development permit under chapter 90.58 RCW.

(5)
If requested by the applicant, the department shall facilitate a project
scoping meeting including the project applicant, the department, the department
of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the local
governments in whose jurisdiction the project is proposed. Federal agencies
and tribal governments that either issue or may require a permit or that may
require a use authorization for the project shall each be invited to name a
representative to participate in the coordinated permit review process for
proposed projects on state-owned aquatic lands. All participating agencies are
encouraged to remain in communication for purposes of coordination throughout
the permit review processes until final permit decisions are made.

(6)
The purpose of the scoping meeting is to share perspectives and identify the
issues and information needs of concern to each participant with regard to the
proposed project, and jointly develop a strategy for coordinating permitting
and issuance of use authorization issues. This project scoping process shall
be concluded within sixty days of the date of receipt of the joint aquatic
resource permit application by the permit assistance center.

(a)
During this review, the participating agencies shall identify:

(i)
The specific information needs and issues of concern and their significance to
each participant with regard to the permitting processes involved;

(ii)
Any statutory or regulatory conflicts that might arise relating to differing
legal authorities and roles of the agencies issuing the permit or use
authorization of the project;

(iii)
Any state or local jurisdiction or private sector liability that might result
from permitting or issuing a use authorization for the project; and

(iv)
Any natural resources, including federal or state listed species, that might be
adversely affected by the permitting or authorizing decision.

(b)
Following this project scoping review, the outcome shall be documented in
written form and furnished to the applicant, and be available to the public.

(c)
Upon completion of this review, the permitting and authorizing agencies and
governments shall proceed according to their respective statutes. Nothing in
this section may prevent the parties from reconvening later in the course of
the permitting or use authorization process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the department is working with state and federal
agencies to address transportation construction and maintenance program impacts
so that these programs meet the requirements of the federal clean water act and
the consultation requirements of the federal endangered species act. The
legislature supports the department's efforts in this regard and encourages the
department to work collaboratively with local governments and other interested
parties during these consultations, and to provide local governments and other
interested parties with opportunity to participate in this process to the
extent practicable.

The
department shall report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the
status of any programmatic consultation developed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the department is working with state and federal
agencies to coordinate the permitting requirements of the federal clean water
act and the consultation requirements of the federal endangered species act.
The legislature supports the department's efforts in this regard and encourages
the department to work collaboratively with local governments and other
interested parties during these consultations, and to provide local governments
and other interested parties with opportunity to participate in this process to
the extent practicable.

The
department shall report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the
status of any programmatic consultation developed under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 75.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the department is working with state and federal
agencies to coordinate the permitting requirements of the federal clean water
act and the consultation requirements of the federal endangered species act.
The legislature supports the department's efforts in this regard and encourages
the department to work collaboratively with local governments and other
interested parties during these consultations, and to provide local governments
and other interested parties with opportunity to participate in this process to
the extent practicable.

The
department shall report by December 1st of each year to the legislature the
status of any programmatic consultation developed under this section.

Sec.
8. 1998
c 286 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

((RCW 36.70B.090 and 64.40.050 shall expire June 30, 2000.))
The provisions of RCW 36.70B.090 and 64.40.050 shall apply to project permit
applications determined to be complete pursuant to RCW 36.70B.070 on or before
June 30, 2000.

---
END ---