BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.19.460 and 1987 c 377 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
schedule of rates or rating plan for automobile liability and physical damage
insurance submitted to or filed with the commissioner shall provide for an
appropriate reduction in premium charges except for underinsured motorist
coverage for those insureds who are fifty-five years of age and older, for a ((two-year))
five-year period after successfully completing a motor vehicle accident
prevention course meeting the criteria of the department of licensing with a
minimum of eight hours, or additional hours as determined by rule of the
department of licensing. An eight-hour program-learning self-instruction
course shall be made available in areas in which a classroom course meeting the
criteria of this section is not offered. The classroom course may be conducted
by a public or private agency approved by the department. The self-instruction
course shall be conducted by an agency approved by the department to conduct
classroom courses under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.19.490 and 1986 c 235 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Each participant shall take an approved course every ((two))
five years to continue to be eligible for the discount on insurance.

---
END ---