BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning July 1, 2001, every traffic enforcement agency in this state shall
provide an annual report to the department, on forms provided by the
department, including the following information:

(a)
The number of individuals stopped for routine traffic enforcement, whether or
not a citation or warning was issued;

(b)
Identifying characteristics of the individual stopped, including the race or
ethnicity, approximate age, and gender;

(c)
The alleged traffic infraction that led to the stop;

(d)
Whether a search was instituted as a result of the stop;

(e)
Whether the vehicle, personal effects, driver, or passenger or passengers were
searched;

(f)
The legal basis for the search, including whether consent was obtained, whether
canine alerted, and whether there was probable cause or reasonable suspicion to
suspect a crime;

(g)
Whether any contraband was discovered in the course of the search;

(h)
What was the contraband and how many or how much of the contraband was found;

(i)
Whether any oral or written citation or warning was issued as a result of the
stop;

(j)
Whether an arrest was made as a result of either the stop or the search; and

(k)
Whether any property was seized under forfeiture laws with a description of
that property.

(2)
It is the duty of the department to compile the information required under
subsection (1) of this section in a manner that is of value in guiding the
policies of the legislature and of those in charge of the apprehension,
prosecution, and treatment of criminals and delinquents, or concerned with the
prevention of crime and delinquency. The report shall include statistics which
are comparable with national uniform criminal statistics published by federal
bureaus or departments.

(3) Data acquired under this section shall be used only for
research or statistical purposes and shall not contain any information that may
reveal the identity of any individual who is stopped or any law enforcement
officer.

---
END ---