BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Outdoor recreation is increasingly important to the citizens of the state of
Washington. A large number of outdoor recreation licenses, permits, and use
fees are required in Washington state from multiple governmental agencies.
These licenses, permits, and use fees are not coordinated in any manner, which
is often confusing and inconvenient to outdoor recreation enthusiasts. A
uniform outdoor recreation permitting system will provide better service to the
citizens of the state by simplifying the procedure for participating in
outdoor recreation. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature that state
agencies involved in outdoor recreation cooperate to develop and implement a
uniform outdoor recreation permitting system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The committee, in cooperation with the parks and recreation commission, the
fish and wildlife commission, and any other interested state agencies, shall
develop and implement a uniform outdoor recreation permitting system. The
uniform outdoor recreation permitting system allows all outdoor recreation
licenses, permits, and use fees to be purchased in the same location with one
fee. The uniform outdoor recreation permitting system will provide a single
form of documentation that will verify which specific outdoor recreation
licenses, permits, or use fees have been purchased.

(2)
For the purposes of this chapter, outdoor recreation licenses, permits, or use
fees include:

(a)
Fees for the use of state park facilities under RCW 79A.05.070(6);

(b)
Winter recreational area parking permits under RCW 79A.05.225;

(c)
Fees for the use of underwater parks under RCW 79A.05.365;

(d)
Water trail recreation program permits under RCW 79A.05.400;

(e)
Fees for the use of the Washington state horse park under RCW 79A.30.040(4);

(f)
Fees for the use of trails designated under chapter 79A.35 RCW;

(g)
Fishing licenses under chapter 75.25 RCW;

(h)
Licenses or permits required under RCW 77.32.010(1) (a) and (g);

(i)
Disabled hunter's permits under RCW 77.32.237;

(j)
Transport tags for game under RCW 77.32.320;

(k)
Supplemental permits or stamps under RCW 77.32.350;

(l)
Conservation licenses under RCW 77.32.380;

(m)
Big game hunting licenses under RCW 77.32.450;

(n)
Small game hunting licenses under RCW 77.32.460;

(o)
Personal use fishing licenses under RCW 77.32.470;

(p)
Reduced rate combination fishing licenses under RCW 77.32.490; or

(q)
Any other outdoor recreation license, permit, or use fee identified by the
committee.

(3)
The uniform outdoor recreation permitting system must take into consideration
that the revenue from different outdoor recreation licenses, permits, and use
fees are dedicated to different funds in the state treasury. The uniform
outdoor recreation permitting system shall not divert any of these revenues
from their intended funds. In developing and implementing the uniform outdoor
recreation permitting system, the committee shall not increase the fee for any
outdoor license or permit, or any outdoor recreation use fee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
committee shall make reasonable efforts to coordinate with local governments to
include any local outdoor recreation licenses, permits, or use fees within the
uniform outdoor recreation permitting system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
committee shall make reasonable efforts to coordinate with the federal government
to include any federal outdoor recreation licenses, permits, or use fees within
the uniform outdoor recreation permitting system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 79A.25 RCW.

---
END ---