BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.49.040 and 1999 c 180 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unlawful
discharge of a laser in the first degree ((or second degree is a civil
infraction)) is a gross misdemeanor if committed by a juvenile who
has not before committed either ((offense)) first or second degree
unlawful discharge of a laser. Unlawful discharge of a laser in the second
degree is a civil infraction if committed by a juvenile who has not before
committed either offense. The monetary penalty imposed upon a juvenile for
a civil infraction may not exceed one hundred dollars.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000, and applies only to offenses committed on or
after that date.

---
END ---