BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
20.01.390 and 1982 c 20 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, every
dealer must pay for agricultural products((, except livestock,))
delivered to him or her at the time and in the manner specified in the
contract with the producer, but if no time is set by such contract, or at the
time of said delivery, then within thirty days from the delivery or taking
possession of such agricultural products.

(2)
Every dealer must pay for livestock delivered to him or her at the time
and in the manner specified in the contract, but if no time is set by such
contract, or at the time of said delivery, then within seven days from the
delivery or taking possession of such livestock. Where payment for livestock
is made by mail, payment is timely if mailed within seven days of the date of
sale.

(3) Every person must pay for apples delivered to the person
within thirty days from the delivery or taking possession of the apples if the
apples are delivered or possessed for retail sale of the apples. The payment
shall be for the full price of the apples and shall be paid in coin or currency
that is the lawful money of the United States or in the form of a cashier's
check, certified check, or bank draft. If the payment is not made within the
thirty-day period prescribed by this subsection, the amount due from the person
shall be the purchase price plus interest at a rate of eight percent per annum
compounded daily. These requirements may not be altered by contract.

---
END ---