BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.20A.050 and 1997 c 386 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature wherever possible to place the internal
affairs of the department under the control of the secretary to institute the
flexible, alert and intelligent management of its business that changing
contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever the secretary's
authority is not specifically limited by law, he or she shall have complete
charge and supervisory powers over the department. The secretary is authorized
to create such administrative structures as deemed appropriate, except as
otherwise specified by law. The secretary shall have the power to employ such
assistants and personnel as may be necessary for the general administration of
the department. Except as elsewhere specified, such employment shall be in accordance
with the rules of the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW.

(2) Further, it is the intent of the legislature that the
department be accountable for operating in an efficient and effective manner.
Therefore, the secretary shall establish performance standards for all
assistant secretaries of the department. The performance standards must
include but not be limited to the management of a division, customer service,
and crisis management. The secretary shall evaluate each assistant secretary annually
and determine if all performance standards are being met. The results of the
evaluations must be made available to the legislature.

---
END ---