BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Using information that the department collects in accordance with RCW
74.13.285, the department shall report to the appropriate legislative
committees the following information:

(a)
The total number of children who are using or have used psychiatric medications
or any other medications used for the purpose of modifying behavior;

(b)
A list of the names of the medications described in (a) of this subsection that
the children use or used;

(c)
When the child began using the medication, if that information is available to
the department; and

(d)
A breakdown by age group of the children and the percentage that the age group
represents as being on the medications described in (a) of this subsection.

(2)
The department shall complete the report by December 15, 2000.

(3)
The report shall only contain nonidentifying information.

(4) The report shall include recommendations by the department as
to how the information contained in the report can be collected on all children
who are in the custody of the state.

---
END ---