BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.34.180 and 1996 c 308 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state and each county, city, and town is responsible for the
prosecution, adjudication, sentencing, and incarceration of misdemeanor and
gross misdemeanor offenses committed by adults in their respective
jurisdictions, and referred from their respective law enforcement agencies,
whether filed under state law or city ordinance, and must carry out these
responsibilities through the use of their own courts, staff, and facilities, or
by entering into contracts or interlocal agreements under this chapter to
provide these services. Nothing in this section is intended to alter the
statutory responsibilities of each county for the prosecution, adjudication,
sentencing, and incarceration for not more than one year of felony offenders,
nor shall this section apply to any offense initially filed by the prosecuting
attorney as a felony offense or an attempt to commit a felony offense.

(2)
The following principles must be followed in negotiating interlocal agreements
or contracts: Cities and counties must consider (a) anticipated costs of
services; and (b) anticipated and potential revenues to fund the services,
including fines and fees, criminal justice funding, and state-authorized sales
tax funding levied for criminal justice purposes.

(3)
If an agreement as to the levels of compensation within an interlocal agreement
or contract for gross misdemeanor and misdemeanor services cannot be reached ((between
a city and county)), then either party may invoke binding arbitration on
the compensation ((issued)) issue by notice to the other party.
In the case of establishing initial compensation, the notice shall request
arbitration within thirty days. In the case of nonrenewal of an existing
contract or interlocal agreement, the notice must be given one hundred twenty
days prior to the expiration of the existing contract or agreement and the
existing contract or agreement remains in effect until a new agreement is
reached or until an arbitration award on the matter of ((fees)) compensation
is made. ((The city and county)) Each party shall select
one arbitrator, and the initial two arbitrators shall pick a third
arbitrator.

(4) For cities or towns that have not adopted, in whole or in part,
criminal code or ordinance provisions related to misdemeanor and gross
misdemeanor crimes as defined by state law, this section shall have no
application until July 1, 1998.

---
END ---