BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that as the state approaches telecommunications deregulation,
telecommunications customers are in need of access to clear pricing information
concerning voice grade telecommunications services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
attorney general shall establish and manage an internet site that serves as a
central information clearinghouse for telecommunications information. The
clearinghouse shall convey telecommunications information to the public in an
easily ascertainable format. The information shall include, without
limitation, information about telecommunications calling plans and pricing for
technologies that permit voice and data telecommunications.

The
attorney general may contract with a private entity or entities to carry out
the requirements of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
central information clearinghouse created in section 2 of this act shall
contain, at a minimum, information concerning the following: Residential and
business calling plans; interstate long distance and intrastate long-distance
calling plans; interlata and intralata calling plans; dial-around plans;
billing increments; applicable variances in costs by time of day or otherwise;
activation or installation fees; monthly charges; and periodic minimum costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. In
order to establish and maintain the central information clearinghouse created
in section 2 of this act, the attorney general may receive certain information
from the commission. The commission shall provide, and maintain the accuracy
of descriptions of, the following information to the attorney general: Federal
and state surcharges and fees; federal and state universal service charges and
fees; an explanation of the alternative titles used by companies to identify
these charges and fees on telephone bills; and information where a customer can
file a complaint.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added to chapter 43.10 RCW.

(2)
Section 4 of this act is added to chapter 80.36 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---