BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales of passenger vehicles that
are designed to use clean fuels as defined in RCW 70.94.015. For the purposes
of this section, "passenger vehicle" means a passenger car as defined
in RCW 46.04.382, or a truck as defined in 46.04.653 with a weight not
exceeding six thousand pounds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use of passenger
vehicles that are designed to use clean fuels as defined in RCW 70.94.015. For
the purposes of this section, "passenger vehicle" is defined as
provided in section 1 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.38.075 and 1983 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to encourage the use of nonpolluting fuels, an annual license fee in lieu
of the tax imposed by RCW 82.38.030 shall be imposed upon the use of natural
gas as defined in this chapter or on liquified petroleum gas, commonly called
propane, which is used in any motor vehicle, as defined in RCW 46.04.320, which
shall be based upon the following schedule as adjusted by the formula set out
below:

VEHICLE TONNAGE (GVW) FEE

0 - 6,000 $
((45)) 0

6,001
- 10,000 $ ((45)) 0

10,001
- 18,000 $ ((80)) 0

18,001
- 28,000 $110

28,001 - 36,000 $150

36,001
and above $250

To
determine the actual annual license fee imposed by this section for a
registration year, the appropriate dollar amount set out in the above schedule
shall be multiplied by the motor vehicle fuel tax rate in cents per gallon as
established by RCW 82.36.025 effective on July 1st of the preceding calendar
year and the product thereof shall be divided by 12 cents.

The
department of licensing, in addition to the foregoing fee, shall charge a
further fee of five dollars as a handling charge for each license issued.

The
director of licensing shall be authorized to prorate the vehicle tonnage fee so
that the annual license required by this section will correspond with the
staggered vehicle licensing system.

A
decal or other identifying device issued upon payment of these annual fees
shall be displayed as prescribed by the department as authority to purchase
this fuel.

Persons
selling or dispensing natural gas or propane may not sell or dispense this fuel
for their own use or the use of others into tanks of vehicles powered by this
fuel which do not display a valid decal or other identifying device as provided
in this section.

Vehicles
registered in jurisdictions outside the state of Washington are exempt from
this section.

Any
person selling or dispensing natural gas or propane into the tank of a motor
vehicle powered by this fuel, except as prescribed in this chapter, is subject
to the penalty provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.120.170 and 1998 c 342 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall administer a system for emission inspections of all motor
vehicles, except those described in RCW 46.16.015(2), that are registered
within the boundaries of each emission contributing area. Under such system a
motor vehicle shall be inspected biennially except where an annual program
would be required to meet federal law and prevent federal sanctions. In
addition, motor vehicles shall be inspected at each change of registered owner
of a licensed vehicle as provided under RCW 46.16.015.

(2)
The director shall:

(a)
Adopt procedures for conducting emission inspections of motor vehicles. The
inspections may include idle and high revolution per minute emission tests.
The emission test for diesel vehicles shall consist solely of a smoke opacity
test.

(b)
Adopt criteria for calibrating emission testing equipment. Electronic
equipment used to test for emissions standards provided for in this chapter
shall be properly calibrated. The department shall examine frequently the
calibration of the emission testing equipment used at the stations.

(c)
Authorize, through contracts, the establishment and operation of inspection
stations for conducting vehicle emission inspections authorized in this
chapter. No person contracted to inspect motor vehicles may perform for
compensation repairs on any vehicles. No public body may establish or operate
contracted inspection stations. Any contracts must be let in accordance with
the procedures established for competitive bids in chapter 43.19 RCW.

(3)
Subsection (2)(c) of this section does not apply to volunteer motor vehicle
inspections under RCW 70.120.020(1) if the inspections are conducted for the
following purposes:

(a)
Auditing;

(b)
Contractor evaluation;

(c)
Collection of data for establishing calibration and performance standards; or

(d)
Public information and education.

(4)(a)
The director shall establish by rule the fee to be charged for emission
inspections. The inspection fee shall be a standard fee applicable state-wide
or throughout an emission contributing area and shall be no greater than
fifteen dollars. Surplus moneys collected from fees over the amount due the
contractor shall be paid to the state and deposited in the general fund,
except that fees collected for the inspection of emissions from motor vehicles
that are six, seven, or eight years old shall be deposited in the air pollution
control account established under RCW 70.94.015. Fees shall be set at the
minimum whole dollar amount required to (i) compensate the contractor or
inspection facility owner, and (ii) offset the general fund appropriation to
the department to cover the administrative costs of the motor vehicle emission
inspection program.

(b)
Before each inspection, a person whose motor vehicle is to be inspected shall
pay to the inspection station the fee established under this section. The
person whose motor vehicle is inspected shall receive the results of the
inspection. If the inspected vehicle complies with the standards established
by the director, the person shall receive a dated certificate of compliance.
If the inspected vehicle does not comply with those standards, one reinspection
of the vehicle shall be afforded without charge.

(5)
All units of local government and agencies of the state with motor vehicles
garaged or regularly operated in an emissions contributing area shall test the
emissions of those vehicles annually to ensure that the vehicle's emissions
comply with the emission standards established by the director. All state
agencies outside of emission contributing areas with more than twenty motor
vehicles housed at a single facility or contiguous facilities shall test the
emissions of those vehicles annually to ensure that the vehicles' emissions
comply with standards established by the director. A report of the results of
the tests shall be submitted to the department.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.94.015 and 1998 c 321 s 33 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The air pollution control account is established in the state treasury. All
receipts collected by or on behalf of the department from RCW 70.94.151(2), and
receipts from nonpermit program sources under RCW 70.94.152(1) and
70.94.154(7), and all receipts from RCW 70.94.650((,)) and 70.94.660((,
82.44.020(2), and 82.50.405)) shall be deposited into the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only to develop and implement the provisions of chapters
70.94 and 70.120 RCW.

(2)
The amounts collected and allocated in accordance with this section shall be
expended upon appropriation except as otherwise provided in this section and in
accordance with the following limitations:

Portions
of moneys received by the department of ecology from the air pollution control
account shall be distributed by the department to local authorities based on:

(a)
The level and extent of air quality problems within such authority's
jurisdiction;

(b)
The costs associated with implementing air pollution regulatory programs by
such authority; and

(c)
The amount of funding available to such authority from other sources, whether
state, federal, or local, that could be used to implement such programs.

(3)
The money deposited in this account from the fees charged for inspection of
emissions under RCW 70.120.170 for motor vehicles that are six, seven, or eight
years old shall be distributed to local air agencies and may only be expended
as matching grants for the funding of infrastructure necessary for the retail
sale of clean fuels. For purposes of this section, "clean fuels"
means alternatives to ordinary gasoline or diesel fuel that do not exceed the
emission standards for passenger cars and light duty trucks as provided in the
federal clean air act amendments of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 7583).

(4) The air operating permit account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected by or on behalf of the
department from permit program sources under RCW 70.94.152(1), 70.94.161,
70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7) shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures
from the account may be used only for the activities described in RCW
70.94.152(1), 70.94.161, 70.94.162, and 70.94.154(7). Moneys in the account
may be spent only after appropriation.

---
END ---