BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.44.053 and 1998 c 233 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The term "reasonable assurance," as used in RCW
50.44.050, means a written, verbal, or implied agreement that the employee will
perform services in the same capacity during the ensuing academic year or term
as in the first academic year or term. "Reasonable assurance"
does not include an agreement that is contingent on enrollment, funding, or
program changes. A person shall not be deemed to be performing services
"in the same capacity" unless those services are rendered under the
same terms or conditions of employment in the ensuing year as in the first
academic year or term.

---
END ---