BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a significant benefit in providing government
services through a competitive system in which both public and private entities
participate. The legislature also finds that updating the state civil service
system and improving the system's classification of jobs to more clearly
distinguish between management and nonmanagement personnel are needed to bring
the system into the twenty-first century.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.06.030 and 1993 c 281 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

A
department of personnel((, governed by the Washington personnel resources
board and administered by a director of personnel,)) is hereby established
as a separate agency within the state government.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.06.070 and 1998 c 245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a)
The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the
legislative branch of the state government including members, officers, and
employees of the legislative council, joint legislative audit and review
committee, statute law committee, and any interim committee of the legislature;

(b)
The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of
the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or
position in the judicial branch of state government;

(c)
Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d)
The officers of the Washington state patrol;

(e)
Elective officers of the state;

(f)
The chief executive officer of each agency;

(g)
In the departments of employment security and social and health services, the
director and the director's confidential secretary; in all other departments,
the executive head of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the
director, his or her confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant
directors;

(h)
In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the
members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or other authority,
serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:

(i)
All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time
basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board,
commission, or committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission,
or committee; and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of the
board, commission, or committee;

(iii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time
basis: The chief executive officer or administrative officer as designated by
the board, commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair
of the board, commission, or committee;

(iv)
If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The
chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive
officer;

(i)
The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate
offices of the elective officers of the state;

(j)
Assistant attorneys general;

(k)
Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l)
Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m)
The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the state printing
plant;

(n)
Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o)
Officers and employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p)
Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q)
Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r)
Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s)
Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t)
((Officers and employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter
15.63 RCW;

(u)))
Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under chapter 15.65
RCW;

(((v)))
(u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under
chapter 67.40 RCW;

(((w)))
(v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor relations
in all state agencies employing such executive assistants including but not
limited to all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards, or other
bodies subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection shall
prevail over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific
exception is made in such law;

(((x)))
(w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads,
assistant directors or division directors, and not more than three principal
policy assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency
heads;

(((y)))
(x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z)
Up to a total of five senior staff positions of the western library network
under chapter 27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing
program management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z)
shall expire on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y)
Staff employed by the department of community, trade, and economic development
to administer energy policy functions and manage energy site evaluation council
activities under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb)))
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy
education, applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW 43.21F.045
as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2)
The following classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of
higher education and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this
chapter:

(a)
Members of the governing board of each institution of higher education and
related boards, all presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential
secretaries, administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and
chairs; academic personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or academic
divisions employed by institutions of higher education; principal assistants to
executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions; other managerial
or professional employees in an institution or related board having substantial
responsibility for directing or controlling program operations and accountable
for allocation of resources and program results, or for the formulation of
institutional policy, or for carrying out personnel administration or labor
relations functions, legislative relations, public information, development,
senior computer systems and network programming, or internal audits and
investigations; and any employee of a community college district whose place of
work is one which is physically located outside the state of Washington and who
is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned to an educational program
operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b)
((Student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board, employed
by institutions of higher education and related boards;

(c))) The
governing board of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt from
this chapter classifications involving research activities, counseling of
students, extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or
publications activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special
training as determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee
engaged in office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be
exempted by the board under this provision;

(((d)))
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.

(3)
In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director of personnel may provide for
further exemptions pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other
appropriate elected official may submit requests for exemption to the ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director of personnel stating the
reasons for requesting such exemptions. The ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director of personnel shall hold a public hearing,
after proper notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the
((board)) director of personnel determines that the position for
which exemption is requested is one involving substantial responsibility for
the formulation of basic agency or executive policy or one involving directing
and controlling program operations of an agency or a major administrative
division thereof, the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director
of personnel shall grant the request and such determination shall be final
as to any decision made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional
exemptions permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards for those agencies not
directly under the authority of any elected public official other than the
governor, and shall not exceed a total of twenty-five for all agencies under
the authority of elected public officials other than the governor.

The
salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted
except for the chief executive officer of each agency, full-time members of
boards and commissions, administrative assistants and confidential secretaries
in the immediate office of an elected state official, and the personnel listed
in subsections (1)(j) through (((v), (y), (z),)) (u) and (x) and
(2) of this section, shall be determined by the ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director of personnel. However, beginning with
changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, changes to the classification
plan affecting exempt salaries must meet the same provisions for classified
salary increases resulting from adjustments to the classification plan as
outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any
person holding a classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall, when and if such position is subsequently exempted from the application
of this chapter, be afforded the following rights: If such person previously
held permanent status in another classified position, such person shall have a
right of reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.

Any
classified employee having civil service status in a classified position who
accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion
to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of similar
nature and salary.

A
person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the position for
gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a
classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.06.110 and 1993 c 281 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created a Washington personnel resources board composed of
three members appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the
senate. The members of the personnel board serving June 30, 1993, shall be the
members of the Washington personnel resources board, and they shall complete
their terms as under the personnel board. Each odd-numbered year thereafter
the governor shall appoint a member for a six-year term. Each member shall
continue to hold office after the expiration of the member's term until a
successor has been appointed. Persons so appointed shall have clearly
demonstrated an interest and belief in the merit principle, shall not hold any
other employment with the state, shall not have been an officer of a political
party for a period of one year immediately prior to such appointment, and shall
not be or become a candidate for partisan elective public office during the
term to which they are appointed;

(2)
Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250. The members of the board may receive any number of daily payments
for official meetings of the board actually attended. Members of the board
shall also be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of their
official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)
At its first meeting following the appointment of all of its members, and
annually thereafter, the board shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among
its members to serve one year. The presence of at least two members of the
board shall constitute a quorum to transact business. A written public record
shall be kept by the board of all actions of the board. The director of
personnel shall serve as secretary.

(4)
The board may appoint and compensate hearing officers to hear and conduct
appeals ((until December 31, 1982)). Such compensation shall be paid on
a contractual basis for each hearing, in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 43.88 RCW and rules adopted pursuant thereto, as they relate to
personal service contracts.

Sec.
5. RCW
41.06.150 and 1999 c 297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((board)) director shall adopt rules, consistent with the
purposes and provisions of this chapter((, as now or hereafter amended,))
and with the best standards of personnel administration, regarding the basis
and procedures to be followed for:

(1)
The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2)
Certification of names for vacancies, including departmental promotions((,
with the number of names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be
filled, such names representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists:
PROVIDED, That when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score
among the names certified, their names shall also be certified));

(3)
Examinations for all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4)
Appointments;

(5)
Training and career development;

(6)
Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary
employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry
level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7)
Transfers;

(8)
Sick leaves and vacations;

(9)
Hours of work;

(10)
Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment((, both according to
seniority));

(11)
Collective bargaining, including:

(a)
Determination of appropriate bargaining units within any agency((:
PROVIDED, That)). In making such determination the ((board))
director shall consider the duties, skills, and working conditions of
the employees, the history of collective bargaining by the employees and their
bargaining representatives, the extent of organization among the employees, and
the desires of the employees. Employees who are members of the Washington
management service may not be included in a bargaining unit;

(((12)))
(b) Certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining
representatives((: PROVIDED, That)) subject to the following:

(i)
After certification of an exclusive bargaining representative and upon the
representative's request, the director shall hold an election among employees
in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to require as a
condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive bargaining
representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning of
employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment constitutes
cause for dismissal((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(ii)
No more often than once in each twelve-month period after expiration of
twelve months following the date of the original election in a bargaining unit
and upon petition of thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the
director shall hold an election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind
such condition of employment((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(iii)
For purposes of this ((clause)) subsection, membership in the
certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment of
monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order)); and

(iv)
To safeguard the right of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona
fide religious tenets or teachings of a church or religious body of which such
public employee is a member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for
purposes within the program of the union as designated by such employee that
would be in harmony with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money
equivalent to regular union dues minus any included monthly premiums for
union-sponsored insurance programs, and such employee shall not be a member of
the union but is entitled to all the representation rights of a union member;

(((13)))
(c)(i) Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining
representatives providing for grievance procedures and collective negotiations
on all personnel matters over which the appointing authority of the appropriate
bargaining unit of such agency may lawfully exercise discretion, except that
collective negotiations are not permitted over wages or wage-related matters,
management rights, or an agency's decision to purchase services by contract. A
provision of a collective bargaining agreement that conflicts with a rule
adopted under this chapter or a statute is invalid and unenforceable.

(ii)
For the purposes of this subsection, "management rights" includes,
in addition to all powers, duties, and rights established by constitutional
provision or statute, at least the following:

(A)
The functions and programs of the agency, the use of technology, and the
structure of the organization;

(B)
The agency's budget and the size of the agency work force, including
determining the financial basis for layoffs;

(C)
The right to direct and supervise employees; and

(D)
The right to take whatever actions are deemed necessary to carry out the
mission of the state and its agencies during emergencies;

(((14)))
(d) Authorization for written agreements ((may)) to
contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee organization dues upon
authorization by the employee member and for the cancellation of such payroll
deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice by the employee with the
appointing authority and the employee organization((: PROVIDED, That));

(e)
Nothing contained ((herein)) in this chapter permits or
grants to any employee the right to strike or refuse to perform his or her
official duties;

(((15)))
(12) Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan for
all positions in the classified service, based on investigation and analysis of
the duties and responsibilities of each such position.

(a)
The ((board)) director shall not adopt job classification
revisions or class studies unless implementation of the proposed revision or
study will result in net cost savings, increased efficiencies, or improved
management of personnel or services, and the proposed revision or study has
been approved by the director of financial management in accordance with
chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b)
Beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the requirements
of (a) of this subsection:

(i)
The board may approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only
if:

(A)
The implementation will not result in additional net costs and the proposed
implementation has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B)
The implementation will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of
all such actions approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature
specifically for this purpose; or

(C)
The implementation is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are
defined as emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions
necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general
welfare, which do not exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section
718(2), chapter 18, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii)
The board shall approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments
to the classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and
retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii)
Adjustments made to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt
from (b)(i) ((through)) and (ii) of this subsection.

(c)
Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented
during the 1997-99 and subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this
subsection and RCW 41.06.152;

(((16)))
(13) Allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification
plan;

(((17)))
(14) Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the
prevailing rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental
units but the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if
necessary to attain comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW
41.06.155 and that, for institutions of higher education and related boards,
shall be competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the
locality in which an institution of higher education or related board is
located, such adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of
financial management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(((18)))
(15) Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade
based on length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are
such as to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(((19)))
(16) Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency
director, whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary
move in accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency
must provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person
receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the
state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good
cause as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the
employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation
from the person;

(((20)))
(17) Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing
statutes, with recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent
reemployment for veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible
veterans and their surviving spouses additional credit in computing their
seniority by adding to their unbroken state service, as defined by the ((board))
director, the veteran's service in the military not to exceed five
years. For the purposes of this section, "veteran" means any person
who has one or more years of active military service in any branch of the armed
forces of the United States or who has less than one year's service and is
discharged with a disability incurred in the line of duty or is discharged at
the convenience of the government and who, upon termination of such service has
received an honorable discharge, a discharge for physical reasons with an
honorable record, or a release from active military service with evidence of
service other than that for which an undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable
discharge shall be given: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a
veteran is entitled to the benefits of this section regardless of the veteran's
length of active military service: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of
this section "veteran" does not include any person who has
voluntarily retired with twenty or more years of active military service and
whose military retirement pay is in excess of five hundred dollars per month;

(((21)))
(18) Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint,
reduce, dismiss, suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if such
agency heads do not have specific statutory authority to so delegate:
PROVIDED, That the ((board)) director may not authorize such
delegation to any position lower than the head of a major subdivision of the
agency;

(((22)))
(19) Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified
positions before July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment,
transfer, and promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this
chapter;

(((23)))
(20) Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer,
recruitment, training, and career development; development and implementation
of affirmative action goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against
those goals and timetables.

The
((board)) director shall consult with the human rights commission
in the development of rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department
of personnel shall transmit a report annually to the human rights commission
which states the progress each state agency has made in meeting affirmative
action goals and timetables.

Sec.
6. RCW
41.06.152 and 1999 c 309 s 914 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall adopt only those job classification revisions, class studies,
and salary adjustments under RCW 41.06.150(((15))) (12) that:

(a)
Are due to documented recruitment and retention difficulties, salary
compression or inversion, increased duties and responsibilities, or
inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as similar work
assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater than 7.5
percent; and

(b)
Are such that the office of financial management has reviewed the agency's
fiscal impact statement and has concurred that the agency can absorb the
biennialized cost of the reclassification, class study, or salary adjustment
within the agency's current authorized level of funding for the current fiscal
biennium and subsequent fiscal biennia.

(2)
In addition to reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the board may approve other
reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments that meet the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section and have been approved under
the procedures established under this subsection.

Before
the department of personnel's biennial budget request is due to the office of
financial management, the board shall prioritize requests for
reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments for the next fiscal
biennium. The board shall prioritize according to such criteria as are
developed by the board consistent with RCW 41.06.150(((15))) (12)(a).

The
board shall submit the prioritized list to the governor's office and the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate at the same time the department
of personnel's biennial budget request is submitted. The office of financial
management shall review the biennial cost of each proposed salary adjustment on
the board's prioritized list.

In
the biennial appropriations acts, the legislature may establish a level of
funding, from the state general fund and other accounts, to be applied by the
board to the prioritized list. Upon enactment of the appropriations act, the
board may approve reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments only
to the extent that the total cost does not exceed the level of funding
established in the appropriations acts and the board's actions are consistent
with the priorities established in the list. The legislature may also specify
or otherwise limit in the appropriations act the implementation dates for
actions approved by the board under this section.

(3)
When the board develops its priority list in the 1999-2001 biennium, for
increases proposed for funding in the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall give
top priority to proposed increases to address documented recruitment and
retention increases, and shall give lowest priority to proposed increases to
recognize increased duties and responsibilities. When the board submits its
prioritized list for the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall also provide: A
comparison of any differences between the salary increases recommended by the
department of personnel staff and those adopted by the board; a review of any
salary compression, inversion, or inequities that would result from
implementing a recommended increase; and a complete description of the
information relied upon by the board in adopting its proposals and priorities.

(4)
This section does not apply to the higher education hospital special pay plan
or to any adjustments to the classification plan under RCW 41.06.150(((15)))
(12) that are due to emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are
defined as emergency conditions requiring the establishment of positions
necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general
welfare.

Sec.
7. RCW
41.06.160 and 1993 c 281 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In preparing classification and salary schedules as set forth in RCW 41.06.150
((as now or hereafter amended)), the department of personnel
shall give full consideration to prevailing rates in other public employment
and in private employment in this state. ((For this purpose)) The
department shall ((undertake comprehensive salary and fringe benefit
surveys, with such surveys to be conducted in the year prior to the convening
of every other one hundred five day regular session of the state legislature.
In the year prior to the convening of each one hundred five day regular session
during which a comprehensive salary and fringe benefit survey is not conducted,
the department shall plan and conduct a trend salary and fringe benefit
survey. This survey shall measure average salary and fringe benefit movement
for broad occupational groups which has occurred since the last comprehensive
salary and fringe benefit survey was conducted. The results of each
comprehensive and trend salary and fringe benefit survey)) use an
appropriate mix of data gathered from surveys conducted by the department and
from surveys conducted by other entities to determine the prevailing rates.
The prevailing rate results shall be ((completed and)) forwarded by
September ((30)) 30th of each even-numbered year with a
recommended state salary schedule to the governor and director of financial management
for their use in preparing budgets to be submitted to the succeeding
legislature. ((A copy of the data and supporting documentation shall be
furnished by the department of personnel)) The information shall also be
forwarded to the standing committees for appropriations of the senate and
house of representatives.

((In
the case of comprehensive salary and fringe benefit surveys, the department
shall furnish the following supplementary data in support of its recommended
salary schedule:

(1)
A total dollar figure which reflects the recommended increase or decrease in
state salaries as a direct result of the specific salary and fringe benefit
survey that has been conducted and which is categorized to indicate what
portion of the increase or decrease is represented by salary survey data and
what portion is represented by fringe benefit survey data;

(2)
An additional total dollar figure which reflects the impact of recommended
increases or decreases to state salaries based on other factors rather than
directly on prevailing rate data obtained through the survey process and which
is categorized to indicate the sources of the requests for deviation from
prevailing rates and the reasons for the changes;

(3)
A list of class codes and titles indicating recommended monthly salary ranges
for all state classes under the control of the department of personnel with
those salary ranges which do not substantially conform to the prevailing rates
developed from the salary and fringe benefit survey distinctly marked and an
explanation of the reason for the deviation included;

(4)
A supplemental salary schedule which indicates the additional salary to be paid
state employees for hazardous duties or other considerations requiring extra
compensation under specific circumstances. Additional compensation for these
circumstances shall not be included in the basic salary schedule but shall be
maintained as a separate pay schedule for purposes of full disclosure and
visibility; and

(5)
A supplemental salary schedule which indicates those cases where the board
determines that prevailing rates do not provide similar salaries for positions
that require or impose similar responsibilities, judgment, knowledge, skills,
and working conditions. This supplementary salary schedule shall contain
proposed salary adjustments necessary to eliminate any such dissimilarities in
compensation. Additional compensation needed to eliminate such salary
dissimilarities shall not be included in the basic salary schedule but shall be
maintained as a separate salary schedule for purposes of full disclosure and
visibility.

It
is the intention of the legislature that requests for funds to support
recommendations for salary deviations from the prevailing rate survey data
shall be kept to a minimum, and that the requests be fully documented when
forwarded by the department of personnel.))

(2)
Salary and fringe benefit survey information collected from private employers
which identifies a specific employer with the salary and fringe benefit rates
which that employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public
disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

((The first comprehensive salary and fringe benefit survey
required by this section shall be completed and forwarded to the governor and
the director of financial management by September 30, 1986. The first trend
salary and fringe benefit survey required by this section shall be completed
and forwarded to the governor and the director of financial management by
September 30, 1988.))

Sec.
8. RCW
41.06.167 and 1991 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of personnel shall undertake comprehensive compensation surveys for
officers and entry-level officer candidates of the Washington state patrol,
with such surveys to be conducted in the year prior to the convening of every
other one hundred five day regular session of the state legislature. ((In
the year prior to the convening of each one hundred five day regular session
during which a comprehensive compensation survey is not conducted, the
department shall conduct a trend compensation survey. This survey shall
measure average compensation movement which has occurred since the last
comprehensive compensation survey was conducted. The results of each
comprehensive and trend survey shall be completed and forwarded by September
30th, after review and preparation of recommendations by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, to the governor and director of financial management
for their use in preparing budgets to be submitted to the succeeding
legislature. A copy of the data and supporting documentation shall be
furnished by the department of personnel to the legislative transportation
committee and the standing committees for appropriations of the senate and
house of representatives. The office of financial management shall analyze the
survey results and conduct investigations which may be necessary to arbitrate differences
between interested parties regarding the accuracy of collected survey data and
the use of such data for salary adjustment.

Surveys
conducted by the department of personnel for the Washington state patrol shall
be undertaken in a manner consistent with statistically accurate sampling
techniques, including comparisons of medians, base ranges, and weighted
averages of salaries. The surveys shall compare competitive labor markets of
law enforcement officers. This service performed by the department of
personnel shall be on a reimbursable basis in accordance with the provisions of
RCW 41.06.080.

A
comprehensive compensation survey plan and the recommendations of the chief of
the Washington state patrol shall be submitted jointly by the department of
personnel and the Washington state patrol to the director of financial
management, the legislative transportation committee, the committee on ways and
means of the senate, and the committee on appropriations of the house of
representatives six months before the beginning of each periodic survey.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
This chapter does not prohibit any agency, as defined in RCW 41.06.020, or
institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, or related board,
from purchasing services by contract with individuals, nonprofit organizations,
businesses, or other entities.

(2)(a)
An agency or institution of higher education that intends to purchase services
by contract must notify an exclusive bargaining representative who represents
any employee whose employment status will be directly affected by the contract.
The exclusive bargaining representative shall have the right to offer
alternatives to the proposed contract and such alternatives must be considered
by the agency or institution of higher education in making the final decision
to contract for services.

(b)
This subsection (2)(b) does not apply to the purchase of services or to any
contracting for services that was authorized by law before the effective date
of this section.

Sec.
10. RCW
41.06.170 and 1993 c 281 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((board or)) director, in the adoption of rules governing
suspensions for cause, shall not authorize an appointing authority to suspend
an employee for more than fifteen calendar days as a single penalty or more
than thirty calendar days in any one calendar year as an accumulation of
several penalties. The ((board or)) director shall require that the
appointing authority give written notice to the employee not later than one day
after the suspension takes effect, stating the reasons for and the duration
thereof.

(2)
Any employee who is reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted, after completing
his or her probationary period of service as provided by the rules of the ((board))
director, or any employee who is adversely affected by a violation of
the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, or rules adopted under it,
shall have the right to appeal ((to the personnel appeals board created by
RCW 41.64.010)) not later than thirty days after the effective date of such
action to the personnel appeals board. The employee shall be furnished
with specified charges in writing when a reduction, dismissal, suspension, or
demotion action is taken. Such appeal shall be in writing.

(3)
Any employee whose position has been exempted after July 1, 1993, shall have
the right to appeal ((to the personnel appeals board created by RCW
41.64.010)) not later than thirty days after the effective date of such
action to the personnel appeals board.

(4)
An employee incumbent in a position at the time of its allocation or
reallocation, or the agency utilizing the position, may appeal the allocation
or reallocation to the personnel appeals board ((created by RCW 41.64.010)).
Notice of such appeal must be filed in writing within thirty days of the action
from which appeal is taken.

Sec.
11. RCW
41.06.170 and 2000 c . . . s 10 (section 10 of this act) are each
amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director, in the adoption of rules governing suspensions for cause, shall
not authorize an appointing authority to suspend an employee for more than
fifteen calendar days as a single penalty or more than thirty calendar days in
any one calendar year as an accumulation of several penalties. The director
shall require that the appointing authority give written notice to the employee
not later than one day after the suspension takes effect, stating the reasons
for and the duration thereof.

(2)
Any employee who is reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted, after completing
his or her probationary period of service as provided by the rules of the
director, or any employee who is adversely affected by a violation of the state
civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, or rules adopted under it, shall have the
right to appeal, either individually or through the employee's authorized
representative, not later than thirty days after the effective date of such
action to the Washington personnel ((appeals)) resources
board. The employee shall be furnished with specified charges in writing when
a reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion action is taken. Such appeal
shall be in writing. The board shall furnish the agency concerned with a
copy of the appeal in advance of the hearing. The board or hearings officer
will process an appeal, or a review of a hearings officer's recommended
decision, if any, as quickly as is feasible to provide prompt resolution of the
appeal.

(3)
Any employee whose position has been exempted after July 1, 1993, shall have
the right to appeal, either individually or through the employee's
authorized representative, not later than thirty days after the effective
date of such action to the Washington personnel ((appeals)) resources
board.

(4)
An employee incumbent in a position at the time of its allocation or
reallocation, or the agency utilizing the position, may appeal the allocation
or reallocation to the Washington personnel ((appeals)) resources
board. Notice of such appeal must be filed in writing within thirty days of
the action from which appeal is taken.

(5)
The board may consolidate two or more appeals when the cases present issues
appropriate for joint resolution.

(6)
A decision of the Washington personnel resources board under subsection (3) or
(4) of this section is final and not subject to appeal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
The board may appoint, following consultation with employee organizations and
employing agencies, one or more hearings officers to conduct hearings and make
recommended decisions in accordance with rules adopted by the board. The
hearings officer shall conduct hearings in the same manner and shall have the
same authority as provided in hearings by the board. The recommended decision
must be forthwith served upon the parties and transmitted to the board.

(2)(a)
Within thirty days of service of the recommended decision of a hearings
officer, any party adversely affected may request the board to review the
recommended decision. The request for review must include a statement of the
issues to which the party takes exception. The board's review is limited to
the stated issues and the requesting party is deemed to have waived all
objections or irregularities not specifically stated in the request. The
requesting party must provide written argument in support of the exceptions and
may, at the discretion of the board, provide oral argument. The board's
decision is subject to section 14 of this act.

(b)
If a request for review of a hearings officer's decision is not filed as
required by this section, the recommended decision of the hearings officer
shall be adopted by the board as the board's decision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. (1)
Hearings on appeals under this chapter shall be open to the public, except for
cases in which the board determines there is substantial reason for not having
an open hearing or in cases where the employee so requests, and shall be
informal with technical rules of evidence not applying to the proceedings
except the rules of privilege recognized by law. Both the employee and his or
her employing agency shall be notified reasonably in advance of the hearing and
may select representatives of their choosing, present and cross‑examine
witnesses, and give evidence before the board.

(2)
Members of the board or the executive secretary may, and shall at the request
of either party, issue subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum. All testimony
shall be on oath administered by a member of the board. The board shall
certify to the superior court the facts of any refusals to obey a subpoena,
take the oath, or testify. The court shall summarily hear the evidence on the
refusal and, if the evidence warrants, punish the refusal in the same manner
and to the same extent as for contempt committed before, or in connection with the
proceedings of, the court.

(3)
The board shall prepare an official record of the hearing, including all
testimony, recorded manually or by mechanical device, and exhibits, but the
board may not be required to transcribe the record unless requested by the
employee, who shall be furnished with a complete transcript upon payment of a
reasonable charge. However, payment of the cost of a transcript used on appeal
shall await determination of the appeal and shall be made by the employing
agency if the employee prevails.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. (1)
Within sixty days after the conclusion of an appeal hearing under this chapter,
the board shall make and fully record in its permanent records the following:
(a) Findings of fact; (b) conclusions of law when the construction of a rule,
regulation, or statute is in question; (c) reasons for the action taken; and
(d) the board's order based thereon. The order is final and not appealable to
court, except as provided in section 15 of this act.

(2)
The board shall simultaneously send a copy of the findings, conclusions, and
order by certified mail to the employing agency and to the employee or the
employee's designated representative.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1) Within
thirty days after the mailing of a recorded order under section 13 of this act,
the employee may appeal a decision and order of the board made under RCW
41.06.170(2) to the superior court of Thurston county on one or more of the
grounds that the order was:

(a)
Founded on or contained an error of law, which shall specifically include error
in construction or application of any pertinent rules or regulations;

(b)
Contrary to a preponderance of the evidence as disclosed by the entire record
with respect to any specified finding or findings of fact;

(c)
Materially affected by unlawful procedure;

(d)
Based on violation of any constitutional provision; or

(e)
Arbitrary or capricious.

(2)
The grounds for appeal shall be stated in a written notice of appeal filed with
the court, with copies thereof served on the director of personnel or a member
of his or her staff or a member of the board and on the employing agency, all
within the time stated.

(3)
Within thirty days after service of a notice of appeal, or within such further
time as the court may allow, the board shall transmit to the court a certified
transcript, with exhibits, of the hearing; but by stipulation between the
employing agency and the employee the transcript may be shortened, and either
party unreasonably refusing to stipulate to such limitation may be ordered by
the court to pay the additional cost involved. The court may require or permit
subsequent corrections or additions to the transcript.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. (1)
The court shall review the hearing without a jury on the basis of the
transcript and exhibits, except that in case of alleged irregularities in
procedure before the board not shown by the transcript the court may order
testimony to be given thereon. The court shall upon request by either party
hear oral argument and receive written briefs.

(2)
The court may affirm the order of the board, remand the matter for further
proceedings before the board, or reverse or modify the order if it finds that
the objection thereto is well taken on any of the grounds stated. Appellate
review of the order of the superior court may be sought as in other civil
cases.

Sec.
17. RCW
41.06.186 and 1993 c 281 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((Washington personnel resources board)) director shall adopt
rules designed to terminate the state employment of any employee whose
performance is so inadequate as to warrant termination.

Sec.
18. RCW
41.06.196 and 1993 c 281 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((Washington personnel resources board)) director shall adopt
rules designed to remove from supervisory positions those supervisors who in
violation of the rules adopted under RCW 41.06.186 have tolerated the continued
employment of employees under their supervision whose performance has warranted
termination from state employment.

Sec.
19. RCW
41.06.270 and 1979 c 151 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

A
disbursing officer shall not pay any employee holding a position covered by
this chapter unless the employment is in accordance with this chapter or the
rules, regulations and orders issued hereunder. The ((board and the))
directors of personnel and financial management shall jointly
establish procedures for the certification of payrolls.

Sec.
20. RCW
41.06.350 and 1993 c 281 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((Washington personnel resources board)) director is authorized
to receive federal funds now available or hereafter made available for the
assistance and improvement of public personnel administration, which may be
expended in addition to the department of personnel service fund established by
RCW 41.06.280.

Sec.
21. RCW
41.06.400 and 1980 c 118 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to other powers and duties specified in this chapter, the ((board))
director shall, by rule, prescribe the purpose and minimum standards for
training and career development programs and, in so doing, regularly consult
with and consider the needs of individual agencies and employees.

(2)
In addition to other powers and duties specified in this chapter, the director
shall:

(a)
Provide for the evaluation of training and career development programs and
plans of agencies ((based on minimum standards established by the board)).
The director shall report the results of such evaluations to the agency which
is the subject of the evaluation;

(b)
Provide training and career development programs which may be conducted more
efficiently and economically on an interagency basis;

(c)
Promote interagency sharing of resources for training and career development;

(d)
Monitor and review the impact of training and career development programs to
ensure that the responsibilities of the state to provide equal employment
opportunities are diligently carried out. ((The director shall report to
the board the impact of training and career development programs on the
fulfillment of such responsibilities.))

(3)
At an agency's request, the director may provide training and career
development programs for an agency's internal use which may be conducted more
efficiently and economically by the department of personnel.

Sec.
22. RCW
41.06.410 and 1980 c 118 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
agency subject to the provisions of this chapter shall:

(1)
Prepare an employee training and career development plan which shall at least
meet minimum standards established by the ((board)) director. A
copy of such plan shall be submitted to the director for purposes of
administering the provisions of RCW 41.06.400(2);

(2)
Provide for training and career development for its employees in accordance
with the agency plan;

(3)
Report on its training and career development program operations and costs to
the director in accordance with reporting procedures adopted by the ((board))
director;

(4)
Budget for training and career development in accordance with procedures of the
office of financial management.

Sec.
23. RCW
41.06.450 and 1993 c 281 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((By January 1, 1983, the Washington personnel resources board)) The
director shall adopt rules applicable to each agency to ensure that
information relating to employee misconduct or alleged misconduct is destroyed
or maintained as follows:

(a)
All such information determined to be false and all such information in
situations where the employee has been fully exonerated of wrongdoing, shall be
promptly destroyed;

(b)
All such information having no reasonable bearing on the employee's job performance
or on the efficient and effective management of the agency, shall be promptly
destroyed;

(c)
All other information shall be retained only so long as it has a reasonable
bearing on the employee's job performance or on the efficient and effective
management of the agency.

(2)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an agency may retain
information relating to employee misconduct or alleged misconduct if:

(a)
The employee requests that the information be retained; or

(b)
The information is related to pending legal action or legal action may be
reasonably expected to result.

(3)
In adopting rules under this section, the ((Washington personnel resources
board)) director shall consult with the public disclosure commission
to ensure that the public policy of the state, as expressed in chapter 42.17
RCW, is adequately protected.

Sec.
24. RCW
41.06.475 and 1993 c 281 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((Washington personnel resources board)) director shall adopt
rules, in cooperation with the secretary of social and health services, for the
background investigation of persons being considered for state employment in
positions directly responsible for the supervision, care, or treatment of
children or developmentally disabled persons.

Sec.
25. RCW
41.06.490 and 1990 c 204 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the rules adopted under RCW 41.06.150, the ((board)) director
shall adopt rules establishing a state employee return-to-work program. The
program shall, at a minimum:

(a)
Direct each agency to adopt a return-to-work policy. The program shall allow
each agency program to take into consideration the special nature of employment
in the agency;

(b)
Provide for eligibility in the return-to-work program, for a minimum of two
years from the date the temporary disability commenced, for any permanent
employee who is receiving compensation under RCW 51.32.090 and who is, by
reason of his or her temporary disability, unable to return to his or her
previous work, but who is physically capable of carrying out work of a lighter
or modified nature;

(c)
Allow opportunity for return-to-work state-wide when appropriate job
classifications are not available in the agency that is the appointing
authority at the time of injury;

(d)
Require each agency to name an agency representative responsible for
coordinating the return-to-work program of the agency;

(e)
Provide that applicants receiving appointments for classified service receive
an explanation of the return-to-work policy;

(f)
Require training of supervisors on implementation of the return-to-work policy,
including but not limited to assessment of the appropriateness of the
return-to-work job for the employee; and

(g)
Coordinate participation of applicable employee assistance programs, as
appropriate.

(2)
The agency full-time equivalents necessary to implement the return-to-work
program established under this section shall be used only for the purposes of the
return-to-work program and the net increase in full-time equivalents shall be
temporary.

Sec.
26. RCW
41.06.500 and 1996 c 319 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 41.06.070, notwithstanding any other provisions of
this chapter, the director is authorized to adopt, after consultation with
state agencies and employee organizations, rules for managers as defined in RCW
41.06.022. These rules shall not apply to managers employed by institutions of
higher education or related boards or whose positions are exempt. The rules
shall govern recruitment, appointment, classification and allocation of
positions, examination, training and career development, hours of work,
probation, certification, compensation, transfer, affirmative action,
promotion, layoff, reemployment, performance appraisals, discipline, and any
and all other personnel practices for managers. These rules shall be separate
from rules adopted by the board for other employees, and to the extent that the
rules adopted apply only to managers shall take precedence over rules adopted
by the board, and are not subject to review by the board.

(2)
In establishing rules for managers, the director shall adhere to the following
goals:

(a)
Development of a simplified classification system that facilitates movement of
managers between agencies and promotes upward mobility;

(b)
Creation of a compensation system consistent with the policy set forth in RCW
41.06.150(((17))) (14). The system shall provide flexibility in
setting and changing salaries, and shall require review and approval by the
director in the case of any salary changes greater than five percent proposed
for any group of employees;

(c)
Establishment of a performance appraisal system that emphasizes individual
accountability for program results and efficient management of resources;
effective planning, organization, and communication skills; valuing and
managing workplace diversity; development of leadership and interpersonal
abilities; and employee development;

(d)
Strengthening management training and career development programs that build
critical management knowledge, skills, and abilities; focusing on managing and
valuing workplace diversity; empowering employees by enabling them to share in
workplace decision making and to be innovative, willing to take risks, and able
to accept and deal with change; promoting a workplace where the overall focus
is on the recipient of the government services and how these services can be
improved; and enhancing mobility and career advancement opportunities;

(e)
Permitting flexible recruitment and hiring procedures that enable agencies to
compete effectively with other employers, both public and private, for managers
with appropriate skills and training; allowing consideration of all qualified
candidates for positions as managers; and achieving affirmative action goals
and diversity in the workplace;

(f)
Providing that managers may only be reduced, dismissed, suspended, or demoted
for cause; and

(g)
Facilitating decentralized and regional administration.

Sec.
27. RCW
41.64.090 and 1993 c 281 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall have jurisdiction to decide appeals filed on or after July 1,
1981, and before July 1, 2001, of employees under the jurisdiction of
the Washington personnel resources board pursuant to RCW 41.06.170((, as now
or hereafter amended)).

(2)
The board shall have jurisdiction to decide appeals filed on or after July 1,
1993, and before July 1, 2001, of employees of institutions of higher
education and related boards under the jurisdiction of the Washington personnel
resources board pursuant to RCW 41.06.170. An appeal under this subsection by
an employee of an institution of higher education or a related board shall be
held in the county in which the institution is located or the county in which
the person was employed when the appeal was filed.

Sec.
28. RCW
28B.12.060 and 1994 c 130 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
higher education coordinating board shall adopt rules as may be necessary or
appropriate for effecting the provisions of this chapter, and not in conflict
with this chapter, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the
state higher education administrative procedure act. Such rules shall include
provisions designed to make employment under the work-study program reasonably
available, to the extent of available funds, to all eligible students in
eligible post-secondary institutions in need thereof. The rules shall include:

(1)
Providing work under the state work-study program that will not result in the
displacement of employed workers or impair existing contracts for services;

(2)
Furnishing work only to a student who:

(a)
Is capable, in the opinion of the eligible institution, of maintaining good
standing in such course of study while employed under the program covered by
the agreement; and

(b)
Has been accepted for enrollment as at least a half-time student at the
eligible institution or, in the case of a student already enrolled in and
attending the eligible institution, is in good standing and in at least
half-time attendance there either as an undergraduate, graduate or professional
student; and

(c)
Is not pursuing a degree in theology;

(3)
Placing priority on providing:

(a)
Work opportunities for students who are residents of the state of Washington as
defined in RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013 except resident students defined in
RCW 28B.15.012(2)(e);

(b)
Job placements in fields related to each student's academic or vocational
pursuits, with an emphasis on off-campus job placements whenever appropriate;
and

(c)
Off-campus community service placements;

(4)
Provisions to assure that in the state institutions of higher education,
utilization of this work-study program:

(a)
Shall only supplement and not supplant classified positions under jurisdiction
of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(b)
That all positions established which are comparable shall be identified to a
job classification under the ((Washington personnel resources board's)) director
of personnel's classification plan and shall receive equal compensation;

(c)
Shall not take place in any manner that would replace classified positions
reduced due to lack of funds or work; and

(d)
That work study positions shall only be established at entry level positions of
the classified service unless the overall scope and responsibilities of the
position indicate a higher level; and

(5)
Provisions to encourage job placements in occupations that meet Washington's
economic development goals, especially those in international trade and
international relations. The board shall permit appropriate job placements in
other states and other countries.

Sec.
29. RCW
34.05.030 and 1994 c 39 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter shall not apply to:

(a)
The state militia, or

(b)
The board of clemency and pardons, or

(c)
The department of corrections or the indeterminate sentencing review board with
respect to persons who are in their custody or are subject to the jurisdiction
of those agencies.

(2)
The provisions of RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 shall not apply:

(a)
To adjudicative proceedings of the board of industrial insurance appeals except
as provided in RCW 7.68.110 and 51.48.131;

(b)
Except for actions pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, to the denial, suspension, or
revocation of a driver's license by the department of licensing;

(c)
To the department of labor and industries where another statute expressly
provides for review of adjudicative proceedings of a department action, order,
decision, or award before the board of industrial insurance appeals;

(d)
To actions of the Washington personnel resources board((,)) or
the director of personnel((, or the personnel appeals board)); or

(e)
To the extent they are inconsistent with any provisions of chapter 43.43 RCW.

(3)
Unless a party makes an election for a formal hearing pursuant to RCW 82.03.140
or 82.03.190, RCW 34.05.410 through 34.05.598 do not apply to a review hearing
conducted by the board of tax appeals.

(4)
The rule-making provisions of this chapter do not apply to reimbursement unit
values, fee schedules, arithmetic conversion factors, and similar arithmetic
factors used to determine payment rates that apply to goods and services
purchased under contract for clients eligible under chapter 74.09 RCW.

(5)
All other agencies, whether or not formerly specifically excluded from the
provisions of all or any part of the Administrative Procedure Act, shall be
subject to the entire act.

Sec.
30. RCW
34.12.020 and 1995 c 331 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Office" means the office of administrative hearings.

(2)
"Administrative law judge" means any person appointed by the chief
administrative law judge to conduct or preside over hearings as provided in
this chapter.

(3)
"Hearing" means an adjudicative proceeding within the meaning of RCW
34.05.010(1) conducted by a state agency under RCW 34.05.413 through 34.05.476.

(4)
"State agency" means any state board, commission, department, or
officer authorized by law to make rules or to conduct adjudicative proceedings,
except those in the legislative or judicial branches, the growth management
hearings boards, the utilities and transportation commission, the pollution
control hearings board, the shorelines hearings board, the forest practices
appeals board, the environmental hearings office, the board of industrial
insurance appeals, the Washington personnel resources board, the public
employment relations commission, ((the personnel appeals board,)) and
the board of tax appeals.

Sec.
31. RCW
41.04.340 and 1998 c 254 s 1 and 1998 c 116 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
An attendance incentive program is established for all eligible employees. As
used in this section the term "eligible employee" means any employee
of the state, other than eligible employees of the community and technical
colleges and the state board for community and technical colleges identified in
RCW 28B.50.553, and teaching and research faculty at the state and regional
universities and The Evergreen State College, entitled to accumulate sick leave
and for whom accurate sick leave records have been maintained. No employee may
receive compensation under this section for any portion of sick leave
accumulated at a rate in excess of one day per month. The state and regional
universities and The Evergreen State College shall maintain complete and
accurate sick leave records for all teaching and research faculty.

(2)
In January of the year following any year in which a minimum of sixty days of
sick leave is accrued, and each January thereafter, any eligible employee may
receive remuneration for unused sick leave accumulated in the previous year at
a rate equal to one day's monetary compensation of the employee for each four
full days of accrued sick leave in excess of sixty days. Sick leave for which
compensation has been received shall be deducted from accrued sick leave at the
rate of four days for every one day's monetary compensation.

(3)
At the time of separation from state service due to retirement or death, an
eligible employee or the employee's estate may elect to receive remuneration at
a rate equal to one day's current monetary compensation of the employee for
each four full days of accrued sick leave.

(4)
Remuneration or benefits received under this section shall not be included for
the purpose of computing a retirement allowance under any public retirement
system in this state.

(5)
Except as provided in subsections (7) through (9) of this section for employees
not covered by chapter 41.06 RCW, this section shall be administered, and rules
shall be adopted to carry out its purposes, by the ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director of personnel for persons subject to
chapter 41.06 RCW: PROVIDED, That determination of classes of eligible
employees shall be subject to approval by the office of financial management.

(6)
Should the legislature revoke any remuneration or benefits granted under this
section, no affected employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such
benefits as a matter of contractual right.

(7)
In lieu of remuneration for unused sick leave at retirement as provided in
subsection (3) of this section, an agency head or designee may with equivalent
funds, provide eligible employees with a benefit plan that provides for
reimbursement for medical expenses. This plan shall be implemented only after
consultation with affected groups of employees. For eligible employees covered
by chapter 41.06 RCW, procedures for the implementation of these plans shall be
adopted by the ((Washington personnel resources board)) director of
personnel. For eligible employees exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW, and
classified employees who have opted out of coverage of chapter 41.06 RCW as
provided in RCW 41.56.201, implementation procedures shall be adopted by an
agency head having jurisdiction over the employees.

(8)
Implementing procedures adopted by the ((Washington personnel resources
board)) director of personnel or agency heads shall require that
each medical expense plan authorized by subsection (7) of this section apply to
all eligible employees in any one of the following groups: (a) Employees in an
agency; (b) employees in a major organizational subdivision of an agency; (c)
employees at a major operating location of an agency; (d) exempt employees
under the jurisdiction of an elected or appointed Washington state executive;
(e) employees of the Washington state senate; (f) employees of the Washington
state house of representatives; (g) classified employees in a bargaining unit
established by the Washington personnel resources board; or (h) other group of
employees defined by an agency head that is not designed to provide an individual-employee
choice regarding participation in a medical expense plan. However, medical
expense plans for eligible employees in any of the groups under (a) through (h)
of this subsection who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement shall be
implemented only by written agreement with the bargaining unit's exclusive
representative and a separate medical expense plan may be provided for
unrepresented employees.

(9)
Medical expense plans authorized by subsection (7) of this section must require
as a condition of participation in the plan that employees in the group
affected by the plan sign an agreement with the employer. The agreement must
include a provision to hold the employer harmless should the United States
government find that the employer or the employee is in debt to the United
States as a result of the employee not paying income taxes due on the
equivalent funds placed into the plan, or as a result of the employer not
withholding or deducting a tax, assessment, or other payment on the funds as
required by federal law. The agreement must also include a provision that
requires an eligible employee to forfeit remuneration under subsection (3) of
this section if the employee belongs to a group that has been designated to
participate in the medical expense plan permitted under this section and the
employee refuses to execute the required agreement.

Sec.
32. RCW
41.50.804 and 1993 c 281 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
contained in this chapter shall be construed to alter any existing collective
bargaining agreement until any such agreement has expired or until any such
bargaining unit has been modified by action of the ((Washington personnel
resources board)) director of personnel as provided by law.

Sec.
33. RCW
43.06.425 and 1993 c 281 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((Washington personnel resources board)) director of personnel
shall adopt rules to provide that:

(1)
Successful completion of an internship under RCW 43.06.420 shall be considered
as employment experience at the level at which the intern was placed;

(2)
Persons leaving classified or exempt positions in state government in order to
take an internship under RCW 43.06.420: (a) Have the right of reversion to the
previous position at any time during the internship or upon completion of the
internship; and (b) shall continue to receive all fringe benefits as if they
had never left their classified or exempt positions;

(3)
Participants in the undergraduate internship program who were not public
employees prior to accepting a position in the program receive sick leave
allowances commensurate with other state employees;

(4)
Participants in the executive fellows program who were not public employees
prior to accepting a position in the program receive sick and vacation leave
allowances commensurate with other state employees.

Sec.
34. RCW
43.33A.100 and 1993 c 281 s 50 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state investment board shall maintain appropriate offices and employ such
personnel as may be necessary to perform its duties. Employment by the
investment board shall include but not be limited to an executive director,
investment officers, and a confidential secretary, which positions are exempt
from classified service under chapter 41.06 RCW. Employment of the executive
director by the board shall be for a term of three years, and such employment
shall be subject to confirmation of the state finance committee: PROVIDED,
That nothing shall prevent the board from dismissing the director for cause
before the expiration of the term nor shall anything prohibit the board, with the
confirmation of the state finance committee, from employing the same individual
as director in succeeding terms. Compensation levels for the investment
officers employed by the investment board shall be established by the ((Washington
personnel resources board)) director of personnel.

As
of July 1, 1981, all employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW and engaged
in duties assumed by the state investment board on July 1, 1981, are assigned
to the state investment board. The transfer shall not diminish any rights
granted these employees under chapter 41.06 RCW nor exempt the employees from
any action which may occur thereafter in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW.

All
existing contracts and obligations pertaining to the functions transferred to
the state investment board in ((this 1980 act)) chapter 3, Laws of
1981 shall remain in full force and effect, and shall be performed by the
board. None of the transfers directed by ((this 1980 act)) chapter
3, Laws of 1981 shall affect the validity of any act performed by a state
entity or by any official or employee thereof prior to July 1, 1981.

Sec.
35. RCW
49.46.010 and 1997 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Director" means the director of labor and industries;

(2)
"Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of employment,
payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible
into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges, or
allowances as may be permitted by rules of the director;

(3)
"Employ" includes to permit to work;

(4)
"Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly
or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;

(5)
"Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but shall
not include:

(a)
Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid on a piece rate
basis in an operation which has been, and is generally and customarily
recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis in the region of
employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her permanent residence to the
farm on which he or she is employed; and (iii) who has been employed in
agriculture less than thirteen weeks during the preceding calendar year;

(b)
Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private home, unless
performed in the course of the employer's trade, business, or profession;

(c)
Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or
professional capacity or in the capacity of outside salesman as those terms are
defined and delimited by rules of the director. However, those terms shall be
defined and delimited by the ((Washington personnel resources board pursuant
to)) director of personnel under chapter 41.06 RCW for employees
employed under the director of personnel's jurisdiction;

(d)
Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable,
religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or nonprofit
organization where the employer-employee relationship does not in fact exist or
where the services are rendered to such organizations gratuitously. If the
individual receives reimbursement in lieu of compensation for normally incurred
out-of-pocket expenses or receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of
voluntary service rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to
exist for the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government or publicly supported retirement
system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(e)
Any individual employed full time by any state or local governmental body or
agency who provides voluntary services but only with regard to the provision of
the voluntary services. The voluntary services and any compensation therefor
shall not affect or add to qualification, entitlement or benefit rights under
any state, local government, or publicly supported retirement system other than
that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(f)
Any newspaper vendor or carrier;

(g)
Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate Commerce Act;

(h)
Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention activities;

(i)
Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged with child care
responsibilities engaged primarily in the development of character or
citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or providing or sponsoring
recreational opportunities or facilities for young people or members of the
armed forces of the United States;

(j)
Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or sleep at the place
of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a substantial portion of his
or her work time subject to call, and not engaged in the performance of active
duties;

(k)
Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or municipal correctional,
detention, treatment or rehabilitative institution;

(l)
Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office of the state,
any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi municipal corporation,
political subdivision, or any instrumentality thereof, or any employee of the
state legislature;

(m)
All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries operated by the
department of transportation;

(n)
Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an American vessel;

(6)
"Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment
in which employees are gainfully employed;

(7)
"Retail or service establishment" means an establishment seventy-five
percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or services, or both,
is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales or services in the
particular industry.

Sec.
36. RCW
13.40.320 and 1997 c 338 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services shall establish and operate a
medium security juvenile offender basic training camp program. The department
shall site a juvenile offender basic training camp facility in the most
cost-effective facility possible and shall review the possibility of using an
existing abandoned and/or available state, federally, or military-owned site or
facility.

(2)
The department may contract under this chapter with private companies, the
national guard, or other federal, state, or local agencies to operate the
juvenile offender basic training camp((, notwithstanding the provisions of
RCW 41.06.380)). Requests for proposals from possible contractors shall
not call for payment on a per diem basis.

(3)
The juvenile offender basic training camp shall accommodate at least seventy
offenders. The beds shall count as additions to, and not be used as
replacements for, existing bed capacity at existing department of social and
health services juvenile facilities.

(4)
The juvenile offender basic training camp shall be a structured and regimented
model lasting one hundred twenty days emphasizing the building up of an
offender's self-esteem, confidence, and discipline. The juvenile offender
basic training camp program shall provide participants with basic education,
prevocational training, work-based learning, live work, work ethic skills,
conflict resolution counseling, substance abuse intervention, anger management
counseling, and structured intensive physical training. The juvenile offender
basic training camp program shall have a curriculum training and work schedule
that incorporates a balanced assignment of these or other rehabilitation and
training components for no less than sixteen hours per day, six days a week.

The
department shall adopt rules for the safe and effective operation of the
juvenile offender basic training camp program, standards for an offender's
successful program completion, and rules for the continued after-care
supervision of offenders who have successfully completed the program.

(5)
Offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp option shall
be those with a disposition of not more than sixty-five weeks. Violent and sex
offenders shall not be eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp
program.

(6)
If the court determines that the offender is eligible for the juvenile offender
basic training camp option, the court may recommend that the department place
the offender in the program. The department shall evaluate the offender and
may place the offender in the program. The evaluation shall include, at a
minimum, a risk assessment developed by the department and designed to
determine the offender's suitability for the program. No juvenile who is
assessed as a high risk offender or suffers from any mental or physical
problems that could endanger his or her health or drastically affect his or her
performance in the program shall be admitted to or retained in the juvenile offender
basic training camp program.

(7)
All juvenile offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp
sentencing option shall spend one hundred twenty days of their disposition in a
juvenile offender basic training camp. If the juvenile offender's activities
while in the juvenile offender basic training camp are so disruptive to the
juvenile offender basic training camp program, as determined by the secretary
according to rules adopted by the department, as to result in the removal of the
juvenile offender from the juvenile offender basic training camp program, or if
the offender cannot complete the juvenile offender basic training camp program
due to medical problems, the secretary shall require that the offender be
committed to a juvenile institution to serve the entire remainder of his or her
disposition, less the amount of time already served in the juvenile offender
basic training camp program.

(8)
All offenders who successfully graduate from the one hundred twenty day
juvenile offender basic training camp program shall spend the remainder of
their disposition on parole in a division of juvenile rehabilitation intensive
aftercare program in the local community. The program shall provide for the
needs of the offender based on his or her progress in the aftercare program as
indicated by ongoing assessment of those needs and progress. The intensive
aftercare program shall monitor postprogram juvenile offenders and assist them
to successfully reintegrate into the community. In addition, the program shall
develop a process for closely monitoring and assessing public safety risks.
The intensive aftercare program shall be designed and funded by the department
of social and health services.

(9)
The department shall also develop and maintain a data base to measure
recidivism rates specific to this incarceration program. The data base shall
maintain data on all juvenile offenders who complete the juvenile offender
basic training camp program for a period of two years after they have completed
the program. The data base shall also maintain data on the criminal activity,
educational progress, and employment activities of all juvenile offenders who
participated in the program.

Sec.
37. RCW
39.29.006 and 1998 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Agency" means any state office or activity of the executive and
judicial branches of state government, including state agencies, departments,
offices, divisions, boards, commissions, and educational, correctional, and
other types of institutions.

(2)
"Client services" means services provided directly to agency clients
including, but not limited to, medical and dental services, employment and
training programs, residential care, and subsidized housing.

(3)
"Competitive solicitation" means a documented formal process
providing an equal and open opportunity to qualified parties and culminating in
a selection based on criteria which may include such factors as the
consultant's fees or costs, ability, capacity, experience, reputation,
responsiveness to time limitations, responsiveness to solicitation
requirements, quality of previous performance, and compliance with statutes and
rules relating to contracts or services.

(4)
"Consultant" means an independent individual or firm contracting with
an agency to perform a service or render an opinion or recommendation according
to the consultant's methods and without being subject to the control of the
agency except as to the result of the work. The agency monitors progress under
the contract and authorizes payment.

(5)
"Emergency" means a set of unforeseen circumstances beyond the
control of the agency that either:

(a)
Present a real, immediate threat to the proper performance of essential
functions; or

(b)
May result in material loss or damage to property, bodily injury, or loss of
life if immediate action is not taken.

(6)
"Evidence of competition" means documentation demonstrating that the
agency has solicited responses from multiple firms in selecting a consultant.

(7)
"Personal service" means professional or technical expertise provided
by a consultant to accomplish a specific study, project, task, or other work
statement. This term does not include purchased services as defined under
subsection (9) of this section. This term does include client services.

(8)
"Personal service contract" means an agreement, or any amendment
thereto, with a consultant for the rendering of personal services to the state
which is consistent with ((RCW 41.06.380)) section 9 of this act.

(9)
"Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing and necessary functions. This term includes,
but is not limited to, services acquired under RCW 43.19.190 or 43.105.041 for
equipment maintenance and repair; operation of a physical plant; security;
computer hardware and software maintenance; data entry; key punch services; and
computer time-sharing, contract programming, and analysis.

(10)
"Sole source" means a consultant providing professional or technical
expertise of such a unique nature that the consultant is clearly and
justifiably the only practicable source to provide the service. The
justification shall be based on either the uniqueness of the service or sole
availability at the location required.

Sec.
38. RCW
47.46.040 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All projects designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must comply
with all applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the agreement
is executed, including but not limited to the following provisions: Chapter
39.12 RCW, this title, ((RCW 41.06.380)) section 9 of this act,
chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW 49.60.180, and 49 C.F.R. Part 21.

(2)
The secretary or a designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other
experts within and outside state government in the negotiation and development
of the agreements.

(3)
Agreements shall provide for private ownership of the projects during the
construction period. After completion and final acceptance of each project or
discrete segment thereof, the agreement shall provide for state ownership of
the transportation systems and facilities and lease to the private entity unless
the state elects to provide for ownership of the facility by the private entity
during the term of the agreement.

The
state shall lease each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project
segments, to the private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4)
The department may exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the
development, construction, financing operation, and maintenance of
transportation projects under this chapter. Agreements for maintenance
services entered into under this section shall provide for full reimbursement
for services rendered by the department or other state agencies. Agreements
for police services for projects, involving state highway routes, developed
under agreements shall be entered into with the Washington state patrol. The
agreement for police services shall provide that the state patrol will be
reimbursed for costs on a comparable basis with the costs incurred for
comparable service on other state highway routes. The department may provide
services for which it is reimbursed, including but not limited to preliminary
planning, environmental certification, and preliminary design of the
demonstration projects.

(5)
The plans and specifications for each project constructed under this section
shall comply with the department's standards for state projects. A facility
constructed by and leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the
state highway system for purposes of identification, maintenance, and
enforcement of traffic laws and for the purposes of applicable sections of this
title. Upon reversion of the facility to the state, the project must meet all
applicable state standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for
reconstruction or renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet
all applicable state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6)
For the purpose of facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity
in the financing, development, construction, and operation of the transportation
systems and facilities, the agreements may include provisions for the
department to exercise its authority, including the lease of facilities, rights
of way, and airspace, exercise of the power of eminent domain, granting of
development rights and opportunities, granting of necessary easements and
rights of access, issuance of permits and other authorizations, protection from
competition, remedies in the event of default of either of the parties,
granting of contractual and real property rights, liability during construction
and the term of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of rights of way
in excess of appraised value, and any other provision deemed necessary by the
secretary.

(7)
The agreements entered into under this section may include provisions
authorizing the state to grant necessary easements and lease to a private
entity existing rights of way or rights of way subsequently acquired with
public or private financing. The agreements may also include provisions to
lease to the entity airspace above or below the right of way associated or to
be associated with the private entity's transportation facility. In
consideration for the reversion rights in these privately constructed
facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the lease of airspace
rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to exceed fifty
years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department continues to
lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so only at fair
market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity the right of
first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by the state in
the vicinity of the public-private project.

(8)
Agreements under this section may include any contractual provision that is
necessary to protect the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred
to study, plan, design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce
laws, and maintain toll highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not
unreasonably inhibit or prohibit the development of additional public
transportation systems and facilities. Agreements under this section must
secure and maintain liability insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to
protect the project's viability and may address state indemnification of the
private entity for design and construction liability where the state has
approved relevant design and construction plans.

(9)
Agreements shall include a process that provides for public involvement in
decision making with respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a)
In carrying out the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of
this section, the private entity shall proactively seek public participation
through a process appropriate to the characteristics of the project that
assesses and demonstrates public support among: Users of the project,
residents of communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of
communities impacted by the project.

(b)
The private entity shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process
that provides, periodically throughout the development and implementation of
the project, users and residents of communities in the affected project area an
opportunity to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not
limited to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi)
tolling or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project
cost; (viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other
salient characteristics.

(c)
If the affected project area has not been defined, the private entity shall
define the affected project area by conducting, at a minimum: (i) A comparison
of the estimated percentage of residents of communities in the vicinity of the
project and in other communities impacted by the project who could be subject
to tolls or user fees and the estimated percentage of other users and transient
traffic that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (ii) an analysis of the
anticipated traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential
economic impact resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on
residents, commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the
vicinity of and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic
impact of tolls or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and
(v) an analysis of the relationship of the project to state transportation
needs and benefits.

The
agreement may require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the
affected project area.

(d)
In seeking public participation, the private entity shall establish a local
involvement committee or committees comprised of residents of the affected
project area, individuals who represent cities and counties in the affected
project area, organizations formed to support or oppose the project, if such
organizations exist, and users of the project. The private entity shall, at a
minimum, establish a committee as required under the specifications of RCW
47.46.030(((5)(b) (ii) and (iii))) (6)(b) (ii) and (iii) and
appointments to such committee shall be made no later than thirty days after
the project area is defined.

(e)
Local involvement committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the
department and the private entity on all issues related to the development and
implementation of the public involvement process established under this
section.

(f)
The department and the private entity shall provide the legislative
transportation committee and local involvement committees with progress reports
on the status of the public involvement process including the results of an
advisory vote, if any occurs.

(11)
Nothing in this chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents
to render such advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in
the best interests of the state and the public.

Sec.
39. RCW
72.09.100 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the power to provide
for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove statutory and other
restrictions which have limited work programs in the past. For purposes of
establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the
department consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:

(1)
CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class
shall be operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

The
customer model industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the
department to provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with
products or services currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign
suppliers. The correctional industries board of directors shall review these
proposed industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The
department of corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody
services without charge to the participating firms.

Inmates
who work in free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They
shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature
in the locality in which the industry is located, as determined by the director
of correctional industries. If the director cannot reasonably determine the
comparable wage, then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

An
inmate who is employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall
not be eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2)
CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The
industries selected for development within this class shall, as much as
possible, match the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the
work opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely
patterned after private sector industries but with the objective of reducing
public support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services of
this industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will be
ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing
manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit
organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons.
Correctional industries products and services shall be reviewed by the
correctional industries board of directors before offering such products and
services for sale to private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct
a yearly marketing review of the products and services offered under this
subsection. Such review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of
the proposed products and services on the Washington state business community.
To avoid waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no
public sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber,
agricultural, and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private persons,
at private sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and
animal husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to
private persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of
surplus products shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by
the secretary.

Security
and custody services shall be provided without charge by the department of
corrections.

Inmates
working in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
be paid for their work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid
for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located
and which is approved by the director of correctional industries.

Subject
to approval of the correctional industries board, provisions of ((RCW
41.06.380 prohibiting contracting out work performed by classified employees))
section 9(2)(a) of this act shall not apply to contracts with Washington
state businesses entered into by the department of corrections through class II
industries.

(3)
CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall
be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and
managed to accomplish the following objectives:

(a)
Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and experience so that the
inmate will be able to qualify for better work both within correctional
industries and the free community. It is not intended that an inmate's work
within this class of industries should be his or her final and total work
experience as an inmate.

(b)
Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c)
Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All
able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in
other classes of industries shall work in this class.

Except
for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be
paid for their work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale
shall be adopted by the secretary of corrections.

(4)
CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be operated
by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed to
provide services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or
infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.

Inmates
in this program shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or
licensed by the department of corrections. A unit of local government shall
provide work supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the
inmate's wage.

The
department of corrections shall reimburse participating units of local
government for liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates
who work in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar
nature in the locality in which the industry is located.

(5)
CLASS V: COMMUNITY SERVICE PROGRAMS. Programs in this class shall be subject
to supervision by the department of corrections. The purpose of this class of
industries is to enable an inmate, placed on community supervision, to work off
all or part of a community service order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment
shall be in a community service program operated by the state, local units of
government, or a nonprofit agency.

To the extent that funds are specifically made available for such
purposes, the department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for
workers compensation insurance costs.

Sec.
40. RCW
49.74.030 and 1993 c 281 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The commission in conjunction with the department of personnel or
the state patrol, whichever is appropriate, shall attempt to resolve the
noncompliance through conciliation. If an agreement is reached for the
elimination of noncompliance, the agreement shall be reduced to writing and an
order shall be issued by the commission setting forth the terms of the
agreement. The noncomplying state agency, institution of higher education, or
state patrol shall make a good faith effort to conciliate and make a full
commitment to correct the noncompliance with any action that may be necessary
to achieve compliance, provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules
adopted under RCW 41.06.150(((21))) (19) and 43.43.340(5),
whichever is appropriate.

Sec.
41. RCW
49.74.040 and 1985 c 365 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

If
no agreement can be reached under RCW 49.74.030, the commission may refer the
matter to the administrative law judge for hearing pursuant to RCW 49.60.250.
If the administrative law judge finds that the state agency, institution of
higher education, or state patrol has not made a good faith effort to correct
the noncompliance, the administrative law judge shall order the state agency,
institution of higher education, or state patrol to comply with this chapter.
The administrative law judge may order any action that may be necessary to
achieve compliance, provided such action is not inconsistent with the rules
adopted under RCW ((28B.16.100(20),)) 41.06.150(((21),)) (19)
and 43.43.340(5), whichever is appropriate.

An order by the administrative law judge may be appealed to
superior court.

Sec.
42. RCW
72.10.030 and 1989 c 157 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the secretary may enter into
contracts with health care practitioners, health care facilities, and other
entities or agents as may be necessary to provide basic medical care to
inmates. ((The contracts shall not cause the termination of classified
employees of the department rendering the services at the time the contract is
executed.))

(2)
In contracting for services, the secretary is authorized to provide for
indemnification of health care practitioners who cannot obtain professional
liability insurance through reasonable effort, from liability on any action,
claim, or proceeding instituted against them arising out of the good faith
performance or failure of performance of services on behalf of the department.
The contracts may provide that for the purposes of chapter 4.92 RCW only, those
health care practitioners with whom the department has contracted shall be
considered state employees.

Sec.
43. RCW
82.01.070 and 1997 c 156 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall have charge and general supervision of the department of
revenue. The director shall appoint an assistant director for administration,
hereinafter in chapter 26, Laws of 1967 ex. sess. referred to as the assistant
director, and subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW may appoint and
employ such clerical, technical and other personnel as may be necessary to
carry out the powers and duties of the department. The director may also enter
into personal service contracts with ((out-of-state)) individuals or
business entities for the performance of auditing services ((outside the
state of Washington when normal efforts to recruit classified employees are
unsuccessful)). The director may agree to pay to the department's
employees or contractors who reside out of state such amounts in addition to
their ordinary rate of compensation as are necessary to defray the extra costs
of facilities, living, and other costs reasonably related to the out-of-state
services, subject to legislative appropriation for those purposes. The special
allowances shall be in such amounts or at such rates as are approved by the
office of financial management. This section does not apply to audit functions
performed in states contiguous to the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 44. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the personnel appeals board pertaining to
appeals filed under RCW 41.06.170 on or after the effective date of this
section are transferred to the Washington personnel resources board. All appeals
filed under RCW 41.06.170 before the effective date of this section shall be
resolved by the personnel appeals board in accordance with the authorities,
rules, and procedures that were in effect at the time of the appeal.

(2)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of personnel pertaining to the
powers, functions, and duties transferred in subsection (1) of this section
shall be delivered to the custody of the Washington personnel resources board.
All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the personnel appeals board in carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred in subsection (1) of this section shall be
made available to the Washington personnel resources board. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and
duties transferred in subsection (1) of this section shall be assigned to the
Washington personnel resources board.

(3)
Any appropriations made to the personnel appeals board for carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred in subsection (1) of this section
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the Washington personnel resources board.

(4)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(5)
After the effective date of this section, the director of personnel and the
executive secretary of the personnel appeals board shall meet and agree upon a
schedule for the transfer of personnel appeals board employees and property to
the Washington personnel resources board. Whenever a question arises as to the
transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files,
equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the
powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the
director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper
allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(6)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the personnel
appeals board under this section does not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section. All existing contracts
and obligations of the personnel appeals board shall remain in full force and
shall be performed by the personnel appeals board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 45. (1)
The personnel appeals board is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and
functions are hereby transferred to the Washington personnel resources board.
All references to the executive secretary of the personnel appeals board or the
personnel appeals board in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to
mean the director of personnel or the Washington personnel resources board,
respectively.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the personnel appeals board shall be delivered to
the custody of the Washington personnel resources board. All cabinets,
furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property
employed by the personnel appeals board shall be made available to the
department of personnel. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the
personnel appeals board shall be assigned to the department of personnel.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the personnel appeals board shall, on the effective date
of this section, be transferred and credited to the department of personnel.

(c)
If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the personnel appeals board are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of personnel. All employees classified under
this chapter, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department of
personnel to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly,
without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the personnel appeals board shall be
continued and acted upon by the Washington personnel resources board. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the Washington personnel resources board.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the personnel
appeals board shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the
effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 46.
Sections 9 and 12 through 16 of this act are each added to chapter 41.06 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 47. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
41.64.010 (Personnel appeals
board--Created--Membership--Definitions) and 1981 c 311 s 1;

(2) RCW
41.64.020 (Removal of members--Hearing) and 1981 c 311 s 3;

(3) RCW
41.64.030 (Compensation of members--Travel expenses--Disclosure
of financial affairs) and 1984 c 287 s 73, 1984 c 34 s 4, & 1981 c 311 s 4;

(4) RCW
41.64.040 (Election of chairperson--Biennial meetings) and 1981 c
311 s 5;

(5) RCW
41.64.050 (Executive secretary--Appointment of assistants) and
1981 c 311 s 6;

(6) RCW
41.64.060 (Location of principal office--Hearings--Procedure) and
1981 c 311 s 7;

(7) RCW
41.64.070 (Journal of official actions) and 1981 c 311 s 8;

(8) RCW
41.64.080 (Employee appeals--Hearings examiners) and 1981 c 311 s
9;

(9) RCW
41.64.090 (Employee appeals--Jurisdiction) and 1999 c
. . . s 27 (section 27 of this act), 1993 c 281 s 41, & 1981 c
311 s 10;

(10) RCW
41.64.100 (Employee appeals--Hearing--Decision to be rendered
within ninety days, exceptions) and 1997 c 386 s 43 & 1981 c 311 s 11;

(11) RCW
41.64.110 (Employee appeals--Hearing--Procedure--Official record)
and 1985 c 461 s 7 & 1981 c 311 s 12;

(12) RCW
41.64.120 (Employee appeals--Findings of fact, conclusions of
law, order--Notice to employee and employing agency) and 1981 c 311 s 13;

(13) RCW
41.64.130 (Employee appeals--Review by superior
court--Grounds--Notice, service--Certified transcript) and 1981 c 311 s 14;

(14) RCW
41.64.140 (Employee appeals--Review by superior
court--Procedure--Appellate review) and 1988 c 202 s 42 & 1981 c 311 s 15;
and

(15) RCW
41.64.910 (Severability--1981 c 311) and 1981 c 311 s 24.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 48. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
41.06.163 (Comprehensive salary and fringe benefit survey plan
required--Contents) and 1993 c 281 s 30, 1987 c 185 s 9, 1986 c 158 s 6, 1979 c
151 s 59, & 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 3;

(2) RCW
41.06.165 (Salary surveys--Criteria) and 1977 ex.s. c 152 s 4;

(3) RCW
41.06.380 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2; and

(4) RCW
41.06.382 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 49.
Provisions of a collective bargaining agreement adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW
that are in effect on the effective date of section 9 of this act and that
conflict with section 5 or 9 of this act shall continue in effect until contract
expiration, unless a superseding agreement resolving the conflict is executed
by the parties before expiration; after expiration, any new agreement executed
between the parties must be consistent with sections 5 and 9 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 50. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 51. (1)
Sections 3, 5, 6, 9, 10, 17 through 28, 31 through 43, and 48 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and take effect July 1, 2000.

(2)
Sections 4, 11 through 16, and 44 of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

(3) Sections 29, 30, 45, and 47 of this act take effect July 1,
2002.

---
END ---