BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All property owned and used by a community public radio station is exempt from
taxation.

(2)
As used in this section "community public radio station" means a
nonprofit organization, other than a government entity or an educational
institution, that holds a noncommercial FM broadcast license under 47 C.F.R.
Sec. 73.503.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.36.810 and 1999 c 203 s 3 and 1999 c 139 s 4 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Upon cessation of a use under which an exemption has been granted pursuant to
RCW 84.36.030, 84.36.037, 84.36.040, 84.36.041, 84.36.042, 84.36.043,
84.36.046, 84.36.050, 84.36.060, 84.36.550, 84.36.560, ((and)) 84.36.570,
and section 1 of this act, the county treasurer shall collect all taxes
which would have been paid had the property not been exempt during the three
years preceding, or the life of such exemption, if such be less, together with
the interest at the same rate and computed in the same way as that upon
delinquent property taxes. If the property has been granted an exemption for
more than ten consecutive years, taxes and interest shall not be assessed under
this section.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section applies only when ownership of the property is
transferred or when fifty-one percent or more of the area of the property loses
its exempt status. The additional tax under subsection (1) of this section
shall not be imposed if the cessation of use resulted solely from:

(a)
Transfer to a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation for a use
which also qualifies and is granted exemption under this chapter;

(b)
A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or sale or
transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the
exercise of such power;

(c)
Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or
city within which the property is located which disallows the present use of
such property;

(d)
A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such
calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the organization, association, or
corporation changing the use of such property;

(e)
Relocation of the activity and use of another location or site except for undeveloped
properties of camp facilities exempted under RCW 84.36.030;

(f)
Cancellation of a lease on leased property that had been exempt under this
chapter ((or RCW 84.36.560)); or

(g)
A change in the exempt portion of a home for the aging under RCW 84.36.041(3),
as long as some portion of the home remains exempt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act is effective for taxes levied for collection in 2001 and
thereafter.

---
END ---