BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that cardiovascular disease is the leading cause of death in
Washington state, accounting for approximately forty-two percent of all
deaths. The legislature also finds that many of these deaths can be prevented
or delayed by reducing risk factors and improving access to services. Some
rural areas, such as Walla Walla county, have a disproportionately high average
annual rate for heart disease while lacking access to available life-saving
medical resources. The legislature further finds that access to quality
coronary tertiary health care services must be assured, especially for rural
communities. The purpose of this act is to improve rural access to available
and needed medical technology and services for coronary heart disease
procedures.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.38.025 and 1997 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

When
used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated.

(1)
"Board of health" means the state board of health created pursuant to
chapter 43.20 RCW.

(2)
"Capital expenditure" is an expenditure, including a force account
expenditure (i.e., an expenditure for a construction project undertaken by a
nursing home facility as its own contractor) which, under generally accepted
accounting principles, is not properly chargeable as an expense of operation or
maintenance. Where a person makes an acquisition under lease or comparable
arrangement, or through donation, which would have required review if the
acquisition had been made by purchase, such expenditure shall be deemed a
capital expenditure. Capital expenditures include donations of equipment or
facilities to a nursing home facility which if acquired directly by such
facility would be subject to certificate of need review under the provisions of
this chapter and transfer of equipment or facilities for less than fair market
value if a transfer of the equipment or facilities at fair market value would
be subject to such review. The cost of any studies, surveys, designs, plans,
working drawings, specifications, and other activities essential to the
acquisition, improvement, expansion, or replacement of any plant or equipment
with respect to which such expenditure is made shall be included in determining
the amount of the expenditure.

(3)
"Continuing care retirement community" means an entity which provides
shelter and services under continuing care contracts with its members and which
sponsors or includes a health care facility or a health service. A
"continuing care contract" means a contract to provide a person, for
the duration of that person's life or for a term in excess of one year, shelter
along with nursing, medical, health-related, or personal care services, which
is conditioned upon the transfer of property, the payment of an entrance fee to
the provider of such services, or the payment of periodic charges for the care
and services involved. A continuing care contract is not excluded from this
definition because the contract is mutually terminable or because shelter and
services are not provided at the same location.

(4)
"Department" means the department of health.

(5)
"Expenditure minimum" means, for the purposes of the certificate of
need program, one million dollars adjusted by the department by rule to reflect
changes in the United States department of commerce composite construction cost
index; or a lesser amount required by federal law and established by the
department by rule.

(6)
"Health care facility" means hospices, hospitals, psychiatric
hospitals, nursing homes, kidney disease treatment centers, ambulatory surgical
facilities, and home health agencies, and includes such facilities when owned
and operated by a political subdivision or instrumentality of the state and
such other facilities as required by federal law and implementing regulations,
but does not include any health facility or institution conducted by and for
those who rely exclusively upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in
accordance with the creed or tenets of any well-recognized church or religious
denomination, or any health facility or institution operated for the exclusive
care of members of a convent as defined in RCW 84.36.800 or rectory, monastery,
or other institution operated for the care of members of the clergy. In addition,
the term does not include any nonprofit hospital: (a) Which is operated
exclusively to provide health care services for children; (b) which does not
charge fees for such services; and (c) if not contrary to federal law as
necessary to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

(7)
"Health maintenance organization" means a public or private
organization, organized under the laws of the state, which:

(a)
Is a qualified health maintenance organization under Title XIII, section
1310(d) of the Public Health Services Act; or

(b)(i)
Provides or otherwise makes available to enrolled participants health care
services, including at least the following basic health care services: Usual
physician services, hospitalization, laboratory, x-ray, emergency, and preventive
services, and out-of-area coverage; (ii) is compensated (except for copayments)
for the provision of the basic health care services listed in (b)(i) to
enrolled participants by a payment which is paid on a periodic basis without
regard to the date the health care services are provided and which is fixed
without regard to the frequency, extent, or kind of health service actually
provided; and (iii) provides physicians' services primarily (A) directly
through physicians who are either employees or partners of such organization,
or (B) through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more groups of
physicians (organized on a group practice or individual practice basis).

(8)
"Health services" means clinically related (i.e., preventive, diagnostic,
curative, rehabilitative, or palliative) services and includes alcoholism, drug
abuse, and mental health services and as defined in federal law.

(9)
"Health service area" means a geographic region appropriate for
effective health planning which includes a broad range of health services.

(10)
"Person" means an individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a
corporation (including associations, joint stock companies, and insurance
companies), the state, or a political subdivision or instrumentality of the
state, including a municipal corporation or a hospital district.

(11)
"Provider" generally means a health care professional or an
organization, institution, or other entity providing health care but the
precise definition for this term shall be established by rule of the
department, consistent with federal law.

(12)
"Public health" means the level of well-being of the general
population; those actions in a community necessary to preserve, protect, and
promote the health of the people for which government is responsible; and the
governmental system developed to guarantee the preservation of the health of
the people.

(13)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(14)
"Tertiary health service" means a specialized service that meets
complicated medical needs of people and requires sufficient patient volume to
optimize provider effectiveness, quality of service, and improved outcomes of
care. "Tertiary health service" does not include open heart
surgery, therapeutic cardiac catheterization, and percutaneous translumenal
coronary angioplasty in or through a hospital located within the limits of the
city of Walla Walla.

(15) "Hospital" means any health care institution which
is required to qualify for a license under RCW 70.41.020(2); or as a
psychiatric hospital under chapter 71.12 RCW.

---
END ---