BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.90.470 and 1984 c 221 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The use of state-owned aquatic lands for public utility lines owned
by a governmental entity, a cooperative association formed under chapter
23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW,
or a public service company subject to regulation by the Washington utilities
and transportation commission shall be granted without charge by an
agreement, permit, or other instrument if the use is consistent with the
purposes of RCW 79.90.450 through 79.90.460 and does not obstruct navigation or
other public uses. Use for public parks or public recreation purposes shall be
granted without charge if the aquatic lands and improvements are available to
the general public on a first-come, first-served basis and are not managed to
produce a profit for the operator or a concessionaire. The department may
lease state-owned tidelands that are in front of state parks only with the
approval of the state parks and recreation commission. The department may
lease bedlands in front of state parks only after the department has consulted
with the state parks and recreation commission.

---
END ---